<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20020812165621.txt.gz
TIME:20020812165621
EVENTS:	
TEXT:
ITEM: 
Item 9.   Regulation FD Disclosure
On August 12, 2002, Philip M. Condit, and Michael M. Sears, Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, of The Boeing Compay each signed the sworn statements required by the Securities and Exchange Commission Order No. 4-460. The two statements are furnished as Exhibit 99.1 and 99.2 to this report and are incorporated by reference herein.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Exhibit Index to The Boeing Company Current Report on Form 8-K dated August 12, 2002:

I, Philip M. Condit, state and attest that: (1)  To the best of my knowledge, based upon a review of the covered reports of The Boeing Company, and, except as corrected or supplemented in a subsequent covered report: *no covered report contained an untrue statement of a material fact as of the end of the period covered by such report (or in the case of a report on Form 8-K or definitive proxy materials, as of the date on which it was filed); and *no covered report omitted to state a material fact necessary to make the statements in the covered report, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading as of the end of the period covered by such report (or in the case of a report on Form 8-K or definitive proxy materials, as of the date on which it was filed). (2)  I have reviewed the contents of this statement with The Boeing Company's audit committee. (3)  In this statement under oath, each of the following, if filed on or before the date of this statement, is a "covered report": *The Boeing Company's 2001 Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the Commission on March 8, 2002; and *all reports on Form 10-Q, all reports on Form 8-K and all definitive proxy materials of The Boeing Company filed with the Commission subsequent to the filing of the Form 10-K identified above; and *any amendments to any of the foregoing. /s/ Philip M. Condit Philip M. Condit Chairman of The Board, Chief Executive Officer and Director August 12, 2002 Subscribed and sworn to me this 12 day of August 2002. /s/ Mary J. Ulibarri Mary J. Ulibarri Notary Public My Commission Expires:  October 5, 2005

I, Michael M. Sears, state and attest that: (1)  To the best of my knowledge, based upon a review of the covered reports of The Boeing Company, and, except as corrected or supplemented in a subsequent covered report: *no covered report contained an untrue statement of a material fact as of the end of the period covered by such report (or in the case of a report on Form 8-K or definitive proxy materials, as of the date on which it was filed); and *no covered report omitted to state a material fact necessary to make the statements in the covered report, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading as of the end of the period covered by such report (or in the case of a report on Form 8-K or definitive proxy materials, as of the date on which it was filed). (2)  I have reviewed the contents of this statement with The Boeing Company's audit committee. (3)  In this statement under oath, each of the following, if filed on or before the date of this statement, is a "covered report": *The Boeing Company's 2001 Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the Commission on March 8, 2002; and *all reports on Form 10-Q, all reports on Form 8-K and all definitive proxy materials of The Boeing Company filed with the Commission subsequent to the filing of the Form 10-K identified above; and *any amendments to any of the foregoing. /s/ Michael M. Sears Michael M. Sears Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer August 12, 2002 Subscribed and sworn to me this 12 day of August 2002. /s/ Mary J. Ulibarri Mary J. Ulibarri Notary Public My Commission Expires:  October 5, 2005


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20020904092902.txt.gz
TIME:20020904092902
EVENTS:	
TEXT:
ITEM: 
Item 9.   Regulation FD Disclosure
On August 30, 2002, the Department of the Navy notified Boeing (the "Company") and General Dynamics Corporation that unless they paid, within 30 days, approximately $2.3 billion that the Government claims they owe in the A-12 case, it would turn the matter over to the Defense Finance and Accounting Service for collection. The letter acknowledges that negotiations regarding a settlement are ongoing and that the Navy fully supports that effort. As noted in the Company's Form 10-Q for the six month period ended June 30, 2002, the Company is continuing to pursue its legal appeal in this matter.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20021004101816.txt.gz
TIME:20021004101816
EVENTS:	Other events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
Item 5. Other Events
Boeing Updates Assessment of Financing Unit Portfolio; Will Record Third Quarter Non-Cash Charges Of Approximately $250 Million
-- Takes Charges to Strengthen Reserves and Revalue Certain Investments and Collateral Amid Continuing Commercial Aviation Downturn
     CHICAGO, Oct. 4, 2002 - The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] announced today that it will recognize, on a pre-tax basis, certain non-cash charges that will reduce operating earnings approximately $250 million. The expected after-tax impact to net earnings is approximately $158 million, or $0.20 per share for the quarter ending September 30, 2002. Boeing will report its full results for the quarter on October 16, 2002.
     Boeing and its financing subsidiary, Boeing Capital Corporation (BCC), have completed their quarterly assessment of BCC's financing and investment assets. BCC's portfolio of financing assets at the end of the third quarter totaled $11.5 billion, of which $8.8 billion was related to Boeing products and services, primarily commercial aircraft. The continuing effects of the current airline industry downturn have caused significant reductions in commercial aircraft values. Older and/or out-of-production aircraft models have experienced the most significant declines in value, while newer aircraft models have seen more moderate declines. At the same time, the credit ratings of many airlines, particularly in the United States, have continued to deteriorate despite initiatives to restore long-term profitability.
     Boeing and BCC anticipated that airline traffic and profitability would gradually, but steadily, recover following Sept. 11, 2001. However, recent announcements by the major domestic airlines and credit rating agencies indicate that this recovery will not be as rapid as anticipated. The charges recognized in the third quarter reflect the continued pressure on airline credit ratings as well as collateral valuations, particularly for older and/or out-of-production aircraft types in the BCC financing portfolio.
     To record these non-cash charges, third quarter BCC segment operating earnings will be reduced by approximately $149 million. Operating earnings in Boeing's "Other" segment will be reduced approximately $101 million for the quarter due to certain guarantees the parent has provided to BCC.
     The financial statements of Boeing and BCC will reflect the adjustments described below for the quarter ending September 30, 2002:
1)  Increased valuation allowance totaling $110 million
      Boeing will record a pre-tax expense of approximately $110 million to increase the valuation allowance and strengthen reserves for BCC's receivables. BCC will record $75 million of this increase. The remaining $35 million will be recorded in the "Other" segment of Boeing due to parent guarantees that mitigate BCC's exposure.
      Each quarter BCC reviews customer credit ratings, published historical credit default rates and third-party aircraft valuations as a basis to validate the reasonableness of its valuation allowance. As noted, airline credit ratings have deteriorated. Published sources and recent market transactions also indicate that valuations for a number of aircraft types used as collateral continue to remain depressed.
      Although no significant airline-related receivable write-offs were recorded during the third quarter, nor have airline delinquency rates in the BCC portfolio substantially deteriorated, Boeing and BCC determined that an increase in the valuation allowance for BCC's portfolio of receivables is warranted in these circumstances. As a result of this adjustment, the allowance recorded by BCC as of September 30 will equal approximately 3.1% of the applicable BCC receivables, up from 2.1% at June 30, 2002.
2)  Revaluation of certain investments in equipment trust certificates securitized by aircraft on lease to United Airlines: $79 million
     As disclosed at the end of the second quarter, United Airlines accounts for approximately $1.3 billion, or nearly 12 percent, of the total BCC portfolio. Most of BCC's United portfolio consists of financings to support recent deliveries of late-model 777 aircraft.
     Among BCC's other portfolio holdings related to United is a long-held investment in equipment trust certificates totaling approximately $79 million. This investment, securitized by aircraft on lease to United Airlines and classified as a held-to-maturity debt investment, has declined in value for a period that is now determined to be other than temporary. As a result, the investment is being written down to its estimated current fair value.
      This write-down is also based on the decline in credit ratings of United Airlines, the long-term maturity of the investment and the decline in the underlying aircraft collateral valuations. The ultimate realization of this investment will depend upon United Airlines continuing to meet its related contractual obligations. United remains current on all of its payment obligations to BCC. The total pre-tax expense to be recorded in the third quarter is approximately $79 million, of which $13 million will be recorded by BCC. The remaining $66 million will be recorded in Boeing's "Other" segment due to parent guarantees that mitigate BCC's exposure.
3)   Revaluation of equipment held for lease in a joint venture and other adjustments totaling $61 million
      Boeing Capital Corporation holds an investment in a joint venture that was established to lease and eventually convert 24 Boeing 727 passenger aircraft to full cargo configuration. The current value of these 727s, which average over 20 years old, is based upon BCC's estimate of future cash flows they are likely to generate. As a result of this estimate, considering the age of the aircraft and current market conditions, BCC will recognize an impairment to the investment in this joint venture, resulting in a pre-tax charge of $48 million for the quarter. The BCC portfolio does not include any Boeing 727 aircraft other than those held through this joint venture. BCC has also identified additional pre-tax charges totaling $13 million primarily attributable to valuations of certain regional turboprops and other assets in its portfolio. Both of these charges will be recorded at BCC.
The table below summarizes the third quarter pre-tax charges and adjustments discussed above:
Summary
      BCC continuously monitors the key factors that impact the value of its portfolio. The magnitude of the non-cash charges and valuation allowance increase taken during the third quarter incorporates the deterioration of aircraft collateral values and customer credit ratings to date. Although its portfolio growth is expected to slow as fewer commercial airplanes are delivered, BCC will continue to provide prudent financing that takes into consideration current market conditions and applies appropriate credit, equipment, return and loan-to-value standards.
Certain statements in this release contain "forward-looking" information that involves risk and uncertainty. This forward-looking information is based upon a number of assumptions including assumptions regarding global economic, passenger and freight growth; successful negotiation of contracts with the Company's labor unions; current and future markets for the Company's products and services; demand for the Company's products and services; performance of internal plans, including, without limitation, plans for productivity gains, reductions in cycle time and improvements in design processes, production processes, program performance, benefits from re-organizations, and asset utilization; product performance; customer financing; customer, supplier and subcontractor performance; customer model selections; favorable outcomes of certain pending sales campaigns and U. S. and foreign government procurement actions; including the timing of procurement of tankers, supplier contract negotiations; price escalation; government policies and actions; regulatory approvals; and successful execution of acquisition and divestiture plans; and the assessment of the impact of the attacks of September 11, 2001. Actual results and future trends may differ materially depending on a variety of factors, including collective bargaining labor disputes; the Company's successful execution of internal performance plans, including continued research and development, production rate increases and decreases (particularly with respect to wide-body production), production system initiatives, timing of product deliveries and launches, supplier contract negotiations, asset management plans, acquisition and divestiture plans, procurement plans, credit rating agency assessments, and other cost-reduction efforts; the actual outcomes of certain pending sales campaigns and U. S. and foreign government procurement activities; including the timing of procurement of tankers, acceptance of new products and services; product performance risks; the cyclical nature of some of the Company's businesses; volatility of the market for certain products and services; domestic and international competition in the defense, space and commercial areas; continued integration of acquired businesses; uncertainties associated with regulatory certifications of the Company's commercial aircraft by the U.S. Government and foreign governments; other regulatory uncertainties; performance issues with key suppliers, subcontractors and customers; governmental export and import policies; factors that result in significant and prolonged disruption to air travel worldwide; any additional impacts from the attacks of September 11, 2001; global trade policies; worldwide political stability; domestic and international economic conditions; price escalation trends; the outcome of political and legal processes, including uncertainty regarding government funding of certain programs; changing priorities or reductions in the U.S. Government or foreign government defense and space budgets; termination of government contracts due to unilateral government action or failure to perform; legal, financial and governmental risks related to international transactions; legal proceedings; and other economic, political and technological risks and uncertainties. Additional information regarding these factors is contained in the Company's SEC filings, including, without limitation, the Company's Annual Report on Form 10K for the year ended, 2001 and the 10Q for the quarter ended 31 March 2002 and 30 June 2002.
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20021021101552.txt.gz
TIME:20021021101552
EVENTS:	Other events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
Item 5. Other Events
      Pursuant to the "Consent and Undertaking of The Boeing Company," dated July 26, 1978 and issued by the United States District Court for the District of Columbia, in Civil Action No. 78-1383, with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (the "Commission") as plaintiff, The Boeing Company (the "Company") agreed to file a statement with the Commission whenever the Company made a change in its statement of policies and procedures as to the appointment of foreign sales consultants.
     The Company has revised its procedure establishing requirements of, and internal responsibilities for, the Company's process for doing business with foreign sales consultants. The Company also revised its policy with respect to consultant services to reflect the changes in the foreign sales consultant procedure.
     Significant changes implemented by the revised procedure include the following:
      These changes were made (a) to broaden application of the procedure to ensure more comprehensive compliance with the U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act and (b) to improve the management and processing of prospective international service contracts.
      Company policy POL-14, "Consultant Services," was revised September 27, 2002, consistent with the changes described above. The substantive revisions specify that the requirements of POL-14 that apply to foreign sales consultants apply to other international service consultants as well.
Item 7. Financial Statements and Exhibits
Exhibit Index to The Boeing Company Current Report on Form 8-K dated October 21, 2002:
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.




</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20030206171643.txt.gz
TIME:20030206171643
EVENTS:	Other events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
QuickLinks
-- Click here to rapidly navigate through this document
Item 5. Other Events
        The Boeing Company (the "Company") sets forth below certain information regarding its quarter and year ended December 31, 2002. The financial information set forth herein is unaudited and does not reflect all reclassifications or changes in presentation that may be made in the financial statements to be filed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2002. In the case of 2002, the amounts we report following the completion of our audit may differ from the unaudited amounts presented herein.
        On January 30, 2003 The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] reported net earnings of $590 million, or $0.73 per share, for the fourth quarter of 2002 on revenues of $13.7 billion. Reported net earnings for 2002 totaled $492 million, or $0.61 per share, on revenues of $54.1 billion. This reflects a $1.8 billion ($2.26 per share) non-cash charge recognized in the first quarter for a change in accounting for goodwill.
        As shown below, operating margins for 2002 were 7.2 percent. Operating earnings were down as a result of decreased commercial airplane deliveries, increased customer financing charges and higher commercial satellite production costs.
        Fourth quarter 2002 earnings from operations were $1.039 billion compared to $245 million for fourth quarter 2002. Commercial Airplanes earnings decreased on lower deliveries partly offset by production efficiencies, while Military Aircraft and Missile Systems earnings were up on higher deliveries. Space and Communications earnings were down as commercial satellite losses offset growth and performance on other programs. Earnings from operations were favorably impacted by $36 million as Commercial Airplanes reversed previously recognized pre-tax charges related to the events of Sept. 11. This is the result of better than expected performance on valuation allowances, vendor penalties, and severance costs.
        Deferred stock compensation pre-tax expense decreased $9 million during the quarter due to the decline in the company's stock price from September 30 through December 31. This resulted in a $0.01 benefit to earnings per share. Pre-tax expense for share-based plans totaled $114 million and reduced earnings per share by $0.09. Netted together, consolidated stock compensation expenses lowered fourth quarter earnings per share by a total of $0.08.
        Cash and short term investment balances at year-end 2002 totaled $2.3 billion, up from $1.7 billion at the end of the third quarter and $0.6 billion at the end of 2001.
        As shown on the chart below, consolidated debt at year-end totaled $14.4 billion, up from $12.3 billion at the end of 2001. The Boeing Company ended the year with $4.4 billion of debt outstanding, similar to 2001. Boeing Capital Corporation debt increased to $9.4 billion to fund portfolio growth, and non-recourse customer financing remained at about $0.6 billion.
Segment Results
        Boeing Commercial Airplanes:
    During 2002, Commercial Airplanes moved to resize operations and remain profitable. Since September 2001 employment has been reduced by approximately 30,000 people (including Shared Services personnel) and airplane production rates cut in half.
*
Commercial Airplanes calculates its earnings results using both unit cost and program accounting methods. Commercial Accounting Differences reconciles the two methods and is an element of the Accounting Differences/Eliminations line under "Earnings from operations" in the Business Segment Data page.
**
This is Commercial Airplanes' pre-tax contribution to reported Boeing company earnings from operations.
        In 2002, annual deliveries of commercial airplanes decreased 28 percent and revenues fell 19 percent. The impact of reduced revenues was significantly offset by strong operating performance.
        On a program accounting basis, Commercial Airplanes' operating earnings totaled $2.0 billion, resulting in a 7.1 percent margin in 2002. This compares to earnings of $1.9 billion in 2001, which reflects $908 million of charges related to the events of September 11.
        Fourth quarter results also reflect significantly fewer airplane deliveries. Deliveries of commercial airplanes in the quarter decreased 40 percent and revenues fell 32 percent.
        Commercial Airplanes received 67 gross orders during the quarter and 251 for the year from a broad cross-section of customers. Contractual backlog at quarter-end totaled $68.2 billion compared with $75.9 billion at the end of 2001.
Integrated Defense Systems:
        On July 10, 2002, Boeing announced the merger of its Military Aircraft and Missiles Systems, and Space and Communications businesses into Integrated Defense Systems. In 2002, the combined revenues of these segments increased 9.4 percent to $25.0 billion, up from $22.8 billion in 2001. Combined earnings from operations totaled about $2.0 billion in each year as profit growth on missile defense, integrated battlespace and platform programs was offset by commercial satellite losses, as well as higher investment in 767 tanker and 737 airborne early warning and control programs.
        Beginning in the first quarter of 2003 the company will no longer report results for Military Aircraft and Missile Systems, and Space and Communications. The company will enhance transparency by reporting consolidated Integrated Defense Systems results and the results of its four reporting segments: 1) Aircraft and Weapon Systems; 2) Network Systems; 3) Launch and Orbital Systems; and 4) Support Systems.
        Military Aircraft and Missile Systems:
    Full year revenues rose 12 percent to almost $14 billion on higher C-17, F-15, F/A-18, and JDAM deliveries coupled with aerospace support volume growth. Operating performance measured by annual margins reached 11.8 percent.
        For the quarter, revenues rose 10 percent to $3.8 billion also driven by higher deliveries and aerospace support growth. Margins were affected by the increasing investment in the 767 tanker program.
        Major international and domestic program wins increased contractual backlog 20 percent in 2002 to $21.1 billion compared with $17.6 billion at the end of 2001.
        Space and Communications:
    Space and Communications results for 2002 reflect continued growth in missile defense and integrated battlespace markets, offset by poor commercial space market conditions, commercial satellite factory cost and schedule performance, and increased investment to complete 737 Airborne Early Warning and Control (AEW&C) system design.
        Revenues in 2002 increased almost 6 percent to $11.0 billion on missile defense and integrated battlespace growth offset by lower commercial satellite, Delta II and NASA volume. Segment earnings and margins decreased to $357 million and 3.3 percent, respectively, due to higher commercial satellite and AEW&C costs and a $100 million write-down for an equity investment in Teledesic. Favorable offsets included performance on other programs and lower company-sponsored research and development expense.
        For the quarter, revenues rose almost 11 percent to $3.2 billion. Operating margins fell to 5.3 percent. During the period, favorable contract settlements offset commercial satellite cost growth. However, results were unfavorably impacted by a customer termination of a commercial satellite contract. Together, these three items reduced segment fourth quarter earnings by approximately $50 million.
        Contractual backlog at the end of the year increased 14 percent to $14.9 billion compared with $13.1 billion at the end of 2001 as the unit strengthened its position in key missile defense and integrated battlespace markets.
        Boeing Capital Corporation:
    Boeing Capital Corporation financial results are summarized in the table below:
        In 2002, Boeing Capital revenues increased 22 percent to nearly $1.0 billion as a result of portfolio growth, which was partially offset by lower lease and financing rates. Pre-tax earnings for the year totaled $72 million and reflect the downturn in commercial aviation.
        For the year 2002, Boeing Capital recognized non-cash charges totaling $194 million to increase the allowance for losses on receivables, as well as revalue certain investments and aircraft on operating lease. This includes $45 million recognized during the fourth quarter. As a result of the market environment, Boeing Capital increased its allowance for losses on finance leases and notes receivable to 3.5 percent of receivables, up from 2.4 percent at the end of 2001.
        As anticipated, Boeing Capital's finance portfolio grew more slowly in the fourth quarter to $11.8 billion compared with $11.5 billion at the end of the third quarter, and up from $9.2 billion at year-end 2001. Approximately 76 percent of Boeing Capital's portfolio is related to Boeing products and services, up from 70 percent at the end of 2001. New business volume and transfers of existing financing assets from the Boeing Company totaling $3.7 billion for the year were offset by asset run-off and depreciation of approximately $1.1 billion. Leverage, as measured by the ratio of debt-to-equity, at year-end 2002 was a conservative 5.7-to-1.
        Other Segments:
    Other Segments consists chiefly of the Connexion by Boeing, Air Traffic Management, and Boeing technology units, as well as results related to the consolidation of all business units. Operating earnings in the Other Segment were $70 million lower than in 2001 primarily as a result of the charges taken in the third and fourth quarters related to customer financing activities, offset by lower spending on Connexion by Boeing.
SM
        During the fourth quarter, Scandinavian Airlines System signed a Memorandum of Understanding and became the fourth customer for the Connexion by Boeing service. On January 15, 2003, Connexion by Boeing successfully began its planned commercial service demonstration on transatlantic Lufthansa flights.
        Boeing's Air Traffic Management (ATM) unit continued to build support during the quarter when a U.S. government commission called for a new air traffic management system similar to that envisioned by Boeing ATM. Additionally, ATM signed a joint development agreement with Air Traffic Control, The Netherlands, to develop and validate solutions to enhance operations at Amsterdam's Schiphol Airport.
        Pension Update:
    The company measures its pension plan using a September 30 year-end for financial accounting purposes. During 2002, historically low interest rates and another year of negative plan investment returns caused the company to make adjustments to its pension assumptions. The discount rate, which is based on a point-in-time estimate as of September 30, was decreased from 7.00 percent to 6.50 percent, resulting in a higher estimated pension liability. In addition, the expected return on plan assets, which reflects expected performance over the long term, was lowered from 9.25 percent to 9.00 percent.
        Due to the higher pension liability and lower pension assets as of September 30, 2002, the company decreased its other comprehensive income equity balance by $3.6 billion at the end of 2002 to reflect the additional minimum liability under its pension plans. This after-tax equity charge did not impact cash or earnings and could reverse in future periods should either interest rates increase or market performance and plan returns improve.
        During 2002, the company recognized $537 million in earnings from operations from its pension plans compared with $785 million in 2001. In 2003, the company expects to recognize approximately $75 million of earnings from operations from its pension plans. In 2004, the pension impact to earnings will depend on market conditions, but based upon current assumptions, the company expects to recognize a non-cash pension expense estimated to range from $200 to $300 million.
        The company had no significant required pension funding in 2002 and does not expect significant requirements for 2003. However, it did contribute $340 million of cash funding in 2002 and expects to make additional discretionary funding contributions in 2003. Requirements in 2004 will depend upon market performance and other factors, but currently are expected to be approximately $1 billion.
Certain statements herein may constitute "forward-looking" statements within the meaning of the Private Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions as to future events that may not prove to be accurate. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak only as of the date they were made and we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise. Our actual results and future trends may differ materially depending on a variety of factors, including the continued operation, viability and growth of major airline customers and non-airline customers (such as the U.S. Government); adverse developments in the value of collateral securing customer and other financings; the occurrence of any significant collective bargaining labor dispute; the Company's successful execution of internal performance plans, price escalation, production rate increases and decreases (including any reduction in or termination of an aircraft product), acquisition and divestiture plans, and other cost-reduction and productivity efforts; charges from any future SFAS 142 review; an adverse development in rating agency credit ratings or assessments; the actual outcomes of certain pending sales campaigns and U.S. and foreign government procurement activities, including the timing of procurement of tankers by the U.S. Department of Defense; the cyclical nature of some of the Company's businesses; unanticipated financial market changes which may impact pension plan assumptions; domestic and international competition in the defense, space and commercial areas; continued integration of acquired businesses; performance issues with key suppliers, subcontractors and customers; factors that could result in significant and prolonged disruption to air travel worldwide (including future terrorist attacks); any additional impacts from the attacks of September 11, 2001; global trade policies; worldwide political stability; domestic and international economic conditions; price escalation; the outcome of political and legal processes, including uncertainty regarding government funding of certain programs; changing priorities or reductions in the U.S. Government or foreign government defense and space budgets; termination of government or commercial contracts due to unilateral government or customer action or failure to perform; legal, financial and governmental risks related to international transactions; legal proceedings; and other economic, political and technological risks and uncertainties. Additional information regarding these factors is contained in the Company's SEC filings, including, without limitation, the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2001 and the Forms 10-Q for the quarters ended March 31, 2002, June 30, 2002 and September 30, 2002.
*
Includes three intercompany C-40 aircraft for the full year 2002; none for the 4Q 2002; two for the full year 2001; one for the 4Q 2001 and one intercompany Project Wedgetail AEW&C aircraft for the 4Q 2002.
Note:    Commercial Airplanes deliveries by model include deliveries under operating lease, which are identified by parentheses.
        Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
QuickLinks
Item 5. Other Events
SIGNATURE


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20030211123950.txt.gz
TIME:20030211123950
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
QuickLinks
-- Click here to rapidly navigate through this document
Item 7.    Financial Statements,
Pro forma
Financial Information and Exhibits
        Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
QuickLinks
Item 7. Financial Statements, Pro forma Financial Information and Exhibits
SIGNATURES

February 6, 2003
        1.
    Introductory.
    The Boeing Company, a Delaware corporation ("
Company
"), proposes to issue and sell from time to time certain of its unsecured debt securities registered under the registration statement referred to in Section 2(a) or such other registration statement that may be filed by the Company ("
Registered Securities
"). The Registered Securities will be issued under an indenture, dated as of February 1, 2003 ("
Indenture
"), between the Company and JPMorgan Chase Bank, as trustee (the "
Trustee
"), in one or more series, which series may vary as to interest rates, maturities, redemption provisions, selling prices and other terms, with all such terms for any particular series of the Registered Securities being determined at the time of sale. Particular series of the Registered Securities will be sold pursuant to a Terms Agreement referred to in Section 3, for resale in accordance with the terms of offering determined at the time of sale. The provisions contained in these Underwriting Provisions are hereinafter referred to as the "
Provisions
".
        The Registered Securities involved in any such offering are hereinafter referred to as the "
Offered Securities
". The firm or firms which agree to purchase the Offered Securities are hereinafter referred to as the "
Underwriters
" of such securities, and the representative or representatives of the Underwriters, if any, specified in a Terms Agreement referred to in Section 3 or if not referred to in Section 3 then the Underwriter first named in the Terms Agreement are hereinafter referred to as the "
Representatives
"; provided, however, that if the Terms Agreement does not specify any representative of the Underwriters, the term "Representatives", as used in these Provisions (other than in Sections 2(b), 5(c) and 6 and the second sentence of Section 3), shall mean the Underwriters.
        2.
    Representations and Warranties of the Company.
    The Company, as of the date of each Terms Agreement referred to in Section 3, represents and warrants to, and agrees with, the several Underwriters that:
        (a)  A registration statement (No. 333-99509), including a prospectus, relating to the Registered Securities has been filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission ("
Commission
") and has become effective. Such registration statement, as amended at the time of any Terms Agreement referred to in Section 3, is hereinafter referred to as the "
Registration Statement
", and the prospectus included in such Registration Statement, as supplemented as contemplated by Section 3 to reflect the terms of the Offered Securities and the terms of offering thereof, as filed or to be filed with the Commission pursuant to and in accordance with Rule 424(b) ("
Rule 424(b)
") under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "
Act
"), including all material incorporated by reference therein, is hereinafter referred to as the "
Prospectus
"; provided, however, that all references to the "Registration Statement" and the "Prospectus" shall also be deemed to include all documents incorporated therein by reference pursuant to the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "
Exchange Act"
), prior to the execution and delivery of the applicable Terms Agreement; and provided, further, that if the Company files a registration statement with the Commission pursuant to Section 462(b) (the "Rule 462(b) Registration Statement") of the rules and regulations promulgated under the Act (the "
1933 Act Regulations
"), then after such filing, all references to "Registration Statement" shall also be deemed to include the Rule 462(b) Registration Statement. No document has been or will be prepared or distributed in reliance on Rule 434 under the Act.
        All references in these Provisions to financial statements and schedules and other information which is "contained," "included" or "stated" in the Registration Statement, any preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus (or other references of like import) shall be deemed to mean and include all such financial statements and schedules and other information which is incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, any preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus, as the case may be; and all references in these Provisions to amendments or supplements to the Registration Statement, any preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus shall be deemed to mean and include the filing of any document under the Exchange Act which is incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, such preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus, as the case may be.
        (b)  On its effective date, the Registration Statement conformed in all material respects to the requirements of the Act, the Trust Indenture Act of 1939 ("
Trust Indenture Act
") and the applicable rules and regulations of the Commission ("
Rules and Regulations
") and did not include any untrue statement of a
material fact or omit to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, and on the date of each Terms Agreement referred to in Section 3, the Registration Statement and the Prospectus conform in all material respects to the requirements of the Act, the Trust Indenture Act and the Rules and Regulations, and neither of such documents include any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, except that the foregoing does not apply to statements in or omissions from any of such documents based upon written information furnished to the Company by any Underwriter specifically for use therein or the Form T-1. The documents incorporated by reference in the Prospectus, when they became effective or were filed with the Commission, as the case may be, conformed in all material respects with the requirements of the Act or the Exchange Act, as applicable, and the Rules and Regulations.
        (c)  The Company has been duly incorporated and is an existing corporation in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware, with power and corporate authority to own its properties and conduct its business as described in the Prospectus; and the Company is duly qualified to do business as a foreign corporation in good standing in all other jurisdictions in which its ownership or lease of property or the conduct of its business requires such qualification except where failure to so qualify would not individually or in the aggregate have a material adverse effect on the financial condition, business, properties or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole or on the Company's ability to perform its obligations under the Offered Securities and the Indenture in any material respect (a "
Material Adverse Effect
").
        (d)  Each
"significant subsidiary"
(as such term is defined in Rule 1-02 of Regulation S-X) of the Company (each a
"Material Subsidiary"
and together the
"Material Subsidiaries"
) has been duly incorporated and is an existing corporation or other entity in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its incorporation or organization, with power and authority to own its properties and conduct its business as described in the Prospectus; and each Material Subsidiary of the Company is duly qualified to do business as a foreign corporation or other entity in good standing in all other jurisdictions in which its ownership or lease of property or the conduct of its business requires such qualification except where failure to so qualify would not have a Material Adverse Effect; all of the issued and outstanding capital stock or ownership interests of each Material Subsidiary of the Company has been duly authorized and validly issued and is fully paid and nonassessable; and the capital stock or ownership interests of each Material Subsidiary owned by the Company, directly or through subsidiaries, is owned free from liens and encumbrances except for such liens or encumbrances that would not have a Material Adverse Effect.
        (e)  The Indenture has been duly authorized by the Company and has been duly qualified under the Trust Indenture Act with respect to the Offered Securities registered thereby; the Offered Securities have been duly authorized; and when the Offered Securities are executed, authenticated, issued and delivered and paid for in the manner provided for in the Terms Agreement and in the Indenture on the Closing Date (as defined below), the Indenture will have been duly executed and delivered by the Company, such Offered Securities will have been duly executed, authenticated, issued and delivered and will conform to the description thereof contained in the Prospectus; and the Indenture (assuming due authorization, execution and delivery thereof by the Trustee) and such Offered Securities will constitute valid and legally binding obligations of the Company, enforceable in accordance with their terms, except as (A) the enforceability thereof may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium, fraudulent transfer or similar laws affecting creditors' rights generally, and (B) the availability of equitable remedies may be limited by equitable principles of general applicability.
        (f)    The Company has applied to have the Offered Securities listed with the stock exchange, if any, indicated in the Terms Agreement, subject to notice of issuance.
        (g)  No consent, approval, authorization, or order of, or filing with, any governmental agency or body or any court is required for the consummation of the transactions contemplated by the Terms Agreement (including the Provisions) in connection with the issuance and sale of the Offered Securities by the Company, except such as have been obtained and made under the Act and the Trust Indenture Act and such as may be required under state securities laws.
        (h)  The execution, delivery and performance of the Indenture and the Terms Agreement (including the Provisions), and the issuance and sale of the Offered Securities and compliance with the terms and provisions thereof will not result in a breach or violation of any of the terms and provisions of, or constitute a default
under, (i) to the knowledge of the Company, any statute, any rule, regulation or order of any governmental agency or body or any court, domestic or foreign, having jurisdiction over the Company or any Material Subsidiary of the Company (provided however that enforcement of rights to indemnity and contribution in the Terms Agreement may be limited by federal or state securities laws or principles of public policy), or any of their properties, (ii) any material agreement or instrument to which the Company or any such Material Subsidiary is a party or by which the Company or any such Material Subsidiary is bound or to which any of the properties of the Company or any such Material Subsidiary is subject, or (iii) the charter or by-laws of the Company or any such Material Subsidiary except in the case of (i) and (ii) where such breach or violation or default would not have a Material Adverse Effect.
        (i)    The Terms Agreement (including the Provisions) has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company.
        (j)    Except as disclosed in the Prospectus, the Company and its Material Subsidiaries have good and marketable title to all real properties and good title to all other properties and assets owned by them which are material to the business of the Company and its subsidiaries consolidated as a single enterprise, in each case free from liens, encumbrances and defects that would materially affect the value thereof or materially interfere with the use made or to be made thereof by them; and except as disclosed in the Prospectus, the Company and its Material Subsidiaries hold any leased real or personal property under valid and enforceable leases with such exceptions that are not material to the business of the Company and its subsidiaries consolidated as a single enterprise and that would not materially interfere with the use made or to be made thereof by them.
        (k)  Neither the Company nor any of its Material Subsidiaries is (i) in violation of its charter or (ii) in default in the performance or observance of any obligation, agreement, covenant or condition contained in any contract, indenture, mortgage, loan agreement, note, lease or other instrument to which it is a party or by which it or any of them or their properties may be bound except in the case of (ii) where such default would not have a Material Adverse Effect.
        (l)    The Company and its Material Subsidiaries possess adequate certificates, authorities or permits issued by appropriate governmental agencies or bodies necessary to conduct the business now operated by them and have not received any notice of proceedings relating to the revocation or modification of any such certificate, authority or permit that, if determined adversely to the Company or any of its Material Subsidiaries, would have a Material Adverse Effect.
        (m)  Except as disclosed in the Prospectus, no labor dispute with the employees of the Company or any Material Subsidiary exists or, to the knowledge of the Company, is imminent that might have a Material Adverse Effect.
        (n)  Except as disclosed in the Prospectus, neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries is in violation of any statute, any rule, regulation, decision or order of any governmental agency or body or any court, domestic or foreign, relating to the use, disposal or release of hazardous or toxic substances or relating to the protection or restoration of the environment or human exposure to hazardous or toxic substances (collectively, "
environmental laws
"), owns or operates any real property contaminated with any substance that is subject to any environmental laws, is liable for any off-site disposal or contamination pursuant to any environmental laws, or is subject to any claim relating to any environmental laws, which violation, contamination, liability or claim would individually or in the aggregate have a Material Adverse Effect; and the Company is not aware of any pending investigation which might lead to such a claim.
        (o)  Except as disclosed in the Prospectus, there are no pending actions, suits or proceedings against or affecting the Company, any of its subsidiaries or any of their respective properties that, if determined adversely to the Company or any of its subsidiaries, would individually or in the aggregate have a Material Adverse Effect, or would materially and adversely affect the ability of the Company to perform its obligations under the Indenture or the Terms Agreement (including the Provisions), or which are otherwise material in the context of the sale of the Offered Securities; and no such actions, suits or proceedings are, to the Company's knowledge, threatened or, contemplated.
        (p)  The financial statements included in the Registration Statement and the Prospectus present fairly in all material respects the financial position of the Company and its consolidated subsidiaries as of the dates shown and their results of operations and cash flows for the periods shown (subject, in the case of unaudited statements, to normal year-end audit adjustments), and such financial statements have been prepared in
conformity with the generally accepted accounting principles in the United States applied on a consistent basis (except as otherwise noted therein) and the schedules included in the Registration Statement present fairly in all material respects the information required to be stated therein.
        (q)  Except as disclosed in the Prospectus, since the date of the latest audited financial statements included in the Prospectus there has been no material adverse change, nor any development or event reasonably likely to involve a prospective material adverse change, in the financial condition, business, properties or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole.
        (r)  The Company is not and, after giving effect to the offering and sale of the Offered Securities and the application of the proceeds thereof as described in the Prospectus, will not be required to register under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended.
        (s)  To the Company's knowledge, after due inquiry, the accountants who certified the financial statements and supporting schedules included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement and Prospectus are independent public accountants as required by the Act and the Exchange Act.
        (t)    The capitalization of the Company has not materially changed since the date of the Prospectus.
        3.
    Purchase, Sale and Delivery of Offered Securities.
    The obligation of the Underwriters to purchase the Offered Securities will be evidenced by an agreement or exchange of other written communications ("
Terms Agreement
") at the time the Company determines to sell the Offered Securities. The Terms Agreement will incorporate by reference the Provisions, except as otherwise provided therein, and will specify the firm or firms which will be Underwriters, the names of any Representatives, the principal amount to be purchased by each Underwriter, the purchase price to be paid by the Underwriters and the terms of the Offered Securities not already specified in the Indenture, including, but not limited to, interest, maturity, any redemption provisions and any sinking fund requirements. The Terms Agreement will also specify the time and date of delivery and payment (such time and date, or such other time not later than seven full business days thereafter as the Representative and the Company agree as the time for payment and delivery, being herein and in the Terms Agreement referred to as the "
Closing Date
"), the place of delivery and payment and any details of the terms of offering that should be reflected in the Prospectus relating to the offering of the Offered Securities. For purposes of Rule 15c6-1 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Closing Date (if later than the otherwise applicable settlement date) shall be the date for payment of funds and delivery of securities for all the Offered Securities sold pursuant to the offering. The obligations of the Underwriters to purchase the Offered Securities will be several and not joint. It is understood that the Underwriters propose to offer the Offered Securities for sale as set forth in the Prospectus.
        If the Terms Agreement specifies "Book-Entry Only" settlement or otherwise states that the provisions of this paragraph shall apply, the Company will deliver against payment of the purchase price the Offered Securities in the form of one or more permanent global securities in definitive form (the "
Global Securities
") deposited with the Trustee as custodian for The Depository Trust Company ("
DTC
") and registered in the name of Cede & Co., as nominee for DTC. Interests in any permanent global securities will be held only in book-entry form through DTC, except in the limited circumstances described in the Prospectus. Payment for the Offered Securities shall be made by the Underwriters in Federal (same day) funds by wire transfer to an account previously designated by the Company at a bank acceptable to the Representatives, at the place of payment specified in the Terms Agreement on the Closing Date, against delivery to the Trustee as custodian for DTC of the Global Securities representing all of the Offered Securities.
        4.
    Certain Agreements of the Company.
    The Company agrees with the several Underwriters that:
        (a)  The Company will file the Prospectus with the Commission pursuant to and in accordance with an appropriate subsection under Rule 424(b) not later than the second business day following the execution and delivery of the Terms Agreement.
        (b)  At any time when a prospectus relating to the Offered Securities is required to be delivered under the Act in connection with sales by any Underwriter or dealer, the Company will advise the Representatives promptly of any proposal to amend or supplement the Registration Statement or the Prospectus and will afford the Representatives a reasonable opportunity to comment on any such proposed amendment or supplement; and the Company will also advise the Representatives promptly of the filing of any such amendment or supplement and of the institution by the Commission of any stop order proceedings in respect
of the Registration Statement or of any part thereof and will use its reasonable best efforts to prevent the issuance of any such stop order and to obtain as soon as possible its lifting, if issued.
        (c)  If, at any time when a prospectus relating to the Offered Securities is required to be delivered under the Act in connection with sales by any Underwriter or dealer any event occurs as a result of which the Prospectus as then amended or supplemented would include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, or if it is necessary at any time to amend the Prospectus to comply with the Act, the Company promptly will notify the Representatives of such event and will promptly prepare and file with the Commission, at its own expense, an amendment or supplement which will correct such statement or omission or an amendment which will effect such compliance. Neither the Representative's consent to, nor the Underwriters' delivery of, any such amendment or supplement shall constitute a waiver of any of the conditions set forth in Section 6 hereof.
        (d)  With respect to each sale of Offered Securities, the Company will make generally available to its security holders as soon as practicable, but not later than 90 days after the close of the period covered thereby, an earning statement in form complying with the provisions of Rule 158 of the 1933 Act Regulations covering a 12-month period beginning not later than the first day of the Company's fiscal quarter next following the "effective date" (as defined in such Rule 158) of the Registration Statement.
        (e)  The Company will furnish to the Representatives copies of the Registration Statement in the form it became effective (of which the quantity specified in the Terms Agreement will be signed and will include all exhibits) and of all amendments thereto, any related preliminary prospectus, any related preliminary prospectus supplement, and, so long as a prospectus relating to the Offered Securities is required to be delivered under the Act in connection with sales by any Underwriter or dealer, the Prospectus and all amendments and supplements to such documents, in each case in such quantities as the Representatives reasonably request. The Prospectus shall be so furnished promptly following the execution and delivery of the Terms Agreement. All other documents shall be so furnished as soon as available.
        (f)    The Company will endeavour, in cooperation with the Underwriters, to arrange for the qualification of the Offered Securities for sale and the determination of their eligibility for investment under the laws of such jurisdictions as the Representatives reasonably designate and will continue such qualifications in effect so long as required for the distribution; provided, however, that the Company shall not be obligated to file any general consent to service of process or to qualify as a foreign corporation in any jurisdiction in which it is not so qualified.
        (g)  The Company will use its reasonable best efforts to effect the listing of the Offered Securities on the stock exchange specified in the Terms Agreement, if any.
        (h)  The Company will pay all expenses incident to the performance of its obligations under the Terms Agreement (including the Provisions) for the preparation and filing of the Registration Statement and all amendments thereto; for the preparation, printing, issuance and delivery of the Offered Securities; for the fees and disbursements of the Company's counsel, accountants and of the Trustee; for the printing and delivery to the Underwriters in quantities as hereinabove stated of copies of the Registration Statement and all amendments thereto, and the Prospectus and any amendments or supplements thereto; for the delivery to the Underwriters of copies of the Indenture and all supplements and amendments thereto; for any filing fees and other reasonable expenses (including fees and disbursements of outside counsel) incurred in connection with qualification of the Offered Securities for sale and determination of their eligibility for investment under the laws of such jurisdictions ("
Blue Sky Laws
") as the Representatives designate and the preparation of the memoranda relating thereto; for any fees charged by investment rating agencies for the rating of the Offered Securities; for the filing fee incident to any review by the National Association of Securities Dealers, Inc. of the Offered Securities; for the fees and expenses incurred with respect to the listing of the Offered Securities on the stock exchange if any specified in the Terms Agreement; for any travel expenses of the Company's officers and employees and any other expenses of the Company in connection with attending or hosting meetings with prospective purchasers of the Offered Securities and for expenses incurred in distributing preliminary prospectuses, preliminary prospectus supplements and the Prospectus (including any amendments and supplements thereto) to the Underwriters.
        (i)    The Company will not offer, sell, contract to sell, pledge or otherwise dispose of, directly or indirectly, or file with the Commission a registration statement under the Act relating to debt securities issued
or guaranteed by the Company and having a maturity of more than one year from the date of issue, or publicly disclose the intention to make any such offer, sale, pledge, disposition or filing, without the prior written consent of the Representative for a period beginning at the date of the Terms Agreement and ending at the number of days after the Closing Date specified under "Blackout" in the Terms Agreement.
        5.
    Conditions of the Obligations of the Underwriters.
    The obligations of the several Underwriters to purchase and pay for the Offered Securities on the Closing Date will be subject to the accuracy of the representations and warranties on the part of the Company herein, to the accuracy of the statements of Company officers made pursuant to the provisions hereof, to the performance by the Company of its obligations hereunder and to the following additional conditions precedent:
        (a)  On or prior to the date of the Terms Agreement, the Representatives shall have received a letter, dated the date of delivery thereof, of Deloitte & Touche LLP confirming that they are independent public accountants with respect to the Company within the meaning of the Act and the applicable published Rules and Regulations thereunder and stating substantially to the effect that:
          (i)  in their opinion the financial statements and any schedules and any summary of earnings examined by them and included in the Prospectus comply as to form in all material respects with the applicable accounting requirements of the Act and the related published Rules and Regulations thereunder;
        (ii)  they have performed the procedures specified by the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants for a review of interim financial information as described in Statement of Auditing Standards No. 71, Interim Financial Information, on any unaudited financial statements included in the Registration Statement;
        (iii)  on the basis of the review referred to in clause (ii) above, a reading of the latest available interim financial statements of the Company, inquiries of officials of the Company who have responsibility for financial and accounting matters and other specified procedures, nothing came to their attention that caused them to believe that:
        (A)  the unaudited financial statements, if any, and any summary of earnings included in the Prospectus do not comply as to form in all material respects with the applicable accounting requirements of the Act and the related published Rules and Regulations or any material modifications should be made to such unaudited financial statements and summary of earnings for them to be in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles;
        (B)  if any unaudited "capsule" information is contained in the Prospectus, the unaudited consolidated net sales, net operating income, net income and net income per share amounts or other amounts constituting such "capsule" information and described in such letter do not agree in all material respects with the corresponding amounts set forth in the unaudited consolidated financial statements or were not determined on a basis substantially consistent with that of the corresponding amounts in the audited statements of income;
        (C)  at the date of the latest available balance sheet read by such accountants, or at a subsequent specified date not more than three business days prior to the date of such letter, there was any change in the capital stock or any increase or long-term debt of the Company and its consolidated subsidiaries or, at the date of the latest available balance sheet read by such accountants, there was any decrease in consolidated net current assets or net assets, as compared with amounts shown on the latest balance sheet included in the Prospectus, in each case in all material respects; or
        (D)  for the period from the closing date of the latest income statement included in the Prospectus to the closing date of the latest available income statement read by such accountants, or to a subsequent specified date not more than three business days prior to the date of such letter, there were any material decreases, as compared with the corresponding period of the previous year and with the period of corresponding length ended the date of the latest income statement included in the Prospectus, in consolidated net sales, net operating income or net income;
except in all cases set forth in clauses (C) and (D) above for changes, increases or decreases which the Prospectus discloses have occurred or may occur or which are described in such letter; and
        (iv)  they have compared specified dollar amounts (or percentages derived from such dollar amounts) and other financial information contained in the Prospectus which are specified by the Representatives (in each case to the extent that such dollar amounts, percentages and other financial information are derived from the general accounting records of the Company and its subsidiaries subject to the internal controls of the Company's accounting system or are derived directly from such records by analysis or computation) with the results obtained from inquiries, a reading of such general accounting records and other procedures specified in such letter and have found such dollar amounts, percentages and other financial information to be in agreement with such results, except as otherwise specified in such letter.
All financial statements and schedules included in material incorporated by reference into the Prospectus shall be deemed included in the Prospectus for purposes of this subsection.
        (b)  The Prospectus shall have been filed with the Commission in accordance with the Rules and Regulations and Section 4(a) of these Provisions. No stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or of any part thereof shall have been issued and no proceedings for that purpose shall have been instituted or, to the knowledge of the Company or any Underwriter, shall be contemplated by the Commission.
        (c)  Subsequent to the execution and delivery of the Terms Agreement, there shall not have occurred (i) any change, or any development or event reasonably likely to involve a prospective change, in the financial condition, business, properties or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as one enterprise which, in the judgment of a majority in interest of the Underwriters including the Representatives, is material and adverse and makes it impractical or inadvisable to proceed with completion of the public offering or the sale of and payment for the Offered Securities; (ii) any downgrading in the rating of any debt securities of the Company by any "nationally recognized statistical rating organization" (as defined for purposes of Rule 436(g) under the Act), or any public announcement that any such organization has under surveillance or review its rating of any debt securities of the Company (other than an announcement with positive implications of a possible upgrading, and no implication of a possible downgrading, of such rating); (iii) any change in U.S. or international financial, political or economic conditions or currency exchange rates or exchange controls as would, in the judgment of a majority in interest of the Underwriters including the Representatives, be likely to prejudice materially the success of the proposed issue, sale or distribution of the Offered Securities, whether in the primary market or in respect of dealings in the secondary market; (iv) any material suspension or material limitation of trading in securities generally on the New York Stock Exchange, or any setting of minimum prices for trading on such exchange, or any suspension of trading of any securities of the Company on any exchange or in the over-the-counter market; (v) any banking moratorium declared by U.S. Federal or New York authorities; (vi) any major disruption of settlements of securities or clearance services in the United States or (vii) any attack on, outbreak or escalation of hostilities or act of terrorism involving the United States, any declaration of war by Congress or any other national or international calamity or emergency if, in the judgment of a majority in interest of the Underwriters including the Representatives, the effect of any such attack, outbreak, escalation, act, declaration, calamity or emergency makes it impractical or inadvisable to proceed with completion of the public offering or the sale of and payment for the Offered Securities.
        (d)  The Representatives shall have received an opinion, dated the Closing Date, of Piper Rudnick, counsel for the Company, to the effect that:
          (i)  The Company has been duly incorporated and is in good standing and has a legal corporate existence under the Delaware General Corporation Law ("DGCL"), with corporate power and authority to own its properties and conduct its business as described in the Prospectus; and the Company is duly qualified to do business as a foreign corporation in good standing in all other jurisdictions listed on Schedule 1 in which its ownership or lease of property or the conduct of its business requires such qualification except where failure to so qualify would not have a Material Adverse Effect;
        (ii)  Boeing Capital Corporation ("
BCC
") has been duly incorporated and is in good standing and has a legal corporate existence under the DGCL, with power and authority to own its properties and conduct its business as described in the Prospectus; and BCC is duly qualified to do business as a foreign corporation in good standing in all other jurisdictions listed on Schedule 2 in which its ownership or lease of property or the conduct of its business requires such qualification except where failure to so qualify would not have a Material Adverse Effect;
        (iii)  The Indenture has been duly authorized by the Company and has been duly qualified under the Trust Indenture Act; the Offered Securities have been duly authorized; and when the Offered Securities are executed, authenticated, issued and delivered and paid for in the manner provided for in the Terms Agreement and in the Indenture on the Closing Date (as defined below), the Indenture will have been duly executed and delivered by the Company, such Offered Securities will have been duly executed, authenticated, issued and delivered and will conform to the description thereof contained in the Prospectus; and the Indenture (assuming due authorization, execution and delivery by the Trustee) and such Offered Securities will constitute valid and legally binding obligations of the Company, enforceable in accordance with their terms, except as (A) the enforceability thereof may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium, fraudulent transfer or similar laws affecting creditors' rights generally, and (B) the availability of equitable remedies may be limited by equitable principles of general applicability and except that a waiver of rights under any usury laws may be unenforceable;
        (iv)  The execution, delivery and performance of the Indenture and the Terms Agreement (including the Provisions) and the issuance and sale of the Offered Securities and compliance with the terms and provisions thereof, to such counsel's knowledge, will not result in a breach or violation of any of the terms and provisions of, or constitute a default under, the DGCL, any federal, Illinois or New York ("
Practicing States
") statute, any Practicing States' rule, regulation or order of any Practicing States' governmental agency or body or any Practicing States' court having jurisdiction over the Company or BCC (provided however that enforcement of rights to indemnity and contribution in the Terms Agreement may be limited by federal or state securities laws or principles of public policy), except where such breach, violation or default would not have a Material Adverse Effect, and except such as may be required under the securities or Blue Sky Laws of various states in connection with the offer and sale of the Offered Securities;
        (v)  The Registration Statement has become effective under the Act, the Prospectus was filed with the Commission pursuant to the subparagraph of Rule 424(b) specified in such opinion on the date specified therein, and, to the knowledge of such counsel, no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or any part thereof has been issued and no proceedings for that purpose have been instituted or are pending or contemplated under the Act; and such counsel does not know of any Practicing States legal or governmental proceedings required to be described in the Prospectus which are not described as required;
        (vi)  The Terms Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company; and
      (vii)  The Registration Statement, as of its effective date, the Registration Statement and the Prospectus, as of the date of the Terms Agreement, and any amendment or supplement thereto, as of its date (in each case excluding the documents incorporated or included by reference therein), complied as to form in all material respects with the requirements of the Act, the Trust Indenture Act and the Rules and Regulations; each of the documents incorporated by reference in the Prospectus, at the time it became effective or was filed with the Commission, as the case may be, complied as to form in all material respects with the requirements of the Act or Exchange Act, as the case may be, and the Rules and Regulations; it being understood that such counsel need express no opinion as to the financial statements and schedules or other financial and statistical data and as to the statement of eligibility on Form T-1 contained in or omitted from the Registration Statement or the Prospectus;
        Such counsel shall also state that it has no reason to believe (which belief shall not constitute an opinion) that the Registration Statement, as of its effective date, as of the date of the Terms Agreement or as of the Closing Date, or any amendment thereto, as of its date or as of the Closing Date, contained any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading or that the Prospectus, as of the date of the Terms Agreement or as of the Closing Date, or any amendment or supplement thereto, as of its date or as of the Closing Date, contained any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; it being understood that such counsel need express no opinion as to the financial statements and schedules or other financial and statistical data and as to the statement of eligibility on Form T-1 contained in or omitted from the Registration Statement or the Prospectus.
        In giving their opinions required by this Section 5(d), such counsel (A) may rely as to all matters of fact upon certificates and written statements of officers and employees of and accountants for the
Company and (B) may rely as to the qualification and good standing of each of the Company or any of its subsidiaries to do business in any state or jurisdiction, upon certificates of appropriate government officials or opinions of counsel in such jurisdictions, which opinions shall be in form and substance satisfactory to counsel for the Underwriters. In giving their believe required to in the preceding paragraph, such counsel may state that their belief is based upon their participation in the preparation of the Registration Statement and Prospectus and any amendments and supplements thereto and review and discussion of the contents thereof, but are without independent check or verification.
        (e)  The Representatives shall have received an opinion, dated the Closing Date, of the General Counsel or Assistant General Counsel of the Company, to the effect that:
          (i)  Each Material Subsidiary (excluding BCC) of the Company has been duly incorporated or organized and is an existing corporation or other entity in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its incorporation or organization, with power and authority to own its properties and conduct its business as described in the Prospectus; and each Material Subsidiary (excluding BCC) of the Company is duly qualified to do business as a foreign corporation or other entity in good standing in all other jurisdictions in which it owns or leases material property or conducts material business except where failure to so qualify would not have a Material Adverse Effect; all of the issued and outstanding capital stock or ownership interests of each Material Subsidiary (including BCC) of the Company has been duly authorized and validly issued and is fully paid and nonassessable; and the capital stock or ownership interests of each Material Subsidiary (including BCC) owned by the Company, directly or through subsidiaries, is owned, to such counsel's knowledge, free from liens and encumbrances;
        (ii)  To such counsel's knowledge, no consent, approval, authorization or order of, or filing with, any governmental agency or body or any court is required for the consummation of the transactions contemplated by the Terms Agreement (including the Provisions) in connection with the issuance or sale of the Offered Securities by the Company, except such as have been obtained and made under the Act and the Trust Indenture Act and such as may be required under state securities laws;
        (iii)  The execution, delivery and performance of the Indenture and the Terms Agreement (including the Provisions) and the issuance and sale of the Offered Securities and compliance with the terms and provisions thereof will not result in a breach or violation of any of the terms and provisions of, or constitute a default under (i) to such counsel's knowledge, any statute, any rule, regulation or order of any governmental agency or body or any court having jurisdiction over the Company or any Material Subsidiary of the Company (provided however, that enforcement of rights to indemnity and contribution in the Terms Agreement may be limited by federal or state securities laws or principles of public policy), or any of their properties, (ii) any material agreement or instrument to which the Company or any such Material Subsidiary is a party or by which the Company or any such Material Subsidiary is bound or to which any of the properties of the Company or any such Material Subsidiary is subject or (iii) under the charter or by-laws of the Company or any Material Subsidiary, except in the case of (i) and (ii) where such breach, violation or default would not have a Material Adverse Effect, and except such as may be required under the securities or Blue Sky Laws of various states in connection with the offer and sale of the Offered Securities; and
        (iv)  The descriptions in the Registration Statement and Prospectus of statutes, legal and governmental proceedings and contracts and other documents are accurate and fairly present the information required to be shown in all material respects; and such counsel does not know of any legal or governmental proceedings required to be described in the Prospectus which are not described as required or of any contracts or documents of a character required to be described in the Registration Statement or Prospectus or to be filed as exhibits to the Registration Statement which are not described and filed as required.
        In giving the opinions required by this Section 5(e), such counsel (A) may rely as to all matters of fact upon certificates and written statements of officers and employees of and accountants for the Company and (B) may rely as to the qualification and good standing of each of the Company or any of its subsidiaries to do business in any state or jurisdiction, upon certificates of appropriate government officials or opinions of counsel in such jurisdictions, which opinions shall be in form and substance satisfactory to counsel for the Underwriters.
        (f)    The Representatives shall have received from Simpson Thacher & Bartlett, or such other counsel as shall be designated by the Underwriters, such opinion or opinions, dated the Closing Date, with respect to the incorporation of the Company, the validity of the Offered Securities delivered on the Closing Date, the Registration Statement, the Prospectus and other related matters as the Representatives may require, and the Company shall have furnished to such counsel such documents as they request for the purpose of enabling them to pass upon such matters.
        (g)  The Representatives shall have received a certificate, dated the Closing Date, of the President or any Vice President and a Treasurer or Assistant Treasurer of the Company in which such officers, to the best of their knowledge after reasonable investigation, shall state that the representations and warranties of the Company in these Provisions are true and correct as of the date thereof, that the Company has complied with all agreements and satisfied all conditions on its part to be performed or satisfied hereunder at or prior to the Closing Date, that no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or of any part thereof has been issued and no proceedings for that purpose have been instituted or are contemplated by the Commission and that, subsequent to the date of the most recent financial statements in the Prospectus, there has been no material adverse change, nor any development or event reasonably likely to involve a prospective material adverse change, in the financial condition, business, properties or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole except as set forth in or contemplated by the Prospectus or as described in such certificate.
        (h)  The Representatives shall have received a letter, dated the Closing Date, of Deloitte & Touche LLP to the effect that they reaffirm the statements made in the letter furnished pursuant to subsection (a) of this Section, except that the specified date referred to in such subsection will be a date not more than three days prior to the Closing Date for the purposes of this subsection.
The Company will furnish the Representatives with such conformed copies of such opinions, certificates, letters and documents as the Representatives reasonably requests. The Representatives may in their sole discretion waive on behalf of the Underwriters compliance with any conditions to the obligations of the Underwriters under these Provisions and the Terms Agreement.
        6.
    Indemnification and Contribution.
    (a) The Company will indemnify and hold harmless each Underwriter, its partners, directors and officers and each person, if any, who controls such Underwriter within the meaning of Section 15 of the Act, against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities, joint or several, to which such Underwriter may become subject, under the Act or otherwise, insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) arise out of or are based upon any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of any material fact contained in the Registration Statement, the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto, or any related preliminary prospectus or preliminary prospectus supplement, or arise out of or are based upon the omission or alleged omission to state therein a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, and will reimburse each Underwriter for any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such Underwriter in connection with investigating or defending any such loss, claim, damage, liability or action as such expenses are incurred; provided, however, that the Company will not be liable in any such case to the extent that any such loss, claim, damage or liability arises out of or is based upon an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement in or omission or alleged omission from any of such documents made in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by any Underwriter through the Representatives specifically for use therein, it being understood and agreed that the only such information furnished by any Underwriter consists of the information described as such in the Terms Agreement.
        (b)  Each Underwriter will severally and not jointly indemnify and hold harmless the Company, its directors and officers and each person, if any who controls the Company within the meaning of Section 15 of the Act, against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities to which the Company may become subject, under the Act or otherwise, insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) arise out of or are based upon any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of any material fact contained in the Registration Statement, the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto, or any related preliminary prospectus or preliminary prospectus supplement, or arise out of or are based upon the omission or the alleged omission to state therein a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, in each case to the extent, but only to the extent, that such untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission was made in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by such Underwriter through the Representatives specifically for use therein, and will reimburse any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by the Company in connection with investigating or defending any
such loss, claim, damage, liability or action as such expenses are incurred, it being understood and agreed that the only such information furnished by any Underwriter consists of the information described in the Terms Agreement.
        (c)  Promptly after receipt by an indemnified party under this Section of notice of the commencement of any action, such indemnified party will, if a claim in respect thereof is to be made against the indemnifying party under subsection (a) or (b) above, notify the indemnifying party of the commencement thereof; but the failure to notify the indemnifying party shall not relieve it from any liability that it may have under subsection (a) or (b) above except to the extent that it has been materially prejudiced (through the forfeiture of substantive rights or defenses) by such failure; and provided further that the failure to notify the indemnifying party shall not relieve it from any liability that it may have to an indemnified party otherwise than under subsection (a) or (b) above. In case any such action is brought against any indemnified party and it notifies the indemnifying party of the commencement thereof, the indemnifying party will be entitled to participate therein and, to the extent that it may wish, jointly with any other indemnifying party similarly notified, to assume the defense thereof, with counsel satisfactory to such indemnified party (who shall not, except with the consent of the indemnified party, be counsel to the indemnifying party), and after notice from the indemnifying party to such indemnified party of its election so to assume the defense thereof, the indemnifying party will not be liable to such indemnified party under this Section for any legal or other expenses subsequently incurred by such indemnified party in connection with the defense thereof other than reasonable costs of investigation. No indemnifying party shall, without the prior written consent of the indemnified party, effect any settlement of any pending or threatened action in respect of which any indemnified party is or could have been a party and indemnity could have been sought hereunder by such indemnified party unless such settlement (i) includes an unconditional release of such indemnified party from all liability on any claims that are the subject matter of such action and (ii) does not include a statement as to, or an admission of, fault, culpability or a failure to act by or on behalf of an indemnified party.
        (d)  If the indemnification provided for in this Section is unavailable or insufficient to hold harmless an indemnified party under subsection (a) or (b) above, then each indemnifying party shall contribute to the amount paid or payable by such indemnified party as a result of the losses, claims, damages or liabilities referred to in subsection (a) or (b) above (i) in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect the relative benefits received by the Company on the one hand and the Underwriters on the other from the offering of the Securities or (ii) if the allocation provided by clause (i) above is not permitted by applicable law, in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect not only the relative benefits referred to in clause (i) above but also the relative fault of the Company on the one hand and the Underwriters on the other in connection with the statements or omissions which resulted in such losses, claims, damages or liabilities as well as any other relevant equitable considerations. The relative benefits received by the Company on the one hand and the Underwriters on the other shall be deemed to be in the same proportion as the total net proceeds from the offering (before deducting expenses) received by the Company bear to the total underwriting discounts and commissions received by the Underwriters. The relative fault shall be determined by reference to, among other things, whether the untrue or alleged untrue statement of a material fact or the omission or alleged omission to state a material fact relates to information supplied by the Company or the Underwriters and the parties' relative intent, knowledge, access to information and opportunity to correct or prevent such untrue statement or omission. The amount paid by an indemnified party as a result of the losses, claims, damages or liabilities referred to in the first sentence of this subsection (d) shall be deemed to include any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such indemnified party in connection with investigating or defending any action or claim which is the subject of this subsection (d). Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection (d), no Underwriter shall be required to contribute any amount in excess of the amount by which the total price at which the Securities underwritten by it and distributed to the public were offered to the public exceeds the amount of any damages which such Underwriter has otherwise been required to pay by reason of such untrue or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission. No person guilty of fraudulent misrepresentation (within the meaning of Section 11(f) of the Act) shall be entitled to contribution from any person who was not guilty of such fraudulent misrepresentation. The Underwriters' obligations in this subsection (d) to contribute are several in proportion to their respective underwriting obligations and not joint.
        (e)  The obligations of the Company under this Section shall be in addition to any liability which the Company may otherwise have and shall extend, upon the same terms and conditions, to each person, if any, who controls any Underwriter within the meaning of the Act; and the obligations of the Underwriters under this Section shall be in addition to any liability which the respective Underwriters may otherwise have and shall extend, upon the same terms and conditions, to each director of the Company, to each officer of the Company who has
signed the Registration Statement and to each person, if any, who controls the Company within the meaning of the Act.
        7.
    Default of Underwriters.
    If any Underwriter or Underwriters default in their obligations to purchase Offered Securities under the Terms Agreement on the Closing Date and the aggregate principal amount of Offered Securities that such defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters agreed but failed to purchase does not exceed 10% of the total principal amount of Offered Securities that the Underwriters are obligated to purchase on the Closing Date, the Representatives may make arrangements satisfactory to the Company for the purchase of such Offered Securities by other persons, including any of the Underwriters, but if no such arrangements are made by the Closing Date, the non-defaulting Underwriters shall be obligated severally, in proportion to their respective commitments under the Terms Agreement, to purchase the Offered Securities that such defaulting Underwriters agreed but failed to purchase on the Closing Date. If any Underwriter or Underwriters so default and the aggregate principal amount of Offered Securities with respect to which such default or defaults occur exceeds 10% of the total principal amount of Offered Securities that the Underwriters are obligated to purchase on the Closing Date and arrangements satisfactory to the Representatives and the Company for the purchase of such Offered Securities by other persons are not made within 36 hours after such default, the Terms Agreement will terminate without liability on the part of any non-defaulting Underwriter or the Company, except as provided in Section 8. As used in these Provisions, the term "Underwriter" includes any person substituted for an Underwriter under this Section. Nothing herein will relieve a defaulting Underwriter from liability for its default.
        8.
    Survival of Certain Representations and Obligations.
    The respective indemnities, agreements, representations, warranties and other statements of the Company or its officers and of the several Underwriters set forth in or made pursuant to the Terms Agreement will remain in full force and effect, regardless of any investigation, or statement as to the results thereof, made by or on behalf of any Underwriter, the Company or any of their respective representatives, officers or directors or any controlling person, and will survive delivery of and payment for the Offered Securities. If the Terms Agreement is terminated pursuant to Section 7 or if for any reason the purchase of the Offered Securities by the Underwriters is not consummated, the Company shall remain responsible for the expenses to be paid or reimbursed by it pursuant to Section 4 and the respective obligations of the Company and the Underwriters pursuant to Section 6 shall remain in effect, and if any Offered Securities have been purchased hereunder the representations and warranties in Section 2 and all obligations under Section 4 shall also remain in effect. If the purchase of the Offered Securities by the Underwriters is not consummated for any reason other than solely because of the termination of the Terms Agreement pursuant to Section 7 or the occurrence of any event specified in clause (iii), (iv), (v), (vi) or (vii) of Section 5(c), the Company will reimburse the Underwriters for all reasonable out-of-pocket expenses (including fees and disbursements of outside counsel) reasonably incurred by them in connection with the offering of the Offered Securities.
        9.
    Certain Agreements of the Underwriters.
    Each of the Underwriters agrees that it will not offer, sell, or deliver any of the Offered Securities, directly or indirectly, or distribute the Prospectus or any other offering material relating to the Offered Securities, in or from any jurisdiction except under circumstances that will, to the best of its knowledge and belief, result in compliance with the applicable laws and regulations and which will not impose any obligations on the Company except as set forth in the Terms Agreement (including the Provisions).
        10.
    Notices.
    All communications hereunder will be in writing and, if sent to the Underwriters, will be mailed, delivered or telegraphed and confirmed to them at their address furnished to the Company in writing for the purpose of communications hereunder, or, if sent to the Company, will be mailed, delivered or telegraphed and confirmed to it at The Boeing Company, 100 North Riverside Plaza, Chicago, Illinois 60606, Attention: James C. Johnson, Senior Vice President, Assistant General Counsel and Secretary; provided, however, that any notice to an Underwriter pursuant to Section 6 will be mailed, delivered or telegraphed and confirmed to such Underwriter.
        11.
    Successors.
    The Terms Agreement (including the Provisions) will inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the parties hereto and their respective successors and the officers and directors and controlling persons referred to in Section 6, and no other person will have any right or obligation hereunder.
        12.
    Representation of Underwriters.
    The Representatives will act for the several Underwriters in connection with the financing described in the Terms Agreement, and any action under such Terms Agreement (including the Provisions) taken by the Representatives will be binding upon all the Underwriters.
        13.
    Counterparts.
    The Terms Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be deemed to be an original, but all such counterparts shall together constitute one and the same Agreement.
        
14.
    
Applicable Law.
    
These Provisions and any applicable Terms Agreement shall be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the laws of the State of New York, without regard to principles of conflicts of laws.
Schedule 1
Washington
Illinois
California
Missouri
Schedule 2
Illinois
California
        [Date]
To:    The Representative[s] of the Underwriters identified herein
Dear Ladies and Gentlemen:
        The undersigned agrees to sell to the several Underwriters named in Schedule A hereto for their respective accounts, on and subject to the terms and conditions of the Underwriting Provisions dated February    , 2003 filed as an exhibit to the Company's registration statement on Form S-3 (No. 333-99509) ("
Underwriting Provisions
"), the following securities ("
Offered Securities
") on the following terms:
Title:
[ %] [Floating Rate]NotesDebentures Due                  .
Principal Amount:
$                  .
Interest:
            % per annum, from                  ,                   , payable [semiannually] on                  and                   , commencing                  ,         , to holders of record on the preceding or                  , as the case may be.
Maturity:
                  ,          .
Optional Redemption:
Sinking Fund:
Listing:
[                  ]
Purchase Price:
        % of principal amount, plus accrued interest [, if any,] from                  ,        .
Expected Reoffering Price:
        % of principal amount, subject to change by the [Representative[s] [Underwriters].
Closing:
9:00 A.M. on                  ,        , at Piper Rudnick, 203 North LaSalle Street, Chicago, IL 60601, in Federal (same day) funds.
Settlement and Trading:
Book-Entry Only via DTC.
Blackout:
Until days after the Closing Date.
Number of signed copies of the Registration Statement (including exhibits):
[ ]
[Name[s] and Address[es] of the [Representative[s]][Underwriter[s]]:]
        The respective principal amounts of the Offered Securities to be purchased by each of the Underwriters are set forth opposite their names in Schedule A hereto.
        The terms of the Underwriting Provisions are incorporated herein by reference.
        For purposes of Section 6 of the Underwriting Provisions, the only information furnished to the Company by any Underwriter for use in the Prospectus consists of the following information in the Prospectus furnished on behalf of each Underwriter:                        in the prospectus supplement.
        If the foregoing is in accordance with your understanding of our agreement, kindly sign and return to the Company one of the counterparts hereof, whereupon it will become a binding agreement between the Company and the several Underwriters in accordance with its terms.
The foregoing Terms Agreement is hereby confirmed and accepted as of the date first above written.
        [Name of Representative]
        Acting on behalf of itself and as the Representative of         the several Underwriters.

QuickLinks
-- Click here to rapidly navigate through this document
February 6, 2003
To: The Representatives of the Underwriters identified herein
Dear Ladies and Gentlemen:
        The undersigned agrees to sell to the several Underwriters named in Schedule A hereto for their respective accounts, on and subject to the terms and conditions of the Underwriting Provisions dated February 6, 2003 to be filed as an exhibit to the Company's registration statement on Form S-3 (No. 333-99509) ("
Underwriting Provisions
"), the following securities ("
Offered Securities
") on the following terms:
Title:
5/% Notes Due February 15, 2013 (the "Notes due 2013")           6/% Notes Due February 15, 2033 (the "Notes due 2033")
1
8
1
8
Principal Amount: 
$600,000,000 for the Notes due 2013 and $400,000,000 for the Notes due 2033
Interest:
5/% per annum for the Notes due 2013 and 6/% for the Notes due 2033, from February 11, 2003, payable semiannually on February 15 and August 15, commencing August 15, 2003, to holders of record on the preceding February 1 or August 1, as the case may be.
1
8
1
8
Maturity: 
February 15, 2013 for the Notes due 2013 and February 15, 2033 for the Notes due 2033.
Optional Redemption: 
Redeemable at any time with at least 30 days' notice
Sinking Fund: 
None
Listing: 
Luxembourg
Purchase Price: 
99.008% of the principal amount for the Notes due 2013 and 97.267% of the principal amount for the Notes due 2033, plus accrued interest, if any, from February 11, 2003.
Price to the Public:
99.458% of the principal amount for the Notes due 2013 and 98.142% of the principal amount for the Notes due 2033, plus accrued interest, if any, from February 11, 2003.
Expected Reoffering Price: 
Selling Concession of 0.30% and Reallowance of 0.15% for the Notes due 2013 and Selling Concession of 0.50% and Reallowance of 0.25% for the Notes due 2033, subject to change by the Underwriters.
Closing: 
9:00 A.M. on February 11, 2003 at Piper Rudnick, 203 North LaSalle Street, Chicago, IL 60601, in Federal (same day) funds.
Settlement and Trading: 
Book-Entry Only via DTC.
Blackout: 
Until the Closing Date.
Number of signed copies of the Registration Statement (including exhibits): 
2
Names and Addresses of the Representatives: 
Credit Suisse First Boston LLC, 11 Madison Avenue, New York, New York 10010, Deutsche Bank Securities, 31 West 52 Street, New York, New York 10019, JP Morgan Securities Inc., 270 Park Avenue, New York, New York 10017
nd
        The respective principal amounts of the Offered Securities to be purchased by each of the Underwriters are set forth opposite their names in Schedule A hereto.
        The terms of the Underwriting Provisions are incorporated herein by reference.
        Section 5 of the Underwriting Provisions is hereby amended to include the further condition that the Representatives shall have received an opinion, dated as of the Closing Date, of Piper Rudnick, counsel for the Company, to the effect that:
"The statements made in the Prospectus under the caption "Certain U.S. Federal Income Tax Consequences", insofar as they constitute summaries of matters of United States federal tax law and regulations or legal conclusions with respect thereto, are accurate summaries of the matters described therein in all material respects."
Section 5(d)(vii) of the Underwriting Provisions is hereby amended in its entirety as follows:
"The Registration Statement, as of its effective date, the Registration Statement and the Prospectus, as of the date of the Terms Agreement, and any amendment or supplement thereto, as of its date (in each case excluding the documents incorporated or included by reference therein), complied as to form in all material respects with the requirements of the Act, the Trust Indenture Act and the Rules and Regulations; each of the documents incorporated by reference in the Prospectus, at the time it became effective or was filed with the Commission, as the case may be, complied as to form in all material respects with the requirements of the Act or Exchange Act, as the case may be, and the Rules and Regulations; it being understood that such counsel need express no opinion as to the financial statements and schedules or other financial or statistical data derived from the Company's accounting records or as to the statement of eligibility on Form T-1 contained in or omitted from the Registration Statement or the Prospectus and that such counsel need express no opinion as to any financial or statistical data covered in the letters delivered by Deloitte & Touche LLP pursuant to Section 5(a) and Section 5(h) hereof;"
        The paragraph following Section 5(d)(vii) of the Underwriting Provisions is hereby amended in its entirety as follows:
"Such counsel shall also state that it has no reason to believe (which belief shall not constitute an opinion) that the Registration Statement, as of its effective date, as of the date of the Terms Agreement or as of the Closing Date, or any amendment thereto, as of its date or as of the Closing Date, contained any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading or that the Prospectus, as of the date of the Terms Agreement or as of the Closing Date, or any amendment or supplement thereto, as of its date or as of the Closing Date, contained any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; it being understood that such counsel need express no opinion as to the financial statements and schedules or other financial or statistical data derived from the Company's accounting records or as to the statement of eligibility on Form T-1 contained in or omitted from the Registration Statement or the Prospectus and that such counsel need express no opinion as to any financial or statistical data covered in the letters delivered by Deloitte & Touche LLP pursuant to Section 5(a) and Section 5(h) hereof."
        For purposes of Section 6 of the Underwriting Provisions, the only information furnished to the Company by any Underwriter for use in the Prospectus consists of the following information in the Prospectus furnished on behalf of each Underwriter: the concession and reallowance figures appearing in the third paragraph, the second and third sentence of the fifth paragraph, the seventh paragraph and the thirteenth paragraph under the caption "Underwriting" in the prospectus supplement.
        Each Underwriter represents and agrees that it and each of its affiliates:
 - 
has not offered or sold and, prior to the date six months after the date of issue of the Offered Securities, will not offer or sell any of the Offered Securities to persons in the United Kingdom except to persons whose ordinary activities involve them in acquiring, holding, managing or disposing of investments (as principal or agent) for the purposes of their businesses or otherwise in circumstances which have not resulted and will not result in an offer to the public in the United Kingdom within the meaning of the Public Offers of Securities Regulations 1995 or the Financial Services and Markets Act 2000;
 - 
has only communicated or caused to be communicated and will only communicate or cause to be communicated any invitation or inducement to engage in investment activity (within the meaning of Section 21 of the Financial Services and Markets Act 2000) received by it in connection with the issue or sale of the Offered Securities in circumstances in which Section 21(1) of the Financial Services and Markets Act 2000 does not apply to the Company; and
 - 
has complied and will comply with all applicable provisions of the Financial Services and Markets Act 2000 with respect to anything done by it in relation to the Offered Securities in, from or otherwise involving the United Kingdom.
        For avoidance of doubt, all references in this Terms Agreement (including the Underwriting Provisions) to the "Prospectus" shall also be deemed to include the Current Report on Form 8-K filed by the Company on February 6, 2003.
        The Company hereby submits to the non-exclusive jurisdiction of the Federal and state courts in the Borough of Manhattan in The City of New York in any suit or proceeding arising out of or relating to the Terms Agreement (including the Underwriting Provisions) or the transactions contemplated hereby.
        If the foregoing is in accordance with your understanding of our agreement, kindly sign and return to the Company one of the counterparts hereof, whereupon it will become a binding agreement between the Company and the several Underwriters in accordance with its terms.
Very truly yours,
THE BOEING COMPANY
The foregoing Terms Agreement is hereby confirmed and     accepted as of the date first above written.
CREDIT SUISSE FIRST BOSTON LLC DEUTSCHE BANK SECURITIES INC. J.P. MORGAN SECURITIES INC.
Acting on behalf of themselves and as the     Representatives of the several Underwriters.
Schedule A
QuickLinks
Schedule A

        UNLESS THIS CERTIFICATE IS PRESENTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DEPOSITORY TRUST COMPANY, A NEW YORK CORPORATION ("DTC"), TO THE BOEING COMPANY OR ITS AGENT FOR REGISTRATION OF TRANSFER, EXCHANGE, OR PAYMENT, AND ANY CERTIFICATE ISSUED IS REGISTERED IN THE NAME OF CEDE & CO. OR IN SUCH OTHER NAME AS IS REQUESTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF DTC (AND ANY PAYMENT IS MADE TO CEDE & CO. OR TO SUCH OTHER ENTITY AS IS REQUESTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF DTC),
ANY TRANSFER, PLEDGE OR OTHER USE HEREOF FOR VALUE OR OTHERWISE BY OR TO ANY PERSON IS WRONGFUL INASMUCH AS THE REGISTERED OWNER HEREOF, CEDE & CO., HAS AN INTEREST HEREIN
.
        TRANSFERS OF THIS GLOBAL NOTE SHALL BE LIMITED TO TRANSFERS IN WHOLE, BUT NOT IN PART, BY DTC TO A NOMINEE OF DTC OR BY A NOMINEE THEREOF TO DTC OR ANOTHER NOMINEE THEREOF OR BY DTC OR ANY SUCH NOMINEE TO A SUCCESSOR OF DTC OR SUCH SUCCESSOR'S NOMINEE, UNLESS AND UNTIL THIS NOTE IS EXCHANGED IN WHOLE OR IN PART FOR NOTES IN DEFINITIVE FORM AND TRANSFERS IN PART OF THIS GLOBAL NOTE SHALL BE LIMITED TO TRANSFERS MADE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE RESTRICTIONS SET FORTH IN THE INDENTURE HEREINAFTER REFERRED TO.
        1.
Principal and Interest
.    THE BOEING COMPANY, a corporation duly organized and existing under the laws of the State of Delaware (herein called the "Company", which term includes any successor corporation under the Indenture hereinafter referred to), for value received, hereby promises to pay to CEDE & CO., or registered assigns, the principal sum of THREE HUNDRED MILLION DOLLARS ($300,000,000) on February 15, 2013 (the "Maturity Date"), and to pay interest thereon from February 11, 2003, or from the most recent Interest Payment Date to which interest has been paid or duly provided for, semi-annually in arrears on February 15 and August 15 in each year (each an "Interest Payment Date"), commencing August 15, 2003, at the rate of 5/% per annum until the principal hereof is paid or made available for payment. Interest will be computed on the basis of a 360 day year of twelve 30 day months. The interest so payable, and punctually paid or duly provided for, on any Interest Payment Date and on the Maturity Date will, as provided in such Indenture, be paid to the Holder in whose name this Note (or one or more predecessor Notes) is registered at the close of business on the first day of February or the first day of August (each "Regular Record Date"), as the case may be, next preceding such Interest Payment Date or the Maturity Date, as applicable. Any such interest not so punctually paid or duly provided for will forthwith cease to be payable to the Holder on such Regular Record Date and may either be paid to the Holder in whose name this Note (or one or more Predecessor Notes) is registered at the close of business on a Special Record Date for the payment of such Defaulted Interest to be fixed by the Trustee under the Indenture, notice whereof shall be given to Holders of Notes of this series not less than 10 days prior to such Special Record Date, or be paid on a specified date in any other lawful manner not inconsistent with the requirements of any securities exchange on which the Notes of this series may be listed, and upon such notice as may be required by such exchange, all as more fully provided in said Indenture. Interest payable on this Note on any Interest Payment Date and on the Maturity Date, as the case may be, will be the amount of interest accrued from and including the immediately preceding Interest Payment Date (or from and including February 11, 2003, in the case of the initial Interest Payment Date) to but excluding the applicable Interest Payment date or the Maturity Date, as the case may be. If an Interest Payment Date or the Maturity Date falls on a day that is not a Business Day, the payment will be made on the next Business Day as if it were made on the date the payment was due, and no interest will accrue on the amount so payable for the period from and after that Interest Payment Date or the Maturity Date, as the case may be. A "Business Day" means any day which is not a Saturday or Sunday or any day on which banking institutions are authorized or obligated by applicable law or regulation to close in the place in which payment on the Notes is required, as the case may be.
1
8
        The principal of this Note payable on the Maturity Date will be paid against presentation and surrender of this Note at the office or agency of the Issuer maintained for that purpose in the Borough of Manhattan, the City of New York.
        2.
Indenture
.    This Note is one of a duly authorized series of securities of the Company (herein called the "Notes"), issued and to be issued in one or more series under an indenture, dated as of February 1, 2003 (herein called the "Indenture"), between the Company, as issuer, and JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, as trustee (in such capacity, the "Trustee," which term includes any successor trustee under the Indenture), and with respect to which, the terms of this Note were established pursuant to the Officers' Certificate delivered pursuant to Section 301 of the Indenture and dated the date hereof, to which Indenture and all indentures supplemental thereto reference is hereby made for a statement of the respective rights, limitations of rights, duties and immunities thereunder of the Company, the Trustee and the Holders of the Notes and of the terms upon which the Notes are, and are to be, authenticated and delivered.
        This Note is one of the series designated as the 5/% Notes due 2013 of the Company, limited in aggregate principal amount to $600,000,000. The Notes are unsecured obligations of the Company and rank
1
8
pari passu
with all unsecured and unsubordinated obligations of the Company.
        The terms of the Notes include those stated in the Indenture and those made part of the Indenture by reference to the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended (15 U.S.C. sections 77aaa-77bbbb) (the "TIA"), as in effect on the date of the Indenture (except as otherwise indicated in the Indenture). Notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein, the Notes are subject to all such terms, and Holders of Notes are referred to the Indenture and the TIA for a statement of them.
        3.
Method of Payment
.    Payment of the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on or Additional Amounts, if any, on the Notes shall be payable at the office or agency of the Company to be maintained in the Borough of Manhattan, the City of New York;
provided, however
, that such payments may be made, at the option of the Company, by check mailed to the address of the person entitled thereto as of the Regular Record Date and as shown on the Security Register. Such payments shall be payable in Dollars.
        4.
Registrar and Paying Agent
.    The Security Registrar and Paying Agent shall be initially the Trustee and in Luxembourg, JPMORGAN BANK LUXEMBOURG S.A.
        5.
Optional Redemption
.    This Note will be redeemable, as a whole or in part, at the Company's option, at any time or from time to time, on at least 30 days, but not more than 60 days, prior notice to Holders of this Note, at a redemption price equal to the greater of:
 - 
100% of the principal amount of this Note to be redeemed, together with any accrued and unpaid interest to the redemption date; or
 - 
the sum of the present values of the Remaining Scheduled Payments, as defined below, discounted, on a semiannual basis, assuming a 360-day year consisting of twelve 30-day months, at the Treasury Rate, as defined below, plus 20 basis points, together with any accrued and unpaid interest to the redemption date.
        "Treasury Rate" means, with respect to any redemption date for the Notes:
 - 
the yield, under the heading which represents the average for the immediately preceding week, appearing in the most recently published statistical release designated "H.15(519)" or any successor publication which is published weekly by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System and which establishes yields on actively traded United States Treasury securities adjusted to constant maturity under the caption "Treasury Constant Maturities," for the maturity corresponding to the Comparable Treasury Issue; provided that if no maturity is within three months before or after the maturity date for the Notes, yields for the two published maturities most closely corresponding to the Comparable Treasury Issue will be determined and the Treasury Rate will be interpolated or extrapolated from those yields on a straight line basis rounding to the nearest month; or
 - 
if that release, or any successor release, is not published during the week preceding the calculation date or does not contain such yields, the rate per annum equal to the semiannual equivalent yield to maturity of the Comparable Treasury Issue, calculated using a price for the Comparable Treasury Issue (expressed as a percentage of its principal amount) equal to the Comparable Treasury Price for that redemption date.
        The Treasury Rate will be calculated by the Company on the third business day preceding the redemption date.
        "Comparable Treasury Issue" means the United States Treasury security selected by an Independent Investment Banker as having a maturity comparable to the remaining term of the Notes to be redeemed that
would be utilized, at the time of selection and in accordance with customary financial practice, in pricing new issues of corporate debt securities of comparable maturity to the remaining term of such Notes.
        "Independent Investment Banker" means one of the Reference Treasury Dealers, to be appointed by the Company.
        "Comparable Treasury Price" means, with respect to any redemption date for the Notes:
 - 
the average of four Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations for that redemption date, after excluding the highest and lowest of such Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations; or
 - 
if the Company obtains fewer than four Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations, the average of all quotations obtained by the Company.
        "Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations" means, with respect to each Reference Treasury Dealer and any redemption date, the average, as determined by the Company, of the bid and asked prices for the Comparable Treasury Issue, expressed in each case as a percentage of its principal amount, quoted in writing to the Company by such Reference Treasury Dealer at 3:30 p.m., New York City time on the third business day preceding such redemption date.
        "Reference Treasury Dealer" means each of Credit Suisse First Boston LLC, Deutsche Bank Securities Inc. and J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. and one other treasury dealer selected by the Company, and their respective successors; provided, however, that if any of the foregoing shall cease to be a primary U.S. Government securities dealer, which the Company refers to as a "Primary Treasury Dealer," the Company will substitute therefor another nationally recognized investment banking firm that is a Primary Treasury Dealer.
        "Remaining Scheduled Payments" means, with respect to each Note to be redeemed, the remaining scheduled payments of the principal thereof and interest thereon that would be due after the related redemption date but for such redemption; provided, however, that, if such redemption date is not an Interest Payment Date with respect to such Note, the amount of the next succeeding scheduled interest payment thereon will be deemed to be reduced by the amount of interest accrued thereon to such redemption date.
        On and after the redemption date, interest will cease to accrue on the Notes or any portion thereof called for redemption, unless the Company defaults in the payment of the redemption price and accrued interest. On or before the redemption date, the Company will deposit with the Paying Agent, or the Trustee, money sufficient to pay the redemption price of and accrued interest on the Notes to be redeemed on such date. If less than all of the Notes are to be redeemed, the Notes to be redeemed shall be selected pro rata by the Trustee or by such method as the Trustee shall deem fair and appropriate; provided, however, that a partial redemption must be in an amount not less than $1,000,000 principal amount of Notes.
        6.
Sinking Fund
.    The Company shall have no sinking fund or analogous obligations in respect of the Notes.
        7.
Discharge and Defeasance
.    The Securities will be subject to satisfaction, discharge and defeasance as set forth in Section 403 of the Indenture.
        8.
Denominations; Transfers; Exchange
.    The Notes are in fully registered form, in denominations of $1,000 and integral multiples of $1,000. A Holder may register transfers of or exchange securities in accordance with the Indenture. No service charge shall be made for any such registration of transfer or exchange, but the Company may require payment of a sum sufficient to cover any tax or other governmental charge payable in connection therewith. Prior to due presentment of this Note for registration of transfer, the Company, the Trustee and any agent of the Company or the Trustee may treat the Holder in whose name this Note is registered as the owner hereof for all purposes, whether or not this Note be overdue, and neither the Company, the Trustee nor any such agent shall be affected by notice to the contrary.
        9.
Events of Default; Remedies
.    The Events of Default are as set forth in Section 501 of the Indenture. If an Event of Default with respect to Notes of this series shall occur and be continuing, the principal of the Notes of this series may be declared due and payable in the manner and with the effect provided in the Indenture. Upon a declaration of acceleration of the Notes, the principal of the Notes may be declared due and payable in the manner, and with the effect, provided in the Indenture.
        10.
Payments of Additional Amounts
.    The Company will, subject to the exceptions and limitations set forth below, pay as additional interest on the notes such additional amounts as are necessary in order that the net payment by the Company or the Paying Agent of the principal of and interest on the notes to a Holder who is not
a United States person (as defined below), after deduction or withholding for or on account of any present or future tax, assessment or other governmental charge imposed upon the Holder by the United States or a political subdivision or taxing authority of or in the United States, imposed by withholding with respect to the payment, will not be less than the amount provided in the Notes to be then due and payable (the "Additional Amounts"); provided, however, that the foregoing obligation to pay Additional Amounts shall not apply:
        (1)  to any tax, assessment or other governmental charge that is imposed or withheld solely by reason of the Holder, or a fiduciary, settlor, beneficiary, member or shareholder of the Holder if the Holder is an estate, trust, partnership or corporation, or a person holding a power over an estate or trust administered by a fiduciary Holder, being considered as:
        (a)  being or having been present or engaged in a trade or business in the United States or having had a permanent establishment in the United States;
        (b)  having a current or former relationship with the United States, including a relationship as a citizen or resident of the United States;
        (c)  being or having been a foreign or domestic personal holding company, a passive foreign investment company or a controlled foreign corporation with respect to the United States or a corporation that has accumulated earnings to avoid United States federal income tax or a foreign private foundation or other foreign tax-exempt organization;
        (d)  being or having been a "10-percent shareholder" of the Company as defined in section 871(h)(3) of the United States Internal Revenue Code and the Regulations that may be promulgated thereunder; or
        (e)  being a bank receiving payments on an extension of credit made pursuant to a loan agreement entered into in the ordinary course of its trade or business;
        (2)  to any Holder that is not the sole beneficial owner of the Notes, or a portion of the Notes, or that is a fiduciary, partnership or entity treated as a partnership or disregarded as an entity separate from its owner for United States federal income tax purposes, but only to the extent that a beneficiary or settlor with respect to the fiduciary, a beneficial owner or member of the partnership or entity treated as a partnership or disregarded as an entity separate from its owner for United States federal income tax purposes would not have been entitled to the payment of an Additional Amount had the beneficiary, settlor, beneficial owner or member received directly its beneficial or distributive share of the payment;
        (3)  to any tax, assessment or other governmental charge that is imposed otherwise or withheld solely by reason of a failure of the Holder or any other person to comply with certification, identification or information reporting requirements concerning the nationality, residence, identity or connection with the United States of the Holder or beneficial owner of the Notes, if compliance is required by statute or by regulation of the United States Treasury Department or by an applicable income tax treaty to which the United States is a party (and with respect to which the Holder is entitled to benefits) as a precondition to exemption from such tax, assessment or other governmental charge;
        (4)  to any tax, assessment or other governmental charge which is imposed or payable otherwise than by withholding by the Company or the Paying Agent from the payment;
        (5)  to any estate, inheritance, gift, sales, excise, transfer, wealth or personal property tax or similar tax, assessment or other governmental charge;
        (6)  to any tax, assessment or other governmental charge required to be withheld by any paying agent from any payment of principal of or interest on any Notes, if such payment can be made without such withholding by any other paying agent;
        (7)  to any tax, assessment or other governmental charge required to be made pursuant to any European Union Directive on the taxation of savings income or any law implementing or complying with, or introduced in order to conform to, such Directive;
        (8)  to any tax, assessment or other governmental charge required to be withheld by any paying agent from any payment in respect of any Note, if such payment can be made without withholding by another paying agent in a member state of the European Union;
        (9)  to any tax, assessment or other governmental charge that is imposed or withheld solely by reason of a change in law, regulation or administrative or judicial interpretation that becomes effective more than 15 days after the payment becomes due or is duly provided for, whichever occurs later; or
        (10) in the case of any combination of the above items.
        The Notes are subject in all cases to any tax, fiscal or other law or regulation or administrative or judicial interpretation applicable to the Notes. Except as specifically provided, the Company shall not be required to make any payment with respect to any tax, assessment or other governmental charge imposed by any government or a political subdivision or taxing authority of or in any government or political subdivision.
        As used in this Section, the term "United States" means the United States of America (including the states and the District of Columbia) and its territories, possessions and other areas subject to its jurisdiction, and "United States person" means any individual who is a citizen or resident of the United States, a corporation, partnership or other entity created or organized in or under the laws of the United States or any political subdivision of the United States or any estate, the income of which is subject to United States federal income taxation regardless of its source, or a trust if (1) it is subject to the primary supervision of a court within the United States and one or more United States persons have the authority to control all substantial decisions of the trust or (2) it has a valid election in effect under applicable Treasury regulations to be treated as a United States person.
        If, as a result of any change in, or amendment to, the laws (or any regulations or rulings promulgated under the laws) of the United States (or any political subdivision or taxing authority of or in the United States), or any change in, or amendments to, an official position regarding the application or interpretation of such laws, regulations or rulings, which change or amendment is announced or becomes effective on or after February 6, 2003, the Company becomes, or based upon a written opinion of independent counsel selected by the Company, will become obligated to pay Additional Amounts with respect to the Notes, then the Company may at its option redeem, in whole, but not in part, the Notes on not less than 30 nor more than 60 days prior notice, at the redemption price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the Notes, together with interest accrued but unpaid on the Notes to the date fixed for redemption.
        11.
Amendments and Waivers
.    The Indenture permits, with certain exceptions as therein provided, that with the written consent of the Holders of not less than 66/% in principal amount of the Outstanding Securities of each series to be adversely affected thereby, the Company, when authorized by a Board Resolution, and the Trustee may enter into an indenture or indentures thereto to add any provisions or to change or eliminate any provisions of the Indenture or any other indenture supplemental thereto or to modify the rights of the Holders of each such series. The Indenture also provides, with certain exceptions therein provided, that the Holders of not less than a majority in principal amount of the Outstanding Securities of any series may waive on behalf of the Holders of all Securities of such series a past default, or Event of Default arising therefrom, with respect to that series and its consequences. Any such consent or waiver by the Holder of this Note shall be conclusive and binding upon such Holder and upon all future Holders of this Note and of any Note issued upon the registration of transfer hereof or in exchange herefor or in lieu hereof, whether or not notation of such consent or waiver is made upon this Note.
2
3
        12.
Obligations Absolute
.    No reference herein to the Indenture and no provision of this Note or of the Indenture shall alter or impair the obligation of the Company, which is absolute and unconditional, to pay the principal of (and premium, if any) and interest (if any) on this Note at the times, place and rate, and in the coin or currency, herein prescribed.
        13.
No Recourse Against Others
.    No recourse shall be had for the payment of the principal of, or premium, if any, or interest on this Note, or for any claim based hereon or otherwise in respect hereof, or based on or in respect of the Indenture, any indenture supplemental thereto, against any incorporator, stockholder, officer or director, as such, past, present or future, of the Company or of any successor corporation of either, whether by virtue of any constitution, statute or rule of law, or by the enforcement of any assessment or penalty or otherwise, all such liability being, by the acceptance hereof and as part of the consideration for the issue hereof, expressly waived and released.
        13.
Defined Terms
.    All initially capitalized terms used in this Note which are defined in the Indenture shall have the meanings assigned to them in the Indenture.
        15.
Governing Law.
THE INDENTURE AND THE NOTES SHALL BE GOVERNED BY AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK.
        16.
Successors and Assigns
.    All covenants and agreements of the Company in the Indenture and the Notes shall bind its successors and assigns. All agreements of the Trustee in the Indenture shall bind its successor.
        17.
Authentication
.    Unless the certificate of authentication hereon has been executed by the Trustee or an Authenticating Agent, by manual signature, this Note shall not be entitled to any benefit under the Indenture or be valid or obligatory for any purpose.
        18.
Abbreviations
.    Customary abbreviations may be used in the name of a Holder or an assignee, such as TEN COM (= tenants in common), TEN ENT (= tenants by the entireties), JT TEN (= joint tenants with rights of survivorship and not as tenants in common), CUST (= custodian), and U/G/M/A (= Uniform Gift to Minors Act).
        19.
CUSIP Numbers
.    Pursuant to a recommendation promulgated by the Committee on Uniform Security Identification Procedures, the Company has caused CUSIP numbers to be printed on the Notes, and the Trustee may use CUSIP numbers in notices as a convenience to Holders. No representation is made as to the accuracy of such numbers either as printed on the Notes or as contained in any notice and reliance may be placed only on the other identification numbers placed thereon.
        IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Company has caused this Note to be duly executed and its corporate seal to be hereunto affixed and attested.
        This is one of the 5/% Notes due 2013 referred to in the within-mentioned Indenture.
1
8
Dated: February 11, 2003
        FOR VALUE RECEIVED, the undersigned hereby sell(s), assign(s) and transfer(s) unto .
                                    
        
(Please insert Social Security, Taxpayer Identification No. or other identifying number of Assignee)
   
        
(Please print or typewrite name and address including postal zip code of Assignee)
the within Note of THE BOEING COMPANY (the "
Company
") and does hereby irrevocably constitute and appoint attorney to transfer the said Note on the books of the Company, with full power of substitution in the premises.
                        
[NOTICE: The signature of this assignment must correspond with the name as written upon the face of the within investment in every particular, without alteration or enlargement or any change whatever.]
        UNLESS THIS CERTIFICATE IS PRESENTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DEPOSITORY TRUST COMPANY, A NEW YORK CORPORATION ("DTC"), TO THE BOEING COMPANY OR ITS AGENT FOR REGISTRATION OF TRANSFER, EXCHANGE, OR PAYMENT, AND ANY CERTIFICATE ISSUED IS REGISTERED IN THE NAME OF CEDE & CO. OR IN SUCH OTHER NAME AS IS REQUESTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF DTC (AND ANY PAYMENT IS MADE TO CEDE & CO. OR TO SUCH OTHER ENTITY AS IS REQUESTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF DTC),
ANY TRANSFER, PLEDGE OR OTHER USE HEREOF FOR VALUE OR OTHERWISE BY OR TO ANY PERSON IS WRONGFUL
INASMUCH AS THE REGISTERED OWNER HEREOF, CEDE & CO., HAS AN INTEREST HEREIN.
        TRANSFERS OF THIS GLOBAL NOTE SHALL BE LIMITED TO TRANSFERS IN WHOLE, BUT NOT IN PART, BY DTC TO A NOMINEE OF DTC OR BY A NOMINEE THEREOF TO DTC OR ANOTHER NOMINEE THEREOF OR BY DTC OR ANY SUCH NOMINEE TO A SUCCESSOR OF DTC OR SUCH SUCCESSOR'S NOMINEE, UNLESS AND UNTIL THIS NOTE IS EXCHANGED IN WHOLE OR IN PART FOR NOTES IN DEFINITIVE FORM AND TRANSFERS IN PART OF THIS GLOBAL NOTE SHALL BE LIMITED TO TRANSFERS MADE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE RESTRICTIONS SET FORTH IN THE INDENTURE HEREINAFTER REFERRED TO.
        1.
    Principal and Interest.
    THE BOEING COMPANY, a corporation duly organized and existing under the laws of the State of Delaware (herein called the "Company", which term includes any successor corporation under the Indenture hereinafter referred to), for value received, hereby promises to pay to CEDE & CO., or registered assigns, the principal sum of THREE HUNDRED MILLION DOLLARS ($300,000,000) on February 15, 2013 (the "Maturity Date"), and to pay interest thereon from February 11, 2003, or from the most recent Interest Payment Date to which interest has been paid or duly provided for, semi-annually in arrears on February 15 and August 15 in each year (each an "Interest Payment Date"), commencing August 15, 2003, at the rate of 5/% per annum until the principal hereof is paid or made available for payment. Interest will be computed on the basis of a 360 day year of twelve 30 day months. The interest so payable, and punctually paid or duly provided for, on any Interest Payment Date and on the Maturity Date will, as provided in such Indenture, be paid to the Holder in whose name this Note (or one or more predecessor Notes) is registered at the close of business on the first day of February or the first day of August (each "Regular Record Date"), as the case may be, next preceding such Interest Payment Date or the Maturity Date, as applicable. Any such interest not so punctually paid or duly provided for will forthwith cease to be payable to the Holder on such Regular Record Date and may either be paid to the Holder in whose name this Note (or one or more Predecessor Notes) is registered at the close of business on a Special Record Date for the payment of such Defaulted Interest to be fixed by the Trustee under the Indenture, notice whereof shall be given to Holders of Notes of this series not less than 10 days prior to such Special Record Date, or be paid on a specified date in any other lawful manner not inconsistent with the requirements of any securities exchange on which the Notes of this series may be listed, and upon such notice as may be required by such exchange, all as more fully provided in said Indenture. Interest payable on this Note on any Interest Payment Date and on the Maturity Date, as the case may be, will be the amount of interest accrued from and including the immediately preceding Interest Payment Date (or from and including February 11, 2003, in the case of the initial Interest Payment Date) to but excluding the applicable Interest Payment date or the Maturity Date, as the case may be. If an Interest Payment Date or the Maturity Date falls on a day that is not a Business Day, the payment will be made on the next Business Day as if it were made on the date the payment was due, and no interest will accrue on the amount so payable for the period from and after that Interest Payment Date or the Maturity Date, as the case may be. A "Business Day" means any day which is not a Saturday or Sunday or any day on which banking institutions are authorized or obligated by applicable law or regulation to close in the place in which payment on the Notes is required, as the case may be.
1
8
        The principal of this Note payable on the Maturity Date will be paid against presentation and surrender of this Note at the office or agency of the Issuer maintained for that purpose in the Borough of Manhattan, the City of New York.
        2.
    Indenture.
    This Note is one of a duly authorized series of securities of the Company (herein called the "Notes"), issued and to be issued in one or more series under an indenture, dated as of February 1, 2003 (herein called the "Indenture"), between the Company, as issuer, and JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, as trustee (in such capacity, the "Trustee," which term includes any successor trustee under the Indenture), and with respect to which, the terms of this Note were established pursuant to the Officers' Certificate delivered pursuant to Section 301 of the Indenture and dated the date hereof, to which Indenture and all indentures supplemental thereto reference is hereby made for a statement of the respective rights, limitations of rights, duties and immunities thereunder of the Company, the Trustee and the Holders of the Notes and of the terms upon which the Notes are, and are to be, authenticated and delivered.
        This Note is one of the series designated as the 5/% Notes due 2013 of the Company, limited in aggregate principal amount to $600,000,000. The Notes are unsecured obligations of the Company and rank
1
8
pari passu
with all unsecured and unsubordinated obligations of the Company.
        The terms of the Notes include those stated in the Indenture and those made part of the Indenture by reference to the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended (15 U.S.C. sections 77aaa-77bbbb) (the "TIA"), as in effect on the date of the Indenture (except as otherwise indicated in the Indenture). Notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein, the Notes are subject to all such terms, and Holders of Notes are referred to the Indenture and the TIA for a statement of them.
        3.
    Method of Payment.
    Payment of the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on or Additional Amounts, if any, on the Notes shall be payable at the office or agency of the Company to be maintained in the Borough of Manhattan, the City of New York;
provided, however
, that such payments may be made, at the option of the Company, by check mailed to the address of the person entitled thereto as of the Regular Record Date and as shown on the Security Register. Such payments shall be payable in Dollars.
        4.
    Registrar and Paying Agent.
    The Security Registrar and Paying Agent shall be initially the Trustee and in Luxembourg, JPMORGAN BANK LUXEMBOURG S.A.
        5.
    Optional Redemption.
    This Note will be redeemable, as a whole or in part, at the Company's option, at any time or from time to time, on at least 30 days, but not more than 60 days, prior notice to Holders of this Note, at a redemption price equal to the greater of:
 - 
100% of the principal amount of this Note to be redeemed, together with any accrued and unpaid interest to the redemption date; or
 - 
the sum of the present values of the Remaining Scheduled Payments, as defined below, discounted, on a semiannual basis, assuming a 360-day year consisting of twelve 30-day months, at the Treasury Rate, as defined below, plus 20 basis points, together with any accrued and unpaid interest to the redemption date.
        "Treasury Rate" means, with respect to any redemption date for the Notes:
 - 
the yield, under the heading which represents the average for the immediately preceding week, appearing in the most recently published statistical release designated "H.15(519)" or any successor publication which is published weekly by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System and which establishes yields on actively traded United States Treasury securities adjusted to constant maturity under the caption "Treasury Constant Maturities," for the maturity corresponding to the Comparable Treasury Issue; provided that if no maturity is within three months before or after the maturity date for the Notes, yields for the two published maturities most closely corresponding to the Comparable Treasury Issue will be determined and the Treasury Rate will be interpolated or extrapolated from those yields on a straight line basis rounding to the nearest month; or
 - 
if that release, or any successor release, is not published during the week preceding the calculation date or does not contain such yields, the rate per annum equal to the semiannual equivalent yield to maturity of the Comparable Treasury Issue, calculated using a price for the Comparable Treasury Issue (expressed as a percentage of its principal amount) equal to the Comparable Treasury Price for that redemption date.
        The Treasury Rate will be calculated by the Company on the third business day preceding the redemption date.
        "Comparable Treasury Issue" means the United States Treasury security selected by an Independent Investment Banker as having a maturity comparable to the remaining term of the Notes to be redeemed that
would be utilized, at the time of selection and in accordance with customary financial practice, in pricing new issues of corporate debt securities of comparable maturity to the remaining term of such Notes.
        "Independent Investment Banker" means one of the Reference Treasury Dealers, to be appointed by the Company.
        "Comparable Treasury Price" means, with respect to any redemption date for the Notes:
 - 
the average of four Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations for that redemption date, after excluding the highest and lowest of such Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations; or
 - 
if the Company obtains fewer than four Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations, the average of all quotations obtained by the Company.
        "Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations" means, with respect to each Reference Treasury Dealer and any redemption date, the average, as determined by the Company, of the bid and asked prices for the Comparable Treasury Issue, expressed in each case as a percentage of its principal amount, quoted in writing to the Company by such Reference Treasury Dealer at 3:30 p.m., New York City time on the third business day preceding such redemption date.
        "Reference Treasury Dealer" means each of Credit Suisse First Boston LLC, Deutsche Bank Securities Inc. and J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. and one other treasury dealer selected by the Company, and their respective successors; provided, however, that if any of the foregoing shall cease to be a primary U.S. Government securities dealer, which the Company refers to as a "Primary Treasury Dealer," the Company will substitute therefor another nationally recognized investment banking firm that is a Primary Treasury Dealer.
        "Remaining Scheduled Payments" means, with respect to each Note to be redeemed, the remaining scheduled payments of the principal thereof and interest thereon that would be due after the related redemption date but for such redemption; provided, however, that, if such redemption date is not an Interest Payment Date with respect to such Note, the amount of the next succeeding scheduled interest payment thereon will be deemed to be reduced by the amount of interest accrued thereon to such redemption date.
        On and after the redemption date, interest will cease to accrue on the Notes or any portion thereof called for redemption, unless the Company defaults in the payment of the redemption price and accrued interest. On or before the redemption date, the Company will deposit with the Paying Agent, or the Trustee, money sufficient to pay the redemption price of and accrued interest on the Notes to be redeemed on such date. If less than all of the Notes are to be redeemed, the Notes to be redeemed shall be selected pro rata by the Trustee or by such method as the Trustee shall deem fair and appropriate; provided, however, that a partial redemption must be in an amount not less than $1,000,000 principal amount of Notes.
        6.
    Sinking Fund.
    The Company shall have no sinking fund or analogous obligations in respect of the Notes.
        7.
    Discharge and Defeasance.
    The Securities will be subject to satisfaction, discharge and defeasance as set forth in Section 403 of the Indenture.
        8.
    Denominations; Transfers; Exchange.
    The Notes are in fully registered form, in denominations of $1,000 and integral multiples of $1,000. A Holder may register transfers of or exchange securities in accordance with the Indenture. No service charge shall be made for any such registration of transfer or exchange, but the Company may require payment of a sum sufficient to cover any tax or other governmental charge payable in connection therewith. Prior to due presentment of this Note for registration of transfer, the Company, the Trustee and any agent of the Company or the Trustee may treat the Holder in whose name this Note is registered as the owner hereof for all purposes, whether or not this Note be overdue, and neither the Company, the Trustee nor any such agent shall be affected by notice to the contrary.
        9.
    Events of Default; Remedies.
    The Events of Default are as set forth in Section 501 of the Indenture. If an Event of Default with respect to Notes of this series shall occur and be continuing, the principal of the Notes of this series may be declared due and payable in the manner and with the effect provided in the Indenture. Upon a declaration of acceleration of the Notes, the principal of the Notes may be declared due and payable in the manner, and with the effect, provided in the Indenture.
        10.
    Payments of Additional Amounts.
    The Company will, subject to the exceptions and limitations set forth below, pay as additional interest on the notes such additional amounts as are necessary in order that the net payment by the Company or the Paying Agent of the principal of and interest on the notes to a Holder who is not
a United States person (as defined below), after deduction or withholding for or on account of any present or future tax, assessment or other governmental charge imposed upon the Holder by the United States or a political subdivision or taxing authority of or in the United States, imposed by withholding with respect to the payment, will not be less than the amount provided in the Notes to be then due and payable (the "Additional Amounts"); provided, however, that the foregoing obligation to pay Additional Amounts shall not apply:
        (1)  to any tax, assessment or other governmental charge that is imposed or withheld solely by reason of the Holder, or a fiduciary, settlor, beneficiary, member or shareholder of the Holder if the Holder is an estate, trust, partnership or corporation, or a person holding a power over an estate or trust administered by a fiduciary Holder, being considered as:
        (a)  being or having been present or engaged in a trade or business in the United States or having had a permanent establishment in the United States;
        (b)  having a current or former relationship with the United States, including a relationship as a citizen or resident of the United States;
        (c)  being or having been a foreign or domestic personal holding company, a passive foreign investment company or a controlled foreign corporation with respect to the United States or a corporation that has accumulated earnings to avoid United States federal income tax or a foreign private foundation or other foreign tax-exempt organization;
        (d)  being or having been a "10-percent shareholder" of the Company as defined in section 871(h)(3) of the United States Internal Revenue Code and the Regulations that may be promulgated thereunder; or
        (e)  being a bank receiving payments on an extension of credit made pursuant to a loan agreement entered into in the ordinary course of its trade or business;
        (2)  to any Holder that is not the sole beneficial owner of the Notes, or a portion of the Notes, or that is a fiduciary, partnership or entity treated as a partnership or disregarded as an entity separate from its owner for United States federal income tax purposes, but only to the extent that a beneficiary or settlor with respect to the fiduciary, a beneficial owner or member of the partnership or entity treated as a partnership or disregarded as an entity separate from its owner for United States federal income tax purposes would not have been entitled to the payment of an Additional Amount had the beneficiary, settlor, beneficial owner or member received directly its beneficial or distributive share of the payment;
        (3)  to any tax, assessment or other governmental charge that is imposed otherwise or withheld solely by reason of a failure of the Holder or any other person to comply with certification, identification or information reporting requirements concerning the nationality, residence, identity or connection with the United States of the Holder or beneficial owner of the Notes, if compliance is required by statute or by regulation of the United States Treasury Department or by an applicable income tax treaty to which the United States is a party (and with respect to which the Holder is entitled to benefits) as a precondition to exemption from such tax, assessment or other governmental charge;
        (4)  to any tax, assessment or other governmental charge which is imposed or payable otherwise than by withholding by the Company or the Paying Agent from the payment;
        (5)  to any estate, inheritance, gift, sales, excise, transfer, wealth or personal property tax or similar tax, assessment or other governmental charge;
        (6)  to any tax, assessment or other governmental charge required to be withheld by any paying agent from any payment of principal of or interest on any Notes, if such payment can be made without such withholding by any other paying agent;
        (7)  to any tax, assessment or other governmental charge required to be made pursuant to any European Union Directive on the taxation of savings income or any law implementing or complying with, or introduced in order to conform to, such Directive;
        (8)  to any tax, assessment or other governmental charge required to be withheld by any paying agent from any payment in respect of any Note, if such payment can be made without withholding by another paying agent in a member state of the European Union;
        (9)  to any tax, assessment or other governmental charge that is imposed or withheld solely by reason of a change in law, regulation or administrative or judicial interpretation that becomes effective more than 15 days after the payment becomes due or is duly provided for, whichever occurs later; or
        (10) in the case of any combination of the above items.
        The Notes are subject in all cases to any tax, fiscal or other law or regulation or administrative or judicial interpretation applicable to the Notes. Except as specifically provided, the Company shall not be required to make any payment with respect to any tax, assessment or other governmental charge imposed by any government or a political subdivision or taxing authority of or in any government or political subdivision.
        As used in this Section, the term "United States" means the United States of America (including the states and the District of Columbia) and its territories, possessions and other areas subject to its jurisdiction, and "United States person" means any individual who is a citizen or resident of the United States, a corporation, partnership or other entity created or organized in or under the laws of the United States or any political subdivision of the United States or any estate, the income of which is subject to United States federal income taxation regardless of its source, or a trust if (1) it is subject to the primary supervision of a court within the United States and one or more United States persons have the authority to control all substantial decisions of the trust or (2) it has a valid election in effect under applicable Treasury regulations to be treated as a United States person.
        If, as a result of any change in, or amendment to, the laws (or any regulations or rulings promulgated under the laws) of the United States (or any political subdivision or taxing authority of or in the United States), or any change in, or amendments to, an official position regarding the application or interpretation of such laws, regulations or rulings, which change or amendment is announced or becomes effective on or after February 6, 2003, the Company becomes, or based upon a written opinion of independent counsel selected by the Company, will become obligated to pay Additional Amounts with respect to the Notes, then the Company may at its option redeem, in whole, but not in part, the Notes on not less than 30 nor more than 60 days prior notice, at the redemption price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the Notes, together with interest accrued but unpaid on the Notes to the date fixed for redemption.
        11.
    Amendments and Waivers.
    The Indenture permits, with certain exceptions as therein provided, that with the written consent of the Holders of not less than 66/% in principal amount of the Outstanding Securities of each series to be adversely affected thereby, the Company, when authorized by a Board Resolution, and the Trustee may enter into an indenture or indentures thereto to add any provisions or to change or eliminate any provisions of the Indenture or any other indenture supplemental thereto or to modify the rights of the Holders of each such series. The Indenture also provides, with certain exceptions therein provided, that the Holders of not less than a majority in principal amount of the Outstanding Securities of any series may waive on behalf of the Holders of all Securities of such series a past default, or Event of Default arising therefrom, with respect to that series and its consequences. Any such consent or waiver by the Holder of this Note shall be conclusive and binding upon such Holder and upon all future Holders of this Note and of any Note issued upon the registration of transfer hereof or in exchange herefor or in lieu hereof, whether or not notation of such consent or waiver is made upon this Note.
2
3
        12.
    Obligations Absolute.
    No reference herein to the Indenture and no provision of this Note or of the Indenture shall alter or impair the obligation of the Company, which is absolute and unconditional, to pay the principal of (and premium, if any) and interest (if any) on this Note at the times, place and rate, and in the coin or currency, herein prescribed.
        13.
    No Recourse Against Others.
    No recourse shall be had for the payment of the principal of, or premium, if any, or interest on this Note, or for any claim based hereon or otherwise in respect hereof, or based on or in respect of the Indenture, any indenture supplemental thereto, against any incorporator, stockholder, officer or director, as such, past, present or future, of the Company or of any successor corporation of either, whether by virtue of any constitution, statute or rule of law, or by the enforcement of any assessment or penalty or otherwise, all such liability being, by the acceptance hereof and as part of the consideration for the issue hereof, expressly waived and released.
        14.
    Defined Terms.
    All initially capitalized terms used in this Note which are defined in the Indenture shall have the meanings assigned to them in the Indenture.
        15.
    
Governing Law.
    
THE INDENTURE AND THE NOTES SHALL BE GOVERNED BY AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK.
        16.
    Successors and Assigns.
    All covenants and agreements of the Company in the Indenture and the Notes shall bind its successors and assigns. All agreements of the Trustee in the Indenture shall bind its successor.
        17.
    Authentication.
    Unless the certificate of authentication hereon has been executed by the Trustee or an Authenticating Agent, by manual signature, this Note shall not be entitled to any benefit under the Indenture or be valid or obligatory for any purpose.
        18.
    Abbreviations.
    Customary abbreviations may be used in the name of a Holder or an assignee, such as TEN COM (= tenants in common), TEN ENT (= tenants by the entireties), JT TEN (= joint tenants with rights of survivorship and not as tenants in common), CUST (= custodian), and U/G/M/A (= Uniform Gift to Minors Act).
        19
    CUSIP Numbers.
    Pursuant to a recommendation promulgated by the Committee on Uniform Security Identification Procedures, the Company has caused CUSIP numbers to be printed on the Notes, and the Trustee may use CUSIP numbers in notices as a convenience to Holders. No representation is made as to the accuracy of such numbers either as printed on the Notes or as contained in any notice and reliance may be placed only on the other identification numbers placed thereon.
        IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Company has caused this Note to be duly executed and its corporate seal to be hereunto affixed and attested.
        This is one of the 5/% Notes due 2013 referred to in the within-mentioned Indenture.
1
8
Dated: February 11, 2003
        FOR VALUE RECEIVED, the undersigned hereby sell(s), assign(s) and transfer(s) unto ______________________.
        
(Please insert Social Security, Taxpayer Identification No. or other identifying number of Assignee)
        
(Please print or typewrite name and address including postal zip code of Assignee)
the within Note of THE BOEING COMPANY (the "
Company
") and does hereby irrevocably constitute and appoint                        attorney to transfer the said Note on the books of the Company, with full power of substitution in the premises.
[NOTICE: The signature of this assignment must correspond with the name as written upon the face of the within investment in every particular, without alteration or enlargement or any change whatever.]

        UNLESS THIS CERTIFICATE IS PRESENTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DEPOSITORY TRUST COMPANY, A NEW YORK CORPORATION ("DTC"), TO THE BOEING COMPANY OR ITS AGENT FOR REGISTRATION OF TRANSFER, EXCHANGE, OR PAYMENT, AND ANY CERTIFICATE ISSUED IS REGISTERED IN THE NAME OF CEDE & CO. OR IN SUCH OTHER NAME AS IS REQUESTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF DTC (AND ANY PAYMENT IS MADE TO CEDE & CO. OR TO SUCH OTHER ENTITY AS IS REQUESTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF DTC),
ANY TRANSFER, PLEDGE OR OTHER USE HEREOF FOR VALUE OR OTHERWISE BY OR TO ANY PERSON IS WRONGFUL
INASMUCH AS THE REGISTERED OWNER HEREOF, CEDE & CO., HAS AN INTEREST HEREIN.
        TRANSFERS OF THIS GLOBAL NOTE SHALL BE LIMITED TO TRANSFERS IN WHOLE, BUT NOT IN PART, BY DTC TO A NOMINEE OF DTC OR BY A NOMINEE THEREOF TO DTC OR ANOTHER NOMINEE THEREOF OR BY DTC OR ANY SUCH NOMINEE TO A SUCCESSOR OF DTC OR SUCH SUCCESSOR'S NOMINEE, UNLESS AND UNTIL THIS NOTE IS EXCHANGED IN WHOLE OR IN PART FOR NOTES IN DEFINITIVE FORM AND TRANSFERS IN PART OF THIS GLOBAL NOTE SHALL BE LIMITED TO TRANSFERS MADE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE RESTRICTIONS SET FORTH IN THE INDENTURE HEREINAFTER REFERRED TO.
        1.
    Principal and Interest.
    THE BOEING COMPANY, a corporation duly organized and existing under the laws of the State of Delaware (herein called the "Company", which term includes any successor corporation under the Indenture hereinafter referred to), for value received, hereby promises to pay to CEDE & CO., or registered assigns, the principal sum of FOUR HUNDRED MILLION DOLLARS ($400,000,000) on February 15, 2033 (the "Maturity Date"), and to pay interest thereon from February 11, 2003, or from the most recent Interest Payment Date to which interest has been paid or duly provided for, semi-annually in arrears on February 15 and August 15 in each year (each an "Interest Payment Date"), commencing August 15, 2003, at the rate of 6/% per annum until the principal hereof is paid or made available for payment. Interest will be computed on the basis of a 360 day year of twelve 30 day months. The interest so payable, and punctually paid or duly provided for, on any Interest Payment Date and on the Maturity Date will, as provided in such Indenture, be paid to the Holder in whose name this Note (or one or more predecessor Notes) is registered at the close of business on the first day of February or the first day of August (each "Regular Record Date"), as the case may be, next preceding such Interest Payment Date or the Maturity Date, as applicable. Any such interest not so punctually paid or duly provided for will forthwith cease to be payable to the Holder on such Regular Record Date and may either be paid to the Holder in whose name this Note (or one or more Predecessor Notes) is registered at the close of business on a Special Record Date for the payment of such Defaulted Interest to be fixed by the Trustee under the Indenture, notice whereof shall be given to Holders of Notes of this series not less than 10 days prior to such Special Record Date, or be paid on a specified date in any other lawful manner not inconsistent with the requirements of any securities exchange on which the Notes of this series may be listed, and upon such notice as may be required by such exchange, all as more fully provided in said Indenture. Interest payable on this Note on any Interest Payment Date and on the Maturity Date, as the case may be, will be the amount of interest accrued from and including the immediately preceding Interest Payment Date (or from and including February 11, 2003, in the case of the initial Interest Payment Date) to but excluding the applicable Interest Payment date or the Maturity Date, as the case may be. If an Interest Payment Date or the Maturity Date falls on a day that is not a Business Day, the payment will be made on the next Business Day as if it were made on the date the payment was due, and no interest will accrue on the amount so payable for the period from and after that Interest Payment Date or the Maturity Date, as the case may be. A "Business Day" means any day which is not a Saturday or Sunday or any day on which banking institutions are authorized or obligated by applicable law or regulation to close in the place in which payment on the Notes is required, as the case may be.
1
8
        The principal of this Note payable on the Maturity Date will be paid against presentation and surrender of this Note at the office or agency of the Issuer maintained for that purpose in the Borough of Manhattan, the City of New York.
        2.
    Indenture.
    This Note is one of a duly authorized series of securities of the Company (herein called the "Notes"), issued and to be issued in one or more series under an indenture, dated as of February 1, 2003 (herein called the "Indenture"), between the Company, as issuer, and JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, as trustee (in such capacity, the "Trustee," which term includes any successor trustee under the Indenture), and with respect to which, the terms of this Note were established pursuant to the Officers' Certificate delivered pursuant to Section 301 of the Indenture and dated the date hereof, to which Indenture and all indentures supplemental thereto reference is hereby made for a statement of the respective rights, limitations of rights, duties and immunities thereunder of the Company, the Trustee and the Holders of the Notes and of the terms upon which the Notes are, and are to be, authenticated and delivered.
        This Note is one of the series designated as the 6/% Notes due 2033 of the Company, limited in aggregate principal amount to $400,000,000. The Notes are unsecured obligations of the Company and rank
1
8
pari passu
with all unsecured and unsubordinated obligations of the Company.
        The terms of the Notes include those stated in the Indenture and those made part of the Indenture by reference to the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended (15 U.S.C. sections 77aaa-77bbbb) (the "TIA"), as in effect on the date of the Indenture (except as otherwise indicated in the Indenture). Notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein, the Notes are subject to all such terms, and Holders of Notes are referred to the Indenture and the TIA for a statement of them.
        3.
    Method of Payment.
    Payment of the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on or Additional Amounts, if any, on the Notes shall be payable at the office or agency of the Company to be maintained in the Borough of Manhattan, the City of New York;
provided, however
, that such payments may be made, at the option of the Company, by check mailed to the address of the person entitled thereto as of the Regular Record Date and as shown on the Security Register. Such payments shall be payable in Dollars.
        4.
    Registrar and Paying Agent.
    The Security Registrar and Paying Agent shall be initially the Trustee and in Luxembourg, JPMORGAN BANK LUXEMBOURG S.A.
        5.
    Optional Redemption.
    This Note will be redeemable, as a whole or in part, at the Company's option, at any time or from time to time, on at least 30 days, but not more than 60 days, prior notice to Holders of this Note, at a redemption price equal to the greater of:
 - 
100% of the principal amount of this Note to be redeemed, together with any accrued and unpaid interest to the redemption date; or
 - 
the sum of the present values of the Remaining Scheduled Payments, as defined below, discounted, on a semiannual basis, assuming a 360-day year consisting of twelve 30-day months, at the Treasury Rate, as defined below, plus 25 basis points, together with any accrued and unpaid interest to the redemption date.
        "Treasury Rate" means, with respect to any redemption date for the Notes:
 - 
the yield, under the heading which represents the average for the immediately preceding week, appearing in the most recently published statistical release designated "H.15(519)" or any successor publication which is published weekly by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System and which establishes yields on actively traded United States Treasury securities adjusted to constant maturity under the caption "Treasury Constant Maturities," for the maturity corresponding to the Comparable Treasury Issue; provided that if no maturity is within three months before or after the maturity date for the Notes, yields for the two published maturities most closely corresponding to the Comparable Treasury Issue will be determined and the Treasury Rate will be interpolated or extrapolated from those yields on a straight line basis rounding to the nearest month; or
 - 
if that release, or any successor release, is not published during the week preceding the calculation date or does not contain such yields, the rate per annum equal to the semiannual equivalent yield to maturity of the Comparable Treasury Issue, calculated using a price for the Comparable Treasury Issue (expressed as a percentage of its principal amount) equal to the Comparable Treasury Price for that redemption date.
        The Treasury Rate will be calculated by the Company on the third business day preceding the redemption date.
        "Comparable Treasury Issue" means the United States Treasury security selected by an Independent Investment Banker as having a maturity comparable to the remaining term of the Notes to be redeemed that would be utilized, at the time of selection and in accordance with customary financial practice, in pricing new issues of corporate debt securities of comparable maturity to the remaining term of such Notes.
        "Independent Investment Banker" means one of the Reference Treasury Dealers, to be appointed by the Company.
        "Comparable Treasury Price" means, with respect to any redemption date for the Notes:
 - 
the average of four Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations for that redemption date, after excluding the highest and lowest of such Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations; or
 - 
if the Company obtains fewer than four Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations, the average of all quotations obtained by the Company.
        "Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations" means, with respect to each Reference Treasury Dealer and any redemption date, the average, as determined by the Company, of the bid and asked prices for the Comparable Treasury Issue, expressed in each case as a percentage of its principal amount, quoted in writing to the Company by such Reference Treasury Dealer at 3:30 p.m., New York City time on the third business day preceding such redemption date.
        "Reference Treasury Dealer" means each of Credit Suisse First Boston LLC, Deutsche Bank Securities Inc. and J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. and one other treasury dealer selected by the Company, and their respective successors; provided, however, that if any of the foregoing shall cease to be a primary U.S. Government securities dealer, which the Company refers to as a "Primary Treasury Dealer," the Company will substitute therefor another nationally recognized investment banking firm that is a Primary Treasury Dealer.
        "Remaining Scheduled Payments" means, with respect to each Note to be redeemed, the remaining scheduled payments of the principal thereof and interest thereon that would be due after the related redemption date but for such redemption; provided, however, that, if such redemption date is not an Interest Payment Date with respect to such Note, the amount of the next succeeding scheduled interest payment thereon will be deemed to be reduced by the amount of interest accrued thereon to such redemption date.
        On and after the redemption date, interest will cease to accrue on the Notes or any portion thereof called for redemption, unless the Company defaults in the payment of the redemption price and accrued interest. On or before the redemption date, the Company will deposit with the Paying Agent, or the Trustee, money sufficient to pay the redemption price of and accrued interest on the Notes to be redeemed on such date. If less than all of the Notes are to be redeemed, the Notes to be redeemed shall be selected pro rata by the Trustee or by such method as the Trustee shall deem fair and appropriate; provided, however, that a partial redemption must be in an amount not less than $1,000,000 principal amount of Notes.
        6.
    Sinking Fund.
    The Company shall have no sinking fund or analogous obligations in respect of the Notes.
        7.
    Discharge and Defeasance.
    The Securities will be subject to satisfaction, discharge and defeasance as set forth in Section 403 of the Indenture.
        8.
    Denominations; Transfers; Exchange.
    The Notes are in fully registered form, in denominations of $1,000 and integral multiples of $1,000. A Holder may register transfers of or exchange securities in accordance with the Indenture. No service charge shall be made for any such registration of transfer or exchange, but the Company may require payment of a sum sufficient to cover any tax or other governmental charge payable in connection therewith. Prior to due presentment of this Note for registration of transfer, the Company, the Trustee and any agent of the Company or the Trustee may treat the Holder in whose name this Note is registered as the owner hereof for all purposes, whether or not this Note be overdue, and neither the Company, the Trustee nor any such agent shall be affected by notice to the contrary.
        9.
    Events of Default; Remedies.
    The Events of Default are as set forth in Section 501 of the Indenture. If an Event of Default with respect to Notes of this series shall occur and be continuing, the principal of the Notes of this series may be declared due and payable in the manner and with the effect provided in the Indenture. Upon a declaration of acceleration of the Notes, the principal of the Notes may be declared due and payable in the manner, and with the effect, provided in the Indenture.
        10.
    Payments of Additional Amounts.
    The Company will, subject to the exceptions and limitations set forth below, pay as additional interest on the notes such additional amounts as are necessary in order that the net payment by the Company or the Paying Agent of the principal of and interest on the notes to a Holder who is not a United States person (as defined below), after deduction or withholding for or on account of any present or future tax, assessment or other governmental charge imposed upon the Holder by the United States or a political subdivision or taxing authority of or in the United States, imposed by withholding with respect to the payment, will not be less than the amount provided in the Notes to be then due and payable (the "Additional Amounts"); provided, however, that the foregoing obligation to pay Additional Amounts shall not apply:
        (1)  to any tax, assessment or other governmental charge that is imposed or withheld solely by reason of the Holder, or a fiduciary, settlor, beneficiary, member or shareholder of the Holder if the Holder is an estate, trust, partnership or corporation, or a person holding a power over an estate or trust administered by a fiduciary Holder, being considered as:
        (a)  being or having been present or engaged in a trade or business in the United States or having had a permanent establishment in the United States;
        (b)  having a current or former relationship with the United States, including a relationship as a citizen or resident of the United States;
        (c)  being or having been a foreign or domestic personal holding company, a passive foreign investment company or a controlled foreign corporation with respect to the United States or a corporation that has accumulated earnings to avoid United States federal income tax or a foreign private foundation or other foreign tax-exempt organization;
        (d)  being or having been a "10-percent shareholder" of the Company as defined in section 871(h)(3) of the United States Internal Revenue Code and the Regulations that may be promulgated thereunder; or
        (e)  being a bank receiving payments on an extension of credit made pursuant to a loan agreement entered into in the ordinary course of its trade or business;
        (2)  to any Holder that is not the sole beneficial owner of the Notes, or a portion of the Notes, or that is a fiduciary, partnership or entity treated as a partnership or disregarded as an entity separate from its owner for United States federal income tax purposes, but only to the extent that a beneficiary or settlor with respect to the fiduciary, a beneficial owner or member of the partnership or entity treated as a partnership or disregarded as an entity separate from its owner for United States federal income tax purposes would not have been entitled to the payment of an Additional Amount had the beneficiary, settlor, beneficial owner or member received directly its beneficial or distributive share of the payment;
        (3)  to any tax, assessment or other governmental charge that is imposed otherwise or withheld solely by reason of a failure of the Holder or any other person to comply with certification, identification or information reporting requirements concerning the nationality, residence, identity or connection with the United States of the Holder or beneficial owner of the Notes, if compliance is required by statute or by regulation of the United States Treasury Department or by an applicable income tax treaty to which the United States is a party (and with respect to which the Holder is entitled to benefits) as a precondition to exemption from such tax, assessment or other governmental charge;
        (4)  to any tax, assessment or other governmental charge which is imposed or payable otherwise than by withholding by the Company or the Paying Agent from the payment;
        (5)  to any estate, inheritance, gift, sales, excise, transfer, wealth or personal property tax or similar tax, assessment or other governmental charge;
        (6)  to any tax, assessment or other governmental charge required to be withheld by any paying agent from any payment of principal of or interest on any Notes, if such payment can be made without such withholding by any other paying agent;
        (7)  to any tax, assessment or other governmental charge required to be made pursuant to any European Union Directive on the taxation of savings income or any law implementing or complying with, or introduced in order to conform to, such Directive;
        (8)  to any tax, assessment or other governmental charge required to be withheld by any paying agent from any payment in respect of any Note, if such payment can be made without withholding by another paying agent in a member state of the European Union;
        (9)  to any tax, assessment or other governmental charge that is imposed or withheld solely by reason of a change in law, regulation or administrative or judicial interpretation that becomes effective more than 15 days after the payment becomes due or is duly provided for, whichever occurs later; or
        (10) in the case of any combination of the above items.
        The Notes are subject in all cases to any tax, fiscal or other law or regulation or administrative or judicial interpretation applicable to the Notes. Except as specifically provided, the Company shall not be required to make any payment with respect to any tax, assessment or other governmental charge imposed by any government or a political subdivision or taxing authority of or in any government or political subdivision.
        As used in this Section, the term "United States" means the United States of America (including the states and the District of Columbia) and its territories, possessions and other areas subject to its jurisdiction, and "United States person" means any individual who is a citizen or resident of the United States, a corporation, partnership or other entity created or organized in or under the laws of the United States or any political subdivision of the United States or any estate, the income of which is subject to United States federal income taxation regardless of its source, or a trust if (1) it is subject to the primary supervision of a court within the United States and one or more United States persons have the authority to control all substantial decisions of the trust or (2) it has a valid election in effect under applicable Treasury regulations to be treated as a United States person.
        If, as a result of any change in, or amendment to, the laws (or any regulations or rulings promulgated under the laws) of the United States (or any political subdivision or taxing authority of or in the United States), or any change in, or amendments to, an official position regarding the application or interpretation of such laws, regulations or rulings, which change or amendment is announced or becomes effective on or after February 6, 2003, the Company becomes, or based upon a written opinion of independent counsel selected by the Company, will become obligated to pay Additional Amounts with respect to the Notes, then the Company may at its option redeem, in whole, but not in part, the Notes on not less than 30 nor more than 60 days prior notice, at the redemption price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the Notes, together with interest accrued but unpaid on the Notes to the date fixed for redemption.
        11.
    Amendments and Waivers.
    The Indenture permits, with certain exceptions as therein provided, that with the written consent of the Holders of not less than 66/% in principal amount of the Outstanding Securities of each series to be adversely affected thereby, the Company, when authorized by a Board Resolution, and the Trustee may enter into an indenture or indentures thereto to add any provisions or to change or eliminate any provisions of the Indenture or any other indenture supplemental thereto or to modify the rights of the Holders of each such series. The Indenture also provides, with certain exceptions therein provided, that the Holders of not less than a majority in principal amount of the Outstanding Securities of any series may waive on behalf of the Holders of all Securities of such series a past default, or Event of Default arising therefrom, with respect to that series and its consequences. Any such consent or waiver by the Holder of this Note shall be conclusive and binding upon such Holder and upon all future Holders of this Note and of any Note issued upon the registration of transfer hereof or in exchange herefor or in lieu hereof, whether or not notation of such consent or waiver is made upon this Note.
2
3
        12.
    Obligations Absolute.
    No reference herein to the Indenture and no provision of this Note or of the Indenture shall alter or impair the obligation of the Company, which is absolute and unconditional, to pay the principal of (and premium, if any) and interest (if any) on this Note at the times, place and rate, and in the coin or currency, herein prescribed.
        13.
    No Recourse Against Others.
    No recourse shall be had for the payment of the principal of, or premium, if any, or interest on this Note, or for any claim based hereon or otherwise in respect hereof, or based on or in respect of the Indenture, any indenture supplemental thereto, against any incorporator, stockholder, officer or director, as such, past, present or future, of the Company or of any successor corporation of either, whether by virtue of any constitution, statute or rule of law, or by the enforcement of any assessment or penalty or otherwise, all such liability being, by the acceptance hereof and as part of the consideration for the issue hereof, expressly waived and released.
        14.
    Defined Terms.
    All initially capitalized terms used in this Note which are defined in the Indenture shall have the meanings assigned to them in the Indenture.
        15.
    
Governing Law.
    
THE INDENTURE AND THE NOTES SHALL BE GOVERNED BY AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK.
        16.
    Successors and Assigns.
    All covenants and agreements of the Company in the Indenture and the Notes shall bind its successors and assigns. All agreements of the Trustee in the Indenture shall bind its successor.
        17.
    Authentication.
    Unless the certificate of authentication hereon has been executed by the Trustee or an Authenticating Agent, by manual signature, this Note shall not be entitled to any benefit under the Indenture or be valid or obligatory for any purpose.
        18.
    Abbreviations.
    Customary abbreviations may be used in the name of a Holder or an assignee, such as TEN COM (= tenants in common), TEN ENT (= tenants by the entireties), JT TEN (= joint tenants with rights of survivorship and not as tenants in common), CUST (= custodian), and U/G/M/A (= Uniform Gift to Minors Act).
        19.
    CUSIP Numbers.
    Pursuant to a recommendation promulgated by the Committee on Uniform Security Identification Procedures, the Company has caused CUSIP numbers to be printed on the Notes, and the Trustee may use CUSIP numbers in notices as a convenience to Holders. No representation is made as to the accuracy of such numbers either as printed on the Notes or as contained in any notice and reliance may be placed only on the other identification numbers placed thereon.
        IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Company has caused this Note to be duly executed and its corporate seal to be hereunto affixed and attested.
        This is one of the 6/% Notes due 2033 referred to in the within-mentioned Indenture.
1
8
Dated: February 11, 2003
        FOR VALUE RECEIVED, the undersigned hereby sell(s), assign(s) and transfer(s) unto ________________________________.
(Please insert Social Security, Taxpayer Identification No. or other identifying number of Assignee)
(Please print or typewrite name and address including postal zip code of Assignee)
the within Note of THE BOEING COMPANY (the "
Company
") and does hereby irrevocably constitute and appoint attorney to transfer the said Note on the books of the Company, with full power of substitution in the premises.
            
[NOTICE: The signature of this assignment must correspond with the name as written upon the face of the within investment in every particular, without alteration or enlargement or any change whatever.]

203 North LaSalle Street, Suite 1800 Chicago, Illinois 60601-1293
main
312.368.4000
fax
312.236.7516
The Boeing Company 100 North Riverside Plaza Chicago, IL 60606
Ladies and Gentlemen:
        We have served as counsel for The Boeing Company, a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), in connection with the Company's registration statement on Form S-3 (SEC File No. 333-99509) (the "Registration Statement") previously declared effective by the Securities and Exchange Commission relating to debt securities in a maximum aggregate offering price of $1,000,000,000 (the "Securities"), all of which Securities may be offered and sold by the Company from time to time as set forth in the prospectus filed as part of the Registration Statement (the "Prospectus"), and as to be set forth in one or more supplements to the Prospectus. This opinion letter is rendered in connection with the offering by the Company of $600,000,000 principal amount of its 5/% Notes due February 15, 2013 and $400,000,000 principal amount of its 6/% Notes due February 15, 2033 (collectively the "Notes") as described in a Prospectus Supplement dated February 6, 2003. This opinion letter is furnished to you at your request to enable the Company to continue to fulfill the requirements of Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K, 17 C.F.R. 229.601(b)(5), in connection with the Registration Statement.
1
8
1
8
        We have examined and relied and base our opinion on originals or copies, certified or otherwise identified to our satisfaction, of the following documents and records and upon such matters of law as we have deemed necessary for the purposes of this opinion.
1.
An executed copy of the Registration Statement and a copy of the Prospectus dated September 20, 2002 and Prospectus Supplement dated February 6, 2003 (the "Prospectus Supplement").
2.
The Restated Certificate of Incorporation of the Company (the "Certificate"), as certified by the Assistant Secretary of the Company on the date hereof as then being complete, accurate and in effect.
3.
The Bylaws of the Company, as amended to date, as certified by the Secretary of the Company on the date hereof as then being complete, accurate and in effect.
4.
Resolutions of the Board of Directors of the Company adopted during meetings on August 25-27, 2002 relating to the filing of the Registration Statement and related matters, and of the Pricing Committee established thereunder adopted on February 6, 2003 relating to the offering of the Notes, each as certified by the Secretary of the Company on the date hereof as then being complete, accurate and in effect.
5.
The Underwriting Provisions dated February 6, 2003, the terms of which are incorporated by reference into the related Terms Agreement dated February 6, 2003 by and among the Company and Credit Suisse First Boston LLC, Deutsche Bank Securities Inc. and J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. (collectively, the "Purchase Agreement").
        The opinions set forth herein are qualified as stated therein and are qualified further by the following:
        (a)  This opinion is based upon existing laws, ordinances and regulations in effect as of the date hereof and as they presently apply.
        (b)  We express no opinion as to the effect of the laws of any state or jurisdiction other than the States of Illinois and New York, the Delaware General Corporation Law and the laws of the United States of America upon the transactions described herein.
        (c)  In rendering the opinions set forth below, we have relied, to the extent we believe appropriate, as to matters of fact, (i) upon certificates or statements of public officials and of the officers of the Company, and (ii) upon representations and warranties contained in the Purchase Agreement and the Registration Statement, and we have made no independent investigation or verification of said facts. No opinion is being expressed as to the effect of any event, fact or circumstance of which we have no actual knowledge.
        (d)  We have assumed the competency of the signatories to the Purchase Agreement, the global certificates representing the Notes and certain officers certificates, the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to us as originals, the conformity to original documents of all documents submitted to us as certified or photostatic copies, and the accuracy and completeness of all records made available to us.
        (e)  We have assumed that (i) the Purchase Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the parties thereto (other than the Company), is within their corporate, trust, limited liability company or partnership power, and are their legal, valid and binding obligation(s) and that it is in compliance with all applicable laws, rules and regulations governing the conduct of their respective businesses and this transaction, (ii) the Purchase Agreement will be enforced in circumstances and in a manner which is commercially reasonable, (iii) the parties to the Purchase Agreement (other than the Company), are not subject to any statute, rule or regulation or any impediment that requires them or the Company to obtain the consent, or to make any declaration or filing with any governmental authority in connection with the transactions contemplated by the Purchase Agreement, and (iv) all terms, provisions and conditions relating to the transaction referred to in this opinion letter are correctly and completely reflected in the Purchase Agreement.
        (f)    The opinions hereafter expressed are qualified to the extent that: (i) the characterization of, and the enforceability of any rights or remedies in, any agreement or instrument may be limited by applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium, fraudulent conveyance or transfer, equitable subordination, or similar laws and doctrines affecting the rights of creditors generally and general equitable principles; (ii) the availability of specific performance, injunctive relief or any other equitable remedy is subject to the discretion of a court of competent jurisdiction; and (iii) the provisions of any document, agreement or instrument that (a) may require indemnification or contribution for liabilities under the provisions of any Federal or state securities laws or in respect to the neglect or wrongful conduct of the indemnified party or its representatives or agents, (b) purport to confer, waive or consent to the jurisdiction of any court, or (c) waive any right granted by common or statutory law, may be unenforceable as against public policy; and (iv) any provisions of the Purchase Agreement granting so-called "self-help" or extrajudicial remedies may not be enforceable.
        (g)  Requirements in the Purchase Agreement specifying that provisions thereof may only be waived in writing may not be valid, binding or enforceable to the extent that an oral agreement or an implied agreement by trade practice or course of conduct has been created modifying any provision of such documents.
        (h)  Whenever our opinion, with respect to the existence or absence of facts, is qualified by the phrase "to our knowledge" or a phrase of similar import, it indicates that during the course of our representation of the Company in connection with the subject transaction no information has come to the attention of our attorneys who have worked on the subject transaction which would give us current actual knowledge of the existence or absence of such facts. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, it is expressly understood
that no opinion is expressed with regard to: (a) the financial ability of the Company to meet its obligations under either the Senior Indenture dated February 1, 2003 between the Company and JPMorgan Chase Bank (the "Indenture") relating to the Notes or the Purchase Agreement; (b) although we are not aware of any untruthfulness or inaccuracy, the truthfulness or accuracy of any applications, reports, plans, documents, financial statements or other matters furnished to the purchasers by (or on behalf of) the Company in connection with the Indenture, the Purchase Agreement or the Registration Statement; or (c) although we are not aware of any untruthfulness or inaccuracy, the truthfulness or accuracy of any representations or warranties made by the Company in the Indenture, the Purchase Agreement or the Registration Statement or other documents described herein, which are not the subject of any of the opinions stated herein. However, except to the extent expressly set forth herein, we have not undertaken any independent investigation to determine the existence or absence of such facts, and no inference as to our knowledge of the existence or absence of such facts should be drawn from the fact of our representation of the Company or any other matter.
        (i)    We have examined the latest compilations that are available to us of the applicable statutes of such jurisdictions that relate to the issuance of the Notes and, in certain instances, the written regulations and rulings issued thereunder. We have not obtained special written rulings of the SEC, state securities commissions or other administrative bodies or officials charged with the administration of such statutes, regulations and rulings and we have not obtained and do not rely on opinions of other counsel.
        Based upon the foregoing, and in reliance thereon, but subject to the assumptions, limitations and qualifications expressed herein, we are of the opinion that, as of the date hereof, following issuance of the Notes pursuant to the terms of the Purchase Agreement and receipt by the Company of the consideration for the Notes specified in the resolutions of the Company's Board of Directors and the Pricing Committee referred to above, the Notes will be validly issued and legally binding obligations of the Company enforceable against the Company in accordance with their terms, subject to applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium, fraudulent transfer, or similar laws affecting creditors' rights generally from time to time in effect and general principles of equity (regardless of whether such enforceability is considered in a proceeding at law or in equity) and except that a waiver of rights under any usury law may be unenforceable.
        We assume no obligation to advise you of any changes in the foregoing subsequent to the delivery of this opinion letter. This opinion letter has been prepared solely for your use in connection with the filing by the Company of a Current Report on Form 8-K on the date of this opinion letter, which Form 8-K will be incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement. This opinion letter should not be quoted in whole or in part or otherwise be referred to, nor filed with or furnished to any governmental agency or other person or entity, without the prior written consent of this firm.
        We hereby consent (i) to be named in the Registration Statement, and in the Prospectus, as attorneys who will pass upon the legality of the Securities to be sold thereunder and (ii) to the filing of this opinion as an Exhibit to the Registration Statement. In giving this consent, we do not thereby admit that we are an "expert" within the meaning of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20030410172646.txt.gz
TIME:20030410172646
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 9. Regulation FD Disclosure (Item 12, Disclosure of Results of Operations and Financial Condition).
 
The following information is being furnished under Item 12 of Form 8-K: New Release by The Boeing Corporation, announcing the completion of a goodwill impairment analysis and assessment of customer financing portfolio that will result in non-cash charges of $1.2 billion in the first quarter of 2003. The text of the release is attached as exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
 
Boeing Completes Goodwill Impairment Analysis and Assessment of Customer Financing Portfolio; Will Record Non-Cash Charges Totaling $1.2 Billion
 
 Reflects the severe downturn in commercial aviation and space markets
 
Chicago, April 10, 2003  The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] announced today that it will recognize non-cash charges that will reduce first quarter 2003 pre-tax earnings from operations approximately $1.2 billion and net earnings per share approximately $1.23. Boeing will report its results for the quarter ending March 31
st
on April 23, 2003.
 
As noted on the chart below, $931 million, or three-quarters of the charges, will be recognized in connection with the company's impairment of goodwill under Statement of Financial Accounting Standards (SFAS) 142. These non-cash charges do not affect company business operations and will be attributable to goodwill recorded in connection with companies acquired since 1996. They will be recorded within the Commercial Airplanes segment and Launch and Orbital Systems segment.
 
The company will also record non-cash charges totaling approximately $251 million to strengthen customer-financing reserves and revalue certain customer financing assets. The charges will be recorded within the Boeing Capital Corporation (BCC) and Other segments.
 
 
Additional detail regarding these charges is provided below.
 
Goodwill Impairment
 
SFAS 142 requires goodwill to be tested for impairment annually and when an event occurs indicating that it is possible an impairment exists. The company has selected April 1 as its annual testing date. However, the reorganization of Boeing's space and defense businesses triggered a goodwill impairment analysis as of January 1, 2003.
 
The company will record $931 million of pre-tax charges in the quarter ending March 31, 2003. Approximately $671 million of these charges are not tax-deductible primarily because the related acquisitions were stock purchases. The company estimates the after-tax earnings impact will be approximately $835 million, or $1.03 per share. After this impairment, Boeing's goodwill balances will total approximately $1.8 billion.
 
Key factors driving the amount of the impairment charge included: a) the continuing severity of market conditions in Boeing's commercial aviation and commercial space businesses, and b) decreases in the company's stock price since the company's previous goodwill evaluation in 2002.
 
The company does not expect to record any additional impairment to goodwill in connection with its annual assessment. More information about the company's process for evaluating goodwill impairment can be found in the Management Discussion and Analysis section of Boeing's 2002 Annual Report on Form 10-K.
 
Customer Financing
 
Boeing and its financing subsidiary, BCC, have completed their first quarter 2003 assessment of BCC's financing portfolio. As summarized on the chart below, Boeing will recognize non-cash, pre-tax charges of approximately $251 million split between BCC and Boeing's "Other" segment. The company estimates the after-tax impact will total approximately $159 million, or $0.20 per share.
 
 
The company is recognizing these charges primarily as a result of continued declines in airline customer credit ratings, airplane collateral values and lease rates. Certain of the charges are recorded in Boeing's "Other" segment as a result of corporate guarantees that reduce BCC's exposure.
 
 
Certain statements in this release may constitute "forward-looking" statements within the meaning of the Private Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions as to future events that may not prove to be accurate. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak only as of the date they were made and we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise. Our actual results and future trends may differ materially depending on a variety of factors, including the continued operation, viability and growth of major airline customers and non-airline customers (such as the U.S. Government); adverse developments in the value of collateral securing customer and other financings; the occurrence of any significant collective bargaining labor dispute; the Company's successful execution of internal performance plans, price escalation, production rate increases and decreases (including any reduction in or termination of an aircraft product), acquisition and divestiture plans, and other cost-reduction and productivity efforts; charges from any future SFAS 142 review; an adverse development in rating agency credit ratings or assessments; the actual outcomes of certain pending sales campaigns and U.S. and foreign government procurement activities, including the timing of procurement of tankers by the U.S. Department of Defense; the cyclical nature of some of the Company's businesses; unanticipated financial market changes which may impact pension plan assumptions; domestic and international competition in the defense, space and commercial areas; continued integration of acquired businesses; performance issues with key suppliers, subcontractors and customers; factors that could result in significant and prolonged disruption to air travel worldwide (including future terrorist attacks); any additional impacts from the attacks of September 11, 2001; global trade policies; worldwide political stability; domestic and international economic conditions; price escalation; the outcome of political and legal processes, including uncertainty regarding government funding of certain programs; changing priorities or reductions in the U.S. Government or foreign government defense and space budgets; termination of government or commercial contracts due to unilateral government or customer action or failure to perform; legal, financial and governmental risks related to international transactions; legal proceedings; and other economic, political and technological risks and uncertainties. Additional information regarding these factors is contained in the Company's SEC filings, including, without limitation, the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2002 and the Forms 10-Q for the quarters ended March 31, 2002, June 30, 2002 and September 30, 2002.
 
 
 
Contacts:
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20030423092131.txt.gz
TIME:20030423092131
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 9. Regulation FD Disclosure (Item 12, Disclosure of Results of Operations and Financial Condition).
 
The following information is being furnished under Item 12 of Form 8-K: News Release by The Boeing Company, for the first quarter results and updated outlook as announced on April 23, 2003. The text of the release is attached as exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
 
Boeing Reports First Quarter Results; Updates Outlook
 
 
 
 
Selected Operating Highlights  First Quarter 2003:
 
 
 
 
 
CHICAGO, April 23, 2003  The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] reported a net loss of $478 million, or $0.60 per share, for the first quarter of 2003 on revenues of $12.3 billion. The loss included previously announced non-cash, after-tax charges totaling $818 million, or $1.02 per share, related to the company's analysis of goodwill impairment, and $159 million, or $0.20 per share, to strengthen reserves and revalue assets in Boeing's customer finance portfolio. However, the underlying performance of the company's aerospace businesses was strong. Excluding the $1.02 impact of goodwill impairment charges, adjusted earnings per share* totaled $0.42.
 
"During the first quarter we continued to run healthy businesses in dynamic market conditions. Integrated Defense Systems delivered strong results in its growing markets, and aggressive management at Boeing Commercial Airplanes again resulted in solid performance," said Boeing Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Phil Condit. Condit added, "Boeing Capital is managing conservatively, and Boeing's balanced portfolio of aerospace businesses underpins our continued strength and profitability."
 
As shown in Table 2 below, the company reported a first quarter 2003 loss from operations of $373 million compared with earnings from operations of $902 million in the first quarter of 2002. This included pre-tax non-cash charges of $1.2 billion consisting of $913 million for goodwill impairment and $251 million related to Boeing's finance portfolio. Excluding these charges, the decrease was primarily the result of lower planned commercial airplane deliveries and lower pension income, as expected. Performance and growth at Integrated Defense Systems and production efficiencies at Commercial Airplanes partially offset this reduction.
 
 
 
 
Deferred stock compensation pre-tax expense decreased $49 million during the quarter due to the decline in the company's stock price from December 31 through March 31. This resulted in a $0.04 benefit to earnings per share. Pre-tax expense for share-based plans totaled $114 million and reduced earnings per share by $0.09. Netted together, consolidated stock compensation expenses lowered first quarter earnings per share by a total of $0.05.
 
As shown in Table 3 below, the company reported negative operating cash flow and negative free cash flow* for the quarter. This reflects receipts timing and inventory growth at Integrated Defense Systems, lower period orders at Boeing Commercial Airplanes, and higher tax payments. As noted in the Outlook section, free cash flow* guidance for 2003 remains unchanged. The company did not contribute cash to its pension plans in either period.
 
 
 
 
Cash and short-term investment balances at the end of the first quarter totaled $2.0 billion, down slightly from the end of 2002. Consolidated debt increased to $15.0 billion, reflecting the successful $1.0 billion long-term bond issue of The Boeing Company completed in February.
 
 
Segment Results
 
Boeing Commercial Airplanes
 
Commercial Airplanes continues to aggressively manage for profitability through the unprecedented downturn in its markets. During the quarter they remained focused on resizing operations, improving efficiency, and pursuing a disciplined product development strategy, including a new 7E7 airplane. Commercial Airplanes results are summarized in Table 5 below.
 
 
During the first quarter, deliveries of commercial airplanes decreased 35 percent to 71 airplanes, and revenues fell 31 percent to $5.7 billion when compared with the first quarter of 2002. Reported period losses of $112 million included non-cash charges for goodwill impairment totaling $341 million, as previously announced. Commercial Airplanes adjusted earnings from operations* totaled $229 million as continued strong operating performance partially offset the impact of significantly lower deliveries and revenues. Adjusted operating margins* were 4.0 percent in the period compared to 7.7 percent for the first quarter last year.
 
Commercial Airplanes received 32 gross orders during the quarter. Contractual backlog totaled $65.8 billion compared with $68.2 billion at the end of 2002.
 
Integrated Defense Systems
 
Integrated Defense Systems delivered strong revenue growth and excellent operating performance in the quarter. Revenues increased 18 percent to $6.3 billion, up from $5.3 billion in the first quarter of 2002. Reported operating earnings of $31 million include the charge for goodwill impairment of $572 million. Excluding this charge, adjusted earnings from operations* rose 49 percent to $603 million compared with the first quarter of 2002. Higher deliveries at Aircraft and Weapon Systems, revenue and margin growth at Network Systems and Support Systems, and improved performance at Launch and Orbital Systems all contributed to an outstanding quarter.
 
Integrated Defense Systems results are summarized below and reflect the new segment reporting structure effective January 1, 2003, as previously disclosed. A description of each of the segments and pro-forma financial results encompassing the prior four quarters are attached as supplemental information to this release.
 
 
Aircraft and Weapon Systems again delivered strong financial results. Revenues for the quarter rose 22 percent to almost $2.7 billion on higher C-17,  F/A-18, and JDAM deliveries. Performance remained excellent with operating margins at 14.2 percent, up from 13.3 percent in 2002, and included continuing investment in the 767 tanker program.
 
Network Systems results for the first quarter reflect continuing strong growth in homeland security, intelligence, and DOD network-centric programs as revenues rose 23 percent to $2.0 billion. Operating margins totaled 6.9 percent, similar to the first quarter of 2002.
 
Support Systems delivered strong growth with revenues up 26 percent to nearly $1.0 billion on significant increases in tactical and transport aircraft spares and modernization. The revenue growth and excellent operating performance drove operating margins up sharply to 11.3 percent from 6.7 percent in the first quarter of 2002. Unfavorable performance on a modernization and upgrade contract affected 2002 results.
 
Excluding the charge for goodwill impairment, Launch and Orbital Systems adjusted operating losses* narrowed significantly to $21 million in the first quarter when compared with the first quarter of 2002. Revenues fell 12 percent on fewer satellite deliveries partially offset by one Delta IV delivery. Launch and Orbital Systems had four successful launches during the quarter. Boeing continues to resize the business to its markets and announced plans to consolidate launch vehicle manufacturing and assembly in Alabama.
 
Contractual backlog at the end of the quarter increased slightly to $36.5 billion compared with $36.0 billion at the end of 2002.
 
Boeing Capital Corporation
 
Boeing Capital Corporation (BCC) results are summarized in Table 7 below.
 
 
Revenues increased 24 percent to $283 million as a result of portfolio growth during 2002. Including the previously announced charges totaling $193 million for strengthening reserves and revaluing certain assets, BCC recorded a pre-tax loss, including interest expense, of $113 million compared with pre-tax income of $66 million in the first quarter of 2002. Additional charges related to the customer financing portfolio totaling $58 million were recorded in Boeing's "Other" segment during the quarter as a result of corporate guarantees to Boeing Capital.
 
BCC increased its allowance for losses on finance leases and notes receivable to 5.3 percent of receivables, up from 3.5 percent at the end of 2002. In addition, the customer financing portfolio declined slightly during the quarter to $11.7 billion, compared to $11.8 billion at the end of 2002 and $10.3 billion at the end of the first quarter of 2002. This decrease reflects lower new business volume and transaction timing. New business volume totaling just under $0.4 billion was offset by slightly higher asset run-off and depreciation.
 
At quarter-end, approximately 76 percent of Boeing Capital Corporation's portfolio was related to Boeing products and services (primarily commercial aircraft) compared with 76 percent at the end of 2002, and 70 percent at the end of 2001. Leverage, as measured by the ratio of debt-to-equity, was a conservative 5.6-to-1.
 
"Other" Segment
 
The "Other" segment consists chiefly of the Connexion by Boeing
SM
, Air Traffic Management, and Boeing technology units, as well as certain results related to the consolidation of all business units. Losses from operations for the quarter totaled $121 million driven in part by the charges noted above related to customer financing activities; these totaled $58 million.
 
During the first quarter, Connexion by Boeing achieved a key milestone as it conducted initial commercial service demonstrations on transatlantic Lufthansa and British Airways flights. Boeing's Air Traffic Management unit continued to build support for a modernized global air traffic management system.
 
Outlook
 
The outlook below in Table 8 reflects the company's current assessment of the markets for its products and services during the guidance period.
 
 
The company continues to monitor conditions in its key markets. In the commercial aviation market, the war in Iraq, increased security costs, the emergence of severe acute respiratory syndrome (SARS) and airline industry restructuring together create a dynamic environment; it is too early to reach conclusions regarding the ultimate impact. However, the downturn remains severe, with trends varying between carriers and regions, and has reduced demand across all airplane models. In the company's commercial space markets, demand for launch services and satellites also remains soft. The company is aggressively managing its commercial businesses to address market realities.
 
At the same time, the company's defense and non-commercial space markets are expected to remain quite strong. Boeing is well positioned to support customer requirements, including the transformation of the military. Integrated Defense Systems' missile defense, homeland security, intelligence, and DOD network-centric businesses are expected to grow. Aircraft, weapons, and aerospace support programs are expected to deliver results similar to the strong levels achieved in 2002. Thus, strength in defense and non-commercial space markets will continue to somewhat offset the downturn in the company's commercial aviation and space markets.
 
At Boeing Capital Corporation, revenues are expected to increase due to prior-year portfolio growth and current-year financing requirements. BCC will focus on minimizing risk and preserving value through careful transaction structuring and portfolio management.
 
Boeing Commercial Airplanes' forecast deliveries for 2003 and 2004 are unchanged. The delivery forecast for 2003 is approximately 280 airplanes and is virtually sold out. The delivery forecast for 2004 remains between 275 and 300 airplanes, with a gradual market recovery beginning in 2005. The 2004 delivery forecast is approximately 85 percent sold for 2004 at the lower end of the range.
 
Boeing revenue guidance for 2003 and 2004 is unchanged. Revenue guidance remains at +/- $49 billion for 2003, and $52 billion to $54 billion for 2004.
 
As a result of the non-cash charges this quarter, the company is revising its earnings per share guidance. On a GAAP basis, the company's 2003 earnings per share outlook ranges from $0.68$0.88 per share. The GAAP earnings per share outlook reflects non-cash charges totaling $1.22 per share recognized in the first quarter. This includes the charges for goodwill impairment ($1.02 per share) and the customer financing portfolio ($0.20 per share).
 
The company's 2003 adjusted earnings per share* guidance, which adds back the charges for goodwill to better reflect the results of current period operating activities, has been revised from $1.90$2.10 per share to $1.70$1.90 per share. The downward revision reflects the first quarter non-cash charges totaling $0.20 per share related to the customer financing portfolio. Earnings per share guidance for 2004 remains unchanged at $2.10$2.30.
 
Earnings per share guidance for 2004 includes an estimated unfavorable impact of $0.15$0.25 per share from pension expense. This compares to an estimated favorable impact of approximately $0.05 per share from pension income in 2003. These amounts are unchanged from prior guidance. As noted, the actual impact of pensions on 2004 earnings per share could differ and depends on market conditions and plan performance.
 
As noted in Table 8, operating cash flows are expected to be $3.0 to $3.5 billion in 2003 and greater than $3.5 billion in 2004. Free cash flow* guidance remains unchanged for 2003 at $2.0 to $2.5 billion, and for 2004 at greater than $2.5 billion. Following historical patterns, Boeing expects 2003 cash flows to be significantly greater in the second half of 2003 than in the first half. The pension funding outlook included in these totals remains unchanged from the prior quarter. The company expects to make discretionary funding contributions in 2003. Free cash flow* guidance for 2004 includes pre-tax pension contributions totaling approximately $1.0 billion.
 
Boeing expects research and development to remain between 3.0 and 3.5 percent of sales including the investment to develop a new mid-size commercial airplane.
 
The following definitions are provided for non-GAAP (Generally Accepted Accounting Principles) measures (indicated by an asterisk *) used by the company within this disclosure. Boeing does not intend for the information to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the related GAAP measures. Other companies may define the measures differently.
 
Adjusted Financial Results
 
Boeing reports adjusted earnings per share, earnings from operations, and operating margins excluding SFAS 142 goodwill charges. Management believes that these adjusted financial results provide investors with an important perspective on the current underlying operating performance of the business by identifying the impact of non-cash adjustments related to past acquisitions.
 
Adjusted Earnings per Share
 
Boeing defines adjusted earnings per share as GAAP earnings per share (EPS) less SFAS 142 goodwill charges. Table 1 provides a reconciliation between GAAP EPS and adjusted EPS.
 
Adjusted Earnings from Operations (or Adjusted Operating Losses)
 
Boeing defines adjusted earnings from operations as GAAP earnings from operations less SFAS 142 goodwill charges. Tables 2, 5, 6, and 8 provide reconciliations between GAAP earnings from operations and adjusted earnings from operations.
 
Adjusted Operating Margin
 
Boeing defines adjusted operating margin as the adjusted earnings from operations (defined above) divided by revenues. Tables 2, 5, and 6 provide reconciliations between GAAP operating margins and adjusted operating margins.
 
Free Cash Flow
 
Free cash flow is defined as GAAP operating cash flow less capital expenditures for property, plant, and equipment. Management believes free cash  flow provides investors with an important perspective on the cash available for shareholders, debt repayment, and acquisitions after making the capital investments required to support ongoing business operations and long term value creation.  Table 3 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and free cash flow.
 
Certain statements in this release may constitute "forward-looking" statements within the meaning of the Private Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. Forward looking statements in this release include, but are not limited to, our assessment of the markets for our products, statements discussing the growth of our business segments, and the statements contained in the "Outlook" section of this release. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions as to future events that may not prove to be accurate. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak only as of the date they were made and we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise. Our actual results and future trends may differ materially depending on a variety of factors, including the continued impact of the commercial aviation downturn on overall production, as well as the impact on production or production rates for specific commercial airplane models, the continued operation, viability and growth of major airline customers and non-airline customers (such as the U.S. Government); adverse developments in the value of collateral securing customer and other financings; the occurrence of any significant collective bargaining labor dispute; tax settlement with the U.S. Government; the Company's successful execution of internal performance plans, production rate increases and decreases (including any reduction in or termination of an aircraft product), acquisition and divestiture plans, and other cost-reduction and productivity efforts; charges from any future SFAS 142 review; an adverse development in rating agency credit ratings or assessments; the actual outcomes of certain pending sales campaigns and U.S. and foreign government procurement activities, including the timing of procurement of tankers by the U.S. Department of Defense; the cyclical nature of some of the Company's businesses; unanticipated financial market changes which may impact pension plan assumptions; domestic and international competition in the defense, space and commercial areas; continued integration of acquired businesses; performance issues with key suppliers, subcontractors and customers; factors that could result in significant and prolonged disruption to air travel worldwide (including the status of and impacts flowing from the war in Iraq and future terrorist attacks); any additional impacts from the attacks of September 11, 2001; global trade policies; worldwide political stability; domestic and international economic conditions; price escalation; the outcome of political and legal processes, including uncertainty regarding government funding of certain programs; changing priorities or reductions in the U.S. Government or foreign government defense and space budgets; termination of government or commercial contracts due to unilateral government or customer action or failure to perform; legal, financial and governmental risks related to international transactions; legal proceedings; and other economic, political and technological risks and uncertainties. Additional information regarding these factors is contained in the Company's SEC filings, including, without limitation, the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2002.
 
Contact:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Note: Commercial Airplanes deliveries by model include deliveries under operating lease, which are identified by parentheses.
 
 
 
 
 
In the first quarter of 2003 Boeing is changing how it reports certain operating segments. The purpose of the change is to further enhance transparency and investor understanding of the company's financial results. In order to facilitate the reporting transition, Boeing is providing the attached 2002 supplemental data which recasts prior period results into the company's new segment reporting format. The company's 2002 financial results as reported in its 10-K filing are unchanged.
 
Revisions to the company's segment reporting, which are effective for the period ending March 31, 2003, are described below.
 
I.  Integrated Defense Systems
 
The formation of the Integrated Defense Systems (IDS) business unit was announced in July 2002. The IDS business unit combines the Company's Military Aircraft and Missile Systems and Space and Communications reporting segments. IDS has capabilities in defense, intelligence, communication and space. IDS is a recognized leader in providing end-to-end services for large-scale systems that combine sophisticated communications networks with air, land, sea and space-based platforms for global military, government and commercial customers.
 
Beginning in 2003, The Boeing Company will report IDS in the following four segments: Aircraft and Weapon Systems; Support Systems; Network Systems; and Launch and Orbital Systems. The Aircraft and Weapon Systems and Support Systems segments comprise what was principally the former Military Aircraft and Missile Systems unit. The Network Systems and Launch and Orbital Systems segments comprise what was principally the former Space and Communications unit. A brief description of each of the new reporting segments is as follows:
 
Aircraft and Weapon Systems
 
This segment includes military aircraft, transport aircraft, rotorcraft, tanker aircraft, unmanned vehicles, and missile systems.
 
Network Systems
 
This segment includes programs focused on battlefield management; command, control and communications systems; missile defense systems; homeland security; and intelligence, surveillance and reconnaissance systems.
 
Support Systems
 
This segment includes training systems, spares, technical data, modernization, upgrades, maintenance, modifications, logistic support services and life cycle customer support.
 
Launch and Orbital Systems
 
This segment includes launch vehicles, commercial satellite programs, propulsion and power systems, and human space flight and exploration including the United Space Alliance venture.
 
II.  Commercial Airplanes
 
Beginning in 2003, Commercial Airplanes will report operating earnings on a program accounting basis. The company is making this change to increase the visibility of Commercial Airplanes' contribution to consolidated earnings and to enhance reporting consistency across its businesses. Previously, Commercial Airplanes earnings from operations were reported on a unit cost basis, and a reconciliation to program accounting earnings results were separately included in the "accounting differences and eliminations" line. With this change, Commercial Airplanes program accounting results are immediately visible and a reconciliation will no longer be necessary to determine segment contributions to consolidated earnings.
 
III.  Boeing Capital Corporation
 
Beginning in 2003, the company will report Boeing Capital Corporation segment earnings from operations net of financing related interest costs. Previously, financing related interest expense was separately reported as a reduction to consolidated earnings from operations. The company is making this change to more clearly present the operating results of Boeing Capital Corporation's financing activities.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20030613170316.txt.gz
TIME:20030613170316
EVENTS:	Other events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
[Logo of Boeing appears here] UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, D.C. 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported): June 13, 2003 THE BOEING COMPANY --------------------------------------------------------------- (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) Commission file number 1-442 Delaware 91-0425694 - ---------------------------------------- ------------------------------------- (State or other jurisdiction of (I.R.S. Employer Identification No.) incorporation or organization) 100 N. Riverside, Chicago, IL 60606-1596 - ---------------------------------------- ------------------------------------- (Address of principal executive offices) (Zip Code) (312) 544-2000 - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (Registrant's telephone number, including area code)
Item 5. Other Events and Required FD Disclosure. As previously reported, the U.S. Air Force has notified the Company that it is reviewing the Company's present responsibility as a government contractor in connection with an incident in 1999 in which two employees were found to have in their possession certain information pertaining to Lockheed Martin Corporation, a competitor under the Evolved Expendable Launch Vehicle Program ("EELV"). The employees, one of whom was a former employee of Lockheed, were terminated, and a third employee was reprimanded and then retired a few days later. The Air Force has expressed concerns over possible misuse of Lockheed's information and the Company's investigation and disclosure of the underlying facts. As previously reported, the same incident is under investigation by the U.S. Attorney in Los Angeles. On June 10, 2003, Lockheed filed a suit against the Company and its three former employees in the U.S. District Court for the Middle District of Florida. The suit alleges that the Company and its employees committed violations of federal and Florida law resulting from their solicitation, acquisition, and use of Lockheed information during the competition for launch contract awards under the EELV program and from the Company's alleged concealment of this conduct. The complaint seeks compensatory damages, including treble and punitive damages, consequential damages, costs, return of all proprietary information, and injunctive relief against all defendants. The Company is cooperating with these parallel government investigations and intends to defend the Lockheed suit vigorously. It is not possible at this time to predict the outcome of these matters or whether an adverse outcome would or could have a material adverse financial impact on the Company.
SIGNATURE Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized. THE BOEING COMPANY (Registrant) /s/ James C. Johnson --------------------- James C. Johnson Senior Vice President, Corporate Secretary and Assistant General Counsel Date: June 13, 2003


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20030715081520.txt.gz
TIME:20030715081520
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 9. Regulation FD Disclosure (Item 12, Disclosure of Results of Operations and Financial Condition).
 
The following information is being furnished under Item 12 of Form 8-K: News Release by The Boeing Company, announcing charges of $1.1 billion during the quarter reflecting an updated assessment of the launch and satellite markets. The text of the release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
Boeing Updates Assessment of Launch and Satellite Businesses in Weak Commercial Space Markets; To Record $1.1 Billion Second Quarter Charge
 
 
CHICAGO, July 15, 2003  The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] announced today that as a result of continued weakness in the commercial space launch market, higher mission and launch costs on its Delta IV program, and cost growth in its satellite businesses, the company will recognize pre-tax charges of approximately $1.1 billion, or $0.87 per share, when it announces second quarter results on July 23.
 
Approximately $835 million, or $0.66 per share, of the charges are attributable to the company's Delta IV program and primarily reflect the company's updated  and significantly lower  assessment of global demand for launch services. The lower program base reduces the profitability of currently contracted launches. The charges also reflect higher mission costs, primarily related to government launch requirements. Approximately $265 million, or $0.21 per share, reflects the loss to be reported by Boeing Satellite Systems for the quarter due to higher cost estimates to complete several satellite programs and write-downs of commercial inventory that recognizes current market conditions.
 
Approximately $135 million of the total charges are non-cash depreciation and inventory adjustments, as noted in the detailed discussion below. The cash outlays associated with the remaining $965 million of charges will be incurred over the next seven years as the affected launch vehicles and satellite programs are completed and delivered.
 
The company will hold an analyst conference call today, July 15, at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Daylight Time which will be accessible at the company's website, .
www.boeing.com
 
A further discussion of the charges follows:
 
1) Delta IV Program ($835 million)
 
When the company began the Delta IV program in the 1990s, demand for commercial satellites and related launch services, particularly for telecommunications, was robust. The company anticipated that strong commercial demand would help reduce the cost of launch vehicles for both commercial and government customers, and the company priced its vehicles accordingly.
 
During this period, Boeing also made substantial incremental investments in a second launch site on the U.S. west coast, a heavy-lift version of the Delta IV vehicle, and an all-new U.S. rocket engine. These unique capabilities were developed to address U.S. government requirements and positioned the company to capture additional business.
 
However, over the last several years demand for commercial launches eroded while global launch capacity increased. In light of the continuing severe downturn in the commercial launch market, the company has determined that a meaningful recovery of demand and pricing is unlikely for the foreseeable future. As a result, in the second quarter of 2003 Boeing made a strategic decision to focus the Delta IV program on the government launch services market. In conjunction with that decision, the company updated  and reduced by nearly one-half  its estimate of long-term demand for Delta IV launch vehicles. This reduction eliminated nearer-term commercial launches previously forecast to occur over the next five years.
 
As a result, the company estimates it will incur higher per-unit labor, materials and business infrastructure costs due to lower annual launch rates over the next five years. In addition, the company has experienced higher mission and launch costs, primarily to support government requirements, and has increased its estimates accordingly. Because currently contracted and awarded launches are in a loss position, Boeing will recognize charges totaling approximately $835 million in the second quarter across its 24 currently contracted and awarded Delta IV (including Evolved Expendable Launch Vehicle program) launches. This estimate is based upon existing pricing in the company's contracted and awarded launches.
 
Of the charges totaling $835 million, approximately $90 million are non-cash charges related to the higher per-unit depreciation and amortization costs associated with the lower number of launches in the company's revised market outlook. The remaining costs will be incurred as the contracted and awarded vehicles are built and delivered over the next seven years.
 
2) Boeing Satellite Systems ($265 Million)
 
Boeing Satellite Systems continues to experience cost growth on certain satellites in its current backlog. Over the past two years, the company has continued to make management changes and implemented significant process improvements to reduce technical and cost risk on future satellite production. The company also recognized significant cost increases to complete currently contracted work based upon known requirements and previous experience. However, many satellites in the current backlog incorporate advanced technology and are the first of their kind to be built. These factors are driving cost growth at higher than previously estimated trend levels.
 
As a result, the company is raising its estimates to complete and deliver in-process satellite backlog and will record charges totaling approximately $265 million in the second quarter. Approximately $45 million of this amount reflects a higher provision for obsolete inventory related to weak demand for commercial satellites, and is non-cash. The cash expenditures associated with the remaining charges will be incurred as satellites on the affected programs are completed over the next two years.
 
Charges totaling approximately $195 million will be recorded in the Launch and Orbital Systems segment; the remaining $70 million is related to satellites for fixed-price military programs and will be recorded in the Network Systems segment, as summarized in the table below.
 
Outlook & Summary
 
Boeing does not expect these charges to have a material impact on the company's consolidated cash flow guidance, as the related costs are spread over the next seven years. The company will discuss its financial outlook in more detail when it releases second quarter results.
 
Boeing will continue to manage its launch services and satellite businesses to market realities. As previously announced, the company continues to reduce employment, consolidate facilities and implement best engineering and manufacturing practices to reduce costs and position the business for future returns.
 
A summary of the charges is provided in the table below:
 
 
 
All estimates subject to final audit.
 
 
Certain statements in this release may constitute "forward-looking" statements within the meaning of the Private Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements in this release include, but are not limited to, our assessment of the markets for our products, statements discussing the growth of our business segments, and the statements contained in the "Outlook" section of this release. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions as to future events that may not prove to be accurate. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak only as of the date they were made and we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise. Our actual results and future trends may differ materially depending on a variety of factors, including the continued impact of the commercial aviation downturn on overall production, as well as the impact on production or production rates for specific commercial airplane models, the continued operation, viability and growth of major airline customers and non-airline customers (such as the U.S. Government); adverse developments in the value of collateral securing customer and other financings; the occurrence of any significant collective bargaining labor dispute; tax settlements with the U.S. Government; the Company's successful execution of internal performance plans, production rate increases and decreases (including any reduction in or termination of an aircraft product), acquisition and divestiture plans, and other cost-reduction and productivity efforts; charges from any future SFAS 142 review; an adverse development in rating agency credit ratings or assessments; the actual outcomes of certain pending sales campaigns and U.S. and foreign government procurement activities, including the timing of procurement of tankers by the U.S. Department of Defense; the cyclical nature of some of the Company's businesses; unanticipated financial market changes which may impact pension plan assumptions; domestic and international competition in the defense, space and commercial areas; continued integration of acquired businesses; performance issues with key suppliers, subcontractors and customers; factors that could result in significant and prolonged disruption to air travel worldwide (including the status of and impacts flowing from the war in Iraq and future terrorist attacks); any additional impacts from the attacks of September 11, 2001; global trade policies; worldwide political stability; domestic and international economic conditions; price escalation; the outcome of political and legal processes, including uncertainty regarding government funding of certain programs; changing priorities or reductions in the U.S. Government or foreign government defense and space budgets; termination of government or commercial contracts due to unilateral government or customer action or failure to perform; legal, financial and governmental risks related to international transactions; legal proceedings, including U.S. Government proceedings and investigations and commercial litigation related to the Evolved Expendable Launch Vehicle Program; and other economic, political and technological risks and uncertainties. Additional information regarding these factors is contained in the Company's SEC filings, including, without limitation, the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2002 and Form 10-Q for the period ending March 31, 2003.
 
 
Contact:
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20030723083953.txt.gz
TIME:20030723083953
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 9. Regulation FD Disclosure (Item 12, Disclosure of Results of Operations and Financial Condition).
 
The following information is being furnished under Item 12 of Form 8-K: News Release by The Boeing Company, for the second quarter results and updated outlook as announced on July 23, 2003. The text of the release is attached as exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
Boeing Reports Second Quarter Results; Updates Outlook
 
 
 
 
Selected Operating Highlights  Second Quarter 2003:
 
 
 
CHICAGO, July 23, 2003  The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] reported a net loss for the second quarter of 2003 of $192 million, or $0.24 per share, on revenues of $12.8 billion. This compares with net earnings of $779 million, or $0.96 per share, on revenues of $13.9 billion for the second quarter of 2002.
 
On July 15, 2003, the company disclosed it would recognize charges related to its launch and satellite businesses. These charges decreased net earnings for the quarter by $693 million, or $0.87 per share.
 
"We took strong actions this quarter to recognize and address the challenges in our commercial space businesses," said Boeing Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Phil Condit. "Our strong defense portfolio again performed well, and Commercial Airplanes and Boeing Capital Corporation are successfully managing through the downturn for strong future returns."
 
As shown in Table 2, the company reported losses from operations totaling $293 million in the second quarter compared with earnings from operations of $1.2 billion in the second quarter of 2002. Previously announced charges related to the satellite and launch businesses reduced earnings from operations $1.1 billion. In addition, second quarter results reflect lower planned commercial airplane deliveries and pension income, partially offset by strong performance on military programs and ongoing production improvements at Commercial Airplanes.
 
 
 
Deferred stock compensation pre-tax expense increased $59 million during the quarter due to the increase in the company's stock price from March 31 through June 30. This resulted in a $0.05 unfavorable impact to earnings per share. Pre-tax expense for share-based plans totaled $120 million and reduced earnings per share by $0.09. Taken together, consolidated stock compensation expenses lowered second quarter earnings per share by a total of $0.14.
 
As shown in Table 3, the company generated operating cash flow of $845 million and free cash flow* of $672 million during the quarter. The company made a discretionary cash contribution to its pension plans of $479 million, which reduced second quarter operating cash flow. This compares with a $325 million discretionary contribution in the second quarter of 2002.
 
 
As shown in Table 4, cash and debt balances at the end of the quarter were down slightly from the first quarter of 2003.
 
 
Segment Results
 
Boeing Commercial Airplanes
 
Commercial Airplanes continues to aggressively manage for profitability through the unprecedented downturn in its markets while focusing on the future. During the quarter, Commercial Airplanes continued to resize operations, improve efficiency, and pursue a disciplined product development strategy, including the new 7E7 airplane. As part of resizing operations, after the quarter Commercial Airplanes announced additional employment reductions of 4,000 to 5,000 people, bringing year-end employment estimates in the range of 55,000 to 56,000. Commercial Airplanes results are summarized in Table 5.
 
 
During the second quarter, deliveries of commercial airplanes decreased 34 percent to 74 airplanes, and revenues fell 24 percent to $5.8 billion when compared
with the second quarter of 2002. Earnings from operations totaled $313 million, and reflect significantly lower deliveries and revenues and higher pension expense, offset by good performance and lower R&D spending. Operating margins were 5.4 percent in the period compared to 7.3 percent for the second quarter last year.
 
Commercial Airplanes received 76 gross orders during the quarter. Contractual backlog grew slightly to $66.0 billion through June 30 compared with $65.8 billion at the end of the first quarter.
 
Integrated Defense Systems
 
Integrated Defense Systems' revenues increased 7 percent to $6.6 billion, up from $6.1 billion in the second quarter of 2002. Reported operating losses totaled $429 million compared with earnings from operations of $639 million in the second quarter of 2002 due to the previously disclosed charges recognized primarily in the Launch and Orbital Systems segment. Because of the charges, operating margins for the quarter were negative 6.5 percent compared with 10.4 percent for the same period last year. Aircraft, weapon, military support and network-centric programs continued to perform well. Integrated Defense Systems results are summarized below in Table 6.
 
 
 
 
Aircraft and Weapon Systems again delivered strong profitability. Revenues for the quarter fell 4 percent to almost $2.5 billion on lower rotorcraft deliveries partially
offset by higher JDAM deliveries. Performance remained excellent with operating margins at 14.6 percent, up from 13.9 percent in 2002, and included continuing investment in the 767 Tanker program.
 
Network Systems results for the second quarter reflected continued growth in its homeland security and Department of Defense (DoD) network-centric program base as revenues rose 13 percent to $2.2 billion. Operating margins were 4.5 percent, down from 7.3 percent last year, due to previously disclosed cost growth on DoD satellite programs. Margins on missile defense, intelligence, and network-centric programs improved from the second quarter of 2002.
 
Support Systems delivered strong growth with revenues up 18 percent to just over $1.0 billion on significant increases in tactical and transport aircraft spares and modernization. Operating margins remained excellent at 10.5 percent compared with 10.7 percent in the second quarter of 2002.
 
Launch and Orbital Systems revenues for the quarter were up 14 percent to $770 million on higher satellite deliveries. Charges recognized during the period, as previously announced, resulted in an operating loss of approximately $1 billion.
 
Contractual backlog at the end of the quarter increased to $38.8 billion compared with $36.5 billion at the end of the first quarter. Unobligated backlog rose by over $10 billion; this primarily reflects the U.S. Army decision to proceed to the system design and development phase of its Future Combat System.
 
Boeing Capital Corporation
 
Boeing Capital Corporation (BCC) results are summarized in Table 7 below.
 
 
 
During the quarter, revenues increased 13 percent to $287 million as a result of portfolio growth during 2003. Pre-tax income, including interest expense, totaled $72 million compared with $73 million in the second quarter of 2002. The slight decline primarily reflects higher depreciation expenses when compared with the second quarter of 2002, largely offset by increased revenues.
 
BCC's customer financing portfolio grew modestly to $12.0 billion, up from $11.7 billion at the end of the first quarter and $11.1 billion in the second quarter of
2002. The increase reflected new business volume totaling $0.6 billion offset by $0.3 billion of asset run-off and depreciation. The allowance for losses on finance lease and note receivables at quarter-end was 5.2 percent compared to 5.3 percent at the end of the first quarter.
 
At quarter-end, approximately 78 percent of Boeing Capital Corporation's portfolio was related to Boeing products and services (primarily commercial aircraft) compared with 76 percent at the end of the first quarter. Leverage, as measured by the ratio of debt-to-equity, declined during the quarter from 5.6-to-1 to 5.3-to-1.
 
"Other" Segment
 
The "Other" segment consists chiefly of the Connexion by Boeing
SM
, Air Traffic Management, and Boeing technology units, as well as certain results related to the consolidation of all business units. Losses from operations for the quarter totaled $57 million as Connexion by Boeing prepares to launch full-scale service in 2004.
 
During the second quarter, Connexion by Boeing completed successful consumer trials with Lufthansa and British Airways, and signed an initial service agreement with Lufthansa for 88 aircraft. Boeing's Air Traffic Management unit continued to build support for a modernized global air traffic management system, signing an agreement with the Air Traffic Alliance to cooperate on several projects around the world.
 
Outlook
 
The outlook below in Table 8 reflects the company's current assessment of the markets for its products and services during the guidance period.
 
 
The company actively monitors conditions in its key markets. In the commercial aviation market, while there have been some encouraging signs, the downturn remains severe and continues to dampen demand across all airplane types, particularly the 757. The timing of a civil aviation industry recovery remains uncertain and is unlikely to begin before 2005.
In commercial space, the outlook for launch services and satellites remains poor, as reflected in the company's decision to focus Delta IV on the government launch market. The company is managing these businesses to address market realities and deliver solid future returns.
 
At the same time, the company expects its defense and non-commercial space businesses to perform well in their growing markets. Boeing Integrated Defense Systems expects continued growth and performance in its Network Systems segment, which contains missile defense, homeland security, intelligence, and DoD network-centric businesses. The Aircraft and Weapon and Support segments are expected to deliver results similar to the strong levels achieved in 2002. Thus, strength in defense and non-commercial space markets should continue to partially offset the downturn in the company's commercial aviation and space markets.
 
Boeing Commercial Airplanes' deliveries forecast for 2003 is unchanged. The delivery forecast for 2003 remains approximately 280 airplanes and is virtually sold out. The delivery forecast for 2004 has been narrowed from between 275 and 300 airplanes to between 275 and 290 airplanes. The 2004 delivery forecast is now approximately 90 percent sold at the lower end of the range. Commercial Airplanes expects demand for aircraft services and spares to remain soft due to severe market conditions.
 
Boeing Capital Corporation portfolio growth is expected to slow as airplane delivery rates remain at depressed levels. BCC is focused on minimizing risk and preserving value with prudently structured transactions and portfolio management.
 
The outlook for 2003 revenues is unchanged at +/-$49 billion. The company is revising its 2004 revenue outlook from $52$54 billion to +/-$52 billion. This revision reflects commercial airplane deliveries as well as lower spares and services volume. The revision also reflects the updated commercial space outlook, including the reduced Delta IV manifest.
 
The company is revising its 2003 earnings per share guidance to incorporate the charges recognized in the second quarter totaling $0.87 per share, partially offset by good performance in other business segments. On a GAAP basis, 2003 earnings per share guidance is revised from $0.68$0.88 per share to ($0.07)$0.03 per share. Adjusted earnings per share* guidance has been revised from $1.70$1.90 per share to $0.95$1.05 per share. The company's 2003 adjusted earnings per share* guidance adds back the charges for goodwill impairment ($1.02 per share) recognized in the first quarter to better reflect the results of current period operating activities.
 
Charges recognized during the first half of 2003 totaled $2.09 per share, of which $1.33 per share are non-cash. These include $1.02 per share for goodwill impairment, $0.20 per share to revalue the customer financing portfolio, and $0.11 per share related to depreciation and inventory adjustments in the company's Delta IV and commercial satellite businesses. Cash charges for the period totaled $0.76 per share, and are spread over the next seven years.
The company is revising its 2004 earnings per share outlook from $2.10$2.30 to $1.75$1.95 per share. This primarily reflects the updated 2004 revenue outlook, as well as the updated 2004 outlook for launch and satellite program profitability.
 
The company's cash flow outlook is unchanged. Operating cash flow is expected to be $3.0 to $3.5 billion in 2003 and greater than $3.5 billion in 2004. Free cash flow* guidance remains unchanged for 2003 at $2.0 to $2.5 billion after $479 million of discretionary pension contributions funded during the second quarter. The company may make additional discretionary funding contributions in 2003. For 2004, free cash flow* guidance is unchanged at greater than $2.5 billion and includes pre-tax pension contributions totaling up to $1.0 billion, as previously disclosed.
 
The company's outlook does not contemplate any outcome associated either with the current procurement investigation or lawsuit related to the Evolved Expendable Launch Vehicle.
 
Boeing expects research and development to remain between 3.0 and 3.5 percent of sales during the guidance period.
 
The following definitions are provided for non-GAAP (Generally Accepted Accounting Principles) measures (indicated by an asterisk *) used by the company within this disclosure. Boeing does not intend for the information to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the related GAAP measures. Other companies may define the measures differently.
 
Adjusted Financial Results
 
Boeing reports adjusted earnings per share, earnings from operations, and operating margins excluding SFAS 142 goodwill charges. Management believes that because goodwill is a non-cash charge related to past acquisitions, adjusting the company's financial results to exclude goodwill provides investors with a clearer perspective on the current underlying operating performance of the company. Management uses earnings from operations excluding goodwill charges as an internal measure of business operating performance.
 
Adjusted Earnings per Share
 
Boeing defines adjusted earnings per share as GAAP earnings per share (EPS) less SFAS 142 goodwill charges. Table 1 reconciles GAAP EPS and adjusted EPS.
 
Adjusted Earnings from Operations (or Adjusted Operating Losses)
 
Boeing defines adjusted earnings from operations as GAAP earnings from operations less SFAS 142 goodwill charges. Tables 2, 5, 6, and 8 reconcile GAAP earnings from operations and adjusted earnings from operations.
 
Adjusted Operating Margin
 
Boeing defines adjusted operating margin as the adjusted earnings from operations (defined above) divided by revenues. Tables 2, 5, and 6 reconcile GAAP operating margins and adjusted operating margins.
 
Free Cash Flow
 
Free cash flow is defined as GAAP operating cash flow less capital expenditures for property, plant, and equipment, net. GAAP operating cash flow includes intercompany cash received from the sale of aircraft by Boeing Commercial Airplanes (BCA) for customers who receive financing from Boeing Capital Corporation (BCC). The year-to-date contribution to operating cash flow related to customer deliveries of Boeing airplanes financed by Boeing Capital Corporation totals approximately $0.9 billion, compared to just under $1.4 billion for the first half of 2002.
 
GAAP investing cash flow includes a reduction in cash for the intercompany cash paid by BCC to BCA, as well as an increase in cash for amounts received from
third parties, primarily customers paying amounts due on aircraft financing transactions. The majority of BCC's customer financing is funded by debt and cash flow from BCC operations.
 
Management believes free cash flow provides investors with an important perspective on the cash available for shareholders, debt repayment, and acquisitions after making the capital investments required to support ongoing business operations and long term value creation. Free cash flow does not represent the residual cash flow available for discretionary expenditures as it excludes certain mandatory expenditures such as repayment of maturing debt. Management uses free cash flow internally to assess both business performance and overall Boeing liquidity. Table 3 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and free cash flow.
 
Certain statements in this release may constitute "forward-looking" statements within the meaning of the Private Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements in this release include, but are not limited to, our assessment of the markets for our products, statements discussing the growth of our business segments, and the statements contained in the "Outlook" section of this release. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions as to future events that may not prove to be accurate. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak only as of the date they were made and we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise. Our actual results and future trends may differ materially depending on a variety of factors, including the continued impact of the commercial satellite downturn, the impact of the commercial aviation downturn on overall production, as well as the impact on production or production rates for specific commercial airplane models, the continued operation, viability and growth of major airline customers and non-airline customers (such as the U.S. Government); adverse developments in the value of collateral securing customer and other financings; the occurrence of any significant collective bargaining labor dispute; tax settlements with the U.S. Government; the Company's successful execution of internal performance plans, production rate increases and decreases (including any reduction in or termination of an aircraft product), acquisition and divestiture plans, and other cost-reduction and productivity efforts; charges from any future SFAS 142 review; an adverse development in rating agency credit ratings or assessments; the actual outcomes of certain pending sales campaigns and U.S. and foreign government procurement activities, including procurement of tankers by the U.S. Department of Defense; the cyclical nature of some of the Company's businesses; unanticipated financial market changes which may impact pension plan assumptions; domestic and international competition in the defense, space and commercial areas; continued integration of acquired businesses; performance issues with key suppliers, subcontractors and customers; factors that could result in significant and prolonged disruption to air travel worldwide (including impacts flowing from the war in Iraq and future terrorist attacks); any additional impacts from the attacks of September 11, 2001; global trade policies; worldwide political stability; domestic and international economic conditions; price escalation; the outcome of political and legal processes, including uncertainty regarding government funding of certain programs; changing priorities or reductions in the U.S. Government or foreign government defense and space budgets; termination of government or commercial contracts due to unilateral government or customer action or failure to perform; legal, financial and governmental risks related to international transactions; legal proceedings, including U.S. Government proceedings and investigations and commercial litigation related to the Evolved Expendable Launch Vehicle Program; and other economic, political and technological risks and uncertainties. Additional information regarding these factors is contained in the Company's SEC filings, including, without limitation, the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2002 and Form 10-Q for the period ending March 31, 2003.
 
Contact:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20030728172953.txt.gz
TIME:20030728172953
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 9.    Regulation FD Disclosure.
 
The United States Air Force announced on July 24, 2003 that it will suspend certain Company business units related to the space launch services business and three former employees from receiving government contracts as a direct result of the previously reported U.S. government review of alleged wrongdoing by the Company during the 1998 Evolved Expendable Launch Vehicle (EELV) source selection. In connection with the alleged wrongdoing, the Air Force also has announced its intention to terminate seven launches out of 21 previously awarded to the Company and disqualify the Company from competing for three additional launches under a follow on procurement. The text of the Air Force press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K. As previously reported, the same incident is under investigation by the U.S. Attorney in Los Angeles and is the subject of a civil lawsuit filed by Lockheed Martin Corporation.
 
The Company is currently assessing the impact of this suspension and termination.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
Date: July 28, 2003

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
[LOGO OF U.S. AIRFORCE]
MEDIA RELEASE
United States Air Force
 
SECRETARY OF THE AIR FORCE PUBLIC AFFAIRS, 1690 AIR FORCE Pentagon, Washington DC 20330-1690
Telephone: (703) 695-0640        Fax: (703) 614-7486
 
July 24, 2003
 
Air Force Announces Inquiry Results
 
WASHINGTONThe Air Force announced today that it has determined that The Boeing Company has committed serious violations of federal law based on its review into allegations of wrongdoing by Boeing during the 1998 Evolved Expendable Launch Vehicle (EEL V) source selection. As a result, the Air Force will suspend three Boeing Integrated Defense System business units and three former Boeing employees from eligibility for new government contracts. The suspensions are issued against The Boeing Company's Launch Systems, Boeing Launch Services and Delta Program business units as they existed in the Boeing organizational structure as of July 21, 2003. This suspension will apply to these business units regardless of where they fall in any Boeing reorganization.
 
The individuals suspended are William David Erskine, former ground operations lead on Boeing's EELV program; Kenneth V. Branch, former senior engineer/scientist on Boeing's EELV program; and Larry Dean Satchell, a former member of Boeing's EELV proposal team.
 
In addition, the Air Force will notify Boeing of its intent to reallocate launches under its existing EELV contract, which was awarded in October 1998 and is known as
Buy I. Under this reallocation the Air Force will reduce the total number of Boeing Buy I Delta IV launches from 19 to 12. The Air Force will increase the total number of Lockheed Martin Buy I Atlas V launches from 7 to 14.
 
INQUIRY/2-2-2
 
Further, the Air Force will permit Lockheed Martin to develop a west coast launch capability at Vandenberg AFB by upgrading an existing launch facility.
 
The Air Force also announced the results of its EELV Buy II decision. The Air Force disqualified Boeing from the award of three Buy II launches and plans to award Lockheed Martin three Buy II launches from Vandenberg AFB.
 
"Our inquiry into Boeing found that they were in possession of thousands of pages of Lockheed Martin proprietary EELV documents during the 1998 source selection," said Under Secretary of the Air Force Peter B. Teets. "As a matter of policy we do not tolerate breaches of procurement integrity and we hold industry accountable for the actions of their employees. We believe the suspension is necessary and we hope all contractors will take note and strive to enforce the highest integrity standards in their organizations."
 
The Boeing Delta IV and Lockheed Martin's Atlas V are the two families of EELVs developed with the Air Force to modernize and reduce the cost of the nation's spacelift operation while providing the United States with assured access to space.
 
 
POC is Col Art Haubold or Maj Angela Billings, 703-695-0640.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20031016171706.txt.gz
TIME:20031016171706
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 9. Regulation FD Disclosure.
 
 
Boeing to Complete Production of 757
 
 
CHICAGO, Oct. 16, 2003  The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] announced today that it has decided to complete production of the 757 jetliner in late 2004.
 
"This decision reflects the market reality for the 757 as well as the growth in range and seating capacity of our market-leading Next-Generation 737 family," said Boeing Commercial Airplanes President and Chief Executive Officer Alan Mulally. "Over the long term, the increased capabilities of our newest 737s and the exciting potential of the 7E7 will fulfill the market served by the 757."
 
Consistent with prior disclosed estimates, Boeing will recognize a pre-tax charge in the third quarter of $184 million, or 14 cents per share, principally related to termination and shutdown costs at Boeing Commercial Airplanes. Most of the cash expenditures related to the charge will occur through 2005.
 
Over the past two decades, more than 1,000 757s have been delivered to 55 customers around the world. The worldwide fleet of 757s will continue to benefit from superior fleet support provided by Boeing Commercial Airplanes.
 
"Thousands of people around the world are to be thanked for making the 757 a success story in aviation over the past 20 years. It will continue to provide great value to the world's passenger airlines and cargo operators in service for many years to come," Mulally said.
 
The Boeing Company will release its third quarter results October 29th.
 
 
Certain statements in this release may constitute "forward-looking" statements within the meaning of the Private Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements in this release include, but are not limited to, our assessment of the markets for our products. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions as to future events that may not prove to be accurate. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak only as of the date they were made and we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise. Our actual results and future trends may differ materially depending on a variety of factors, including the continued impact of the commercial aviation downturn on overall production, as well as the impact on production or production rates for specific commercial airplane models, the continued operation, viability and growth of major airline customers and non-airline customers (such as the U.S. Government); adverse developments in the value of collateral securing customer and other financings; the occurrence of any significant collective bargaining labor dispute; the Company's successful execution of internal performance plans, production rate increases and decreases (including any reduction in or termination of an aircraft product), acquisition and divestiture plans, and other cost-reduction and productivity efforts; an adverse development in rating agency credit ratings or assessments; the actual outcomes of certain pending sales campaigns and U.S. and foreign government procurement activities, including the timing of procurement of tankers by the U.S. Department of Defense; the cyclical nature of some of the Company's businesses; domestic and international competition in the commercial area; continued integration of acquired businesses; performance issues with key suppliers, subcontractors and customers; factors that could result in significant and prolonged disruption to air travel worldwide including future terrorist attacks; any additional impacts from the attacks of September 11, 2001; global trade policies; worldwide political stability; domestic and international economic conditions; price escalation; termination of government or commercial contracts due to unilateral government or customer action or failure to perform; legal, financial and governmental risks related to international transactions; and other technical, economic, and political risks and uncertainties. Additional information regarding these factors is contained in the Company's SEC filings, including, without limitation, the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2002 and Form 10-Q for the period ending March 31, 2003, and June 30, 2003.
 
 
Contacts:
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20031029091031.txt.gz
TIME:20031029091031
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 9. Regulation FD Disclosure (Item 12, Disclosure of Results of Operations and Financial Condition).
 
The following information is being furnished under Item 12 of Form 8-K: News Release by The Boeing Company, for the third quarter results and updated outlook as announced on October 29, 2003. The text of the release is attached as exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
Boeing Reports Third Quarter Results; Updates Outlook
 
 
 
Selected Operating Highlights  Third Quarter 2003:
 
 
 
CHICAGO, Oct. 29, 2003  The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] reported net income for the third quarter of 2003 of $256 million, or $0.32 per share, on revenues of $12.2 billion. This compares with net earnings of $372 million, or $0.46 per share, on revenues of $12.7 billion for the third quarter of 2002.
 
On Oct. 16, 2003, the company announced it will complete production of the 757 jetliner during 2004 after delivering more than 1000 units over 20 years. The company recognized a charge related to this decision that reduced third quarter operating earnings $184 million, or $0.14 per share.
 
"This quarter we continued to build a strong long-term future with disciplined program management and decisive action," said Boeing Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Phil Condit. "Development of the technical and business case for a 7E7 program remained on track, and our decision to complete production of the 757 reflects both market conditions and the evolution of our product line. We also positioned our defense business for continued long-term growth and performance by completing partner selection on the Future Combat Systems program and moving forward with the Small Diameter Bomb program."
 
As shown in Table 2, the company's third quarter earnings from operations totaled $433 million. Operating earnings reflected solid results from military and commercial airplane programs, which partially offset the 757 charge, planned lower commercial airplane deliveries, and lower pension income.
 
 
 
Pre-tax expense for share-based plans totaled $115 million and reduced earnings per share by $0.09 in the third quarter. This reflects non-cash expenses attributable to the company's equity compensation plans. Deferred stock compensation expense attributable to vested and undistributed performance shares, which is separately determined based on the quarterly change in the company's stock price, did not impact earnings per share as company's stock price on September 30 was little changed from June 30.
 
During the quarter, the company generated strong cash flows that it used to make a $1.2 billion discretionary cash contribution to its pension plans. Including the contribution, the company's third quarter operating cash flow was negative $168 million, and free cash flow* was negative $343 million, as shown in Table 3. As a result of the contribution, future pension funding requirements will be reduced, depending on plan and market performance.
 
 
 
As shown in Table 4, the company's cash balance remained strong at $1.7 billion. Boeing debt was flat at $4.8 billion while debt at Boeing Capital grew modestly, consistent with customer-financing portfolio growth.
 
 
Segment Results
 
Boeing Commercial Airplanes
 
Commercial Airplanes continued to aggressively manage for profitability through the continuing downturn in its markets, while positioning itself for long-term strength. Third-quarter results reflect solid operating performance on planned lower delivery volumes, offset both by the impact associated with the decision to complete 757 production as well as pension expense. Commercial Airplanes made further progress on resizing operations and improving efficiency while moving forward with its disciplined product development strategy. Commercial Airplanes' results are summarized in Table 5.
 
During the third quarter, deliveries of commercial airplanes decreased 11 percent to 65 airplanes, and revenues fell 17 percent to $5.0 billion, when compared with the third quarter of 2002. Reported earnings from operations totaled $35 million and operating margins were 0.7 percent. Third quarter earnings and margins reflect expenses totaling $184 million attributable to completing production of the 757.
 
Commercial Airplanes received 51 gross orders during the quarter. Contractual backlog totaled $65.1 billion on September 30 compared with $66.0 billion at the end of the second quarter.
 
Integrated Defense Systems
 
Integrated Defense Systems delivered strong revenue growth and solid operating performance for the quarter. Revenues increased 12 percent to $7.3 billion, up from $6.5 billion in the third quarter of 2002. Reported operating earnings totaled $561 million compared with earnings from operations of $406 million in the third quarter of 2002. Operating margins for the quarter were 7.7 percent compared with 6.3 percent for the same period last year. Aircraft and weapon, support, and network systems programs continued to perform well. Integrated Defense Systems results are summarized below in Table 6.
 
 
 
Aircraft and Weapon Systems delivered another quarter of strong profitability. Revenues for the quarter rose 2 percent to just under $3.0 billion on increased JDAM volume. Performance remained excellent with operating margins at 11.9 percent, up from 11.0 percent in 2002, and included continuing investment in the 767 Tanker program.
 
Network Systems results for the third quarter reflected continued growth in its Department of Defense (DoD) network-centric and homeland security program base as revenues rose 15 percent to $2.3 billion. Operating margins were 6.5 percent and reflected strong program performance offset by a $47 million pre-tax non-cash charge related to the Resource 21 venture based on NASA's decision not to award an imagery contract. Period results in 2002 included a $100 million charge related to the development of the 737 Airborne Early Warning & Control aircraft.
 
Support Systems delivered strong growth with revenues up 19 percent to almost $1.1 billion on significant increases in spares for tactical aircraft, maintenance and modifications on transport aircraft, and integrated logistic support and services. Operating margins remained strong at 11.1 percent compared with 14.2 percent in the third quarter of 2002, which benefited from a gain related to the divestiture of an equity investment.
 
Launch and Orbital Systems revenues for the quarter were up 37 percent to just under $1.0 billion on increased Delta IV deliveries and higher satellite sales. Operating losses were $58 million and reflect development cost on the Delta IV heavy demonstration vehicle and slight cost growth on current commercial satellite programs. This compares to a loss of $113 million in third quarter of 2002, which included the non-cash write-down of a $100 million equity investment in Teledesic, LLC.
 
At the end of the quarter, contractual backlog was $34.4 billion compared with $38.8 billion at the end of the second quarter; unobligated backlog totaled $44.3 billion.
Boeing Capital Corporation
 
Boeing Capital Corporation (BCC) continues to focus on minimizing risk and preserving value with prudently structured transactions and portfolio management. BCC results are summarized in Table 7.
 
 
 
During the quarter, revenues and pre-tax income increased to $344 million and $108 million, respectively, primarily as a result of portfolio growth during the second half of 2002. BCC third-quarter revenues and income also reflect the sale of certain financing assets, which resulted in a $45 million gain in the period. This gain was partially offset by non-cash charges totaling $34 million, primarily to revalue selected operating lease assets. In the third quarter of 2002, comparable results included pre-tax charges of $149 million to strengthen reserves and revalue certain investments.
 
BCC's customer-financing portfolio grew modestly in the quarter to $12.2 billion, up from $12.0 billion at the end of the second quarter and $11.5 billion in the third quarter of 2002. The increase reflected new business volume totaling $0.6 billion offset by $0.4 billion of asset run-off and depreciation. The allowance for losses on finance lease and note receivables at quarter-end was 4.6 percent compared to 5.2 percent at the end of the second quarter.
 
At quarter-end, approximately 78 percent of BCC's portfolio was related to Boeing products and services (primarily commercial aircraft), unchanged from the end of the second quarter. During the quarter, BCC agreed to restructure the terms of its loans and leases with United Airlines. The company does not expect the revised terms will have a material adverse effect on earnings, cash flow or financial position. Leverage, as measured by the ratio of debt-to-equity, declined during the quarter from 5.3-to-1 to 5.2-to-1.
 
"Other" Segment
 
The "Other" segment consists chiefly of the Connexion by Boeing
SM
, Air Traffic Management, and Boeing technology units, as well as certain results related to the consolidation of all business units. Third-quarter losses from operations totaled $55 million primarily reflecting investment in Connexion by Boeing as well as net
adjustments relating to customer financing activities with an unfavorable impact totaling $14 million. This compares to $191 million in the third quarter of 2002, which included a $101 million charge related to customer-financing activities subject to Boeing company guarantees.
 
Connexion by Boeing continues to prepare for launch of commercial service in 2004, while Air Traffic Management builds support for a modernized global air traffic management system. During the third quarter, Connexion by Boeing signed an initial service agreement with SAS for 11 aircraft and a memorandum of understanding with All Nippon Airlines.
 
Outlook
 
Table 8 reflects the company's current assessment of its financial outlook during the guidance period.
 
 
The company actively monitors conditions in its key markets. In the commercial aviation market the airline industry environment remains mixed with trends varying between carriers and regions. A number of low-cost carriers continue to gain market share, remain profitable and are ordering new airplanes. Although there have been encouraging signs, the downturn remains severe and many airlines continue to incur losses that dampen demand across all airplane types. The timing of a civil aviation delivery recovery remains uncertain and will likely be no earlier than 2005.
 
At the same time, the company expects its defense and non-commercial space businesses to perform well in their growing markets. Boeing Integrated Defense Systems expects continued growth and performance in its Network Systems segment, which contains missile defense, homeland security, intelligence, and DoD network-centric businesses. The Aircraft and Weapon and Support Systems segments are also expected to continue delivering strong results. Strength in defense and non-commercial space markets should continue to partially offset the downturn in the company's commercial aviation and space markets, and drive revenue growth in 2004. The company's outlook contemplates signing the proposed contract in 2003 to deliver 100 767 tankers to the U.S. Air Force.
Boeing Commercial Airplanes' delivery forecast for 2003 is unchanged at approximately 280 airplanes. The delivery forecast for 2004 is also unchanged at between 275 and 290 airplanes and is essentially sold out at the lower end of the range. Commercial Airplanes expects demand for aircraft services and spares to remain soft due to severe market conditions.
 
The company is increasing its revenue outlook for 2003 from +/- $49 billion to +/- $50 billion. The revision primarily reflects continued revenue strength in the company's military programs. The company's 2004 revenue outlook is unchanged at +/- $52 billion.
 
The company is revising its 2003 earnings per share guidance to reflect the results of the quarter. On a GAAP basis, 2003 earnings per share guidance is revised from ($0.07) to $0.03 per share to ($0.12) to ($0.02) per share. Adjusted earnings per share* guidance is also revised from $0.95$1.05 per share to $0.90 to $1.00 per share. The company's 2003 adjusted earnings per share* guidance adds back the non-cash charges for goodwill impairment ($1.02 per share) recognized in the first quarter. Earnings per share guidance for 2004 remains unchanged at $1.75 to $1.95 per share.
 
The company is also revising its cash flow guidance to reflect its $1.2 billion of discretionary pension contributions in the third quarter. For 2003, operating cash flow guidance is revised from $3.0 to $3.5 billion to $2.0 to $2.5 billion. Similarly, the company is revising free cash flow* guidance for 2003 from $2.0 to $2.5 billion to $1.0 to $1.5 billion. For 2004, operating cash flow guidance remains unchanged at greater than $3.5 billion with free cash flow* guidance unchanged at greater than $2.5 billion.
 
Boeing expects research and development to remain between 3.0 and 3.5 percent of sales during the guidance period.
 
 
The following definitions are provided for non-GAAP (Generally Accepted Accounting Principles) measures (indicated by an asterisk *) used by the company within this disclosure. Boeing does not intend for the information to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the related GAAP measures. Other companies may define the measures differently.
 
Adjusted Financial Results
 
Boeing reports adjusted earnings per share, earnings from operations, and operating margins excluding SFAS 142 goodwill charges. Management believes that because goodwill is a non-cash charge related to past acquisitions, adjusting the company's financial results to exclude goodwill provides investors with a clearer perspective on the current underlying operating performance of the company. Management uses earnings from operations excluding goodwill charges as an internal measure of business operating performance.
 
Adjusted Earnings per Share
 
Boeing defines adjusted earnings per share as GAAP earnings per share (EPS) less SFAS 142 goodwill charges. Table 1 reconciles GAAP EPS and adjusted EPS.
 
Adjusted Earnings from Operations (or Adjusted Operating Losses)
 
Boeing defines adjusted earnings from operations as GAAP earnings from operations less SFAS 142 goodwill charges. Tables 2, 5, 6, and 8 reconcile GAAP earnings from operations and adjusted earnings from operations.
 
Adjusted Operating Margin
 
Boeing defines adjusted operating margin as the adjusted earnings from operations (defined above) divided by revenues. Tables 2, 5, and 6 reconcile GAAP operating margins and adjusted operating margins.
 
Free Cash Flow
 
Free cash flow is defined as GAAP operating cash flow less capital expenditures for property, plant, and equipment, net. GAAP operating cash flow includes intercompany cash received from the sale of aircraft by Boeing Commercial Airplanes (BCA) for customers who receive financing from Boeing Capital Corporation (BCC). The year-to-date contribution to operating cash flow related to customer deliveries of Boeing airplanes financed by Boeing Capital Corporation totals approximately $1.4 billion, compared to just under $2.2 billion for the first three quarters of 2002.
GAAP investing cash flow includes a reduction in cash for the intercompany cash paid by BCC to BCA, as well as an increase in cash for amounts received from third parties, primarily customers paying amounts due on aircraft financing transactions. The majority of BCC's customer financing is funded by debt and cash flow from BCC operations.
 
Management believes free cash flow provides investors with an important perspective on the cash available for shareholders, debt repayment, and acquisitions after making the capital investments required to support ongoing business operations and long term value creation. Free cash flow does not represent the residual cash flow available for discretionary expenditures as it excludes certain mandatory expenditures such as repayment of maturing debt. Management uses free cash flow internally to assess both business performance and overall Boeing liquidity. Table 3 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and free cash flow.
 
Certain statements in this release may constitute "forward-looking" statements within the meaning of the Private Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements in this release include, but are not limited to, our assessment of the markets for our products, statements discussing the growth of our business segments and statements contained in the "Outlook" section of this release. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions as to future events that may not prove to be accurate. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak only as of the date they were made and we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise. Our actual results and future trends may differ materially depending on a variety of factors, including the continued impact of the commercial aviation downturn on overall production, as well as the impact on production or production rates for specific commercial airplane models, the continued operation, viability and growth of major airline customers and non-airline customers (such as the U.S. Government); adverse developments in the value of collateral securing customer and other financings; the occurrence of any significant collective bargaining labor dispute; tax settlements with the U.S. Government; our successful execution of internal performance plans, production rate increases and decreases (including any reduction in or termination of an aircraft product, including the 717, 757 and 767 models), acquisition and divestiture plans, and other cost-reduction and productivity efforts; charges from any future SFAS 142 review; an adverse development in rating agency credit ratings or assessments; the actual outcomes of certain pending sales campaigns and U.S. and foreign government procurement activities, including the timing of procurement of tankers by the U.S. Department of Defense; the cyclical nature of some of our businesses; unanticipated financial market changes which may impact pension plan assumptions; domestic and international competition in the defense, space and commercial areas; continued integration of acquired businesses; performance issues with key suppliers, subcontractors and customers; factors that could result in significant and prolonged disruption to air travel worldwide (including the status of and impacts flowing from continued warfare in Iraq and future terrorist attacks); any additional impacts from the attacks of September 11, 2001; global trade policies; worldwide political stability; domestic and international economic conditions; price escalation; the outcome of political and legal processes, including uncertainty regarding government funding of certain programs; changing priorities or reductions in the U.S. Government or foreign government defense and space budgets; termination of government or commercial contracts due to unilateral government or customer
action or failure to perform; legal, financial and governmental risks related to international transactions; legal proceedings, including U.S. Government proceedings and investigations and commercial litigation related to the Evolved Expendable Launch Vehicle Program; and other economic, political and technological risks and uncertainties. Additional information regarding these factors is contained in our SEC filings, including, without limitation, our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2002 and Form 10-Q for the period ending March 31, 2003 and June 30, 2003.
 
C2014
 
Contact:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20031124102831.txt.gz
TIME:20031124102831
EVENTS:	Other events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
 <PAGE>
Item 5. Other Events and Regulation FD Disclosure
On November 24, 2003, the Company issued the following press release:
CHICAGO, Nov. 24, 2003 - Boeing Executive Vice President and CFO Mike Sears has been dismissed for cause effective immediately as the result of circumstances surrounding the hiring of Darleen Druyun, a former U.S. government official. Druyun, who has been vice president and deputy general manager of Missile Defense Systems, also has been dismissed for cause.
Sears was dismissed for violating company policies by communicating directly and indirectly with Druyun about future employment when she had not disqualified herself from acting in her official government capacity on matters involving Boeing. In addition, an internally initiated review found both attempted to conceal their misconduct.
"Compelling evidence of this misconduct by Mr. Sears and Ms. Druyun came to light over the last two weeks," said Boeing Chairman and CEO Phil Condit. "Upon review of the facts, our board of directors determined that immediate dismissal of both individuals for cause was the appropriate course of action."
Over the past several months Boeing has made a concentrated effort to enhance its programs and policies to ensure understanding that ethical breaches will not be tolerated. "The board of directors retained former Sen. Warren Rudman of Paul, Weiss, Rifkind, Wharton & Garrison to review Boeing's ethics programs," Condit said. "One of the first actions we took as a result was to create the Office of Internal Governance, with its leader reporting directly to me. The board and I have asked Senator Rudman to extend his review and examine Boeing's procedures and practices on hiring government employees to ensure this type of incident never happens again," said Condit.
"Boeing must and will live by the highest standards of ethical conduct in every aspect of our business," Condit said. "When we determine there have been violations of our standards, we will act swiftly to address them, just as we have today.
"The action taken today reflects in no way on the financial condition of the company, which remains excellent," Condit added.
Boeing has informed the Department of the Air Force of the actions taken and will continue to cooperate with the government in its ongoing investigation regarding this matter. It is not possible to predict at this time what actions the government might take against the individuals or Boeing and the consequences of those actions.
CXXXX Contact: John Dern or Larry McCracken, (312) 544-2002
 <PAGE>
THE BOEING COMPANY
Dated: November 24, 2003


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20031125091348.txt.gz
TIME:20031125091348
EVENTS:	Other events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5. Other Events
 
IRS Tax Settlement
 
The Boeing Company has received a federal income tax refund and related interest totaling approximately $1.1 billion. The refund and interest are related to a partial settlement of tax years 1992 to 1997 with the Internal Revenue Service and further strengthen the Company's cash balances.
 
Based upon a preliminary analysis, the Company estimates the partial settlement will favorably impact fourth quarter 2003 net income by approximately $700 million, or $0.87 per share. The partial settlement will increase fourth quarter 2003 operating cash flow by approximately $1.1 billion.
 
The 2003 earnings per share and cash flow guidance issued by the Company on October 29, 2003, does not reflect this tax settlement. The Company will disclose its final determination of the period financial impact when it releases fourth quarter and full-year 2003 financial results in January 2004.
 
 
Certain statements in this release may constitute "forward-looking" statements within the meaning of the Private Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements in this release include, but are not limited to, our expectation that the refunds will further strengthen the Company's cash balances and statements discussing the financial impact of the partial settlement. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions as to future events that may not prove to be accurate. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak only as of the date they were made and we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise. Our actual results and future trends may differ materially depending on a variety of factors, including the continued impact of the commercial aviation downturn on overall production, as well as the impact on production or production rates for specific commercial airplane models, the continued operation, viability and growth of major airline customers and non-airline customers (such as the U.S. Government); adverse developments in the value of collateral securing customer and other financings; the occurrence of any significant collective bargaining labor dispute; additional tax settlements with the U.S. Government; our successful execution of internal performance plans, production rate increases and decreases (including any reduction in or termination of an aircraft product, including the 717, 757 and 767 models), acquisition and divestiture plans, and other cost-reduction and productivity efforts; charges from any future SFAS 142 review; an adverse development in rating agency credit ratings or assessments; the actual outcomes of certain pending sales campaigns and U.S. and foreign government procurement activities, including the timing of procurement of tankers by the U.S. Department of Defense ("DOD") in light of, among other things, the Congressional review process, an ongoing DOD investigation, and our for cause termination of our Chief Financial Officer;  the cyclical nature of some of our businesses; unanticipated financial market changes which may impact pension plan assumptions; domestic and international competition in the defense, space and commercial areas; continued integration of acquired businesses; performance issues with key suppliers, subcontractors and customers; factors that could result in significant and prolonged disruption to air travel worldwide (including the status of and impacts flowing from continued warfare in Iraq and future terrorist attacks); any additional impacts from the attacks of September 11, 2001; global trade policies; worldwide political stability; domestic and international economic conditions; price escalation; the outcome of political and legal processes, including uncertainty regarding government funding of certain programs; changing priorities or reductions in the U.S. Government or foreign government defense and space budgets; termination of government or commercial contracts due to unilateral government or customer action or failure to perform; legal, financial and governmental risks related to international transactions; legal proceedings, including U.S. Government proceedings and investigations and commercial litigation related to the Evolved Expendable Launch Vehicle Program or related to the Air Force 767 Tanker Program; and other economic, political and technological risks and uncertainties. Additional information regarding these factors is contained in our SEC filings, including, without limitation, our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2002 and Form 10-Q for the periods ending March 31, 2003, June 30, 2003, and September 30, 2003.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20031201154714.txt.gz
TIME:20031201154714
EVENTS:	Resignations of registrant's directors
TEXT:
ITEM: Resignations of registrant's directors
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 6. Resignations of Registrant's Directors
 
On December 1, 2003, Philip M. Condit tendered his resignation as Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of The Boeing Company. The resignation is not the result of any disagreement with Boeing on any matter relating to its operations, policies or practices. A copy of the press release announcing Mr. Condit's resignation is filed as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
 
The Board of Directors named Harry C. Stonecipher as President and Chief Executive Officer and Lewis E. Platt as Non-executive Chairman of Boeing.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
Boeing [NYSE: BA] announced today that its board of directors has accepted the resignation of Phil Condit, 62, as chairman and CEO. After thorough deliberations, the board decided that a new structure for the leadership of the company is needed and named Lewis E. Platt, 62, as non-executive chairman and Harry C. Stonecipher, 67, as president and CEO, effective immediately.
CHICAGO, Dec. 1, 2003
 
Both Platt and Stonecipher are experienced leaders who are knowledgeable about the company's operations and strategy. Platt has been a member of Boeing's board of directors for four years; he is a retired chairman of the board, president and CEO of Hewlett-Packard Company. Stonecipher retired from Boeing in 2002 after working closely with Condit for five years in several roles, including vice chairman, president and chief operating officer. Stonecipher also has served as a Boeing director for six years.
 
"Boeing is advancing on several of the most important programs in its history and I offered my resignation as a way to put the distractions and controversies of the past year behind us, and to place the focus on our performance," Condit said. "I am proud of the strategies that have transformed Boeing into the world's largest aerospace company, and I have the highest regard and respect for Lew and Harry. They each possess the knowledge, experience and leadership to take this company to the next level. I will watch the progress of Boeing with great pride."
 
"The board appreciates that Phil acted with characteristic dignity and selflessness in recognizing that his resignation was for the good of the company," said the new chairman, Lew Platt. "We accepted his decision with sadness, but also with the knowledge that changes needed to be made. The board is confident that the new leadership will bring a renewed focus on execution and performance.
 
"The board is in unanimous agreement that the company has been pursuing the right transformation strategy and that Boeing is in excellent financial condition," he said.
 
"As the non-executive chairman, I will bring to bear the full strength and perspective of the board in guiding the company and assisting Harry in any way he requests. Harry will be responsible for executing our strategy and running every aspect of the company," Platt said.
"Boeing has a solid foundation for the future  strong businesses, valuable assets, and thousands of hard-working, dedicated people  and we are all deeply grateful to Phil for his contributions and accomplishments," Stonecipher said.
 
"We have the right strategy. The task before us is to execute. We need to strengthen our reputation with our customers, employees, investors and the communities in which we operate. Lew and I, and the entire board, are determined that the events of the last year no longer obscure the company's strengths or distract us from what we need to do. Boeing is a great company with tremendous capabilities to define the future in each of our markets and deliver consistent, profitable growth," said Stonecipher.
 
Lew Platt joined Hewlett-Packard in 1966 in the medical products operations and went on to manage various parts of HP's computer business. He became an executive vice president in 1987 and retired in 1999 after serving seven years as chairman, CEO and president of HP. He was the CEO of Kendall-Jackson Wine Estates from 2000 to mid-2001.
 
Platt earned his bachelor's degree in mechanical engineering from Cornell University and has a master's degree in business administration from the Wharton School of Business, University of Pennsylvania. He serves on the boards of 7-Eleven, The Packard Foundation and the Wharton School.
 
Harry Stonecipher's aerospace career spans more than 47 years from his start at General Motors' Allison Division as a lab technician to being elected vice chairman of The Boeing Company in 2001. In 1960, he joined General Electric's aircraft engine operations, and progressed through a series of engineering and program positions, ending up running the division from 1984 to 1987.
 
In 1987, Stonecipher left GE to join Sundstrand and shortly thereafter became president and chief operating officer. He became president and CEO in 1989 and assumed the additional office of chairman in 1991. During his seven and a half years at Sundstrand, Stonecipher repaired the company's seriously damaged customer relationship with the U.S. Department of Defense.
 
Stonecipher joined McDonnell Douglas in 1994 as president and CEO. In his short 33 months at the aerospace company he increased the financial performance of the enterprise, saw a four-fold increase in the share price, and led the merger with Boeing in 1997. At completion of the merger, Stonecipher was elected president and chief operating officer and a member of Boeing's board.
 
He has a bachelor's degree in physics from Tennessee Technological University and serves on the board of directors of PACCAR, Inc.
 
Certain statements in this release may constitute "forward-looking" statements within the meaning of the Private Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements in this release include, but are not limited to, our expectation that the refunds will further strengthen the Company's cash balances and statements discussing the financial impact of the partial settlement. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions as to future events that may not prove to be accurate. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak only as of the date they were made and we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise. Our actual results and future trends may differ materially depending on a variety of factors, including the continued impact of the commercial aviation downturn on overall production, as well as the impact on production or production rates for specific commercial airplane models, the continued operation, viability and growth of major airline customers and non-airline customers (such as the U.S. Government); adverse developments in the value of collateral securing customer and other financings; the occurrence of any significant collective bargaining labor dispute; additional tax settlements with the U.S. Government; our successful execution of internal performance plans, production rate increases and decreases (including any reduction in or termination of an aircraft product, including the 717, 757 and 767 models), acquisition and divestiture plans, and other cost-reduction and productivity efforts; charges from any future SFAS 142 review; an adverse development in rating agency credit ratings or assessments; the actual outcomes of certain pending sales campaigns and U.S. and foreign government procurement activities, including the timing of procurement of tankers by the U.S. Department of Defense ("DOD") in light of, among other things, the Congressional review process, an ongoing DOD investigation, and our for cause termination of our Chief Financial Officer;  the cyclical nature of some of our businesses; unanticipated financial market changes which may impact pension plan assumptions; domestic and international competition in the defense, space and commercial areas; continued integration of acquired businesses; performance issues with key suppliers, subcontractors and customers; factors that could result in significant and prolonged disruption to air travel worldwide (including the status of and impacts flowing from continued warfare in Iraq and future terrorist attacks); any additional impacts from the attacks of September 11, 2001; global trade policies; worldwide political stability; domestic and international economic conditions; price escalation; the outcome of political and legal processes, including uncertainty regarding government funding of certain programs; changing priorities or reductions in the U.S. Government or foreign government defense and space budgets; termination of government or commercial contracts due to unilateral government or customer action or failure to perform; legal, financial and governmental risks related to international transactions; legal proceedings, including U.S. Government proceedings and investigations and commercial litigation related to the Evolved Expendable Launch Vehicle Program or related to the Air Force 767 Tanker Program; and other economic, political and technological risks and uncertainties. Additional information regarding these factors is contained in our SEC filings, including, without limitation, our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2002 and Form 10-Q for the periods ending March 31, 2003, June 30, 2003, and September 30, 2003.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20031219172918.txt.gz
TIME:20031219172918
EVENTS:	Other events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
 <PAGE>
Item 5. Other Events
On December 19, 2003, The Boeing Company ("Boeing") announced its intention to unconditionally guaranty the outstanding bonds $250,000,000 6 7/8% due November 1, 2006 and $350,000,000 9 3/4% due April 1, 2012 of McDonnell Douglas Corporation.
Boeing has also agreed to enter into a support agreement with its wholly owned subsidiary, Boeing Capital Corporation ("BCC") under which Boeing would agree to maintain a minimum ownership interest in BCC and to make payments to BCC should its fixed charge coverage ratio or net worth fall below minimum levels. The support agreement will include provisions under which it may be modified or terminated, with appropriate safeguards for BCC's noteholders. Boeing and BCC have agreed that a support agreement is appropriate in view of the previously announced new strategy under which BCC will focus primarily on supporting Boeing products and services.
 
<PAGE> 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20040129084551.txt.gz
TIME:20040129084551
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 9. Regulation FD Disclosure (Item 12, Disclosure of Results of Operations and Financial Condition).
 
The following information is being furnished under Item 12 of Form 8-K: News Release by The Boeing Company, for the fourth quarter results and updated outlook as announced on January 29, 2004. The text of the release is attached as exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
Boeing Reports Fourth-Quarter and Full-Year 2003 Results; Updates Outlook
 
 
Financial Highlights:
 
 
Selected Operating Highlights:
 
 
 
 The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] reported net income of $1.1 billion for the fourth quarter, or $1.37 per share, on revenues of $13.2 billion. Reported net income for 2003 totaled $0.7 billion, or $0.86 per share, on revenues of $50.5 billion. The results include a $1.01 per share non-cash charge to revalue goodwill balances in the first quarter and a $0.87 per share gain related to a federal tax refund in the fourth quarter.
CHICAGO, Jan. 29, 2004
 
"This past year was notable both for the solid performance turned in by most of our businesses, as well as the challenges we faced," Boeing President and CEO Harry Stonecipher said. "Integrated Defense Systems delivered strong fourth-quarter operating performance and over $50 billion of new orders for the year, which strengthen our revenue outlook going forward. Despite the most severe market challenges our industry has faced, Boeing Commercial Airplanes continues to perform well in terms of productivity and profitability. With the Board's approval to begin selling the 7E7, we are well positioned as the industry recovers with an airplane we believe will provide significant benefits to airlines and passengers," he added.
 
"While there is no doubt that the emergence of ethical issues during the year was deeply disappointing to all of us, I feel strongly that we acted quickly and aggressively to address the issues," Stonecipher said. "As we move into 2004, our focus is on execution, demonstrating our commitment to integrity, and raising our performance to a new level."
 
The Company's 2003 earnings from operations of $0.4 billion reflect lower commercial airplane deliveries, commercial space charges, lower pension income, and the revaluation of commercial financing and goodwill assets (see Table 2). These factors were partially offset by continued growth and strong operating performance in the Company's portfolio of defense businesses and by continued improvements in operating efficiencies at Commercial Airplanes. Excluding the goodwill impairment charges reported earlier in the year, adjusted earnings from operations* were $1.3 billion for 2003.
 
 
 
Pre-tax expense for share-based plans totaled $108 million in the fourth quarter and $456 million for 2003 reducing earnings per share by $0.08 and $0.36, respectively. These expenses are non-cash and are attributable to the Company's equity compensation plans. Deferred stock compensation expense attributable to vested and undistributed performance shares, which is separately determined based on the quarterly change in the Company's stock price, reduced fourth quarter earnings per share by $0.04 as the Company's stock price rose in the period. For the year, deferred stock compensation expense reduced earnings per share by $0.05 as the Company's stock price increased almost 28 percent.
 
Cash flow remained strong as the Company generated $3.6 billion and $3.9 billion of operating cash flow for the fourth quarter and the full year, respectively. Discretionary cash contributions to the Company's pension plans reduced operating cash flow for 2003 by $1.7 billion, but were partially offset by a $1.1 billion dollar tax refund received in the fourth quarter. As shown in Table 3, free cash flow* for the year, measured after investments in property, plant, and equipment, also remained solid at $3.2 billion. Excluding the impact of the tax refund, free cash flow* in the fourth quarter was $2.3 billion.
 
 
 
The Company's cash balance at year end totaled $4.6 billion, up substantially from $1.7 billion at the end of the third quarter and $2.3 billion at the end of 2002 (see Table 4). Excluding BCC and non-recourse debt, the Company's debt increased slightly in 2003 to $4.7 billion after a successful debt refinancing early in the year. Debt at Boeing Capital decreased by approximately $300 million as the unit implemented its announced strategy to reduce financing portfolio growth and risk.
 
 
Segment Results
 
Boeing Commercial Airplanes
 
During 2003, Commercial Airplanes aggressively managed for profitability through the downturn in its markets while positioning itself for long-term strength. In December, Commercial Airplanes received authority from the Board of Directors to offer the 7E7 mid-sized airplane, which is designed to provide airlines with substantial gains over current-generation aircraft in efficiency, environmental friendliness, and passenger comfort. Customer interest in the 7E7 is high and the Company projects the addressable market to be approximately $400 billion over the next 20 years.
Commercial Airplanes' results for the fourth quarter and full year are summarized in Table 5 and reflect solid operating performance on planned lower delivery volumes and the third-quarter decision to complete 757 production after delivering more than 1,000 airplanes over two decades.
 
 
For 2003, Commercial Airplanes delivered 281 airplanes generating $22.4 billion of revenue. Operating earnings for the year totaled approximately $0.7 billion, reflecting lower revenues, a goodwill impairment charge in the first quarter, and the decision to conclude the 757 program. These impacts were partially offset by continued improvements in operating efficiencies. Excluding the goodwill impairment charge, adjusted operating earnings* for the year totaled approximately $1.0 billion.
 
During the fourth quarter, deliveries of commercial airplanes decreased 17 percent to 71 airplanes, and revenues fell 8 percent to $5.8 billion, when compared with the fourth quarter of 2002. Operating earnings totaled $471 million and operating margins increased to 8.1 percent.
 
Commercial Airplanes captured 81 gross orders during the quarter and 240 for the year from a broad cross-section of customers including many leading low-cost airlines. Contractual backlog totaled $63.9 billion on December 31 compared with $68.2 billion at the end of 2002.
 
Integrated Defense Systems
 
Integrated Defense Systems (IDS) delivered solid revenue growth and operating profitability as its defense and intelligence businesses continued to perform in strong markets. During 2003, IDS won unprecedented orders of more than $50 billion. IDS faced challenges in 2003 that impacted its results, primarily in its Launch and Orbital Systems segment, including continued weakness in its commercial space markets and ethics issues related to the U.S. Air Force EELV contract. However, with
a broad portfolio of traditional platforms and transformational programs along with success in winning new business, IDS is well positioned to deliver continued growth and profitability. IDS results are summarized in Table 6.
 
 
 
 
Revenues for 2003 were $27.4 billion, up 10 percent over 2002 driven by growth in all four of IDS's reporting segments. Operating earnings and margins were down from 2002 as a result of charges related to its commercial space businesses that were partially offset by improved performance in its Aircraft and Weapon Systems, Network Systems, and Support Systems businesses.
 
For the fourth quarter, IDS revenues increased to $7.2 billion primarily as a result of significant growth in its Network Systems and Support Systems segments. IDS delivered strong fourth-quarter operating margins of 8.3 percent, up from 8.0 percent in the fourth quarter of 2002.
 
Aircraft and Weapon Systems delivered another year of excellent profitability. Revenues rose 2 percent to $10.8 billion on increased JDAM and F/A-22 volume, which offset lower rotorcraft deliveries. Performance remained outstanding with
operating margins of 13.2 percent net of investment in the 767 Tanker program, up from 12.0 percent in 2002.
 
Network Systems continued its rapid growth and solid performance in 2003. Revenues rose 16 percent to almost $9.4 billion on increased activity in its Proprietary, Homeland Security, and Future Combat Systems programs. Operating margins remained solid at 6.7 percent on higher revenues and favorable program mix offset by cost growth on DoD satellite programs as well as a non-cash charge taken for the Resource 21 venture in the third quarter. Results for 2002 included a $100 million charge related to the development of the 737 Airborne Early Warning & Control aircraft.
 
Support Systems also delivered strong growth and excellent profitability in 2003. Revenues increased 21 percent to $4.2 billion on significant increases in spares for tactical aircraft, maintenance and modifications on transport aircraft, and integrated logistic support and services. Operating margins continued to improve, totaling 11.2 percent on higher revenue and strong program performance. During the fourth quarter, Support Systems was awarded the Malcolm Baldridge quality award in recognition of their operational excellence.
 
Launch and Orbital Systems' 2003 results were impacted by the continued weakness in commercial space markets and cost growth in its satellite business. Revenues rose 7 percent on higher deliveries of Delta launch vehicles. Operating losses totaled approximately $1.8 billion, primarily reflecting the write-down of goodwill balances in the first quarter and the charge associated with its launch and satellite businesses in the second quarter.
 
During 2003, IDS captured new business that boosted its year-end contractual backlog to $40.9 billion compared with $36.0 billion at the end of 2002. Unobligated backlog also rose significantly to $50.6 billion. Total IDS backlog, comprised of contractual and unobligated, ended 2003 at $91.5 billion compared with $70.7 billion at the end of 2002.
Boeing Capital Corporation
 
During 2003, Boeing Capital Corporation (BCC) shifted its strategy to create value by supporting the operations of the Company's business units while reducing risk. BCC's performance reflected this new strategy as customer financing portfolio growth slowed over the course of the year. BCC results are summarized in Table 7.
 
 
 
In 2003, BCC annual revenues and pre-tax income increased to $1.2 billion and $143 million, respectively, primarily reflecting the portfolio growth that occurred during the second half of 2002. For the fourth quarter, revenues rose by 11 percent to $307 million as portfolio growth slowed during 2003. Pre-tax income rose to $76 million, driven by a sharp reduction in non-cash charges compared with the fourth quarter of 2002.
 
BCC's customer financing portfolio grew slightly in 2003 to $12.2 billion, up from $11.8 billion at the end of 2002. New business volume of approximately $2.0 billion was offset by $1.6 billion of asset run-off and depreciation. In the fourth quarter, BCC's portfolio balance was unchanged from the $12.2 billion reported at the end of the third quarter as asset run-off and depreciation offset new business volume. The allowance for losses on finance leases and notes receivable at year-end was 4.8 percent compared to 4.6 percent at the end of the third quarter and 3.5 percent at the end of 2002. Leverage, as measured by the ratio of debt-to-equity, dropped sharply to 4.7-to-1, down from 5.2-to-1 at the end of the third quarter and 5.7-to-1 at the end of 2002.
 
At year end, approximately 80 percent of BCC's portfolio was related to Boeing products and services (primarily commercial aircraft), up slightly from the end of the third quarter. On January 15, 2004, BCC announced it is assessing strategic options with regard to the future of its Commercial Financing unit.
 
"Other" Segment
 
The "Other" segment consists chiefly of the Connexion by Boeing
SM
, Air Traffic Management, and Boeing Technology units, as well as certain results related to the consolidation of all business units. For 2003, losses from operations were $449 million up slightly from 2002.
Connexion by Boeing
SM
continues to prepare for launch of commercial service on Lufthansa in March 2004, while Air Traffic Management builds support for a modernized global air traffic management system. During the fourth quarter, Connexion by Boeing signed initial service agreements with Japan Airlines and All Nippon Airways for 10 aircraft each bringing the total number of aircraft under contract for its service to 119.
 
Pension Update
 
The Company measures its pension plans using a September 30 year end for financial accounting purposes. For the plan year ending September 30, 2003, investment returns were 17 percent reflecting strong market and plan performance. However, during 2003 interest rates continued to decline. As a result, the Company lowered its discount rate, which is based on interest rates as of September 30, from 6.50 percent to 6.00 percent resulting in a higher estimated actuarial pension liability. In addition, the Company lowered its expected return on plan assets, which reflects expected performance over the long term, from 9.00 percent in 2003 to 8.75 percent in 2004.
 
Due to these adjustments, the Company decreased its other comprehensive income equity balance by $0.2 billion at the end of 2003 to reflect the additional minimum liability under its pension plans. This after-tax equity charge did not impact cash or earnings and could reverse in future periods should interest rates increase, plan returns remain strong, or The Company makes additional contributions.
 
During 2003, the Company recognized $147 million in earnings from operations from its pension plans compared with $526 million in 2002. In 2004, the Company expects pension expense to reduce earnings from operations by between $350 million and $400 million. In 2005, the pension impact on earnings will depend on market conditions and discretionary funding, but based upon current assumptions the Company estimates its non-cash pension expense will be between $600 and $700 million.
 
The Company had no significant required pension funding in 2003 and expects 2004 requirements to be approximately $100 million. However, the Company did make $1.7 billion in discretionary cash contributions to its plans in 2003 and will continue to evaluate additional discretionary funding in 2004. Requirements in 2005 will depend upon market performance and other factors but currently are expected to be less than $500 million. The Company's pension funding requirements are reflected in its outlook.
 
Outlook
 
Table 8 reflects the Company's current assessment of its financial outlook during the guidance period. Beginning with this release, the Company will provide an
outlook for operating cash flow in lieu of free cash flow* guidance in order to completely align the Company's guidance with GAAP.
 
 
Strength in defense and intelligence markets is expected to drive revenue and earnings growth in 2004 and 2005 offsetting challenges in the Company's commercial aviation and space markets and increasing development costs for the 7E7.
 
The airline industry environment remains mixed with trends varying between carriers and regions. A number of low-cost carriers continue to gain market share, remain profitable and are ordering new airplanes. There have been encouraging signs that the U.S. economy and global air traffic are recovering and airline interest is slowly increasing, although demand for the 717 remains low. However, the timing of a commercial airplane recovery remains uncertain. Currently, the Company expects airplane deliveries to remain roughly flat in 2004 and 2005 and begin increasing in 2006.
 
Commercial Airplanes' delivery forecast for 2004 has been revised from an estimated 275 to 290 airplanes to approximately 285 airplanes. Looking ahead, Commercial Airplanes expects deliveries in 2005 to be about the same as 2004. The delivery forecast is essentially sold out for 2004 and over 90-percent sold for 2005. Commercial Airplanes expects demand for aircraft services and spares to remain soft in 2004 due to difficult market conditions before picking up strength in 2005.
 
At the same time, the Company expects its defense and non-commercial space businesses to perform well in their growing markets. IDS anticipates continued growth and performance in its Network Systems segment, driven by captured programs such as Future Combat Systems and its current business base in missile defense, homeland security, intelligence, and DoD network-centric programs. The Aircraft and Weapon Systems and Support Systems segments are also expected to continue delivering strong results. The Company's outlook contemplates signing in 2004 the proposed contract to deliver 100 767 tankers to the U.S. Air Force.
 
The Company's 2004 revenue outlook is unchanged at +/-$52 billion. Revenue guidance for 2005 is between $55 billion and $57 billion.
 
Earnings per share guidance for 2004 remains unchanged at $1.75 to $1.95 per share. For 2005, the Company expects earnings per share to be between $1.95 and $2.20.
For 2004, operating cash flow guidance is revised from greater than $3.5 billion to $3.0 to $3.5 billion reflecting the acceleration of certain customer progress payments and advances from 2004 into 2003. The Company forecasts operating cash flow for 2005 to be greater than $4.5 billion. The Company expects capital expenditures in 2004 to be approximately $1 billion and expenditures in 2005 to be approximately $1.5 billion.
 
The Company expects research and development expenses to be between 3.25 and 3.75 percent of revenue in 2004 and between 3.5 and 4.0 percent in 2005 as spending increases on the 7E7 program.
 
Boeing's financial outlook for each of its major segments is shown in Table 9.
 
Non-GAAP Measure Disclosure
 
The following definitions are provided for non-GAAP (Generally Accepted Accounting Principles) measures (indicated by an asterisk *) used by the Company within this disclosure. Boeing does not intend for the information to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the related GAAP measures. Other companies may define the measures differently.
 
Adjusted Financial Results
 
Boeing reports adjusted earnings per share, earnings from operations, and operating margins excluding SFAS 142 goodwill charges. Management believes that because goodwill is a non-cash charge related to past acquisitions, adjusting the Company's financial results to exclude goodwill provides investors with a clearer perspective on the current underlying operating performance of the Company. Management uses earnings from operations excluding goodwill charges as an internal measure of business operating performance.
 
Adjusted Earnings per Share
 
Boeing defines adjusted earnings per share as GAAP earnings per share less SFAS 142 goodwill charges. Table 1 reconciles GAAP EPS and adjusted EPS.
 
Adjusted Earnings from Operations (or Adjusted Operating Losses)
 
Boeing defines adjusted earnings from operations as GAAP earnings from operations less SFAS 142 goodwill charges. Tables 2, 5, and 6 reconcile GAAP earnings from operations and adjusted earnings from operations.
 
Adjusted Operating Margin
 
Boeing defines adjusted operating margin as the adjusted earnings from operations (defined above) divided by revenues. Tables 2, 5, and 6 reconcile GAAP operating margins and adjusted operating margins.
 
Free Cash Flow
 
Free cash flow is defined as GAAP operating cash flow less capital expenditures for property, plant, and equipment, net. GAAP operating cash flow includes inter-company cash received from the sale of aircraft by Commercial Airplanes for customers who receive financing from BCC. In 2003, the contribution to operating cash flow related to customer deliveries of Boeing airplanes financed by BCC totaled approximately $1.7 billion, compared with $2.7 billion for 2002.
 
GAAP investing cash flow includes a reduction in cash for the intercompany cash paid by BCC to Commercial Airplanes, as well as an increase in cash for amounts received from third parties, primarily customers paying amounts due on aircraft financing transactions. The majority of BCC's customer financing is funded by debt and cash flow from BCC operations.
 
Management believes free cash flow provides investors with an important perspective on the cash available for shareholders, debt repayment, and acquisitions after making the capital investments required to support ongoing business operations and long term value creation. Free cash flow does not represent the residual cash flow available for discretionary expenditures as it excludes certain mandatory expenditures such as repayment of maturing debt. Management uses free cash flow internally to assess both business performance and overall liquidity. Table 3 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and free cash flow.
 
Certain statements in this release may constitute "forward-looking" statements within the meaning of the Private Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements in this release include, but are not limited to, our assessment of the markets for our products, statements discussing the growth of our business segments and statements contained in the "Outlook" section of this release. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions as to future events that may not prove to be accurate. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak only as of the date they were made and we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise. Our actual results and future trends may differ materially depending on a variety of factors, including the timing and extent of any commercial aviation recovery and its effect on overall production, as well as the impact on production or production rates for specific commercial airplane models (including any reduction in or termination of an aircraft product, including the 717 and 767 models), the continued operation, viability and growth of major airline customers and non-airline customers (such as the U.S. Government); adverse developments in the value of collateral securing customer and other financings; the occurrence of any significant collective bargaining labor dispute; our successful execution of internal performance plans, acquisition and divestiture plans, and other cost-reduction and productivity efforts; charges from any future SFAS 142 review; an adverse development in rating agency credit ratings or assessments; the actual outcomes of certain pending sales campaigns including the 7E7 and U.S. and foreign government procurement activities, including the timing of procurement of tankers by the U.S. Department of Defense; the cyclical nature of some of our businesses; financial market changes which may impact pension plan assumptions; domestic and international competition in the defense, space and commercial areas; continued integration of acquired businesses; performance issues with key suppliers, subcontractors and customers; factors that could result in significant and prolonged disruption to air travel worldwide (including the status of and impacts flowing from continued warfare in Iraq and future terrorist attacks); any additional impacts from the attacks of September 11, 2001; global trade policies; worldwide political stability; domestic and international economic conditions; price escalation; the outcome of political and legal processes, including uncertainty regarding government funding of certain programs; changing priorities or reductions in the U.S. Government or foreign government defense and space budgets; termination of government or commercial contracts due to unilateral government or customer action, or failure to perform; legal, financial and governmental risks related to international transactions; legal proceedings, including U.S. Government proceedings and investigations and commercial litigation related to the Evolved Expendable Launch Vehicle Program and the hiring by the Company of a former government employee; and other economic, political and technological risks and uncertainties. Additional information regarding these factors is contained in our SEC filings, including, without limitation, our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2002, and Form 10-Q for the periods ending March 31, 2003, June 30, 2003, and September 30, 2003.
 
 
Contact:
 
Investor Relations: Dave Dohnalek or Bob Kurtz (312) 544-2140
Communications:   John Dern or Anne Eisele (312) 544-2002
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20040422083122.txt.gz
TIME:20040422083122
EVENTS:		Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 7. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
(a) Not applicable
 
(b) Not applicable
 
(c) Exhibits
 
99.1    Press Release issued April 22, 2004.
 
Item 12. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On April 22, 2004, The Boeing Company issued a press release with respect to its expected earnings per share for the first quarter of 2004. The text of that press release is furnished as exhibit 99.1.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] today announced it expects earnings per share for the first quarter of 2004 to significantly exceed current analyst average estimates as a result of good performance across its core businesses. More details concerning Boeing's first-quarter results and outlook will be provided on Wednesday, April 28, 2004 when the company issues its regularly scheduled earnings release at 7:30 a.m. (CDT) and hosts a teleconference call at 9:30 a.m. The financial release and webcast of the conference call will be available at www.boeing.com.
CHICAGO, April 22, 2004
 
Certain statements in this release may constitute "forward-looking" statements within the meaning of the Private Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements in this release include, but are not limited to, our expectation that earnings per share for the first quarter of 2004 will exceed estimates. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions as to future events that may not prove to be accurate. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak only as of the date they were made and we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise. Our actual results and future trends may differ materially depending on a variety of factors including our successful execution of internal performance plans, price escalation, production rate increases and decreases (including any reduction in or termination of an aircraft product), acquisition and divestiture plans, and other cost-reduction and productivity efforts; the actual outcomes of certain pending sales campaigns and U.S. and foreign government procurement activities, including the timing of procurement of tankers by the U.S. Department of Defense (DoD) in light of, among other things, the congressional review process, an ongoing DoD investigation and our for cause termination of our Chief Financial Officer; unanticipated financial market changes including those which may impact pension plan assumptions; domestic and international competition in the defense, space and commercial areas; performance issues with key suppliers, subcontractors and customers; factors that could result in significant and prolonged disruption to air travel worldwide (including future terrorist attacks); worldwide political stability; domestic and international economic conditions; the outcome of political and legal processes, including uncertainty regarding government funding of certain programs; changing priorities or reductions in the U.S. Government or foreign government defense and space budgets; termination of government or commercial contracts due to unilateral government or customer action or failure to perform; legal, financial and governmental risks related to international transactions; legal proceedings; additional tax settlements with the IRS; and other economic, political and technological risks and uncertainties. Additional information regarding risk factors is contained in our SEC filings, including, without limitation, our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2003.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20040428092214.txt.gz
TIME:20040428092214
EVENTS:		Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 7. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
(a) Not applicable
 
(b) Not applicable
 
(c) Exhibits
 
99.1    Press Release issued April 28, 2004.
 
Item 12. Disclosure of Results of Operations.
 
The following information is being furnished under Item 12 of Form 8-K: News Release by The Boeing Company, for the first quarter results and updated outlook as announced on April 28, 2004. The text of the release is attached as exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
Boeing Reports First-Quarter 2004 Results; Raises Outlook
 
 
 
Financial Highlights:
 
 
Selected Operating Highlights:
 
 
 
  The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] reported healthy growth and profitability for the first quarter of 2004 with net income of $623 million, or $0.77 per share, on revenues of $13.0 billion. Results included a $0.12 per share gain related to interest on a federal tax refund. This compares with a net loss of $478 million, or $0.60 per share, on revenues of $12.3 billion in the first quarter of 2003. The first quarter of 2003 included a revaluation of goodwill totaling $818 million after tax.
CHICAGO, April 28, 2004
 
"Boeing's first-quarter 2004 results reflect our drive to improve profitability through intense focus on execution across all of our businesses," Boeing President and CEO Harry Stonecipher said. "Integrated Defense Systems delivered another strong quarter of revenue growth and margin performance as it executed on its large backlog of key defense programs. Boeing Commercial Airplanes is generating solid profitability at the bottom of the commercial airplane cycle, while investing for future growth in the new 7E7 airplane which received a launch order for 50 airplanes from All Nippon Airways this week. I am pleased with the progress the Boeing team made during the quarter to deliver value to customers and shareholders."
 
The Company's first-quarter earnings from operations totaled $0.8 billion (see Table 2), reflect strong performance and growth in the Company's portfolio of defense businesses as well as higher operating earnings at Commercial Airplanes and Boeing Capital.
 
 
Pre-tax expense for share-based plans totaled $119 million in the first quarter, reducing earnings per share by $0.10. These expenses are non-cash and are attributable to the Company's equity compensation plans. Deferred stock compensation expense primarily attributable to vested and undistributed performance shares, which is separately determined based on the quarterly change in the Company's stock price, increased first-quarter earnings per share by $0.01 as the Company's stock price fell slightly during the period.
 
The Company generated $1.1 billion of cash flow during the quarter before making a discretionary cash contribution to its pension plans totaling $1.0 billion (pre-tax). Operating cash flow, after pension contributions, was $0.1 billion (see Table 3).
 
 
 
The Company's cash balance at quarter-end totaled $4.0 billion, down from $4.6 billion at the end of 2003 as the Company reduced debt at Boeing Capital by approximately $0.4 billion (see Table 4). The debt reduction reflected the unit's announced strategy to reduce financing-portfolio growth and risk. The Company's debt was unchanged at $4.7 billion.
 
Segment Results
 
Integrated Defense Systems
 
During the first quarter, Integrated Defense Systems (IDS) delivered strong revenue growth and excellent operating profitability in its large defense and intelligence businesses. IDS revenues increased 18 percent to $7.4 billion, driven by double-digit growth in all four of its business segments. IDS delivered strong first-quarter operating margins of 10.0 percent, reflecting outstanding program execution as well as the capture of on-going performance improvements on contracts nearing completion in the Aircraft and Weapon Systems and Support Systems businesses. Margins were up from 0.5 percent in the first quarter of 2003, which included a significant charge for goodwill impairment (see Table 5).
 
 
 
Aircraft and Weapon Systems delivered another quarter of excellent profitability. Revenues rose 13 percent to $3.0 billion on increased F/A-18, JDAM, F/A-22 and rotorcraft volume. Performance remained outstanding with operating margins of 15.8 percent driven by very strong execution on its production programs as well as positive performance adjustments on several contracts. These margins are evidence of Boeing's continued focus on lean initiatives, which ultimately benefit our U.S. Government customer.
Network Systems continued its rapid growth and solid performance in the first quarter. Revenues rose 27 percent to $2.5 billion on increased activity in its Future Combat Systems, Proprietary, and Airborne Command and Control programs. Operating margins were 7.3 percent as higher revenues and favorable program mix were somewhat offset by cost growth on DoD satellite programs.
 
Support Systems also delivered strong growth and excellent profitability. Revenues increased 15 percent to $1.1 billion on significant increases in supply chain services, maintenance and modifications on transport aircraft, and modernization and upgrade programs. Operating margins grew to 13.0 percent on the higher revenue, strong program performance and favorable contract close-outs.
 
Launch and Orbital Systems' first-quarter results were affected by the continued weakness in commercial space markets and cost growth in its satellite business. Revenues rose 23 percent on higher satellite volumes including the termination for convenience of a commercial satellite program. Operating losses totaled $63 million reflecting cost growth on certain satellite programs partially offset by continued profitability on its NASA programs.
 
IDS won key business during the quarter including orders for additional V-22 Ospreys and a U.S. Air Force transformational communications satellite program, as well as follow-on contracts for JDAMs and airport security programs. Contractual backlog ended the quarter at $41.6 billion, up from $40.9 billion at the end of 2003. Unobligated backlog declined to $44.2 billion at the end of the quarter primarily due to the Comanche termination and the funding of previously unobligated backlog on C-17 and proprietary programs. At the end of first quarter, total IDS backlog, comprised of contractual and unobligated, was $85.8 billion.
 
Boeing Commercial Airplanes
 
Commercial Airplanes continued to aggressively manage for profitability through the downturn in its markets while investing for long-term growth. Results for the first quarter reflect strong operating performance, slightly higher delivery volumes and increased investment in the new 7E7 airplane (see Table 6). Commercial Airplanes received U.S. and European certification for its new 777-300ER airplane with initial customer deliveries scheduled for the second quarter. Commercial Airplanes made important progress on the 7E7 and earlier this week, launched the program with an order for 50 airplanes from All Nippon Airways worth approximately $6 billion at list prices. Customer interest from other airlines around the world remains heavy. Commercial Airplanes also continued to select key partners for the 7E7 and, in early April, announced that it has selected General Electric and Rolls Royce as the engine suppliers for the airplane.
 
During the first quarter, deliveries of commercial airplanes increased 7 percent to 76 airplanes when compared with the first quarter of 2003, consisting of a higher proportion of single-aisle airplane deliveries. Revenues fell by 6 percent to $5.3 billion reflecting lower airplane services and used aircraft sales volume. Operating earnings totaled $352 million and operating margins increased to 6.6 percent as Commercial Airplanes continued to focus on reducing costs and improving asset utilization across its operations.
 
Commercial Airplanes captured 36 gross orders during the quarter, including key orders from Nippon Cargo Airlines, Cathay Pacific Airways and WestJet. Contractual backlog totaled $62.2 billion at quarter-end compared with $63.9 billion at the end of 2003.
 
Boeing Capital Corporation
 
During the first quarter, Boeing Capital Corporation (BCC) continued implementation of its new strategy to create value by supporting the operations of Boeing's business units while reducing risk. Earnings increased as customer-financing portfolio growth moderated and market conditions stabilized (see Table 7).
 
First-quarter revenues rose by 8 percent to $307 million reflecting modest year-on-year portfolio growth and gains on asset sales. Pre-tax income rose markedly to $87 million, driven by gains on asset sales and a sharp reduction in non-cash charges compared with the first quarter of 2003.
 
BCC's customer-financing portfolio was unchanged in the first quarter at $12.2 billion. New business volume of approximately $0.3 billion was offset by $0.3 billion of asset run-off and depreciation. The allowance for losses on finance leases and notes receivable at the end of the first quarter was 4.7 percent, unchanged from the end of 2003. Leverage, as measured by the ratio of debt-to-equity, was a conservative 4.4-to-1, down from 4.7-to-1 at the end of 2003.
 
At quarter end, approximately 80 percent of BCC's portfolio was related to Boeing products and services (primarily commercial aircraft), up slightly from the end of 2003. On January 15, 2004, BCC announced it is assessing strategic options with regard to the future of its Commercial Financing Services unit, including the possible sale of the unit. At the end of March 2004, Commercial Financing Services assets totaled $2.2 billion.
 
"Other" Segment
 
The "Other" segment consists primarily of the Connexion by Boeing
SM
and Boeing Technology units, as well as certain results related to the consolidation of all business units. For the first quarter, losses from operations were $104 million, slightly lower than the first quarter of 2003 as a result of higher spending on Connexion by Boeing
SM
more than offset by reduced customer-financing charges.
 
During the quarter, Connexion by Boeing
SM
continued to prepare for launch of commercial service starting with Lufthansa in early May 2004. The Company also announced that it would scale back its investment in its Air Traffic Management business and consolidate the unit into Boeing Technology to improve operating efficiencies.
 
Outlook
 
The Company is raising its 2004 outlook for earnings to reflect strong performance at Integrated Defense Systems and Commercial Airplanes, lower pension expense as a result of the first-quarter pension contribution and the impact of the federal tax refund. The Company is also increasing its 2005 outlook for revenues and earnings to reflect expected higher deliveries of commercial airplanes as well as lower than previously anticipated pension expense (see Table 8).
 
Strength in defense and intelligence markets is expected to drive solid Company revenue and earnings growth in 2004 and 2005. Commercial airplane markets are slowly improving with delivery recovery expected in 2006. And the
Company continues to develop the 7E7 for first delivery into stronger markets in 2008. Market conditions for commercial space are expected to remain challenging.
 
The airline industry environment remains mixed with trends varying between carriers and regions. A number of low-cost carriers continue to gain market share, remain profitable and order new airplanes. There have been encouraging signs that the global economy and air traffic are recovering and that airline interest is increasing. Commercial Airplanes is experiencing increased demand for 737s as airline passengers continue to value frequent, direct routes and airlines focus on reducing costs. As a result, the Company expects airplane deliveries to increase slightly in 2005 before a further increase in 2006.
 
The Company expects deliveries in 2004 to be approximately 285 airplanes. In 2005, deliveries are now expected to total approximately 300 airplanes, up slightly from previous expectations that it would be the same as 2004, driven by increased demand for single-aisle airplanes. The delivery forecast is essentially sold out for 2004 and 92 percent sold for 2005. The increase in deliveries is reflected in improved Commercial Airplanes revenue and operating earnings guidance ranges. Demand for aircraft spares has recently improved and is expected to slowly strengthen as this market recovers more fully in 2005.
 
The Company expects its defense and non-commercial space businesses to continue performing well in their growing markets. IDS anticipates continued growth and performance in its Network Systems segment, driven by captured programs such as Future Combat Systems and its leading position in missile defense, homeland security, intelligence, and DoD network-centric programs. The Aircraft and Weapon Systems and Support Systems segments are also expected to continue delivering strong results, though margins are expected to be lower than the first quarter. The Company's outlook contemplates signing in 2004 the proposed contract to deliver 100 767 tankers to the U.S. Air Force.
 
The Company's 2004 revenue outlook is unchanged at +/- $52 billion. Revenue guidance for 2005 is increased from between $55 billion and $57 billion to between $57 billion and $59 billion.
 
Earnings-per-share guidance for 2004 is increased from between $1.75 and $1.95 per share to between $2.05 and $2.25 per share. For 2005, earnings-per-share guidance is increased from between $1.95 and $2.20 per share to between $2.20 and $2.45 per share.
 
The Company's forecast for operating cash flow in 2004 and 2005 is unchanged. Guidance for 2004 is $3.0 to $3.5 billion, which now includes the recent $1 billion contribution to the Company's pension plans not previously included in our forecast. The cash flow forecast for 2005 remains greater than $4.5 billion. During the guidance period, the Company will continue to evaluate making additional
discretionary payments to its pension plans. The Company expects capital expenditures in 2004 to be approximately $1 billion and expenditures in 2005 to be approximately $1.5 billion.
 
The Company expects research and development expenses to be between 3.25 and 3.75 percent of revenue in 2004 and between 3.5 and 4.0 percent in 2005 as spending increases on the 7E7 program.
 
 
 
Non-GAAP Measure Disclosure
 
The following definitions are provided for non-GAAP (Generally Accepted Accounting Principles) measures (indicated by an asterisk *) used by the Company within this disclosure. The Company does not intend for the information to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the related GAAP measures. Other companies may define the measures differently.
Adjusted Financial Results
 
The Company reports adjusted earnings per share, earnings from operations, and operating margins excluding SFAS 142 goodwill charges. Management believes that because goodwill is a non-cash charge related to past acquisitions, adjusting the Company's financial results to exclude goodwill provides investors with a clearer perspective on the current underlying operating performance of the Company. Management uses earnings from operations excluding goodwill charges as an internal measure of business operating performance.
 
Adjusted Earnings per Share
 
The Company defines adjusted earnings per share as GAAP earnings per share less SFAS 142 goodwill charges. Table 1 reconciles GAAP EPS and adjusted EPS.
 
Adjusted Earnings from Operations (or Adjusted Operating Losses)
 
The Company defines adjusted earnings from operations as GAAP earnings from operations less SFAS 142 goodwill charges. Tables 2, 5, and 6 reconcile GAAP earnings from operations and adjusted earnings from operations.
 
Adjusted Operating Margin
 
The Company defines adjusted operating margin as the adjusted earnings from operations (defined above) divided by revenues. Tables 2, 5, and 6 reconcile GAAP operating margins and adjusted operating margins.
 
Free Cash Flow
 
Free cash flow is defined as GAAP operating cash flow less capital expenditures for property, plant, and equipment, net. GAAP operating cash flow includes inter-company cash received from the sale of aircraft by Commercial Airplanes for customers who receive financing from BCC. In the first quarter of 2004, the contribution to operating cash flow related to customer deliveries of Boeing airplanes financed by BCC totaled approximately $0.3 billion, compared with $0.3 billion for the first quarter of 2003.
 
GAAP investing cash flow includes a reduction in cash for the intercompany cash paid by BCC to Commercial Airplanes, as well as an increase in cash for amounts received from third parties, primarily customers paying amounts due on aircraft financing transactions. The majority of BCC's customer financing is funded by debt and cash flow from BCC operations.
 
Management believes free cash flow provides investors with an important perspective on the cash available for shareholders, debt repayment, and acquisitions after making the capital investments required to support ongoing business operations and long term value creation. Free cash flow does not represent the residual cash
flow available for discretionary expenditures as it excludes certain mandatory expenditures such as repayment of maturing debt. Management uses free cash flow internally to assess both business performance and overall liquidity. Table 3 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and free cash flow.
 
 
Certain statements in this report may constitute "forward-looking" statements within the meaning of the Private Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions as to future events that may not prove to be accurate. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak only as of the date they were made and we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise. Our actual results and future trends may differ materially depending on a variety of factors, including the continued operation, viability and growth of major airline customers and non-airline customers (such as the U.S. Government); adverse developments in the value of collateral securing customer and other financings; the occurrence of any significant collective bargaining labor dispute; our successful execution of internal performance plans, price escalation, production rate increases and decreases (including any reduction in or termination of an aircraft product), acquisition and divestiture plans, and other cost-reduction and productivity efforts; charges from any future SFAS No. 142 review; an adverse development in rating agency credit ratings or assessments; the actual outcomes of certain pending sales campaigns and U.S. and foreign government procurement activities, including the timing of procurement of tankers by the U.S. Department of Defense (DoD); the cyclical nature of some of our businesses; unanticipated financial market changes which may impact pension plan assumptions; domestic and international competition in the defense, space and commercial areas; continued integration of acquired businesses; performance issues with key suppliers, subcontractors and customers; factors that could result in significant and prolonged disruption to air travel worldwide (including future terrorist attacks); any additional impacts from the attacks of September 11, 2001; global trade policies; worldwide political stability; domestic and international economic conditions; price escalation; the outcome of political and legal processes, including uncertainty regarding government funding of certain programs; changing priorities or reductions in the U.S. Government or foreign government defense and space budgets; termination of government or commercial contracts due to unilateral government or customer action or failure to perform; legal, financial and governmental risks related to international transactions; legal proceedings; tax settlements with the IRS; and other economic, political and technological risks and uncertainties. Additional information regarding these factors is contained in our SEC filings, including, without limitation, our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2003.
 
Contact:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20040504122506.txt.gz
TIME:20040504122506
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5. Other Events
 
On May 3, 2004, The Boeing Company issued a press release announcing an increase in its quarterly dividend, the resumption of its authorized share repurchase program and that it is considering a near-term contribution to its pension plan. The text of that press release is filed as Exhibit 99.1.
 
Item 7. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
(a) Not applicable
(b) Not applicable
(c) Exhibits
99.1 Press release issued May 3, 2004.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
Boeing World Headquarters
100 N. Riverside
Chicago, IL 60606-1596
www.boeing.com
 
 
Boeing Increases Quarterly Dividend; Resumes Share Repurchase Program
 
CHICAGO, May 3, 2004The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] announced today that the company's Board of Directors approved a quarterly dividend increase of more than 17.5 percent and said the company will resume its authorized share repurchase program. Additionally, the company reconfirmed that it is considering a near-term contribution of up to an additional $1 billion to its pension plan.
 
The dividend increase of 3 cents per share lifts the company's quarterly dividend to 20 cents per share, from its current level of 17 cents per share. The increased dividend is payable June 11, 2004, to shareholders of record at the close of business on May 21, 2004.
 
The share repurchase program was authorized by the company's Board of Directors on December 11, 2000. Boeing halted the program after September 11, 2001. Of the 85 million authorized shares, 44 million remain available for repurchase.
 
The number of shares to be repurchased and the timing of such purchases will be based on the level of cash balances, general business conditions and other factors, including alternative investment activities.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20040524152051.txt.gz
TIME:20040524152051
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5. Other Events
 
On May 24, 2004, Boeing Capital Corporation, a wholly-owned subsidiary of the Boeing Company, issued a press release announcing the sale of its Commercial Financial Services business to GE Commercial Finance, a business-to-business financial services unit of General Electric. The text of that press release is filed as Exhibit 99.1.
 
Item 7. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
(a) Not applicable
(b) Not applicable
(c) Exhibits
99.1 Press release issued May 24, 2004.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
B C C
OEING
APITAL
ORPORATION
500 Naches Ave. SW
Renton, WA 98055
www.boeing.com/bcc
 
Boeing Capital Announces Sale of Commercial Finance Unit to GE Commercial Finance
 
SEATTLE, May 24, 2004  Boeing Capital Corporation (BCC), a wholly owned subsidiary of The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA], announced today it has entered into an agreement to sell its Commercial Financial Services business to GE Commercial Finance, the business-to-business financial services unit of General Electric [NYSE: GE]. The transaction includes approximately $2 billion in assets.
 
Under the terms of the agreement, BCC will receive a premium above net asset value at closing for the sale of the business. The all-cash transaction is expected to close during the second quarter of 2004.
 
"We are extremely pleased with the agreement that we have reached with GE Commercial Finance. This further advances our strategic priority to support the sale of Boeing products and services by arranging, structuring or providing financing. While the commercial finance business has been a solid contributor to our success, we believe it will be better positioned for growth within the GE Commercial Finance portfolio," said BCC President Walt Skowronski.
 
"The transaction will enhance both cash flow and earnings by generating more than $1.7 billion in deployable cash after taxes and expenses," said Skowronski. "The proceeds will be used to fund a combination of debt repayment, reinvestment and dividends to our parent. The transaction is projected to generate a modest gain upon closing."
 
"This agreement brings us over 170 clients, and we look forward to doing a terrific job for them," said Mike Neal, president and CEO, GE Commercial Finance. "This acquisition of a seasoned, balanced portfolio is very much in line with our growth plans for 2004."
 
BCC's Commercial Financial Services unit provides lease and loan financing for a variety of commercial assets, including business aircraft, machine tools, marine vessels and construction equipment. The unit currently has approximately 50 employees.
 
After the transaction is completed, BCC will have a customer financing portfolio of approximately $10 billion, primarily consisting of Boeing commercial aircraft.
 
Headquartered in Seattle, Boeing Capital is made up of two major groups: Aircraft Financial Services, which facilitates, structures and provides financing for Boeing commercial aircraft; and Space and Defense Financial Services, which arranges and structures financial solutions for Boeing customers for military equipment, satellites and launch vehicles. Boeing is the world's leading aerospace company, with 2003 revenues of $50 billion and more than 155,000 employees worldwide.
 
GE Commercial Finance, which operates in 35 countries, has assets of over $220 billion and is headquartered in Stamford, Conn.
 
 
 
Certain statements in this press release may contain projections or "forward-looking" information (as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) that involve risk and uncertainty. The words "aim", "plan", "likely", "believe", "expect", "anticipate", "intend", "estimate", "will", "should", "could", "may", and other expressions that indicate future events and trends identify forward-looking statements. These statements are not guaranties of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions as to future events that may not prove to be accurate. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what we express or forecast in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak only as of the date they were made and we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements. Our actual results and future trends may differ materially from our forward-looking statements depending on a variety of factors including our relationship with Boeing, as well as strategic decisions of Boeing relating to us, the effects of the September 11, 2001 terrorist attacks or future terrorist threats or attacks and their continuing impact on the airline industry, wars, SARS or other diseases, the capital equipment requirements of United States domestic and foreign businesses, general economic conditions, and in particular, economic conditions in the airline industry and the continued operation, viability and growth of major airline customers, capital availability and cost, changes in laws and tax benefits, the tax position of Boeing (including the applicability of the alternative minimum tax), competition from other financial institutions, our successful execution of internal operating plans, including the transition of our Long Beach, California administrative groups to Renton, Washington, defaults or bankruptcies by customers (especially airlines), adverse developments in the value of collateral or owned assets (especially aircraft), termination of aircraft manufacturing programs, regulatory uncertainties, legal proceedings and an adverse development in rating agency credit ratings or assessments.
 
Contact: Russ Young  Boeing Capital
             (425) 393-1534
 
             John Oliver  GE Commercial Finance
             (203) 357-4346  office
             (203) 984-7757  mobile


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20040728085147.txt.gz
TIME:20040728085147
EVENTS:		Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 7. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
(a) Not applicable
 
(b) Not applicable
 
(c) Exhibits
 
99.1    Press Release issued July 28, 2004.
 
Item 12. Disclosure of Results of Operations.
 
The following information is being furnished under Item 12 of Form 8-K: News Release by The Boeing Company, for the second quarter results and updated outlook as announced on July 28, 2004. The text of the release is attached as exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
Boeing Reports Quarterly Results and Raises Outlook
 
 Integrated Defense Systems delivers strong revenue growth and operating margins while Commercial Airplanes continues solid operating performance and raises delivery forecast
 
 7E7 launch and Multi-mission Maritime Aircraft win bolster growth outlook
 
Financial Highlights:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Selected Operating Highlights:
 
 
 
Table 1. Summary Financial Results
 
 
 The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] reported strong earnings growth for the second quarter of 2004 with net income of $607 million, or $0.75 per share, on revenues of $13.1 billion. Results included a $0.23 per share benefit from a federal tax refund and a $0.02 per share gain from the sale of Boeing Capital Corporation's (BCC) commercial finance portfolio, which was reported as discontinued operations. This compares with a net loss of $192 million, or $0.24 per share, on revenues of $12.7 billion in the second quarter of 2003.
CHICAGO, July 28, 2004
 
"Boeing delivered strong results in the second quarter as we continued to execute well in our core businesses and invest for growth," said Boeing President and CEO Harry Stonecipher. "Our Integrated Defense Systems business turned in another quarter of strong top-line growth and profitability while adding to its large backlog by winning the $3.9 billion MMA order from the U.S. Navy. Commercial Airplanes continued to deliver solid operating margins and made tremendous progress launching the 7E7 program with four airlines while receiving proposal acceptances from numerous additional customers. With our strong performance and improving outlook, we are raising our financial guidance for 2004 and 2005."
 
The Company's second-quarter earnings from operations totaled $0.6 billion (see Table 2), reflecting strong performance and growth in the Company's defense businesses and higher operating earnings at its Commercial Airplanes unit.
 
Table 2. Earnings from Operations & Margins
 
 
Pre-tax expense for share-based plans totaled $164 million in the second quarter, reducing earnings per share by $0.13. These expenses are non-cash and are attributable to the Company's equity compensation plans. Deferred stock compensation expense primarily attributable to vested and undistributed performance shares, which is separately determined based on the quarterly change in the Company's stock price, reduced second-quarter earnings by $0.07 per share as the Company's stock price rose significantly during the period.
 
The Company generated $2.4 billion of cash flow during the quarter before making a discretionary cash contribution to its pension plans totaling $1.0 billion (pre-tax). Operating cash flow for the second quarter, after pension contributions, was $1.4 billion (see Table 3). This latest pension contribution brings total discretionary contributions for the first half of 2004 to $2 billion.
 
Table 3. Cash Flow
 
 
The Company's cash balance at quarter-end totaled $6.2 billion, up from $4.0 billion at the end of the first quarter, due to the sale of Boeing Capital's commercial finance portfolio to GE Capital and strong working capital performance (see Table 4). Boeing Capital debt fell $0.3 billion reflecting the unit's announced strategy to reduce financing-portfolio growth and risk while the Company's debt was unchanged at $4.7 billion. Boeing Capital announced that it will use a portion of the proceeds from the portfolio sale to redeem approximately $1 billion of debt. The redemption was completed on July 26 and will be reflected in third-quarter results.
 
Table 4. Cash and Debt Balances
 
 
Segment Results
 
Integrated Defense Systems
 
During the second quarter, Integrated Defense Systems (IDS) delivered strong revenue growth and operating margins in its large defense and intelligence businesses. IDS revenues increased 9 percent to $7.2 billion, driven by growth in three of its four business segments (see Table 5). IDS delivered excellent second-quarter operating margins of 9.7 percent, reflecting outstanding program execution. Margins were up from a loss in the second quarter of 2003, which included a significant charge in the commercial launch and satellite businesses. IDS continued to strengthen its outstanding track record of capturing new business by partnering with Boeing Commercial Airplanes to win the U.S. Navy's Multi-mission Maritime Aircraft contract totaling $3.9 billion.
 
Table 5. Integrated Defense Systems Operating Results
 
 
Aircraft and Weapon Systems continued to build on its record of solid growth and excellent profitability. Revenues rose 5 percent to $2.7 billion on increased F/A-18, JDAM, and rotorcraft volume. Performance remained outstanding with operating margins of 14.4 percent driven by very strong execution on its production programs.
 
Network Systems delivered rapid growth and solid performance in the second quarter. Revenues rose 22 percent to $2.7 billion on increased activity in Future Combat Systems, Missile Defense and Proprietary programs. Operating margins were 8.3 percent as higher revenues and favorable program mix produced solid performance across its programs.
 
Support Systems continued its strong growth and excellent profitability during the quarter. Revenues increased 8 percent to $1.1 billion on significant increases in supply chain services, life-cycle customer support, and training systems and services. Operating margins grew to 12.5 percent on the higher revenue and strong program performance.
 
Launch and Orbital Systems' second-quarter results were affected by the continued weakness in commercial space markets and cost growth in its commercial satellite business. Revenues fell 13 percent to $0.7 billion on lower satellite volume which offset one additional Delta II launch. Operating losses totaled $50 million reflecting cost growth on certain satellite programs partially offset by continued profitability on its NASA programs.
 
In addition to the MMA program, IDS won an important follow-on order for F/A-22 Raptors as well as numerous orders throughout the Aerospace Support business. At the end of the quarter, IDS contractual backlog totaled $41.2 billion, down slightly from $41.6 billion at the end of the first quarter. Unobligated backlog grew to $46.1 billion at the end of the quarter primarily due to the MMA contract win. Total IDS backlog, comprised of contractual and unobligated, was $87.3 billion.
 
Boeing Commercial Airplanes
 
Commercial Airplanes continued to aggressively manage for profitability while investing for long-term growth. Results for the second quarter reflect strong operating performance and increased investment in the new 7E7 airplane (see Table 6). Commercial Airplanes made important progress on the 7E7, launching the program in April with 50 airplanes from All Nippon Airways. Air New Zealand announced its selection of the 7E7 and 777 in May, and Blue Panorama and First Choice Airways selected the 7E7 in early July. Commercial Airplanes selected General Electric and
 
Rolls Royce as the engine suppliers for the airplane. Customer interest in the 7E7 remains very strong with accepted proposals from airlines around the world for over 200 airplanes.
 
Table 6. Commercial Airplanes Operating Results
 
 
Commercial Airplanes' deliveries increased to 75 airplanes during the second quarter, but revenues fell by 3 percent to $5.7 billion reflecting a higher proportion of 737 deliveries. Operating earnings totaled $382 million and operating margins increased to 6.7 percent as Commercial Airplanes continued to deliver improved cost performance that offset lower revenues and higher development expenditures for the 7E7 program.
 
Commercial Airplanes captured 46 gross orders during the quarter, including key orders from Air Tran Airways, Korean Air, China Airlines and GOL Airlines. Commercial Airplanes also won orders for 14 747 special freighter modifications and kits. Contractual backlog totaled $62.2 billion at quarter-end, unchanged from the end of the first quarter.
 
Boeing Capital Corporation
 
Boeing Capital Corporation continued implementation of its new strategy to create value by supporting the operations of Boeing's business units while reducing risk. During the second quarter, BCC announced the sale of its commercial finance unit to GE Capital for approximately $2 billion. All quarterly, year-to-date, and prior period results for the commercial finance unit are now reported as discontinued operations.
 
Second-quarter revenues remained essentially flat, while pre-tax income fell to $15 million as a result of the write down of an equity investment and lower gains on asset sales when compared with the second quarter of 2003 (see Table 7).
 
Table 7. Boeing Capital Corporation Operating Results
 
 
In addition to the sale of the commercial finance unit, normal portfolio run-off and depreciation offset new business volume and resulted in a customer-financing portfolio of $10.0 billion at the end of the second quarter. The allowance for losses on finance leases and notes receivable at the end of the second quarter remained relatively stable at 5.1 percent, up slightly from 4.9 percent at the end of the first quarter. Leverage, as measured by the ratio of debt-to-equity, was 4.7-to-1, up from 4.4-to-1 at the end of the first quarter.
 
At quarter-end, nearly all of BCC's portfolio was related to Boeing products and services (primarily commercial aircraft), up from 80 percent at the end of the first quarter, due to the sale of the commercial finance unit.
 
"Other" Segment
 
The "Other" segment consists primarily of the Connexion by Boeing
SM
and Boeing Technology units, as well as certain results related to the consolidation of all business units. For the second quarter, losses from operations were $124 million, up from the second quarter of 2003 as a result of higher spending on Connexion by Boeing
SM
and expenses associated with exiting certain real estate leases. During the quarter, Connexion by Boeing
SM
successfully launched commercial service with Lufthansa.
 
Outlook
 
The Company is raising its 2004 outlook for earnings to reflect the additional tax refund recognized during the second quarter. The Company is also increasing its 2005 outlook for earnings to reflect expected higher deliveries of commercial airplanes as well as lower than previously anticipated pension and retiree medical expense (see Table 8).
 
Defense and intelligence markets are expected to remain strong in 2004 and 2005. Conditions in the commercial space market are expected to remain challenging. Commercial airplane markets are slowly improving with higher deliveries forecast for 2005 and further delivery recovery expected in 2006. Development of the 7E7 is timed for delivery into stronger markets in 2008. These market conditions, combined with a strong focus on operational execution, underpin the Company's outlook for solid revenue and earnings growth.
 
The airline industry environment remains mixed with trends varying between carriers and regions. A number of low-cost carriers continue to gain market share, remain profitable and order new airplanes. There have been encouraging signs that the global economy and air traffic are recovering and that airline interest is increasing, though higher fuel prices have dampened airline profits, particularly in the US. Commercial Airplanes is experiencing increased demand for 737s as airline passengers continue to value frequent, direct routes, and airlines focus on reducing costs. As a result, the Company expects airplane deliveries to increase in 2005, followed by a further gradual increase in 2006. Demand for aircraft spares continues to improve and is expected to strengthen as this market recovers more fully in 2005.
 
Commercial Airplanes' delivery forecast for 2004 is unchanged at approximately 285 airplanes. The delivery forecast for 2005 has been increased from approximately 300 airplanes to between 315 and 320 airplanes, driven by increased demand for single-aisle airplanes. The delivery forecast is essentially sold out for 2004 and 92-percent sold for 2005 at the bottom end of the range. The increase in deliveries is reflected in improved Commercial Airplanes revenue and operating earnings guidance ranges.
 
The Company expects its defense and non-commercial space businesses to continue performing well in their growing markets. IDS anticipates continued growth and performance in its Network Systems segment, driven by programs such as Future Combat Systems, Multi-mission Maritime Aircraft and the Company's leading position in missile defense, intelligence, and DoD network-centric programs. The Aircraft and Weapon Systems and Support Systems segments also are expected to continue delivering strong results. The Company's outlook contemplates signing the proposed contract to deliver 100 767 tankers to the U.S. Air Force in 2005.
 
The Company's 2004 revenue outlook is unchanged at +/- $52 billion. Revenue guidance for 2005 is unchanged at between $57 billion and $59 billion and reflects higher Commercial Airplanes revenues partially offset by lower BCC revenues due to the sale of the commercial finance portfolio.
 
Earnings-per-share guidance for 2004 is increased from between $2.05 and $2.25 per share to between $2.25 and $2.45 per share. For 2005, earnings-per-share guidance is increased from between $2.20 and $2.45 per share to between $2.35 and $2.60 per share. Costs totaling $52 million, or $0.04 per share, for the retirement of approximately $1 billion of BCC debt (related to BCC's former commercial finance portfolio) that was redeemed at a premium on July 26, 2004, will be reflected in Boeing's third-quarter 2004 results.
 
The Company's forecast for operating cash flow in 2004 remains in the range of $3.0 to $3.5 billion and now includes $2 billion in discretionary contributions to the Company's pension plans made in the first and second quarters as well as the tax refunds. The Company now expects operating cash flow for 2005 to be greater than $5.0 billion, up from greater than $4.5 billion previously. During the guidance period, the Company will continue to evaluate making additional discretionary payments to its pension plans. The Company expects capital expenditures in 2004 to be approximately $1 billion and expenditures in 2005 to be approximately $1.5 billion.
 
The Company expects research and development investment between 3.25 and 3.75 percent of revenue in 2004 and between 3.5 and 4.0 percent in 2005 as investment increases on the 7E7 program.
 
Table 8.FinancialOutlook
 
 
Non-GAAP Measure Disclosure
 
The following definitions are provided for non-GAAP (Generally Accepted Accounting Principles) measures (indicated by an asterisk *) used by the Company within this disclosure. The Company does not intend for the information to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the related GAAP measures. Other companies may define the measures differently.
 
Adjusted Financial Results
 
The Company reports adjusted earnings per share, earnings from operations, and operating margins excluding SFAS 142 goodwill charges. Management believes that because goodwill is a non-cash charge related to past acquisitions, adjusting the Company's financial results to exclude goodwill provides investors with a clearer perspective on the current underlying operating performance of the Company. Management uses earnings from operations excluding goodwill charges as an internal measure of business operating performance.
 
Adjusted Earnings per Share
 
The Company defines adjusted earnings per share as GAAP earnings per share less SFAS 142 goodwill charges. Table 1 reconciles GAAP EPS and adjusted EPS.
 
Adjusted Earnings from Operations (or Adjusted Operating Losses)
 
The Company defines adjusted earnings from operations as GAAP earnings from operations less SFAS 142 goodwill charges. Tables 2, 5, and 6 reconcile GAAP earnings from operations and adjusted earnings from operations.
 
Adjusted Operating Margin
 
The Company defines adjusted operating margin as the adjusted earnings from operations (defined above) divided by revenues. Tables 2, 5, and 6 reconcile GAAP operating margins and adjusted operating margins.
 
Free Cash Flow
 
Free cash flow is defined as GAAP operating cash flow less capital expenditures for property, plant, and equipment, net. GAAP operating cash flow includes inter-company cash received from the sale of aircraft by Commercial Airplanes for customers who receive financing from BCC. In the second quarter of 2004, the contribution to
 
operating cash flow related to customer deliveries of Boeing airplanes financed by BCC totaled approximately $0.1 billion, compared with $0.5 billion for the second quarter of 2003.
 
GAAP investing cash flow includes a reduction in cash for the intercompany cash paid by BCC to Commercial Airplanes, as well as an increase in cash for amounts received from third parties, primarily customers paying amounts due on aircraft financing transactions. The majority of BCC's customer financing is funded by debt and cash flow from BCC operations.
 
Management believes free cash flow provides investors with an important perspective on the cash available for shareholders, debt repayment, and acquisitions after making the capital investments required to support ongoing business operations and long term value creation. Free cash flow does not represent the residual cash flow available for discretionary expenditures as it excludes certain mandatory expenditures such as repayment of maturing debt. Management uses free cash flow internally to assess both business performance and overall liquidity. Table 3 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and free cash flow.
 
 
Certain statements in this report may constitute "forward-looking" statements within the meaning of the Private Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions as to future events that may not prove to be accurate. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak only as of the date they were made and we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise. Our actual results and future trends may differ materially depending on a variety of factors, including the continued operation, viability and growth of major airline customers and non-airline customers (such as the U.S. Government); adverse developments in the value of collateral securing customer and other financings; the occurrence of any significant collective bargaining labor dispute; our successful execution of internal performance plans, price escalation, production rate increases and decreases (including any reduction in or termination of an aircraft product), acquisition and divestiture plans, and other cost-reduction and productivity efforts; charges from any future SFAS No. 142 review; an adverse development in rating agency credit ratings or assessments; the actual outcomes of certain pending sales campaigns including the 717 program and the launch of the 7E7 program and U.S. and foreign government procurement activities, including the timing of procurement of tankers by the U.S. Department of Defense (DoD); the cyclical nature of some of our businesses; unanticipated financial market changes which may impact pension plan assumptions; domestic and international competition in the defense, space and commercial areas; continued integration of acquired businesses; performance issues with key suppliers, subcontractors and customers; significant and prolonged disruption to air travel worldwide (including future terrorist attacks); global trade policies; worldwide political stability; domestic and international economic conditions; price escalation; the outcome of political and legal processes, changing priorities or reductions in the U.S. Government or foreign government defense and space budgets; termination of government or commercial contracts due to unilateral government or customer action or failure to perform; legal, financial and governmental risks related to international transactions; legal proceedings; tax settlements with the IRS; and other economic, political and technological risks and uncertainties. Additional information regarding these factors is contained in our SEC filings, including, without limitation, our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2003 and Form 10-Q for the period ending March 31, 2004.
 
Cxxxx
 
Contact:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20041021165743.txt.gz
TIME:20041021165743
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
Item 8.01. Other Events
 
On October 21, 2004, The Boeing Company issued a press release, a copy of which is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
(a) Not applicable
 
(b) Not applicable
 
(c) Exhibits
 
99.1    Press Release issued October 21, 2004.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
Boeing Supporting SEC Information Request for Pension Accounting
 
CHICAGO, Oct. 21, 2004  The Boeing Company confirmed today that it has received a request for information from the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) in connection with an inquiry related to accounting for pension and other post-retirement benefit plans.
 
Boeing is cooperating with the SEC's inquiry, which also involves several other companies. The SEC has stated that this inquiry should not be construed as an indication by the Commission or its staff that any violation of laws has occurred, nor should it be considered a reflection upon any person, entity or security.
 
Boeing believes that its accounting policies and practices are in accordance with the highest standards and are accurate and complete. However, due to the early stage of this matter, the company is unable to predict what conclusions, if any, the SEC will reach.
 
 
 
 
C2084
Contact: Anne Eisele or John Dern (312) 544-2002


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20041027074409.txt.gz
TIME:20041027074409
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Disclosure of Results of Operations.
 
The following information is being furnished under Item 12 of Form 8-K: News Release by The Boeing Company, for the third quarter results and updated outlook as announced on October 27, 2004. The text of the release is attached as exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
(a) Not applicable
 
(b) Not applicable
 
(c) Exhibits
 
99.1    Press Release issued October 27, 2004.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
Boeing World Headquarters
100 N. Riverside
Chicago, IL 60606-1596
www.boeing.com
 
Boeing Reports Third-Quarter Results and Raises Forecast for 2004
 
 Double-digit revenue and earnings growth at Integrated Defense Systems and solid performance at Commercial Airplanes reflect focus on execution
 
 7E7 program on track with strong customer interest
 
Financial Highlights:
 
 
 
 
Selected Operating Highlights:
 
 
 
 
 
 The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] reported strong revenue and earnings growth for the third quarter of 2004 with net income of $456 million, or $0.56 per share, on revenues of $13.2 billion. Results included a $0.02 per share gain related to the sale of Boeing Capital Corporation's (BCC) commercial finance unit (reported as discontinued operations), a $0.04 per share charge for retiring $1 billion of BCC debt, and a $0.14 per share contribution from state tax settlements and other adjustments from prior tax years. This compares with net income of $256 million, or $0.32 per share, on revenues of $12.2 billion in the third quarter of 2003.
CHICAGO, October 27, 2004
 
"Boeing's strong third quarter results reflect our relentless focus on business execution, investment for future growth and sustained value creation," said Boeing President and CEO Harry Stonecipher. "Our Integrated Defense Systems business again delivered strong revenue growth and outstanding profitability, and made significant progress on key programs such as Future Combat Systems and Ground-based Midcourse Defense. Commercial Airplanes generated another quarter of solid performance and continues to experience unprecedented customer interest in the 7E7. Our cash flow remains very strong and we're on track to meet our operating and financial goals for 2004."
 
The Company's third quarter earnings from operations increased 20 percent to $0.5 billion (see Table 2), reflecting strong growth and profitability in the Company's defense and intelligence businesses and higher operating earnings at its Commercial Airplanes unit.
 
 
Pre-tax expense for share-based plans totaled $166 million in the third quarter, reducing earnings per share by $0.13. These expenses are non-cash and are attributable to the Company's equity compensation plans. Deferred stock
 
compensation expense primarily attributable to vested and undistributed performance shares, which is separately determined based on the quarterly change in the Company's stock price, increased third-quarter earnings by less than $0.01 per share.
 
The Company generated $2.3 billion of cash flow during the quarter before making a discretionary cash contribution to its pension plans totaling $1.6 billion (pre-tax). Operating cash flow for the third quarter, after pension contributions, was $0.7 billion (see Table 3). This investment in pensions brings total contributions for 2004 to $3.6 billion as the Company significantly improved the funded status of its plans.
 
 
The Company's cash balance at quarter-end totaled $4.3 billion, down from $6.2 billion at the end of the second quarter (see Table 4). The change in cash balance was due primarily to the $1.6 billion pension contribution and the redemption of $1 billion of Boeing Capital debt. In addition the Company invested $1.3 billion of cash into a portfolio of high-quality fixed income securities which are classified as "Short-term investments" and "Investments." The Company repurchased 2.2 million shares in the quarter for $115 million. Boeing's debt was unchanged at $4.7 billion; Boeing Capital debt was reduced by $1.3 billion, primarily reflecting the $1 billion redemption.
 
 
Segment Results
 
Integrated Defense Systems
 
During the third quarter, Integrated Defense Systems (IDS) generated double-digit revenue growth and excellent operating margins in its large defense and intelligence businesses. IDS revenues increased 13 percent to $8.3 billion, driven by growth in its Network Systems and Support Systems segments (see Table 5). IDS produced third quarter operating margins of 9.9 percent, reflecting outstanding program execution across most of its businesses. Margins were up significantly from the third quarter of 2003 as defense and intelligence program results offset cost growth on commercial satellite programs.
 
Table 5. Integrated Defense Systems Operating Results
 
 
Aircraft and Weapon Systems delivered another quarter of solid growth and excellent profitability. Revenues rose 4 percent to $3.1 billion on increased C-17, C-40, F/A-22, F/A-18 and rotorcraft volume which offset lower T-45 and JDAM deliveries and the cancellation of the Comanche program. Performance remained outstanding with operating margins of 15.7 percent driven by very strong execution on its production programs and the planned reduction in spending on international tanker programs.
 
Network Systems generated rapid growth and solid performance in the third quarter. Revenues rose 39 percent to $3.2 billion on increased activity in Future Combat Systems, Missile Defense, Intelligence, and Airborne Command and Control programs. Operating margins were 9.4 percent, up significantly from the third quarter of 2003, as higher revenues and strong execution produced solid performance across its programs.
 
Support Systems continued to deliver strong growth and excellent profitability on its business base. Revenues increased 7 percent to $1.1 billion on significant increases in supply chain services, life-cycle customer support, and training systems and services which offset lower contractor logistical support volume. Operating margins grew to 16.2 percent on the higher revenue and strong program performance.
 
Launch and Orbital Systems' third quarter results were affected by the continued weakness in commercial space markets and cost growth in its commercial satellite business. Revenues fell 14 percent to $0.8 billion on lower satellite volume and one less Delta IV launch. Operating losses totaled $153 million reflecting cost growth on certain satellite programs partially offset by continued profitability on NASA programs.
 
At the end of the quarter, IDS's contractual backlog totaled $37.5 billion, down from $41.2 billion at the end of the second quarter mainly due to sales on multi-year contracts that were awarded in prior periods. Unobligated backlog grew to $52.3 billion at the end of the quarter primarily due to a $6 billion order to accelerate and extend the Future Combat Systems program. Total IDS backlog, comprised of contractual and unobligated, increased to $90 billion, up from $87 billion at the end of the second quarter.
 
Boeing Commercial Airplanes
 
Commercial Airplanes continued to aggressively manage for profitability while investing for long-term growth. Results for the third quarter reflect solid operating performance and increased investment in the new 7E7 airplane (see Table 6). Customer interest in the 7E7 remains very strong with firm orders for 52 airplanes and accepted proposals from airlines around the world.
 
 
Commercial Airplanes' deliveries increased to 67 airplanes during the third quarter, but revenues fell by 8 percent to $4.6 billion reflecting a higher proportion of 737 deliveries. Operating earnings totaled $168 million and operating margins increased to 3.6 percent as Commercial Airplanes continued to deliver improved cost performance offset by lower revenues and higher investment on the 7E7 program. Margins in the third quarter of 2003 were impacted by a charge for the planned shutdown of the 757 program.
 
Commercial Airplanes booked 114 gross orders during the quarter, including 7E7 launch orders from All Nippon Airways and Air New Zealand, and significant 737, 747 and 777 orders from Turkish Airlines, Air China Cargo and Emirates Airlines. Contractual backlog totaled $68.2 billion at quarter-end, up from $62.2 billion at the end of the second quarter.
 
Boeing Capital Corporation
 
Boeing Capital Corporation continued implementation of its new strategy to create value by supporting the operations of Boeing's business units while reducing portfolio risk. Third quarter revenues were $253 million, down from the third quarter of 2003 due to lower new business volume in 2004. Pre-tax income totaled $60 million as gains on asset sales and a favorable settlement with Hawaiian Airlines offset a charge to impair a preferred stock investment, as well as $52 million of expenses associated with the $1 billion debt redemption (see Table 7).
 
 
During the quarter, normal portfolio run-off and depreciation offset new business volume. The quarter-end portfolio balance was $9.7 billion, down slightly from the end of the second quarter. The allowance for losses on finance leases and notes receivable at the end of the third quarter dropped to 4.1 percent (from 5.1 percent in the second quarter), reflecting the continued focus on reducing risk across the portfolio. Leverage, as measured by the ratio of debt-to-equity, was 4.8-to-1, up slightly from 4.7-to-1 at the end of the second quarter as the reduction in debt largely offset dividends paid by BCC to the Company.
 
At quarter-end, nearly all of BCC's portfolio was related to Boeing products and services (primarily commercial aircraft).
 
"Other" Segment
 
The "Other" segment consists primarily of the Connexion by Boeing
SM
and Boeing Technology units, as well as certain results related to the consolidation of all business units. For the third quarter, losses from operations were $145 million, up from the third quarter of 2003 as a result of continued investment in the launch of Connexion by Boeing
SM
, which began commercial service in May 2004. Connexion by Boeing
SM
has announced firm orders from six airlines for 177 aircraft.
 
Outlook
 
The Company is raising its 2004 outlook for earnings and cash flow to reflect the lower tax expense recognized during the third quarter as well as strong working capital performance (see Table 8).
 
Defense and intelligence markets are expected to remain strong in 2004 and 2005. Conditions in the commercial space market are expected to remain challenging. The global commercial airplane markets are improving with higher deliveries forecast for 2005 and further delivery recovery expected in 2006. Development of the 7E7 is timed for delivery into stronger markets in 2008. These market conditions, combined with a strong focus on operational execution, underpin the Company's outlook for solid revenue and earnings growth.
 
The airline industry environment remains mixed with trends varying between carriers and regions. A number of low-cost carriers continue to gain market share, remain profitable and order new airplanes. The global economy and air traffic trends are recovering and interest from airlines in adding capacity to handle higher traffic volume is increasing. However, higher fuel prices have dampened airline profits, particularly in the United States. Commercial Airplanes is experiencing increased demand for aircraft, especially 737s, as airline passengers continue to value frequent, direct routes and airlines focus on reducing costs. As a result, the Company expects airplane deliveries to increase in 2005, followed by a further increase in 2006. Demand for aircraft spares continues to improve and is expected to strengthen as this market recovers more fully in 2005.
 
Commercial Airplanes' delivery forecast for 2004 is unchanged at approximately 285 airplanes. The delivery forecast for 2005 is increased to approximately 320 airplanes, which is at the high end of the previous range. The delivery forecast is sold out for 2004 and essentially sold out for 2005.
 
The Company expects its defense and non-commercial space businesses to continue performing well in their growing markets. IDS anticipates continued growth and performance in its Network Systems segment, driven by programs such as Future Combat Systems, Multi-mission Maritime Aircraft and the Company's leading position in Missile Defense, Intelligence, and DoD network-centric programs. The Aircraft and Weapon Systems and Support Systems segments also are expected to continue delivering strong results. The Company's outlook contemplates signing a contract in 2005 to deliver 100 767 tankers to the U.S. Air Force.
 
The Company's 2004 revenue outlook is unchanged at +/- $52 billion. Revenue guidance for 2005 is unchanged at between $57 billion and $59 billion.
 
Earnings-per-share guidance for 2004 is increased from between $2.25 and $2.45 per share to between $2.40 and $2.60 per share mostly due to lower tax expense. Results for the first nine months of 2004 include tax refunds and adjustments totaling $0.50 per share. For 2005, earnings-per-share guidance is unchanged at between $2.35 and $2.60 per share.
 
The Company is raising its forecast for operating cash flow in 2004 to greater than $3.5 billion. The increased guidance includes $3.6 billion in discretionary contributions to the Company's pension plans made in the first three quarters of 2004, as well as tax refunds and improvements in working capital at IDS and Commercial Airplanes. The Company expects operating cash flow for 2005 to be greater than $5 billion. During the guidance period, the Company will continue to evaluate making additional discretionary payments to its pension plans. The Company expects capital expenditures in 2004 to be approximately $1 billion and expenditures in 2005 to be approximately $1.5 billion.
 
The Company expects research and development investment between 3.25 and 3.75 percent of revenue in 2004 and between 3.5 and 4.0 percent in 2005 as investment increases on the 7E7 program.
 
 
Non-GAAP Measure Disclosure
 
The following definitions are provided for non-GAAP (Generally Accepted Accounting Principles) measures (indicated by an asterisk *) used by the Company within this disclosure. The Company does not intend for the information to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the related GAAP measures. Other companies may define the measures differently.
 
Adjusted Financial Results
 
The Company reports adjusted earnings per share, earnings from operations, and operating margins excluding SFAS 142 goodwill charges. Management believes that because goodwill is a non-cash charge related to past acquisitions, adjusting the Company's financial results to exclude goodwill provides investors with a clearer perspective on the current underlying operating performance of the Company. Management uses earnings from operations excluding goodwill charges as an internal measure of business operating performance.
 
Adjusted Earnings per Share
 
The Company defines adjusted earnings per share as GAAP earnings per share less SFAS 142 goodwill charges. Table 1 reconciles GAAP EPS and adjusted EPS.
 
Adjusted Earnings from Operations (or Adjusted Operating Losses)
 
The Company defines adjusted earnings from operations as GAAP earnings from operations less SFAS 142 goodwill charges. Tables 2, 5, and 6 reconcile GAAP earnings from operations and adjusted earnings from operations.
 
Adjusted Operating Margin
 
The Company defines adjusted operating margin as the adjusted earnings from operations (defined above) divided by revenues. Tables 2, 5, and 6 reconcile GAAP operating margins and adjusted operating margins.
 
Free Cash Flow
 
Free cash flow is defined as GAAP operating cash flow less capital expenditures for property, plant, and equipment, net. GAAP operating cash flow includes inter-company cash received from the sale of aircraft by Commercial Airplanes for customers who receive financing from BCC. In the third quarter of 2004, the contribution to
 
operating cash flow related to customer deliveries of Boeing airplanes financed by BCC totaled approximately $0.1 billion, compared with $0.6 billion for the third quarter of 2003.
 
GAAP investing cash flow includes a reduction in cash for the intercompany cash paid by BCC to Commercial Airplanes, as well as an increase in cash for amounts received from third parties, primarily customers paying amounts due on aircraft financing transactions. The majority of BCC's customer financing is funded by debt and cash flow from BCC operations.
 
Management believes free cash flow provides investors with an important perspective on the cash available for shareholders, debt repayment, and acquisitions after making the capital investments required to support ongoing business operations and long-term value creation. Free cash flow does not represent the residual cash flow available for discretionary expenditures as it excludes certain mandatory expenditures such as repayment of maturing debt. Management uses free cash flow internally to assess both business performance and overall liquidity. Table 3 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and free cash flow.
 
 
 
 
Contact:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20041027173933.txt.gz
TIME:20041027173933
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
 
On October 24, 2004, the Board of Directors of The Boeing Company (the "Company"), upon the recommendation of the Governance, Organization and Nominating Committee, elected Michael S. Zafirovski, President and Chief Operating Officer of Motorola, Inc., as a new director. Mr. Zafirovski will be proposed to shareholders at the 2005 Annual Meeting of Shareholders for election as a director to serve a three-year term. No determination has been made to date as to the committees of the Board on which Mr. Zafirovski will serve. There was no arrangement or understanding between Mr. Zafirovski and any other persons pursuant to which Mr. Zafirovski was selected as a director and there are no related party transactions between Mr. Zafirovski and the Company. A copy of the Company's press release announcing the election of Mr. Zafirovski is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
Item 5.03 Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or ByLaws; Change in Fiscal Year
 
On October 24, 2004, the Board of Directors amended and restated the Company's By-Laws by increasing the number of directors from ten to eleven and adding a new section for the appointment of a designated engineer in the State of Washington. A copy of the Company's By-Laws, as amended and restated, is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.2 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
(a) Not applicable
 
(b) Not applicable
 
(c) Exhibits
 
99.1    Press Release issued October 25, 2004.
 
99.2    By-Laws, as amended and restated on October 24, 2004.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 

EXHIBIT 99.1
 
Motorola's Mike Zafirovski Elected to Boeing Board of Directors
 
The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] today announced that Mike S. Zafirovski, president and chief operating officer of Motorola, Inc., (NYSE: MOT) has been elected to the company's board of directors, effective immediately.
CHICAGO, Oct. 25, 2004 
 
"Mike's strong financial and operational background, international experience, and impressive record of community involvement make him an excellent addition to our board," said Boeing President and Chief Executive Officer Harry C. Stonecipher.
 
Zafirovski joined Motorola in June of 2000 as president and CEO of the Personal Communications Sector (wireless handsets, related-software and consumer two-way radio). He was promoted to his current position in July of 2002.
 
Prior to joining Motorola, Zafirovski had a 24-year career at the General Electric Company, including 14 years at GE Capital where he served as president and CEO of four of its businesses (autos, commercial leasing, mortgage services and insurance). In 1999 he became president and CEO of GE Lighting, reporting to the company's chairman and CEO.
 
Zafirovski holds a Bachelor of Arts degree in mathematics from Edinboro University in Pennsylvania, and an honorary doctorate degree in public service awarded to him by the same university in 2002. He also received the Ellis Island Medal of Honor in 2003. A native of Macedonia, Zafirovski and his wife Robin have three sons.
 
Chicago-based Boeing is the world's largest aerospace company, with customers in 145 countries and suppliers and partners around the world. It is the global leader in commercial jetliners, military aircraft, satellites, launch services, human space flight, missile defense, moving-platform connectivity, and network-centric solutions for defense and homeland security.
 
# # #
 
C2085
 
Contact:
Tim Neale, 312-544-2002

EXHIBIT 99.2
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
SECTION 1.
.
Annual Meetings
 
The Annual Meeting of the stockholders shall be held on such date and at such time as the Board of Directors shall determine, for the election of directors and the transaction of such other business as may come before the meeting.
 
SECTION 2. .
Special Meetings
 
A special meeting of the stockholders may be called at any time by the Board of Directors, or by stockholders holding together at least twenty-five percent of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, except as otherwise provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto.
 
SECTION 3.
.
Place of Meeting
 
All meetings of the stockholders of the Corporation shall be held at such place or places within or without the State of Delaware as may from time to time be fixed by the Board of Directors or as shall be specified or fixed in the respective notices or waivers of notice thereof.
 
SECTION 4.
.
Notice of Meetings
 
Except as otherwise required by statute and as set forth below, notice of each annual or special meeting of stockholders shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than thirty nor more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date. If the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, notice of each special meeting of stockholders shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than fifty-five nor more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date, unless the calling of such meeting is ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, in which case notice of such special meeting shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than thirty nor more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date. Such notice shall be given by delivering to each stockholder a written or printed notice thereof either personally or by mailing such notice in a postage-prepaid envelope addressed to the stockholder's address as it appears on the stock books of the Corporation. Except as otherwise required by statute, no publication of any notice of a meeting of stockholders shall be required. Every notice of a meeting of stockholders shall state the place, date, and hour of the meeting and, in the case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called.
 
SECTION 5.
.
Waivers of Notice
 
Whenever any notice is required to be given to any stockholder under the provisions of these By-Laws, the Certificate of Incorporation, or the Delaware General Corporation Law, a waiver thereof in writing, signed by the person or persons entitled to such notice, whether before or after the time stated therein, shall be deemed equivalent to the giving of such notice. The attendance of a stockholder at a meeting, in person or by proxy, shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when a stockholder attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened.
 
SECTION 6.
.
Quorum
 
At all meetings of stockholders, except when otherwise provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by the By-Laws, the presence, in person or by proxy duly authorized, of the holders of one-third of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and except as otherwise provided by statute or rule of law, or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by the By-Laws, the vote, in person or by proxy, of the holders of a majority of the shares constituting such quorum shall be binding upon all stockholders of the Corporation. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote may adjourn any meeting, from time to time but not for a period of more than thirty days at any one time, until a quorum shall attend. At any such adjourned meeting at which a quorum shall be present, any business may be transacted which might have been transacted at the meeting as originally called. Unless otherwise provided by statute, no notice of an adjourned meeting need be given.
 
SECTION 7.
.
Proxies
 
7.1 Each stockholder entitled to vote at a meeting of stockholders or to express consent or dissent to corporate action in writing without a meeting may authorize another person or persons to act for such stockholder by proxy. Such authorization may be accomplished by (a) the stockholder or such stockholder's authorized officer, director, employee, or agent executing a writing or causing his or her signature to be affixed to such writing by any reasonable means, including facsimile signature, or (b) by transmitting or authorizing the transmission of a telegram, cablegram, or other means of electronic transmission to the intended holder of the proxy or to a proxy solicitation firm, proxy support service, or similar agent duly authorized by the intended proxy holder to receive such transmission; provided, that any such telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission must either set forth or be accompanied by information from which it can be determined that the telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission was authorized by the stockholder. Any copy, facsimile telecommunication, or other reliable reproduction of the writing or transmission by which a stockholder has authorized another person to act as proxy for such stockholder may be substituted or used in lieu of the original writing or transmission for any and all purposes for which the original writing or transmission could be used, provided that such copy, facsimile telecommunication, or other reproduction shall be a complete reproduction of the entire original writing or transmission.
.
Appointment
 
7.2 A proxy shall be filed with the Secretary of the Corporation before or at the time of the meeting or the delivery to the Corporation of the consent to corporate action in writing. A proxy shall become invalid three years after the date of its execution, unless otherwise provided in the proxy. A proxy with respect to a specified meeting shall entitle the holder thereof to vote at any reconvened meeting following adjournment of such meeting but shall not be valid after the final adjournment thereof.
.
Delivery to Corporation; Duration
 
SECTION 8.
.
Inspectors of Election
 
8.1 In advance of any meeting of stockholders, the Board of Directors of the Corporation shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspectors of election at such meeting and to make a written report thereof. The Board of Directors may designate one or more persons to serve as alternate inspectors to serve in place of any inspector who is unable or fails to act. If no inspector or alternate is able to act at a meeting of stockholders, the chairman of such meeting shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspector of elections at such meeting.
.
Appointment
 
8.2 The inspectors shall: (a) ascertain the number of shares of the Corporation outstanding and the voting power of each such share; (b) determine the shares represented at the meeting and the validity of proxies and ballots; (c) count all votes and ballots; (d) determine and retain for a reasonable period of time a record of the disposition of any challenges made to any determination by them; and (e) certify their determination of the number of shares represented at the meeting and their count of the votes and ballots. Each inspector of election shall, before entering upon the discharge of his or her duties, take and sign an oath to faithfully execute the duties of inspector with strict impartiality and according to the best of his or her ability. The inspectors of election may appoint or retain other persons or entities to assist them in the performance of their duties.
.
Duties
 
8.3 The validity of any proxy or ballot executed for a meeting of stockholders shall be determined by the inspectors of election in accordance with the applicable provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law as then in effect. In determining the validity of any proxy transmitted by telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission, the inspectors shall record in writing the information upon which they relied in making such determination.
.
Determination of Proxy Validity
 
SECTION 9.
.
Fixing the Record Date
 
9.1 For the purpose of determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at any meeting of stockholders or any adjournment thereof, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which record date shall be not fewer than thirty nor more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the date of such meeting. If the corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, the record date for each special meeting of stockholders shall be not fewer than fifty-five nor more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date, unless the calling of such meeting is ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of
.
Meetings
 
Incorporation. If no record date is fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall be at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which notice is given, or, if notice is waived, at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which the meeting is held. A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting; provided, however, that the Board of Directors may fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
 
9.2 For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which date shall not be more than ten (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days after the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, when no prior action by the Board of Directors is required by Chapter 1 of the Delaware General Corporation Law as now or hereafter amended, shall be the first date on which a signed written consent setting forth the action taken or proposed to be taken is delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the records of proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Delivery made to the Corporation's registered office shall be by hand or by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors and prior action by the Board of Directors is required by Chapter 1 of the Delaware General Corporation Law as now or hereafter amended, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution taking such prior action.
.
Consent to Corporate Action Without a Meeting
 
9.3 For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to receive payment of any dividend or other distribution or allotment of any rights or the stockholders entitled to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion, or exchange of stock, or for the purpose of any other lawful action, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted, and which record date shall be not more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days prior to such action. If no record date is fixed, the record date for determining stockholders for any such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution relating thereto.
.
Dividends, Distributions, and Other Rights
 
9.4. At least ten days before each meeting of stockholders, a complete list of the stockholders entitled to vote at such meeting shall be made, arranged in alphabetical order, and showing the address of each stockholder and the number of shares registered in the name of each stockholder. This list shall be open to examination by any stockholder, for any purpose germane to the meeting, during ordinary business hours, for a period of ten days prior to the meeting, either at a place within the city where the meeting is to be held, which place shall be specified in the notice of the meeting, or, if not so specified, at the place where the meeting is to be held. The
.
Voting List
 
list shall also be produced and kept at such meeting for inspection by any stockholder who is present.
 
SECTION 10.
.
Action by Stockholders Without a Meeting
 
Subject to the provisions of Article NINTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, any action which could be taken at any annual or special meeting of stockholders may be taken without a meeting, without prior notice, and without a vote, if a consent or consents in writing, setting forth the action so taken, are (a) signed by the holders of outstanding stock having not fewer than the minimum number of votes that would be necessary to authorize or take such action at a meeting at which all shares entitled to vote thereon were present and voted and (b) delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the records of proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Delivery made to the Corporation's registered office shall be by hand or by certified mail or registered mail, return receipt requested. Every written consent shall bear the date of signature of each stockholder who signs the consent and no written consent shall be effective to take the corporate action referred to therein unless written consents signed by a sufficient number of stockholders to take such action are delivered to the Corporation, in the manner required by this section, within sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days of the date of the earliest dated consent delivered to the Corporation in the manner required by this section. The validity of any consent executed by a proxy for a stockholder pursuant to a telegram, cablegram, or other means of electronic transmission transmitted to such proxy holder by or upon the authorization of the stockholder shall be determined by or at the direction of the Secretary of the Corporation. A written record of the information upon which the person making such determination relied shall be made and kept in the records of the proceedings of the stockholders. Any such consent shall be inserted in the minute book as if it were the minutes of a meeting of the stockholders. Prompt notice of the taking of the corporate action without a meeting by less than unanimous written consent shall be given to those stockholders who have not consented in writing.
 
SECTION 11.
.
Business and Nominations at Stockholders' Meetings
 
11.1 In addition to the election of directors, other proper business may be transacted at the annual meeting of stockholders, provided that such business is a proper matter for stockholder action and is properly brought before such meeting. To be properly brought before an annual meeting, nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors and business to be considered by stockholders must be (a) made or brought by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, or (b) made or brought before the meeting by a stockholder of the Corporation who is a stockholder of record at the time of giving notice as required in this By-Law, who is entitled to vote at the meeting, and who complies with the notice procedures set forth in this By-Law. Notice by a stockholder pursuant to (b) above must be in writing, in accordance with Section 12 of this Article I, and received by the Secretary not earlier than the one-hundred and twentieth day nor later than the close of business on the ninetieth day prior to the date specified in Section 1 of this Article I for such annual meeting; provided, however, that in the event that the date of the annual meeting is more than thirty days before or more than sixty days after such date, notice by the stockholder must be received by the Secretary not earlier than the one-hundred and twentieth
.
Business and Nominations at Annual Meetings
 
day prior to such annual meeting and not later than the close of business on the ninetieth day prior to such annual meeting or the tenth day following the day on which public announcement of the date of such meeting is first made by the Corporation.
 
11.2 . Any stockholder notice given pursuant to Section 11.1 shall set forth (i) the name and address of the stockholder proposing such business and of the beneficial owner, if any, on whose behalf the proposal or nomination is made; (ii) a representation that the stockholder is entitled to vote at such meeting and a statement of the number of shares of the Corporation which are owned by the stockholder and the number of shares which are beneficially owned by the beneficial owner, if any; (iii) a representation that the stockholder intends to appear in person or by proxy at the meeting to nominate the person or persons or to propose the business specified in the notice; and (iv) as to each person the stockholder proposes to nominate for election or re-election as a director, the name and address of such person and such other information regarding such nominee as would be required in a proxy statement filed pursuant to the proxy rules of the Securities and Exchange Commission had such nominee been nominated by the Board of Directors, and a description of any arrangements or understandings, between the stockholder and such nominee and any other persons (including their names), pursuant to which the nomination is to be made, and the written consent of each such nominee to being named in the proxy statement as a nominee and to serving as a director if elected; or, as to each matter the stockholder proposes to bring before the meeting, a brief description of the business desired to be brought before the meeting, the reasons for conducting such business at the meeting, the language of the business matter (if appropriate), and any material interest of the stockholder in such business.
Stockholder Notice
 
11.3 At any special meeting of the stockholders, only such business as is specified in the notice of such special meeting given by or at the direction of the person or persons calling such meeting, in accordance with Section 2 of this Article I, shall come before such meeting. Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors may be made at a special meeting of stockholders at which directors are to be elected pursuant to the Corporation's notice of meeting (a) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or (b) provided that the Board of Directors has determined that directors shall be elected at such meeting, by any stockholder of the Corporation who is a stockholder of record at the time of giving of notice provided for in this By-Law, who shall be entitled to vote at the meeting and who complies with the notice procedures set forth in this By-Law. In the event the Corporation calls a special meeting of stockholders for the purpose of electing one or more directors to the Board of Directors, any such stockholder may nominate a person or persons for election to such position(s) as specified in the Corporation's notice of meeting, if the stockholder's notice required by paragraph 11.1 of this By-Law shall be delivered to the Secretary not earlier than the one hundred and twentieth day nor later than the ninetieth day prior to such special meeting or the tenth day following the day on which public announcement is first made of the date of the special meeting and of the nominees proposed by the Board of Directors to be elected at such meeting.
.
Business and Nominations at Special Meetings
 
11.4 . No business shall be conducted nor director nominations made at any meeting of stockholders except in accordance with this Section 11. If
Stockholder Meeting Procedures
 
the facts warrant, the Board of Directors, or the chairman of a stockholders' meeting at which directors are to be elected, may determine and declare (a) that a proposal does not constitute proper business to be transacted at the meeting or (b) that business was not properly brought before the meeting in accordance with the provisions of this Section 11 or (c) that a nomination was not made in accordance with this Section 11; and, if it is so determined, the defective proposal or nomination shall be disregarded and shall not be transacted or acted upon. The right of stockholders to bring business before or to make nominations pursuant to the foregoing procedure is subject to the rights of the holders of any class or series of stock having a preference over the Common Stock as to dividends or upon liquidation. The procedures set forth in this Section 11 for stockholders' bringing business before a stockholders' meeting or stockholders' making nominations for the election of directors are in addition to, and not in lieu or limitation of, (a) any procedures now in effect or hereafter adopted by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof and (b) the requirements set forth in Rule 14a-8 and Rule 14a-11 under Section 14 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, or any successor provisions.
 
11.5 . For purposes of this By-Law, "public announcement" as to an annual or special meeting of stockholders shall mean disclosure in a press release reported by the Dow Jones News Service, Associated Press or comparable national news service or in a document publicly filed by the Corporation with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to Section 13, 14 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act. In no event shall the public announcement of an adjournment of an annual or special meeting commence a new time period for the giving of a stockholder's notice as described above.
Public Announcement of Stockholders' Meetings
 
SECTION 12.
.
Notice to Corporation
 
Any written notice required to be delivered by a stockholder to the Corporation pursuant to Section 11.1 of this Article I or Section 2.1 of Article II must be given, either by personal delivery or by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, to the Secretary at the Corporation's executive offices in the City of Seattle, State of Washington.
 
 
 
SECTION 1.
.
Number and Term of Office
 
The number of directors shall be eleven, but the number may be increased, or decreased to not less than three, from time to time, either by the directors by adoption of a resolution to such effect or by the stockholders by amendment of the By-Laws in accordance with Article VIII hereof. The directors shall be divided into three classes, each of which shall be composed as nearly as possible of one-third of the directors. Each director shall serve for the term to which the director was elected, and until a successor shall have been elected and qualified or until the director's prior death, resignation, or removal. At each annual election, directors shall be chosen for a full three-year term to succeed those whose terms expire.
 
SECTION 2.
.
Nomination and Election
 
2.1 Only persons who are nominated in accordance with Article I, Section 11 of these By-Laws shall be eligible for election as directors.
.
Nomination
 
2.2 At each election of directors, the persons receiving the greatest number of votes shall be the directors.
.
Election
 
SECTION 3.
.
Place of Meeting
 
Meetings of the Board of Directors, or of any committee thereof, may be held either within or without the State of Delaware.
 
SECTION 4.
.
Annual Meeting
 
Each year the Board of Directors shall meet in connection with the annual meeting of stockholders for the purpose of electing officers and for the transaction of other business. No notice of such meeting is required. Such annual meeting may be held at any other time or place which shall be specified in a notice given as hereinafter provided for special meetings of the Board, or in a consent and waiver of notice thereof, signed by all the directors.
 
SECTION 5.
.
Stated Meetings
 
The Board of Directors may, by resolution adopted by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board, from time to time appoint the time and place for holding stated meetings of the Board, if by it deemed advisable; and such stated meetings shall thereupon be held at the time and place so appointed, without the giving of any special notice with regard thereto. In case the day appointed for a stated meeting shall fall upon a legal holiday, such meeting shall be held on the next following day, not a legal holiday, at the regularly appointed hour. Except as otherwise provided in the By-Laws, any and all business may be transacted at any stated meeting.
 
SECTION 6.
.
Special Meetings
 
6.1 Special meetings of the Board of Directors may be called by or at the request of the Chairman of the Board or any two directors. Notice of a special meeting of the Board of Directors, stating the place, day, and hour of the meeting, shall be given to each director in writing (by mail, wire, facsimile, or personal delivery) or orally (by telephone or in person).
.
Convenors and Notice
 
6.2 With respect to a special meeting of the Board of Directors, a written waiver, signed by a director, shall be deemed equivalent to notice to that director. A director's attendance at a meeting shall constitute that director's waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the director attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting was not lawfully called or convened. Neither the business to be transacted at, nor the purpose of, any regular or special meeting of the Board of Directors need be specified in the waiver of notice of such meeting.
.
Waiver of Notice
 
SECTION 7.
.
Quorum and Manner of Acting
 
Except as herein otherwise provided, forty percent of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided in these By-Laws at the time of any stated or special meeting of the Board or, if vacancies exist on the Board of Directors, forty percent of such number of directors then in office, provided, however, that such number may not be less than one-third of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided in these By-Laws, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and, except as otherwise required by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by the By-Laws, the act of a majority of the directors present at any such meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of the Board of Directors. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the directors present may adjourn any meeting, from time to time, until a quorum is present. No notice of any adjourned meeting need be given.
 
SECTION 8.
.
Chairman of the Board
 
The Chairman of the Board shall preside, when present, at all meetings of the Board, except as otherwise provided by law.
 
SECTION 9.
.
Resignations
 
Any director of the Corporation may resign at any time by giving written notice thereof to the Secretary. Such resignation shall take effect at the time specified therefor or if the time is not specified, upon delivery thereof; and, unless otherwise specified with respect thereto, the acceptance of such resignation shall not be necessary to make it effective.
 
SECTION 10.
.
Removal of Directors
 
Any director may be removed solely for cause by the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, at a meeting of the stockholders called for the purpose; and the vacancy on the Board caused by any such removal may be filled by the stockholders at such meeting or at any subsequent meeting.
 
SECTION 11.
.
Filling of Vacancies Not Caused by Removal
 
In case of any increase in the number of directors, or of any vacancy created by death or resignation, the additional director or directors may be elected or, as the case may be, the vacancy or vacancies may be filled, either (a) by the Board of Directors at any meeting, (i) if the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH, or (ii) if the Corporation does not have an Interested Stockholder, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the remaining directors, though less than a quorum; or (b) by the stockholders entitled to vote, either at an annual meeting or at a special meeting thereof called for the purpose, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the outstanding shares entitled to vote at such meeting.
 
SECTION 12.
.
Directors' Fees
 
The Board of Directors shall have authority to determine from time to time the amount of compensation which shall be paid to its members for attendance at meetings of the Board or of any committee of the Board.
 
SECTION 13. Any action required or permitted to be taken at any meeting of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof may be taken without a meeting if all members of the Board or committee, as the case may be, consent thereto in writing, and the writing or writings are filed with the minutes of proceedings of the Board or committee.
.
Action Without a Meeting
 
 
 
SECTION 1.
.
Audit Committee
 
In addition to any committees appointed pursuant to Section 2 of this Article, there shall be an Audit Committee, appointed annually by the Board of Directors, consisting of at least three directors who are not members of management. It shall be the responsibility of the Audit Committee to review the scope and results of the annual independent audit of books and records of the Corporation and its subsidiaries and to discharge such other responsibilities as may from time to time be assigned to it by the Board of Directors. The Audit Committee shall meet at such times and places as the members deem advisable, and shall make such recommendations to the Board of Directors as they consider appropriate.
 
SECTION 2.
.
Other Committees
 
2.1 The Board of Directors may appoint standing or temporary committees and invest such committees with such powers as it may see fit, with power to subdelegate such powers if deemed desirable by the Board of Directors; but no such committee shall have the power or authority of the Board of Directors to adopt, amend, or repeal the By-Laws of the Corporation or approve, adopt or recommend to the stockholders of the Corporation any action or matter expressly required by the Certificate of Incorporation, these By-Laws or the Delaware General Corporation Law to be submitted to stockholders for approval.
.
Committee Powers
 
2.2 The Board of Directors may designate one or more directors as alternate members of any committee, who may replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of the committee. In the absence or disqualification of a member of a committee, the member or members thereof present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, whether or not such member or members constitute a quorum, may unanimously appoint another member of the Board to act at the meeting in the place of any such absent or disqualified member.
.
Committee Members
 
SECTION 3.
.
Quorum and Manner of Acting
 
A majority of the number of directors composing any committee of the Board of Directors, as established and fixed by resolution of the Board of Directors, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at any meeting of such committee but, if less than a majority are present at a meeting, a majority of such directors present may adjourn the meeting from time to time without further notice. The act of a majority of the members of a committee present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of such committee.
 
 
 
SECTION 1.
.
Officers
 
The elected officers of the Corporation shall be a Chairman of the Board (who shall be a director) and, at the discretion of the Board, a President (who shall be a director), and one or more Vice Presidents (each of whom may be assigned by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer an additional title descriptive of the functions assigned to such officer and one or more of whom may be designated Executive or Senior Vice President). The Board may also elect one or more Vice Chairmen. The Board of Directors shall also designate either the Chairman of the Board or the President as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation. The Board of Directors shall appoint a Controller, a Secretary, and a Treasurer. Any number of offices, whether elective or appointive, may be held by the same person. The Chief Executive Officer may, by a writing filed with the Secretary, designate titles as officers for employees and agents and appoint Assistant Secretaries and Assistant Treasurers, as, from time to time, may appear to be necessary or advisable in the conduct of the affairs of the Corporation and may, in the same manner, terminate or change such titles.
 
SECTION 2.
.
Term of Office
 
So far as practicable, all elected officers shall be elected at the annual meeting of the Board in each year, and shall hold office until the annual meeting of the Board in the next subsequent year and until their respective successors are chosen. The Controller, Secretary, and Treasurer shall hold office at the pleasure of the Board.
 
SECTION 3.
.
Salaries of Elected Officers
 
The salaries paid to the elected officers of the Corporation shall be authorized or approved by the Board of Directors.
 
SECTION 4.
.
Bonuses
 
None of the officers, directors, or employees of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations shall at any time be paid any bonus or share in the earnings or profits of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations except pursuant to a plan approved by affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members of the Board of Directors.
 
SECTION 5.
.
Removal of Elected and Appointed Officers
 
Any elected or appointed officer may be removed at any time, either for or without cause, by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors, at any meeting called for the purpose.
 
SECTION 6.
.
Vacancies
 
If any vacancy occurs in any office, the Board of Directors may elect or appoint a successor to fill such vacancy for the remainder of the term.
 
 
 
SECTION 1.
.
Chairman of the Board
 
The Chairman of the Board shall preside, when present, at all meetings of the stockholders (except as otherwise provided by statute) and at all meetings of the Board of Directors. The Chairman shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation; to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the Chairman by the Board of Directors.
 
SECTION 2.
.
President
 
The President shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation and to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; during the absence or disability of the Chairman of the Board to exercise the Chairman's powers and to perform the Chairman's duties; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the President by the Board of Directors; provided, that if the office of President is vacant, the Chairman shall exercise the duties ordinarily exercised by the President until such time as a President is elected or appointed.
 
SECTION 3.
.
Chief Executive Officer
 
The officer designated by the Board of Directors as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation shall have general and active control of its business and affairs. The Chief Executive Officer shall have general power to appoint or designate all employees and agents of the Corporation whose appointment or designation is not otherwise provided for and to fix the compensation thereof, subject to the provisions of these By-Laws; to remove or suspend any employee or agent who shall not have been elected or appointed by the Board of Directors or other body; to suspend for cause any employee, agent, or officer, other than an elected officer, pending final action by the body which shall have appointed such employee, agent, or officer; and to exercise all the powers usually pertaining to the office held by the Chief Executive Officer of a corporation.
 
SECTION 4.
.
Vice Presidents and Controller
 
The several Vice Presidents and the Controller shall perform all such duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of them, from time to time, by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer, respectively.
 
SECTION 5.
Secretary
.
 
The Secretary shall attend to the giving of notice of all meetings of stockholders and of the Board of Directors and shall keep and attest true records of all proceedings thereat. The Secretary shall have charge of the corporate seal and have authority to attest any and all instruments or writings to which the same may be affixed and shall keep and account for all books, documents, papers, and records of the Corporation relating to its corporate organization. The Secretary shall have authority to sign stock certificates and shall generally perform all the duties usually appertaining to the office of secretary of a corporation. In the absence of
 
the Secretary, an Assistant Secretary or Secretary pro tempore shall perform the duties of the Secretary.
 
SECTION 6.
.
Treasurer
 
The Treasurer shall have the care and custody of all moneys, funds, and securities of the Corporation, and shall deposit or cause to be deposited all funds of the Corporation in accordance with directions or authorizations of the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer. The Treasurer shall have power to sign stock certificates, to indorse for deposit or collection, or otherwise, all checks, drafts, notes, bills of exchange, or other commercial paper payable to the Corporation, and to give proper receipts or discharges therefor. In the absence of the Treasurer, an Assistant Treasurer shall perform the duties of the Treasurer.
 
SECTION 7.
.
Additional Powers and Duties
 
In addition to the foregoing especially enumerated duties and powers, the several officers of the Corporation shall perform such other duties and exercise such further powers as may be provided in these By-Laws or as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine, or as may be assigned to them by any superior officer.
 
SECTION 8.
.
Disaster Emergency Powers of Acting Officers
 
If, as a result of a disaster or other state of emergency, the Chief Executive Officer is unable to perform the duties of that office, (a) the powers and duties of the Chief Executive Officer shall be performed by the employee with the highest base salary who shall be available and capable of performing such powers and duties and, if more than one such employee has the same base salary, by the employee whose surname begins with the earliest letter of the alphabet among the group of those employees with the same base salary; and (b) the officer performing such duties shall continue to perform such powers and duties until the Chief Executive Officer becomes capable of performing those duties or until the Board of Directors shall have elected a new Chief Executive Officer or designated another individual as Acting Chief Executive Officer; and (c) such officer shall have the power in addition to all other powers granted to the Chief Executive Officer by these By-Laws and by the Board of Directors to appoint an acting President, acting Vice President - Finance, acting Controller, acting Secretary, and acting Treasurer, if any of the persons duly elected to any such office is not by reason of such disaster or emergency able to perform the duties of such office, each of such acting appointees to serve in such capacities until the officer for whom the appointee is acting becomes capable of performing the duties of such office or until the Board of Directors shall have designated another individual to perform such duties or have elected another person to fill such office; and (d) any such acting officer so appointed shall be entitled to exercise all powers vested by the By-Laws or the Board of Directors in the duly elected officer for whom the acting officer is acting; and (e) anyone transacting business with this Corporation may rely upon a certification by any two officers of the Corporation that a specified individual has succeeded to the powers of the Chief Executive Officer and that such person has appointed other acting officers as herein provided and any person, firm, corporation, or other entity to which such certification has been delivered by such officers may continue to rely upon it until notified of a change in writing signed by two officers of this Corporation.
 
 
 
SECTION 1.
.
Stock Certificates
 
Every stockholder shall be entitled to a certificate, signed by the Chairman of the Board or the President or a Vice President and the Treasurer or an Assistant Treasurer or the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary, certifying the number of shares owned by the stockholder in the Corporation. Any and all of the signatures on a certificate may be a facsimile. If any officer, transfer agent, or registrar who has signed or whose facsimile signature has been placed upon a certificate shall have ceased to be such officer, transfer agent, or registrar before such certificate is issued, it may be issued by the Corporation with the same effect as if he or she were such officer, transfer agent, or registrar at the date of issue.
 
SECTION 2.
.
Transfer Agents and Registrars
 
The Board of Directors may, in its discretion, appoint responsible banks or trust companies in the Borough of Manhattan, in the City of New York, State of New York, and in such other city or cities as the Board may deem advisable, from time to time, to act as transfer agents and registrars of the stock of the Corporation; and, when such appointments shall have been made, no stock certificate shall be valid until countersigned by one of such transfer agents and registered by one of such registrars.
 
SECTION 3.
.
Transfers of Stock
 
Shares of stock may be transferred by delivery of the certificates therefor, accompanied either by an assignment in writing on the back of the certificates or by written power of attorney to sell, assign, and transfer the same, signed by the record holder thereof; but no transfer shall affect the right of the Corporation to pay any dividend upon the stock to the holder of record thereof, or to treat the holder of record as the holder in fact thereof for all purposes, and no transfer shall be valid, except between the parties thereto, until such transfer shall have been made upon the books of the Corporation.
 
SECTION 4.
.
Lost Certificates
 
The Board of Directors may provide for the issuance of new certificates of stock to replace certificates of stock lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, or alleged to be lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, upon such terms and in accordance with such procedures as the Board of Directors shall deem proper and prescribe.
 
 
 
SECTION 1.
Fiscal Year
.
 
The fiscal year of the Corporation shall be the calendar year.
 
SECTION 2. (Repealed in its entirety by vote of the stockholders, May 5, 1975.)
 
SECTION 3.
.
Signing of Negotiable Instruments
 
All bills, notes, checks, or other instruments for the payment of money shall be signed or countersigned by such officer or officers and in such manner as from time to time may be prescribed by resolution (whether general or special) of the Board of Directors.
 
SECTION 4.
.
Indemnification of Directors and Officers
 
4.1 Each person who was or is made a party or is threatened to be made a party to or is otherwise involved (including, without limitation, as a witness) in any actual or threatened action, suit, or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative, or investigative (hereinafter a "proceeding"), by reason of the fact that he or she is or was a director or officer of the Corporation or that, being or having been such a director or officer or an employee of the Corporation, he or she is or was serving at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation as a director, officer, employee, or agent of another corporation or of a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise, including service with respect to an employee benefit plan (hereinafter an "indemnitee"), whether the basis of such proceeding is alleged action in an official capacity as such a director, officer, employee, or agent or in any other capacity while serving as such a director, officer, employee, or agent, shall be indemnified and held harmless by the Corporation to the full extent permitted by the Delaware General Corporation Law, as the same exists or may hereafter be amended (but, in the case of any such amendment, only to the extent that such amendment permits the Corporation to provide broader indemnification rights than permitted prior thereto), or by other applicable law as then in effect, against all expense, liability, and loss (including attorneys' fees, judgments, fines, ERISA excise taxes or penalties, and amounts paid in settlement) actually and reasonably incurred or suffered by such indemnitee in connection therewith and such indemnification shall continue as to an indemnitee who has ceased to be a director, officer, employee, or agent and shall inure to the benefit of the indemnitee's heirs, executors, and administrators; , , that except as provided in Section 4.2 with respect to proceedings seeking to enforce rights to indemnification, the Corporation shall indemnify any such indemnitee in connection with a proceeding (or part thereof) initiated by such indemnitee only if such proceeding (or part thereof) was authorized or ratified by the Board of Directors of the Corporation. The right to indemnification conferred in this Section 4.1 shall be a contract right and shall include the right to be paid by the Corporation the expenses incurred in defending any such proceeding in advance of its final disposition (hereinafter an "advancement of expenses"); , , that an advancement of expenses incurred by an indemnitee in his or her capacity as a director or officer (and not in any other capacity in which service was or is rendered by such indemnitee, including, without limitation, service to an employee benefit plan) shall be made only upon delivery to the Corporation of an under-taking (hereinafter an "undertaking"), by or on behalf of such indemnitee, to repay all amounts so advanced if it shall ultimately be determined by final judicial decision from which there is no further right to appeal that such indemnitee is not entitled to be indemnified for such expenses under this Section 4.1 or otherwise; and , , that an advancement of expenses shall not be made if the Corporation's Board of Directors makes a good faith determination that such payment would violate law or public policy.
.
Right to Indemnification
provided
however
provided
however
provided
further
 
4.2 If a claim under Section 4.1 is not paid in full by the Corporation within sixty days after a written claim has been received by the Corporation, except in the case of a claim for an advancement of expenses, in which case the applicable period shall be twenty days, the indemnitee may at any time thereafter bring suit against the Corporation to recover the unpaid amount of the claim. If successful in whole or in part in any such suit, or in a suit brought by the Corporation to recover an advancement of expenses pursuant to the terms of an undertaking, the indemnitee shall also be entitled to be paid the expense of prosecuting or defending such suit. The indemnitee shall be presumed to be entitled to indemnification under this Section 4 upon submission of a written claim (and, in an action brought to enforce a claim for an advancement of expenses, where the required undertaking has been tendered to the Corporation), and thereafter the Corporation shall have the burden of proof to overcome the presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled. Neither the failure of the Corporation (including its Board of Directors, independent legal counsel, or its stockholders) to have made a determination prior to the commencement of such suit that indemnification of the indemnitee is proper in the circumstances, nor an actual determination by the Corporation (including its Board of Directors, independent legal counsel, or its stockholders) that the indemnitee is not entitled to indemnification shall be a defense to the suit or create a presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled.
.
Right of Indemnitee to Bring Suit
 
4.3 The rights to indemnification and to the advancement of expenses conferred in this Section 4 shall not be exclusive of any other right which any person may have or hereafter acquire under any statute, provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation, By-Laws, agreement, vote of stockholders or disinterested directors, or otherwise. Notwithstanding any amendment to or repeal of this Section 4, or of any of the procedures established by the Board of Directors pursuant to Section 4.7, any indemnitee shall be entitled to indemnification in accordance with the provisions hereof and thereof with respect to any acts or omissions of such indemnitee occurring prior to such amendment or repeal.
.
Nonexclusivity of Rights
 
4.4 The Corporation may maintain insurance, at its expense, to protect itself and any director, officer, employee, or agent of the Corporation or another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise against any expense, liability, or loss, whether or not the Corporation would have the power to indemnify such person against such expense, liability, or loss under the Delaware General Corporation Law. The Corporation may, without further stockholder approval, enter into contracts with any indemnitee in furtherance of the provisions of this Section 4 and may create a trust fund, grant a security interest, or use other means (including, without limitation, a letter of credit) to ensure the payment of such amounts as may be necessary to effect indemnification as provided in this Section 4.
.
Insurance, Contracts, and Funding
 
4.5 Any person who is or was a director, officer, or employee of the Corporation who is or was serving (i) as a director or officer of another corporation of which a majority of the shares entitled to vote in the election of its directors is held by the Corporation or (ii) in an executive or management capacity in a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise of which the Corporation or a wholly owned subsidiary of the Corporation is a general partner or has a majority ownership shall be deemed to be so serving
.
Persons Serving Other Entities
 
at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation and entitled to indemnification and advancement of expenses under Section 4.1.
 
4.6 The Corporation may, by action of its Board of Directors, authorize one or more executive officers to grant rights to advancement of expenses to employees or agents of the Corporation on such terms and conditions as such officer or officers deem appropriate under the circumstances. The Corporation may, by action of its Board of Directors, grant rights to indemnification and advancement of expenses to employees or agents or groups of employees or agents of the Corporation with the same scope and effect as the provisions of this Section 4 with respect to the indemnification and advancement of expenses of directors and officers of the Corporation; , , that an undertaking shall be made by an employee or agent only if required by the Board of Directors.
.
Indemnification of Employees and Agents of the Corporation
provided
however
 
4.7 The Board of Directors may establish reasonable procedures for the submission of claims for indemnification pursuant to this Section 4, determination of the entitlement of any person thereto, and review of any such determination. Such procedures shall be set forth in an appendix to these By-Laws and shall be deemed for all purposes to be a part hereof.
.
Procedures for the Submission of Claims
 
SECTION 5.
.
Designated Engineer in the State of Washington
 
5.1 The Board of Directors, as required by the Revised Code of Washington, has appointed a licensed professional engineer in the State of Washington the Designated Engineer as being in responsible charge for the practice of engineering performed by the Corporation in Washington.
.
Appointment of Designated Engineer
 
5.2 The Board of Directors grants and delegates to the Designated Engineer the full authority to make all final engineering decisions on behalf of the Corporation with respect to engineering work performed in the State of Washington.
.
Grant of Authority to the Designated Engineer
 
5.3 The Board of Directors grants and delegates to the appropriate officers of the Corporation the authority to designate each successor Designated Engineer as being in responsible charge for the practice of engineering and to notify the Washington Board of Registration for Professional Engineers and Land Surveyors of the appointment of each successor Designated Engineer within 30 days after the effective date of the appointment.
.
Grant of Authority to Appropriate Officers
 
 
 
SECTION 1.
.
Amendment of the By-Laws: General
 
Except as herein otherwise expressly provided, the By-Laws of the Corporation may be altered or repealed in any particular and new By-Laws, not inconsistent with any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or any provision of law, may be adopted, either by the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority in number of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote at an annual meeting of stockholders or at a special meeting thereof, the notice of which special meeting shall include the form of the proposed alteration or repeal or of the proposed new By-Laws, or a summary thereof; or either
 
 
 
provided, in either of the latter cases, that the notice of such meeting shall include the form of the proposed alteration or repeal or of the proposed new By-Laws, or a summary thereof.
 
SECTION 2.
.
Amendments as to Compensation and Removal of Officers
 
Notwithstanding anything contained in these By-Laws to the contrary, the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the Voting Stock, as defined in Article FOURTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, at a meeting of the stockholders called for the purpose, shall be required to alter, amend, repeal, or adopt any provision inconsistent with Sections 3, 4 and 5 of Article IV hereof, notice of which meeting shall include the form of the proposed amendment, or a summary thereof.
 
SECTION 3.
.
Amendments as to Stockholders' Meetings, Directors
 
Notwithstanding anything contained in these By-Laws to the contrary, either (a) the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, or (b) the affirmative vote of the holders of record of at least seventy-five percent of the Voting Stock, as defined in Article FOURTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, shall be required to alter, amend, repeal, or adopt any provision inconsistent with Sections 1, 2, and 4 of Article I and Sections 1, 10, and 11 of Article II.
 
SECTION 4.
.
Amendment of this Article VIII
 
Notwithstanding anything contained in these By-Laws to the contrary, either (a) the recommendation of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, together with the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the Voting Stock, as defined in Article FOURTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, or (b) the affirmative vote of the holders of record of at least seventy-five percent of the Voting Stock, as defined in Article FOURTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, shall be required to alter, amend, repeal, or adopt any provision inconsistent with this Article VIII.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20041206144258.txt.gz
TIME:20041206144258
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
 
The Boeing Company (the "Company") is filing this amendment to its Current Report on Form 8-K filed on October 28, 2004 which reported the election of Mike S. Zafirovski to the Board of Directors of the Company. At the time of Mr. Zafirovski's election, no determination had been made as to which committees of the Board Mr. Zafirovski would serve. On December 2, 2004, the Board of Directors appointed Mr. Zafirovski to the Audit Committee and Finance Committee.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this Amendment No. 1 to the report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20041214112650.txt.gz
TIME:20041214112650
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
 
On December 13, 2004, the Board of Directors of The Boeing Company (the "Company"), upon the recommendation of the Governance, Organization and Nominating Committee, elected Richard Nanula, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of Amgen Inc., as a new director effective January 1, 2005. Mr. Nanula was elected to the class of directors whose term expires in 2006. In addition, Mr. Nanula was appointed to the Company's Audit Committee and the Finance Committee. There was no arrangement or understanding between Mr. Nanula and any other persons pursuant to which Mr. Nanula was selected as a director and there are no related party transactions between Mr. Nanula and the Company. A copy of the Company's press release announcing the election of Mr. Nanula is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
Item 5.03 Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or ByLaws; Change in Fiscal Year
 
On December 13, 2004, the Board of Directors amended and restated the Company's By-Laws by increasing the number of directors from eleven to twelve. A copy of the Company's By-Laws, as amended and restated, is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.2 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
(a) Not applicable
 
(b) Not applicable
 
(c) Exhibits
 
99.1    Press Release issued December 13, 2004.
 
99.2    By-Laws, as amended and restated on December 13, 2004.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 

EXHIBIT 99.1
Amgen CFO Nanula Elected to Boeing Board of Directors
 
The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] today announced that Richard D. Nanula, executive vice president and chief financial officer, Amgen Inc. [NASDAQ: AMGN], has been elected to the company's board of directors effective January 1, 2005. Nanula will serve on the company's Audit Committee and Finance Committee.
CHICAGO, Dec. 13, 2004 
 
"We are extremely pleased to have Richard join our board," said Boeing President and Chief Executive Officer Harry Stonecipher. "He brings with him broad and significant business experience, particularly in the areas of finance and technology," he said.
 
Nanula, 44, joined Amgen as executive vice president and member of its executive committee in May 2001 and became the company's CFO in August of that year. Nanula began his career with the Walt Disney Company where he held a number of executive positions over 12 years, including senior executive vice president, CFO, and president of Disney Stores Worldwide. He also served as president and chief operating officer of New York-based Starwood Hotels and Resorts. Prior to joining Amgen he was chairman and CEO of Broadband Sports Inc., an Internet media company.
 
Nanula graduated from the University of California, Santa Barbara, in 1982 with a bachelor's degree in economics. He also holds a master's degree in business administration from Harvard Business School, awarded in 1986.
 
Chicago-based Boeing is the world's largest aerospace company, with customers in 145 countries and suppliers and partners worldwide. It is a global leader in commercial jetliners, military aircraft, satellites, launch services, human space flight, missile defense, moving-platform connectivity, and network-centric solutions for defense and homeland security.
 
 
C2097
 
Contact:
Tim Neale (312) 544-2002

EXHIBIT 99.2
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
SECTION 1.
.
Annual Meetings
 
The Annual Meeting of the stockholders shall be held on such date and at such time as the Board of Directors shall determine, for the election of directors and the transaction of such other business as may come before the meeting.
 
SECTION 2. .
Special Meetings
 
A special meeting of the stockholders may be called at any time by the Board of Directors, or by stockholders holding together at least twenty-five percent of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, except as otherwise provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto.
 
SECTION 3.
.
Place of Meeting
 
All meetings of the stockholders of the Corporation shall be held at such place or places within or without the State of Delaware as may from time to time be fixed by the Board of Directors or as shall be specified or fixed in the respective notices or waivers of notice thereof.
 
SECTION 4.
.
Notice of Meetings
 
Except as otherwise required by statute and as set forth below, notice of each annual or special meeting of stockholders shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than thirty nor more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date. If the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, notice of each special meeting of stockholders shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than fifty-five nor more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date, unless the calling of such meeting is ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, in which case notice of such special meeting shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than thirty nor more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date. Such notice shall be given by delivering to each stockholder a written or printed notice thereof either personally or by mailing such notice in a postage-prepaid envelope addressed to the stockholder's address as it appears on the stock books of the Corporation. Except as otherwise required by statute, no publication of any notice of a meeting of stockholders shall be required. Every notice of a meeting of stockholders shall state the place, date, and hour of the meeting and, in the case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called.
 
SECTION 5.
.
Waivers of Notice
 
Whenever any notice is required to be given to any stockholder under the provisions of these By-Laws, the Certificate of Incorporation, or the Delaware General Corporation Law, a waiver thereof in writing, signed by the person or persons entitled to such notice, whether before or after the time stated therein, shall be deemed equivalent to the giving of such notice. The attendance of a stockholder at a meeting, in person or by proxy, shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when a stockholder attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened.
 
SECTION 6.
.
Quorum
 
At all meetings of stockholders, except when otherwise provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by the By-Laws, the presence, in person or by proxy duly authorized, of the holders of one-third of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and except as otherwise provided by statute or rule of law, or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by the By-Laws, the vote, in person or by proxy, of the holders of a majority of the shares constituting such quorum shall be binding upon all stockholders of the Corporation. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote may adjourn any meeting, from time to time but not for a period of more than thirty days at any one time, until a quorum shall attend. At any such adjourned meeting at which a quorum shall be present, any business may be transacted which might have been transacted at the meeting as originally called. Unless otherwise provided by statute, no notice of an adjourned meeting need be given.
 
SECTION 7.
.
Proxies
 
7.1 Each stockholder entitled to vote at a meeting of stockholders or to express consent or dissent to corporate action in writing without a meeting may authorize another person or persons to act for such stockholder by proxy. Such authorization may be accomplished by (a) the stockholder or such stockholder's authorized officer, director, employee, or agent executing a writing or causing his or her signature to be affixed to such writing by any reasonable means, including facsimile signature, or (b) by transmitting or authorizing the transmission of a telegram, cablegram, or other means of electronic transmission to the intended holder of the proxy or to a proxy solicitation firm, proxy support service, or similar agent duly authorized by the intended proxy holder to receive such transmission; provided, that any such telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission must either set forth or be accompanied by information from which it can be determined that the telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission was authorized by the stockholder. Any copy, facsimile telecommunication, or other reliable reproduction of the writing or transmission by which a stockholder has authorized another person to act as proxy for such stockholder may be substituted or used in lieu of the original writing or transmission for any and all purposes for which the original writing or transmission could be used, provided that such copy, facsimile telecommunication, or other reproduction shall be a complete reproduction of the entire original writing or transmission.
.
Appointment
 
7.2 A proxy shall be filed with the Secretary of the Corporation before or at the time of the meeting or the delivery to the Corporation of the consent to corporate action in writing. A proxy shall become invalid three years after the date of its execution, unless otherwise provided in the proxy. A proxy with respect to a specified meeting shall entitle the holder thereof to vote at any reconvened meeting following adjournment of such meeting but shall not be valid after the final adjournment thereof.
.
Delivery to Corporation; Duration
 
SECTION 8.
.
Inspectors of Election
 
8.1 In advance of any meeting of stockholders, the Board of Directors of the Corporation shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspectors of election at such meeting and to make a written report thereof. The Board of Directors may designate one or more persons to serve as alternate inspectors to serve in place of any inspector who is unable or fails to act. If no inspector or alternate is able to act at a meeting of stockholders, the chairman of such meeting shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspector of elections at such meeting.
.
Appointment
 
8.2 The inspectors shall: (a) ascertain the number of shares of the Corporation outstanding and the voting power of each such share; (b) determine the shares represented at the meeting and the validity of proxies and ballots; (c) count all votes and ballots; (d) determine and retain for a reasonable period of time a record of the disposition of any challenges made to any determination by them; and (e) certify their determination of the number of shares represented at the meeting and their count of the votes and ballots. Each inspector of election shall, before entering upon the discharge of his or her duties, take and sign an oath to faithfully execute the duties of inspector with strict impartiality and according to the best of his or her ability. The inspectors of election may appoint or retain other persons or entities to assist them in the performance of their duties.
.
Duties
 
8.3 The validity of any proxy or ballot executed for a meeting of stockholders shall be determined by the inspectors of election in accordance with the applicable provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law as then in effect. In determining the validity of any proxy transmitted by telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission, the inspectors shall record in writing the information upon which they relied in making such determination.
.
Determination of Proxy Validity
 
SECTION 9.
.
Fixing the Record Date
 
9.1 For the purpose of determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at any meeting of stockholders or any adjournment thereof, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which record date shall be not fewer than thirty nor more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the date of such meeting. If the corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, the record date for each special meeting of stockholders shall be not fewer than fifty-five nor more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date, unless the calling of such meeting is ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of
.
Meetings
 
Incorporation. If no record date is fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall be at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which notice is given, or, if notice is waived, at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which the meeting is held. A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting; provided, however, that the Board of Directors may fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
 
9.2 For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which date shall not be more than ten (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days after the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, when no prior action by the Board of Directors is required by Chapter 1 of the Delaware General Corporation Law as now or hereafter amended, shall be the first date on which a signed written consent setting forth the action taken or proposed to be taken is delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the records of proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Delivery made to the Corporation's registered office shall be by hand or by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors and prior action by the Board of Directors is required by Chapter 1 of the Delaware General Corporation Law as now or hereafter amended, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution taking such prior action.
.
Consent to Corporate Action Without a Meeting
 
9.3 For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to receive payment of any dividend or other distribution or allotment of any rights or the stockholders entitled to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion, or exchange of stock, or for the purpose of any other lawful action, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted, and which record date shall be not more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days prior to such action. If no record date is fixed, the record date for determining stockholders for any such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution relating thereto.
.
Dividends, Distributions, and Other Rights
 
9.4. At least ten days before each meeting of stockholders, a complete list of the stockholders entitled to vote at such meeting shall be made, arranged in alphabetical order, and showing the address of each stockholder and the number of shares registered in the name of each stockholder. This list shall be open to examination by any stockholder, for any purpose germane to the meeting, during ordinary business hours, for a period of ten days prior to the meeting, either at a place within the city where the meeting is to be held, which place shall be specified in the notice of the meeting, or, if not so specified, at the place where the meeting is to be held. The
.
Voting List
 
list shall also be produced and kept at such meeting for inspection by any stockholder who is present.
 
SECTION 10.
.
Action by Stockholders Without a Meeting
 
Subject to the provisions of Article NINTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, any action which could be taken at any annual or special meeting of stockholders may be taken without a meeting, without prior notice, and without a vote, if a consent or consents in writing, setting forth the action so taken, are (a) signed by the holders of outstanding stock having not fewer than the minimum number of votes that would be necessary to authorize or take such action at a meeting at which all shares entitled to vote thereon were present and voted and (b) delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the records of proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Delivery made to the Corporation's registered office shall be by hand or by certified mail or registered mail, return receipt requested. Every written consent shall bear the date of signature of each stockholder who signs the consent and no written consent shall be effective to take the corporate action referred to therein unless written consents signed by a sufficient number of stockholders to take such action are delivered to the Corporation, in the manner required by this section, within sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days of the date of the earliest dated consent delivered to the Corporation in the manner required by this section. The validity of any consent executed by a proxy for a stockholder pursuant to a telegram, cablegram, or other means of electronic transmission transmitted to such proxy holder by or upon the authorization of the stockholder shall be determined by or at the direction of the Secretary of the Corporation. A written record of the information upon which the person making such determination relied shall be made and kept in the records of the proceedings of the stockholders. Any such consent shall be inserted in the minute book as if it were the minutes of a meeting of the stockholders. Prompt notice of the taking of the corporate action without a meeting by less than unanimous written consent shall be given to those stockholders who have not consented in writing.
 
SECTION 11.
.
Business and Nominations at Stockholders' Meetings
 
11.1 In addition to the election of directors, other proper business may be transacted at the annual meeting of stockholders, provided that such business is a proper matter for stockholder action and is properly brought before such meeting. To be properly brought before an annual meeting, nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors and business to be considered by stockholders must be (a) made or brought by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, or (b) made or brought before the meeting by a stockholder of the Corporation who is a stockholder of record at the time of giving notice as required in this By-Law, who is entitled to vote at the meeting, and who complies with the notice procedures set forth in this By-Law. Notice by a stockholder pursuant to (b) above must be in writing, in accordance with Section 12 of this Article I, and received by the Secretary not earlier than the one-hundred and twentieth day nor later than the close of business on the ninetieth day prior to the date specified in Section 1 of this Article I for such annual meeting; provided, however, that in the event that the date of the annual meeting is more than thirty days before or more than sixty days after such date, notice by the stockholder must be received by the Secretary not earlier than the one-hundred and twentieth
.
Business and Nominations at Annual Meetings
 
day prior to such annual meeting and not later than the close of business on the ninetieth day prior to such annual meeting or the tenth day following the day on which public announcement of the date of such meeting is first made by the Corporation.
 
11.2 . Any stockholder notice given pursuant to Section 11.1 shall set forth (i) the name and address of the stockholder proposing such business and of the beneficial owner, if any, on whose behalf the proposal or nomination is made; (ii) a representation that the stockholder is entitled to vote at such meeting and a statement of the number of shares of the Corporation which are owned by the stockholder and the number of shares which are beneficially owned by the beneficial owner, if any; (iii) a representation that the stockholder intends to appear in person or by proxy at the meeting to nominate the person or persons or to propose the business specified in the notice; and (iv) as to each person the stockholder proposes to nominate for election or re-election as a director, the name and address of such person and such other information regarding such nominee as would be required in a proxy statement filed pursuant to the proxy rules of the Securities and Exchange Commission had such nominee been nominated by the Board of Directors, and a description of any arrangements or understandings, between the stockholder and such nominee and any other persons (including their names), pursuant to which the nomination is to be made, and the written consent of each such nominee to being named in the proxy statement as a nominee and to serving as a director if elected; or, as to each matter the stockholder proposes to bring before the meeting, a brief description of the business desired to be brought before the meeting, the reasons for conducting such business at the meeting, the language of the business matter (if appropriate), and any material interest of the stockholder in such business.
Stockholder Notice
 
11.3 At any special meeting of the stockholders, only such business as is specified in the notice of such special meeting given by or at the direction of the person or persons calling such meeting, in accordance with Section 2 of this Article I, shall come before such meeting. Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors may be made at a special meeting of stockholders at which directors are to be elected pursuant to the Corporation's notice of meeting (a) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or (b) provided that the Board of Directors has determined that directors shall be elected at such meeting, by any stockholder of the Corporation who is a stockholder of record at the time of giving of notice provided for in this By-Law, who shall be entitled to vote at the meeting and who complies with the notice procedures set forth in this By-Law. In the event the Corporation calls a special meeting of stockholders for the purpose of electing one or more directors to the Board of Directors, any such stockholder may nominate a person or persons for election to such position(s) as specified in the Corporation's notice of meeting, if the stockholder's notice required by paragraph 11.1 of this By-Law shall be delivered to the Secretary not earlier than the one hundred and twentieth day nor later than the ninetieth day prior to such special meeting or the tenth day following the day on which public announcement is first made of the date of the special meeting and of the nominees proposed by the Board of Directors to be elected at such meeting.
.
Business and Nominations at Special Meetings
 
11.4 . No business shall be conducted nor director nominations made at any meeting of stockholders except in accordance with this Section 11. If
Stockholder Meeting Procedures
 
the facts warrant, the Board of Directors, or the chairman of a stockholders' meeting at which directors are to be elected, may determine and declare (a) that a proposal does not constitute proper business to be transacted at the meeting or (b) that business was not properly brought before the meeting in accordance with the provisions of this Section 11 or (c) that a nomination was not made in accordance with this Section 11; and, if it is so determined, the defective proposal or nomination shall be disregarded and shall not be transacted or acted upon. The right of stockholders to bring business before or to make nominations pursuant to the foregoing procedure is subject to the rights of the holders of any class or series of stock having a preference over the Common Stock as to dividends or upon liquidation. The procedures set forth in this Section 11 for stockholders' bringing business before a stockholders' meeting or stockholders' making nominations for the election of directors are in addition to, and not in lieu or limitation of, (a) any procedures now in effect or hereafter adopted by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof and (b) the requirements set forth in Rule 14a-8 and Rule 14a-11 under Section 14 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, or any successor provisions.
 
11.5 . For purposes of this By-Law, "public announcement" as to an annual or special meeting of stockholders shall mean disclosure in a press release reported by the Dow Jones News Service, Associated Press or comparable national news service or in a document publicly filed by the Corporation with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to Section 13, 14 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act. In no event shall the public announcement of an adjournment of an annual or special meeting commence a new time period for the giving of a stockholder's notice as described above.
Public Announcement of Stockholders' Meetings
 
SECTION 12.
.
Notice to Corporation
 
Any written notice required to be delivered by a stockholder to the Corporation pursuant to Section 11.1 of this Article I or Section 2.1 of Article II must be given, either by personal delivery or by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, to the Secretary at the Corporation's executive offices in the City of Seattle, State of Washington.
 
 
 
SECTION 1.
.
Number and Term of Office
 
The number of directors shall be twelve, but the number may be increased, or decreased to not less than three, from time to time, either by the directors by adoption of a resolution to such effect or by the stockholders by amendment of the By-Laws in accordance with Article VIII hereof. The directors shall be divided into three classes, each of which shall be composed as nearly as possible of one-third of the directors. Each director shall serve for the term to which the director was elected, and until a successor shall have been elected and qualified or until the director's prior death, resignation, or removal. At each annual election, directors shall be chosen for a full three-year term to succeed those whose terms expire.
 
SECTION 2.
.
Nomination and Election
 
2.1 Only persons who are nominated in accordance with Article I, Section 11 of these By-Laws shall be eligible for election as directors.
.
Nomination
 
2.2 At each election of directors, the persons receiving the greatest number of votes shall be the directors.
.
Election
 
SECTION 3.
.
Place of Meeting
 
Meetings of the Board of Directors, or of any committee thereof, may be held either within or without the State of Delaware.
 
SECTION 4.
.
Annual Meeting
 
Each year the Board of Directors shall meet in connection with the annual meeting of stockholders for the purpose of electing officers and for the transaction of other business. No notice of such meeting is required. Such annual meeting may be held at any other time or place which shall be specified in a notice given as hereinafter provided for special meetings of the Board, or in a consent and waiver of notice thereof, signed by all the directors.
 
SECTION 5.
.
Stated Meetings
 
The Board of Directors may, by resolution adopted by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board, from time to time appoint the time and place for holding stated meetings of the Board, if by it deemed advisable; and such stated meetings shall thereupon be held at the time and place so appointed, without the giving of any special notice with regard thereto. In case the day appointed for a stated meeting shall fall upon a legal holiday, such meeting shall be held on the next following day, not a legal holiday, at the regularly appointed hour. Except as otherwise provided in the By-Laws, any and all business may be transacted at any stated meeting.
 
SECTION 6.
.
Special Meetings
 
6.1 Special meetings of the Board of Directors may be called by or at the request of the Chairman of the Board or any two directors. Notice of a special meeting of the Board of Directors, stating the place, day, and hour of the meeting, shall be given to each director in writing (by mail, wire, facsimile, or personal delivery) or orally (by telephone or in person).
.
Convenors and Notice
 
6.2 With respect to a special meeting of the Board of Directors, a written waiver, signed by a director, shall be deemed equivalent to notice to that director. A director's attendance at a meeting shall constitute that director's waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the director attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting was not lawfully called or convened. Neither the business to be transacted at, nor the purpose of, any regular or special meeting of the Board of Directors need be specified in the waiver of notice of such meeting.
.
Waiver of Notice
 
SECTION 7.
.
Quorum and Manner of Acting
 
Except as herein otherwise provided, forty percent of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided in these By-Laws at the time of any stated or special meeting of the Board or, if vacancies exist on the Board of Directors, forty percent of such number of directors then in office, provided, however, that such number may not be less than one-third of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided in these By-Laws, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and, except as otherwise required by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by the By-Laws, the act of a majority of the directors present at any such meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of the Board of Directors. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the directors present may adjourn any meeting, from time to time, until a quorum is present. No notice of any adjourned meeting need be given.
 
SECTION 8.
.
Chairman of the Board
 
The Chairman of the Board shall preside, when present, at all meetings of the Board, except as otherwise provided by law.
 
SECTION 9.
.
Resignations
 
Any director of the Corporation may resign at any time by giving written notice thereof to the Secretary. Such resignation shall take effect at the time specified therefor or if the time is not specified, upon delivery thereof; and, unless otherwise specified with respect thereto, the acceptance of such resignation shall not be necessary to make it effective.
 
SECTION 10.
.
Removal of Directors
 
Any director may be removed solely for cause by the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, at a meeting of the stockholders called for the purpose; and the vacancy on the Board caused by any such removal may be filled by the stockholders at such meeting or at any subsequent meeting.
 
SECTION 11.
.
Filling of Vacancies Not Caused by Removal
 
In case of any increase in the number of directors, or of any vacancy created by death or resignation, the additional director or directors may be elected or, as the case may be, the vacancy or vacancies may be filled, either (a) by the Board of Directors at any meeting, (i) if the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH, or (ii) if the Corporation does not have an Interested Stockholder, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the remaining directors, though less than a quorum; or (b) by the stockholders entitled to vote, either at an annual meeting or at a special meeting thereof called for the purpose, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the outstanding shares entitled to vote at such meeting.
 
SECTION 12.
.
Directors' Fees
 
The Board of Directors shall have authority to determine from time to time the amount of compensation which shall be paid to its members for attendance at meetings of the Board or of any committee of the Board.
 
SECTION 13. Any action required or permitted to be taken at any meeting of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof may be taken without a meeting if all members of the Board or committee, as the case may be, consent thereto in writing, and the writing or writings are filed with the minutes of proceedings of the Board or committee.
.
Action Without a Meeting
 
 
 
SECTION 1.
.
Audit Committee
 
In addition to any committees appointed pursuant to Section 2 of this Article, there shall be an Audit Committee, appointed annually by the Board of Directors, consisting of at least three directors who are not members of management. It shall be the responsibility of the Audit Committee to review the scope and results of the annual independent audit of books and records of the Corporation and its subsidiaries and to discharge such other responsibilities as may from time to time be assigned to it by the Board of Directors. The Audit Committee shall meet at such times and places as the members deem advisable, and shall make such recommendations to the Board of Directors as they consider appropriate.
 
SECTION 2.
.
Other Committees
 
2.1 The Board of Directors may appoint standing or temporary committees and invest such committees with such powers as it may see fit, with power to subdelegate such powers if deemed desirable by the Board of Directors; but no such committee shall have the power or authority of the Board of Directors to adopt, amend, or repeal the By-Laws of the Corporation or approve, adopt or recommend to the stockholders of the Corporation any action or matter expressly required by the Certificate of Incorporation, these By-Laws or the Delaware General Corporation Law to be submitted to stockholders for approval.
.
Committee Powers
 
2.2 The Board of Directors may designate one or more directors as alternate members of any committee, who may replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of the committee. In the absence or disqualification of a member of a committee, the member or members thereof present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, whether or not such member or members constitute a quorum, may unanimously appoint another member of the Board to act at the meeting in the place of any such absent or disqualified member.
.
Committee Members
 
SECTION 3.
.
Quorum and Manner of Acting
 
A majority of the number of directors composing any committee of the Board of Directors, as established and fixed by resolution of the Board of Directors, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at any meeting of such committee but, if less than a majority are present at a meeting, a majority of such directors present may adjourn the meeting from time to time without further notice. The act of a majority of the members of a committee present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of such committee.
 
 
 
SECTION 1.
.
Officers
 
The elected officers of the Corporation shall be a Chairman of the Board (who shall be a director) and, at the discretion of the Board, a President (who shall be a director), and one or more Vice Presidents (each of whom may be assigned by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer an additional title descriptive of the functions assigned to such officer and one or more of whom may be designated Executive or Senior Vice President). The Board may also elect one or more Vice Chairmen. The Board of Directors shall also designate either the Chairman of the Board or the President as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation. The Board of Directors shall appoint a Controller, a Secretary, and a Treasurer. Any number of offices, whether elective or appointive, may be held by the same person. The Chief Executive Officer may, by a writing filed with the Secretary, designate titles as officers for employees and agents and appoint Assistant Secretaries and Assistant Treasurers, as, from time to time, may appear to be necessary or advisable in the conduct of the affairs of the Corporation and may, in the same manner, terminate or change such titles.
 
SECTION 2.
.
Term of Office
 
So far as practicable, all elected officers shall be elected at the annual meeting of the Board in each year, and shall hold office until the annual meeting of the Board in the next subsequent year and until their respective successors are chosen. The Controller, Secretary, and Treasurer shall hold office at the pleasure of the Board.
 
SECTION 3.
.
Salaries of Elected Officers
 
The salaries paid to the elected officers of the Corporation shall be authorized or approved by the Board of Directors.
 
SECTION 4.
.
Bonuses
 
None of the officers, directors, or employees of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations shall at any time be paid any bonus or share in the earnings or profits of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations except pursuant to a plan approved by affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members of the Board of Directors.
 
SECTION 5.
.
Removal of Elected and Appointed Officers
 
Any elected or appointed officer may be removed at any time, either for or without cause, by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors, at any meeting called for the purpose.
 
SECTION 6.
.
Vacancies
 
If any vacancy occurs in any office, the Board of Directors may elect or appoint a successor to fill such vacancy for the remainder of the term.
 
 
 
SECTION 1.
.
Chairman of the Board
 
The Chairman of the Board shall preside, when present, at all meetings of the stockholders (except as otherwise provided by statute) and at all meetings of the Board of Directors. The Chairman shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation; to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the Chairman by the Board of Directors.
 
SECTION 2.
.
President
 
The President shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation and to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; during the absence or disability of the Chairman of the Board to exercise the Chairman's powers and to perform the Chairman's duties; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the President by the Board of Directors; provided, that if the office of President is vacant, the Chairman shall exercise the duties ordinarily exercised by the President until such time as a President is elected or appointed.
 
SECTION 3.
.
Chief Executive Officer
 
The officer designated by the Board of Directors as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation shall have general and active control of its business and affairs. The Chief Executive Officer shall have general power to appoint or designate all employees and agents of the Corporation whose appointment or designation is not otherwise provided for and to fix the compensation thereof, subject to the provisions of these By-Laws; to remove or suspend any employee or agent who shall not have been elected or appointed by the Board of Directors or other body; to suspend for cause any employee, agent, or officer, other than an elected officer, pending final action by the body which shall have appointed such employee, agent, or officer; and to exercise all the powers usually pertaining to the office held by the Chief Executive Officer of a corporation.
 
SECTION 4.
.
Vice Presidents and Controller
 
The several Vice Presidents and the Controller shall perform all such duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of them, from time to time, by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer, respectively.
 
SECTION 5.
Secretary
.
 
The Secretary shall attend to the giving of notice of all meetings of stockholders and of the Board of Directors and shall keep and attest true records of all proceedings thereat. The Secretary shall have charge of the corporate seal and have authority to attest any and all instruments or writings to which the same may be affixed and shall keep and account for all books, documents, papers, and records of the Corporation relating to its corporate organization. The Secretary shall have authority to sign stock certificates and shall generally perform all the duties usually appertaining to the office of secretary of a corporation. In the absence of
 
the Secretary, an Assistant Secretary or Secretary pro tempore shall perform the duties of the Secretary.
 
SECTION 6.
.
Treasurer
 
The Treasurer shall have the care and custody of all moneys, funds, and securities of the Corporation, and shall deposit or cause to be deposited all funds of the Corporation in accordance with directions or authorizations of the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer. The Treasurer shall have power to sign stock certificates, to indorse for deposit or collection, or otherwise, all checks, drafts, notes, bills of exchange, or other commercial paper payable to the Corporation, and to give proper receipts or discharges therefor. In the absence of the Treasurer, an Assistant Treasurer shall perform the duties of the Treasurer.
 
SECTION 7.
.
Additional Powers and Duties
 
In addition to the foregoing especially enumerated duties and powers, the several officers of the Corporation shall perform such other duties and exercise such further powers as may be provided in these By-Laws or as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine, or as may be assigned to them by any superior officer.
 
SECTION 8.
.
Disaster Emergency Powers of Acting Officers
 
If, as a result of a disaster or other state of emergency, the Chief Executive Officer is unable to perform the duties of that office, (a) the powers and duties of the Chief Executive Officer shall be performed by the employee with the highest base salary who shall be available and capable of performing such powers and duties and, if more than one such employee has the same base salary, by the employee whose surname begins with the earliest letter of the alphabet among the group of those employees with the same base salary; and (b) the officer performing such duties shall continue to perform such powers and duties until the Chief Executive Officer becomes capable of performing those duties or until the Board of Directors shall have elected a new Chief Executive Officer or designated another individual as Acting Chief Executive Officer; and (c) such officer shall have the power in addition to all other powers granted to the Chief Executive Officer by these By-Laws and by the Board of Directors to appoint an acting President, acting Vice President - Finance, acting Controller, acting Secretary, and acting Treasurer, if any of the persons duly elected to any such office is not by reason of such disaster or emergency able to perform the duties of such office, each of such acting appointees to serve in such capacities until the officer for whom the appointee is acting becomes capable of performing the duties of such office or until the Board of Directors shall have designated another individual to perform such duties or have elected another person to fill such office; and (d) any such acting officer so appointed shall be entitled to exercise all powers vested by the By-Laws or the Board of Directors in the duly elected officer for whom the acting officer is acting; and (e) anyone transacting business with this Corporation may rely upon a certification by any two officers of the Corporation that a specified individual has succeeded to the powers of the Chief Executive Officer and that such person has appointed other acting officers as herein provided and any person, firm, corporation, or other entity to which such certification has been delivered by such officers may continue to rely upon it until notified of a change in writing signed by two officers of this Corporation.
 
 
 
SECTION 1.
.
Stock Certificates
 
Every stockholder shall be entitled to a certificate, signed by the Chairman of the Board or the President or a Vice President and the Treasurer or an Assistant Treasurer or the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary, certifying the number of shares owned by the stockholder in the Corporation. Any and all of the signatures on a certificate may be a facsimile. If any officer, transfer agent, or registrar who has signed or whose facsimile signature has been placed upon a certificate shall have ceased to be such officer, transfer agent, or registrar before such certificate is issued, it may be issued by the Corporation with the same effect as if he or she were such officer, transfer agent, or registrar at the date of issue.
 
SECTION 2.
.
Transfer Agents and Registrars
 
The Board of Directors may, in its discretion, appoint responsible banks or trust companies in the Borough of Manhattan, in the City of New York, State of New York, and in such other city or cities as the Board may deem advisable, from time to time, to act as transfer agents and registrars of the stock of the Corporation; and, when such appointments shall have been made, no stock certificate shall be valid until countersigned by one of such transfer agents and registered by one of such registrars.
 
SECTION 3.
.
Transfers of Stock
 
Shares of stock may be transferred by delivery of the certificates therefor, accompanied either by an assignment in writing on the back of the certificates or by written power of attorney to sell, assign, and transfer the same, signed by the record holder thereof; but no transfer shall affect the right of the Corporation to pay any dividend upon the stock to the holder of record thereof, or to treat the holder of record as the holder in fact thereof for all purposes, and no transfer shall be valid, except between the parties thereto, until such transfer shall have been made upon the books of the Corporation.
 
SECTION 4.
.
Lost Certificates
 
The Board of Directors may provide for the issuance of new certificates of stock to replace certificates of stock lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, or alleged to be lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, upon such terms and in accordance with such procedures as the Board of Directors shall deem proper and prescribe.
 
 
 
SECTION 1.
Fiscal Year
.
 
The fiscal year of the Corporation shall be the calendar year.
 
SECTION 2. (Repealed in its entirety by vote of the stockholders, May 5, 1975.)
 
SECTION 3.
.
Signing of Negotiable Instruments
 
All bills, notes, checks, or other instruments for the payment of money shall be signed or countersigned by such officer or officers and in such manner as from time to time may be prescribed by resolution (whether general or special) of the Board of Directors.
 
SECTION 4.
.
Indemnification of Directors and Officers
 
4.1 Each person who was or is made a party or is threatened to be made a party to or is otherwise involved (including, without limitation, as a witness) in any actual or threatened action, suit, or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative, or investigative (hereinafter a "proceeding"), by reason of the fact that he or she is or was a director or officer of the Corporation or that, being or having been such a director or officer or an employee of the Corporation, he or she is or was serving at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation as a director, officer, employee, or agent of another corporation or of a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise, including service with respect to an employee benefit plan (hereinafter an "indemnitee"), whether the basis of such proceeding is alleged action in an official capacity as such a director, officer, employee, or agent or in any other capacity while serving as such a director, officer, employee, or agent, shall be indemnified and held harmless by the Corporation to the full extent permitted by the Delaware General Corporation Law, as the same exists or may hereafter be amended (but, in the case of any such amendment, only to the extent that such amendment permits the Corporation to provide broader indemnification rights than permitted prior thereto), or by other applicable law as then in effect, against all expense, liability, and loss (including attorneys' fees, judgments, fines, ERISA excise taxes or penalties, and amounts paid in settlement) actually and reasonably incurred or suffered by such indemnitee in connection therewith and such indemnification shall continue as to an indemnitee who has ceased to be a director, officer, employee, or agent and shall inure to the benefit of the indemnitee's heirs, executors, and administrators; , , that except as provided in Section 4.2 with respect to proceedings seeking to enforce rights to indemnification, the Corporation shall indemnify any such indemnitee in connection with a proceeding (or part thereof) initiated by such indemnitee only if such proceeding (or part thereof) was authorized or ratified by the Board of Directors of the Corporation. The right to indemnification conferred in this Section 4.1 shall be a contract right and shall include the right to be paid by the Corporation the expenses incurred in defending any such proceeding in advance of its final disposition (hereinafter an "advancement of expenses"); , , that an advancement of expenses incurred by an indemnitee in his or her capacity as a director or officer (and not in any other capacity in which service was or is rendered by such indemnitee, including, without limitation, service to an employee benefit plan) shall be made only upon delivery to the Corporation of an under-taking (hereinafter an "undertaking"), by or on behalf of such indemnitee, to repay all amounts so advanced if it shall ultimately be determined by final judicial decision from which there is no further right to appeal that such indemnitee is not entitled to be indemnified for such expenses under this Section 4.1 or otherwise; and , , that an advancement of expenses shall not be made if the Corporation's Board of Directors makes a good faith determination that such payment would violate law or public policy.
.
Right to Indemnification
provided
however
provided
however
provided
further
 
4.2 If a claim under Section 4.1 is not paid in full by the Corporation within sixty days after a written claim has been received by the Corporation, except in the case of a claim for an advancement of expenses, in which case the applicable period shall be twenty days, the indemnitee may at any time thereafter bring suit against the Corporation to recover the unpaid amount of the claim. If successful in whole or in part in any such suit, or in a suit brought by the Corporation to recover an advancement of expenses pursuant to the terms of an undertaking, the indemnitee shall also be entitled to be paid the expense of prosecuting or defending such suit. The indemnitee shall be presumed to be entitled to indemnification under this Section 4 upon submission of a written claim (and, in an action brought to enforce a claim for an advancement of expenses, where the required undertaking has been tendered to the Corporation), and thereafter the Corporation shall have the burden of proof to overcome the presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled. Neither the failure of the Corporation (including its Board of Directors, independent legal counsel, or its stockholders) to have made a determination prior to the commencement of such suit that indemnification of the indemnitee is proper in the circumstances, nor an actual determination by the Corporation (including its Board of Directors, independent legal counsel, or its stockholders) that the indemnitee is not entitled to indemnification shall be a defense to the suit or create a presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled.
.
Right of Indemnitee to Bring Suit
 
4.3 The rights to indemnification and to the advancement of expenses conferred in this Section 4 shall not be exclusive of any other right which any person may have or hereafter acquire under any statute, provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation, By-Laws, agreement, vote of stockholders or disinterested directors, or otherwise. Notwithstanding any amendment to or repeal of this Section 4, or of any of the procedures established by the Board of Directors pursuant to Section 4.7, any indemnitee shall be entitled to indemnification in accordance with the provisions hereof and thereof with respect to any acts or omissions of such indemnitee occurring prior to such amendment or repeal.
.
Nonexclusivity of Rights
 
4.4 The Corporation may maintain insurance, at its expense, to protect itself and any director, officer, employee, or agent of the Corporation or another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise against any expense, liability, or loss, whether or not the Corporation would have the power to indemnify such person against such expense, liability, or loss under the Delaware General Corporation Law. The Corporation may, without further stockholder approval, enter into contracts with any indemnitee in furtherance of the provisions of this Section 4 and may create a trust fund, grant a security interest, or use other means (including, without limitation, a letter of credit) to ensure the payment of such amounts as may be necessary to effect indemnification as provided in this Section 4.
.
Insurance, Contracts, and Funding
 
4.5 Any person who is or was a director, officer, or employee of the Corporation who is or was serving (i) as a director or officer of another corporation of which a majority of the shares entitled to vote in the election of its directors is held by the Corporation or (ii) in an executive or management capacity in a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise of which the Corporation or a wholly owned subsidiary of the Corporation is a general partner or has a majority ownership shall be deemed to be so serving
.
Persons Serving Other Entities
 
at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation and entitled to indemnification and advancement of expenses under Section 4.1.
 
4.6 The Corporation may, by action of its Board of Directors, authorize one or more executive officers to grant rights to advancement of expenses to employees or agents of the Corporation on such terms and conditions as such officer or officers deem appropriate under the circumstances. The Corporation may, by action of its Board of Directors, grant rights to indemnification and advancement of expenses to employees or agents or groups of employees or agents of the Corporation with the same scope and effect as the provisions of this Section 4 with respect to the indemnification and advancement of expenses of directors and officers of the Corporation; , , that an undertaking shall be made by an employee or agent only if required by the Board of Directors.
.
Indemnification of Employees and Agents of the Corporation
provided
however
 
4.7 The Board of Directors may establish reasonable procedures for the submission of claims for indemnification pursuant to this Section 4, determination of the entitlement of any person thereto, and review of any such determination. Such procedures shall be set forth in an appendix to these By-Laws and shall be deemed for all purposes to be a part hereof.
.
Procedures for the Submission of Claims
 
SECTION 5.
.
Designated Engineer in the State of Washington
 
5.1 The Board of Directors, as required by the Revised Code of Washington, has appointed a licensed professional engineer in the State of Washington the Designated Engineer as being in responsible charge for the practice of engineering performed by the Corporation in Washington.
.
Appointment of Designated Engineer
 
5.2 The Board of Directors grants and delegates to the Designated Engineer the full authority to make all final engineering decisions on behalf of the Corporation with respect to engineering work performed in the State of Washington.
.
Grant of Authority to the Designated Engineer
 
5.3 The Board of Directors grants and delegates to the appropriate officers of the Corporation the authority to designate each successor Designated Engineer as being in responsible charge for the practice of engineering and to notify the Washington Board of Registration for Professional Engineers and Land Surveyors of the appointment of each successor Designated Engineer within 30 days after the effective date of the appointment.
.
Grant of Authority to Appropriate Officers
 
 
 
SECTION 1.
.
Amendment of the By-Laws: General
 
Except as herein otherwise expressly provided, the By-Laws of the Corporation may be altered or repealed in any particular and new By-Laws, not inconsistent with any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or any provision of law, may be adopted, either by the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority in number of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote at an annual meeting of stockholders or at a special meeting thereof, the notice of which special meeting shall include the form of the proposed alteration or repeal or of the proposed new By-Laws, or a summary thereof; or either
 
 
 
provided, in either of the latter cases, that the notice of such meeting shall include the form of the proposed alteration or repeal or of the proposed new By-Laws, or a summary thereof.
 
SECTION 2.
.
Amendments as to Compensation and Removal of Officers
 
Notwithstanding anything contained in these By-Laws to the contrary, the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the Voting Stock, as defined in Article FOURTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, at a meeting of the stockholders called for the purpose, shall be required to alter, amend, repeal, or adopt any provision inconsistent with Sections 3, 4 and 5 of Article IV hereof, notice of which meeting shall include the form of the proposed amendment, or a summary thereof.
 
SECTION 3.
.
Amendments as to Stockholders' Meetings, Directors
 
Notwithstanding anything contained in these By-Laws to the contrary, either (a) the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, or (b) the affirmative vote of the holders of record of at least seventy-five percent of the Voting Stock, as defined in Article FOURTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, shall be required to alter, amend, repeal, or adopt any provision inconsistent with Sections 1, 2, and 4 of Article I and Sections 1, 10, and 11 of Article II.
 
SECTION 4.
.
Amendment of this Article VIII
 
Notwithstanding anything contained in these By-Laws to the contrary, either (a) the recommendation of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, together with the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the Voting Stock, as defined in Article FOURTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, or (b) the affirmative vote of the holders of record of at least seventy-five percent of the Voting Stock, as defined in Article FOURTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, shall be required to alter, amend, repeal, or adopt any provision inconsistent with this Article VIII.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20041216095140.txt.gz
TIME:20041216095140
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
 
On December 12, 2004, the Compensation Committee of The Boeing Company (the "Company") approved amendments to the 1999 Bonus and Retention Award Plan (the "Plan") as follows: (1) changing the name of the Plan to the 2004 Variable Compensation Plan; (2) broadening the scope of the Plan to include sales incentives/commission programs and variable pay programs for certain union-represented employees; (3) requiring approval of payouts by the head of the applicable business unit; (4) eliminating maximum target award and excepting sales incentive/commission programs from the maximum payout of 200% of target award; (5) allowing for the adjustment of goals to account for extraordinary events/changes in business conditions; and (6) raising the maximum aggregate annual awards for each program created under the Plan to $25 million.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
(a) Not applicable
 
(b) Not applicable
 
(c) Exhibits
 
10.1    2004 Variable Compensation Plan
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 10.1
 
 
 
 
 
Examples of types of compensation and programs to be permitted under this Plan are:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Examples include, but are not limited to, signing bonuses, retention incentive arrangements, completion bonuses and similar types of compensation.
 
 
1
Examples include, but are not limited to, incentive plans tied to unique business requirements, such as acquired plans, commission plans, and incentive plans for collective bargaining units.
 
 
 
In addition, the head of the relevant business unit (Vice President level or above) must also adopt the program. If the program is established to cover employees of a subsidiary of the Company, then the board of directors or similar governing body of the subsidiary (or its delegate) must adopt the program, in place of the head of the business unit.
 
 
 
 
In addition, the head of the relevant business unit (Vice President level or above) must also approve the goals and related potential awards established for a performance period prior to the beginning of the performance period. If the program is established to cover employees of a subsidiary of the Company, then the board of directors or similar governing body of the subsidiary (or its delegate) must adopt the program, in place of the business unit head.
 
 
2
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
3
 
 
4


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20041223110537.txt.gz
TIME:20041223110537
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
 
1.    
364-Day Revolving Credit Agreement
 
On November 19, 2004, we entered into a $2.0 billion, 364-day revolving credit agreement (the "Credit Agreement"), replacing an earlier $2.5 billion credit agreement with Citigroup Global Markets Inc. and J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. as joint lead arrangers and joint book managers, JPMorgan Chase Bank as syndication agent, and Citibank N.A. as administrative agent, and a syndicate of lenders as defined in the Credit Agreement.
 
Borrowings under the Credit Agreement (that are not based on Eurodollar rates) bear interest at an annual rate based on the "base rate" of interest in effect plus the applicable margin and applicable utilization fees payable quarterly and in arrears as defined in the Credit Agreement. The "base rate" of interest is the base rate announced publicly by Citibank, N.A., from time to time. The applicable margin will vary depending upon our credit rating and whether the payment is made before or after the termination date and may vary from a low of 0.100% to a high of 0.475%. The applicable utilization fee varies between 0.100% and 0.275% depending on our credit rating and applies on any date that the aggregate principal amount of outstanding advances exceeds 25% of the aggregate commitments.
 
The Credit Agreement contains customary terms and conditions, including certain financial covenants that are similar to those contained in the previous facility, including, without limitation, covenants restricting our ability to incur liens, merge or consolidate with another entity. Further, the Credit Agreement contains a covenant restricting our ability to permit consolidated debt (as defined in the Credit Agreement) to exceed 60% of our total capital (as defined in the Credit Agreement) while any amount is payable to a lender under the Credit Agreement.
 
Some of the lenders under the Credit Agreement and their affiliates have various relationships with us and our subsidiaries involving the provision of financial services, including cash management, investment banking, trust and leasing services. In addition, we and some of our subsidiaries have entered into foreign exchange and other derivative arrangements with certain of the lenders and their affiliates.
 
2.    
Directors Compensation
 
On August 30, 2004, our Board of Directors approved an increase in the deferred stock portion of the annual retainer for non-employee directors, effective January 1, 2005. The non-employee directors annual retainer will include $130,000 in deferred stock units, an increase of $90,000 in deferred stock units. In connection with this change, the non-employee directors will no longer receive (i) contributions of additional deferred stock units with respect to compensation deferred by a non-executive director and (ii) stock option grants in connection with our annual meetings. The remaining components of the non-employee directors compensation remain unchanged from the amounts described in the Company's Proxy Statement for its 2004 Annual Meeting of Stockholders and are as follows:
 
 
Our non-executive Chairman will receive an annual cash retainer in the amount of $150,000 and $250,000 in deferred stock units, which represents an increase of $170,000 in deferred stock units. Similar to non-employee directors, the non-executive Chairman will no longer receive (i) contributions of additional deferred stock units with respect to compensation deferred by the non-executive Chairman and (ii) an option grant.
 
Item 2.03. Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation Under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
 
The information described above under "Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement" with respect to the 364-Day Revolving Credit Agreement is hereby incorporated by reference.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20050119172840.txt.gz
TIME:20050119172840
EVENTS:	Cost Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities	Material Impairments	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Cost Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities
ITEM: Material Impairments
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
Item 2.05 Costs Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities
 
On January 12, 2005, The Boeing Company (the "Company") decided to conclude production of the 717 commercial airplane in 2006 due to the lack of overall market demand for the airplane. The Company's decision is expected to result in total pre-tax charges of approximately $385 million, of which $280 million is expected to be incorporated in the Company's 2004 fourth quarter and year end results, $60 million is expected to be recognized in 2005, and $45 million is expected to be recognized over the period 2005-2007. The Company had previously stated on January 14, 2005 that termination of the 717 line would result in a $340 million charge to 2004 fourth quarter and year end results, but subsequently, the Company determined that $60 million (pension settlement costs) of that $340 million charge would instead be incorporated in 2005 results.
 
Of the $280 million charge that is expected to be incorporated in the Company's 2004 fourth quarter and year end results, supplier termination charges are estimated to be $171 million; production disruption and related charges are estimated to be $36 million; pension/post-retirement curtailment charges are estimated to be $43 million; and severance charges are estimated to be $30 million. Of the $105 million charge that is expected to be recorded by the Company in periods subsequent to 2004, pension settlement charges are estimated to be $60 million and plant shutdown charges are estimated to be $45 million. The termination of the 717 line will result in $385 million dollars of cash expenditures that are expected to occur during 2005-2007.
 
Item 2.06 Material Impairments
 
On January 12, 2005, the Company decided to recognize a pre-tax charge of approximately $275 million related to the initial production of aerial refueling tankers for the U.S. Air Force. The Company reached its decision as a result of its regular quarter and year-end reviews and reflects the Company's updated assessment of securing the specific USAF 767 Tanker contract. The Company estimates future cash expenditures to be approximately $49 million.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
(a) Not applicable
 
(b) Not applicable
 
(c) Exhibits
 
99.1    Press release issued by The Boeing Company on January 14, 2005
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 

EXHIBIT 99.1
 
 
 
Boeing to Recognize Charges for USAF 767 Tanker Costs and Conclusion of 717 Production
 
 
 
CHICAGO, Jan. 14, 2005  The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] announced it plans to recognize pre-tax charges totaling approximately $615 million, or $0.48 per share, related to the U.S. Air Force 767 Tanker program and expenses incurred to end production of the 717. The charges will be incorporated in the company's fourth-quarter and full-year 2004 results, scheduled to be released on Feb. 2, 2005.
 
The charge related to the initial production of aerial refueling tankers for the U.S. Air Force is approximately $275 million pre-tax, or $0.21 per share, including expected supplier obligations. The charge, which is a result of the Company's regular quarter- and year-end reviews, reflects Boeing's updated assessment of securing the specific USAF 767 Tanker contract that was being negotiated, given the continued delay and now likely re-competition of the contract.
 
Boeing remains firmly committed to the USAF 767 Tanker program and is ready to support its customer in whatever decision is made regarding the recapitalization of the nation's current aerial refueling fleet. Boeing used its own money and received no government funding in development of the USAF 767 Tanker.
 
The impact of this decision on the 767 commercial airplane program's gross margin is expected to be offset by favorable performance. No decision has been made on the potential phase out of the 767 line.
 
Another charge of approximately $340 million pre-tax, or $0.27 per share, is attributable to a decision to conclude production of the 717 commercial airplane in 2006 and includes expected supplier termination charges. Most of the cash expenditures related to the charge and an additional $45 million of period expenses associated with the shutdown are expected to occur in 2005 through 2007.
 
"The 717 brings tremendous value to the airlines that operate it. Unfortunately, the overall market for the airplane does not support continuing 717 production beyond delivering on our current commitments," said Boeing Commercial Airplanes President and Chief Executive Officer Alan Mulally. "We extend our appreciation and gratitude to all our employees, customers and partners who worked so well together on the 717. The moving production line pioneered on this airplane will be a lasting legacy across our current and future airplane programs.
 
"As with all Boeing airplanes, we will continue to provide exceptional customer support for 717s in service for many years to come. And Boeing will continue to compete aggressively with our popular 737 Next Generation family of airplanes, which serves the 100- to 215-seat market," said Mulally.
 
The Company will discuss its financial outlook in more detail when it releases fourth-quarter and year-end 2004 results on Feb. 2.
 
 
Certain statements in this report may constitute "forward-looking" statements within the meaning of the Private Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions as to future events that may not prove to be accurate. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak only as of the date they were made and we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise. Our actual results and future trends may differ materially depending on a variety of factors, including the continued operation, viability and growth of major airline customers and non-airline customers (such as the U.S. Government); adverse developments in the value of collateral securing customer and other financings; the occurrence of any significant collective bargaining labor dispute; our successful execution of internal performance plans, production rate increases and decreases (including any reduction in or termination of an aircraft product), acquisition and divestiture plans, and other cost-reduction and productivity efforts; charges from any future SFAS No. 142 review; an adverse development in rating agency credit ratings or assessments; the actual outcomes of certain pending sales campaigns and the launch of the 7E7 program and U.S. and foreign government procurement activities, including the uncertainty associated with the procurement of tankers by the U.S. Department of Defense (DoD); the cyclical nature of some of our businesses; unanticipated financial market changes which may impact pension plan assumptions; domestic and international competition in the defense, space and commercial areas; continued integration of acquired businesses; performance issues with key suppliers, subcontractors and customers; significant disruption to air travel worldwide (including future terrorist attacks); global trade policies; worldwide political stability; domestic and international economic conditions; price escalation; the outcome of political and legal processes, changing priorities or reductions in the U.S. Government or foreign government defense and space budgets; termination of government or commercial contracts due to unilateral government or customer action or failure to perform; legal, financial and governmental risks related to international transactions; legal proceedings; tax settlements with the IRS; U.S. Air Force review of previously awarded contracts; and other economic, political and technological risks and uncertainties. Additional information regarding these factors is contained in our SEC filings, including, without limitation, our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2003 and Form 10-Q for the period ending March 31, 2004, June 30, 2004 and Sept. 30, 2004.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20050202061327.txt.gz
TIME:20050202061327
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Disclosure of Results of Operations.
 
The following information is being furnished under Item 12 of Form 8-K: News Release by The Boeing Company, for the fourth quarter results and updated outlook as announced on February 2, 2005. The text of the release is attached as exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
(a) Not applicable
 
(b) Not applicable
 
(c) Exhibits
 
99.1    Press Release issued February 2, 2005.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
Boeing Reports Fourth-Quarter and Full-Year 2004 Results; Updates Outlook
 
 Integrated Defense Systems delivers strong revenue growth and profitability
 
 Commercial Airplanes achieves 14% order growth; launches 787 program, winning 126 orders and commitments in eight months
 
Financial Highlights:
 
 
 
 
Selected 2004 Operating Highlights:
 
 
 
 
Table 1. Summary Financial Results
 
 
 The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] reported fourth-quarter 2004 net income of $186 million, or $0.23 per share, on revenues of $13.3 billion. Reported net income for 2004 totaled $1.9 billion or $2.30 per share, on revenues of $52.5 billion. The results include previously announced charges totaling $0.44 per share for completing production on the 717 program and recognizing expenses related to the USAF 767 Tanker program as well as a $0.12 per share benefit related to state tax settlements.
CHICAGO, Feb. 2, 2005
 
"An intense focus on execution led to strongly improved results in 2004," said Boeing President and CEO Harry Stonecipher. "Integrated Defense Systems delivered double-digit revenue growth, outstanding profitability and over $30 billion of new orders for the year, which strengthens our revenue outlook going forward. Boeing Commercial Airplanes generated solid operating performance while successfully laying the groundwork for a significant increase in airplane deliveries to meet higher demand over the next few years. Our cash flow remains very strong. Significant progress on important new programs like the 787 (formerly the 7E7) and the Multi-mission Maritime Aircraft, as well as expansion of key contracts like Future Combat Systems, position us well for future growth. As we enter 2005 our focus remains on business execution, demonstrating our commitment to integrity and growing the business."
 
The Company's 2004 earnings from operations increased sharply to $2.0 billion (see Table 2), reflecting strong growth and profitability in the Company's defense and intelligence businesses and higher operating earnings at its Commercial Airplanes unit.
 
Table 2. Earnings from Operations & Margins
 
 
Pre-tax expense for share-based plans totaled $127 million in the fourth quarter and $576 million for 2004, reducing earnings per share by $0.10 and $0.45 respectively. These expenses are non-cash and are attributable to the Company's
 
equity compensation plans, including stock options, which the Company has expensed since 1998. Deferred stock compensation expense primarily attributable to vested and undistributed performance shares, which is separately determined based on the quarterly change in the Company's stock price, decreased fourth-quarter earnings by less than $0.01 per share as the Company's stock price rose only slightly in the period. For the year, deferred stock compensation expense reduced earnings per share by $0.06 as the Company's stock price increased almost 23 percent.
 
Cash flow remained very strong as the Company generated $3.7 billion of operating cash flow after pension contributions during 2004. The Company contributed an additional $750 million to its pension plans in the fourth quarter bringing total pension contributions for 2004 to $4.4 billion. Free cash flow* for the year, measured after investments in property, plant, and equipment, was $2.7 billion (see Table 3).
 
Table 3. Cash Flow
 
 
The Company's cash balance at year-end totaled $3.2 billion, compared to $4.6 billion at the end of 2003 (see Table 4). The change in cash balance reflected strong operating cash flows offset by the Company investment of $2.9 billion of cash into marketable securities. The combination of cash and marketable securities totaled $6.1 billion at the end of 2004, up from $4.6 billion in 2003. The Company repurchased 8.1 million shares during the quarter for $433 million; repurchases for all of 2004 totaled 14.7 million shares for $752 million. Boeing's debt was unchanged at $4.7 billion. Boeing Capital debt was reduced by $2.2 billion during 2004, primarily as a result of the sale of its commercial finance business and lower new aircraft financing volume.
 
Table 4. Cash, Marketable Securities and Debt Balances
 
 
Segment Results
 
Integrated Defense Systems
 
Integrated Defense Systems (IDS) delivered double-digit revenue growth and excellent profitability as its defense and intelligence businesses continued to perform in healthy markets. Revenues for all of 2004 grew 11 percent to $30.5 billion on strong growth in its Network Systems and Support Systems segments. Operating margins rose to 9.6 percent as all four IDS segments delivered improved performance. IDS expanded its business base with over $30 billion in orders including the U.S. Navy's Multi-mission Maritime Aircraft program and a significant expansion to the U.S. Army's Future Combat Systems program. IDS results are summarized in Table 5.
 
During the fourth quarter, IDS revenues increased 5 percent to $7.6 billion driven by growth in its Network Systems and Support Systems segments. IDS produced strong fourth-quarter operating margins of 8.9 percent, up from 8.9 percent in the fourth quarter of 2003 despite the $80 million charge taken for the USAF 767 Tanker program, which partially offset improved operating performance in all four segments.
 
Table 5. Integrated Defense Systems Operating Results
 
 
Aircraft and Weapon Systems delivered solid growth and excellent profitability in 2004. Full-year revenues rose 6 percent to $11.4 billion on increased F/A-22, F/A-18 and rotorcraft volume, which offset lower T-45 and F-15 deliveries and the cancellation of the Comanche program. Program performance was outstanding and offset Aircraft and Weapon Systems' portion of the charge ($62 million) for the USAF 767 Tanker program as operating margins reached 14.4 percent, up from 13.2 percent in 2003.
 
Network Systems continued its rapid growth and solid performance in 2004. Revenues rose 22 percent to $11.4 billion on increased activity in Future Combat Systems, missile defense (including the installation of 8 interceptors) and intelligence programs. Operating margins were 8.7 percent, up significantly from 2003, as higher revenues and strong execution produced solid performance across its programs.
 
Support Systems achieved excellent growth and profitability on its business base during 2004. Revenues increased 11 percent to $4.7 billion on significant increases in supply chain services, life-cycle customer support, and training systems and services which offset lower contractor logistical support volume. Operating margins grew to 13.7
 
percent on the higher revenue and strong program performance, which offset Support Systems' portion of the charge ($18 million) for the USAF 767 Tanker program.
 
Launch and Orbital Systems' 2004 results were impacted by the continued weakness in commercial space markets as well as cost growth in its commercial satellite business, which occurred primarily in the first three quarters. Revenues fell 1 percent from 2003 to $3.0 billion on lower satellite volume and two fewer Delta IV launches. Operating losses totaled $342 million reflecting cost growth on certain satellite programs partially offset by continued profitability on NASA programs.
 
At the end of 2004, IDS contractual backlog totaled $39.2 billion, down slightly from $40.9 billion at the end of 2003. Unobligated backlog was $47.3 billion at the end of 2004. Total IDS backlog, comprised of contractual and unobligated, was $86.5 billion compared with $91.4 billion at the end of 2003.
 
Boeing Commercial Airplanes
 
During 2004, Boeing Commercial Airplanes (BCA) aggressively managed for profitability and made investments to support long-term growth. Commercial Airplanes launched the 787 program in April and won 126 customer orders and commitments from 8 airlines. At the same time, Commercial Airplanes introduced the 777-300ER, launched the 747 Special Freighter and began offering the 777 Freighter. In early 2005, Commercial Airplanes won commitments from six Chinese airlines for 60 787s bringing total customer orders and commitments to 186. BCA results are summarized in Table 6.
 
Table 6. Commercial Airplanes Operating Results
 
 
 
For 2004, Commercial Airplanes delivered 285 airplanes and generated $21.0 billion of revenue. Operating earnings for the year were $0.8 billion while operating margins were 3.6 percent, primarily reflecting the fourth-quarter charges of $280 million to shut down the 717 program and $195 million for the USAF 767 Tanker program, which were partially offset by good operating performance.
 
For the quarter, Commercial Airplanes' revenues fell 8 percent to $5.4 billion, in line with deliveries which decreased 6 percent to 67 airplanes. Operating losses totaled $149 million, reflecting the program charges and lower twin-aisle deliveries.
 
Commercial Airplanes captured 81 net orders during the quarter and 272 net orders for the year, which included 56 787s. The fourth quarter also included 787 commitments from Primaris, Japan Airlines, Vietnam Airlines and Continental Airlines. Contractual backlog totaled $70.4 billion at year-end 2004, up significantly from $63.9 billion at the end of 2003.
 
Boeing Capital Corporation
 
Boeing Capital Corporation (BCC) continued to create value by supporting the operations of Boeing's business units while reducing portfolio risk. Revenues for the full year and fourth quarter were $959 million and $226 million respectively, down from the corresponding periods in 2003 due to lower new business volume. Pre-tax income for 2004 rose significantly to $183 million as BCC's risk management actions and the commercial market recovery supported a significant reduction in asset impairments and charges compared with 2003. Fourth-quarter pre-tax income totaled $35 million due to lower revenues and a charge to partially impair an EETC investment. BCC results are summarized in Table 7.
 
Table 7. Boeing Capital Corporation Operating Results
 
 
The year-end portfolio balance was $9.7 billion, down more than $2.5 billion from the end of 2003, reflecting the sale of the commercial finance business as well as normal portfolio run-off and depreciation, which was higher than new business volume for the year. These factors, combined with solid performance, enabled BCC to contribute over $700 million in cash dividends to the Company during the year. Leverage, as measured by the ratio of debt-to-equity, was 5.0-to-1, up slightly from 4.7-to-1 at the end of 2003.
 
"Other" Segment
 
The "Other" segment consists primarily of the Connexion by Boeing
SM
and Boeing Technology units, as well as certain results related to the consolidation of all business units. For 2004, losses from operations were up slightly to $535 million, reflecting the launch of Connexion by Boeing
SM
, expenses at Boeing Technology and the write-down of certain real estate assets. Connexion by Boeing
SM
, which began commercial service in May 2004, has announced firm orders from seven airlines for 211 aircraft.
 
Pension Update
 
The Company significantly strengthened its pension plans during 2004 with large cash contributions and excellent investment returns on plan assets.
 
The Company measures its pension plans using a September 30 year end for financial accounting purposes. For the plan year ending September 30, 2004, investment returns were 13 percent reflecting strong market and plan performance. However, during 2004 interest rates continued to decline. As a result, the Company lowered its discount rate, which is based on interest rates as of September 30, from 6.00 percent to 5.75 percent. This resulted in higher estimated actuarial pension liabilities. However, the impact of lowering the discount rate was more than offset by strong plan returns and company contributions, which together significantly improved the funded status of the plans and increased the other comprehensive income equity balance by $2.2 billion. This after-tax equity write-up did not impact cash or earnings but had a favorable impact on the Company's debt ratio.
 
In addition, the Company lowered its expected return on plan assets, which reflects expected performance over the long term, from 8.75 percent in 2004 to 8.50 percent in 2005.
 
During 2004, the Company recognized pre-tax expense of $335 million from its pension plans compared with pre-tax earnings of $147 million in 2003. In 2005, the Company expects pension expense to reduce earnings from operations by between $625 million and $650 million, as the impact of the poor market returns experienced in 2001 and 2002 continues to flow through earnings. In 2006 and 2007, the pension impact on earnings will depend on market conditions and discretionary funding, but based upon current assumptions the Company estimates its non-cash pension expense will peak at between $700 million and $750 million in 2006 and then decline in 2007.
 
The Company had no significant required pension funding in 2004 and expects 2005 and 2006 requirements to be minimal. However, the Company did make $4.4 billion in mostly discretionary cash contributions to its plans in 2004 and will continue to evaluate additional discretionary funding in 2005 and 2006. Currently, the Company anticipates making approximately $1 billion in cash contributions to its plans in 2005 and approximately $0.5 billion in 2006. The Company's pension funding forecast is included in its outlook for operating cash flow.
 
Outlook
 
The Company is updating its 2005 outlook and providing its initial 2006 outlook, which reflect continued solid growth in revenues and earnings (see Table 8).
 
Defense and intelligence markets are expected to remain strong in 2005 and 2006. Conditions in the commercial space market are expected to remain challenging. Global commercial airplane markets are improving with higher deliveries forecast for 2006 and further delivery improvement expected in 2007. Development of the 787 is timed for delivery into strong markets in 2008. These healthy market conditions, combined with a strong focus on operational execution, underpin the Company's outlook for solid revenue and earnings growth.
 
The airline industry environment remains mixed with trends varying between carriers and regions. A number of low-cost carriers continue to gain market share, remain profitable and order new airplanes. The global economy and air traffic trends
 
are strengthening and interest from airlines in adding capacity to handle higher traffic volume is increasing. However, higher fuel prices have dampened airline profits, particularly in the United States. Commercial Airplanes is experiencing increased demand for aircraft, especially 737s and 777s, as airline passengers continue to value frequent, direct routes and airlines focus on reducing costs. As a result, the Company expects airplane deliveries to increase in 2005 and 2006, followed by a further increase in 2007.
 
Commercial Airplanes' delivery forecast for 2005 is unchanged at approximately 320 airplanes. The delivery forecast for 2006 is between 375 and 385 airplanes. The delivery forecast is sold out for 2005 and 78 percent sold out for 2006 at the low end of the range.
 
The Company expects its defense and non-commercial space businesses to continue performing well in their growing markets. IDS anticipates continued growth and performance in its Network Systems segment, driven by programs such as Future Combat Systems, Multi-mission Maritime Aircraft and the Company's leading position in missile defense, intelligence, and DoD network-centric programs. The Aircraft and Weapon Systems and Support Systems segments also are expected to continue delivering strong results.
 
The Company's 2005 revenue outlook is now approximately $58 billion. Revenue guidance for 2006 is between $62 billion and $63 billion reflecting continued growth at IDS and higher commercial airplane deliveries.
 
Earnings-per-share guidance for 2005 is between $2.40 and $2.60 per share. Earnings-per-share guidance for 2006 is between $3.00 and $3.20 as improved operating performance and continued revenue growth in the Company's core businesses are expected to offset increased pension expense.
 
The Company expects operating cash flow for 2005 to be greater than $5.0 billion, which includes anticipated pension contributions totaling $1 billion. Operating cash flow in 2006 is also expected to be greater than $5.5 billion, including $500 million of expected pension contributions. During the guidance period, the Company will continue to evaluate making additional discretionary payments to its pension plans.
 
The Company expects capital expenditures in 2005 to be approximately $1.5 billion and expenditures in 2006 to be approximately $1.7 billion.
 
The Company expects research and development investment between $2.3 and $2.5 billion in 2005 and between $2.5 and $2.7 billion in 2006 (or approximately four percent of revenues in each year) as investment increases on the 787 program.
 
Table 8. Financial Outlook
 
 
Non-GAAP Measure Disclosure
 
The following definitions are provided for non-GAAP (Generally Accepted Accounting Principles) measures (indicated by an asterisk *) used by the Company within this disclosure. The Company does not intend for the information to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the related GAAP measures. Other companies may define the measures differently.
 
Adjusted Financial Results
 
The Company reports adjusted earnings per share, earnings from operations, and operating margins excluding SFAS 142 goodwill charges. Management believes that because goodwill is a non-cash charge related to past acquisitions, adjusting the Company's financial results to exclude goodwill provides investors with a clearer perspective on the current underlying operating performance of the Company. Management uses earnings from operations excluding goodwill charges as an internal measure of business operating performance.
 
Adjusted Earnings per Share
 
The Company defines adjusted earnings per share as GAAP earnings per share less SFAS 142 goodwill charges. Table 1 reconciles GAAP EPS and adjusted EPS.
 
Adjusted Earnings from Operations (or Adjusted Operating Losses)
 
The Company defines adjusted earnings from operations as GAAP earnings from operations less SFAS 142 goodwill charges. Tables 2, 5, and 6 reconcile GAAP earnings from operations and adjusted earnings from operations.
 
Adjusted Operating Margin
 
The Company defines adjusted operating margin as the adjusted earnings from operations (defined above) divided by revenues. Tables 2, 5, and 6 reconcile GAAP operating margins and adjusted operating margins.
 
Free Cash Flow
 
Free cash flow is defined as GAAP operating cash flow less capital expenditures for property, plant, and equipment, net. Management believes free cash flow provides investors with an important perspective on the cash available for shareholders, debt repayment, and acquisitions after making the capital investments required to support ongoing business operations and long term value creation. Free cash flow does not represent the residual cash flow available for discretionary expenditures as it excludes certain mandatory expenditures such as repayment of maturing debt. Management uses free cash flow internally to assess both business performance and overall liquidity. Table 3 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and free cash flow.
 
 
 
Certain statements in this report may constitute "forward-looking" statements within the meaning of the Private Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions as to future events that may not prove to be accurate. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak only as of the date they were made and we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise. Our actual results and future trends may differ materially depending on a variety of factors, including the continued operation, viability and growth of major airline customers and non-airline customers (such as the U.S. Government); adverse developments in the value of collateral securing customer and other financings; the occurrence of any significant collective bargaining labor dispute; our successful execution of internal performance plans, production rate increases and decreases (including any reduction in or termination of an aircraft product), acquisition and divestiture plans, and other cost-reduction and productivity efforts; charges from any future SFAS No. 142 review; an adverse development in rating agency credit ratings or assessments; the actual outcomes of certain pending sales campaigns and the launch of the 787 program and U.S. and foreign government procurement activities, including the uncertainty associated with the procurement of tankers by the U.S. Department of Defense (DoD); the cyclical nature of some of our businesses; unanticipated financial market changes which may impact pension plan assumptions; domestic and international competition in the defense, space and commercial areas; continued integration of acquired businesses; performance issues with key suppliers, subcontractors and customers; significant disruption to air travel worldwide (including future terrorist attacks); global trade policies; worldwide political stability; domestic and international economic conditions; price escalation; the outcome of political and legal processes, changing priorities or reductions in the U.S. Government or foreign government defense and space budgets; termination of government or commercial contracts due to unilateral government or customer action or failure to perform; legal, financial and governmental risks related to international transactions; legal and investigatory proceedings; tax settlements with the IRS and various states; U.S. Air Force review of previously awarded contracts; and other economic, political and technological risks and uncertainties. Additional information regarding these factors is contained in our SEC filings, including, without limitation, our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2003 and Form 10-Q for the period ending March 31, 2004, June 30, 2004 and Sept. 30, 2004.
 
 
Cxxxx
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20050224172535.txt.gz
TIME:20050224172535
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
================================================================================ SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, D.C. 20549 --------------------- FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of the earliest event reported): February 22, 2005 --------------------- The Boeing Company (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) Delaware 1-442 91-0425694 (State or other jurisdiction of (Commission (I.R.S Employer incorporation or organization) File Number) Identification No.) 100 N. Riverside, Chicago, IL 60606-1596 (Address of principal (Zip Code) executive offices) (312) 544-2000 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: |_| Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) |_| Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) |_| Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) |_| Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c)) ================================================================================ -1-
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement On February 22, 2005, The Boeing Company ("Boeing") entered into an Asset Purchase Agreement (the "Purchase Agreement") with Mid-Western Aircraft Systems, Inc. ("Mid-Western"), an indirect majority-owned subsidiary of Onex Partners LP. Under the Purchase Agreement Boeing has agreed to sell, and Mid-Western has agreed to buy, substantially all of the assets related to the airplane components business of Boeing's Commercial Airplanes operating segment, which designs, manufactures and supports structural components (including spare parts) for commercial airplanes and manufactures components for certain military platforms at facilities in Wichita, Kansas and Tulsa and McAlester, Oklahoma (collectively, the "Business"). Transaction consideration to Boeing includes approximately $900 million cash, the transfer of certain liabilities and entry into long-term supply agreements that Boeing expects to provide ongoing cost savings. Boeing will retain certain liabilities associated with the Business. Mid-Western's obligation to complete the purchase under the Purchase Agreement is subject to several conditions, including without limitation the following requirements: o all required governmental and third party consents to transfer have been obtained, including applicable antitrust approvals; o Mid-Western receives the proceeds of its debt financing in substantially the amount and form described in its financing commitments; and o the successful negotiation of collective bargaining agreements by Mid-Western. The cash purchase price for the Business will be approximately $900 million and is subject to certain post-closing adjustments, including, without limitation, changes in the working capital of the Business and certain investments made by Boeing. Boeing expects to recognize a non-cash loss on the transaction attributable to the transfer of pension-related assets and liabilities. Recognizing these non-cash charges at closing will reduce future pension expenses. The Purchase Agreement contemplates that Boeing and Mid-Western will enter into a number of long-term supply agreements and license agreements at or prior to the closing of the purchase (including with respect to Boeing's 787 aircraft program), pursuant to which Mid-Western will provide certain parts and services on an exclusive basis to Boeing, as well as a transition services agreement. The Purchase Agreement also includes a covenant by Boeing during the term of those supply agreements not to compete with Mid-Western in the manufacture of certain products subject to those supply agreements. The Purchase Agreement also contemplates that Boeing will provide Mid-Western with a $150 million subordinated, secured non-revolving line of credit which shall contain customary terms and covenants for a credit line of this type. Certain statements in this Report contain "forward-looking" information (as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995), which involve risk and uncertainty. These include statements reflecting Boeing's expectations that the sale to Mid-Western of the assets of the Business as provided for in the Purchase Agreement will be completed, that it will recognize a non-cash loss on the transaction and that the long-term supply agreements will provide Boeing with cost savings. These forward-looking statements are not guaranties of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Forward-looking statements are based on assumptions as to future events that may not prove to be accurate. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from those we express or forecast in these forward-looking statements. Boeing undertakes no obligation to update the forward-looking statements in this Report and does not intend to do so. Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits (c) Exhibits Exhibit Number Description -------------- ----------- 99.1 Press Release issued February 22, 2005 -2-
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized. Date: February 24,2005 THE BOEING COMPANY By /s/ James C. Johnson --------------------------------------- James C. Johnson Vice President, Corporate Secretary and Assistant General Counsel -3-

Exhibit 99.1 WICHITA, Kansas, Feb. 22, 2005 - The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] and Onex Corporation today announced an agreement under which Onex will acquire the Wichita/Tulsa Division of Boeing Commercial Airplanes. The transaction includes Commercial Airplanes facilities and assets in Wichita, Kansas, and Tulsa and McAlester, Oklahoma. Transaction consideration to Boeing includes approximately $900 million cash, transfer of certain liabilities and long-term supply agreements that provide Boeing ongoing cost savings. The single-source supply agreements cover the structures and parts currently produced by the Wichita/Tulsa Division, providing a stable base of revenue for the new business to build upon. In addition, the Wichita/Tulsa operations will continue as a major partner on the 787 Dreamliner. The sale is expected to close during the second quarter of 2005. Boeing expects to recognize a non-cash loss on the transaction attributable to the transfer of pension related assets and liabilities. Recognizing these non-cash charges at closing will reduce future pension expenses. Boeing Integrated Defense Systems operations in Wichita and Oklahoma are not included in the transaction. "This agreement fully supports our strategy to focus Boeing on large-scale systems integration, which is where we are most competitive and can add the most value to our airplanes and services," said Boeing Commercial Airplanes President and Chief Executive Officer Alan Mulally. "Boeing will benefit from lower procurement costs and the Wichita/Tulsa operations now can grow by winning new business with other customers." Mulally said Boeing selected Onex based on its successful history of investing in and growing companies. Onex will form a new company to operate the facilities. The plants will continue to operate under the leadership of Jeff Turner, currently vice president and general manager of the Boeing Commercial Airplanes Wichita Division, who will be the new company's CEO. "Onex has a strategy to build the most efficient and innovative company in the aerostructures industry. We intend to invest over $1 billion in Kansas and Oklahoma in the next few years," said Seth Mersky, an Onex managing director. Mersky said Onex's vision is to grow the value of the Wichita/Tulsa operations over a number of years. "We are committed to working in close partnership with the current Wichita/Tulsa senior leadership team to make the transition as seamless as possible," added Nigel Wright, another Onex managing director. "The new company will compete for work inside and outside of Boeing, providing potential for more, and more stable, jobs. The key is to get the cost structure right."
Boeing announced in April 2004 that it was studying the possible sale of its plants in Wichita , Tulsa and McAlester . Boeing included balancing the interests of employees, customers, shareholders and its plant communities in its criteria for the decision. "We firmly believe that this decision provides the best available outcome for the Wichita/Tulsa Division and its plant communities by creating new opportunities for sustained growth as a separate operation. Onex shares this perspective, and we look forward to a long and productive relationship together," Mulally said. Approximately 9,000 Commercial Airplanes employees currently work at the Wichita, Tulsa and McAlester sites. The Division incurred approximately US$2.2 billion in annual costs for 2004. The facilities currently supply Boeing with fuselage and other structural components for the 737, 747, 767 and 777 programs, and the division is a supplier partner on the 787 Dreamliner. The transaction is subject to a number of conditions before closing, including U.S. government reviews. Goldman Sachs advised The Boeing Company on this transaction. About The Boeing Company With headquarters in Chicago , The Boeing Company is the largest aerospace company in the world and is one of the leading U.S. exporters. It is the world's largest manuf acturer of commercial jetliners and military aircraft, and the largest NASA contractor. The company's capabilities in aerospace also include rotorcraft, electronic and defense systems, missiles, rocket engines, satellites, launch vehicles and advanced information and communication systems. The company has an extensive global reach with customers, manufacturing facilities, suppliers and business partners throughout the world. Boeing Commercial Airplanes produces the popular 7-series jetliner family, and is setting a new standard for jetliners with its upcoming 787 Dreamliner. Boeing Commercial Airplanes is headquartered in Seattle , Wash. About Onex Onex is a Toronto-based diversified company with annual consolidated revenues of approximately Cdn$16 billion and consolidated assets of approximately Cdn$12 billion. It is one of Canada 's largest companies with global operations in service, manufacturing and technology industries. Its operating companies include Celestica Inc.; Magellan Health Services, Inc.; ClientLogic Corporation; Cineplex Galaxy LP; J.L. French Automotive Castings, Inc.; Res-Care, Inc.; Radian Communications Services Corporation; Emergency Medical Services Corporation; Cosmetic Essence, Inc.; Center for Diagnostic Imaging, Inc. Onex shares trade on the Toronto Stock Exchange under the stock symbol OCX.SV. Onex Partners LP has acted as managing partner for this transaction. In early February 2004, Onex completed the final closing of the Onex Partners Fund, with total commitments of US$1.65 billion. The fund provides capital for Onex-sponsored acquisitions not related to Onex's existing operating companies or to ONCAP. Onex controls the General Partner and Manager of the Fund and has committed US$375 million to Onex Partners LP. Safe Harbor Statement / Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements contained in this press release are considered "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, and it is Boeing's intent that such statements be protected by the safe harbor created thereby. Forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to statements regarding: (1) the expected closing date of the transaction, (2) the expected costs savings arising out of the transaction, and (3) the expected effect of the transaction on future pension expenses. These forward-looking statements are subject to a number of risks, uncertainties and other factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from future results expressed or implied by such forward-looking statements. Potential risks and uncertainties include, but are not limited to: (a) the risk that the transaction may close more slowly than expected or not at all; (b) the risk that the cost savings arising out of the transaction may be less than anticipated, and (c) other risks and uncertainties detailed from time to time in Boeing's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. ### Contacts: Chuck Cadena, 206-437-0138, Boeing Commercial Airplanes (Seattle) Dick Ziegler, 316-523-1465, Boeing Commercial Airplanes (Wichita) Dan Wilinsky, 816-512-2430, Fleishman-Hillard (for Onex) Steve Hendrickson, 918-832-3352, Boeing Commercial Airplanes (Tulsa/McAlester)


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20050310172148.txt.gz
TIME:20050310172148
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
 
On March 6, 2005, the Board of Directors of The Boeing Company (the "Company") asked for and received the resignation of Harry C. Stonecipher as President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company. Concurrently, Mr. Stonecipher resigned from the Company's Board of Directors. Mr. Stonecipher will remain an employee of the Company until his retirement effective April 1, 2005 (the "Retirement Date").
 
Until the Retirement Date, Mr. Stonecipher will receive salary compensation at an annual rate of $1,500,000, which is the same rate that he was compensated prior to his resignation from the President and CEO positions. Mr. Stonecipher will continue to accrue benefits under the Company's Pension Value Plan and Supplemental Executive Retirement Plan until the Retirement Date. Until he retires, Mr. Stonecipher will also continue to be eligible for the same perquisites he was eligible for prior to his resignation, including a company-provided automobile and financial counseling. He will not have use of the Company's aircraft, unless approved by the Company's Non-Executive Chairman.
 
In addition, Mr. Stonecipher will receive an annual incentive award for his services in 2004 based on company and individual performance. For 2004, Mr. Stonecipher had a target annual incentive of 100% of salary. Based on his ability to focus the Company to achieve excellent financial results and strong stock performance in 2004, Mr. Stonecipher will receive an annual incentive award of $2,100,000. This reflects company performance against pre-established economic profit goals at a factor of 1.4, which was above the target of 1.0, and an individual performance factor of 1.0 for 2004. Consistent with the Company's guidelines for senior executives, Mr. Stonecipher's award was eligible to be paid 60% in cash, and 40% in Boeing stock units. However, based upon a prior election, Mr. Stonecipher has elected to defer the entire amount into a stock unit account under the Company's Deferred Compensation Plan. The deferred stock units will vest upon his retirement and, consistent with the treatment of other executives who defer awards into stock, will be subject to a 25% Company match. While the Company grants Performance Shares and Career Shares to its senior executives each February under its long-term incentive program, the Board decided not to grant any long-term incentives to Mr. Stonecipher in 2005.
 
Upon Mr. Stonecipher's retirement, he will no longer receive employee benefits or perquisites. Mr. Stonecipher will receive office space or administrative support only if he is requested to perform tasks on behalf of the Company by the Non-Executive Chairman which requires such support. Upon his retirement date, Mr. Stonecipher will receive pension benefits in annual installments and his outstanding employee equity awards will vest, remain exercisable or be paid out, as applicable, in accordance with their terms. The director option grant for 3,000 shares that he received in 2003 will be forfeited. He will not be eligible for a prorated annual incentive award for 2005, which would have been payable in 2006.
 
Item 5.02. Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers.
 
(b) On March 6, 2005, the Board of Directors of the Company asked for and received the resignation of President and Chief Executive Officer Harry C. Stonecipher. Concurrently, Mr. Stonecipher resigned from the Company's Board of Directors. A description of the terms of Mr. Stonecipher's resignation and retirement are included under Item 1.01.
 
(c) On March 6, 2005, the Board of Directors of the Company appointed Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer James A. Bell, 56, as President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company, on an interim basis. Mr. Bell has served as Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer since January 2004. Prior thereto, Mr. Bell served as Senior Vice President of Finance and Corporate Controller from October 2000 to January 2004. Prior thereto, Mr. Bell served as Vice President of Contracts and Pricing for Boeing Space Communications from January 1997 to October 2000. There was no arrangement or understanding between Mr. Bell and any other persons pursuant to which Mr. Bell was appointed Interim President and Chief Executive Officer and there are no related party transactions between Mr. Bell and the Company.
 
A copy of the Company's press release announcing the resignation of Mr. Stonecipher and the appointment of Mr. Bell, among other things, is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
Item 5.03. Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year.
 
(a) On March 6, 2005, the Board of Directors amended and restated the Company's By-Laws by decreasing the number of directors from twelve to eleven. A copy of the Company's By-Laws, as amended and restated, is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.2 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
Item 8.01. Other Events.
 
On March 4, 2005, the U. S. Air Force lifted the suspension from government contracting of the Company's space launch services business. The Air Force suspended the launch services business on July 24, 2003, based upon findings relating to certain employees' possession and alleged use of proprietary information of the Lockheed Martin Corporation ("Lockheed Martin") in connection with the Evolved Expendable Launch Vehicle ("EELV") Program. The same circumstances remain under investigation by the U. S. Attorney in Los Angeles for possible criminal and civil penalties and also are the subject of a federal court lawsuit filed by Lockheed Martin in Orlando, Florida.
 
Under the terms of the Interim Administrative Agreement between the Company and the Air Force (the "Agreement"), the Air Force can reinstate the suspension if the Company is indicted or convicted in connection with the EELV matter, or if material new evidence is discovered. The Agreement requires periodic reporting to the Air Force and also provides for appointment of a Special Compliance Officer responsible for verifying the Company's implementation of remedial measures and compliance with other provisions of the Agreement. The Company has reimbursed the Air Force $1.9 million for costs relating to its investigation and has agreed that certain costs relating to the EELV matter and improvements to its Ethics and Business Conduct Program will be treated as unallowable.
 
Full text of the Agreement can be found at .
http://www.af.mil
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(c) Exhibits.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
Dated: March 10, 2005
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Boeing CEO Harry Stonecipher Resigns; Board Appoints James Bell Interim President and CEO; Lew Platt to Expand Role
 
 Boeing [NYSE: BA] announced today that its Board of Directors asked for and received the resignation of President and CEO Harry Stonecipher on Sunday, March 6. Concurrently, the Board has appointed CFO , 56, as president and CEO on an interim basis, with Board Chairman Lew Platt assuming an expanded role in his capacity as non-executive chairman. Stonecipher will also leave the company's Board; all changes are effective immediately.
CHICAGO, March 7, 2005
James A. Bell
 
The Board actions were taken following an investigation by internal and external legal counsel of the facts and circumstances surrounding a personal relationship between Stonecipher and a female executive of the company who did not report directly to him. The Board determined that his actions were inconsistent with Boeing's Code of Conduct.
 
"The Board concluded that the facts reflected poorly on Harry's judgment and would impair his ability to lead the company," said Platt.
 
"The resignation was in no way related to the company's operational performance or financial condition, both of which remain strong. However, the CEO must set the standard for unimpeachable professional and personal behavior, and the Board determined that this was the right and necessary decision under the circumstances," he said.
 
The Board ordered an immediate and comprehensive investigation of the matter after Platt received information that was sent anonymously to him and to the company's legal and ethics leaders 10 days ago. The investigation determined the relationship was consensual and had no effect on the conduct of the company's business. The investigation also determined that neither the career nor the compensation of the female executive was influenced by this relationship.
 
Bell is a 32-year veteran of the company who has served as Boeing CFO and as a member of the company's Executive Council since November 2003. He oversees all company financial matters and will continue in this role during the interim period.
 
The Board has a robust succession planning process in place and will accelerate the search for a permanent CEO. Candidates both inside and outside the company are being considered. Bell, who is not a candidate, will serve until the process is completed.
"Boeing is in excellent shape with significant momentum due in large part to Harry's forceful leadership," said Bell. "We have a clear strategy that has us well positioned for future growth. Continuing his focus on execution is my top priority."
 
"I know this is difficult news for everyone associated with Boeing, but we have strong leaders driving our businesses, and strong teams of employees driving performance," Platt said. "At the same time, we are committed to strong ethical leadership. We have fought hard to restore our reputation. Everyone should know that if we see any improper activities, we will take decisive action."
 
 
Forward-Looking Information Is Subject to Risk and Uncertainty
 
Certain statements in this report may constitute "forward-looking" statements within the meaning of the Private Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions as to future events that may not prove to be accurate. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak only as of the date they were made and we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise. Our actual results and future trends may differ materially depending on a variety of factors, including the continued operation, viability and growth of major airline customers and non-airline customers (such as the U.S. Government); adverse developments in the value of collateral securing customer and other financings; the occurrence of any significant collective bargaining labor dispute; our successful execution of internal performance plans, production rate increases and decreases (including any reduction in or termination of an aircraft product), acquisition and divestiture plans, and other cost-reduction and productivity efforts; charges from any future SFAS No. 142 review; an adverse development in rating agency credit ratings or assessments; the actual outcomes of certain pending sales campaigns
and the launch of the 787 program and U.S. and foreign government procurement activities, including the uncertainty associated with the procurement of tankers by the U.S. Department of Defense (DoD); the cyclical nature of some of our businesses; unanticipated financial market changes which may impact pension plan assumptions; domestic and international competition in the defense, space and commercial areas; continued integration of acquired businesses; performance issues with key suppliers, subcontractors and customers; significant disruption to air travel worldwide (including future terrorist attacks); global trade policies; worldwide political stability; domestic and international economic conditions; price escalation; the outcome of political and legal processes, changing priorities or reductions in the U.S. Government or foreign government defense and space budgets; termination of government or commercial contracts due to unilateral government or customer action or failure to perform; legal, financial and governmental risks related to international transactions; legal and investigatory proceedings; tax settlements with the IRS and various states; U.S. Air Force review of previously awarded contracts; and other economic, political and technological risks and uncertainties. Additional information regarding these factors is contained in our SEC filings, including, without limitation, our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2004.
 
C2114
 
Contacts:
 
Communications: John Dern, Anne Eisele or Larry McCracken, (312) 544-2002
 
Investor Relations: Dave Dohnalek or Bob Kurtz, (312) 544-2140

EXHIBIT 99.2
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
SECTION 1.
.
Annual Meetings
 
The Annual Meeting of the stockholders shall be held on such date and at such time as the Board of Directors shall determine, for the election of directors and the transaction of such other business as may come before the meeting.
 
SECTION 2. .
Special Meetings
 
A special meeting of the stockholders may be called at any time by the Board of Directors, or by stockholders holding together at least twenty-five percent of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, except as otherwise provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto.
 
SECTION 3.
.
Place of Meeting
 
All meetings of the stockholders of the Corporation shall be held at such place or places within or without the State of Delaware as may from time to time be fixed by the Board of Directors or as shall be specified or fixed in the respective notices or waivers of notice thereof.
 
SECTION 4.
.
Notice of Meetings
 
Except as otherwise required by statute and as set forth below, notice of each annual or special meeting of stockholders shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than thirty nor more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date. If the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, notice of each special meeting of stockholders shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than fifty-five nor more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date, unless the calling of such meeting is ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, in which case notice of such special meeting shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than thirty nor more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date. Such notice shall be given by delivering to each stockholder a written or printed notice thereof either personally or by mailing such notice in a postage-prepaid envelope addressed to the stockholder's address as it appears on the stock books of the Corporation. Except as otherwise required by statute, no publication of any notice of a meeting of stockholders shall be required. Every notice of a meeting of stockholders shall state the place, date, and hour of the meeting and, in the case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called.
 
SECTION 5.
.
Waivers of Notice
 
Whenever any notice is required to be given to any stockholder under the provisions of these By-Laws, the Certificate of Incorporation, or the Delaware General Corporation Law, a waiver thereof in writing, signed by the person or persons entitled to such notice, whether before or after the time stated therein, shall be deemed equivalent to the giving of such notice. The attendance of a stockholder at a meeting, in person or by proxy, shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when a stockholder attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened.
 
SECTION 6.
.
Quorum
 
At all meetings of stockholders, except when otherwise provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by the By-Laws, the presence, in person or by proxy duly authorized, of the holders of one-third of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and except as otherwise provided by statute or rule of law, or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by the By-Laws, the vote, in person or by proxy, of the holders of a majority of the shares constituting such quorum shall be binding upon all stockholders of the Corporation. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote may adjourn any meeting, from time to time but not for a period of more than thirty days at any one time, until a quorum shall attend. At any such adjourned meeting at which a quorum shall be present, any business may be transacted which might have been transacted at the meeting as originally called. Unless otherwise provided by statute, no notice of an adjourned meeting need be given.
 
SECTION 7.
.
Proxies
 
7.1 Each stockholder entitled to vote at a meeting of stockholders or to express consent or dissent to corporate action in writing without a meeting may authorize another person or persons to act for such stockholder by proxy. Such authorization may be accomplished by (a) the stockholder or such stockholder's authorized officer, director, employee, or agent executing a writing or causing his or her signature to be affixed to such writing by any reasonable means, including facsimile signature, or (b) by transmitting or authorizing the transmission of a telegram, cablegram, or other means of electronic transmission to the intended holder of the proxy or to a proxy solicitation firm, proxy support service, or similar agent duly authorized by the intended proxy holder to receive such transmission; provided, that any such telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission must either set forth or be accompanied by information from which it can be determined that the telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission was authorized by the stockholder. Any copy, facsimile telecommunication, or other reliable reproduction of the writing or transmission by which a stockholder has authorized another person to act as proxy for such stockholder may be substituted or used in lieu of the original writing or transmission for any and all purposes for which the original writing or transmission could be used, provided that such copy, facsimile telecommunication, or other reproduction shall be a complete reproduction of the entire original writing or transmission.
.
Appointment
 
7.2 A proxy shall be filed with the Secretary of the Corporation before or at the time of the meeting or the delivery to the Corporation of the consent to corporate action in writing. A proxy shall become invalid three years after the date of its execution, unless otherwise provided in the proxy. A proxy with respect to a specified meeting shall entitle the holder thereof to vote at any reconvened meeting following adjournment of such meeting but shall not be valid after the final adjournment thereof.
.
Delivery to Corporation; Duration
 
SECTION 8.
.
Inspectors of Election
 
8.1 In advance of any meeting of stockholders, the Board of Directors of the Corporation shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspectors of election at such meeting and to make a written report thereof. The Board of Directors may designate one or more persons to serve as alternate inspectors to serve in place of any inspector who is unable or fails to act. If no inspector or alternate is able to act at a meeting of stockholders, the chairman of such meeting shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspector of elections at such meeting.
.
Appointment
 
8.2 The inspectors shall: (a) ascertain the number of shares of the Corporation outstanding and the voting power of each such share; (b) determine the shares represented at the meeting and the validity of proxies and ballots; (c) count all votes and ballots; (d) determine and retain for a reasonable period of time a record of the disposition of any challenges made to any determination by them; and (e) certify their determination of the number of shares represented at the meeting and their count of the votes and ballots. Each inspector of election shall, before entering upon the discharge of his or her duties, take and sign an oath to faithfully execute the duties of inspector with strict impartiality and according to the best of his or her ability. The inspectors of election may appoint or retain other persons or entities to assist them in the performance of their duties.
.
Duties
 
8.3 The validity of any proxy or ballot executed for a meeting of stockholders shall be determined by the inspectors of election in accordance with the applicable provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law as then in effect. In determining the validity of any proxy transmitted by telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission, the inspectors shall record in writing the information upon which they relied in making such determination.
.
Determination of Proxy Validity
 
SECTION 9.
.
Fixing the Record Date
 
9.1 For the purpose of determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at any meeting of stockholders or any adjournment thereof, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which record date shall be not fewer than thirty nor more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the date of such meeting. If the corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, the record date for each special meeting of stockholders shall be not fewer than fifty-five nor more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date, unless the calling of such meeting is ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of
.
Meetings
 
Incorporation. If no record date is fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall be at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which notice is given, or, if notice is waived, at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which the meeting is held. A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting; provided, however, that the Board of Directors may fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
 
9.2 For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which date shall not be more than ten (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days after the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, when no prior action by the Board of Directors is required by Chapter 1 of the Delaware General Corporation Law as now or hereafter amended, shall be the first date on which a signed written consent setting forth the action taken or proposed to be taken is delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the records of proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Delivery made to the Corporation's registered office shall be by hand or by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors and prior action by the Board of Directors is required by Chapter 1 of the Delaware General Corporation Law as now or hereafter amended, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution taking such prior action.
.
Consent to Corporate Action Without a Meeting
 
9.3 For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to receive payment of any dividend or other distribution or allotment of any rights or the stockholders entitled to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion, or exchange of stock, or for the purpose of any other lawful action, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted, and which record date shall be not more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days prior to such action. If no record date is fixed, the record date for determining stockholders for any such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution relating thereto.
.
Dividends, Distributions, and Other Rights
 
9.4. At least ten days before each meeting of stockholders, a complete list of the stockholders entitled to vote at such meeting shall be made, arranged in alphabetical order, and showing the address of each stockholder and the number of shares registered in the name of each stockholder. This list shall be open to examination by any stockholder, for any purpose germane to the meeting, during ordinary business hours, for a period of ten days prior to the meeting, either at a place within the city where the meeting is to be held, which place shall be specified in the notice of the meeting, or, if not so specified, at the place where the meeting is to be held. The
.
Voting List
 
list shall also be produced and kept at such meeting for inspection by any stockholder who is present.
 
SECTION 10.
.
Action by Stockholders Without a Meeting
 
Subject to the provisions of Article NINTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, any action which could be taken at any annual or special meeting of stockholders may be taken without a meeting, without prior notice, and without a vote, if a consent or consents in writing, setting forth the action so taken, are (a) signed by the holders of outstanding stock having not fewer than the minimum number of votes that would be necessary to authorize or take such action at a meeting at which all shares entitled to vote thereon were present and voted and (b) delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the records of proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Delivery made to the Corporation's registered office shall be by hand or by certified mail or registered mail, return receipt requested. Every written consent shall bear the date of signature of each stockholder who signs the consent and no written consent shall be effective to take the corporate action referred to therein unless written consents signed by a sufficient number of stockholders to take such action are delivered to the Corporation, in the manner required by this section, within sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days of the date of the earliest dated consent delivered to the Corporation in the manner required by this section. The validity of any consent executed by a proxy for a stockholder pursuant to a telegram, cablegram, or other means of electronic transmission transmitted to such proxy holder by or upon the authorization of the stockholder shall be determined by or at the direction of the Secretary of the Corporation. A written record of the information upon which the person making such determination relied shall be made and kept in the records of the proceedings of the stockholders. Any such consent shall be inserted in the minute book as if it were the minutes of a meeting of the stockholders. Prompt notice of the taking of the corporate action without a meeting by less than unanimous written consent shall be given to those stockholders who have not consented in writing.
 
SECTION 11.
.
Business and Nominations at Stockholders' Meetings
 
11.1 In addition to the election of directors, other proper business may be transacted at the annual meeting of stockholders, provided that such business is a proper matter for stockholder action and is properly brought before such meeting. To be properly brought before an annual meeting, nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors and business to be considered by stockholders must be (a) made or brought by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, or (b) made or brought before the meeting by a stockholder of the Corporation who is a stockholder of record at the time of giving notice as required in this By-Law, who is entitled to vote at the meeting, and who complies with the notice procedures set forth in this By-Law. Notice by a stockholder pursuant to (b) above must be in writing, in accordance with Section 12 of this Article I, and received by the Secretary not earlier than the one-hundred and twentieth day nor later than the close of business on the ninetieth day prior to the date specified in Section 1 of this Article I for such annual meeting; provided, however, that in the event that the date of the annual meeting is more than thirty days before or more than sixty days after such date, notice by the stockholder must be received by the Secretary not earlier than the one-hundred and twentieth
.
Business and Nominations at Annual Meetings
 
day prior to such annual meeting and not later than the close of business on the ninetieth day prior to such annual meeting or the tenth day following the day on which public announcement of the date of such meeting is first made by the Corporation.
 
11.2 . Any stockholder notice given pursuant to Section 11.1 shall set forth (i) the name and address of the stockholder proposing such business and of the beneficial owner, if any, on whose behalf the proposal or nomination is made; (ii) a representation that the stockholder is entitled to vote at such meeting and a statement of the number of shares of the Corporation which are owned by the stockholder and the number of shares which are beneficially owned by the beneficial owner, if any; (iii) a representation that the stockholder intends to appear in person or by proxy at the meeting to nominate the person or persons or to propose the business specified in the notice; and (iv) as to each person the stockholder proposes to nominate for election or re-election as a director, the name and address of such person and such other information regarding such nominee as would be required in a proxy statement filed pursuant to the proxy rules of the Securities and Exchange Commission had such nominee been nominated by the Board of Directors, and a description of any arrangements or understandings, between the stockholder and such nominee and any other persons (including their names), pursuant to which the nomination is to be made, and the written consent of each such nominee to being named in the proxy statement as a nominee and to serving as a director if elected; or, as to each matter the stockholder proposes to bring before the meeting, a brief description of the business desired to be brought before the meeting, the reasons for conducting such business at the meeting, the language of the business matter (if appropriate), and any material interest of the stockholder in such business.
Stockholder Notice
 
11.3 At any special meeting of the stockholders, only such business as is specified in the notice of such special meeting given by or at the direction of the person or persons calling such meeting, in accordance with Section 2 of this Article I, shall come before such meeting. Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors may be made at a special meeting of stockholders at which directors are to be elected pursuant to the Corporation's notice of meeting (a) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or (b) provided that the Board of Directors has determined that directors shall be elected at such meeting, by any stockholder of the Corporation who is a stockholder of record at the time of giving of notice provided for in this By-Law, who shall be entitled to vote at the meeting and who complies with the notice procedures set forth in this By-Law. In the event the Corporation calls a special meeting of stockholders for the purpose of electing one or more directors to the Board of Directors, any such stockholder may nominate a person or persons for election to such position(s) as specified in the Corporation's notice of meeting, if the stockholder's notice required by paragraph 11.1 of this By-Law shall be delivered to the Secretary not earlier than the one hundred and twentieth day nor later than the ninetieth day prior to such special meeting or the tenth day following the day on which public announcement is first made of the date of the special meeting and of the nominees proposed by the Board of Directors to be elected at such meeting.
.
Business and Nominations at Special Meetings
 
11.4 . No business shall be conducted nor director nominations made at any meeting of stockholders except in accordance with this Section 11. If
Stockholder Meeting Procedures
 
the facts warrant, the Board of Directors, or the chairman of a stockholders' meeting at which directors are to be elected, may determine and declare (a) that a proposal does not constitute proper business to be transacted at the meeting or (b) that business was not properly brought before the meeting in accordance with the provisions of this Section 11 or (c) that a nomination was not made in accordance with this Section 11; and, if it is so determined, the defective proposal or nomination shall be disregarded and shall not be transacted or acted upon. The right of stockholders to bring business before or to make nominations pursuant to the foregoing procedure is subject to the rights of the holders of any class or series of stock having a preference over the Common Stock as to dividends or upon liquidation. The procedures set forth in this Section 11 for stockholders' bringing business before a stockholders' meeting or stockholders' making nominations for the election of directors are in addition to, and not in lieu or limitation of, (a) any procedures now in effect or hereafter adopted by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof and (b) the requirements set forth in Rule 14a-8 and Rule 14a-11 under Section 14 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, or any successor provisions.
 
11.5 . For purposes of this By-Law, "public announcement" as to an annual or special meeting of stockholders shall mean disclosure in a press release reported by the Dow Jones News Service, Associated Press or comparable national news service or in a document publicly filed by the Corporation with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to Section 13, 14 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act. In no event shall the public announcement of an adjournment of an annual or special meeting commence a new time period for the giving of a stockholder's notice as described above.
Public Announcement of Stockholders' Meetings
 
SECTION 12.
.
Notice to Corporation
 
Any written notice required to be delivered by a stockholder to the Corporation pursuant to Section 11.1 of this Article I or Section 2.1 of Article II must be given, either by personal delivery or by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, to the Secretary at the Corporation's executive offices in the City of Seattle, State of Washington.
 
 
 
SECTION 1.
.
Number and Term of Office
 
The number of directors shall be 11, but the number may be increased, or decreased to not less than three, from time to time, either by the directors by adoption of a resolution to such effect or by the stockholders by amendment of the By-Laws in accordance with Article VIII hereof. The directors shall be divided into three classes, each of which shall be composed as nearly as possible of one-third of the directors. Each director shall serve for the term to which the director was elected, and until a successor shall have been elected and qualified or until the director's prior death, resignation, or removal. At each annual election, directors shall be chosen for a full three-year term to succeed those whose terms expire.
 
SECTION 2.
.
Nomination and Election
 
2.1 Only persons who are nominated in accordance with Article I, Section 11 of these By-Laws shall be eligible for election as directors.
.
Nomination
 
2.2 At each election of directors, the persons receiving the greatest number of votes shall be the directors.
.
Election
 
SECTION 3.
.
Place of Meeting
 
Meetings of the Board of Directors, or of any committee thereof, may be held either within or without the State of Delaware.
 
SECTION 4.
.
Annual Meeting
 
Each year the Board of Directors shall meet in connection with the annual meeting of stockholders for the purpose of electing officers and for the transaction of other business. No notice of such meeting is required. Such annual meeting may be held at any other time or place which shall be specified in a notice given as hereinafter provided for special meetings of the Board, or in a consent and waiver of notice thereof, signed by all the directors.
 
SECTION 5.
.
Stated Meetings
 
The Board of Directors may, by resolution adopted by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board, from time to time appoint the time and place for holding stated meetings of the Board, if by it deemed advisable; and such stated meetings shall thereupon be held at the time and place so appointed, without the giving of any special notice with regard thereto. In case the day appointed for a stated meeting shall fall upon a legal holiday, such meeting shall be held on the next following day, not a legal holiday, at the regularly appointed hour. Except as otherwise provided in the By-Laws, any and all business may be transacted at any stated meeting.
 
SECTION 6.
.
Special Meetings
 
6.1 Special meetings of the Board of Directors may be called by or at the request of the Chairman of the Board or any two directors. Notice of a special meeting of the Board of Directors, stating the place, day, and hour of the meeting, shall be given to each director in writing (by mail, wire, facsimile, or personal delivery) or orally (by telephone or in person).
.
Convenors and Notice
 
6.2 With respect to a special meeting of the Board of Directors, a written waiver, signed by a director, shall be deemed equivalent to notice to that director. A director's attendance at a meeting shall constitute that director's waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the director attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting was not lawfully called or convened. Neither the business to be transacted at, nor the purpose of, any regular or special meeting of the Board of Directors need be specified in the waiver of notice of such meeting.
.
Waiver of Notice
 
SECTION 7.
.
Quorum and Manner of Acting
 
Except as herein otherwise provided, forty percent of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided in these By-Laws at the time of any stated or special meeting of the Board or, if vacancies exist on the Board of Directors, forty percent of such number of directors then in office, provided, however, that such number may not be less than one-third of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided in these By-Laws, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and, except as otherwise required by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by the By-Laws, the act of a majority of the directors present at any such meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of the Board of Directors. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the directors present may adjourn any meeting, from time to time, until a quorum is present. No notice of any adjourned meeting need be given.
 
SECTION 8.
.
Chairman of the Board
 
The Chairman of the Board shall preside, when present, at all meetings of the Board, except as otherwise provided by law.
 
SECTION 9.
.
Resignations
 
Any director of the Corporation may resign at any time by giving written notice thereof to the Secretary. Such resignation shall take effect at the time specified therefor or if the time is not specified, upon delivery thereof; and, unless otherwise specified with respect thereto, the acceptance of such resignation shall not be necessary to make it effective.
 
SECTION 10.
.
Removal of Directors
 
Any director may be removed solely for cause by the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, at a meeting of the stockholders called for the purpose; and the vacancy on the Board caused by any such removal may be filled by the stockholders at such meeting or at any subsequent meeting.
 
SECTION 11.
.
Filling of Vacancies Not Caused by Removal
 
In case of any increase in the number of directors, or of any vacancy created by death or resignation, the additional director or directors may be elected or, as the case may be, the vacancy or vacancies may be filled, either (a) by the Board of Directors at any meeting, (i) if the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH, or (ii) if the Corporation does not have an Interested Stockholder, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the remaining directors, though less than a quorum; or (b) by the stockholders entitled to vote, either at an annual meeting or at a special meeting thereof called for the purpose, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the outstanding shares entitled to vote at such meeting.
 
SECTION 12.
.
Directors' Fees
 
The Board of Directors shall have authority to determine from time to time the amount of compensation which shall be paid to its members for attendance at meetings of the Board or of any committee of the Board.
 
SECTION 13. Any action required or permitted to be taken at any meeting of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof may be taken without a meeting if all members of the Board or committee, as the case may be, consent thereto in writing, and the writing or writings are filed with the minutes of proceedings of the Board or committee.
.
Action Without a Meeting
 
 
 
SECTION 1.
.
Audit Committee
 
In addition to any committees appointed pursuant to Section 2 of this Article, there shall be an Audit Committee, appointed annually by the Board of Directors, consisting of at least three directors who are not members of management. It shall be the responsibility of the Audit Committee to review the scope and results of the annual independent audit of books and records of the Corporation and its subsidiaries and to discharge such other responsibilities as may from time to time be assigned to it by the Board of Directors. The Audit Committee shall meet at such times and places as the members deem advisable, and shall make such recommendations to the Board of Directors as they consider appropriate.
 
SECTION 2.
.
Other Committees
 
2.1 The Board of Directors may appoint standing or temporary committees and invest such committees with such powers as it may see fit, with power to subdelegate such powers if deemed desirable by the Board of Directors; but no such committee shall have the power or authority of the Board of Directors to adopt, amend, or repeal the By-Laws of the Corporation or approve, adopt or recommend to the stockholders of the Corporation any action or matter expressly required by the Certificate of Incorporation, these By-Laws or the Delaware General Corporation Law to be submitted to stockholders for approval.
.
Committee Powers
 
2.2 The Board of Directors may designate one or more directors as alternate members of any committee, who may replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of the committee. In the absence or disqualification of a member of a committee, the member or members thereof present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, whether or not such member or members constitute a quorum, may unanimously appoint another member of the Board to act at the meeting in the place of any such absent or disqualified member.
.
Committee Members
 
SECTION 3.
.
Quorum and Manner of Acting
 
A majority of the number of directors composing any committee of the Board of Directors, as established and fixed by resolution of the Board of Directors, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at any meeting of such committee but, if less than a majority are present at a meeting, a majority of such directors present may adjourn the meeting from time to time without further notice. The act of a majority of the members of a committee present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of such committee.
 
 
 
SECTION 1.
.
Officers
 
The elected officers of the Corporation shall be a Chairman of the Board (who shall be a director) and, at the discretion of the Board, a President (who shall be a director), and one or more Vice Presidents (each of whom may be assigned by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer an additional title descriptive of the functions assigned to such officer and one or more of whom may be designated Executive or Senior Vice President). The Board may also elect one or more Vice Chairmen. The Board of Directors shall also designate either the Chairman of the Board or the President as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation. The Board of Directors shall appoint a Controller, a Secretary, and a Treasurer. Any number of offices, whether elective or appointive, may be held by the same person. The Chief Executive Officer may, by a writing filed with the Secretary, designate titles as officers for employees and agents and appoint Assistant Secretaries and Assistant Treasurers, as, from time to time, may appear to be necessary or advisable in the conduct of the affairs of the Corporation and may, in the same manner, terminate or change such titles.
 
SECTION 2.
.
Term of Office
 
So far as practicable, all elected officers shall be elected at the annual meeting of the Board in each year, and shall hold office until the annual meeting of the Board in the next subsequent year and until their respective successors are chosen. The Controller, Secretary, and Treasurer shall hold office at the pleasure of the Board.
 
SECTION 3.
.
Salaries of Elected Officers
 
The salaries paid to the elected officers of the Corporation shall be authorized or approved by the Board of Directors.
 
SECTION 4.
.
Bonuses
 
None of the officers, directors, or employees of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations shall at any time be paid any bonus or share in the earnings or profits of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations except pursuant to a plan approved by affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members of the Board of Directors.
 
SECTION 5.
.
Removal of Elected and Appointed Officers
 
Any elected or appointed officer may be removed at any time, either for or without cause, by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors, at any meeting called for the purpose.
 
SECTION 6.
.
Vacancies
 
If any vacancy occurs in any office, the Board of Directors may elect or appoint a successor to fill such vacancy for the remainder of the term.
 
 
 
SECTION 1.
.
Chairman of the Board
 
The Chairman of the Board shall preside, when present, at all meetings of the stockholders (except as otherwise provided by statute) and at all meetings of the Board of Directors. The Chairman shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation; to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the Chairman by the Board of Directors.
 
SECTION 2.
.
President
 
The President shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation and to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; during the absence or disability of the Chairman of the Board to exercise the Chairman's powers and to perform the Chairman's duties; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the President by the Board of Directors; provided, that if the office of President is vacant, the Chairman shall exercise the duties ordinarily exercised by the President until such time as a President is elected or appointed.
 
SECTION 3.
.
Chief Executive Officer
 
The officer designated by the Board of Directors as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation shall have general and active control of its business and affairs. The Chief Executive Officer shall have general power to appoint or designate all employees and agents of the Corporation whose appointment or designation is not otherwise provided for and to fix the compensation thereof, subject to the provisions of these By-Laws; to remove or suspend any employee or agent who shall not have been elected or appointed by the Board of Directors or other body; to suspend for cause any employee, agent, or officer, other than an elected officer, pending final action by the body which shall have appointed such employee, agent, or officer; and to exercise all the powers usually pertaining to the office held by the Chief Executive Officer of a corporation.
 
SECTION 4.
.
Vice Presidents and Controller
 
The several Vice Presidents and the Controller shall perform all such duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of them, from time to time, by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer, respectively.
 
SECTION 5.
Secretary
.
 
The Secretary shall attend to the giving of notice of all meetings of stockholders and of the Board of Directors and shall keep and attest true records of all proceedings thereat. The Secretary shall have charge of the corporate seal and have authority to attest any and all instruments or writings to which the same may be affixed and shall keep and account for all books, documents, papers, and records of the Corporation relating to its corporate organization. The Secretary shall have authority to sign stock certificates and shall generally perform all the duties usually appertaining to the office of secretary of a corporation. In the absence of
 
the Secretary, an Assistant Secretary or Secretary pro tempore shall perform the duties of the Secretary.
 
SECTION 6.
.
Treasurer
 
The Treasurer shall have the care and custody of all moneys, funds, and securities of the Corporation, and shall deposit or cause to be deposited all funds of the Corporation in accordance with directions or authorizations of the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer. The Treasurer shall have power to sign stock certificates, to indorse for deposit or collection, or otherwise, all checks, drafts, notes, bills of exchange, or other commercial paper payable to the Corporation, and to give proper receipts or discharges therefor. In the absence of the Treasurer, an Assistant Treasurer shall perform the duties of the Treasurer.
 
SECTION 7.
.
Additional Powers and Duties
 
In addition to the foregoing especially enumerated duties and powers, the several officers of the Corporation shall perform such other duties and exercise such further powers as may be provided in these By-Laws or as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine, or as may be assigned to them by any superior officer.
 
SECTION 8.
.
Disaster Emergency Powers of Acting Officers
 
If, as a result of a disaster or other state of emergency, the Chief Executive Officer is unable to perform the duties of that office, (a) the powers and duties of the Chief Executive Officer shall be performed by the employee with the highest base salary who shall be available and capable of performing such powers and duties and, if more than one such employee has the same base salary, by the employee whose surname begins with the earliest letter of the alphabet among the group of those employees with the same base salary; and (b) the officer performing such duties shall continue to perform such powers and duties until the Chief Executive Officer becomes capable of performing those duties or until the Board of Directors shall have elected a new Chief Executive Officer or designated another individual as Acting Chief Executive Officer; and (c) such officer shall have the power in addition to all other powers granted to the Chief Executive Officer by these By-Laws and by the Board of Directors to appoint an acting President, acting Vice President - Finance, acting Controller, acting Secretary, and acting Treasurer, if any of the persons duly elected to any such office is not by reason of such disaster or emergency able to perform the duties of such office, each of such acting appointees to serve in such capacities until the officer for whom the appointee is acting becomes capable of performing the duties of such office or until the Board of Directors shall have designated another individual to perform such duties or have elected another person to fill such office; and (d) any such acting officer so appointed shall be entitled to exercise all powers vested by the By-Laws or the Board of Directors in the duly elected officer for whom the acting officer is acting; and (e) anyone transacting business with this Corporation may rely upon a certification by any two officers of the Corporation that a specified individual has succeeded to the powers of the Chief Executive Officer and that such person has appointed other acting officers as herein provided and any person, firm, corporation, or other entity to which such certification has been delivered by such officers may continue to rely upon it until notified of a change in writing signed by two officers of this Corporation.
 
 
 
SECTION 1.
.
Stock Certificates
 
Every stockholder shall be entitled to a certificate, signed by the Chairman of the Board or the President or a Vice President and the Treasurer or an Assistant Treasurer or the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary, certifying the number of shares owned by the stockholder in the Corporation. Any and all of the signatures on a certificate may be a facsimile. If any officer, transfer agent, or registrar who has signed or whose facsimile signature has been placed upon a certificate shall have ceased to be such officer, transfer agent, or registrar before such certificate is issued, it may be issued by the Corporation with the same effect as if he or she were such officer, transfer agent, or registrar at the date of issue.
 
SECTION 2.
.
Transfer Agents and Registrars
 
The Board of Directors may, in its discretion, appoint responsible banks or trust companies in the Borough of Manhattan, in the City of New York, State of New York, and in such other city or cities as the Board may deem advisable, from time to time, to act as transfer agents and registrars of the stock of the Corporation; and, when such appointments shall have been made, no stock certificate shall be valid until countersigned by one of such transfer agents and registered by one of such registrars.
 
SECTION 3.
.
Transfers of Stock
 
Shares of stock may be transferred by delivery of the certificates therefor, accompanied either by an assignment in writing on the back of the certificates or by written power of attorney to sell, assign, and transfer the same, signed by the record holder thereof; but no transfer shall affect the right of the Corporation to pay any dividend upon the stock to the holder of record thereof, or to treat the holder of record as the holder in fact thereof for all purposes, and no transfer shall be valid, except between the parties thereto, until such transfer shall have been made upon the books of the Corporation.
 
SECTION 4.
.
Lost Certificates
 
The Board of Directors may provide for the issuance of new certificates of stock to replace certificates of stock lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, or alleged to be lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, upon such terms and in accordance with such procedures as the Board of Directors shall deem proper and prescribe.
 
 
 
SECTION 1.
Fiscal Year
.
 
The fiscal year of the Corporation shall be the calendar year.
 
SECTION 2. (Repealed in its entirety by vote of the stockholders, May 5, 1975.)
 
SECTION 3.
.
Signing of Negotiable Instruments
 
All bills, notes, checks, or other instruments for the payment of money shall be signed or countersigned by such officer or officers and in such manner as from time to time may be prescribed by resolution (whether general or special) of the Board of Directors.
 
SECTION 4.
.
Indemnification of Directors and Officers
 
4.1 Each person who was or is made a party or is threatened to be made a party to or is otherwise involved (including, without limitation, as a witness) in any actual or threatened action, suit, or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative, or investigative (hereinafter a "proceeding"), by reason of the fact that he or she is or was a director or officer of the Corporation or that, being or having been such a director or officer or an employee of the Corporation, he or she is or was serving at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation as a director, officer, employee, or agent of another corporation or of a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise, including service with respect to an employee benefit plan (hereinafter an "indemnitee"), whether the basis of such proceeding is alleged action in an official capacity as such a director, officer, employee, or agent or in any other capacity while serving as such a director, officer, employee, or agent, shall be indemnified and held harmless by the Corporation to the full extent permitted by the Delaware General Corporation Law, as the same exists or may hereafter be amended (but, in the case of any such amendment, only to the extent that such amendment permits the Corporation to provide broader indemnification rights than permitted prior thereto), or by other applicable law as then in effect, against all expense, liability, and loss (including attorneys' fees, judgments, fines, ERISA excise taxes or penalties, and amounts paid in settlement) actually and reasonably incurred or suffered by such indemnitee in connection therewith and such indemnification shall continue as to an indemnitee who has ceased to be a director, officer, employee, or agent and shall inure to the benefit of the indemnitee's heirs, executors, and administrators; , , that except as provided in Section 4.2 with respect to proceedings seeking to enforce rights to indemnification, the Corporation shall indemnify any such indemnitee in connection with a proceeding (or part thereof) initiated by such indemnitee only if such proceeding (or part thereof) was authorized or ratified by the Board of Directors of the Corporation. The right to indemnification conferred in this Section 4.1 shall be a contract right and shall include the right to be paid by the Corporation the expenses incurred in defending any such proceeding in advance of its final disposition (hereinafter an "advancement of expenses"); , , that an advancement of expenses incurred by an indemnitee in his or her capacity as a director or officer (and not in any other capacity in which service was or is rendered by such indemnitee, including, without limitation, service to an employee benefit plan) shall be made only upon delivery to the Corporation of an under-taking (hereinafter an "undertaking"), by or on behalf of such indemnitee, to repay all amounts so advanced if it shall ultimately be determined by final judicial decision from which there is no further right to appeal that such indemnitee is not entitled to be indemnified for such expenses under this Section 4.1 or otherwise; and , , that an advancement of expenses shall not be made if the Corporation's Board of Directors makes a good faith determination that such payment would violate law or public policy.
.
Right to Indemnification
provided
however
provided
however
provided
further
 
4.2 If a claim under Section 4.1 is not paid in full by the Corporation within sixty days after a written claim has been received by the Corporation, except in the case of a claim for an advancement of expenses, in which case the applicable period shall be twenty days, the indemnitee may at any time thereafter bring suit against the Corporation to recover the unpaid amount of the claim. If successful in whole or in part in any such suit, or in a suit brought by the Corporation to recover an advancement of expenses pursuant to the terms of an undertaking, the indemnitee shall also be entitled to be paid the expense of prosecuting or defending such suit. The indemnitee shall be presumed to be entitled to indemnification under this Section 4 upon submission of a written claim (and, in an action brought to enforce a claim for an advancement of expenses, where the required undertaking has been tendered to the Corporation), and thereafter the Corporation shall have the burden of proof to overcome the presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled. Neither the failure of the Corporation (including its Board of Directors, independent legal counsel, or its stockholders) to have made a determination prior to the commencement of such suit that indemnification of the indemnitee is proper in the circumstances, nor an actual determination by the Corporation (including its Board of Directors, independent legal counsel, or its stockholders) that the indemnitee is not entitled to indemnification shall be a defense to the suit or create a presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled.
.
Right of Indemnitee to Bring Suit
 
4.3 The rights to indemnification and to the advancement of expenses conferred in this Section 4 shall not be exclusive of any other right which any person may have or hereafter acquire under any statute, provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation, By-Laws, agreement, vote of stockholders or disinterested directors, or otherwise. Notwithstanding any amendment to or repeal of this Section 4, or of any of the procedures established by the Board of Directors pursuant to Section 4.7, any indemnitee shall be entitled to indemnification in accordance with the provisions hereof and thereof with respect to any acts or omissions of such indemnitee occurring prior to such amendment or repeal.
.
Nonexclusivity of Rights
 
4.4 The Corporation may maintain insurance, at its expense, to protect itself and any director, officer, employee, or agent of the Corporation or another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise against any expense, liability, or loss, whether or not the Corporation would have the power to indemnify such person against such expense, liability, or loss under the Delaware General Corporation Law. The Corporation may, without further stockholder approval, enter into contracts with any indemnitee in furtherance of the provisions of this Section 4 and may create a trust fund, grant a security interest, or use other means (including, without limitation, a letter of credit) to ensure the payment of such amounts as may be necessary to effect indemnification as provided in this Section 4.
.
Insurance, Contracts, and Funding
 
4.5 Any person who is or was a director, officer, or employee of the Corporation who is or was serving (i) as a director or officer of another corporation of which a majority of the shares entitled to vote in the election of its directors is held by the Corporation or (ii) in an executive or management capacity in a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise of which the Corporation or a wholly owned subsidiary of the Corporation is a general partner or has a majority ownership shall be deemed to be so serving
.
Persons Serving Other Entities
 
at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation and entitled to indemnification and advancement of expenses under Section 4.1.
 
4.6 The Corporation may, by action of its Board of Directors, authorize one or more executive officers to grant rights to advancement of expenses to employees or agents of the Corporation on such terms and conditions as such officer or officers deem appropriate under the circumstances. The Corporation may, by action of its Board of Directors, grant rights to indemnification and advancement of expenses to employees or agents or groups of employees or agents of the Corporation with the same scope and effect as the provisions of this Section 4 with respect to the indemnification and advancement of expenses of directors and officers of the Corporation; , , that an undertaking shall be made by an employee or agent only if required by the Board of Directors.
.
Indemnification of Employees and Agents of the Corporation
provided
however
 
4.7 The Board of Directors may establish reasonable procedures for the submission of claims for indemnification pursuant to this Section 4, determination of the entitlement of any person thereto, and review of any such determination. Such procedures shall be set forth in an appendix to these By-Laws and shall be deemed for all purposes to be a part hereof.
.
Procedures for the Submission of Claims
 
SECTION 5.
.
Designated Engineer in the State of Washington
 
5.1 The Board of Directors, as required by the Revised Code of Washington, has appointed a licensed professional engineer in the State of Washington the Designated Engineer as being in responsible charge for the practice of engineering performed by the Corporation in Washington.
.
Appointment of Designated Engineer
 
5.2 The Board of Directors grants and delegates to the Designated Engineer the full authority to make all final engineering decisions on behalf of the Corporation with respect to engineering work performed in the State of Washington.
.
Grant of Authority to the Designated Engineer
 
5.3 The Board of Directors grants and delegates to the appropriate officers of the Corporation the authority to designate each successor Designated Engineer as being in responsible charge for the practice of engineering and to notify the Washington Board of Registration for Professional Engineers and Land Surveyors of the appointment of each successor Designated Engineer within 30 days after the effective date of the appointment.
.
Grant of Authority to Appropriate Officers
 
 
 
SECTION 1.
.
Amendment of the By-Laws: General
 
Except as herein otherwise expressly provided, the By-Laws of the Corporation may be altered or repealed in any particular and new By-Laws, not inconsistent with any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or any provision of law, may be adopted, either by the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority in number of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote at an annual meeting of stockholders or at a special meeting thereof, the notice of which special meeting shall include the form of the proposed alteration or repeal or of the proposed new By-Laws, or a summary thereof; or either
 
 
 
provided, in either of the latter cases, that the notice of such meeting shall include the form of the proposed alteration or repeal or of the proposed new By-Laws, or a summary thereof.
 
SECTION 2.
.
Amendments as to Compensation and Removal of Officers
 
Notwithstanding anything contained in these By-Laws to the contrary, the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the Voting Stock, as defined in Article FOURTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, at a meeting of the stockholders called for the purpose, shall be required to alter, amend, repeal, or adopt any provision inconsistent with Sections 3, 4 and 5 of Article IV hereof, notice of which meeting shall include the form of the proposed amendment, or a summary thereof.
 
SECTION 3.
.
Amendments as to Stockholders' Meetings, Directors
 
Notwithstanding anything contained in these By-Laws to the contrary, either (a) the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, or (b) the affirmative vote of the holders of record of at least seventy-five percent of the Voting Stock, as defined in Article FOURTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, shall be required to alter, amend, repeal, or adopt any provision inconsistent with Sections 1, 2, and 4 of Article I and Sections 1, 10, and 11 of Article II.
 
SECTION 4.
.
Amendment of this Article VIII
 
Notwithstanding anything contained in these By-Laws to the contrary, either (a) the recommendation of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, together with the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the Voting Stock, as defined in Article FOURTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, or (b) the affirmative vote of the holders of record of at least seventy-five percent of the Voting Stock, as defined in Article FOURTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, shall be required to alter, amend, repeal, or adopt any provision inconsistent with this Article VIII.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20050427110641.txt.gz
TIME:20050427110641
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Disclosure of Results of Operations.
 
The following information is being furnished under Item 12 of Form 8-K: News Release by The Boeing Company, for the first quarter results as announced on April 27, 2005. The text of the release is attached as exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
(a) Not applicable
 
(b) Not applicable
 
(c) Exhibits
 
99.1    Press Release issued April 27, 2005.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
Boeing Reports First-Quarter 2005 Results; Reaffirms Outlook
 
 Integrated Defense Systems delivers double-digit margins driven by excellent execution across all four business segments
 
 Commercial Airplanes continues strong operating performance and outstanding sales success
 
Financial Highlights:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Selected First-Quarter 2005 Operating Highlights:
 
 
 
 
Table 1. Summary Financial Results
 
 
 The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] today reported first-quarter 2005 net income of $535 million, or $0.66 per share, on revenues of $13.0 billion. Strong operating results offset charges totaling $0.07 per share related to the disposal of Boeing's venture capital investments and the sale of the Electron Dynamic Devices (EDD) business. First-quarter earnings also benefited from tax adjustments totaling $0.14 per share, which helped offset significant increases in non-cash pension and share-based-plans expense. First-quarter 2004 earnings of $0.77 per share included a $0.12 per share benefit from interest on a tax refund.
CHICAGO, Apr. 27, 2005
 
"First-quarter results reflect continued strong operational and financial performance across our businesses and demonstrate that the 160,000 people of Boeing remain keenly focused on delivering value to customers and shareholders," said Boeing President and CEO James Bell. "Integrated Defense Systems delivered outstanding margins as it continued to execute well on its broad portfolio of defense, space and intelligence programs. Commercial Airplanes generated strong operating performance while capturing over 250 new orders and commitments as the commercial airplane market continues to recover. Our cash flow remains very strong, driven by solid earnings and excellent working capital performance. I am pleased that the entire Boeing team remains focused on business execution, demonstrating our commitment to integrity and growing the business."
 
The Company's first-quarter earnings from operations decreased to $0.7 billion (see Table 2) as significantly higher non-cash expenses for share-based plans, deferred compensation and pensions offset strong performance by its core businesses.
 
Table 2. Earnings from Operations & Margins
 
 
Share-based-plans expense grew $126 million, or $0.10 per share, from the first quarter of 2004. The increase reflected the vesting of performance shares and the adoption of the new methodology required by Financial Accounting Standard (FAS) 123R for estimating expense related to the Company's performance share plans. This
 
change reduces total expense over the life of a share grant but accelerates expense in the early years compared with the previous methodology. These expenses are non-cash and are attributable to the Company's equity compensation plans, which the Company has expensed since adopting FAS 123 in 1998. Deferred stock compensation expense decreased first-quarter earnings by $0.05 per share as the Company's stock price rose 13 percent during the period. Pre-tax (non-cash) pension expense was $223 million, up $151 million, or $0.12 per share, from the first quarter of 2004. The increase includes pension charges related to the EDD sale.
 
Cash flow remained very strong as the Company generated $1.4 billion of operating cash flow during the first quarter after making an additional discretionary contribution of $455 million to its pension plans. Free cash flow* for the quarter was $1.1 billion (see Table 3).
 
Table 3. Cash Flow
 
 
 
 
The Company's cash balance at quarter-end totaled $3.3 billion, up slightly from the end of 2004 (see Table 4). The cash balance reflected strong operating cash flows that offset the cash used for the Company's ongoing share repurchase program, debt maturities and the investment of cash into marketable securities. The combination of cash and marketable securities totaled $6.3 billion at the end of the first quarter, up slightly from $6.1 billion at the end of 2004. The Company repurchased 8.9 million shares during the quarter for $495 million. Boeing's debt fell slightly from $4.7 billion to $4.4 billion. Boeing Capital debt dropped to $6.8 billion as operating cash flow from the unit exceeded new financing requirements.
 
Table 4. Cash, Marketable Securities and Debt Balances
 
 
Segment Results
 
Integrated Defense Systems
 
Integrated Defense Systems (IDS) delivered outstanding profitability as its defense and intelligence businesses continued to perform in healthy markets. IDS results are summarized in Table 5.
 
During the first quarter, IDS revenues increased 2 percent to $7.5 billion as growth at Network Systems offset a decline at Aircraft and Weapon Systems. IDS produced excellent first-quarter operating margins of 11.2 percent, up from 10.0 percent in the first quarter of 2004 as all four segments delivered strong profitability.
 
Table 5. Integrated Defense Systems Operating Results
 
 
Network Systems continued its rapid growth and solid performance in the first quarter. Revenues rose 18 percent to $2.9 billion on increased activity in Future Combat Systems, Multi-mission Maritime Aircraft, and 737 Airborne Early Warning and Control programs, which offset lower volume in homeland security and proprietary programs. Operating margins were 7.4 percent, up slightly from the first quarter of 2004, as higher revenues and improved performance on a military satellite program were partially offset by revised cost and fee estimates in the missile defense business.
 
Aircraft and Weapon Systems delivered excellent profitability in the first quarter. Revenues fell 11 percent to $2.7 billion primarily driven by the timing of C-17, F/A-18 and F-15 deliveries as well as lower JDAM volumes. Program performance remained strong as operating margins were 13.7 percent, down from 15.8 percent in the first quarter of 2004 when the unit benefited from significant contract close-outs.
 
Support Systems generated very strong profitability on its broad business base during the first quarter. Revenues rose 1 percent to $1.2 billion as increased volume in support services offset reduced volume in the maintenance, modification and upgrade business, supply-chain services and training and support systems. Operating margins grew to 14.4 percent on strong program performance across the segment.
 
Launch and Orbital Systems returned to profitability during the first quarter as the segment continued to make progress. Revenues fell 1 percent to $0.8 billion while operating margins rose to 11.8 percent in the first quarter of 2005 reflecting better program performance as well as a $72 million benefit due to the sale of the EDD business and higher contract values for Delta IV launch contracts. (The EDD charge referenced in the first paragraph of the release is comprised of a gain recorded in the Launch and Orbital Systems segment offset by a non-cash pension charge recorded in accounting differences and eliminations.) During the quarter, IDS announced the sale of its Rocketdyne business to United Technologies for approximately $700 million.
 
At the end of the first quarter, IDS contractual backlog totaled $43.8 billion, up from $39.2 billion at the end of 2004. Unobligated backlog was $41.9 billion at the end of the first quarter. Total IDS backlog, comprised of contractual and unobligated, was $85.7 billion compared with $86.4 billion at the end of 2004.
 
Boeing Commercial Airplanes
 
During the first quarter, Boeing Commercial Airplanes (BCA) won several key customer campaigns while continuing to aggressively manage for profitability and invest to support long-term growth. Commercial Airplanes announced customer commitments for over 250 airplanes in the quarter, including 63 firm orders. Order commitments included 70 737NG airplanes from Ryanair, 30 737NG airplanes from Japan Airlines, 20 737NG airplanes from Singapore Aircraft Leasing Enterprise and 60 787 Dreamliners to be delivered to Air China, China Eastern Airlines, China Southern Airlines, Hainan Airlines, Shanghai Airlines and Xiamen Airlines. The 787 program alone has won total orders and commitments from 19 airlines for 237 airplanes over the past 12 months. BCA results are summarized in Table 6.
 
Table 6. Commercial Airplanes Operating Results
 
 
Commercial Airplanes delivered 70 airplanes in the first quarter and generated $5.1 billion of revenue, down modestly from the first quarter of 2004 due to lower deliveries. Operating margins were 7.7 percent, up from the first quarter of 2004 reflecting strong operating performance partially offset by fewer deliveries and lower revenues as well as higher 787 development spending.
 
During the quarter, Commercial Airplanes announced the sale of its Wichita and Tulsa operations to Onex for approximately $900 million cash, the transfer of about $120 million in liabilities to Onex, and the establishment of long-term supply agreements that provide Commercial Airplanes with ongoing cost savings.
 
Commercial Airplanes captured 63 gross and 46 net orders during the quarter including important orders from Icelandair, Air France, SpiceJet, GOL Airlines and First Choice Airways. Contractual backlog totaled $68.7 billion at the end of the first quarter, compared with $70.4 billion at the end of 2004.
 
Boeing Capital Corporation
 
Boeing Capital Corporation (BCC) continued to create value by supporting the operations of Boeing's business units and reducing portfolio risk. Revenues for the first quarter were $237 million and pre-tax income was $44 million, both down from the first quarter of 2004 due to portfolio reductions and the absence of gains on asset sales recognized in 2004. BCC results are summarized in Table 7.
 
Table 7. Boeing Capital Corporation Operating Results
 
 
The quarter-end portfolio balance was $9.4 billion, down from $9.7 billion at the end of 2004. The portfolio reduction reflects normal portfolio run-off and depreciation, which was higher than new business volume for the quarter, and a restructure of certain leases which resulted in the application of reserves to reduce asset values. These factors, combined with solid performance, enabled BCC to contribute $55 million in cash dividends to the Company during the quarter. Leverage, as measured by the ratio of debt-to-equity, was 5.0-to-1, unchanged from the end of 2004.
 
"Other" Segment
 
The "Other" segment consists primarily of the Connexion by Boeing
SM
and Boeing Technology units, as well as certain results related to the consolidation of all business units. For the first quarter, losses from operations were $72 million, improved from the first quarter of 2004. Connexion by Boeing
SM
, which began commercial service in May 2004, has announced firm orders and options from 10 airlines for more than 450 aircraft and this quarter announced that it is now offering broadband services to the maritime market.
 
Outlook
 
The Company's overall outlook for 2005 and 2006 is unchanged and reflects strong growth in revenues and earnings (see Table 8). The financial guidance does not
 
include any impact from the sale of the Company's Rocketdyne or Wichita and Tulsa operations, which have been announced but have not closed.
 
Defense and intelligence markets are expected to remain strong in 2005 and 2006 with U.S. Defense budgets expected to grow modestly. The airline industry environment remains mixed with trends varying between carriers and regions. The global economy and air traffic trends are strengthening and interest from airlines in adding capacity to handle higher traffic volume is increasing. Many low-cost carriers and international airlines are profitable and are ordering new airplanes. However, higher fuel prices continue to dampen airline profits, particularly in the United States. Commercial Airplanes is experiencing increased demand for aircraft, especially 737s, 777s and the new 787 Dreamliner, as airline passengers continue to value frequent, direct routes and airlines focus on reducing costs.
 
The Company expects airplane deliveries to increase in 2005 and 2006, followed by a further increase in 2007. Commercial Airplanes' delivery forecast for 2005 is unchanged at approximately 320 airplanes. The delivery forecast for 2006 is also unchanged at between 375 and 385 airplanes. The delivery forecast is sold out for 2005 and 84 percent sold out for 2006 at the low end of the range.
 
The Company expects its defense and non-commercial space businesses to continue performing well in their growing markets. IDS anticipates continued growth and performance in its Network Systems segment, driven by programs such as Future Combat Systems, Multi-mission Maritime Aircraft and the Company's leading position in missile defense, intelligence, and DoD network-centric programs. The Aircraft and Weapon Systems and Support Systems segments also are expected to continue delivering strong results.
 
The Company's 2005 revenue outlook is approximately $58 billion. Revenue guidance for 2006 is between $62 billion and $63 billion reflecting continued growth at IDS and higher commercial airplane deliveries compared to 2005.
 
Earnings-per-share guidance for 2005 is between $2.40 and $2.60 per share. Earnings-per-share guidance for 2006 is between $3.00 and $3.20 as improved operating performance and continued revenue growth in the Company's core businesses are expected to offset increased pension expense.
 
The Company expects operating cash flow for 2005 to be greater than $5.0 billion, after anticipated pension contributions totaling $1 billion. Operating cash flow in 2006 is also expected to be greater than $5.5 billion, after $500 million of expected pension contributions. During the guidance period, the Company will continue to evaluate making additional discretionary payments to its pension plans. The Company expects capital expenditures in 2005 to be approximately $1.5 billion and expenditures in 2006 to be approximately $1.7 billion.
 
The Company expects research and development investment between $2.3 billion and $2.5 billion in 2005 and between $2.5 billion and $2.7 billion in 2006 (or approximately four percent of revenues) as investment increases on the 787 program.
 
Table 8. Financial Outlook
 
 
Non-GAAP Measure Disclosure
 
The following definitions are provided for non-GAAP (Generally Accepted Accounting Principles) measures (indicated by an asterisk *) used by the Company within this disclosure. The Company does not intend for the information to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the related GAAP measures. Other companies may define the measures differently.
 
Free Cash Flow
 
Free cash flow is defined as GAAP operating cash flow less capital expenditures for property, plant, and equipment, additions. Management believes free cash flow provides investors with an important perspective on the cash available for shareholders, debt repayment, and acquisitions after making the capital investments required to support ongoing business operations and long term value creation. Free cash flow does not represent the residual cash flow available for discretionary expenditures as it excludes certain mandatory expenditures such as repayment of maturing debt. Management uses free cash flow internally to assess both business performance and overall liquidity. Table 3 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and free cash flow.
 
 
Certain statements in this report may constitute "forward-looking" statements within the meaning of the Private Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions as to future events that may not prove to be accurate. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak only as of the date they were made and we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise. Our actual results and future trends may differ materially depending on a variety of factors, including the continued operation, viability and growth of major airline customers and non-airline customers (such as the U.S. Government); adverse developments in the value of collateral securing customer and other financings; the occurrence of any significant collective bargaining labor dispute; our successful execution of internal performance plans, production rate increases and decreases (including any reduction in or termination of an aircraft product), acquisition and divestiture plans, and other cost-reduction and productivity efforts; charges from any future SFAS No. 142 review; an adverse development in rating agency credit ratings or assessments; the actual outcomes of certain pending sales campaigns and the launch of the 787 program and U.S. and foreign government procurement activities, including the uncertainty associated with the procurement of tankers by the U.S. Department of Defense (DoD); the cyclical nature of some of our businesses; unanticipated financial market changes which may impact pension plan assumptions; domestic and international competition in the defense, space and commercial areas; continued integration of acquired businesses; performance issues with key suppliers, subcontractors and customers; significant disruption to air travel worldwide (including future terrorist attacks); global trade policies; worldwide political stability; domestic and international economic conditions; price escalation; the outcome of political and legal processes, changing priorities or reductions in the U.S. Government or foreign government defense and space budgets; termination of government or commercial contracts due to unilateral government or customer action or failure to perform; legal, financial and governmental risks related to international transactions; legal and investigatory proceedings; tax settlements with the IRS and various states; U.S. Air Force review of previously awarded contracts; and other economic, political and technological risks and uncertainties. Additional information regarding these factors is contained in our SEC filings, including, without limitation, our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2004.
 
 
Cxxxx
 
Contact:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20050504080112.txt.gz
TIME:20050504080112
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Regulation FD Disclosure	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
        Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
         [   ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
         [   ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
         [   ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
         [   ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Item  1.01.    Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
                 On May 2, 2005, The Boeing Company ("Boeing") and Lockheed Martin Corporation ("Lockheed Martin") entered into a Joint Venture Master Agreement (the "Master Agreement") pursuant to which Boeing and Lockheed Martin agreed to form a joint venture that will own and operate their U.S. Government expendable launch businesses, including the Boeing Delta and Lockheed Martin Atlas rockets. Pursuant to the Master Agreement, each of Boeing and Lockheed Martin agreed to contribute certain assets and liabilities related to their respective businesses of designing, developing and manufacturing expendable launch vehicle ("ELV") systems for, and providing launch services using such ELV systems to, the U.S. Government, in exchange for a 50% ownership interest in a Delaware limited liability company to be formed (the "Company"). Under the terms of the Master Agreement, Boeing and Lockheed Martin have agreed to support the Company's initial working capital needs. Both Boeing and Lockheed Martin plan to account for the ownership interest in the Company using the equity method of accounting.
                 Lockheed Martin's International Launch Services (including Proton) and Boeing Launch Services (including Sea Launch) are not included in the joint venture. Each of Boeing and Lockheed Martin will continue to provide launch services to commercial customers outside the joint venture. At the closing, the Company will enter into agreements granting exclusive rights to International Launch Services and Boeing Launch Services to market Atlas and Delta launch services, respectively, to commercial customers for a period of ten years.
                 The contributions of each party will be subject to adjustment based on the net working capital of each of the ELV businesses as of the closing. Neither member's percentage ownership in the Company will change as a result of the adjustment.
                 The Master Agreement provides that each of Boeing and Lockheed Martin will enter into various agreements with the Company at the closing of the transaction, including long-term supply agreements, transition services agreements, and various real property leases and subleases. The Master Agreement includes a non-competition provision which generally prohibits Boeing and Lockheed Martin from providing expendable launch vehicle and related launch services to the U.S. Government for 7 1/2 years after the closing date and from designing or developing competitive launch vehicles for the U.S. Government for 5 years after the closing date, in each case subject to various exceptions. The Master Agreement also contains provisions restricting each of Boeing, Lockheed Martin and the Company from soliciting or hiring certain employees of the others. Until the closing, Lockheed Martin and Boeing will continue to operate their respective ELV businesses independently.
                 The Master Agreement provides that Boeing and Lockheed Martin will promptly request an order from the U.S. District Court suspending all activity in the pending civil litigation between them related to a previous competition for launches under the Air Force Evolved ELV program. As of the closing of the transactions contemplated by the Master Agreement, the parties will enter into a final settlement agreement and will dismiss all pending claims in the civil proceeding.
                 The obligations of each of Boeing and Lockheed Martin to complete the transactions contemplated by the Master Agreement are subject to several conditions, including:
                 The Master Agreement may be terminated prior to the closing of the transaction by either Boeing or Lockheed Martin:
                 Effective as of the closing, each of Boeing and Lockheed Martin has agreed, subject to certain limitations, to indemnify the other and the Company against certain damages arising out of a breach of its representations and warranties or covenants, and for certain liabilities retained by each.
                 The Company's day-to-day operations will be managed by an executive management team from both members. Mike Gass, Vice President and General Manager of Lockheed Martin Space Transportation, has been designated to serve as the Company's President and Chief Executive Officer. Dan Collins, Vice President of Boeing Expendable Launch Systems, has
been designated to serve as Chief Operating Officer. These managers will report to a six-member board of directors, with each member appointing three directors.
Item  7.01.    Regulation FD Disclosure.
                 A copy of the joint press release of Boeing and Lockheed Martin announcing the transaction is furnished as Exhibit 99 to this report.
Item  8.01.    Other Events.
                 The information set forth above under "Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement" is incorporated herein by reference.
Item  9.01.    Financial Statements and Exhibits.
                 Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
Date:  May 3, 2005

Exhibit 99    
Boeing, Lockheed Martin to Form Launch Services Joint Venture
      o   
Lowers Cost to the Government
      o    
Maintains Assured Access to Spac
e
      o   
Enhances Reliability
      o   
Provides Full Cost Visibility
            CHICAGO, and BETHESDA, MD  May 2, 2005  The Boeing Company (NYSE: BA) and Lockheed Martin Corporation (NYSE: LMT) have entered into an agreement to create a joint venture that will combine the production, engineering, test and launch operations associated with U.S. government launches of Boeing Delta and Lockheed Martin Atlas rockets. The joint venture, named United Launch Alliance, will reduce the cost of meeting the critical national security and NASA expendable launch vehicle needs of the United States.
            "It has become increasingly clear that an alliance of launch capabilities is essential to meet the space communications, surveillance and reconnaissance needs of the 21 century, and to assure access to space," said Lockheed Martin Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer Robert J. Stevens. "This combination will permit our national customers to achieve their mission objectives while reflecting current budget pressures and providing the government with full cost visibility."
st
            "Both of our companies have developed versions of the Evolved Expendable Launch Vehicle (EELV) in collaboration with the Air Force and have flown them successfully," said Boeing President, Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer James A. Bell. "By joining together we are convinced that we can provide the customer with assured access to space at the lowest possible cost while ensuring enhanced reliability by eliminating duplicate infrastructure and bringing experts from both companies to focus on mission assurance."
            United Launch Alliance will be structured as a 50-50 joint venture between Boeing and Lockheed Martincombining services currently provided separately by Boeing Integrated Defense Systems' Expendable Launch Systems division
and by Lockheed Martin's Space Systems Companyfor launches of each company's respective rockets. Based upon initial estimates, annual savings to the government resulting from the combination are expected to be approximately $100  $150 million.
            Michael C. Gass, vice president and general manager of Lockheed Martin Space Transportation, has been appointed United Launch Alliance president and chief executive officer and Daniel J. Collins, vice president Boeing Expendable Launch Systems will serve as chief operating officer. In addition, a Boeing executive will be appointed chief financial officer and a Lockheed Martin executive will be named controller at a later date. These leaders will report to a six-member board of directors, with each company appointing three directors.
            "The Lockheed Martin and Boeing employees who will be part of this new launch provider understand the enduring needs of our Air Force and NASA customers for mission success," said Gass. "They bring together a remarkable record of accomplishment in launching national-security and scientific space payloads."
            "The continued performance of Boeing and Lockheed Martin employees as a new team going forwardfrom the engineering center to the factory floor to the launch padwill offer even greater reliability and mission assurance to the customer," said Collins.
            The agreement, which is subject to government and regulatory approval in the United States and internationally, also stipulates that the companies will immediately request an order from the U.S. District Court suspending all activity in the pending civil litigation related to a previous competition for launches under the Air Force EELV program. Simultaneous with the closing of the transaction, the parties will dismiss all claims against each other.
            "The mission of this joint venture is to reliably meet critical launch needs, so it is imperative that the two teams come together as one with all lingering issues resolved," said Stevens. "When agreement was reached to form this alliance, both parties agreed that they were ready to move forward with a clean slate and an undistracted focus on mission success."
            Under the terms of the joint venture, Boeing's Delta and Lockheed Martin's Atlas rockets will continue to be available as alternatives on individual launch missions. This will ensure that government customers are able to make decisions that meet the goal of assured access to space with two families of launch vehicles. Upon vehicle selection, the United Launch Alliance team will carry out the mission, including vehicle integration and payload processing.
            Lockheed Martin's International Launch Services (including Proton) and Boeing Launch Services (including Sea Launch) are not included in the joint venture. These entities will continue to sell launch services to non-U.S. government customers. Additionally, work the companies are performing independently in support of NASA-sponsored Space Shuttle-Derived Launch Vehicle concepts for future space exploration initiatives will be excluded from this joint venture.
            United Launch Alliance headquarters will be established in Denver with most engineering and administrative activities consolidated at that location's existing Lockheed Martin Space Systems Company facilities. Major assembly and integration operations will be located primarily at Boeing's manufacturing and assembly facility in Decatur, Ala. As part of the joint venture, Boeing's and Lockheed Martin's launch facilities at Cape Canaveral Air Force Station in Florida and Vandenberg Air Force Base in California will provide flexibility for meeting the requirements for East and West Coast launches.
            United Launch Alliance is expected to have about 3,800 total employees at sites in Colorado, Alabama, Florida, California and Texas. It is anticipated that consolidation of the two organizations eventually will result in the elimination of some undetermined number of positions. A range of services will be made available to support those employees transferring to new locations to work with United Launch Alliance.
            Completion of the transaction is expected in late 2005 at which time United Launch Alliance operations would begin.
            Morgan Stanley served as financial advisor to Boeing and JP Morgan served as financial advisor to Lockheed Martin.
Safe Harbor Statement / Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements contained in this press release are considered "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, and it is both companies' intent that such statements be protected by the safe harbor created thereby. Forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to statements regarding: (1) the expected closing date of the transaction; (2) the expected costs savings arising out of the transaction; (3) the ability to quantify and demonstrate cost savings; (4) the complexities of successfully integrating two workforces; (5) the difficulty in retaining critical skill employees; (6) uncertainties involved in advanced technological products and services; and (7) future performance, reliability and mission assurance. These forward-looking statements are subject to a number of risks, uncertainties and other factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from future results expressed or implied by such forward-looking statements. Potential risks and uncertainties include, but are not limited to: (a) the risk that the transaction may close more slowly than expected or not at all; (b) the risk that the cost savings arising out of the transaction may be less than anticipated, and (c) other risks and uncertainties detailed from time to time in each company's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All information in this release is as of May 2, 2005. Both companies disclaim any duty to update forward-looking statements to reflect subsequent events, actual results or changes in expectations.
Media Contacts: Boeing: Dan Beck, 562-810-5797 or Walt Rice, 314-234-2149 Lockheed Martin: Tom Jurkowsky, 301-897-6352 or Jeff Adams, 301-897-6308
Investor Relations Contacts: Boeing: Dave Dohnalek or Bob Kurtz, 312-544-2140 Lockheed Martin: James Ryan, 301-897-6584 or Mike Gabaly, 301-897-6455


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20050622150600.txt.gz
TIME:20050622150600
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
Item 8.01. Other Events.
 
On June 16, 2005, The Boeing Company (the "Company") completed the sale of its Commercial Airplanes operations in Kansas and Oklahoma to Mid-Western Aircraft Systems, Inc., an indirect majority-owned subsidiary of Onex Partners, LP under an Asset Purchase Agreement dated February 22, 2005. The transaction includes the Company's Commercial Airplanes facilities and assets in Wichita, Kansas, and Tulsa and McAlester, Oklahoma. Boeing Integrated Defense Systems operations in Wichita and Oklahoma are not included in the transaction. Transaction consideration to the Company includes approximately $900 million cash, transfer of certain liabilities, and long-term supply agreements that provide the Company with ongoing cost savings. As a result of the transaction, the Company will recognize a substantially non-cash loss of approximately $350 million on a pre-tax basis. Of the approximate $350 million loss, the Company will recognize approximately $100 million in the second quarter of 2005 and the remaining loss relating to estimated pension and post-retirement curtailments and settlement is anticipated to be recognized in the third quarter of 2005.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
Dated: June 22, 2005
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20050706171453.txt.gz
TIME:20050706171453
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
 
(a) (1) The Boeing Company ("Boeing" or the "Company") and W. James McNerney, Jr. ("Mr. McNerney") entered into the Executive Employment Agreement dated as of June 29, 2005 (the "Agreement"). A copy of the Agreement is filed with this report as Exhibit 99.1.
 
(2) The material terms and conditions of the Agreement are summarized in Item 5.02 below.
 
(3) On June 29, 2005, the Company's Board of Directors (the "Board") approved a change to the standard compensation for non-employee directors to eliminate the additional compensation to be paid to the Non-Executive Chairman and to provide that the Lead Director will receive an annual cash retainer in the amount of $60,000 in addition to his nonemployee director compensation. The remaining components of non-employee director compensation remain unchanged from the amounts described in the Company's Proxy Statement for its 2005 Annual Meeting of Shareholders.
 
Item 5.02. Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers.
 
(b) On June 30, 2005, Boeing issued a press release entitled "Boeing Board Elects W. James McNerney, Jr. Chairman, President and CEO," a copy of which is filed with this report as Exhibit 99.2. As described in the press release, James A. Bell, who has served as the Company's Chief Executive Officer (the Company's principal executive officer) on an interim basis since March 6, 2005, will remain as Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of the Company (principal financial officer). As also described in the press release, Lewis E. Platt, who has served as the Non-Executive Chairman of the Board since December 2003, will become the Lead Director of the Board. He will continue to be a member of the Board's Governance, Organization and Nominating Committee, Compensation Committee, and Special Programs Committee.
 
(c) (1) On June 30, 2005, the Board announced the election of Mr. McNerney as the Company's Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer, effective as of July 1, 2005 (the "Effective Date").
 
(2) Mr. McNerney, age 55, served as Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of 3M Company (diversified technology) since January 2001. Before joining 3M, beginning in 1982, he served in executive positions at General Electric Company, including as President and Chief Executive Officer of GE Aircraft Engines from 1997 until 2000. Mr. McNerney is a director of Procter & Gamble Company. He has been a member of the Boeing Board since 2001. As of the Effective Date, he will no longer serve on the Board's Governance, Organization and Nominating Committee or Compensation Committee, and will become a member of the Special Programs Committee. Other than the Agreement, there is no arrangement or understanding between Mr. McNerney and any other persons pursuant to which he was selected as an officer.
 
(3) Under the terms of the Agreement (defined in Item 1.01 above), Mr. McNerney is employed as the Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company. The material terms and conditions of the Agreement are summarized below, which description is qualified by reference to the provisions of the Agreement attached to this report as Exhibit 99.1. Capitalized terms are as defined in the Agreement.
 
Term of Employment
 
The Agreement has an initial term of three years, with an automatic extension such that the term will thereafter be two years unless the Company or Mr. McNerney gives notice that the term will not be extended.
 
Board of Directors
 
During the term of the Agreement, Mr. McNerney will be nominated for re-election as a member of the Board.
 
Base Salary
 
Mr. McNerney will receive an annual base salary of $1,750,000. The base salary may be increased, but not decreased, from time to time by the Board.
 
Bonus
 
Mr. McNerney will be eligible to participate in the Company's annual bonus plan. His annual bonus will have a target bonus amount of at least 170% of base salary, with a maximum annual bonus of 230% of base salary and a potential reduced bonus for achievements below target in accordance with the terms of the bonus plan.
 
Mr. McNerney's 2005 bonus will be no less than his full annual target bonus, less all quarterly bonus amounts received from 3M for performance during 2005.
 
Annual bonuses for 2005 through 2010 will be paid in cash, and beginning with 2011 will be paid in the same form and subject to the same terms as the annual bonuses paid to other senior executives of the Company.
 
One-Time Buy-Out Equity Awards
 
As compensation to replace unvested 3M equity awards that Mr. McNerney will forfeit, he was granted, effective July 1, 2005, the following Buy-Out Restricted Stock Awards: (i) for forfeited 3M stock options, 159,000 shares of restricted Boeing stock with vesting and restrictions lapsing in five equal annual installments beginning on May 10, 2006; (ii) for forfeited 3M restricted stock awards, 162,000 shares of restricted Boeing stock with vesting and restrictions lapsing in six equal annual installments beginning on January 1, 2006; and (iii) for forfeited 3M restricted stock awards, 70,000 shares of restricted Boeing stock with vesting and restrictions lapsing in three equal annual installments beginning on July 1, 2006. The aggregate value of the Buy-Out Restricted Stock Awards as of July 1, 2005 was $25,289,880. Mr. McNerney will receive dividend equivalents in cash for the Buy-Out Restricted Stock Awards as and when declared and paid.
 
Long-Term Incentives
 
Mr. McNerney will participate in all Company long-term incentive programs at levels commensurate with his position.
 
Stock Ownership Guidelines
 
In accordance with Company policy, Mr. McNerney will be subject to Company stock ownership guidelines. The Buy-Out Restricted Stock Awards will be counted toward his stock ownership guidelines.
 
Supplemental Retirement Benefit
 
As compensation to replace the supplemental nonqualified pension benefit provided by 3M that Mr. McNerney will forfeit, he will receive a supplemental retirement benefit ("Supplemental Pension") payable in a lump sum as of the date of his termination of employment or an earlier Change in Control. The Supplemental Pension is calculated based on the actuarial equivalent of an annuity payable for his lifetime commencing at age 62 equal to 50% of his highest three consecutive year average compensation over the prior ten-year period of employment at Boeing, 3M and GE. The Supplemental Pension will be offset by other retirement benefits payable from Boeing, 3M and GE. Effective upon employment, Mr. McNerney is vested in half of the Supplemental Pension, or 25% of final average pay minus offsets, which has a current estimated lump sum present value of approximately $11 million as of December 31, 2005. The remaining 25% of final average pay will be accrued on a pro-rata basis over a period of five years beginning January 1, 2006. The additional estimated lump sum present value as of December 31, 2005 of the accrual over the future five-year period is approximately $11 million, without regard to future compensation increases. Mr. McNerney is 100% vested in any accrued portion of the Supplemental Pension. However, Mr. McNerney will forfeit the entire Supplemental Pension if he voluntarily terminates employment without Good Reason before the third anniversary of the Effective Date and accepts employment or any other position with substantially comparable compensation elsewhere at any time within one year after such termination date.
 
Other Benefits and Perquisites
 
Mr. McNerney will participate in Company equity, pension, 401(k), and health and welfare benefits offered to senior executives. During the term of the Agreement, Mr. McNerney will be provided with universal life insurance coverage (or reimbursement for such coverage) with an annual premium not to exceed $267,937.
 
Mr. McNerney will receive perquisites that other executive vice presidents of the Company are generally entitled to receive, including business and personal use of Company aircraft for security reasons and consistent with the Company's executive protection policy; club memberships, leased automobile and financial services allowance.
 
Relocation Benefit
 
Mr. McNerney will receive standard relocation benefits, including packing and moving expenses, temporary housing, house-hunting travel, and closing costs on the sale of his current residence and on the purchase of a new residence in the Chicago area, with a gross-up for income taxes.
 
Retiree Benefits
 
Upon completion of five years of continuous employment, Mr. McNerney will be deemed retiree eligible under and in accordance with the terms of all welfare benefit, equity and other incentive plans and programs applicable to senior executives.
 
Mr. McNerney and his spouse (and other covered dependents) will be provided post-employment COBRA-equivalent medical coverage, at his expense, until each of Mr. McNerney and his wife, respectively, attains age 65 (and other covered dependents cease to be eligible for coverage), such coverage to follow any health benefit continuation coverage occurring in connection with severance, as described in subparagraph (iii) below.
 
Severance
 
Upon involuntary termination without Cause or voluntary termination for Good Reason, Mr. McNerney's benefits will include:
 
(i) Full vesting of all Buy-Out Restricted Stock Awards.
 
(ii) Supplemental Pension benefit accrued to date, with additional credit for Supplemental Pension service for the Severance Period.
 
(iii) Severance and any welfare benefit continuation provided in accordance with any Company plan, but no less than
 
(a) two times the sum of Mr. McNerney's base salary plus his then-current target bonus amount;
 
(b) continued participation for two years in all health and welfare plans or, if not available, the value thereof, reduced by comparable subsequent employer benefits; and
 
(c) a pro rata bonus for the termination year based on actual performance for the year.
 
The benefits specified in subparagraph (iii) above do not apply in the case of any termination of Mr. McNerney's employment by the Company or by Mr. McNerney at or after Mr. McNerney has attained age 62.
 
Change in Control
 
Mr. McNerney will receive any change in control benefits as may be provided to other senior executives, except that in the event of a termination of employment in contemplation of or within two years after a Change in Control in which severance would be payable as described above, he will receive change in control benefits no less than the amounts set forth above regarding severance except that "three" will be substituted for "two" in subparagraphs (iii)(a) and (b) above; he will receive additional credit for Supplemental Pension service for the Severance Period.
 
Confidential Information, Nonsolicitation, Noncompetition
 
Mr. McNerney will comply with covenants prohibiting disclosure of confidential information, solicitation of customers and employees, and engaging in competitive activity.
 
Arbitration
 
All disputes arising under or in connection with the Agreement will be resolved through binding arbitration. The Company may seek interim injunctive relief to enforce restrictive covenants pending resolution of any arbitration.
 
Indemnification
 
The Company will indemnify Mr. McNerney to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law and provide director and officer liability insurance to the same extent provided to other directors and officers.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(c) Exhibits.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
Dated: July 5, 2005
 
 
 

EXHIBIT 99.1
 
Execution Copy
 
 
(the "") dated as of June 29, 2005, between The Boeing Company, a Delaware corporation (the ""), and W. James McNerney, Jr. (the "").
EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENT
Agreement
Company
Executive
 
 
, the Company desires to employ the Executive as Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company;
WHEREAS
 
, the Company and the Executive desire to enter into the Agreement as to the terms of his employment by the Company;
WHEREAS
 
, in consideration of the foregoing, of the mutual promises contained herein and of other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto hereby agree as follows:
NOW THEREFORE
 
1. .
POSITION/DUTIES
 
(a) During the Employment Term (as defined in Section 2 below), the Executive shall serve as the Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company. In this capacity the Executive shall have such duties, authorities and responsibilities commensurate with the duties, authorities and responsibilities of persons in similar capacities in similarly sized companies and such other duties and responsibilities as the Board of Directors of the Company (the "") shall designate that are consistent with the Executive's position as Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company. The Executive shall report exclusively to the Board.
Board
 
(b) During the Employment Term, the Executive shall devote substantially all of his business time (excluding periods of vacation and other approved leaves of absence) to the performance of his duties with the Company, provided the foregoing shall not prevent the Executive from (i) participating in charitable, civic, educational, professional, community or industry affairs or, with prior written approval of the Board, serving on the board of directors or advisory boards of other companies; and (ii) managing his and his family's personal investments, so long as such activities do not materially interfere with the performance of his duties hereunder or create a potential business conflict or the appearance thereof. If at any time service on any board of directors or advisory board would, in the good faith judgment of the Board, conflict with the Executive's fiduciary duty to the Company or create any appearance thereof, the Executive shall, as soon as reasonably practicable considering any fiduciary duty to the other entity, resign from such other board of directors or advisory board after written notice of the conflict is received from the Board. Service on the boards of directors or advisory boards disclosed by the Executive to the Company on which he is serving as of the Effective Date are hereby approved.
 
(c) During the Employment Term, the Board shall nominate the Executive for re-election as a member of the Board at the expiration of each then-current term.
(d) The Executive further agrees to serve without additional compensation as an officer and director of any of the Company's subsidiaries and agrees that any amounts received from such corporation may be offset against the amounts due hereunder. In addition, it is agreed that the Company may assign the Executive to one of its subsidiaries for payroll purposes, but such assignment shall not relieve the Company of its obligations hereunder.
 
2. . The Executive's term of employment under this Agreement (such term of employment, as it may be extended or terminated, is herein referred to as the "") shall be for a term commencing on July 1, 2005 (the "") and, unless terminated earlier as provided in Section 7 hereof, ending on the third anniversary of the Effective Date (the ""), provided that effective beginning on the first anniversary of the Effective Date, the Employment Term shall automatically be extended by one (1) day for each day that passes, so that the Employment Term shall always be two (2) years, until such time as either the Company or the Executive gives notice to the other that the Employment Term shall cease to be so extended, subject to earlier termination as provided in Section 7 hereof.
EMPLOYMENT TERM
Employment Term
Effective Date
Original Employment Term
 
3. . The Company agrees to pay the Executive a base salary (the "") at an annual rate of not less than $1,750,000, payable in accordance with the regular payroll practices of the Company, but not less frequently than monthly. The Executive's Base Salary shall be subject to annual review by the Board (or a committee thereof) and may be increased, but not decreased, from time to time by the Board. No increase to Base Salary shall be used to offset or otherwise reduce any obligations of the Company to the Executive hereunder or otherwise. The base salary as determined herein from time to time shall constitute "Base Salary" for purposes of this Agreement.
BASE SALARY
Base Salary
 
4. . During the Employment Term, the Executive shall be eligible to participate in the Company's bonus and other incentive compensation plans and programs for the Company's senior executives at a level commensurate with his position. The Executive shall have the opportunity to earn an annual target bonus measured against objective financial criteria to be determined by the Board (or a committee thereof) of at least 170% of Base Salary, with a maximum annual bonus of 230% of Base Salary and a potential reduced bonus for achievements below target in accordance with the applicable bonus plan. Executive's 2005 annual bonus shall be no less than his full annual target bonus, less all quarterly bonus amounts received from his prior employer for performance during 2005. Annual bonuses payable to Executive for the performance years 2005 through 2010 shall be fully paid in cash; beginning with the 2011 performance year and for all performance years thereafter, the Executive's annual bonus shall be paid to the Executive in the same form (and subject to the same terms) as are annual bonuses earned by and paid to other senior executives of the Company.
ANNUAL BONUS
 
5. .
EQUITY AWARDS
 
(a) .
BUY-OUT RESTRICTED STOCK GRANTS
 
(i) The Company will grant the Executive as of the Effective Date an equity award of 159,000 shares of restricted stock, which shall vest and the restrictions thereon shall lapse 20% on each of May 10, 2006, May 10, 2007, May 10, 2008, May 10,
 
2009 and May 10, 2010, provided that the Executive is continuously employed with the Company through each such vesting date for such restricted shares to vest (except as otherwise provided herein).
 
(ii) The Company will grant the Executive as of the Effective Date an equity award of 162,000 shares of restricted stock, which shall vest and the restrictions thereon shall lapse 16
 2
/
3
% on each of January 1, 2006, January 1, 2007, January 1, 2008, January 1, 2009, January 1, 2010 and January 1, 2011, provided that the Executive is continuously employed with the Company through each such vesting date for such restricted shares to vest (except as otherwise provided herein).
 
(iii) The Company will grant the Executive as of the Effective Date an award of 70,000 shares of restricted stock, which shall vest and the restrictions thereon shall lapse 33
 1
/
3
% on each of the first three anniversaries of the Effective Date, provided that the Executive is continuously employed with the Company through each such vesting date for such restricted shares to vest (except as otherwise provided herein).
 
(iv) The restricted stock awards granted to the Executive pursuant to Section 5(a)(i), (ii) and (iii) are, collectively, the "."
Buy-Out Restricted Stock Awards
 
(v) The Executive will receive fully vested dividend equivalents in cash on the Buy-Out Restricted Stock Awards as and when declared and paid.
 
(vi) The Buy-Out Restricted Stock Awards shall be granted pursuant to and, to the extent not contrary to the terms of this Agreement, shall be subject to all of the terms and conditions imposed upon such awards granted under The Boeing Company 2003 Incentive Stock Plan (the "").
Plan
 
(vii) Award agreements memorializing the grants of the Buy-Out Restricted Stock Awards will be executed by the parties as soon as practicable (but in no event more than fifteen (15) business days after the Effective Date). The Buy-Out Restricted Stock Awards shall be subject to no forfeiture provisions (except as set forth in this Agreement) and shall be adjusted in the same manner as any other outstanding stock in connection with any stock split, stock dividend or other recapitalization or any corporate transaction. The Executive may reduce the number of shares upon vesting to cover the minimum required tax withholding. The Company represents and warrants that (A) the shares will be issued under the Plan, (B) the Plan and the Buy-Out Restricted Stock Awards are covered under a Form S-8 (which shall continue to be maintained so that the Executive can resell the shares on a current basis once vested), (C) there are adequate shares available under the Plan for the issuance of the Buy-Out Restricted Stock Awards and (D) the Plan permits the contemplated provisions of such grants.
 
(b) The Executive will participate in all Company long term incentive programs extended to senior executives of the Company generally at levels commensurate with the Executive's position.
FUTURE EQUITY AWARDS.
 
(c) . The Executive shall be subject to, and shall comply with, the stock ownership guidelines of the Company as may be in effect from time to time; provided that the Buy-Out Restricted Stock Awards shall be included as Company stock owned by the Executive for purposes of such guidelines.
STOCK OWNERSHIP
 
6. .
EMPLOYEE BENEFITS
 
(a) . The Executive shall be entitled to participate in all employee and executive benefit plans of the Company including, but not limited to, equity, pension, thrift, profit sharing, 401(k), medical coverage, education, or other retirement or welfare benefits that the Company has adopted or may adopt, maintain or contribute to for the benefit of its senior executives at a level commensurate with his positions subject to satisfying the applicable eligibility requirements. Such benefits, in the aggregate, shall be no less favorable than the level of benefits in effect on the Effective Date; provided, however, that in the event there is a reduction of employee benefits applicable to senior executives generally, nothing herein shall preclude the Company's ability to reduce the Executive's benefits consistent with such reduction. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, during the Employment Term, the Company will provide the Executive with universal life insurance providing a death benefit of at least $16,400,000 at the premium level expense for such coverage (or reimbursement to the Executive for such coverage) in effect on the date hereof, but not to exceed $262,937 annually, through use of existing policies or such other arrangements as mutually agreed by the Company and the Executive.
BENEFIT PLANS
 
(b) .
SUPPLEMENTAL RETIREMENT BENEFIT
 
(i) The Executive will receive a supplemental pension benefit ("") in an amount equal to (A) the Hypothetical Prior Employer Pension Benefits, minus (B) the sum of the Actual Company Pension Benefits, Actual Prior Employer Pension Benefits, and benefits paid or payable to the Executive under any other employer's qualified and non-qualified defined benefit pension plan with respect to service prior to the Effective Date. If the remainder is zero or less, no amount shall be payable by the Company hereunder.
Supplemental Pension
 
(ii) The Supplemental Pension will vest on the Effective Date. Notwithstanding, the Supplemental Pension benefit will be forfeited (and any amount paid to the Executive shall be promptly refunded to the Company) upon the Executive's termination of employment without Good Reason (as hereinafter defined), before the third (3rd) anniversary of the Effective Date, to accept employment or any other position with in either case substantially comparable compensation elsewhere at any time within one (1) year after such termination date.
 
(iii) The Supplemental Pension will be payable as of the date of termination of employment or an earlier Change in Control (as hereinafter defined) that satisfies the requirements of Section 409A ("") of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the ""), or such later date as required under 409A, in a lump sum equal to the Actuarial Equivalent present value of an annuity based on the accrued vested benefit due under the first sentence of Section 6(b)(i). In the event of a termination of employment by reason of the Executive's death, the amount of such lump sum payment to the beneficiary designated by the Executive in writing to the Company during his
409A
Code
 
lifetime (or, if no such beneficiary is designated, to the Executive's estate) shall equal the lump sum payment that would have been payable to the Executive if he had been alive on the date of termination. The Supplemental Pension benefit may, at the election of the Executive (made in accordance with 409A), also be paid in the form of a mutually agreeable commercially available annuity, life insurance contract or such other mutually agreeable forms.
 
(iv) For purposes of this Section 6(b), the terms set forth below have the following meanings:
 
(A) "" means a single life annuity amount commencing at age 62 and payable in monthly installments to the Executive for his life of the Actuarial Equivalent of the amounts that the Executive has actually received, or is entitled to receive, from the Company's qualified and non-qualified defined benefit pension plans.
Actual Company Pension Benefits
 
(B) "" means a single life annuity amount commencing at age 62 and payable in monthly installments to the Executive for his life of the Actuarial Equivalent of the amounts that the Executive has actually received, or is entitled to receive, from the Prior Employers' qualified and non-qualified defined benefit pension plans.
Actual Prior Employer Pension Benefits
 
(C) "" of any amount shall be determined in accordance with generally accepted actuarial principles using interest rate, mortality and other methods and assumptions that the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation ("") would have used in determining the value of an immediate annuity payment of benefits with regard to terminations of plans immediately prior to enactment of the Retirement Protection Act of 1994, or if such interest rate and mortality assumptions are no longer published by the PBGC, interest rate and mortality assumptions determined in a manner as similar as practicable to the manner by which the PBGC's interest rate and mortality assumptions were determined immediately prior to the PBGC's cessation of publication of such assumptions.
Actuarial Equivalent
PBGC
 
(D) "" means the Executive's average annual compensation for the three (3) consecutive calendar years out of the last ten (10) calendar years preceding termination of employment during which such average is the highest. For purposes of determining the Executive's Highest Average Annual Compensation, compensation paid by the Company or the Prior Employers shall be taken into account to the same extent as such compensation would have been taken into account for purposes of such determination under the General Electric Company qualified and non-qualified defined benefit pension plans as in effect on December 31, 2000 if such compensation were with or paid by the General Electric Company. In addition, solely for purposes of calculating the Executive's average annual compensation, in the event of an involuntary termination without Cause (as hereinafter defined) or a termination for Good Reason (as hereinafter defined), in which the
Highest Average Annual Compensation
 
Executive is entitled to severance benefits under this Agreement, applicable Company plans or otherwise, the Executive shall be treated as having earned any severance paid to the Executive ratably over the course of the period to which it relates (e.g., two (2) years for severance equal to two (2) years of base salary).
 
(E) "" means a benefit payable in the form of a single life annuity amount commencing at age 62 and payable in monthly installments for the Executive's life equal to one-twelfth (1/12th) multiplied by fifty percent (50%) of the Executive's Highest Average Annual Compensation. Provided, upon a termination of the Executive's employment for any reason prior to January 1, 2011, the Executive's Hypothetical Prior Employer Pension Benefits will be reduced so that he receives a prorated Supplemental Pension, determined by multiplying the Supplemental Pension benefit amount, as determined under the preceding sentence, by a fraction (not to exceed 1.0) the numerator of which is the sum of (x) five (5) plus (y) the number of the Executive's whole and partial Years of Service with the Company as of the date of the termination of employment, and the denominator of which is ten (10).
Hypothetical Prior Employer Pension Benefits
 
(F) The "" means the 3M Corporation and the General Electric Company.
Prior Employers
 
(G) "" means the 12-month period beginning on January 1, 2006 and each 12-month period beginning on each anniversary thereof in which the Executive remains continuously employed by the Company. For such purpose, "Years of Service" will be measured from January 1 of each year following the Effective Date. In the event of an involuntary termination without Cause or a termination for Good Reason, in which the Executive is entitled to severance benefits under this Agreement, applicable Company plans or otherwise, the Executive shall also be credited with an additional number of Years of Service equal to the period over which any such severance relates (e.g., two (2) Years of Service for severance equal to two (2) years of base salary).
Year of Service
 
(c) . The Executive shall be entitled to annual paid vacation in accordance with the Company's policy applicable to senior executives, but in no event less than four (4) weeks per calendar year (as prorated for partial years), which vacation may be taken at such times as the Executive elects with due regard to the needs of the Company.
VACATIONS
 
(d) . The Company shall provide to the Executive all employee and executive perquisites which other senior executives of the Company are generally entitled to receive, in accordance with Company policy set by the Board from time to time, including (i) business and personal use of Company plane (pursuant to security policy); (ii) club memberships (initiation and dues); (iii) leased automobile; and (iv) financial services allowance.
PERQUISITES
 
(e) . Upon presentation of appropriate documentation, the Executive shall be reimbursed in accordance with the Company's expense reimbursement policy for all reasonable and necessary business and entertainment expenses incurred in connection with the performance of his duties hereunder.
BUSINESS AND ENTERTAINMENT EXPENSES
 
(f) . The Executive will relocate to the Chicago, Illinois metropolitan area within one (1) year or such other time frame mutually agreed upon between the Executive and the Board (the ""). The Executive shall be entitled to relocation benefits in accordance with the Company's relocation policy (other than reasonable costs that may exceed dollar limitations) and such additions thereto as mutually agreed to by the Executive and the Board (or a committee thereof). In any event, the Company shall reimburse the Executive for the costs of physical packing and moving expenses for household goods and vehicles, temporary housing, house hunting travel, closing costs on the sale of the Executive's current residence, and on the purchase of a new residence in the Chicago, Illinois metropolitan area. The Company shall gross up for tax purposes any income taxable to the Executive pursuant to the payment or benefits provided under this Section 6(f) (other than for any gain on any sale of the Executive's residence), so that the economic benefit is the same to the Executive as if such payment or benefits were provided on a non-taxable basis to the Executive. All amounts payable under this Section 6(f) shall be subject to the Executive's presentment to the Company of appropriate documentation and otherwise in accordance with the terms of the Company's relocation program (other than reasonable costs that may exceed dollar limitations) applicable to senior executives.
RELOCATION
Relocation Period
 
(g) . Upon completion of five (5) years of continuous employment with the Company from the Effective Date, the Executive will be deemed retiree eligible under all welfare benefit, equity and other incentive plans and programs applicable to senior executives of the Company with regard to any termination thereafter. The Company may amend or terminate any and all such benefits plans and programs (other than respecting the Executive's eligibility) at any time and from time to time.
RETIREE BENEFITS
 
7. . The Executive's employment and the Employment Term shall terminate on the first of the following to occur:
TERMINATION
 
(a) . Upon written notice by the Company to the Executive of termination due to Disability, while the Executive remains Disabled. For purposes of this Agreement, "" shall be defined as the inability of the Executive to have performed his material duties hereunder due to a physical or mental injury, infirmity or incapacity for 180 days (including weekends and holidays) in any 365-day period. The existence or nonexistence of a physical or mental injury, infirmity or incapacity shall be determined by an independent physician mutually agreed to by the Company and the Executive (provided that neither party shall unreasonably withhold their agreement).
DISABILITY
Disability
 
(b) . Automatically on the date of death of the Executive.
DEATH
 
(c) . Immediately upon written notice by the Company to the Executive of a termination for Cause.
CAUSE
 
(i) "" shall mean any of the following:
Cause
 
(A) the Executive's conviction of:
 
a. a felony, or
 
b. a misdemeanor excluding a petty offense (as defined in Illinois or a comparable misdemeanor under the laws of another state) involving fraud, dishonesty or moral turpitude,
 
   other than Limited Vicarious Liability or a routine traffic violation,
 
(B) the Executive's material breach of this Agreement, provided that such breach is not cured within ten (10) days after delivery to the Executive of a notice from the Board requesting cure,
 
(C) the willful or intentional material misconduct by the Executive in the performance of his duties under this Agreement, including a material breach of the Company's Code of Conduct which is willful or intentional material misconduct, or
 
(D) the willful or intentional failure by the Executive to materially comply (to the best of his ability) with a specific, written direction of the Board that is consistent with normal business practice and not inconsistent with this Agreement and the Executive's responsibilities hereunder, provided that such refusal or failure (i) is not cured to the best of the Executive's ability within ten (10) days after the delivery thereof to the Executive and (ii) is not based on the Executive's good faith belief, as expressed by written notice to the Board given within such ten (10)-day period, that the implementation of such direction of the Board would be unlawful or unethical.
 
(ii) For purposes of Section 7(c)(i), "" shall mean any liability which is (A) based on acts of the Company for which the Executive is responsible solely as a result of his office(s) with the Company and (B) provided that (x) he was not directly involved in such acts and either had no prior knowledge of such intended actions or promptly acted reasonably and in good faith to attempt to prevent the acts causing such liability or (y) he did not have a reasonable basis to believe that a law was being violated by such acts.
Limited Vicarious Liability
 
(iii) For purposes of clause (B) and (C) of Section 7(c)(i) above, "Cause" shall not include any one or more of the following:
 
(A) bad judgment,
 
(B) negligence,
 
(C) any act or omission that the Executive believed in good faith to have been in or not opposed to the interest of the Company (without intent of the Executive to gain therefrom, directly or indirectly, a profit to which he was not legally entitled), or
 
(D) any act or omission of which any member of the Board who is not a party to such act or omission has had actual knowledge for at least six (6) months.
 
(iv) The Company may not terminate the Executive's employment for Cause unless:
 
(A) no fewer than 30 days prior to the date of termination, the Company provides the Executive with written notice (the "") of its intent to consider termination of the Executive's employment for Cause, including a detailed description of the specific reasons which form the basis for such consideration;
Notice of Consideration
 
(B) after providing Notice of Consideration, the Board may, by the affirmative vote of a majority of its members (excluding for this purpose the Executive if he is a member of the Board, any other management member of the Board and any other member of the Board reasonably believed by the Board to be involved in the events leading to the Notice of Consideration), suspend the Executive with pay until a final determination pursuant to this Section has been made;
 
(C) on a date designated in the Notice of Consideration, which date shall be at least 30 days following the date the Notice of Consideration is provided, the Executive shall have the opportunity to appear before the Board, with or without legal representation, at the Executive's election, to present arguments and evidence on his own behalf; and
 
(D) following the presentation to the Board as provided in (C) above or the Executive's failure to appear before the Board at the date and time specified in the Notice of Consideration, the Executive may be terminated for Cause only if the Board, by the two-thirds vote of its members (excluding the Executive if he is a member of the Board, any other management member of the Board and any other member of the Board reasonably believed by the Board to be involved in the events leading the Board to consider terminating the Executive for Cause), determines that the actions or inactions of the Executive specified in the Notice of Consideration occurred, that such actions or inactions constitute Cause, and that the Executive's employment should accordingly be terminated for Cause.
 
(d) . Upon written notice by the Company to the Executive of an involuntary termination without Cause, other than for death or Disability.
WITHOUT CAUSE
 
(e) . Upon written notice by the Executive to the Company of a termination for Good Reason that he intends to terminate his employment hereunder for one of the reasons set forth below. "" means the occurrence of any one of the following events unless the Executive specifically agrees in writing that such event shall not be Good Reason:
GOOD REASON
Good Reason
 
(i) any material breach of the Agreement by the Company, including:
 
(A) the material failure of the Company to comply with the provisions of Sections 1(a), 1(c), 2, 3, 4, 5 and 6 of this Agreement;
 
(B) any material adverse change in the status, responsibilities or perquisites of the Executive;
 
(C) any diminution in the Executive's titles (except for the Executive's no longer serving as the Chairman of the Company's Board due to legislative or other regulatory requirements mandating the appointment of a non-executive Chairman of the Company's Board);
 
(D) any failure to nominate or elect the Executive as Chief Executive Officer of the Company or as Chairman of the Company's Board, subject to the exception in subparagraph (C), above, and as a Director of the Company;
 
(E) causing or requiring the Executive to report to anyone other than the Board;
 
(F) assignment of duties materially inconsistent with his positions and duties described in this Agreement; or
 
(G) the Company giving a notice terminating the renewal feature of the Employment Term under Section 2;
 
provided, however, that no act or omission described above shall constitute "Good Reason" unless the Executive gives Company thirty (30) days' prior written notice of such act or omission and the Company fails to cure such act or omission within the thirty (30)-day period (except that the Executive shall not be required to provide such notice in case of intentional acts or omissions by the Company);
 
(ii) the failure of the Company to assign the Agreement to a successor to the Company or failure of a successor to the Company to explicitly assume and agree to be bound by the Agreement in a writing delivered to the Executive, or
 
(iii) the requiring of the Executive to be principally based at any office or location more than thirty (30) miles from the current corporate offices of the Company in Chicago, Illinois.
 
(f) . Upon five (5) days' prior written notice by the Executive to the Company of the Executive's termination of employment without Good Reason (which the Company may, in its sole discretion, make effective earlier than any notice date).
WITHOUT GOOD REASON
 
8. . Any termination payments made and benefits provided under this Agreement to the Executive shall offset any termination or severance payments or benefits for which the Executive may be eligible under any of the plans, policies or programs of the Company or its affiliates. Subject to Section 9, the following amounts and benefits shall be due to the Executive.
CONSEQUENCES OF TERMINATION
 
(a) . Upon such termination, the Company shall pay or provide the Executive (i) any unpaid Base Salary through the date of termination and any accrued vacation in accordance with Company policy; (ii) any unpaid bonus earned with respect to any fiscal year ending on or preceding the date of termination; (iii) reimbursement for any unreimbursed expenses incurred through the date of termination; (iv) reimbursement for any unpaid relocation expenses (including the related gross-up) in accordance with Section 6(f); (v) following expiration of the medical benefits provided under the Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1985, as amended (""), COBRA-equivalent medical benefits, at the Executive's expense (which shall be equivalent to the COBRA cost), following such termination for the Executive and his covered dependents until he and his wife, respectively, attain age 65 (and for any other covered dependent, until such other covered dependent otherwise would be no longer eligible for coverage under the terms of the applicable medical benefits plan) (provided, that upon a termination of the Executive's employment by the Company without Cause or by the Executive for Good Reason, the Executive shall first be entitled to health benefit continuation upon the terms and conditions, and for the period, provided in Section 8(d)(ii) or (10)(b)(iii), as the case may be, and after the expiration of such continued coverage, the Executive shall thereafter be entitled to the foregoing COBRA-equivalent benefit); and (vi) all other payments, benefits or fringe benefits to which the Executive may be entitled under the terms of any applicable compensation arrangement or benefit, equity or fringe benefit plan or program or grant or this Agreement (collectively, ""). In addition, upon such termination, the Buy-Out Restricted Stock Awards shall fully vest and all restrictions thereon shall lapse, and the Executive shall be entitled to the Supplemental Pension benefit accrued through the date of termination as provided in Section 6(b), above, and the Executive shall receive a Pro Rata Bonus as defined in Section 6(d) below.
DISABILITY
COBRA
Accrued Amounts
 
(b) . In the event the Employment Term ends on account of the Executive's death, the Executive's estate (or to the extent a beneficiary has been designated in accordance with a program, the beneficiary under such program) shall be entitled to any Accrued Amounts. In addition, upon such termination, the Buy-Out Restricted Stock Awards shall fully vest and all restrictions thereon shall lapse, and the Executive's beneficiary shall be entitled to the Supplemental Pension benefit accrued through the date of termination as provided in Section 6(b), above, and the Executive's beneficiary shall receive a Pro Rata Bonus as defined in Section 6(d) below.
DEATH
 
(c) . If the Executive's employment should be terminated (i) by the Company for Cause, or (ii) by the Executive without Good Reason, the Company shall pay to the Executive any Accrued Amounts.
TERMINATION FOR CAUSE OR WITHOUT GOOD REASON
 
(d) .
TERMINATION WITHOUT CAUSE OR FOR GOOD REASON
 
(i) If the Executive's employment by the Company is terminated by the Company other than for Cause (other than a termination for Disability or due to the Executive's death) or by the Executive for Good Reason, the Company shall pay or provide the Executive with the Accrued Amounts. In addition, upon such termination, the Buy-Out Restricted Stock Awards shall fully vest and all restrictions thereon shall lapse, and the Executive shall be entitled to the Supplemental Pension benefit accrued through the date of termination as provided in Section 6(b), above (including additional credit for Supplemental Pension service as provided therein).
 
(ii) Upon such termination, the Executive shall also be entitled to severance and any welfare benefit continuation provided in accordance with any applicable Company plan, but in no event less than (i) two (2) times the sum of (A) the Executive's Base Salary, plus (B) his then-current target bonus amount; (ii) subject to the Executive's continued co-payment of premiums, continued participation for two (2) years in all health and welfare plans which cover the Executive (and eligible dependents) upon the same terms and conditions (except for the requirements of the Executive's continued employment) in effect for active employees of the Company; and (iii) a pro-rata portion of the Executive's bonus for the performance year in which the Executive's termination occurs, payable at the time that annual bonuses are paid to other senior executives, (determined by multiplying the amount the Executive would have received based upon actual performance had employment continued through the end of the performance year by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of days during the performance year of termination that the Executive is employed by the Company and the denominator of which is 365) (the ""). In the event that the Executive obtains other employment that offers substantially similar or improved benefits, as to any particular health or welfare plan, such continuation of coverage by the Company for such similar or improved benefit under such plan under this subsection shall immediately cease, provided that in no event shall any COBRA (or COBRA-equivalent) benefits or retiree benefits cease but they shall become secondary to the extent permitted by law (or suspended in the case of COBRA or COBRA-equivalent benefits) while such other benefits are in effect. To the extent such coverage cannot be provided under the Company's health or welfare plans without jeopardizing the tax status of such plans, for underwriting reasons (e.g., disability benefits) or because of the tax impact on the Executive, the Company shall pay the Executive an amount equal to the value thereof; provided that the "value" of benefits, if insured benefits, shall be the present value (based on the two (2)-year U.S. Treasury rates as of the date of termination) of premiums expected for coverage, and if not insurance benefits, shall be the present value of the expected net cost (i.e., gross cost less any active employee premiums) to the Company to provide such benefits. The continuation of health benefits under this subsection shall reduce and count against the Executive's rights under COBRA. Any termination by the Company other than for Cause (other than a termination for Disability or due to the Executive's death) or by the Executive for Good Reason will be treated as a "layoff" under Company layoff plans that are applicable to senior executives (with severance and benefits payable as provided in this Section 8(d)). Provided, this Section 8(d)(ii) shall not apply to any termination of Executive's employment by the Company or by the Executive at or after the Executive has attained age 62.
Pro Rata Bonus
 
9. . Any and all amounts payable and benefits or additional rights provided pursuant to this Agreement beyond Accrued Amounts shall only be payable if the Executive delivers to the Company a general release of all claims of the Executive occurring up to the release date in the form of Exhibit A hereto (with such changes therein as may be necessary to make it valid and encompassing under applicable law) within twenty-one (21) days of presentation thereof by the Company to the Executive.
RELEASE
 
10. .
CHANGE IN CONTROL BENEFITS
 
(a) For purposes of this Agreement, "" shall mean the first to occur of any of the following events:
Change in Control
 
(i) any "person" (as defined in Section 13(d) and 14(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "")), excluding for this purpose, (A) the Company or any subsidiary of the Company, or (B) any employee benefit plan of the Company or any subsidiary of the Company, or any person or entity organized, appointed or established by the Company for or pursuant to the terms of any such plan which acquires beneficial ownership of voting securities of the Company, is or becomes the "beneficial owner" (as defined in Rule 13d-3 under the Exchange Act), directly or indirectly of securities of the Company representing more than thirty percent (30%) of the combined voting power of the Company's then outstanding securities; provided, however, that no Change in Control will be deemed to have occurred as a result of a change in ownership percentage resulting solely from an acquisition of securities by the Company; or
Exchange Act
 
(ii) persons who, as of the Effective Date constitute the Board (the "") cease for any reason, including without limitation, as a result of a tender offer, proxy contest, merger or similar transaction, to constitute at least a majority thereof, provided that any person becoming a director of the Company subsequent to the Effective Date shall be considered an Incumbent Director if such person's election or nomination for election was approved by a vote of at least fifty percent (50%) of the Incumbent Directors; but provided further, that any such person whose initial assumption of office is in connection with an actual or threatened election contest relating to the election of members of the Board or other actual or threatened solicitation of proxies or consents by or on behalf of a "person" (as defined in Section 13(d) and 14(d) of the Exchange Act) other than the Board, including by reason of agreement intended to avoid or settle any such actual or threatened contest or solicitation, shall not be considered an Incumbent Director; or
Incumbent Directors
 
(iii) consummation of a reorganization, merger or consolidation or sale or other disposition of at least eighty percent (80%) of the assets of the Company (a ""), in each case, unless, following such Business Combination, all or substantially all of the individuals and entities who were the beneficial owners of outstanding voting securities of the Company immediately prior to such Business Combination beneficially own, directly or indirectly, more than fifty percent (50%) of the combined voting power of the then outstanding voting securities entitled to vote generally in the election of directors of the company resulting from such Business Combination (including, without limitation, a company which, as a result of such transaction, owns the Company or all or substantially all of the Company's assets either directly or through one or more subsidiaries) in substantially the same proportions as their ownership, immediately prior to such Business Combination, of the outstanding voting securities of the Company; or
Business Combination
 
(iv) approval by the stockholders of the Company of a complete liquidation or dissolution of the Company.
 
(b) Upon a Change in Control of the Company, the Executive will receive such change-in-control benefits as may be provided to other senior executives of the Company; provided, in the event of a termination of the Executive's employment by the Company without Cause (and not due to the Executive's death or Disability) or by the Executive for Good Reason (i) on the day of or during the 2-year period immediately following a Change in Control or (ii) prior to a Change in Control but at the request of any third party participating in or causing the Change in Control or otherwise in connection thereto, the Executive shall be entitled to receive the following:
 
(i) The Company shall pay or provide the Executive with the Accrued Amounts.
 
(ii) In addition, upon such termination, the Buy-Out Restricted Stock Awards shall fully vest and all restrictions thereon shall lapse, and the Executive shall be entitled to the Supplemental Pension benefit accrued through the date of termination as provided in Section 6(b), above (including additional credit for Supplemental Pension service as provided therein).
 
(iii) The Executive shall also be entitled to severance and any welfare benefit continuation provided in accordance with any applicable Company plan, but in no event less than (i) three (3) times the sum of (A) the Executive's Base Salary, plus (B) his then-current target bonus amount; (ii) subject to the Executive's continued co-payment of premiums, continued participation for three (3) years in all health and welfare plans which cover the Executive (and eligible dependents) upon the same terms and conditions (except for the requirements of the Executive's continued employment) in effect for active employees of the Company; and (iii) a pro-rata portion of the Executive's bonus for the performance year in which the Executive's termination occurs, payable at the time that annual bonuses are paid to other senior executives, (determined by multiplying the amount the Executive would have received based upon actual performance had employment continued through the end of the performance year by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of days during the performance year of termination that the Executive is employed by the Company and the denominator of which is 365). In the event that the Executive obtains other employment that offers substantially similar or improved benefits, as to any particular health or welfare plan, such continuation of coverage by the Company for such similar or improved benefit under such plan under this subsection shall immediately cease, provided that in no event shall any COBRA (or COBRA-equivalent) benefits or retiree benefits cease but they shall become secondary to the extent permitted by law (or suspended in the case of COBRA or COBRA-equivalent benefits) while such other benefits are in effect. To the extent such coverage cannot be provided under the Company's health or welfare plans without jeopardizing the tax status of such plans, for underwriting reasons (e.g., disability benefits) or because of the tax impact on the Executive, the Company shall pay the Executive an amount equal to the value thereof; provided that the "value" of benefits, if insured benefits, shall be the present value (based on the three (3)-year U.S. Treasury rates as of the date of
 
termination) of premiums expected for coverage, and if not insurance benefits, shall be the present value of the expected net cost (i.e., gross cost less any active employee premiums) to the Company to provide such benefits. The continuation of health benefits under this subsection shall reduce and count against the Executive's rights under COBRA. Any termination by the Company other than for Cause (other than a termination for Disability or due to the Executive's death) or by the Executive for Good Reason will be treated as a "layoff" under Company layoff plans that are applicable to senior executives (with severance and benefits payable as provided in this Section 10(b)).
 
11. (a) . The Executive agrees that he shall not, directly or indirectly, use, make available, sell, disclose or otherwise communicate to any person, other than in the course of the Executive's employment and for the benefit of the Company (as determined by the Executive in good faith), either during the period of the Executive's employment or at any time thereafter, any nonpublic, proprietary or confidential information, knowledge or data relating to the Company, any of its subsidiaries, affiliated companies or businesses, which shall have been obtained by the Executive during the Executive's employment by the Company. The foregoing shall not apply to information that (i) was known to the public prior to its disclosure to the Executive; (ii) becomes known to the public subsequent to disclosure to the Executive through no wrongful act of the Executive or any representative of the Executive; or (iii) the Executive is required to disclose by applicable law, regulation or legal process (provided that the Executive provides the Company with prior notice of the contemplated disclosure and reasonably cooperates with the Company at its expense in seeking a protective order or other appropriate protection of such information). Notwithstanding clauses (i) and (ii) of the preceding sentence, the Executive's obligation to maintain such disclosed information in confidence shall not terminate where only portions of the information are in the public domain.
CONFIDENTIALITY
 
(b) . During the Executive's employment with the Company and for the one (1) year period thereafter, the Executive agrees that he will not, directly or indirectly, individually or on behalf of any other person, firm, corporation or other entity, knowingly solicit, aid or induce (i) any managerial level employee of the Company or any of its subsidiaries or affiliates to leave such employment in order to accept employment with or render services to or with any other person, firm, corporation or other entity unaffiliated with the Company or knowingly take any action to materially assist or aid any other person, firm, corporation or other entity in identifying or hiring any such employee (provided, that the foregoing shall not be violated by general advertising not targeted at Company employees nor by serving as a reference for an employee with regard to an entity with which the Executive is not affiliated), or (ii) any customer of the Company or any of its subsidiaries or affiliates to purchase goods or services then sold by the Company or any of its subsidiaries or affiliates from another person, firm, corporation or other entity or assist or aid any other persons or entity in identifying or soliciting any such customer (provided, that the foregoing shall not apply to any product or service which is not covered by the noncompetition provision set forth in Section 11(c), below).
NONSOLICITATION
 
(c) . The Executive acknowledges that he performs services of a unique nature for the Company that are irreplaceable, and that his performance of such services to a competing business (other than respecting a product or service of the Company involving less than one percent (1%) of the Company's revenues in the prior fiscal year
NONCOMPETITION
 
("")) will result in irreparable harm to the Company. Accordingly, during the Executive's employment hereunder and for the one (1) year period thereafter, the Executive agrees that the Executive will not, directly or indirectly, own, manage, operate, control, be employed by (whether as an employee, consultant, independent contractor or otherwise, and whether or not for compensation) or render services to any person, firm, corporation or other entity, in whatever form, engaged in any business of the same type as any business in which the Company or any of its subsidiaries or affiliates is engaged on the date of termination or in which they have proposed, on or prior to such date, to be engaged in on or after such date and in which the Executive has been involved to any extent (other than De Minimis) at any time during the twelve (12)-month period ending with the date of termination, in any locale of any country in which the Company conducts business. This Section 11(c) shall not prevent the Executive from owning not more than one percent (1%) of the total shares of all classes of stock outstanding of any publicly held entity engaged in such business, nor will it restrict the Executive from rendering services to charitable organizations, as such term is defined in Section 501(c) of the Code.
De Minimis
 
(d) . Each of the Executive and the Company (for purposes hereof, "the Company" shall mean only (i) the Company by press release or other formally released announcement and (ii) the executive officers and directors thereof and not any other employees) agrees that during the Employment Term and for five (5) years thereafter not to make any public statements that disparage the other party, or in the case of the Company, its respective affiliates, employees, officers, directors, products or services. Notwithstanding the foregoing, statements made in the course of sworn testimony in administrative, judicial or arbitral proceedings (including, without limitation, depositions in connection with such proceedings) shall not be subject to this Section 11(d). This provision shall also not cover normal competitive statements which do not cite the Executive's employment by the Company.
NONDISPARAGEMENT
 
(e) . The parties acknowledge and agree that the other party's remedies at law for a breach or threatened breach of any of the provisions of this Section would be inadequate and, in recognition of this fact, the parties agree that, in the event of such a breach or threatened breach, in addition to any remedies at law, the other party, without posting any bond, shall be entitled to obtain equitable relief in the form of specific performance, temporary restraining order, a temporary or permanent injunction or any other equitable remedy which may then be available.
EQUITABLE RELIEF AND OTHER REMEDIES
 
(f) . If it is determined by a court of competent jurisdiction in any state that any restriction in this Section 11 is excessive in duration or scope or is unreasonable or unenforceable under the laws of that state, it is the intention of the parties that such restriction may be modified or amended by the court to render it enforceable to the maximum extent permitted by the law of that state.
REFORMATION
 
(g) . The obligations contained in this Section 11 shall survive the termination or expiration of the Executive's employment with the Company and shall be fully enforceable thereafter.
SURVIVAL OF PROVISIONS
 
12. '. The Company shall pay all of the reasonable professional fees and expenses incurred by the Executive in the negotiation and preparation of this Agreement and related arrangements.
ATTORNEY
S FEES
 
13.
NO ASSIGNMENTS.
 
(a) This Agreement is personal to each of the parties hereto. Except as provided in Section 13(b) below, no party may assign or delegate any rights or obligations hereunder without first obtaining the written consent of the other party hereto.
 
(b) The Company may assign this Agreement to any successor to all or substantially all of the business and/or assets of the Company provided the Company shall require such successor to expressly assume and agree to perform this Agreement in the same manner and to the same extent that the Company would be required to perform it if no such succession had taken place and shall deliver a copy of such assignment to the Executive.
 
14. . For the purpose of this Agreement, notices and all other communications provided for in this Agreement shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given (i) on the date of delivery if delivered by hand, (ii) on the date of transmission, if delivered by confirmed facsimile, (iii) on the first business day following the date of deposit if delivered by guaranteed overnight delivery service, or (iv) on the fourth business day following the date delivered or mailed by United States registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, postage prepaid, addressed as follows:
NOTICE
 
If to the Executive:
 
At the address (or to the facsimile number) shown
on the records of the Company
 
If to the Company:
The Boeing Company
100 North Riverside Plaza
Chicago, Illinois 60606-1596
Attention: Senior Vice President and General Counsel
Fax No.: 312/544-2828
 
or to such other address as either party may have furnished to the other in writing in accordance herewith, except that notices of change of address shall be effective only upon receipt.
 
15. . The section headings used in this Agreement are included solely for convenience and shall not affect, or be used in connection with, the interpretation of this Agreement. In the event of any inconsistency between the terms of this Agreement and any form, award, plan or policy of the Company, the terms of this Agreement shall control. No provision in any policy, code, plan or program related to a violation thereof being grounds for termination, or similar language, shall result in a "cause" termination unless such violation is also Cause under this Agreement and the provisions hereof are complied with, and the foregoing shall apply even if the Executive signs an acknowledgement or otherwise agrees to the provisions of such policy, code, plan or program.
SECTION HEADINGS; INCONSISTENCY
 
16. . The provisions of this Agreement shall be deemed severable and the invalidity of unenforceability of any provision shall not affect the validity or enforceability of the other provisions hereof.
SEVERABILITY
 
17. . This Agreement may be executed in several counterparts, each of which shall be deemed to be an original but all of which together will constitute one and the same instruments. One or more counterparts of this Agreement may be delivered by facsimile, with the intention that delivery by such means shall have the same effect as delivery of an original counterpart thereof.
COUNTERPARTS
 
18. . Any dispute or controversy arising under or in connection with this Agreement, other than injunctive relief under Section 11(e) hereof or damages for breach of Section 11, shall be settled exclusively by arbitration, conducted before a single arbitrator in Chicago, Illinois, administered by the American Arbitration Association ("") in accordance with its Commercial Arbitration Rules then in effect. The single arbitrator shall be selected by the mutual agreement of the Company and the Executive, unless the parties are unable to agree to an arbitrator, in which case, the arbitrator will be selected under the procedures of the AAA. The arbitrator will have the authority to permit discovery and to follow the procedures that he or she determines to be appropriate. The arbitrator will have no power to award consequential (including lost profits), punitive or exemplary damages. The decision of the arbitrator will be final and binding upon the parties hereto. Judgment may be entered on the arbitrator's award in any court having jurisdiction. Each party shall bear its own legal fees and costs and equally divide the forum fees and cost of the arbitrator; provided, that if the Executive is a Prevailing Party (as defined below), the Executive shall be entitled to recover all of his reasonable attorneys' fees and expenses incurred in connection with the dispute. A "" is one who is successful on any material substantive issue in the action and achieves either a judgment in such party's favor or some other affirmative recovery.
ARBITRATION
AAA
Prevailing Party
 
19. . The Company hereby agrees to indemnify the Executive and hold him harmless to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law against and in respect to any and all actions, suits, proceedings, claims, demands, judgments, costs, expenses (including reasonable attorney's fees), losses, and damages resulting from the Executive's good faith performance of his duties and obligations with the Company. This provision is in addition to any other rights of indemnification the Executive may have.
INDEMNIFICATION
 
20. . The Company shall cover the Executive under directors and officers liability insurance both during and, while potential liability exists, after the term of this Agreement in the same amount and to the same extent as the Company covers its other officers and directors.
LIABILITY INSURANCE
 
21. . No provision of this Agreement may be modified, waived or discharged unless such waiver, modification or discharge is agreed to in writing and signed by the Executive and such officer or director as may be designated by the Board. No waiver by either party hereto at any time of any breach by the other party hereto of, or compliance with, any condition or provision of this Agreement to be performed by such other party shall be deemed a waiver of similar or dissimilar provisions or conditions at the same or at any prior or subsequent time. This Agreement together with all exhibits hereto sets forth the entire
MISCELLANEOUS
 
agreement of the parties hereto in respect of the subject matter contained herein. No agreements or representations, oral or otherwise, express or implied, with respect to the subject matter hereof have been made by either party which are not expressly set forth in this Agreement. The validity, interpretation, construction and performance of this Agreement shall be governed by the laws of the State of Illinois without regard to its conflicts of law principles.
 
22. . It is intended that any amounts payable under this Agreement and the Company's and the Executive's exercise of authority or discretion hereunder shall comply with the provisions of Code Section 409A and the treasury regulations relating thereto so as not to subject the Executive to the payment of interest and tax penalty which may be imposed under Code Section 409A. In furtherance of this interest, to the extent that any regulations or other guidance issued under Code Section 409A after the date of this Agreement would result in the Executive being subject to payment of interest and tax penalty under Code Section 409A, the parties agree to amend this Agreement in order to bring this Agreement into compliance with Code Section 409A
CODE SECTION 409A
 
23. . Except as set forth in this Agreement, the Company's obligation to make the payments provided for in this Agreement and otherwise to perform its obligations hereunder shall not be affected by any circumstances, including without limitation, set-off, counterclaim, recoupment, defense or other claim, right or action which the Company may have against the Executive or others, except to the extent any amounts are due the Company or its subsidiaries or affiliates pursuant to a judgment against the Executive. In no event shall the Executive be obliged to seek other employment or take any other action by way of mitigation of the amounts payable to the Executive under any of the provisions of this Agreement, nor shall the amount of any payment hereunder be reduced by any compensation earned by the Executive as a result of employment by another employer, except as set forth in this Agreement.
FULL SETTLEMENT
 
24.
REPRESENTATIONS.
 
(a) The Company represents and warrants to the Executive that the execution of this Agreement and the provision of all benefits and grants provided herein have been duly authorized by the Company, including action of the Board and Compensation Committee and, upon the execution and delivery of this Agreement by the Executive, this Agreement shall be the valid and binding obligation of the Company, enforceable in accordance with its terms, except to the extent enforceability may be limited by applicable bankruptcy, insolvency or similar laws affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally and by the effect of general principles of equity (regardless of whether enforceability is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law).
 
(b) The Executive represents and warrants to the Company that he has the legal right to enter into this Agreement and to perform all of the obligations on his part to be performed hereunder in accordance with its terms and that he is not a party to any agreement or understanding, written or oral, which could prevent him from entering into this Agreement or performing all of his obligations hereunder.
 
25. . The Company may withhold from any and all amounts payable under this Agreement such federal, state and local taxes as may be required to be withheld pursuant to any applicable law or regulation.
WITHHOLDING
 
26. . The Company shall give the Executive a reasonable opportunity to review and comment on any public announcement (including any filing with a governmental agency or stock exchange) relating to this Agreement or the Executive's employment by the Company.
PUBLIC ANNOUNCEMENTS
 
 
, the parties hereto have executed this Agreement as of the date first written above.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF
 
 
 
 
 
The Boeing Company, its affiliates, subsidiaries, divisions, successors and assigns in such capacity, and the current, future and former employees, officers, directors, trustees and agents thereof (collectively referred to throughout this Agreement as "") and W. James McNerney, Jr., his heirs, executors, administrators, successors and assigns (collectively referred to throughout this Agreement as "") agree:
Employer
Employee
 
1. . Employee's last day of employment with Employer is DATE. In addition, effective as of DATE, Employee resigns from his position as Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer of The Boeing Company and will not be eligible for any benefits or compensation after DATE, other than as specifically provided in Sections 6 and 8 of the employment agreement between The Boeing Company and Employee dated as of June 29, 2005 (the "") and his right to indemnification and directors and officers liability insurance. Employee further acknowledges and agrees that, after DATE, he will not represent himself as being a director, employee, officer, trustee, agent or representative of the Employer for any purpose. In addition, effective as of DATE, Employee resigns from all offices, directorships, trusteeships, committee memberships and fiduciary capacities held with, or on behalf of, the Employer or any benefit plans of the Employer. These resignations will become irrevocable as set forth in Section 3 below.
Last Day of Employment
Employment Agreement
 
2. . The parties acknowledge that this Agreement and General Release is being executed in accordance with Section 9 of the Employment Agreement.
Consideration
 
3. . Employee may revoke this Agreement and General Release for a period of seven (7) calendar days following the day he executes this Agreement and General Release. Any revocation within this period must be submitted, in writing, to Employer and state, "I hereby revoke my acceptance of our Agreement and General Release." The revocation must be personally delivered to the Company's Senior Vice President and General Counsel, or his/her designee, or mailed to Employer, 100 North Riverside Plaza, Chicago, Illinois 60606-1596 and postmarked within seven (7) calendar days of execution of this Agreement and General Release. This Agreement and General Release shall not become effective or enforceable until the revocation period has expired. If the last day of the revocation period is a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday in Illinois, then the revocation period shall not expire until the next following day which is not a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday.
Revocation
 
4. . Employee knowingly and voluntarily releases and forever discharges Employer from any and all claims, causes of action, demands, fees and liabilities of any kind whatsoever, whether known and unknown, against Employer, Employee has, has ever had or may have as of the date of execution of this Agreement and General Release, including, but not limited to, any alleged violation of:
General Release of Claim
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, the sole matters to which the Agreement and General Release do not apply are: (i) the Employee's rights of indemnification and directors and officers liability insurance coverage to which he was entitled immediately prior to DATE with regard to his service as an officer and director of the Employer (including, without limitation, under Sections 19 and 20 of the Employment Agreement); (ii) the Employee's rights under any tax-qualified pension or claims for accrued vested benefits under any other employee benefit plan, policy or arrangement maintained by the Employer or under COBRA; (iii) the Employee's rights under the provisions of the Employment Agreement which are intended to survive termination of employment; or (iv) the Employee's rights as a stockholder.
 
5. . Employee waives his right to file any charge or complaint against Employer arising out of his employment with or separation from Employer before any federal, state or local court or any state or local administrative agency, except where such
No Claims Permitted
 
waivers are prohibited by law. This Agreement, however, does not prevent Employee from filing a charge with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission, any other federal government agency, and/or any government agency concerning claims of discrimination, although Employee waives his right to recover any damages or other relief in any claim or suit brought by or through the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission or any other state or local agency on behalf of Employee under the Age Discrimination in Employment Act, Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 as amended, the Americans with Disabilities Act, or any other federal or state discrimination law, except where such waivers are prohibited by law.
 
6. . Employee affirms he has not filed, has not caused to be filed, and is not presently a party to, any claim, complaint, or action against Employer in any forum or form. Employee further affirms that he has been paid and/or has received all compensation, wages, bonuses, commissions, and/or benefits to which he may be entitled and no other compensation, wages, bonuses, commissions and/or benefits are due to him, except as provided in Sections 6 and 8 of the Employment Agreement. Employee also affirms he has no known workplace injuries.
Affirmations
 
7. . Employee agrees to reasonably cooperate with the Employer and its counsel in connection with any investigation, administrative proceeding or litigation relating to any matter that occurred during his employment in which he was involved or of which he has knowledge. The Employer will reimburse the Employee for any reasonable out-of-pocket travel, delivery or similar expenses incurred in providing such service to the Employer. Employee represents that he has returned to the Employer all property belonging to the Employer, including but not limited to any leased vehicle, laptop, cell phone, keys, access cards, phone cards and credit cards, provided that the Executive may retain, and the Company shall cooperate in transferring, his cell phone number and any home communication and security equipment as well as his rolodex and other address books.
Cooperation; Return of Property
 
8. . This Agreement and General Release shall be governed and conformed in accordance with the laws of the State of Illinois without regard to its conflict of laws provision. In the event Employee or Employer breaches any provision of this Agreement and General Release, Employee and Employer affirm either may institute an action to specifically enforce any term or terms of this Agreement and General Release. Should any provision of this Agreement and General Release be declared illegal or unenforceable by any court of competent jurisdiction and should the provision be incapable of being modified to be enforceable, such provision shall immediately become null and void, leaving the remainder of this Agreement and General Release in full force and effect. Nothing herein, however, shall operate to void or nullify any general release language contained in the Agreement and General Release.
Governing Law and Interpretation
 
9. . Employee agrees neither this Agreement and General Release nor the furnishing of the consideration for this Release shall be deemed or construed at any time for any purpose as an admission by Employer of any liability or unlawful conduct of any kind.
Nonadmission of Wrongdoing
 
10. . This Agreement and General Release may not be modified, altered or changed except upon express written consent of both parties wherein specific reference is made to this Agreement and General Release.
Amendment
 
11. . This Agreement and General Release sets forth the entire agreement between the parties hereto and fully supersedes any prior agreements or understandings between the parties; provided, however, that notwithstanding anything in this Agreement and General Release, the provisions in the Employment Agreement which are intended to survive termination of the Employment Agreement, including but not limited to those contained in Section 11 thereof, shall survive and continue in full force and effect. Employee acknowledges he has not relied on any representations, promises, or agreements of any kind made to him in connection with his decision to accept this Agreement and General Release.
Entire Agreement
 
EMPLOYEE HAS BEEN ADVISED THAT HE HAS UP TO TWENTY-ONE (21) CALENDAR DAYS TO REVIEW THIS AGREEMENT AND GENERAL RELEASE AND HAS BEEN ADVISED IN WRITING TO CONSULT WITH AN ATTORNEY PRIOR TO EXECUTION OF THIS AGREEMENT AND GENERAL RELEASE.
 
EMPLOYEE AGREES ANY MODIFICATIONS, MATERIAL OR OTHERWISE, MADE TO THIS AGREEMENT AND GENERAL RELEASE DO NOT RESTART OR AFFECT IN ANY MANNER THE ORIGINAL TWENTY-ONE (21) CALENDAR DAY CONSIDERATION PERIOD.
 
HAVING ELECTED TO EXECUTE THIS AGREEMENT AND GENERAL RELEASE, TO FULFILL THE PROMISES SET FORTH HEREIN, AND TO RECEIVE THE SUMS AND BENEFITS SET FORTH IN THE EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENT, EMPLOYEE FREELY AND KNOWINGLY, AND AFTER DUE CONSIDERATION, ENTERS INTO THIS AGREEMENT AND GENERAL RELEASE INTENDING TO WAIVE, SETTLE AND RELEASE ALL CLAIMS HE HAS OR MIGHT HAVE AGAINST EMPLOYER.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto knowingly and voluntarily executed this Agreement and General Release as of the date set forth below:
 
 

EXHIBIT 99.2
 
Boeing Board Elects W. James McNerney, Jr. Chairman, President and CEO
 
The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] announced today that its board of directors has elected W. James McNerney, Jr. chairman of the board, president and chief executive officer, effective July 1. James A. Bell, who has served as president and chief executive officer on an interim basis, will remain chief financial officer, and Lewis E. Platt will become lead director.
CHICAGO, June 30, 2005 
 
"Boeing's businesses are performing very well, and the board sought a CEO with the experience and credentials necessary to sustain that momentum and take the company to the next level," Platt said. "Jim met all the board's criteria. He is, in the unanimous judgment of our board members, the ideal person to lead Boeing."
 
McNerney, 55, has served as chairman and chief executive officer of 3M since January 2001. Before joining 3M, he held top executive positions at the General Electric Company, including president and CEO of GE Aircraft Engines and GE Lighting; president of GE Asia-Pacific; and president and CEO of GE Electrical Distribution and Control. In addition, he served as executive vice president of GE Capital, which plays an important role in the commercial aviation industry as a provider of airplane leasing and financing services. He has been a director of Boeing for three-and-a-half years and is a director of the Procter & Gamble Co.
 
"As a past business partner and as a Boeing director, Jim has deep knowledge of the aerospace industry and of Boeing," Platt added. "He has a proven track record as a leader of complex global businesses, has gained significant experience working with a wide range of our government and commercial customers, and throughout his career has demonstrated an ability to deliver results even in the most challenging business environment.
"Jim wins respect for his integrity, ethical leadership and personal business style wherever he goes. We look forward to the next phase of Boeing's growth with Jim leading our team," Platt said.
 
"Boeing is the world's leading aerospace company with a rich tradition and a bright future," said McNerney. "I intend to ensure that we continue to harness the innovative energy of our people and the cutting-edge technologies they are developing. Our financial position is strong, and we have proven the logic of our strategy. My job is to make sure we deliver continued profitable growth by consistently meeting the requirements of our diverse customers with outstanding new products and superior service, and I look forward to meeting that challenge.
 
"As a current board member, I have come to know our leadership team and have developed an enormous respect for them and for the people of Boeing. I look forward to working with all of them as we realize Boeing's considerable potential," McNerney added.
 
"On behalf of the entire board I want to thank the leadership team and employees of Boeing for their extraordinary work during the past several months," Platt said. "The board extends its deep appreciation to James Bell, who stepped up at a crucial time. As interim CEO, his leadership kept the company on track and moving forward while continuing in his role as CFO. As we move forward, James will be a valuable partner to Jim.
 
"We are also very grateful for the performance delivered by Jim Albaugh and Alan Mulally, and their teams at Integrated Defense Systems and Commercial Airplanes. It's clear that we have extraordinary people in place across the company, and we are looking ahead with great confidence in Boeing's future."
 
McNerney was born Aug. 22, 1949, in Providence, R.I. He holds a B.A. from Yale University and an MBA from Harvard University.
Forward-Looking Information Is Subject to Risk and Uncertainty
 
Certain statements contained in this press release are considered "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, and it is Boeing's intent that such statements be protected by the safe harbor created thereby. Words such as "expects," "believes" and similar expressions are used to identify forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are subject to a number of risks, uncertainties and other factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from future results expressed or implied by such forward-looking statements. Potential risks and uncertainties include, but are not limited to those detailed in Boeing's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
 
 
Contact:
 
Boeing Media Relations: John Dern or Tim Neale, 312-544-2002
Boeing Investor Relations: Dave Dohnalek or Bob Kurtz, 312-544-2140


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20050727083907.txt.gz
TIME:20050727083907
EVENTS:	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
(a) Not applicable
 
(b) Not applicable
 
(c) Exhibits
 
99.1    Press Release issued July 27, 2005.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

 
Boeing Reports Second-Quarter 2005 Results; Updates Outlook
 
 Integrated Defense Systems delivers strong revenue growth and double-digit margins driven by excellent operating performance
 
 Commercial Airplanes reports double-digit revenue growth and strong margins; outstanding sales success and productivity gains drive higher financial outlook
 
 EPS guidance for 2005 increased
 
Financial Highlights:
 
 
Q2:
$0.70 per share, after $0.09 charge for sale of Wichita and Tulsa operations
 
 
Q2:
$15.0 billion
 
 
Q2:
$2.7 billion
 
Selected Second-Quarter 2005 Operating Highlights:
 
 
 
 
Table 1. Summary Financial Results
 
 
 The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] today reported second-quarter 2005 net income of $566 million, or $0.70 per share, on revenues of $15.0 billion. Strong operating results offset primarily non-cash charges totaling $0.09 per share related to the sale of the Commercial Airplanes' operations in Wichita and Tulsa to Onex. Second-quarter 2004 earnings of $0.75 per share included a $0.23 per share benefit from interest on a tax refund.
CHICAGO, July 27, 2005
 
"Second-quarter results reflect Boeing's focus on strong execution and improved operational efficiency," said Jim McNerney, Boeing Chairman and CEO. "Integrated Defense Systems delivered solid revenue growth and excellent margins driven by strong performance across its broad portfolio of defense, space and intelligence programs. Commercial Airplanes grew revenues by twenty percent and generated solid operating margins while finalizing 376 orders and achieving key milestones on the 787 program. Our cash flow was outstanding and we continued our balanced strategy for cash deployment, including the authorization of a new share repurchase plan and repayment of maturing debt. Due to improving commercial markets and strong operating performance from the Boeing team, we are raising our financial outlook."
 
The Company's second-quarter earnings from operations increased 26 percent to $0.8 billion (see Table 2) as strong operating performance offset higher non-cash expenses for pensions and share-based plans.
 
Table 2. Earnings from Operations & Margins
 
 
Pre-tax (non-cash) pension expense was $155 million, up $77 million or $0.06 per share, from the second quarter of 2004. Share-based-plans expense was $201 million, up $37 million or $0.03 per share, over the same period. Deferred stock compensation expense was $76 million, or $0.06 per share, as the Company's stock price rose 13 percent during the period.
 
The Company generated $2.7 billion of operating cash flow during the second quarter driven by strong performance in its core businesses. Free cash flow* was $2.2 billion for the quarter (see Table 3).
 
Table 3. Cash Flow
 
 
 
 
The Company's cash balance at quarter-end totaled $4.9 billion, up from $3.3 billion at the end of the first quarter (see Table 4). The cash balance reflected strong operating cash flows and cash received from the sale of the Commercial Airplanes operations in Wichita and Tulsa, which offset cash used for the Company's on-going share repurchase program, to repay maturing debt and to support planned increases in investment in Boeing's core businesses. The combination of cash and marketable securities totaled $7.9 billion at the end of the second quarter, up from $6.3 billion at the end of the first quarter. The Company repurchased 10.3 million shares during the quarter for $646 million and announced a new share repurchase program for up to 40 million shares. Boeing Company debt fell to $3.9 billion as $0.5 billion of debt matured during the quarter. Boeing Capital debt dropped to $6.5 billion as strong operating cash flow eliminated the need for new financing.
 
Table 4. Cash, Marketable Securities and Debt Balances
 
 
Segment Results
 
Integrated Defense Systems
 
Integrated Defense Systems (IDS) delivered strong growth and outstanding profitability as its defense, space and intelligence businesses continued to perform well in healthy markets. IDS results are summarized in Table 5.
 
During the second quarter, IDS revenues increased 8 percent to $7.7 billion as all four segments generated growth. IDS produced second-quarter operating margins of 10.5 percent, up from 9.7 percent in the second quarter of 2004 driven by double-digit margins in the Aircraft and Weapon Systems and Support Systems segments.
 
Table 5. Integrated Defense Systems Operating Results
 
 
Network Systems revenues rose 3 percent to $2.8 billion on increased activity in Future Combat Systems, 737 Airborne Early Warning and Control, and Multi-mission Maritime Aircraft, which offset lower volume in proprietary, homeland security and missile defense programs. Operating margins declined to 6.1 percent, as revised cost and fee estimates in the proprietary area and on the 737 AEW&C program offset earnings from higher revenues.
 
Aircraft and Weapon Systems delivered excellent profitability in the second quarter. Revenues rose 15 percent to $3.1 billion primarily driven by the timing of C-17, F-15, C-40, T-45 and JDAM deliveries. Operating margins were 14.3 percent driven by strong performance across key programs including C-17, F/A-18 and Rotorcraft.
 
Support Systems generated very strong profitability on its broad business base during the second quarter. Revenues rose 3 percent to $1.2 billion driven by increased volume in support services. Operating margins grew to 15.1 percent on strong program performance across the segment.
 
Launch and Orbital Systems continued to improve its performance during the second quarter. Revenues rose 7 percent to $0.7 billion driven by increased satellite activity. Operating margins rose to 4.0 percent reflecting the higher revenues and better commercial satellite program performance.
 
At the end of the second quarter, IDS contractual backlog totaled $41.0 billion, down from $43.8 billion at the end of the first quarter. Unobligated backlog was $41.1 billion at the end of the second quarter. Total IDS backlog, comprised of contractual and unobligated, was $82.1 billion compared with $85.7 billion at the end of the first quarter.
 
Boeing Commercial Airplanes
 
During the second quarter, Boeing Commercial Airplanes (BCA) captured key customer orders while aggressively managing for profitability and investing to support long-term growth. Commercial Airplanes signed 376 firm orders from a broad range of domestic and international airlines and leasing companies. The 787 program also made excellent progress toward firm configuration and finalized the 787 aerodynamic configuration. At the end of the quarter, the 787 program had captured orders and commitments from 20 customers for 252 airplanes since the launch of the program, including 143 firm orders and additional commitments for 109. BCA results are summarized in Table 6.
 
Table 6. Commercial Airplanes Operating Results
 
 
Commercial Airplanes delivered 85 airplanes in the second quarter and generated $6.8 billion of revenue, up 20 percent from the second quarter of 2004 due to higher deliveries and a more favorable mix. Operating margins were 7.0 percent, up from the second quarter of 2004 reflecting higher revenues as well as strong operating performance that offset the planned increase in 787 development spending and a charge from the sale of the Wichita and Tulsa operations. Operating margins also reflected the improving market environment as Commercial Airplanes extended the accounting quantities on the 767 program by eight airplanes and the 777 program by 50 airplanes.
 
During the quarter, Commercial Airplanes completed the sale of its Wichita and Tulsa operations to Onex for approximately $900 million cash, the transfer of approximately $100 million in liabilities to Onex, and the establishment of long-term supply agreements that provide Commercial Airplanes with ongoing cost savings. The sale resulted in a pre-tax, primarily non-cash, charge of $110 million, of which $75 million was recognized in Commercial Airplanes and $35 million was recorded at World Headquarters. The sale will also produce an additional pre-tax, primarily non-cash, charge of $238 million for The Boeing Company in the third quarter of 2005 related to the curtailment and settlement of pension plans and the transfer of pension liabilities.
 
Commercial Airplanes captured 376 gross and 371 net orders during the quarter bringing net orders for the first half of 2005 to 417 airplanes. Contractual backlog increased 26 percent totaling $86.7 billion at the end of the second quarter, compared with $68.7 billion at the end of the first quarter.
 
Boeing Capital Corporation
 
Boeing Capital Corporation (BCC) continued to create value by supporting the operations of Boeing's business units and reducing portfolio risk. Revenues for the second quarter increased 15 percent to $264 million, and pre-tax income rose significantly to $112 million driven by asset sales, lower asset impairments and a reduction of reserves associated with Hawaiian Airlines' emergence from bankruptcy. BCC results are summarized in Table 7.
 
Table 7. Boeing Capital Corporation Operating Results
 
 
The quarter-end portfolio balance was $9.4 billion, unchanged from the end of the first quarter as normal portfolio run-off and depreciation offset new business volume. The strong performance enabled BCC to contribute $105 million in cash dividends to the Company during the quarter, while lowering leverage slightly from the end of the first quarter to 4.9-to-1, as measured by the ratio of debt-to-equity.
 
"Other" Segment
 
The "Other" segment consists primarily of Boeing Technology and Connexion by Boeing
SM
, as well as certain results related to the consolidation of all business units. For the second quarter, losses from operations were $105 million, slightly improved from the second quarter of 2004. Connexion by Boeing
SM
continued to expand its global reach during the quarter and is now operational on more than 70 commercial aircraft which provide service on more than 100 daily flights.
 
Outlook
 
The Company is updating its overall outlook to reflect continued strong performance across its core businesses in 2005 followed in 2006 by higher BCA deliveries, revenues and earnings, lower revenue growth at Integrated Defense Systems and higher pension expense due to lower interest rates (see Table 8). The updated outlook also includes the impact of the sale of Wichita and Tulsa as well as the expected sale of the Rocketdyne operations, which together reduce revenues and increase earnings in 2005 and 2006. The financial guidance does not include the impact of the proposed United Launch Alliance (ULA) transaction, which is expected to reduce 2006 revenues due to a shift to equity method accounting once the joint venture is completed.
 
Defense and intelligence markets are expected to remain solid in 2005 and 2006 with U.S. Defense budgets expected to grow modestly. The airline industry
 
environment remains mixed with trends varying between carriers and regions. The global economy and air traffic trends are strengthening and interest from airlines in adding capacity to handle higher traffic volume is increasing. Many low-cost carriers and international airlines are profitable and are ordering new airplanes. However, higher fuel prices continue to dampen airline profits, particularly in the United States. Commercial Airplanes is experiencing increased demand for aircraft, especially 737s, 777s and the new 787 Dreamliner, as airline passengers continue to value frequent, direct routes and airlines focus on reducing costs. Demand for 747s and 767s has also strengthened, which has allowed the Company to defer any program completion decisions into 2006 at the earliest.
 
The Company expects airplane deliveries to increase in 2005 and 2006, followed by a further increase in 2007. Commercial Airplanes' delivery forecast for 2005 is unchanged at approximately 320 airplanes. The delivery forecast for 2006 is increased to approximately 395 airplanes, up from 375 to 385 airplanes. The delivery forecast is sold out for 2005 and 87 percent sold out for 2006.
 
The Company expects its defense and non-commercial space businesses to continue performing well in stable markets. IDS anticipates modest growth and strong performance in its Network Systems, Aircraft and Weapon Systems and Support Systems segments. Launch and Orbital Systems is expected to remain stable (excluding the impact of the planned ULA joint venture) with improving profitability in markets that remain soft.
 
The Company's 2005 revenue outlook remains at approximately $58 billion reflecting higher Commercial Airplane revenues offset by lower IDS revenue growth and the expected sale of Rocketdyne. Revenue guidance for 2006 is now approximately $62 billion reflecting higher commercial airplane deliveries and revenues offset by the sale of Rocketdyne and lower revenue growth at IDS.
 
Earnings-per-share guidance for 2005 has been raised to between $2.75 and $2.85 per share, up from between $2.40 and $2.60 per share, reflecting stronger operating margins across Boeing's core businesses. The Company continues to expect higher earnings in 2006 ranging between $3.00 and $3.20 as growing BCA and IDS margins offset higher non-cash pension expenses and a lower revenue growth rate at IDS.
 
The company annually updates its estimate of future pension expenses based on plan actuarial factors, including its pension discount rate, as of its September 30 measurement date. Because long-term interest rates (specifically, the Moody's Aa Corporate Bond Index) remain volatile and have fallen significantly over the last several months, the discount rate for 2006 may be lower than the 5.75 percent rate established for 2005, thereby increasing 2006 pension expense. The Company currently estimates pre-tax non-cash pension expenses in 2006 could be approximately $400 million higher than previously forecast if the discount rate for 2006 were to fall to 5.25 percent. The Company will update its pension assessment after the third quarter.
 
The Company now expects operating cash flow for 2005 to be greater than $6.0 billion, up from greater than $5.0 billion. The increase reflects stronger-than-expected commercial airplane orders and is after anticipated pension contributions totaling $1.6 billion. Operating cash flow in 2006 is expected to be greater than $5.5 billion, after $500 million of expected pension contributions. The Company will continue to evaluate making additional discretionary payments to its pension plans. The Company expects capital expenditures in 2005 to be approximately $1.5 billion and expenditures in 2006 to be approximately $1.7 billion.
 
The Company expects research and development investment between $2.3 billion and $2.5 billion in 2005 and between $2.5 billion and $2.7 billion in 2006 as investment increases on the 787 program as planned.
 
Table 8. Financial Outlook
 
 
 
Non-GAAP Measure Disclosure
 
The following definitions are provided for non-GAAP (Generally Accepted Accounting Principles) measures (indicated by an asterisk *) used by the Company within this disclosure. The Company does not intend for the information to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the related GAAP measures. Other companies may define the measures differently.
 
Free Cash Flow
 
Free cash flow is defined as GAAP operating cash flow less capital expenditures for property, plant, and equipment, additions. Management believes free cash flow provides investors with an important perspective on the cash available for shareholders, debt repayment, and acquisitions after making the capital investments required to support ongoing business operations and long term value creation. Free cash flow does not represent the residual cash flow available for discretionary expenditures as it excludes certain mandatory expenditures such as repayment of maturing debt. Management uses free cash flow internally to assess both business performance and overall liquidity. Table 3 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and free cash flow.
 
 
Certain statements in this report may constitute "forward-looking" statements within the meaning of the Private Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions as to future events that may not prove to be accurate. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak only as of the date they were made and we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise. Our actual results and future trends may differ materially depending on a variety of factors, including the continued operation, viability and growth of major airline customers and non-airline customers (such as the U.S. Government); adverse developments in the value of collateral securing customer and other financings; the occurrence of any significant collective bargaining labor dispute; our successful execution of internal performance plans, production rate increases and decreases (including any reduction in or termination of an aircraft product), acquisition and divestiture plans, and other cost-reduction and productivity efforts; charges from any future SFAS No. 142 review; an adverse development in rating agency credit ratings or assessments; the actual outcomes of certain pending sales campaigns and the launch of the 787 program and U.S. and foreign government procurement activities, including the uncertainty associated with the procurement of tankers by the U.S. Department of Defense (DoD); the cyclical nature of some of our businesses; unanticipated financial market changes which may impact pension plan assumptions; domestic and international competition in the defense, space and commercial areas; continued integration of acquired businesses; performance issues with key suppliers, subcontractors and customers; significant disruption to air travel worldwide (including future terrorist attacks); global trade policies; worldwide political stability; domestic and international economic conditions; price escalation; the outcome of political and legal processes, changing priorities or reductions in the U.S. Government or foreign government defense and space budgets; termination of government or commercial contracts due to unilateral government or customer action or failure to perform; legal, financial and governmental risks related to international transactions; legal and investigatory proceedings; tax settlements with the IRS and various states; U.S. Air Force review of previously awarded contracts; and other economic, political and technological risks and uncertainties. Additional information regarding these factors is contained in our SEC filings, including, without limitation, our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2004 and Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2005.
 
 
 
 
 
 
See notes to consolidated financial statements.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20050902165258.txt.gz
TIME:20050902165258
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
(a) (1) The Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors (the "Board") of The Boeing Company ("Boeing" or the "Company") granted, effective August 29, 2005, a restricted stock unit award for 22,433.26 units of Boeing Common Stock to James A. Bell, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer. The award was granted in recognition of the Company's outstanding performance during Mr. Bell's tenure as President and Chief Executive Officer, while continuing his duties as Chief Financial Officer, from March 6, 2005 to June 30, 2005 (the "Interim CEO Period"), and to encourage long-term performance.
 
The restricted stock unit award was granted under the Company's 2003 Incentive Stock Plan (the "2003 Plan") and is subject to the terms and conditions of the plan. The award will vest 50% after three years and the remaining 50% after five years of Mr. Bell's continuous service with the Company, and will be subject to forfeiture if his employment is terminated for any reason other than death, layoff, or disability. Cash dividends will be credited as additional restricted stock units that will vest at the same time as the restricted stock units with which they are associated. Upon vesting, Mr. Bell will be entitled to receive one share of Boeing Common Stock for each restricted stock unit held by him. A copy of the Restricted Stock Unit Grant Notice of Terms is filed with this report as Exhibit 99.1.
 
(2) The Governance and Nominating Committee (the "Committee") of the Board recommended and the Board approved, effective August 29, 2005, a stock award for 7,398 shares of Boeing Common Stock to Lewis E. Platt, the Company's Lead Director. The award, which was fully vested on grant, was made in recognition of Mr. Platt's increased responsibilities and contributions while serving as Non-Executive Chairman during the Interim CEO Period. The stock award was granted under the 2003 Plan and is subject to the terms and conditions of the plan. Mr. Platt did not participate in the Committee or the Board deliberations and voting on the stock award.
 
 
(c) Exhibits.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
Dated: September 2, 2005
 
 
 

EXHIBIT 99.1
 
 
The Boeing Company (the "Company") has awarded a Restricted Stock Unit award to James A. Bell (Mr. Bell). The terms and conditions of the award are as follows:
 
 
1. The Company hereby grants to Mr. Bell, Restricted Stock Units (RSUs) pursuant to The Boeing Company 2003 Incentive Stock Plan (the Plan) and the award is subject to the terms of the Plan. A summary of the Plan accompanies this notice. Mr. Bell will be credited with one million five hundred thousand dollars of RSUs as set forth below.
 
2. The number of RSUs to be granted will be determined by dividing $1.5 million by the Fair Market Value of the Common Stock of the Company on the Grant Date as determined below in Paragraph 3. "Fair Market Value" equals the mean of the high and low per share trading prices for the common stock of the Company as reported by . The number will be carried to two decimal places.
The Wall Street Journal
 
3. The RSU Grant Date will be August 29, 2005.
 
4. The RSU grant will vest upon satisfaction of the following performance criteria:
 
 
 
5. Mr. Bell's RSU account will be credited on a quarterly basis with additional RSUs (earnings credit RSUs) equal in number to the number of shares of the Company's common stock that could be purchased with the cash dividends payable on the number of shares of Company stock that equals the number of RSUs in Mr. Bell's account. The determination of the number of shares to be credited will be based on the Fair Market Value of the Common Stock of the Company on the dividend payment date (or on the next business day on which the New York Stock Exchange is open, if the Exchange is closed on the dividend payment date). Earnings credit RSUs will vest at the same time as the RSUs with which they are associated.
 
6. The Company will maintain a record of the number of awarded RSUs in an account for Mr. Bell.
7. Mr. Bell's RSU account will be adjusted proportionately for any increase or decrease in the number of issued shares of Boeing stock resulting from any stock split, combination or exchange of shares, consolidation, spin-off or recapitalization of shares, or any similar capital adjustment or the payment of any stock dividend.
 
8. If Mr. Bell's employment with the Company or a subsidiary is terminated for any reason other than death, layoff, or disability, his nonvested RSUs will be forfeited and canceled. Earnings credit RSUs will be forfeited and canceled along with the RSUs with which they are associated. "Disability" here means a disability entitling a participant to benefits under a long-term disability policy sponsored by the Company or one of its subsidiaries.
 
9. Distribution from Mr. Bell's RSU account will be made within thirty days after the vesting date of the RSUs. Distributions will be in whole shares of the Company's common stock. Distribution of shares will be equal in number to the whole number of vested RSUs in Mr. Bell's account. Fractional shares values will be applied to income tax withholding.
 
10. The Company will deduct from any distribution to Mr. Bell any tax withholding required by law, and any amounts owed by Mr. Bell to the Company.
 
11. RSUs are not transferable except by will or applicable laws of descent and distribution.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20051026100501.txt.gz
TIME:20051026100501
EVENTS:	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
(a) Not applicable
 
(b) Not applicable
 
(c) Exhibits
 
99.1    Press Release issued October 26, 2005.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
Boeing Reports Third-Quarter 2005 Results; Raises Outlook
 
 
Financial Highlights:
 
 
Selected Third-Quarter 2005 Operating Highlights:
 
 
 
 
Table 1. Summary Financial Results
1 Third-quarter 2005 EPS includes a $0.62 per share gain from tax settlements and adjustments, $0.06 per share additional expense for share based plans, a $0.45 per share gain from the sale of Rocketdyne, and a non-cash $0.14 per share charge for post-retirement expense related to the sale of Wichita/Tulsa operations. Company estimates that IAM strike affected third-quarter results by $0.25-$0.30 per share. Third-quarter 2004 EPS includes a $0.02 per share gain from sale of Boeing Capital's commercial finance operations, a $0.04 per share charge for retirement of $1 billion of BCC debt, and a $0.14 per share benefit from tax settlements/adjustments.
 
 The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] today reported that third-quarter 2005 net income increased to $1,011 million, or $1.26 per share, compared with $456 million, or $0.56 per share in the year-ago quarter. Third-quarter revenues declined to $12.6 billion from $13.2 billion last year. Earnings for the quarter include a $0.62 per share benefit from tax settlements and adjustments. The company estimates that the month-long International Association of Machinists (IAM) strike caused 21 fewer airplane deliveries in the quarter and reduced results by $0.25 to $0.30 per share.
CHICAGO, October 26, 2005
 
"Our third-quarter results and our increase in guidance underscore our operating strength," said Jim McNerney, Boeing chairman and chief executive officer. "Although we faced some challenges this quarter, Commercial Airplanes continued its tremendous sales success, completed firm configuration of the 787 Dreamliner, and reached an agreement with the IAM that supports continued growth and competitiveness. At the same time, Integrated Defense Systems delivered strong margins while achieving key milestones on leading-edge programs such as Future Combat Systems. Across Boeing, we are focused on executing our growth plans and improving our margins."
 
Results for the quarter include a previously-disclosed $0.45 per share gain on the sale of Rocketdyne, and a non-cash charge of $0.14 per share for post-retirement expense related to the Wichita/Tulsa sale. The company also booked an additional $0.06 per share in share based plans expense to reflect a cumulative adjustment.
 
The company's third-quarter earnings from operations increased 49 percent to $0.8 billion (see Table 2) as strong business unit operating performance offset higher non-cash expenses for pensions and share-based plans.
 
Table 2. Earnings from Operations & Margins
 
Pre-tax (non-cash) pension expense was $396 million, up $332 million or $0.26 per share from the same period of 2004. This includes a pre-tax, non-cash pension charge of $250 million from the sale of the company's Wichita and Tulsa operations. Share-based-plans expense was $246 million, up $80 million or $0.06 per share from the same period of 2004. Deferred stock compensation expense was $37 million, or $0.03 per share, as Boeing's stock price increased during the period.
 
Boeing generated $0.5 billion of operating cash flow during the third quarter driven by strong performance in its core businesses and $537 million in cash and interest from a tax audit settlement, which more than offset the impact of the IAM strike and $1.4 billion in discretionary pension contributions. Free cash flow* was $0.2 billion for the quarter after investment of $0.3 billion in property, plant & equipment (Table 3).
 
Table 3. Cash Flow
1 Includes pension contributions totaling $1.4 billion in the third quarter of 2005, and $1.6 billion in the same period of 2004. The corresponding year-to-date pension contributions for 2005 and 2004 are $1.8 billion and $3.6 billion, respectively.
* A complete definition and discussion of Boeing's use of non-GAAP measures, identified by an asterisk (*), is attached at the end of the release.
 
Cash and investments in marketable securities totaled $7.5 billion, down from $7.9 billion at the end of the second quarter. This reflected the ongoing share repurchase program, pension plan contributions, and planned investment increases in Boeing's core businesses, offset by strong operating cash flows and cash received from the Rocketdyne sale. The company repurchased 13.7 million shares during the quarter for $904 million, leaving 37 million shares available under the existing repurchase authorization. The company made a discretionary contribution of $1.4 billion to its pension plans during the quarter, bringing total 2005 contributions to $1.8 billion.
 
The Boeing Company debt was unchanged at $3.9 billion as no debt matured during the quarter. Boeing Capital debt declined slightly to $6.4 billion as strong operating cash flow eliminated the need for new financing.
 
Table 4. Cash, Marketable Securities and Debt Balances
1 Marketable securities consists primarily of investments in high-quality fixed-income and asset-backed securities classified as "short-term investments" and "investments."
 
Segment Results
 
Commercial Airplanes
 
Boeing Commercial Airplanes (BCA) continued winning key customer orders during the third quarter while aggressively managing for profitability and investing for long-term growth. It won 202 gross orders from a broad range of customers, launched the 737-900 Extended Range with an order from Lion Air, and completed firm configuration for the 787 Dreamliner. To date, the 787 has captured orders and commitments from 24 customers for 293 airplanes since its launch, including 194 firm orders and additional commitments for 99 airplanes.
 
Commercial Airplanes generated $4.9 billion of revenue, up 6 percent from the third quarter of 2004 on higher used aircraft sales, favorable model mix, and spares revenue. BCA delivered 62 airplanes in the quarter, 21 fewer than planned due to the month-long IAM strike. Operating margins were 4.8 percent, up from the third quarter of 2004 reflecting continued productivity gains and higher revenues that were partially offset by the strike. BCA results are shown in Table 5.
 
 
Commercial Airplanes captured 199 net orders during the quarter, bringing net orders for the first nine months of 2005 to 616 airplanes, as compared to 191 net orders during the first nine months of 2004. BCA contractual backlog jumped 13 percent to $98.1 billion, up from $86.7 billion at the end of the second quarter. Commercial Airplanes' backlog has increased 39 percent during 2005.
 
Integrated Defense Systems
 
Integrated Defense Systems (IDS) had another strong quarter delivering 19 aircraft and capturing follow-on orders for Apache helicopters and the Joint Unmanned Combat Air System. IDS successfully passed the Future Combat Systems (FCS) System of Systems Functional Review and the TSAT Interim Space Segment Design Review. IDS reported third-quarter operating margins of 17.7 percent, up from 9.9
 
percent in the same period of 2004, as a result of double-digit performance in the Aircraft & Weapons Systems and Support Systems segments along with the Rocketdyne sale. Revenues decreased 11 percent to $7.4 billion due to timing and mix of aircraft deliveries, lower volume in Proprietary and Missile Defense, and the Rocketdyne divestiture. IDS results are summarized in Table 6.
 
Table 6. Integrated Defense Systems Operating Results
 
During the quarter, IDS completed the sale of its Rocketdyne operations to United Technologies for $700 million in cash and the establishment of long-term supply agreements. That resulted in a pre-tax gain of $582 million, of which $573 million was recognized in Launch & Orbital Systems and $9 million was recorded in the Other segment. The sale will also produce an additional pre-tax, non-cash charge of approximately $190 million in the Other segment during the fourth quarter of 2005 related to the curtailment and settlement of post-retirement plans and the transfer of post-retirement liabilities. Excluding the Rocketdyne sale, the IDS third-quarter operating margin was 9.9 percent.
 
Network Systems revenues declined 14 percent to $2.7 billion on lower volume in Proprietary programs, Ground-based Midcourse Defense and a military satellite program, partially offset by increased activity in Future Combat Systems and the Multi-mission Maritime Aircraft program. Operating margins decreased to 3.4 percent, as higher earnings for FCS and MMA were offset by revised cost and fee estimates on the Future Imagery Architecture program and a military satellite program.
 
Aircraft & Weapon Systems delivered excellent profitability in the third quarter. Revenues declined 16 percent to $2.6 billion primarily due to the delivery and timing
 
mix of C-17 and other aircraft. Operating margins were 15.0 percent driven by strong performance across key programs including C-17, F/A-18 and Rotorcraft.
 
Support Systems generated strong growth and profitability on its broad business base during the third quarter. Revenues rose 18 percent to $1.4 billion driven by increased volume in Integrated Support Services for F-15K, C-17 and V-22, as well as higher revenues in Training & Support Systems. Operating margins were 13.7 percent, down from the same period in 2004 which benefited from higher contract closeout activity in Supply Chain Services and Training & Support Systems.
 
Launch and Orbital Systems continued to improve its margin performance during the third quarter. Revenues declined 19 percent to $0.7 billion driven by the sale of Rocketdyne and reduced NASA Return-to-Flight activity. Operating margins rose to 94.6 percent due to the gain on the sale of Rocketdyne as well as improved satellite program performance and higher contract values for Delta IV launch contracts. Without the sale of Rocketdyne, the segment would have had operating margins of 9.0 percent.
 
At the end of the third quarter, IDS contractual backlog totaled $35.5 billion, down from $41.0 billion at the end of the second quarter. Unobligated backlog grew to $42.9 billion at the end of the third quarter. Total IDS backlog, comprised of contractual and unobligated, was $78.4 billion compared with $82.1 billion at the end of the second quarter.
 
Boeing Capital Corporation
 
Boeing Capital Corporation (BCC) continued to support the operations of Boeing's business units and reduce portfolio risk. Revenues for the third quarter declined 9 percent to $230 million, and pre-tax income declined to $28 million, due to a smaller portfolio and one-time gains recognized in 2004 which are absent in the same period of 2005. BCC results are summarized in Table 7.
 
 
 
 
BCC's quarter-end portfolio balance was $9.2 billion, down from $9.4 billion at the end of the second quarter as normal portfolio run-off and depreciation was partially offset by new business volume. BCC contributed $58 million in cash dividends to the company during the quarter, while maintaining leverage at a conservative 4.8-to-1, as measured by the ratio of debt-to-equity.
 
"Other" Segment
 
The "Other" segment consists primarily of Boeing Technology and Connexion by Boeing
SM
, as well as certain results related to the consolidation of all business units. For the third quarter, losses from operations were $97 million, compared to $145 million in the third quarter of 2004. Connexion by Boeing
SM
expanded its global reach by approximately 20 percent during the quarter and is now operational on more than 80 commercial aircraft which provide service on more than 120 daily flights.
 
Outlook
 
The company is updating its outlook to reflect continued strong performance across its core businesses in 2005 followed in 2006 by higher BCA deliveries, revenues and earnings, and lower revenue growth at Integrated Defense Systems (see Table 8). The updated outlook also includes the impact of the sales of Wichita/Tulsa and Rocketdyne operations (which together reduce revenues and increase earnings in 2005 and 2006) and the impact of the IAM strike. The guidance does not include the impact of the proposed United Launch Alliance (ULA) transaction, which is expected to reduce 2006 revenues due to a shift to equity-method accounting once the joint venture is completed.
 
Beginning in 2006, BCA will change its method of accounting for supplier concession sharing agreements. It will no longer record concession reimbursements received from suppliers as "Sales and other operating revenues." Instead those will be reflected as a reduction to "Cost of products and services." This accounting change will reduce BCA revenue in 2006 by approximately $1.5 to $2.0 billion, but will have only a nominal impact on operating earnings. The impact of this accounting change will be included in 2006 guidance coincident with the change in accounting method.
 
The airline industry environment remains mixed with trends varying between carriers and regions. The global economy and air traffic trends are strengthening and interest from airlines in adding capacity to handle higher traffic volume is increasing.
 
Many low-cost carriers and international airlines are profitable and are ordering new airplanes. However, higher fuel prices continue dampening airline profits, particularly in the United States. Commercial Airplanes is experiencing increased demand for aircraft across all models as airline passengers continue to value frequent, direct routes and airlines focus on reducing costs.
 
The company now expects to deliver approximately 290 airplanes during 2005, down from our previous estimate of 320 due to the IAM strike, but up from 285 deliveries last year.
 
The 2006 delivery forecast remains at approximately 395 airplanes, an increase of 36 percent from this year. Airplane deliveries in 2007 are expected to be above the 2006 level. The 2006 forecast reflects an orderly production restart and disciplined ramp up throughout the value chain to support continued growth in demand through the up-cycle. This approach will enable Boeing to meet its commitments and continue its productivity gains. The 2005 delivery forecast is sold out while 2006's is now 93 percent sold out.
 
Defense and intelligence markets are expected to remain solid in 2005 and 2006 as U.S. defense budgets are expected to grow modestly. The company expects its defense and non-commercial space businesses to continue performing well in stable markets, generating double-digit margins. IDS anticipates stable growth with high single-digit margins in its Network Systems segment and stable growth with low double-digit margins in its Aircraft & Weapon Systems segment. IDS expects strong growth in Support Systems with low double-digit margins, while Launch and Orbital Systems revenue is expected to remain stable (excluding the impact of the planned ULA joint venture) with low single-digit margins.
 
The company's 2005 revenue outlook is reduced to approximately $55.5 billion reflecting the impact of the IAM strike and slower growth at IDS. Revenue guidance for 2006 remains at $62 billion reflecting higher commercial airplane deliveries and revenues offset by the sale of Rocketdyne, and slower revenue growth at IDS.
 
Earnings per share guidance for 2005 is being raised to between $2.95 and $3.05 per share, from between $2.75 and $2.85 per share. The company is also raising its EPS guidance for 2006 to between $3.10 and $3.30 per share, up from $3.00 to $3.20 per share primarily due to a higher margin forecast at BCA.
 
The company annually updates its estimate of future pension expenses based on plan actuarial factors, including its pension discount rate, at the end of the plan's fiscal year on September 30. For the plan year ending September 30, 2005, Boeing's pension asset returns exceeded 14 percent, well above the company's 8.5 percent expected rate of return. However, since long-term interest rates have fallen during the past year, the discount rate for 2006 will be 5.50 percent, down from the 5.75 percent rate established for 2005, bringing 2006 estimated pre-tax pension expense to approximately $1.0 billion.
 
The company now expects operating cash flow for 2005 to be greater than $7.0 billion, up from greater than $6.0 billion. The increase reflects stronger-than-expected commercial airplane orders and the tax refund, offset somewhat by higher pension contributions (totaling $1.8 billion for 2005) and the impact of the IAM strike. Operating cash flow in 2006 is expected to be greater than $5.5 billion, after $500 million of expected pension contributions. The company will continue to evaluate making additional discretionary payments to its pension plans. Capital expenditures in 2005 should be approximately $1.5 billion and expenditures in 2006 are expected to be approximately $1.7 billion.
 
Research and development investment is expected to be between $2.3 billion and $2.5 billion this year, and between $2.5 billion and $2.7 billion in 2006, reflecting investment increases on planned BCA product development programs.
 
Table 8. Financial Outlook
1 After forecast pension contributions of $1.8 billion in 2005 and $0.5 billion in 2006.
2 2005 Outlook impacted by IAM strike (estimated 30 fewer airplane deliveries in 2005).
3 Launch and Orbital Systems' 2005 margin reflects the sale of Rocketdyne, which closed in the third quarter and generated a pre-tax gain of approximately $582 million in the third quarter, mostly in the L&OS segment. Offsetting pre-tax charges totaling approximately $190 million are expected to be recorded in the fourth quarter, primarily in Accounting Differences and Eliminations, bringing the total expected pre-tax gain for the Rocketdyne sale to approximately $390 million.
 
 
Non-GAAP Measure Disclosure
 
The following definition is provided for free cash flow, a non-GAAP (Generally Accepted Accounting Principles) measure (indicated by an asterisk *) used by the company within this disclosure. The company does not intend for the information to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the related GAAP measure. Other companies may define the measure differently.
 
Free Cash Flow
 
Free cash flow is defined as GAAP operating cash flow less capital expenditures for property, plant, and equipment, additions. Management believes free cash flow provides investors with an important perspective on the cash available for shareholders, debt repayment, and acquisitions after making the capital investments required to support ongoing business operations and long term value creation. Free cash flow does not represent the residual cash flow available for discretionary expenditures as it excludes certain mandatory expenditures such as repayment of maturing debt. Management uses free cash flow internally to assess both business performance and overall liquidity. Table 3 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and free cash flow.
 
 
Certain statements in this report may constitute "forward-looking" statements within the meaning of the Private Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions as to future events that may not prove to be accurate. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak only as of the date they were made and we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise. Our actual results and future trends may differ materially depending on a variety of factors, including the continued operation, viability and growth of major airline customers and non-airline customers (such as the U.S. Government); adverse developments in the value of collateral securing customer and other financings; the occurrence of any significant collective bargaining labor dispute; our successful execution of internal performance plans, production rate increases and decreases (including any reduction in or termination of an aircraft product), acquisition and divestiture plans, and other cost-reduction and productivity efforts; charges from any future SFAS No. 142 review; an adverse development in rating agency credit ratings or assessments; the actual outcomes of certain pending sales campaigns and the launch of the 787 program and U.S. and foreign government procurement activities, including the uncertainty associated with the procurement of tankers by the U.S. Department of Defense (DoD); the cyclical nature of some of our businesses; unanticipated financial market changes which may impact pension plan assumptions; domestic and international competition in the defense, space and commercial areas; continued integration of acquired businesses; performance issues with key suppliers, subcontractors and customers; significant disruption to air travel worldwide (including future terrorist attacks); global trade policies; worldwide political stability; domestic and international economic conditions; price escalation; the outcome of political and legal processes, changing priorities or reductions in the U.S. Government or foreign government defense and space budgets; termination of government or commercial contracts due to unilateral government or customer action or failure to perform; legal, financial and governmental risks related to international transactions; legal and investigatory proceedings; tax settlements with the IRS and various states; U.S. Air Force review of previously awarded contracts; and other economic, political and technological risks and uncertainties. Additional information regarding these factors is contained in our SEC filings, including, without limitation, our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2004 and Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q for the quarters ended March 31, 2005, June 30, 2005 and September 30, 2005.
 
 
Cxxxx
 
Contact:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20051103114659.txt.gz
TIME:20051103114659
EVENTS:	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.03. Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year.
 
(a) On October 31, 2005, the Board of Directors amended and restated the Company's By-Laws by decreasing the number of directors from eleven to ten. A copy of the Company's By-Laws, as amended and restated, is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(c) Exhibits.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
Dated: November 3, 2005
 
 
 

EXHIBIT 99.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
SECTION 1.
.
Annual Meetings
 
The Annual Meeting of the stockholders shall be held on such date and at such time as the Board of Directors shall determine, for the election of directors and the transaction of such other business as may come before the meeting.
 
SECTION 2. .
Special Meetings
 
A special meeting of the stockholders may be called at any time by the Board of Directors, or by stockholders holding together at least twenty-five percent of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, except as otherwise provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto.
 
SECTION 3.
.
Place of Meeting
 
All meetings of the stockholders of the Corporation shall be held at such place or places within or without the State of Delaware as may from time to time be fixed by the Board of Directors or as shall be specified or fixed in the respective notices or waivers of notice thereof.
 
SECTION 4.
.
Notice of Meetings
 
Except as otherwise required by statute and as set forth below, notice of each annual or special meeting of stockholders shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than thirty nor more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date. If the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, notice of each special meeting of stockholders shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than fifty-five nor more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date, unless the calling of such meeting is ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, in which case notice of such special meeting shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than thirty nor more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date. Such notice shall be given by delivering to each stockholder a written or printed notice thereof either personally or by mailing such notice in a postage-prepaid envelope addressed to the stockholder's address as it appears on the stock books of the Corporation. Except as otherwise required by statute, no publication of any notice of a meeting of stockholders shall be required. Every notice of a meeting of stockholders shall state the place, date, and hour of the meeting and, in the case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called.
 
SECTION 5.
.
Waivers of Notice
 
Whenever any notice is required to be given to any stockholder under the provisions of these By-Laws, the Certificate of Incorporation, or the Delaware General Corporation Law, a waiver thereof in writing, signed by the person or persons entitled to such notice, whether before or after the time stated therein, shall be deemed equivalent to the giving of such notice. The attendance of a stockholder at a meeting, in person or by proxy, shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when a stockholder attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened.
 
SECTION 6.
.
Quorum
 
At all meetings of stockholders, except when otherwise provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by the By-Laws, the presence, in person or by proxy duly authorized, of the holders of one-third of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and except as otherwise provided by statute or rule of law, or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by the By-Laws, the vote, in person or by proxy, of the holders of a majority of the shares constituting such quorum shall be binding upon all stockholders of the Corporation. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote may adjourn any meeting, from time to time but not for a period of more than thirty days at any one time, until a quorum shall attend. At any such adjourned meeting at which a quorum shall be present, any business may be transacted which might have been transacted at the meeting as originally called. Unless otherwise provided by statute, no notice of an adjourned meeting need be given.
 
SECTION 7.
.
Proxies
 
7.1 Each stockholder entitled to vote at a meeting of stockholders or to express consent or dissent to corporate action in writing without a meeting may authorize another person or persons to act for such stockholder by proxy. Such authorization may be accomplished by (a) the stockholder or such stockholder's authorized officer, director, employee, or agent executing a writing or causing his or her signature to be affixed to such writing by any reasonable means, including facsimile signature, or (b) by transmitting or authorizing the transmission of a telegram, cablegram, or other means of electronic transmission to the intended holder of the proxy or to a proxy solicitation firm, proxy support service, or similar agent duly authorized by the intended proxy holder to receive such transmission; provided, that any such telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission must either set forth or be accompanied by information from which it can be determined that the telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission was authorized by the stockholder. Any copy, facsimile telecommunication, or other reliable reproduction of the writing or transmission by which a stockholder has authorized another person to act as proxy for such stockholder may be substituted or used in lieu of the original writing or transmission for any and all purposes for which the original writing or transmission could be used, provided that such copy, facsimile telecommunication, or other reproduction shall be a complete reproduction of the entire original writing or transmission.
.
Appointment
 
7.2 A proxy shall be filed with the Secretary of the Corporation before or at the time of the meeting or the delivery to the Corporation of the consent to corporate action in writing. A proxy shall become invalid three years after the date of its execution, unless otherwise provided in the proxy. A proxy with respect to a specified meeting shall entitle the holder thereof to vote at any reconvened meeting following adjournment of such meeting but shall not be valid after the final adjournment thereof.
.
Delivery to Corporation; Duration
 
SECTION 8.
.
Inspectors of Election
 
8.1 In advance of any meeting of stockholders, the Board of Directors of the Corporation shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspectors of election at such meeting and to make a written report thereof. The Board of Directors may designate one or more persons to serve as alternate inspectors to serve in place of any inspector who is unable or fails to act. If no inspector or alternate is able to act at a meeting of stockholders, the chairman of such meeting shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspector of elections at such meeting.
.
Appointment
 
8.2 The inspectors shall: (a) ascertain the number of shares of the Corporation outstanding and the voting power of each such share; (b) determine the shares represented at the meeting and the validity of proxies and ballots; (c) count all votes and ballots; (d) determine and retain for a reasonable period of time a record of the disposition of any challenges made to any determination by them; and (e) certify their determination of the number of shares represented at the meeting and their count of the votes and ballots. Each inspector of election shall, before entering upon the discharge of his or her duties, take and sign an oath to faithfully execute the duties of inspector with strict impartiality and according to the best of his or her ability. The inspectors of election may appoint or retain other persons or entities to assist them in the performance of their duties.
.
Duties
 
8.3 The validity of any proxy or ballot executed for a meeting of stockholders shall be determined by the inspectors of election in accordance with the applicable provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law as then in effect. In determining the validity of any proxy transmitted by telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission, the inspectors shall record in writing the information upon which they relied in making such determination.
.
Determination of Proxy Validity
 
SECTION 9.
.
Fixing the Record Date
 
9.1 For the purpose of determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at any meeting of stockholders or any adjournment thereof, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which record date shall be not fewer than thirty nor more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the date of such meeting. If the corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, the record date for each special meeting of stockholders shall be not fewer than fifty-five nor more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date, unless the calling of such meeting is ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of
.
Meetings
 
Incorporation. If no record date is fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall be at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which notice is given, or, if notice is waived, at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which the meeting is held. A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting; provided, however, that the Board of Directors may fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
 
9.2 For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which date shall not be more than ten (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days after the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, when no prior action by the Board of Directors is required by Chapter 1 of the Delaware General Corporation Law as now or hereafter amended, shall be the first date on which a signed written consent setting forth the action taken or proposed to be taken is delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the records of proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Delivery made to the Corporation's registered office shall be by hand or by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors and prior action by the Board of Directors is required by Chapter 1 of the Delaware General Corporation Law as now or hereafter amended, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution taking such prior action.
.
Consent to Corporate Action Without a Meeting
 
9.3 For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to receive payment of any dividend or other distribution or allotment of any rights or the stockholders entitled to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion, or exchange of stock, or for the purpose of any other lawful action, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted, and which record date shall be not more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days prior to such action. If no record date is fixed, the record date for determining stockholders for any such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution relating thereto.
.
Dividends, Distributions, and Other Rights
 
9.4. At least ten days before each meeting of stockholders, a complete list of the stockholders entitled to vote at such meeting shall be made, arranged in alphabetical order, and showing the address of each stockholder and the number of shares registered in the name of each stockholder. This list shall be open to examination by any stockholder, for any purpose germane to the meeting, during ordinary business hours, for a period of ten days prior to the meeting, either at a place within the city where the meeting is to be held, which place shall be specified in the notice of the meeting, or, if not so specified, at the place where the meeting is to be held. The
.
Voting List
 
list shall also be produced and kept at such meeting for inspection by any stockholder who is present.
 
SECTION 10.
.
Action by Stockholders Without a Meeting
 
Subject to the provisions of Article NINTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, any action which could be taken at any annual or special meeting of stockholders may be taken without a meeting, without prior notice, and without a vote, if a consent or consents in writing, setting forth the action so taken, are (a) signed by the holders of outstanding stock having not fewer than the minimum number of votes that would be necessary to authorize or take such action at a meeting at which all shares entitled to vote thereon were present and voted and (b) delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the records of proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Delivery made to the Corporation's registered office shall be by hand or by certified mail or registered mail, return receipt requested. Every written consent shall bear the date of signature of each stockholder who signs the consent and no written consent shall be effective to take the corporate action referred to therein unless written consents signed by a sufficient number of stockholders to take such action are delivered to the Corporation, in the manner required by this section, within sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days of the date of the earliest dated consent delivered to the Corporation in the manner required by this section. The validity of any consent executed by a proxy for a stockholder pursuant to a telegram, cablegram, or other means of electronic transmission transmitted to such proxy holder by or upon the authorization of the stockholder shall be determined by or at the direction of the Secretary of the Corporation. A written record of the information upon which the person making such determination relied shall be made and kept in the records of the proceedings of the stockholders. Any such consent shall be inserted in the minute book as if it were the minutes of a meeting of the stockholders. Prompt notice of the taking of the corporate action without a meeting by less than unanimous written consent shall be given to those stockholders who have not consented in writing.
 
SECTION 11.
.
Business and Nominations at Stockholders' Meetings
 
11.1 In addition to the election of directors, other proper business may be transacted at the annual meeting of stockholders, provided that such business is a proper matter for stockholder action and is properly brought before such meeting. To be properly brought before an annual meeting, nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors and business to be considered by stockholders must be (a) made or brought by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, or (b) made or brought before the meeting by a stockholder of the Corporation who is a stockholder of record at the time of giving notice as required in this By-Law, who is entitled to vote at the meeting, and who complies with the notice procedures set forth in this By-Law. Notice by a stockholder pursuant to (b) above must be in writing, in accordance with Section 12 of this Article I, and received by the Secretary not earlier than the one-hundred and twentieth day nor later than the close of business on the ninetieth day prior to the date specified in Section 1 of this Article I for such annual meeting; provided, however, that in the event that the date of the annual meeting is more than thirty days before or more than sixty days after such date, notice by the stockholder must be received by the Secretary not earlier than the one-hundred and twentieth
.
Business and Nominations at Annual Meetings
 
day prior to such annual meeting and not later than the close of business on the ninetieth day prior to such annual meeting or the tenth day following the day on which public announcement of the date of such meeting is first made by the Corporation.
 
11.2 . Any stockholder notice given pursuant to Section 11.1 shall set forth (i) the name and address of the stockholder proposing such business and of the beneficial owner, if any, on whose behalf the proposal or nomination is made; (ii) a representation that the stockholder is entitled to vote at such meeting and a statement of the number of shares of the Corporation which are owned by the stockholder and the number of shares which are beneficially owned by the beneficial owner, if any; (iii) a representation that the stockholder intends to appear in person or by proxy at the meeting to nominate the person or persons or to propose the business specified in the notice; and (iv) as to each person the stockholder proposes to nominate for election or re-election as a director, the name and address of such person and such other information regarding such nominee as would be required in a proxy statement filed pursuant to the proxy rules of the Securities and Exchange Commission had such nominee been nominated by the Board of Directors, and a description of any arrangements or understandings, between the stockholder and such nominee and any other persons (including their names), pursuant to which the nomination is to be made, and the written consent of each such nominee to being named in the proxy statement as a nominee and to serving as a director if elected; or, as to each matter the stockholder proposes to bring before the meeting, a brief description of the business desired to be brought before the meeting, the reasons for conducting such business at the meeting, the language of the business matter (if appropriate), and any material interest of the stockholder in such business.
Stockholder Notice
 
11.3 At any special meeting of the stockholders, only such business as is specified in the notice of such special meeting given by or at the direction of the person or persons calling such meeting, in accordance with Section 2 of this Article I, shall come before such meeting. Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors may be made at a special meeting of stockholders at which directors are to be elected pursuant to the Corporation's notice of meeting (a) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or (b) provided that the Board of Directors has determined that directors shall be elected at such meeting, by any stockholder of the Corporation who is a stockholder of record at the time of giving of notice provided for in this By-Law, who shall be entitled to vote at the meeting and who complies with the notice procedures set forth in this By-Law. In the event the Corporation calls a special meeting of stockholders for the purpose of electing one or more directors to the Board of Directors, any such stockholder may nominate a person or persons for election to such position(s) as specified in the Corporation's notice of meeting, if the stockholder's notice required by paragraph 11.1 of this By-Law shall be delivered to the Secretary not earlier than the one hundred and twentieth day nor later than the ninetieth day prior to such special meeting or the tenth day following the day on which public announcement is first made of the date of the special meeting and of the nominees proposed by the Board of Directors to be elected at such meeting.
.
Business and Nominations at Special Meetings
 
11.4 . No business shall be conducted nor director nominations made at any meeting of stockholders except in accordance with this Section 11. If
Stockholder Meeting Procedures
 
the facts warrant, the Board of Directors, or the chairman of a stockholders' meeting at which directors are to be elected, may determine and declare (a) that a proposal does not constitute proper business to be transacted at the meeting or (b) that business was not properly brought before the meeting in accordance with the provisions of this Section 11 or (c) that a nomination was not made in accordance with this Section 11; and, if it is so determined, the defective proposal or nomination shall be disregarded and shall not be transacted or acted upon. The right of stockholders to bring business before or to make nominations pursuant to the foregoing procedure is subject to the rights of the holders of any class or series of stock having a preference over the Common Stock as to dividends or upon liquidation. The procedures set forth in this Section 11 for stockholders' bringing business before a stockholders' meeting or stockholders' making nominations for the election of directors are in addition to, and not in lieu or limitation of, (a) any procedures now in effect or hereafter adopted by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof and (b) the requirements set forth in Rule 14a-8 and Rule 14a-11 under Section 14 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, or any successor provisions.
 
11.5 . For purposes of this By-Law, "public announcement" as to an annual or special meeting of stockholders shall mean disclosure in a press release reported by the Dow Jones News Service, Associated Press or comparable national news service or in a document publicly filed by the Corporation with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to Section 13, 14 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act. In no event shall the public announcement of an adjournment of an annual or special meeting commence a new time period for the giving of a stockholder's notice as described above.
Public Announcement of Stockholders' Meetings
 
SECTION 12.
.
Notice to Corporation
 
Any written notice required to be delivered by a stockholder to the Corporation pursuant to Section 11.1 of this Article I or Section 2.1 of Article II must be given, either by personal delivery or by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, to the Secretary at the Corporation's executive offices in the City of Seattle, State of Washington.
 
 
 
SECTION 1.
.
Number and Term of Office
 
The number of directors shall be ten, but the number may be increased, or decreased to not less than three, from time to time, either by the directors by adoption of a resolution to such effect or by the stockholders by amendment of the By-Laws in accordance with Article VIII hereof. The directors shall be divided into three classes, each of which shall be composed as nearly as possible of one-third of the directors. Each director shall serve for the term to which the director was elected, and until a successor shall have been elected and qualified or until the director's prior death, resignation, or removal. At each annual election, directors shall be chosen for a full three-year term to succeed those whose terms expire.
 
SECTION 2.
.
Nomination and Election
 
2.1 Only persons who are nominated in accordance with Article I, Section 11 of these By-Laws shall be eligible for election as directors.
.
Nomination
 
2.2 At each election of directors, the persons receiving the greatest number of votes shall be the directors.
.
Election
 
SECTION 3.
.
Place of Meeting
 
Meetings of the Board of Directors, or of any committee thereof, may be held either within or without the State of Delaware.
 
SECTION 4.
.
Annual Meeting
 
Each year the Board of Directors shall meet in connection with the annual meeting of stockholders for the purpose of electing officers and for the transaction of other business. No notice of such meeting is required. Such annual meeting may be held at any other time or place which shall be specified in a notice given as hereinafter provided for special meetings of the Board, or in a consent and waiver of notice thereof, signed by all the directors.
 
SECTION 5.
.
Stated Meetings
 
The Board of Directors may, by resolution adopted by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board, from time to time appoint the time and place for holding stated meetings of the Board, if by it deemed advisable; and such stated meetings shall thereupon be held at the time and place so appointed, without the giving of any special notice with regard thereto. In case the day appointed for a stated meeting shall fall upon a legal holiday, such meeting shall be held on the next following day, not a legal holiday, at the regularly appointed hour. Except as otherwise provided in the By-Laws, any and all business may be transacted at any stated meeting.
 
SECTION 6.
.
Special Meetings
 
6.1 Special meetings of the Board of Directors may be called by or at the request of the Chairman of the Board or any two directors. Notice of a special meeting of the Board of Directors, stating the place, day, and hour of the meeting, shall be given to each director in writing (by mail, wire, facsimile, or personal delivery) or orally (by telephone or in person).
.
Convenors and Notice
 
6.2 With respect to a special meeting of the Board of Directors, a written waiver, signed by a director, shall be deemed equivalent to notice to that director. A director's attendance at a meeting shall constitute that director's waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the director attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting was not lawfully called or convened. Neither the business to be transacted at, nor the purpose of, any regular or special meeting of the Board of Directors need be specified in the waiver of notice of such meeting.
.
Waiver of Notice
 
SECTION 7.
.
Quorum and Manner of Acting
 
Except as herein otherwise provided, forty percent of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided in these By-Laws at the time of any stated or special meeting of the Board or, if vacancies exist on the Board of Directors, forty percent of such number of directors then in office, provided, however, that such number may not be less than one-third of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided in these By-Laws, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and, except as otherwise required by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by the By-Laws, the act of a majority of the directors present at any such meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of the Board of Directors. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the directors present may adjourn any meeting, from time to time, until a quorum is present. No notice of any adjourned meeting need be given.
 
SECTION 8.
.
Chairman of the Board
 
The Chairman of the Board shall preside, when present, at all meetings of the Board, except as otherwise provided by law.
 
SECTION 9.
.
Resignations
 
Any director of the Corporation may resign at any time by giving written notice thereof to the Secretary. Such resignation shall take effect at the time specified therefor or if the time is not specified, upon delivery thereof; and, unless otherwise specified with respect thereto, the acceptance of such resignation shall not be necessary to make it effective.
 
SECTION 10.
.
Removal of Directors
 
Any director may be removed solely for cause by the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, at a meeting of the stockholders called for the purpose; and the vacancy on the Board caused by any such removal may be filled by the stockholders at such meeting or at any subsequent meeting.
 
SECTION 11.
.
Filling of Vacancies Not Caused by Removal
 
In case of any increase in the number of directors, or of any vacancy created by death or resignation, the additional director or directors may be elected or, as the case may be, the vacancy or vacancies may be filled, either (a) by the Board of Directors at any meeting, (i) if the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH, or (ii) if the Corporation does not have an Interested Stockholder, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the remaining directors, though less than a quorum; or (b) by the stockholders entitled to vote, either at an annual meeting or at a special meeting thereof called for the purpose, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the outstanding shares entitled to vote at such meeting.
 
SECTION 12.
.
Directors' Fees
 
The Board of Directors shall have authority to determine from time to time the amount of compensation which shall be paid to its members for attendance at meetings of the Board or of any committee of the Board.
 
SECTION 13. Any action required or permitted to be taken at any meeting of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof may be taken without a meeting if all members of the Board or committee, as the case may be, consent thereto in writing, and the writing or writings are filed with the minutes of proceedings of the Board or committee.
.
Action Without a Meeting
 
 
 
SECTION 1.
.
Audit Committee
 
In addition to any committees appointed pursuant to Section 2 of this Article, there shall be an Audit Committee, appointed annually by the Board of Directors, consisting of at least three directors who are not members of management. It shall be the responsibility of the Audit Committee to review the scope and results of the annual independent audit of books and records of the Corporation and its subsidiaries and to discharge such other responsibilities as may from time to time be assigned to it by the Board of Directors. The Audit Committee shall meet at such times and places as the members deem advisable, and shall make such recommendations to the Board of Directors as they consider appropriate.
 
SECTION 2.
.
Other Committees
 
2.1 The Board of Directors may appoint standing or temporary committees and invest such committees with such powers as it may see fit, with power to subdelegate such powers if deemed desirable by the Board of Directors; but no such committee shall have the power or authority of the Board of Directors to adopt, amend, or repeal the By-Laws of the Corporation or approve, adopt or recommend to the stockholders of the Corporation any action or matter expressly required by the Certificate of Incorporation, these By-Laws or the Delaware General Corporation Law to be submitted to stockholders for approval.
.
Committee Powers
 
2.2 The Board of Directors may designate one or more directors as alternate members of any committee, who may replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of the committee. In the absence or disqualification of a member of a committee, the member or members thereof present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, whether or not such member or members constitute a quorum, may unanimously appoint another member of the Board to act at the meeting in the place of any such absent or disqualified member.
.
Committee Members
 
SECTION 3.
.
Quorum and Manner of Acting
 
A majority of the number of directors composing any committee of the Board of Directors, as established and fixed by resolution of the Board of Directors, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at any meeting of such committee but, if less than a majority are present at a meeting, a majority of such directors present may adjourn the meeting from time to time without further notice. The act of a majority of the members of a committee present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of such committee.
 
 
 
SECTION 1.
.
Officers
 
The elected officers of the Corporation shall be a Chairman of the Board (who shall be a director) and, at the discretion of the Board, a President (who shall be a director), and one or more Vice Presidents (each of whom may be assigned by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer an additional title descriptive of the functions assigned to such officer and one or more of whom may be designated Executive or Senior Vice President). The Board may also elect one or more Vice Chairmen. The Board of Directors shall also designate either the Chairman of the Board or the President as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation. The Board of Directors shall appoint a Controller, a Secretary, and a Treasurer. Any number of offices, whether elective or appointive, may be held by the same person. The Chief Executive Officer may, by a writing filed with the Secretary, designate titles as officers for employees and agents and appoint Assistant Secretaries and Assistant Treasurers, as, from time to time, may appear to be necessary or advisable in the conduct of the affairs of the Corporation and may, in the same manner, terminate or change such titles.
 
SECTION 2.
.
Term of Office
 
So far as practicable, all elected officers shall be elected at the annual meeting of the Board in each year, and shall hold office until the annual meeting of the Board in the next subsequent year and until their respective successors are chosen. The Controller, Secretary, and Treasurer shall hold office at the pleasure of the Board.
 
SECTION 3.
.
Salaries of Elected Officers
 
The salaries paid to the elected officers of the Corporation shall be authorized or approved by the Board of Directors.
 
SECTION 4.
.
Bonuses
 
None of the officers, directors, or employees of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations shall at any time be paid any bonus or share in the earnings or profits of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations except pursuant to a plan approved by affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members of the Board of Directors.
 
SECTION 5.
.
Removal of Elected and Appointed Officers
 
Any elected or appointed officer may be removed at any time, either for or without cause, by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors, at any meeting called for the purpose.
 
SECTION 6.
.
Vacancies
 
If any vacancy occurs in any office, the Board of Directors may elect or appoint a successor to fill such vacancy for the remainder of the term.
 
 
 
SECTION 1.
.
Chairman of the Board
 
The Chairman of the Board shall preside, when present, at all meetings of the stockholders (except as otherwise provided by statute) and at all meetings of the Board of Directors. The Chairman shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation; to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the Chairman by the Board of Directors.
 
SECTION 2.
.
President
 
The President shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation and to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; during the absence or disability of the Chairman of the Board to exercise the Chairman's powers and to perform the Chairman's duties; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the President by the Board of Directors; provided, that if the office of President is vacant, the Chairman shall exercise the duties ordinarily exercised by the President until such time as a President is elected or appointed.
 
SECTION 3.
.
Chief Executive Officer
 
The officer designated by the Board of Directors as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation shall have general and active control of its business and affairs. The Chief Executive Officer shall have general power to appoint or designate all employees and agents of the Corporation whose appointment or designation is not otherwise provided for and to fix the compensation thereof, subject to the provisions of these By-Laws; to remove or suspend any employee or agent who shall not have been elected or appointed by the Board of Directors or other body; to suspend for cause any employee, agent, or officer, other than an elected officer, pending final action by the body which shall have appointed such employee, agent, or officer; and to exercise all the powers usually pertaining to the office held by the Chief Executive Officer of a corporation.
 
SECTION 4.
.
Vice Presidents and Controller
 
The several Vice Presidents and the Controller shall perform all such duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of them, from time to time, by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer, respectively.
 
SECTION 5.
Secretary
.
 
The Secretary shall attend to the giving of notice of all meetings of stockholders and of the Board of Directors and shall keep and attest true records of all proceedings thereat. The Secretary shall have charge of the corporate seal and have authority to attest any and all instruments or writings to which the same may be affixed and shall keep and account for all books, documents, papers, and records of the Corporation relating to its corporate organization. The Secretary shall have authority to sign stock certificates and shall generally perform all the duties usually appertaining to the office of secretary of a corporation. In the absence of
 
the Secretary, an Assistant Secretary or Secretary pro tempore shall perform the duties of the Secretary.
 
SECTION 6.
.
Treasurer
 
The Treasurer shall have the care and custody of all moneys, funds, and securities of the Corporation, and shall deposit or cause to be deposited all funds of the Corporation in accordance with directions or authorizations of the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer. The Treasurer shall have power to sign stock certificates, to indorse for deposit or collection, or otherwise, all checks, drafts, notes, bills of exchange, or other commercial paper payable to the Corporation, and to give proper receipts or discharges therefor. In the absence of the Treasurer, an Assistant Treasurer shall perform the duties of the Treasurer.
 
SECTION 7.
.
Additional Powers and Duties
 
In addition to the foregoing especially enumerated duties and powers, the several officers of the Corporation shall perform such other duties and exercise such further powers as may be provided in these By-Laws or as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine, or as may be assigned to them by any superior officer.
 
SECTION 8.
.
Disaster Emergency Powers of Acting Officers
 
If, as a result of a disaster or other state of emergency, the Chief Executive Officer is unable to perform the duties of that office, (a) the powers and duties of the Chief Executive Officer shall be performed by the employee with the highest base salary who shall be available and capable of performing such powers and duties and, if more than one such employee has the same base salary, by the employee whose surname begins with the earliest letter of the alphabet among the group of those employees with the same base salary; and (b) the officer performing such duties shall continue to perform such powers and duties until the Chief Executive Officer becomes capable of performing those duties or until the Board of Directors shall have elected a new Chief Executive Officer or designated another individual as Acting Chief Executive Officer; and (c) such officer shall have the power in addition to all other powers granted to the Chief Executive Officer by these By-Laws and by the Board of Directors to appoint an acting President, acting Vice President - Finance, acting Controller, acting Secretary, and acting Treasurer, if any of the persons duly elected to any such office is not by reason of such disaster or emergency able to perform the duties of such office, each of such acting appointees to serve in such capacities until the officer for whom the appointee is acting becomes capable of performing the duties of such office or until the Board of Directors shall have designated another individual to perform such duties or have elected another person to fill such office; and (d) any such acting officer so appointed shall be entitled to exercise all powers vested by the By-Laws or the Board of Directors in the duly elected officer for whom the acting officer is acting; and (e) anyone transacting business with this Corporation may rely upon a certification by any two officers of the Corporation that a specified individual has succeeded to the powers of the Chief Executive Officer and that such person has appointed other acting officers as herein provided and any person, firm, corporation, or other entity to which such certification has been delivered by such officers may continue to rely upon it until notified of a change in writing signed by two officers of this Corporation.
 
 
 
SECTION 1.
.
Stock Certificates
 
Every stockholder shall be entitled to a certificate, signed by the Chairman of the Board or the President or a Vice President and the Treasurer or an Assistant Treasurer or the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary, certifying the number of shares owned by the stockholder in the Corporation. Any and all of the signatures on a certificate may be a facsimile. If any officer, transfer agent, or registrar who has signed or whose facsimile signature has been placed upon a certificate shall have ceased to be such officer, transfer agent, or registrar before such certificate is issued, it may be issued by the Corporation with the same effect as if he or she were such officer, transfer agent, or registrar at the date of issue.
 
SECTION 2.
.
Transfer Agents and Registrars
 
The Board of Directors may, in its discretion, appoint responsible banks or trust companies in the Borough of Manhattan, in the City of New York, State of New York, and in such other city or cities as the Board may deem advisable, from time to time, to act as transfer agents and registrars of the stock of the Corporation; and, when such appointments shall have been made, no stock certificate shall be valid until countersigned by one of such transfer agents and registered by one of such registrars.
 
SECTION 3.
.
Transfers of Stock
 
Shares of stock may be transferred by delivery of the certificates therefor, accompanied either by an assignment in writing on the back of the certificates or by written power of attorney to sell, assign, and transfer the same, signed by the record holder thereof; but no transfer shall affect the right of the Corporation to pay any dividend upon the stock to the holder of record thereof, or to treat the holder of record as the holder in fact thereof for all purposes, and no transfer shall be valid, except between the parties thereto, until such transfer shall have been made upon the books of the Corporation.
 
SECTION 4.
.
Lost Certificates
 
The Board of Directors may provide for the issuance of new certificates of stock to replace certificates of stock lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, or alleged to be lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, upon such terms and in accordance with such procedures as the Board of Directors shall deem proper and prescribe.
 
 
 
SECTION 1.
Fiscal Year
.
 
The fiscal year of the Corporation shall be the calendar year.
 
SECTION 2. (Repealed in its entirety by vote of the stockholders, May 5, 1975.)
 
SECTION 3.
.
Signing of Negotiable Instruments
 
All bills, notes, checks, or other instruments for the payment of money shall be signed or countersigned by such officer or officers and in such manner as from time to time may be prescribed by resolution (whether general or special) of the Board of Directors.
 
SECTION 4.
.
Indemnification of Directors and Officers
 
4.1 Each person who was or is made a party or is threatened to be made a party to or is otherwise involved (including, without limitation, as a witness) in any actual or threatened action, suit, or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative, or investigative (hereinafter a "proceeding"), by reason of the fact that he or she is or was a director or officer of the Corporation or that, being or having been such a director or officer or an employee of the Corporation, he or she is or was serving at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation as a director, officer, employee, or agent of another corporation or of a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise, including service with respect to an employee benefit plan (hereinafter an "indemnitee"), whether the basis of such proceeding is alleged action in an official capacity as such a director, officer, employee, or agent or in any other capacity while serving as such a director, officer, employee, or agent, shall be indemnified and held harmless by the Corporation to the full extent permitted by the Delaware General Corporation Law, as the same exists or may hereafter be amended (but, in the case of any such amendment, only to the extent that such amendment permits the Corporation to provide broader indemnification rights than permitted prior thereto), or by other applicable law as then in effect, against all expense, liability, and loss (including attorneys' fees, judgments, fines, ERISA excise taxes or penalties, and amounts paid in settlement) actually and reasonably incurred or suffered by such indemnitee in connection therewith and such indemnification shall continue as to an indemnitee who has ceased to be a director, officer, employee, or agent and shall inure to the benefit of the indemnitee's heirs, executors, and administrators; , , that except as provided in Section 4.2 with respect to proceedings seeking to enforce rights to indemnification, the Corporation shall indemnify any such indemnitee in connection with a proceeding (or part thereof) initiated by such indemnitee only if such proceeding (or part thereof) was authorized or ratified by the Board of Directors of the Corporation. The right to indemnification conferred in this Section 4.1 shall be a contract right and shall include the right to be paid by the Corporation the expenses incurred in defending any such proceeding in advance of its final disposition (hereinafter an "advancement of expenses"); , , that an advancement of expenses incurred by an indemnitee in his or her capacity as a director or officer (and not in any other capacity in which service was or is rendered by such indemnitee, including, without limitation, service to an employee benefit plan) shall be made only upon delivery to the Corporation of an under-taking (hereinafter an "undertaking"), by or on behalf of such indemnitee, to repay all amounts so advanced if it shall ultimately be determined by final judicial decision from which there is no further right to appeal that such indemnitee is not entitled to be indemnified for such expenses under this Section 4.1 or otherwise; and , , that an advancement of expenses shall not be made if the Corporation's Board of Directors makes a good faith determination that such payment would violate law or public policy.
.
Right to Indemnification
provided
however
provided
however
provided
further
 
4.2 If a claim under Section 4.1 is not paid in full by the Corporation within sixty days after a written claim has been received by the Corporation, except in the case of a claim for an advancement of expenses, in which case the applicable period shall be twenty days, the indemnitee may at any time thereafter bring suit against the Corporation to recover the unpaid amount of the claim. If successful in whole or in part in any such suit, or in a suit brought by the Corporation to recover an advancement of expenses pursuant to the terms of an undertaking, the indemnitee shall also be entitled to be paid the expense of prosecuting or defending such suit. The indemnitee shall be presumed to be entitled to indemnification under this Section 4 upon submission of a written claim (and, in an action brought to enforce a claim for an advancement of expenses, where the required undertaking has been tendered to the Corporation), and thereafter the Corporation shall have the burden of proof to overcome the presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled. Neither the failure of the Corporation (including its Board of Directors, independent legal counsel, or its stockholders) to have made a determination prior to the commencement of such suit that indemnification of the indemnitee is proper in the circumstances, nor an actual determination by the Corporation (including its Board of Directors, independent legal counsel, or its stockholders) that the indemnitee is not entitled to indemnification shall be a defense to the suit or create a presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled.
.
Right of Indemnitee to Bring Suit
 
4.3 The rights to indemnification and to the advancement of expenses conferred in this Section 4 shall not be exclusive of any other right which any person may have or hereafter acquire under any statute, provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation, By-Laws, agreement, vote of stockholders or disinterested directors, or otherwise. Notwithstanding any amendment to or repeal of this Section 4, or of any of the procedures established by the Board of Directors pursuant to Section 4.7, any indemnitee shall be entitled to indemnification in accordance with the provisions hereof and thereof with respect to any acts or omissions of such indemnitee occurring prior to such amendment or repeal.
.
Nonexclusivity of Rights
 
4.4 The Corporation may maintain insurance, at its expense, to protect itself and any director, officer, employee, or agent of the Corporation or another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise against any expense, liability, or loss, whether or not the Corporation would have the power to indemnify such person against such expense, liability, or loss under the Delaware General Corporation Law. The Corporation may, without further stockholder approval, enter into contracts with any indemnitee in furtherance of the provisions of this Section 4 and may create a trust fund, grant a security interest, or use other means (including, without limitation, a letter of credit) to ensure the payment of such amounts as may be necessary to effect indemnification as provided in this Section 4.
.
Insurance, Contracts, and Funding
 
4.5 Any person who is or was a director, officer, or employee of the Corporation who is or was serving (i) as a director or officer of another corporation of which a majority of the shares entitled to vote in the election of its directors is held by the Corporation or (ii) in an executive or management capacity in a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise of which the Corporation or a wholly owned subsidiary of the Corporation is a general partner or has a majority ownership shall be deemed to be so serving
.
Persons Serving Other Entities
 
at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation and entitled to indemnification and advancement of expenses under Section 4.1.
 
4.6 The Corporation may, by action of its Board of Directors, authorize one or more executive officers to grant rights to advancement of expenses to employees or agents of the Corporation on such terms and conditions as such officer or officers deem appropriate under the circumstances. The Corporation may, by action of its Board of Directors, grant rights to indemnification and advancement of expenses to employees or agents or groups of employees or agents of the Corporation with the same scope and effect as the provisions of this Section 4 with respect to the indemnification and advancement of expenses of directors and officers of the Corporation; , , that an undertaking shall be made by an employee or agent only if required by the Board of Directors.
.
Indemnification of Employees and Agents of the Corporation
provided
however
 
4.7 The Board of Directors may establish reasonable procedures for the submission of claims for indemnification pursuant to this Section 4, determination of the entitlement of any person thereto, and review of any such determination. Such procedures shall be set forth in an appendix to these By-Laws and shall be deemed for all purposes to be a part hereof.
.
Procedures for the Submission of Claims
 
SECTION 5.
.
Designated Engineer in the State of Washington
 
5.1 The Board of Directors, as required by the Revised Code of Washington, has appointed a licensed professional engineer in the State of Washington the Designated Engineer as being in responsible charge for the practice of engineering performed by the Corporation in Washington.
.
Appointment of Designated Engineer
 
5.2 The Board of Directors grants and delegates to the Designated Engineer the full authority to make all final engineering decisions on behalf of the Corporation with respect to engineering work performed in the State of Washington.
.
Grant of Authority to the Designated Engineer
 
5.3 The Board of Directors grants and delegates to the appropriate officers of the Corporation the authority to designate each successor Designated Engineer as being in responsible charge for the practice of engineering and to notify the Washington Board of Registration for Professional Engineers and Land Surveyors of the appointment of each successor Designated Engineer within 30 days after the effective date of the appointment.
.
Grant of Authority to Appropriate Officers
 
 
 
SECTION 1.
.
Amendment of the By-Laws: General
 
Except as herein otherwise expressly provided, the By-Laws of the Corporation may be altered or repealed in any particular and new By-Laws, not inconsistent with any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or any provision of law, may be adopted, either by the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority in number of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote at an annual meeting of stockholders or at a special meeting thereof, the notice of which special meeting shall include the form of the proposed alteration or repeal or of the proposed new By-Laws, or a summary thereof; or either
 
 
 
provided, in either of the latter cases, that the notice of such meeting shall include the form of the proposed alteration or repeal or of the proposed new By-Laws, or a summary thereof.
 
SECTION 2.
.
Amendments as to Compensation and Removal of Officers
 
Notwithstanding anything contained in these By-Laws to the contrary, the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the Voting Stock, as defined in Article FOURTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, at a meeting of the stockholders called for the purpose, shall be required to alter, amend, repeal, or adopt any provision inconsistent with Sections 3, 4 and 5 of Article IV hereof, notice of which meeting shall include the form of the proposed amendment, or a summary thereof.
 
SECTION 3.
.
Amendments as to Stockholders' Meetings, Directors
 
Notwithstanding anything contained in these By-Laws to the contrary, either (a) the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, or (b) the affirmative vote of the holders of record of at least seventy-five percent of the Voting Stock, as defined in Article FOURTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, shall be required to alter, amend, repeal, or adopt any provision inconsistent with Sections 1, 2, and 4 of Article I and Sections 1, 10, and 11 of Article II.
 
SECTION 4.
.
Amendment of this Article VIII
 
Notwithstanding anything contained in these By-Laws to the contrary, either (a) the recommendation of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, together with the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the Voting Stock, as defined in Article FOURTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, or (b) the affirmative vote of the holders of record of at least seventy-five percent of the Voting Stock, as defined in Article FOURTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, shall be required to alter, amend, repeal, or adopt any provision inconsistent with this Article VIII.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20051110171224.txt.gz
TIME:20051110171224
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
On November 4, 2005, the Compensation Committee (the "Committee") of the Board of Directors of The Boeing Company ("Boeing" or the "Company") approved changes to the Company's executive compensation program that generally will be implemented starting in 2006. These changes, which are described briefly in this report,are being made to increase our executives' focus on leadership, performance and business results. At the same time, these changes are designed to help ensure that the program continues to be competitive in the market and continues to align executives' interests with those of our shareholders, while reducing some of the program's complexity.
 
Annual Incentive Award Program
 
The Committee has adopted a change to the Company's annual incentive award program to provide that beginning with the 2006 performance year (for awards payable in 2007), any awards that may be earned for the performance year will be paid entirely in cash, instead of the current mix of cash and Boeing Stock Units.
 
Long-Term Incentive Awards Program
 
The Committee has adopted changes to the Company's long-term incentive awards program for 2006. The program will consist of a combination of awards  performance awards and stock options  that will replace the current performance share program and career share program. The Committee has the discretion to determine the grant mix of performance awards and stock options on an annual basis. Performance awards will be based on economic profit over three-year rolling performance periods with a payout opportunity of up to 200% of the target award with the intent to pay awards in stock. Specific target award opportunities will be determined by the Committee. The stock options will vest over three years (one-third each year) and have a ten-year term. Stock option grant guidelines will be determined by the Committee.
 
Deferred Compensation Plan for Employees of The Boeing Company
 
The Committee has adopted the following amendments to the Deferred Compensation Plan for Employees of the Company (the "DCP"), effective as of January 1, 2006 (or as of the earlier or later dates specified in the amendments).
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Participants may make a separate election with respect to each previous annual Performance Share deferral election. A participant who does not make an affirmative election will be deemed to have elected option (b)(i) above.
 
 
 
 
Participants may make a separate election with respect to each previous annual Performance Share deferral election. A participant who does not make an affirmative election will be deemed to have elected option (c)(i) above.
 
The foregoing summary of the amendments is qualified in its entirety by reference to the text of the amendments to the DCP, a copy of which is filed as an exhibit to this report.
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
Dated: November 10, 2005
 
 
 

EXHIBIT 99.1
 
 
RESOLVED, that pursuant to Section 8 of the Plan and resolutions of the Board of Directors dated April 27, 1998, delegating powers of amendment to this Committee, the Plan is hereby amended substantially as follows, effective as of January 1, 2006 (or as of such earlier or later dates specified herein):
 
1. By inserting the following paragraph after the second paragraph of Section 3 of the Plan:
 
"The annual enrollment deadline under this Section shall be extended from December 1, 2005 to December 15, 2005, with respect to elections otherwise due by December 1, 2005."
 
2. By adding the following paragraph to Section 4 of the Plan:
 
"Effective with respect to amounts deferred on or after January 1, 2006, (including amounts for which deferral elections are made prior to January 1, 2006) the Company will no longer provide any matching contribution under this Section 4 on any contributions deferred into a Stock Unit account; provided that in the case of deferrals that were the subject of an election to defer into a Stock Unit account made prior to January 1, 2005, the Company will continue to match such deferrals of Boeing Stock Units and Performance Share Awards that are not yet vested (upon vesting) and such deferrals of 2005 Annual Incentive Awards to be paid in 2006."
 
3. By adding the following paragraphs to the end of Section 5 of the Plan:
 
"Effective in May 2006, in addition to the Interest Credit and Stock Unit methods of allocating earnings on deferred amounts, a Participant may choose to diversify most of the Participant's deferrals by electing that the Participant's account be credited (or charged) with the expenses, income, gains and losses on investment funds similar to those offered under The Boeing Company Voluntary Investment Plan ("VIP") as designated by the Committee from time to time, pursuant to an election by the Participant to have the Participant's account credited as though the Participant had elected to invest in such funds in such increments as the Participant shall direct in accordance with rules to be established by the Committee or its delegates; provided that the Committee may disregard such elections in its discretion.
 
Deferrals eligible for diversification include:
 
 
 
 
 
 
Performance Shares that are unvested as of December 31, 2005, and deferred into the Stock Unit account shall not be eligible for diversification, even upon vesting. Matching contributions (except as described in (f) above) and LTIP (long-term incentive) awards also shall not be eligible for diversification."
 
4. By adding the following sentence to the end of the paragraph in Section 5 of the Plan titled "":
Special Election for Terminating Employees
 
"Effective as of January 1, 2006, the special one-time election for terminating employees under this Section 5 of the Plan shall no longer be available, and no such election received after December 31, 2005 will be effective."
 
5. By adding the following sentences after the fourth paragraph of Section 6 of the Plan:
 
"Notwithstanding the foregoing, effective for participants who terminate employment on or after January 1, 2006, a Participant may make a separate election as to the timing and form of distribution of (i) the Participant's Company matching contributions and (ii) the balance of the Participant's Plan accounts, and all matching contributions paid from such Participants' accounts shall be paid in whole shares of the Company's common stock. No fractional shares shall be distributed and any account balance remaining after a stock distribution shall be paid in cash or applied to federal withholding."
 
6. By adding the following section as new Section 6A to the Plan:
 
"6A. . Notwithstanding any provision of the Plan to the contrary, deferrals of long-term incentive awards shall be further subject to the following:
Special Rules for Deferrals of Long-Term Incentive Awards
 
 
 
 
 
 
Participants may make a separate election under (b)(i), (ii), or (iii) above with respect to each previous annual Performance Share deferral election. A Participant who does not make an affirmative election will be deemed to have elected option (b)(i) above.
 
 
 
 
Participants may make a separate election under (c)(i) or (ii) above with respect to each previous annual Performance Share deferral election. A Participant who does not make an affirmative election will be deemed to have elected option (c)(i) above."
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20051123151413.txt.gz
TIME:20051123151413
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
 
1.    364-Day Revolving Credit Agreement.
 
On November 18, 2005, we entered into a $1.5 billion, 364-day revolving credit agreement (the "364-Day Credit Agreement"), replacing an earlier $2.0 billion credit agreement with Citigroup Global Markets Inc. and J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. as joint lead arrangers and joint book managers, JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. as syndication Agent and Citibank, N.A. as administrative agent, and a syndicate of lenders as defined in the 364-Day Credit Agreement.
 
Borrowings under the 364-Day Credit Agreement (that are not based on Eurodollar rates) bear interest at an annual rate based on the "base rate" of interest in effect plus the applicable margin and applicable utilization fees payable quarterly in arrears as defined in the 364-Day Credit Agreement. The "base rate" of interest is the higher of (i) the base rate announced publicly by Citibank, N.A., from time to time and (ii) the Federal Funds Rate plus 0.50%. The applicable margin will vary depending upon our credit rating and whether the payment is made before or after the termination date. For payments made before the termination date, the applicable margin may vary from a low of 0.070% to a high of 0.475%. The applicable utilization fee varies between 0.050% and 0.150% depending on our credit rating and applies on any date the aggregate principal amount of outstanding advances exceeds 50% of the aggregate commitments.
 
The 364-Day Credit Agreement contains customary terms and conditions, including certain financial covenants that are substantially similar to those contained in the previous facility, including, without limitation, covenants restricting our ability to incur liens, merge or consolidate with another entity. Further, the 364-Day Credit Agreement contains a covenant restricting our ability to permit consolidated debt (as defined in the 364-Day Credit Agreement) to exceed 60% of our total capital (as defined in the 364-Day Credit Agreement) until the Credit Agreement terminates and all amounts borrowed under the Credit Agreement are paid in full.
 
Some of the lenders under the 364-Day Credit Agreement and their affiliates have various relationships with us and our subsidiaries involving the provision of financial service, including cash management, investment banking, trust and leasing services. In addition, we and some of our subsidiaries have entered into foreign exchange and other derivative arrangements with certain of the lenders and their affiliates.
 
2.    Five-Year Revolving Credit Agreement.
 
On November 18, 2005, we entered into a $1.5 billion, five-year revolving credit agreement (the "Five-Year Credit Agreement"), replacing an earlier $1.5 billion credit agreement with Citigroup Global Markets Inc. and J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. as joint lead arrangers and joint book managers, JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. as syndication Agent and Citibank, N.A. as administrative agent, and a syndicate of lenders as defined in the Five-Year Credit Agreement.
 
Borrowings under the Five-Year Credit Agreement (that are not based on Eurodollar rates) bear interest at an annual rate based on the "base rate" of interest in effect plus the applicable margin and applicable utilization fees payable quarterly in arrears as defined in the Five-Year Credit Agreement. The "base rate" of interest is the higher of (i) the base rate announced publicly by Citibank, N.A., from time to time and (ii) the Federal Funds Rate plus 0.50%. The applicable margin will vary depending upon our credit rating and may vary from a low of 0.050% to a high of 0.450%. The applicable utilization fee varies between 0.050% and 0.150% depending on our credit rating and applies on any date the aggregate principal amount of outstanding advances exceeds 50% of the aggregate commitments.
 
The Five-Year Credit Agreement contains customary terms and conditions, including certain financial covenants that are substantially similar to those contained in the previous facility, including, without limitation, covenants restricting our ability to incur liens, merge or consolidate with another entity. Further, the Five-Year Credit Agreement contains a covenant restricting our ability to permit consolidated debt (as defined in the Five-Year Credit Agreement) to exceed 60% of our total capital (as defined in the Five-Year Credit Agreement) until the Credit Agreement terminates and all amounts borrowed under the Credit Agreement are paid in full.
 
Some of the lenders under the Five-Year Credit Agreement and their affiliates have various relationships with us and our subsidiaries involving the provision of financial service, including cash management, investment banking, trust and leasing services. In addition, we and some of our subsidiaries have entered into foreign exchange and other derivative arrangements with certain of the lenders and their affiliates.
 
Item 2.03. Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation Under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
 
The information described above under "Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement" with respect to the 364-Day Revolving Credit Agreement and the Five-Year Credit Agreement is hereby incorporated by reference.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20060201103416.txt.gz
TIME:20060201103416
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Disclosure of Results of Operations.
 
The following information is being furnished under Item 12 of Form 8-K: News Release by The Boeing Company, for the fourth quarter results and updated outlook as announced on February 1, 2006. The text of the release is attached as exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
(a) Not applicable
 
(b) Not applicable
 
(c) Exhibits
 
99.1    Press Release issued February 1, 2006.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
Boeing Fourth-Quarter Net Income More Than Doubles; EPS Outlook Raised
 
 
 
 
 
 
Table 1. Summary Financial Results
 
 
 The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] today reported significant growth in its fourth-quarter financial performance and provided guidance for 2006 and 2007 emphasizing its expectations for continued growth and margin expansion.
CHICAGO, Feb. 1, 2006
 
Boeing's fourth-quarter net income more than doubled to $460 million, or $0.58 per share, from $186 million, or $0.23, a year ago. Revenue increased 7 percent to $14.2 billion from $13.3 billion while operating margin increased to 3.8 percent from 0.2 percent.
 
For 2005, Boeing's net income increased to $2.6 billion, or $3.20 per share, from $1.9 billion, or $2.30 per share, in 2004. Revenue rose to $54.8 billion from $52.5 billion and operating margin rose to 5.1 percent from 3.8 percent. Revenue in 2005 grew 5 percent despite labor strikes at Commercial Airplanes and the company's launch business that reduced revenue by approximately $2.3 billion.
 
Building on progress made in 2005, Boeing is increasing its earnings per share guidance for 2006 to between $3.25 and $3.45. In 2007, earnings per share is projected to rise approximately 25 percent to between $4.10 and $4.30 on higher deliveries of commercial airplanes and company-wide productivity improvements. Further details on financial guidance are provided below.
 
"Our results and improved outlook reflect a strong commitment to growth, expanding margins and improving how we do business every day," said Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer Jim McNerney. "As we look ahead, that commitment will be reflected in a continued emphasis on driving results in our core business units and a new focus on a series of growth and productivity initiatives to leverage our capabilities, resources and talent across the entire company."
 
Boeing's fourth-quarter earnings from operations rose to $544 million from $28 million in the same quarter a year ago, and its operating cash flow grew by 80 percent to $2.4 billion. Free cash flow* was $1.9 billion for the quarter after an investment of $0.5 billion in property, plant & equipment (Table 2). For the year, operating earnings grew 40 percent to $2.8 billion and operating cash flow doubled to a record $7.0 billion. Free cash flow* was $5.5 billion, 140 percent higher than last year's $2.3 billion on strong earnings growth and working capital improvements.
 
Table 2. Cash Flow
 
 
Fourth quarter earnings per share of $0.58 includes a reduction of 16 cents for the previously disclosed non-cash pension charge related to the sale of Rocketdyne. Results for the year-ago quarter included a tax benefit of 12 cents per share and charges totaling 44 cents per share related to the U.S. Air Force 767 Tanker program and to complete 717 production. Without these items, adjusted earnings per share* would have been 74 cents in fourth quarter 2005 and 55 cents in the same quarter last year. Reconciliations of GAAP earnings per share to adjusted earnings per share are appended to this release.
 
Boeing's backlog at year end was a record $202 billion, up 19 percent from the end of the third quarter and 33 percent for the year. That growth primarily reflects the more than 1,000 commercial airplane orders received during the year.
 
Boeing's cash and investments in marketable securities totaled $8.4 billion at year end, up from $7.5 billion at the end of the third quarter (Table 3) and from $6.1 billion at the end of 2004. This reflected strong operating cash flow partially offset by the ongoing share repurchase program, pension plan contributions, and planned investment increases in Boeing's core businesses. The company repurchased 12.4 million shares during the quarter for $832 million and 45.2 million shares for $2.9 billion during the entire year, leaving 24.3 million shares available under the existing repurchase authorization. The company made no discretionary contributions to its pension plans during the quarter; contributions for all of 2005 totaled $1.9 billion. The funded status of the Company's pension plans improved to 96 percent in 2005.
 
The Boeing Company debt was unchanged from the end of the third quarter at $3.9 billion. Boeing Capital debt declined slightly to $6.2 billion as strong operating cash flow eliminated the need for new financing.
 
Table 3. Cash, Marketable Securities and Debt Balances
 
 
Segment Results
 
Commercial Airplanes
 
Boeing Commercial Airplanes' contractual backlog rose 37 percent during the quarter and 89 percent for the full year to $124 billion, reflecting 388 gross orders during the quarter  including 18 that launched the 747-8 program  and 1,029 for the year. From the 787 Dreamliner program launch to the end of 2005, 27 customers had booked a total of 379 orders and commitments for the new airplane, including 291 firm orders.
 
Revenues for the fourth quarter increased 8 percent to $5.9 billion on higher airplane deliveries, a favorable model mix and higher spares revenue (Table 4). Operating margins were 5.6 percent, reflecting higher revenues partially offset by planned increases in research and development expense. The tanker and 717 related items mentioned above led to a negative operating margin for 2004's fourth quarter. Airplane deliveries totaled 73 units, eight fewer than originally planned due to residual effects of the September labor strike, which reduced results by an estimated 8 cents in the quarter.
 
For the year, revenues rose 8 percent to $22.7 billion on higher deliveries, increased spares and services sales, and higher used aircraft sales. Deliveries for the year totaled 290 airplanes. Operating earnings grew 90 percent to $1.4 billion.
 
Table 4. Commercial Airplanes Operating Results
 
 
Integrated Defense Systems
 
Boeing Integrated Defense Systems (IDS) revenues increased 7 percent in the quarter to $8.1 billion due to strong growth in Aircraft & Weapon Systems and Support Systems segments (Table 5). Operating margins increased to 11.4 percent from 8.9 percent driven by double-digit performance in these segments. A strike at IDS's launch business and lower revenue from proprietary programs reduced fourth-quarter revenue by nearly $700 million below previous expectations.
 
For the year, IDS achieved record revenue, earnings and margins. Revenues rose 1 percent to $30.8 billion, operating earnings rose 33 percent to $3.9 billion, and operating margins increased to 12.6 percent, up from 9.6 percent a year ago. Full year operating earnings include a pre-tax gain of $569 million from the sale of Rocketdyne, without which IDS's operating margin would have been an industry-leading 10.8%.
 
Aircraft & Weapon Systems revenues increased 18 percent to $3.1 billion for the quarter, primarily due to the delivery mix and timing of C-17 and other aircraft programs. Operating margins were 16.5 percent driven by strong performance across key programs including C-17, F/A-18 and Rotorcraft.
 
Network Systems revenues declined to $2.9 billion on lower volume on Ground-based Midcourse Defense, Homeland Security and Proprietary programs that was partially offset by increased activity in Future Combat Systems (FCS) and Airborne Command & Control programs. Operating margins fell to 5.7 percent, as lower missile defense and Airborne Early Warning & Control earnings from revised cost and fee estimates offset higher earnings from programs with increased revenues identified above.
 
Table 5. Integrated Defense Systems Operating Results
 
 
Support Systems revenues rose 14 percent to $1.6 billion driven by increased volume in Integrated Support Services for Special Operations Forces, C-17, C-130 and F-15K. Operating margins were 14.2 percent, up from 13.2 percent during the same period in 2004.
 
Launch and Orbital Systems revenues declined 18 percent to $0.5 billion due primarily to the strike affecting the launch business during the quarter. Operating margins rose to 4.2 percent due to higher contract values for Delta IV launch contracts in 2005 and revised cost and fee estimates in 2004.
 
As previously announced, IDS is reorganizing into 3 new business segments. This new structure will more effectively address evolving customer requirements for capability-driven solutions and improve productivity.
 
IDS's total backlog continues to be the largest in the industry at $77.6 billion. Contractual backlog grew to $37.9 billion, up from $35.5 billion at the end of the third quarter. Unobligated backlog was $39.7 billion at the end of the fourth quarter. Total IDS backlog, comprised of contractual and unobligated, was down 1 percent from the end of the third quarter and down 10 percent from a year earlier.
 
Boeing Capital Corporation
 
Boeing Capital Corporation (BCC) continued to support the operations of Boeing's business units and reduce portfolio risk. Revenues for the fourth quarter grew 5 percent to $238 million on favorable dispositions and restructurings. Pre-tax income rose 14 percent to $40 million on higher revenues and lower asset impairment charges.
 
For the year, pre-tax income grew 27 percent (Table 6). BCC's year-end portfolio balance was $9.2 billion, unchanged from the end of the third quarter and down $0.5 billion for the year as normal portfolio run-off and depreciation more than offset new business volume. BCC contributed $120 million in cash dividends to the company during the quarter and $338 million for the year. BCC recorded leverage of 5.0-to-1, as measured by the ratio of debt-to-equity.
 
Table 6. Boeing Capital Corporation Operating Results
 
 
Additional Information
 
The "Other" segment consists primarily of Boeing Technology and Connexion by Boeing
SM
, as well as certain results related to the consolidation of all business units. For the fourth quarter, losses from operations narrowed to $60 million from $162 million last year, due primarily to lower expenses in Boeing Technology in 2005 and asset write-downs in 2004.
 
Pre-tax (non-cash) pension expense for the quarter was $451 million, up $330 million or $0.26 per share from the same period of 2004. This includes a pre-tax, non-cash pension charge of $228 million from the Rocketdyne sale. Share-based-plans expense was $160 million, up $33 million from the same period of 2004. Deferred stock compensation expense was $50 million, or $0.04 per share, as Boeing's stock price rose during the period.
 
Outlook
 
The company is forecasting solid growth in 2006 and 2007 that reflects continued strong performance from its core businesses, higher commercial airplane deliveries and productivity gains across the company. (Table 7).
 
Boeing's 2006 revenue is expected to be approximately $60 billion, which is below prior estimates due solely to a previously disclosed accounting change in our commercial airplane business. Revenue guidance for 2007 is established at $63.5 billion to $64.5 billion.
 
Earnings per share guidance for 2006 is being increased to between $3.25 and $3.45, from $3.10 to $3.30 previously forecasted, due to better operating performance and a lower deferred tax charge in the first quarter of 2006 than previously expected. This new outlook indicates an increase of approximately 5% over 2005, on GAAP basis, and approximately 40% over 2005 adjusted earnings per share* of 2.39. Boeing expects further EPS growth in 2007, with guidance of between $4.10 and $4.30 per share.
 
The company is maintaining its 2006 operating cash flow guidance at greater than $5.5 billion, and is setting its 2007 operating cash flow guidance at greater than $5.5 billion.
 
As noted above, Boeing Commercial Airplanes (BCA) is changing its method of accounting for supplier concession sharing agreements beginning in 2006. It will no longer record concession reimbursements received from suppliers as "Sales and other operating revenues." Instead those will be reflected as a reduction to "Cost of products and services." This accounting change reduced BCA's 2006 revenue guidance by nearly $2 billion, but had only a nominal impact on expected operating earnings. Guidance for 2006 and 2007 now includes this change.
 
The guidance does not include the impact of the pending United Launch Alliance (ULA) transaction. Launch & Orbital Systems revenue guidance for 2006 includes approximately $1 billion for business planned to be part of ULA. Upon completion of the transaction, Boeing will use the equity method of accounting for this new joint venture, recognizing Boeing's proportionate share of the venture's earnings in the Launch & Orbital Systems segment.
 
The commercial airplane outlook is very strong. The 2006 delivery forecast remains approximately 395 airplanes, 36 percent higher than in 2005, while 2007
 
deliveries are expected to increase to between 440 and 445 airplanes. BCA revenue for 2006 is expected to be approximately $27.5 billion, with operating margins greater than 9 percent, while revenue for 2007 is expected to be between $29.5 billion to $30.5 billion, with operating margins greater than 10 percent. The 2006 delivery forecast is completely sold out while the forecast for 2007 is more than 92 percent sold out.
 
IDS revenues for 2006 are expected to be approximately $31.5 billion, with operating margins of approximately 10.5 percent. For 2007, IDS expects 2 to 5 percent revenue growth and operating margins above 10.5 percent.
 
Within IDS, Aircraft & Weapon Systems expects revenues of approximately $12.5 billion and operating margins of approximately 13 percent in 2006, with a stable outlook for 2007 and operating margins continuing in the low double-digit range. Network Systems expects revenues of approximately $10.5 billion and margins of approximately 8 percent, with a moderate growth outlook for 2007. Support Systems expects revenue to be approximately $6 billion in 2006 with operating margins of about 13 percent, with moderate revenue growth in 2007 and operating margins continuing in the low double-digit range. Launch & Orbital Systems expects 2006 revenues of about $2.5 billion and operating margins of about 2 percent, with a stable outlook for 2007.
 
IDS is reorganizing into 3 new segments: Precision Engagement and Mobility Systems, Networks and Space Systems, and Support Systems. We expect to begin reporting through these new segments when we report financial results for the first quarter of 2006.
 
Boeing's research and development investment is expected to be between $2.6 billion and $2.8 billion in 2006 and between $2.7 billion and $2.9 billion in 2007, reflecting continued investment in planned product development programs. Annual capital expenditures should be approximately $1.6 billion in 2006 and $1.5 billion in 2007.
 
The company's non-cash pension expense is expected to be approximately $1 billion for 2006 and for 2007. Pension cash funding is expected to be approximately $500 million in each of those years. The company will continue to evaluate making additional discretionary contributions to its pension plans.
 
Table 7. Financial Outlook
 
 
Non-GAAP Measure Disclosure
 
Management believes that the non-GAAP (Generally Accepted Accounting Principles) measures (indicated by an asterisk *) used in this report provide investors with important perspectives into the company's ongoing business performance. The company does not intend for the information to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the related GAAP measure. Other companies may define the measure differently. The following definitions are provided for free cash flow and adjusted earnings per share.
 
Free Cash Flow
 
Free cash flow is defined as GAAP operating cash flow less capital expenditures for property, plant, and equipment, additions. Management believes free cash flow provides investors with an important perspective on the cash available for shareholders, debt repayment, and acquisitions after making the capital investments required to support ongoing business operations and long term value creation. Free cash flow does not represent the residual cash flow available for discretionary expenditures as it excludes certain mandatory expenditures such as repayment of maturing debt. Management uses free cash flow internally to assess both business performance and overall liquidity. Table 2 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and free cash flow.
 
Adjusted earnings per share
 
Adjusted earnings per share is defined as diluted earnings per share computed in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles adjusted for certain significant charges or credits. Management believes adjusted earnings per share are important to understanding the company's on-going operations and provide additional insights into underlying business performance. Significant charges or credits are described in the attachments to this release which provide reconciliations between GAAP earnings per share and adjusted earnings per share.
 
 
Certain statements in this report may constitute "forward-looking" statements within the meaning of the Private Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions as to future events that may not prove to be accurate. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak only as of the date they were made and we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise. Our actual results and future trends may differ materially depending on a variety of factors, including the continued operation, viability and growth of major airline customers and non-airline customers (such as the U.S. Government); adverse developments in the value of collateral securing customer and other financings; the occurrence of any significant collective bargaining labor dispute; our successful execution of internal performance plans including our company-wide growth and productivity initiatives, production rate increases and decreases (including any reduction in or termination of an aircraft product), acquisition and divestiture plans, and other cost-reduction and productivity efforts; charges from any future SFAS No. 142 review; an adverse development in rating agency credit ratings or assessments; the actual outcomes of certain pending sales campaigns and the launch of the 787 program and U.S. and foreign government procurement activities, including the uncertainty associated with the procurement of tankers by the U.S. Department of Defense (DoD) and funding of the C-17 program; the cyclical nature of some of our businesses; unanticipated financial market changes which may impact pension plan assumptions; domestic and international competition in the defense, space and commercial areas; continued integration of acquired businesses; performance issues with key suppliers, subcontractors and customers; significant disruption to air travel worldwide (including future terrorist attacks); global trade policies; worldwide political stability; domestic and international economic conditions; price escalation; the outcome of political and legal processes, changing priorities or reductions in the U.S. Government or foreign government defense and space budgets; termination of government or commercial contracts due to unilateral government or customer action or failure to perform; legal, financial and governmental risks related to international transactions; legal and investigatory proceedings; tax settlements with the IRS and various states; U.S. Air Force review of previously awarded contracts; and other economic, political and technological risks and uncertainties. Additional information regarding these factors is contained in our SEC filings, including, without limitation, our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2004 and Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q for the quarters ended March 31, 2005, June 30, 2005 and September 30, 2005.
 
 
Cxxxx
 
Contact:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
In addition to disclosing results that are determined in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), the company also discloses non-GAAP results that exclude certain significant charges or credits that are important to an understanding of the company's ongoing operations. The company provides reconciliations of its non-GAAP financial reporting to the most comparable GAAP reporting. The company believes that discussion of results excluding certain significant charges or credits provides additional insights into underlying business performance. Adjusted earnings per share is not a measure recognized under GAAP. The determination of significant charges or credits may not be comparable to similarly titled measures used by other companies and may vary from quarter to quarter.
 
 
In addition to disclosing results that are determined in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), the company also discloses non-GAAP results that exclude certain significant charges or credits that are important to an understanding of the company's ongoing operations. The company provides reconciliations of its non-GAAP financial reporting to the most comparable GAAP reporting. The company believes that discussion of results excluding certain significant charges or credits provides additional insights into underlying business performance. Adjusted earnings per share is not a measure recognized under GAAP. The determination of significant charges or credits may not be comparable to similarly titled measures used by other companies and may vary from quarter to quarter.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20060202060638.txt.gz
TIME:20060202060638
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
On February 1, 2006, The Boeing Company held a conference call and posted a slide presentation on its website, each relating to the Company's results of operations for the fourth-quarter and year-ended December 31, 2005. The transcript from the conference call is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and the slide presentation is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.2.
 
 
(a) Not applicable
 
(b) Not applicable
 
(c) Exhibits
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
PRESENTATION
 
Operator
 
Good day, everyone and welcome to The Boeing Company's 2005 fourth quarter and full year results conference call. [OPERATOR INSTRUCTIONS] At this time for opening remarks and introductions, I am turning the call over to Mr. David Dohnalek, Vice President of Investor Relations for the Boeing Company. Mr. Dohnalek please go ahead.
 
Dave Dohnalek -
The Boeing Company - VP IR
 
Thank you very much. Good morning and welcome to Boeing's fourth quarter and full year 2005 earnings call. I'm Dave Dohnalek. And with me today are Jim McNerney, Boeing's Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, and James Bell, Boeing's Chief Financial Officer. After brief comments from Jim and James we will take your questions. And in the interest of time we ask that you limit yourself to one question.
 
As always, we've provided detailed financial information in our press release issued earlier today. And as a reminder, you can follow today's broadcast and slide presentation through our Website at boeing.com. Before we begin, I need to remind you that any projections and goals we may include in our discussions this morning are likely to involve risks. Those risks are detailed in the news release we issued this morning, in our various SEC filings and in the forward-looking statement at the end of this Web presentation. Now, I will turn the meeting over to Jim McNerney.
 
Jim McNerney -
The Boeing Company - Chairman, CEO, President and Member of Special Programs Committee
 
Thanks, Dave and good morning. Let me begin with a few comments about our 2005 performance and then James will walk you through the numbers. After that I'll, say a few words about the road ahead and take your questions. Slide two, please. Boeing made great progress in 05, which has given us a solid foundation for even better performance in 2006 and beyond. We executed on our plans and improved our financial results across the board with higher revenues, margin expansion and strong earnings growth.
 
Most notably, we generated a record 7 billion of operating cash flow during the year, and that's after investing in our growth programs and contributing 1.9 billion to our pension plans. We also raised our dividend 20%, reduced debt and repurchased more than 45 million shares. We continue to deliver value through our balanced approach to cash deployment. Of course, our strong cash flow was due in part to the tremendous order flow last year. Boeing had a record year for commercial airplane orders, which drove a 33% growth in our total backlog to a record of over 200 billion.
 
Looking at the industry environment, we continue to be well positioned in healthy markets. The commercial airplane business is set to grow robustly over the next few years, driven by significant demand for airplanes in key growth markets around the world. Our defense business had a record year in 05, and we still see a great opportunity for sustained outstanding margin performance in that business. Though we do expect defense growth to moderate due to a tightening budget environment. To more effectively address evolving customer requirements for capability-driven solutions and improved productivity, IDS announced last week a significant reorganization, which I'll touch in a minute, that had the effect of consolidating operations into three new business segments.
 
We made great progress on our development programs in 05 as well. We continue to invest in key growth programs such as the 787, future combat systems, the P-8A Multimission Maritime Aircraft. We also launched the new 747-8 program during the year, along with new members of the 777 and 737 families. Investing in future growth is a top priority for us. As part of that, we are taking very concrete steps to drive sustained growth in productivity throughout this Company. I will explain more about our plans and specific initiatives in this area in just a few minutes.
 
Driven by the positive momentum in our business, we are raising our earnings per share guidance for 2006. And we are forecasting significant additional EPS growth for 2007. Now, let me turn it over to James to provide more detail on our financial results and our outlook.
James Bell -
The Boeing Company - CFO
 
James. Thank you, Jim, and good morning. We delivered solid top-line performance and significant earnings and cash flow growth in 2005. Total Company revenues grew 5% to $54.8 billion, driven by higher commercial airplane deliveries and record revenues in our defense business.
 
Earnings per share grew 39% to $3.20 in 2005, and operating cash flow nearly doubled to a record $7 billion. Revenue came in at about $700 million below previous guidance for the year. This was due to an ongoing strike in our launch business and lower revenues in IDS proprietary programs as we transitioned resources from a restructured program faster than expected. With respect to that strike, the workers are voting on a new contract today, and we're hopeful that they will ratify it. Despite these events, Boeing delivered strong bottom-line performance and outstanding cash flow.
 
Now, turning to our fourth quarter performance on slide four. Fourth quarter revenue grew 7%, driven by high single digit growth in each of our core businesses. We earned $0.58 per share in the quarter, more than double the earnings from the same period last year. Results this quarter included a one-time pension charge from the sell of Rocketdyne of $0.16 per share. Results from the same period of 2004 include charges totaling $0.44 per share related to the tanker program and the 717 program, as well as a tax benefit of $0.12 per share. So you can see, our core EPS grew at a very healthy rate of 35%.
 
Now, turning to the highlights from Commercial Airplanes on slide five. BCA delivered 73 airplanes in the fourth quarter and 290 for the year. Revenues grew 8% in the quarter and for the year driven by higher deliveries and growth in airplane service. Fourth quarter margins were 5.6%, as productivity improvements were somewhat offset by customer mix and increased raw material costs during the period. As a result, program margins exceeded unit margins in the quarter, reflecting the cumulative impact of these items on the current production block.
 
For the year, program margins grew to 6.3% and unit margins exceeded program margins as expected. A trend we project will continue in 2006. BCA's innovative product strategy was clearly validated by the market last year. We captured a record 1,029 gross orders and achieved sales records for the 737, the 777, and the 787. BCA's backlog grew 89% during the year to over $124 billion. This number incorporates the previously disclosed impact on future revenues of the accounting change for supplier concession sharing. The 787 program made excellent progress during the year. The Dreamliner's firm configuration was completed in September and the team is now working to complete the airline's detailed design.
 
We continue to see outstanding customer demand for the 787. Since its launch in 2004, the 787 has captured 379 orders and commitments from 27 customers around the world. BCA reached other important milestones during the year, launching the 747-8, the 777 Freighter, and the 737-900 ER programs. Driven by its industry leading products and services, Commercial Airplanes expects significant growth in airplane deliveries, revenues and earnings during the guidance period.
 
Now moving to slide six. IDS had a record year of profitability, delivering 11.4% margins for the quarter and 12.6% for all of 2005. Excluding the gain from Rocketdyne's sale, IDS margins would have been industry leading  would have been an industry-leading 10.8%. Revenue for the quarter grew 7% on higher volumes at our aircraft and weapons system and our support systems segment. Revenue for the year grew to a record $30.8 billion but was 700 million below our previous forecast due to a strike in our launch business and lower revenues in our proprietary programs. Strong margin performance at IDS was driven by double digit profitability in both aircraft and weapons and support system segments.
 
Margins in our network systems segment declined due to revised cost and fee estimates on a proprietary program and on the ground-based missile defense program. IDS won important new business during the quarter, including the sale of F-15's to Singapore, a large logistics support contract with the U.S. Navy for the F/A-18, and a large Army Chinook order. IDS achieved several key program milestones during the year, as future combat systems passed its systems of systems functional review and the Department of Defense approved full rate production for the V-22.
 
IDS also exceeded  also executed a successful flight test on the ground-based missile defense program and conducted the preliminary design review on the P-8 A Multimission Maritime Aircraft program. Despite moderating growth in the U.S. defense budgets during the next few years, IDS is positioned to deliver modest revenue growth and excellent profitability with its industry-leading backlog of programs. As part of the restructuring that Jim mentioned, we are in the process of adjusting to three reporting segments in IDS to reflect the new organization. Until that is complete, we will continue to report and issue guidance using the former four-segment arrangement.
 
Now, let's look at our other businesses on slide seven. Boeing Capital performed well this year. BCC grew its pretax income by 27% in 2005 and continued to return significant cash dividends to Boeing, totaling more than $1 billion in the past 24 months. The aircraft financing market continues to improve and BCC is executing well on its mission to support Boeing core businesses while reducing its portfolio size and risk.
 
Connexion by Boeing continued expanding its business during the year, with service now available on more than 180 flights daily. Orders and options for Connexion's commercial service now totals over 500 airplanes at 11 airlines, in addition to new orders and applications in the maritime industry. Just last week, we completed the first Connexion installation on a commercial shipping vessel.
Now, let's turn to cash flow on slide eight. Our cash flow generation remains outstanding, with operating cash flow of $2.4 billion in the quarter and $7 billion for the year. This performance reflected strong earnings growth and excellent working capital management. During the quarter, we repurchased 12.4 million shares for $832 million. For the year, we repurchased 45 million shares for 2.9 billion, leaving 24 million shares still authorized for repurchase.
 
We've made excellent progress in strengthening our pension plans in 2005. During the plan year ended September 30, our pension investment earned nearly 15%. And we made cash contributions of $1.9 billion to our pension plans during the year. As a result we've improved our funded status to 96%.
 
Looking ahead, the discount rate we will apply in 2006 for determined pension liabilities is 5.5%, which is below the 5.75% used in 2005. Our expected rate of return for 2006 remain at 8.5%. Given these factors, we still expect noncash pretax pension expense to be approximately $1 billion in 2006 or about $0.80 per share. Due to the sizable contribution made this year, we have essentially eliminated our cash funding requirements for 2006. However, we will continue to evaluate additional discretionary contributions to our pension plans.
 
Now let's turn to slide nine. We have a strong balance sheet with outstanding liquidity. We ended 2005 with cash and liquid investment balances of 8.4 billion, up 38% from the same period last year. Boeing's debt levels continued to decline during the year as maturing debt was not refinanced due to our strong cash position. Financial strength and solid credit ratings continue to be a priority for us. And on that front, Moody's announced last week that they are considering an upgrade of our credit ratings.
 
Now, let's move to slide 10 and our financial outlook. Today we are raising our EPS guidance for 2006 and forecasting significant additional EPS growth for 2007. Boeing's revenue guidance for 2006 is approximately $60 billion. Revenue guidance for 2007 is 63.5 billion to 64.5 billion. We are raising our earnings per share guidance for 2006 to between $3.25 and $3.45 per share because of our strong operating performance and a smaller deferred tax charge in the first quarter than we previously expected. This represents an increase of approximately 40% over 2005 after special items. For 2007, we expect EPS to grow about 25% to between $4.10 and $4.30 per share. Driven by higher deliveries and margins at BCA and solid margin performance at IDS.
 
We expect operating cash flow to exceed 5.5 billion in both 2006 and 2007. Please note, that this financial guidance now reflects the previously disclosed impact of an accounting change affecting supplier concession payments at BCA, which we are implementing beginning in 2006. This change will reduce 2006 revenue by about $2 billion but will not materially affect earnings. Our revenue guidance for 2006 includes approximately $1 billion for business planned to be part of the pending United launch transaction. Upon completing that transaction, Boeing would use the equity method of accounting for this new joint venture.
 
Now, let's look at our segment guidance. BCA airplane deliveries are forecast to grow 36%, to 395 airplanes in 2006. Deliveries in 2007 are expected to be approximately 440 to 445 airplanes. Commercial Airplanes' revenue guidance for 2006 is now approximately $27.5 billion and between $29.5 billion and $30.5 billion for 2007. We expect 2006 operating margins for Commercial Airplanes to be above 9% on a program accounting basis, reflecting higher deliveries and continued productivity. For 2007, we expect BCA margins to continue to improve, exceeding 10% for the year.
 
Our 2006 revenue forecast for IDS is approximately $31.5 billion. In 2007, IDS revenues are expected to grow 2% to 5% as we execute on our industry leading backlog in an environment of moderating defense budget growth. We expect IDS margins to be approximately 10.5% in 2006 and greater than 10.5% 2007, driven by strong overall program performance.
 
Additional segment guidance is provided in our earnings release. Now, I'm going to turn this back over to Jim who will give you some thoughts on our look ahead. Jim.
 
Jim McNerney -
The Boeing Company - Chairman, CEO, President and Member of Special Programs Committee
 
Thanks, James. Let me make a few additional comments, and then we'll take your questions, based on slide 11. In January, the senior team charted our course for the next several years. Our objective can be stated simply. The Boeing Company aspires to deliver financial results that match the quality of our people and our technology, which is a meaningful improvement from where we are today. In short, we expect to meet a significantly higher standard of overall financial performance and finding ways to make Boeing bigger and better than the sum of its parts is how we intend to get there.
The foundation for this framework will be driving and nurturing a culture of leadership and accountability. We have started by setting challenging but attainable financial objectives and more strongly linking them to our own pay and career development. An intense but equal pursuit of productivity and growth will be the building blocks of our improved financial performance. We must have both, simultaneously, since they fuel each other. We will always remember that growth, our future, begins and ends with our customers. I am pleased that Boeing's teams have made significant strides in living at our customer's place and at our customer's pace.
 
And we won't stop there. Further, we will strive to address growth as a disciplined process, not as a series of intermittent opportunities. Through this approach, we hope to anticipate our customers' needs better and earlier than our competitors, respond faster, and solidify our standing as the preferred supplier for our customers around the world. While we can still be better and will be better, I'm impressed by our recent progress on growth through customer focus.
 
Commercial Airplanes has transformed its products into a clearly preferred lineup by the often messy, iterative, but ultimately disciplined process of listening to what customers need. Not just for today but for the future. As a result, Boeing is now offering the innovative airplanes with the efficiency and range airlines and consumers need. This focus on our customers produced a record order year for Commercial Airplanes in 2005, and added to Boeing's leadership position in the important twin-aisle market.
 
Our Integrated Defense Systems business has the industry's leading backlog because it listened to and adeptly met its customers' needs for transformational solution. Witness the success of our future combat systems program as an example. Now however, IDS is transforming itself to reflect how our customers' future requirements are evolving. Still transformational, but now often coordinated capabilities and across service organizations. This is evident in the IDS restructuring we announced last week that will further enhance the customer focus of our top management and improve productivity through some consolidation.
 
Slide 12, please. Also in support of our objectives, we are providing our business and functional teams with the tools in the form of four productivity and growth initiatives to build on the strong business positions they have already developed. These Company-wide initiatives will support our continuous productivity and growth objectives. The benefits from these initiatives will be built into our plans and support our financial guidance.
 
Our first initiative is internal services productivity. James Bell will sponsor this effort. Through it, we will reduce indirect costs that are centrally managed or embedded in the businesses. We will also be improving functional productivity. Second is global sourcing, with Jim Albaugh as its sponsor. This is all about taking greater advantage of economies of scale and moving best practices deeper into the supply chain.
 
Third is lean plus. Alan Mulally will sponsor this. As we continue to build on our excellent lean practices, we want to take them to the next level in our production areas and move them into our offices and back shops. Fourth is development process excellent. Jim Jamieson, now our Chief Technology Officer is its sponsor. Through this, we expect to improve both the yield of our R&D investments and the effectiveness and productivity of our development programs.
 
I want to point out that the initiative sponsors are acting in their role as corporate officers. On a day to day level we have assigned a senior executive to lead each initiative on a full-time basis. These leaders, drawn from across the Company, will act as resources for our line organizations and will help us move both internal and external best practices across all of our businesses. Again, these initiatives will be measured by their contribution toward helping our businesses and functions meet their objectives.
 
Slide 13, please. Leadership development is the foundation of our management model and the key to sustainably growing our Company. I consider it one of my own top priorities. If we're going to achieve the performance we just discussed, we must take specific steps to strengthen the culture of leadership and accountability within Boeing. We have embarked on a major effort to do just that. We have defined our expectations for leaders, the attributes you saw on the previous slide, and we are spreading these throughout Boeing.
 
But we realize that just talking about them won't make them stick. That's why we're going to teach them to leaders and managers at our Boeing Leadership Center in St. Louis. We're going to make sure people know we expect them to live by these attributes, both the performance and values nature of them. We are going to measure performance against them. We're going to tie career and job readiness assessments to demonstrate a progress in these areas. And we are going to insist that our leaders be models for the entire Company of what the attributes are all about. As our people grow, so will Boeing.
 
Now, let me summarize. Slide 14, please. The Boeing Company's businesses are well positioned in healthy markets. We are forecasting strong profitability and growth in 2006 and in 2007. With the great success we've had in winning new orders we now have a record backlog that exceeds 200 billion. Our focus is on executing on that backlog better than we ever have and increasing the backlog at the same time.
We are focused like never before on productivity and growth. You've seen the models by which we will manage and lead this Company forward. Now, James and I would be happy to take your questions.
 
QUESTION AND ANSWER
 
Operator
 
Thank you. [OPERATOR INSTRUCTIONS] Our first question comes from Doug Harned of Sanford Bernstein.
 
Doug Harned -
Sanford C. Bernstein & Company, Inc. - Analyst
 
Good morning. You've made improving margins a major focus and the Q4 results and the 06 guidance reflect great progress there. But we continue to see margins held back in IDS by performance issues on some development programs. And I assume that the reorganization should help here but what steps will enable to you identify problems earlier and reduce risks, particularly to improve GMD, military satellite performance, and also to ensure against longer term issues arising in STS?
 
James Bell -
The Boeing Company - CFO
 
Doug, this is James. Well first of all, I guess you could define holding back margins being leading industry margins with them being in double digits. We've always said that that was the goal for that business and we're there. We're ending the year, even if you adjust the 12.6 for the one-time Rocketdyne pick-up, we're at 10.8, which does lead the aerospace industry in terms of margin performance.
 
Now clearly, we expect the reorganization to better align our top management talent with our customers, so that we'll have more focus both on the execution of those programs but also more integration on the communication of performance. Now, as you recall, these programs are programs that have a heavy technological content and require a lot of invention. And so part of the story going forward needs to be close communication with our customer as to what we're able to achieve given what the requirements are and what the expectations are. And making sure we have the appropriate funding and schedule to go along with that, so that we can continue to deliver industry leading margins.
 
Doug Harned -
Sanford C. Bernstein & Company, Inc. - Analyst
 
And I assume that also a part of this is also around some of the shared services costs that I know you've been going after. Could you also comment on how that initiative is progressing and when we may expect to see some impact from that?
 
James Bell -
The Boeing Company - CFO
 
I can. Now, Jim has asked me to lead the shared services activity and also the initiative to improve our performance in that area. But embedded in our guidance is a pretty significant productivity improvement in how we deliver those services, both from a quality service standpoint and also from a cost perspective. So, what you're seeing today is a lot of that embedded in the current guidance. We'll continue to work that going forward.
 
Doug Harned -
Sanford C. Bernstein & Company, Inc. - Analyst
 
Okay. Great. Thanks.
 
Operator
 
Thank you. Our next question comes from Byron Callan of Prudential Equity Group.
Byron Callan -
Prudential Equity Group - Analyst
 
James can you address some of the assumptions in the midsection of the income statement for 2007? Have you just kind of ported things over from 2006? Or are there any variances in pension expense assumptions, the tax rate, some of the other line items there?
 
James Bell -
The Boeing Company - CFO
 
We expect the tax rate to increase. Obviously, we had good performance relative to getting some tax settlements this year that drove the rate down. But if you take those out, we're at about 29% tax rate and we're expecting going forward the tax rate to level out in the low 30's percentile. So, we think it will be more normal. Clearly on the pension area, we had the one-timers associated with the divestiture of Rocketdyne in Wichita and that had a significant impact. And then finally, on the share-based plan comp expense, we had some acceleration of that because a lot of the performance shares did pay out. And then also because of our method of accrual, we had to front load it as we went to a binomial model to evaluate our 05 plan. But I expect that to moderate going forward.
 
Byron Callan -
Prudential Equity Group - Analyst
 
And that's included in the 2007 guidance, or that's  we'll cross those bridges when we get to them?
 
James Bell -
The Boeing Company - CFO
 
It's included in the 2006 and 2007 guidance.
 
Operator
 
Our next question comes from Steve Binder of Bear Stearns.
 
Steve Binder -
Bear Stearns - Analyst
 
Good morning. I just wanted to touch  James, can you maybe just touch a little more depth on your unit costs and program margin discussion before? I'm just wondering, were there block changes, number one, in the quarter? And two, was the higher raw material costs and the block changes is that what accounted for the $90 million increase in deferred production costs in the quarter?
 
James Bell -
The Boeing Company - CFO
 
Yes, it's principally the higher material costs. We really didn't have any block changes except for, on our 747 we added 12 to our accounting quantity unit. But as you know, Steve, that the impact of an increased cost estimate on the commercial airplane programs have more of an impact in unit margin because of the cumulative adjustment associated for the current production block versus what you will see on a program accounting margin going forward basis. But that's basically all that's in there.
 
Steve Binder -
Bear Stearns - Analyst
 
And the tax rate for the fourth quarter came in a bit light and interest income was pretty heavy. Were there some other tax items in the quarter?
 
James Bell -
The Boeing Company - CFO
 
No, nothing big. The interest expense, quite frankly, was down. The income was up because of our investments of our cash into the short-term maturity  the short-term high quality investments. because we have so much cash we've put it there and so we're starting to see some of the benefits of that in terms of a return in interest income.
Steve Binder -
Bear Stearns - Analyst
 
And lastly, your R&D increase for 2006, you only bumped it up $100 million. Is that related to the 787?
 
James Bell -
The Boeing Company - CFO
 
Basically we're about peaking and we're going to stabilize for the next couple of years in that development costs. As we've mentioned, that program is really on track and we are right on target both from a spending level and also from a performance perspective.
 
Steve Binder -
Bear Stearns - Analyst
 
Thanks very much.
 
Operator
 
Thank you. Our next question comes from Robert Spingarn of CSFB.
 
Robert Spingarn -
Credit Suisse First Boston - Analyst
 
Jim, could you talk a little bit about your commercial order expectations for this year? And then as a follow-up to that, Airbus came in at the last hour here in 05 on the orders. I suspect there's some real aggressive pricing there. And could you talk about the competitive environment, vis-a-vis pricing, and how you address that with the margin expansion that you're looking for?
 
Jim McNerney -
The Boeing Company - Chairman, CEO, President and Member of Special Programs Committee
 
Well, we probably won't get as many orders next year as we got this year. Now  and we don't give guidance on orders, as you know. But we expect to still see a pretty good order flow next year. We've got good momentum exiting the year obviously. I don't want to comment on the quality of Airbus' order book. I'll leave that for to you judge. I think our order book very strong, weighted toward wide body new technology, new airplanes, where we have a high market shares, very promising momentum there. And by the way, a huge backlog in the 737. Obviously, the world's highest selling airplane ever. So, I think nice momentum there. I think in terms of pricing and margins, Alan Mulally and the team understand the reality of price in that marketplace. And have signed up to the productivity necessary to continue to expand margins within a realistic view of the pricing there. And I think Alan and others are convinced that the initiatives that were embarked on can only help.
 
Robert Spingarn -
Credit Suisse First Boston - Analyst
 
So, are you saying that you should maintain share at least this year? And while I know you don't want to forecast orders, should we expect at least a book to bill of over 1?
 
Jim McNerney -
The Boeing Company - Chairman, CEO, President and Member of Special Programs Committee
 
Yes. Look again, I don't want to answer the question specifically, because you will come up with some number but that would not be an unreasonable assumption if I were just sitting out there.
 
Robert Spingarn -
Credit Suisse First Boston - Analyst
 
Okay. Thank you.
 
Operator
 
Thank you. Our next question comes from Howard Rubel of Jefferies.
Jim McNerney -
The Boeing Company - Chairman, CEO, President and Member of Special Programs Committee
 
Howard are you there?
 
Howard Rubel -
Jefferies & Co. - Analyst
 
Can you hear me okay?
 
Jim McNerney -
The Boeing Company - Chairman, CEO, President and Member of Special Programs Committee
 
We can hear you now.
 
Howard Rubel -
Jefferies & Co. - Analyst
 
Sorry. I noticed you need to be almost a James to be leading one of these particular business units, with the exception of Alan. But I want to focus for a second on something that you talked about again, with respect to network and MDA and all of that. And I don't think you completely addressed the question before. Is  there seems to have been sort of some fundamental misses in the business over the last nine to 12 months. And could you address a little bit more about what you're doing, other than just some management reorganization to improve the performance of this unit?
 
James Bell -
The Boeing Company - CFO
 
Okay, Howard, I can do that. I don't think the question was asked quite as clearly as you've just asked it. There's no question that in network systems, in our proprietary program we had some performance issues we took. Clearly, we got a contract change notice that restructured that work. We had to increase our cost estimate and reduce what our fee capture assumption would be on that program. So, that is reflected in the 05 margins.
 
The same holds true for our GMD program that's also resident in network systems where we had some performance issues. And the program was slowed down to make sure that we worked our way through some of the test anomalies we had experienced and to make sure we had the right concept in place going forward. So, both of those issues had a relatively significant impact on the margin performance in network systems. Now, we believe this reorganization will better align our senior leadership team with the customer set, so that we stay more aligned on those contracts. On the proprietary contracts was where I alluded to that it has a very, very high and difficult technical content that really is supported by invention as you go. And it's important that we stay linked with our customer. So that we have the expectations of performance properly contexted with the appropriate funding and schedule to go along with it.
 
And I think this realignment will help us do that. The same holds true on the GMD program, which we did end the year with a very successful test that we think helps put that contract back on track. Now, having said that, the program has been stretched out because of some funding constraints. And so we're going to see lower revenue going forward in that. But again I think the alignment will help us be better integrated with our customer and put better, focused, senior leadership management on the performance in both of those programs.
 
Howard Rubel -
Jefferies & Co. - Analyst
 
All right. Thank you very much, gentlemen.
 
Operator
 
Thank you. Our next question comes from Cai Von Rumohr of SG Cowen.
Cai Von Rumohr -
SG Cowen & Co. - Analyst
 
Yes, as we look out to two 2007 you've told us 440-plus deliveries, you're 92% sold out. The revenues you're guiding to look a little bit light for the number of deliveries you're talking about. Could you give us some guidance on the percent of deliveries in 06 and 07 that you expect to be of the single-aisle?
 
James Bell -
The Boeing Company - CFO
 
Well, remember now that if you look at it from year-over-year that the new revenue number also includes in it the accounting change that we're implementing in 2006 which had an impact on the revenue number of $2 billion, and pretty close to that for 07 as well.
 
Cai Von Rumohr -
SG Cowen & Co. - Analyst
 
It's the change from 06 to 07 that looks like it's light, given that I assume the 777 would be ramping. Does the 737 have the same percentage of deliveries in 07 as 06?
 
James Bell -
The Boeing Company - CFO
 
The 737 is also ramping. We're going to have about the same percentage, about 75%, as we've told you in the past, for single-aisle both years. So, it doesn't get any heavier for the wide bodies in 07.
 
Cai Von Rumohr -
SG Cowen & Co. - Analyst
 
And given 
 
Jim McNerney -
The Boeing Company - Chairman, CEO, President and Member of Special Programs Committee
 
As a percent.
 
James Bell -
The Boeing Company - CFO
 
As a percent.
 
Cai Von Rumohr -
SG Cowen & Co. - Analyst
 
And given that you're 92% sold out, is there any chance that that rate in 07 has any up side?
 
Jim McNerney -
The Boeing Company - Chairman, CEO, President and Member of Special Programs Committee
 
Well, it's  Cai, I understand why you're asking the question and I don't blame you for asking the question. But this is our best shot right now. We're no smarter than the numbers we are presenting to you right now. And I know you appreciate the disciplined approach we are going to take to satisfying our customers and making and delivering our airplanes here. And if we get to a better place, we'll let you know. But right now this is our best shot. There's  we don't have a big hedge in here, we don't have a big stretch in here, this is our straight shot.
 
Cai Von Rumohr -
SG Cowen & Co. - Analyst
 
Excellent. Thank you, gentlemen.
 
Operator
 
Our next question comes from Joseph Campbell of Lehman Brothers.
Joseph Campbell -
Lehman Brothers - Analyst
 
Good morning. I wondered if you could give us a little more color into what's happening in the cash flow guidance? It looks like the cash flow was 8.9 billion before we put money in the pension plan and I guess working capital probably mostly deposits contributed 3. But even if you assume that there's no working capital gains, you get 5.9. And if you're going to put 0.5 billion or so in the pension plan, it looks like there's absolutely no cash flow for the net earnings or whatever. It looks like a low number.
 
James Bell -
The Boeing Company - CFO
 
Well, Joe, I guess it really gets down to we've actually had a lot of help on cash flow with the order traffic we saw this year. Obviously, that's going to moderate. Clearly, we got cash from taxes  from the tax returns this year. We're not assuming that going forward. And we are assuming that we would make some pension contribution in the area of about $0.5 billion. And we'll do more if, in fact, that's possible. So, I think what we're seeing is that the cash flow is coming to what we would expect to be a more normal level without peaks in orders or significant returns from taxes.
 
Joseph Campbell -
Lehman Brothers - - Analyst
 
Would the CapEx change for the free cash flow number, or is 1.5 about the right number?
 
James Bell -
The Boeing Company - CFO
 
1.5 is about the right number.
 
Joseph Campbell -
Lehman Brothers - Analyst
 
For both years, 06 and 7?
 
James Bell -
The Boeing Company - CFO
 
Yes.
 
Joseph Campbell -
Lehman Brothers - Analyst
 
Thank you very much.
 
Operator
 
Thank you. Our next question comes from George Shapiro of Citigroup.
 
George Shapiro -
Citigroup - Analyst
 
Good morning. James, it seems like the increase in profit margin from the change in revenue assumption runs about 50 or 60 basis points. So, is it safe to say about half of the increase in margin that you're projecting in 06 is just  is coming from the accounting and the other half is coming from improved performance?
 
James Bell -
The Boeing Company - CFO
 
It's safe to say that.
George Shapiro -
Citigroup - Analyst
 
And second one, with the deferred production increase of 90 million on the 777 and no change in the pool, so you didn't change the profitability  profit margins on the program; you must be making the assumption that these material costs are kind of a one-time item. I was just wondering what gives that you confidence and what might have caused it this particular particular quarter then?
 
James Bell -
The Boeing Company - CFO
 
Well I think, as you know, for the most of our materials, we have long-term fixed price contracts that moderate any growth in those costs going forward. I think in the fourth quarter, we had to go out and buy above the requirement that we had embedded in those contracts. And so, we're pretty comfortable we have a pretty good fix on the requirements going forward. And the rest of our material purchases will be bought within our contracted requirements and so we won't to have go outside of then and pay a premium price.
 
George Shapiro -
Citigroup - Analyst
 
Okay. Thanks.
 
James Bell -
The Boeing Company - CFO
 
You're welcome.
 
Operator
 
Thank you. Our next question comes from Ron Epstein of Merrill Lynch.
 
Ron Epstein -
Merrill Lynch - Analyst
 
Good morning. Jim, in your presentation you talked about the focus on leadership. And a huge organization like Boeing at the helm, how do you incite cultural change? Can you walk through some of the incentives, financial and otherwise, that you've put in place? Not just for the senior management. When you move into middle management to try to improve the performance, as you've discussed.
 
Jim McNerney -
The Boeing Company - Chairman, CEO, President and Member of Special Programs Committee
 
Well, that's a big question. I think the  it takes time. You don't transform a Company that's already well led to an even higher level overnight. Having said that, where you start is define what you mean by leadership. And we've spent the last six or seven months doing that. It's the list of attributes. And embedded in those list of attributes are the kinds of values and ethical behavior that we expect of ourselves to make it clear there's no trade-off on performance against the values that we expect in ourselves. So, you define it and then you expect it. I think  and that has to start at that time top.
 
And then you embed it in your HR processes. In other words, make it meaningful in terms of pay, promotion, job readiness, and things like that. And then you link it to broader pay plans. And I think I alluded in my remarks to a top management pay plan that now links a large portion of long-term incentives to economic profit growth versus the three-year plan we've got. And so it  all those things. There's no one thing. There's a lot of things. And then there's just spending a lot of time discussing it and talking about it and trying to get people excited about it.
 
There's a lot of these things all add up to hopefully an ability to improve our leadership capability. And I think we can here. There's some very good people here.
Ron Epstein -
Merrill Lynch - Analyst
 
Thank you.
 
Operator
 
Our next question comes from David Strauss of UBS.
 
David Strauss -
UBS - Analyst
 
Good morning. You've obviously been buying back shares at a pretty nice pace here. What are you assuming going forward in terms of your guidance as far as the share count coming down further?
 
James Bell -
The Boeing Company - CFO
 
Well, as you know, we still have 24 million to go under the current authorization. What we'd like to get to is about a 40% payout ratio between that and the dividends. And so I think that's what you'll be seeing going forward. So as we get through where we are today, with the current authorization, we'd probably go back and get another one. But if there's an opportunity, if you all continue to undervalue the stock, we may look at going in and doing it if we can do better.
 
Ron Epstein -
Merrill Lynch - Analyst
 
Jim, could you touch on briefly the status of the supply chain as you see it today relative to a couple months ago?
 
Jim McNerney -
The Boeing Company - Chairman, CEO, President and Member of Special Programs Committee
 
Well, I think in my position you always worry about the supply chain and so do Alan and Jim and the people on their team. It's under the heading of "only the paranoid survive". Now, so we've spend a lot of time and attention on it. And having said that, though, I think we've got a good plan. I think the pressure is on the raw materials side right now. And we're fighting through those issues and resolving them. I think as the 787 becomes reality, there will be delivery of high-level componentry from our partners that we're focused on today, every day and we'll then deliver in a couple of years. So I think, it's sort of a three yards and a cloud of dust, all hands on deck, good processes. And so I'm feeling comfortable where we are when you add it all up.
 
Ron Epstein -
Merrill Lynch - Analyst
 
Thanks.
 
Operator
 
Our next question comes from Joe Nadol of J.P. Morgan.
 
Joe Nadol -
J.P. Morgan - Analyst
 
Jim, I'd like to dig into the IDS restructuring a little bit more.
 
Jim McNerney -
The Boeing Company - Chairman, CEO, President and Member of Special Programs Committee
 
Sure.
Joe Nadol -
J.P. Morgan - Analyst
 
If I understand it properly, the twin goals are taking out costs and improving customer focus. And I guess on each of those, on the cost item, do you have any goals, specific goals as to what you can save and how much of it importantly that you could keep, given the nature of pricing in the defense business? Then the customer side, if I remember properly, the last time this business was restructured, that was the primary goal. And there were sort of two tiers set up with  customer facing units and then reporting units, based on product. And so what was wrong with that? What have you learned from experience and why is this the better way to face the customer?
 
Jim McNerney -
The Boeing Company - Chairman, CEO, President and Member of Special Programs Committee
 
Nothing's wrong with it, because the same principle drove both restructurings. Just to back up for a second. Costs  the cost reduction largely comes from consolidation and alignment around these three units. These cost reductions are anticipated in the guidance we've given you. The implementation will happen over the next few months. Now, the philosophy behind it  our customer is evolving. That's why we evolve. The principle is to always stay with them and remain customer focused.
 
So, I'm not trying to make the point, and neither is Jim Albaugh, that we weren't customer focused before, now we are. It's just a matter of adhering to the same principle, as the programs that they're asking us to lead have more to do with cross-service coordination and capabilities that spread across many platforms. We're trying to follow that trend and have an organization that both sells and delivers that way. That's what this is all about.
 
I think the other thing I would say is that, as the market moderates, execution, while always critical, will be even more at a premium. And these three units are set up to have stronger functional discipline and focus against execution as that becomes even more important, than it always is, in a moderating environment. So that's  that may be more of an answer than you wanted but that's the philosophy behind this thing.
 
Joe Nadol -
J.P. Morgan - Analyst
 
Okay. Thank you.
 
Jim McNerney -
The Boeing Company - Chairman, CEO, President and Member of Special Programs Committee
 
You're very welcome.
 
Operator
 
Thank you. Our next question comes from Nick Fothergill, Bank of America Securities.
 
Nick Fothergill -
Bank of America Securities - Analyst
 
Jim, I wanted to  are there any particular materials or components in the supply chain that you're keeping extra focused on at the moment? And with regard to questions we just had on the raw material price increase, how much of those are you managing to pass on to airlines through your accelerator clauses?
 
James Bell -
The Boeing Company - CFO
 
Well I  Jim, if you have the precise percentage, you can just chime in here. But we obviously have escalation in all of our  virtually all of our contracts that try to capture changes in raw material and labor. I don't know the exact percentage, to be honest with you, but the ones that we've been wrestling with are the ones that you would think. Everything from aluminum to titanium and some of these things are two notable ones. But these have all been resolved. We've got great vendors and partners out there that  for whom we're important customers. So, we tend to find answers to these things. But we stay focused on them. Jim, do you have anything to add on the escalation side?
Jim McNerney -
The Boeing Company - Chairman, CEO, President and Member of Special Programs Committee
 
For the most part that we have long-term contracts on most of the materials. As I mentioned, Nick, that this was more of a one-time adjustment by material to requirements. I don't see this as an ongoing trend. And so I think we'll manage it and offset a lot of these costs through even more productivity improvement.
 
Nick Fothergill -
Bank of America Securities - Analyst
 
Great. And a quick follow-up back to Jim, if I may. Acquisitions, Jim, you're obviously generating exceptionally good cash flow at the moment. Are there any areas of the business, now that you've been in charge for a little while, that you would identify as being areas that you would be interested in expanding in?
 
Jim McNerney -
The Boeing Company - Chairman, CEO, President and Member of Special Programs Committee
 
Well, I think expansion opportunities would be things that are pretty close to the business we're in today. I think  and we have no immediate objectives or things that are imminent. I think the  but we will be very disciplined about either leveraging our market position or our technology. We will not get too far afield as we think about all this. So, we will look for smart acquisitions as they come and we're always looking. We've got a pretty good flow here but nothing  that will be the philosophy with which we'll approach it.
 
Dave Dohnalek -
The Boeing Company - VP IR
 
Operator, we have time for one more question from investors, please.
 
Operator
 
Thank you. Our final question comes from David Gremmels of Thomas Weisel Partners.
 
David Gremmels -
Thomas Weisel Partners - Analyst
 
I was hoping to drill down a little on launch and orbital systems. And I think if you strip out the one-time stuff in 05, you did around 5% margin but you're guiding to around 2% in 06. So first of all, is that a fair statement? And can we just walk through the moving pieces there?
 
James Bell -
The Boeing Company - CFO
 
Basically, that's our NASA business that  and it's coming out of our joint venture that we already have with Lockheed with the United Space Alliance. We also got some help this year, one-timers, where we had some funding, which we characterize as assured access to space funding, that was associated with the Delta IV launch business. And so going forward we don't anticipate that happening. Although, we will continue with the NASA work. But of course, as we consummate the transaction, we're working with Lockheed to establish ULA, then we'll start accounting for all of that as equity.
 
David Gremmels -
Thomas Weisel Partners - Analyst
 
Great. And also, can you give us any kind of an update on the ULA joint venture? Is that something that might still happen this quarter?
 
James Bell -
The Boeing Company - CFO
 
Don't know if it will happen this quarter. I think it will happen. It's both supported by us and Lockheed. And I think we're answering the questions that the Department of Defense and others that are reviewing that transaction have. So, we just need to hang in there and keep working it, but I think it will happen. Maybe not this quarter.
David Gremmels -
Thomas Weisel Partners - Analyst
 
Thanks very much.
 
James Bell -
The Boeing Company - CFO
 
You're welcome.
 
Dave Dohnalek -
The Boeing Company - VP IR
 
Thank you. Operator, now we're ready for questions from media.
 
Operator
 
Thank you. That completes the analyst question-and-answer session. [OPERATOR INSTRUCTIONS] I will now return you to The Boeing Company for introductory remarks by Mr. Tod Hullin, Senior Vice President of Communications. Mr. Hullin, please go ahead.
 
Tod Hullin -
The Boeing Company - SVP Communications
 
Thank you and good morning. We will continue the questions with Jim and James. If you have any questions after the session ends, please contact our Media Relations team at 312-544-2002. Operator, we're ready for the first question. And in the interest of time I ask everyone to limit themselves to one question. Thank you. Our first question comes from Lynn Lunsford of Wall Street Journal.
 
Lynn Lunsford -
Wall Street Journal - Member of the Media
 
Good morning. I wanted to ask, one of the things that some of the analysts have talked about in recent weeks is the ability of Boeing suppliers to essentially keep up with the increasing rates for both Boeing and Airbus. Particularly you're relying more on these suppliers, like with the 787, for even bigger parts of the airplane to be delivered until you finish. What are you doing to keep on top of sort of balancing these pressures?
 
Jim McNerney -
The Boeing Company - Chairman, CEO, President and Member of Special Programs Committee
 
Well, Lynn, this is Jim. The  I think you have captured in stuff you've written and implied in your question here that you understand the strategy of what we're trying to do. The way to properly manage higher level componentry is early and often and with a great deal of engineering engagement at the front end. All of which has been anticipated by Alan's team. I think the  and then it's just get on the same information system. Co-location of your partner and you years before something has to be delivered. Again, it is those kinds of execution elements that sometimes get rushed or don't happen in proper sequence. I think  and it's 10 or 12 of those little things that add up to success. And I think that level of detail has been paid attention to. And it's not that we're going to stop paying attention to it, it's as I've said before, this is one of Boeing's big opportunities and issues to make sure we get right.
 
Lynn Lunsford -
Wall Street Journal - Member of the Media
 
Thank you.
 
Jim McNerney -
The Boeing Company - Chairman, CEO, President and Member of Special Programs Committee
 
Yes, you're welcome.
 
Operator
 
Thank you. Our next question comes from Kevin Done of Financial Times.
Kevin Done -
Financial Times - Memeber of the Media
 
Could you just give me please, the commercial backlog by units at the end of December 2005? And just to check, was it 1,097 a year earlier?
 
Jim McNerney -
The Boeing Company - Chairman, CEO, President and Member of Special Programs Committee
 
I wasn't sure I heard the question. Was it backlog or orders?
 
Kevin Done -
Financial Times - Memeber of the Media
 
The order backlog by units for Commercial Airplanes at the end of December.
 
Jim McNerney -
The Boeing Company - Chairman, CEO, President and Member of Special Programs Committee
 
Okay.
 
James Bell -
The Boeing Company - CFO
 
You mean in terms of what the order traffic this year, how did it break out by unit?
 
Jim McNerney -
The Boeing Company - Chairman, CEO, President and Member of Special Programs Committee
 
This is the biggies. Asking 125 billion by unit.
 
James Bell -
The Boeing Company - CFO
 
No. We can get that. We don't have that offhand.
 
Jim McNerney -
The Boeing Company - Chairman, CEO, President and Member of Special Programs Committee
 
We can get that for you, Kevin.
 
Kevin Done -
Financial Times - Memeber of the Media
 
Thanks very much indeed. And perhaps if I could just add, what is the estimated development cost for the 787 program?
 
James Bell -
The Boeing Company - CFO
 
We don't share that information public but I will tell you it it's in the guidance. It's in the R&D numbers. We have discussed for 05 and in the guidance in 06 and 07 going forward. And that program is being conducted within its cost targets and it's on schedule.
 
Kevin Done -
Financial Times - Memeber of the Media
 
Thanks very much.
 
Operator
 
Thank you. Our next question comes from August Cole of Market Watch.
August Cole -
Market Watch - Member of the Media
 
Good morning. I wanted to get a sense, Jim, of when the commercial group's revenue might reverse this paradigm where the defense has more sales. Are we talking a couple of years?
 
Jim McNerney -
The Boeing Company - Chairman, CEO, President and Member of Special Programs Committee
 
I'm sorry, I didn't quite get it all. Say it again.
 
August Cole -
Market Watch - Member of the Media
 
Let me take off my headset. Can you guys hear me better yet?
 
Jim McNerney -
The Boeing Company - Chairman, CEO, President and Member of Special Programs Committee
 
Much better.
 
August Cole -
Market Watch - Member of the Media
 
What I'd like to know is, when you think the commercial group's revenue will eclipse the defense group's sales?
 
Jim McNerney -
The Boeing Company - Chairman, CEO, President and Member of Special Programs Committee
 
Well, I want them each to run scared and compete with one another is what I'd really like. But I think it's beyond our guidance, quite frankly and therefore, I'm not in a position to tell you, but the guys in Seattle are trying like hell to do that.
 
August Cole -
Market Watch - Member of the Media
 
And if you could permit me a follow-up question. Is this something you strive to balance or do you expect there will be with the cyclical nature of both industries some back and forth?
 
Jim McNerney -
The Boeing Company - Chairman, CEO, President and Member of Special Programs Committee
 
I think there will be reasonable balance between those two businesses over time and that's good for us. And I think the current cycle we're entering into is a perfect example of that. And the cycle we just left is also a perfect example of that, where one is offsetting pressure in the other. And so we feel good about the level of diversification they give us.
 
August Cole -
Market Watch - Member of the Media
 
Thank you.
 
Jim McNerney -
The Boeing Company - Chairman, CEO, President and Member of Special Programs Committee
 
You're welcome.
Operator
 
Thank you. [OPERATOR INSTRUCTIONS] Our next question comes from John Liang of Inside Defense.
 
John Liang -
Inside Defense - Member of the Media
 
On the GMD program the review team that was established after the last two test failures, one of its recommendations was that Boeing establish a service life requirement and make them known to the appropriate subcontractors. Have those requirements been established? And if so what are they, if not where are you in that process?
 
James Bell -
The Boeing Company - CFO
 
I don't have that answer for you. I don't have that detail in the program. But remember the last test was a success. So, we haven't had two failures in a row. The last test at the end of the year was an outstanding success on the program. But we can get you that other information.
 
John Liang -
Inside Defense - Member of the Media
 
Really quick follow-up. Did you, in fact, get  were you, in fact, awarded, 299.7 million in missile defense bonuses last year out of a potential 407 million? Is that correct?
 
James Bell -
The Boeing Company - CFO
 
We don't give that kind of detailed information. What I can tell you is, us that program, although we had to take an adjustment on it, we still had pretty good earnings on the missile defense program.
 
John Liang -
Inside Defense - Member of the Media
 
Thank you.
 
Dave Dohnalek -
The Boeing Company - VP IR
 
We have time for one more question.
 
Operator
 
Thank you. Our final question comes from James Gunsalus of Bloomberg News.
 
James Gunsalus -
Bloomberg News - Member of the Media
 
Question for you on the IDS restructuring.
 
Jim McNerney -
The Boeing Company - Chairman, CEO, President and Member of Special Programs Committee
 
James, we can't hear you.
 
James Gunsalus -
Bloomberg News - Member of the Media
 
Is that better?
 
Jim McNerney -
The Boeing Company - Chairman, CEO, President and Member of Special Programs Committee
 
Much better.
James Gunsalus -
Bloomberg News - Member of the Media
 
Sorry about that. The changes at IDS, one of the things that they seemed to assume is that there's similar changes have taken place at the DoD. And I'm wondering what specifically have you guys seen in terms of the way the branches are operating with jointness, that they would be able to coordinate themselves to come to you and say this is what we want? They've had some trouble doing that in the past. But what changes are you seeing at the DoD that made you feel like this is a good time to do this?
 
Jim McNerney -
The Boeing Company - Chairman, CEO, President and Member of Special Programs Committee
 
Well, I think the  I don't want to comment on the organizational effectiveness of the DoD. But it's clear in the QDR and in discussions we've had with them, that more jointness is desired rather than less. And that capabilities spread across platforms; more required than less. We're trying to reflect that. I think there are organizational challenges on both sides to achieve it. And we want to be a friend in that process and not have an organization that reinforces the old way of looking at it.
 
James Gunsalus -
Bloomberg News - Member of the Media
 
Got It. Thanks.
 
Dave Dohnalek -
The Boeing Company - VP IR
 
Thank you very much. Again, if you have further questions, please don't hesitate to call on our Media Team. Thanks very much.



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20060302164319.txt.gz
TIME:20060302164319
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
 
On February 26, 2006, the Board of Directors of The Boeing Company (the "Company"), upon the recommendation of the Governance, Organization and Nominating Committee, elected William M. Daley, Chairman of Midwest Region for JPMorgan Chase & Co., as a new director. Mr. Daley will be proposed to shareholders at the 2006 Annual Meeting of Shareholders for election as a director. Mr. Daley will serve on the Finance Committee. There was no arrangement or understanding between Mr. Daley and any other persons pursuant to which Mr. Daley was selected as a director and there are no related party transactions between Mr. Daley and the Company. A copy of the Company's press release announcing the election of Mr. Daley is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
Gen. John M. Shalikashvili, a director of the Company since 2000, informed the Board of Directors on February 27, 2006, that he will not stand for re-election when his term expires at the 2006 Annual Meeting of Shareholders. General Shalikashvili is retired chairman of the U.S. Department of Defense Joint Chiefs of Staff and former Commander-in-Chief of all U.S. forces in Europe. No disagreement with the Company caused in whole or in part Gen. Shalikashvili's decision not to stand for re-election. He served on the Board's Audit and Finance Committees, and chaired its Special Programs Committee. A copy of the Company's press release announcing Gen. Shalikashvili's decision is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.2 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
Item 5.03. Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year.
 
On February 26, 2006, the Board of Directors amended and restated the Company's By-Laws by increasing the number of directors from ten to eleven.
 
On February 27, 2006, the Board of Directors of the Company approved and adopted amendments to Article II, Sections 1 and 10 of the Company's By-Laws to eliminate the Company's classified Board. Prior to the By-Law amendments, Article II, Section 1 of the Company's By-Laws provided for three classes of directors, with each director serving a three-year term. The amendment to Section 10 was a conforming amendment pursuant to the declassification of the Board.
 
Pursuant to the amendment, the entire Board of Directors will now be elected each year for a one year term. The term of all current directors will continue until the Company's 2006 Annual Meeting of Shareholders, which is scheduled to be held on Monday, May 1. Each director elected at such meeting will have a one-year term ending at the 2007 Annual Meeting of Shareholders.
 
The foregoing summary of the By-Law amendments is qualified in its entirety by reference to the text of the amendments to the By-Laws, a copy of which is filed as Exhibit 3(ii) and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
Dated: March 2, 2006
 
 
 

EXHIBIT 3(ii)
 
 
 
Article II, Section 1 of the By-Laws is amended to read in its entirety as follows:
"SECTION 1. Number and Term of Office.
The number of directors shall be eleven, but the number may be increased, or decreased to not less than three, from time to time, either by the directors by adoption of a resolution to such effect or by the stockholders by amendment of the By-Laws in accordance with Article VIII hereof. Until the annual meeting of stockholders of the Corporation to be held in 2006, the directors shall be divided into three classes, each of which shall be composed as nearly as possible of one-third of the directors. Until the annual meeting of stockholders to be held in 2006, each director shall serve for the term to which the director was elected, and until a successor shall have been elected and qualified or until the director's prior death, resignation, or removal. The terms of all directors in office immediately prior to the opening of the polls for the 2006 annual meeting of stockholders of the Corporation shall expire at the time of the opening of the polls for the 2006 annual meeting of stockholders of the Corporation. At each succeeding annual meeting of stockholders of the Corporation, each director shall be elected to hold office until the next annual meeting of stockholders or until his or her successor shall be elected and qualified or until his or her earlier resignation or removal."
 
 
Article II, Section 10 of the By-Laws is amended to read in its entirety as follows:
"SECTION 10. Removal of Directors.
Until the 2006 annual meeting of stockholders of the Corporation, any director may be removed solely for cause by the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, at a meeting of the stockholders called for that purpose; and the vacancy on the Board caused by any such removal may be filled by the stockholders at such meeting or at any subsequent meeting. All directors elected at and after the 2006 annual meeting of stockholders of the Corporation may be removed with or without cause by the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, at a meeting of the stockholders called for that purpose; and the vacancy on the Board caused by any such removal may be filled by the stockholders at such meeting or at any subsequent meeting."

Exhibit 99.1
JPMorgan Chase's Daley Elected to Boeing Board of Directors
 The Boeing Company's [NYSE: BA] board of directors has elected William M. Daley, chairman of the Midwest region for JPMorgan Chase & Co., as a new board member effective immediately. Daley will serve on the board's finance committee.
CHICAGO, Feb. 28, 2006
Daley, 57, joined JPMorgan Chase in May 2004 from SBC Communications Inc., where he had been president. From 1997-2000 he was Secretary of Commerce in the Clinton administration and also served as Special Counsel to the President advising on trade matters.
"Bill Daley brings a wide range of experience with respect to business, finance and government," said Jim McNerney, Boeing chairman, president and CEO. "He has a proven record of leadership and will bring to the board valuable perspective in many important areas."
The Boeing board stands at 11 members. All qualify as independent, outside directors, with the exception of Chairman and CEO McNerney.
###
Contact Info:
John Dern
312-544-2002

Exhibit 99.2
Boeing Director Shalikashvili Announces Retirement from Board
 Gen. John M. Shalikashvili, a Boeing director since 2000, has informed the Boeing board of directors that he will not stand for re-election when his term expires later this year.
CHICAGO, Feb. 28, 2006
Shalikashvili, 69, cited other business commitments and health reasons in his decision, said Boeing Chairman, President and CEO Jim McNerney. "Shali has a record of service and accomplishment that is truly distinguished, and serving alongside him on the Boeing board has been a privilege," McNerney said. "He brought to Boeing great personal and professional strengthscommon sense and an intuitive feel for what is right; a deep concern for people and their welfare; and a broad, deep understanding of global affairs. Our people and our business are better for having had the benefit of his service."
Shalikashvili is retired chairman of the U.S. Department of Defense Joint Chiefs of Staff and former commander-in-chief of all U.S. forces in Europe. He served on the board's audit and finance committees, and chaired its special programs committee.
###
Contact Info:
John Dern
312-544-2002


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20060303171301.txt.gz
TIME:20060303171301
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
On February 27, 2006, the Compensation Committee (the "Committee") of the Board of Directors of the Boeing Company (the "Company") approved stock option grants and cash-based performance awards for certain executive officers under the Company's long-term incentive program. The performance awards pay out based on the achievement of long-term financial goals based on economic performance at the end of a three-year performance period. Individual target awards are based on a multiple of base salary, which is then converted into a number of units. Each unit has an initial value of $100. The amount payable at the end of the three-year performance period may be anywhere from $0 to $200 per unit, depending on the Company's performance against plan for the period ending on December 31, 2008. As a result, final awards may range from 0% to 200% of an individual's target. Payment will be made (at the discretion of the Committee) in the form of cash, stock or a combination of cash and stock. The stock options have an exercise price of $74.45, equal to the of Boeing stock on the February 27, 2006 grant date, vest annually over a three-year period and expire ten years after the date of grant. The for a single trading day is the mean of the high and low per share trading prices for the Company's stock as reported by for the New York Stock Exchange Composite Transactions.
Fair Market Value
Fair Market Value
The Wall Street Journal
The following table sets forth the performance awards and stock options granted on February 27, 2006 for the Company's named executive officers (as defined in Regulation S-K Item 402(a)(3)).
 
The Company intends to provide additional information regarding this and other compensation for the named executive officers in the definitive proxy statement for its 2006 annual meeting of shareholders, which is expected to be filed with the SEC later in March 2006.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: March 3, 2006


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20060426092643.txt.gz
TIME:20060426092643
EVENTS:	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
(a) Not applicable
 
(b) Not applicable
 
(c) Not applicable
 
(d) Exhibits
 
99.1    Press Release issued April 26, 2006.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Boeing Reports Double-Digit Growth in Revenue, Earnings and Cash Flow
 
 
 
 
 
Table 1. Summary Financial Results
 
 The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] today reported double-digit increases in its first-quarter financial performance and reaffirmed its 2006 and 2007 guidance, emphasizing its outlook for continued revenue and margin growth and strong cash flow.
CHICAGO, April 26, 2006
Boeing's first-quarter net income rose 29 percent to $692 million from $535 million a year ago, and earnings per share rose 33 percent to $0.88 per share from $0.66 per share last year. First-quarter results include a benefit of $0.03 per share due to tax settlements. Last year's results included a tax benefit of $0.14 per share, a charge of $0.07 per share related to divestitures, and a benefit of $0.02 per share due to a change in accounting method. Without those items, adjusted earnings per share* grew 49 percent from $0.57 in the first quarter of 2005. Reconciliations of GAAP earnings per share to adjusted earnings per share* are attached to this release.
 
Revenue for the quarter increased 12 percent to $14.3 billion from $12.7 billion, operating cash flow grew 46 percent to $2.1 billion and the company's operating margin rose to 6.7 percent from 5.4 percent.
"Strong overall performance, combined with a significant increase in commercial airplane deliveries, drove this quarter's results," said Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Jim McNerney. "Going forward, our strong market position and continued focus on growth and productivity should enable us to deliver financial results that reflect the quality of our people and our technologies."
Boeing's backlog at quarter end was a record $213 billion, up 42 percent from a year ago and 4 percent in the quarter. The growth primarily reflects the record 1,002 commercial airplane orders won during 2005 and the additional 176 orders received during the first quarter of 2006.
Free cash flow* grew 50 percent to $1.6 billion for the quarter after an investment of $0.4 billion in property, plant & equipment and a discretionary contribution of $0.5 billion in the company's pension plans (Table 2).
Table 2. Cash Flow
 
1 Includes pension contributions of $0.5 billion in the first quarter of each of 2006 and 2005.
* A definition of Boeing's non-GAAP measures, identified by an asterisk (*), is appended to this release.
Boeing's cash and investments in marketable securities totaled $9.8 billion at quarter's end, up 17 percent from $8.4 billion at the end of the previous quarter (Table 3) and up 56 percent from $6.3 billion at the end of the first quarter 2005. This reflected strong operating cash flow partially offset by the ongoing share repurchase program, pension plan contributions, and planned investments in Boeing's core businesses. The company repurchased 5.5 million shares during the quarter for $404 million, leaving 18.9 million shares available under the existing repurchase authorization.
The Boeing Company debt increased by $0.3 billion from the end of the fourth quarter to $4.2 billion due to an increase in capital lease obligations classified as debt. Boeing Capital Corporation debt was unchanged at $6.2 billion as strong portfolio cash flows funded modest new customer financing requirements.
 
Boeing's strong cash flow, balance sheet and liquidity led Moody's to raise its ratings of Boeing and Boeing Capital debt securities during the quarter. The short term rating is now P1 and the long term rating is now A2, with a stable outlook.
Table 3. Cash, Marketable Securities and Debt Balances
 
1 Marketable securities consists primarily of investments in high-quality fixed-income and asset-backed securities classified as "short-term investments" and "investments."
Segment Results
Commercial Airplanes
Boeing Commercial Airplanes' (BCA) first quarter revenues increased 48 percent to $7.1 billion on 40 percent growth in airplane deliveries (Table 4). Operating earnings rose 81 percent and operating margins increased to 10.0 percent, reflecting higher revenues, favorable model mix and productivity improvements, which more than exceeded planned increases in research and development expense.
The 787 Dreamliner program continued to make outstanding progress, while capturing an additional 54 firm orders during the quarter. In the two years from its launch, 26 customers have booked 350 firm orders for the new airplane.
BCA's contractual backlog increased 6 percent to $132 billion, reflecting 176 net orders during the quarter. BCA's backlog is up 107 percent from the end of the same quarter last year, driven by record orders in 2005 and continued strong order activity in the first quarter of 2006.
Table 4. Commercial Airplanes Operating Results
 
 
Integrated Defense Systems
Boeing Integrated Defense Systems (IDS) produced another quarter of double-digit operating margins, delivering 11.4 percent profitability on $7.2 billion of revenue (Table 5). Strong execution in both the Precision Engagement and Mobility Systems and Support Systems segments drove these results. Revenue declined 6 percent from a year ago as Support Systems's 10 percent revenue growth was offset by lower volume in Proprietary and commercial satellite programs, strike-delayed launches, and the August 2005 sale of our Rocketdyne business.
As previously announced, IDS has reorganized into three new business segments to more effectively address evolving customer requirements for capability-driven solutions, and improve productivity. Selected results for 2005 have been recast to reflect the new structure and are attached to this release.
In Precision Engagement and Mobility Systems, IDS continues to deliver aircraft and weapons systems to meet our customers' needs while improving profitability. Revenue was $3.1 billion for the quarter with operating margins of 15.1 percent. Higher deliveries on Apache and T-45 and strong performance across key programs such as C-17, F/A-18 and Rotorcraft drove improved margin performance, while revenue declined by 2 percent due to fewer planned milestone completions on 737 Airborne Early Warning & Control.
In Network and Space Systems, IDS achieved significant milestones on several key development programs. First-quarter revenue was $2.8 billion, a decrease of 15 percent from the first quarter of 2005 due to lower volume in Proprietary and Commercial satellite programs, and the Rocketdyne sale, partially offset by higher
Table 5. Integrated Defense Systems Operating Results
 
 
volume on the Future Combat System program. Operating margins decreased compared to the same quarter of 2005 due in part to higher cost estimates to complete work on Delta IV and a military satellite program, and partly due to benefits in 2005 that were not part of 2006 results, including higher contract values for Delta IV and the gain from the sale of Electron Dynamic Devices (EDD).
Support Systems revenues rose 10 percent to $1.3 billion while operating margins grew to 14.8 percent due to continued outstanding performance on its broad portfolio of services and logistics programs. These results were driven by increased volume in Integrated Logistics programs supporting C-17 and F/A-18, and Training Systems & Services programs supporting F-15.
IDS's industry-leading backlog remained stable at $80.6 billion, comprised of $42.3 billion contractual and $38.3 billion unobligated.
Boeing Capital Corporation
Boeing Capital Corporation (BCC) continued to support the operations of Boeing's business units and manage portfolio risk. Despite consistent revenues, pre-tax income rose 59 percent to $70 million primarily on reduced expenses for operations, asset impairments and aircraft redelivery (Table 6). BCC's quarter-end portfolio balance was $9.0 billion, down $0.2 billion from the end of the previous quarter and down $0.4 billion from the first quarter of 2005 as normal portfolio run-off and depreciation exceeded new business volume. These factors, combined with solid performance, allowed BCC to return $50 million in cash dividends and capital to Boeing during the quarter and more than $1 billion in the past 24 months. BCC leverage was down slightly to 4.9-to-1, as measured by the ratio of debt-to-equity.
Table 6. Boeing Capital Corporation Operating Results
 
Additional Information
The "Other" segment consists primarily of Boeing Technology and Connexion by Boeing
, as well as certain results related to the consolidation of all business units. For the first quarter, losses from operations softened slightly to $61 million from $75 million last year.
 
Pre-tax (non-cash) pension expense for the quarter was $190 million, down $33 million or $0.03 per share from the same period of 2005 which included a pre-tax, non-cash pension charge of $69 million from the EDD sale. Share-based-plans expense was $202 million, down $43 million from the same period of 2005. Deferred stock compensation expense was $109 million, or $0.09 per share, as Boeing's stock price rose 11 percent during the quarter.
Outlook
The company's financial guidance for 2006 and 2007 is reaffirmed. The company is forecasting solid growth in 2006 and 2007 that reflects continued strong performance from its core businesses, higher commercial airplane deliveries and company-wide productivity gains (Table 7).
Boeing's 2006 revenue is expected to be approximately $60 billion. Revenue guidance for 2007 is reaffirmed to be between $63.5 billion to $64.5 billion. Earnings per share for 2006 is expected to be between $3.25 and $3.45. Boeing also reaffirms its EPS guidance of between $4.10 and $4.30 per share for 2007. The company is maintaining its operating cash flow guidance for 2006 and 2007 at greater than $5.5 billion each year.
The current guidance doesn't reflect the impact of the pending United Launch Alliance (ULA) transaction. Network & Space Systems revenue guidance for 2006 includes approximately $1 billion for business planned to be part of ULA. Upon completion of the transaction, Boeing will use the equity method of accounting for the joint venture, recognizing Boeing's proportionate share of the venture's earnings in the Network & Space Systems segment.
The commercial airplane outlook is very strong. The 2006 delivery forecast remains at approximately 395 airplanes, 36 percent higher than in 2005, and deliveries in 2007 are expected to increase to between 440 and 445 airplanes. Commercial Airplanes' revenue for 2006 is expected to be approximately $27.5 billion, with operating margins greater than 9 percent, while revenue for 2007 is expected to be between $29.5 billion to $30.5 billion, with operating margins greater than 10 percent. The 2006 delivery forecast is sold out, and the forecast for 2007 is more than 98 percent sold out.
 
IDS revenue guidance is also reaffirmed at approximately $31.5 billion, with operating margins of approximately 10.5 percent for 2006. For 2007, IDS expects 2 to 5 percent revenue growth and operating margins above 10.5 percent.
Reflecting the new IDS segment structure, Precision Engagement & Mobility Systems expects revenues of approximately $14 billion and operating margins of approximately 13 percent in 2006, with a moderate growth outlook for 2007 and operating margins continuing in the low double-digit range. Network & Space Systems expects revenues of approximately $11.5 billion and margins of approximately 6 percent, with a moderate growth outlook for 2007 and operating margins in the high single digits. Support Systems expects revenue to be approximately $6 billion in 2006 with operating margins of about 13.5 percent, followed by moderate revenue growth in 2007 and operating margins continuing in the low double-digit range.
Boeing's research and development outlays are forecast between $2.6 billion and $2.8 billion in 2006 and between $2.7 billion and $2.9 billion in 2007, reflecting continued investment in planned product development programs such as the 787 and 747-8. Annual capital expenditures should be approximately $1.6 billion in 2006 and $1.5 billion in 2007.
The company's non-cash pension expense is expected to be approximately $1 billion for 2006 and for 2007. Pension cash funding is expected to be approximately $500 million in each of those years; the planned funding for 2006 was completed in the first quarter. The company will continue to evaluate making additional discretionary contributions to its pension plans.
 
Table 7. Financial Outlook
 
1 After forecast pension contributions of $0.5 billion in each of 2006 and 2007.
 
Non-GAAP Measure Disclosure
Management believes that the non-GAAP (Generally Accepted Accounting Principles) measures (indicated by an asterisk *) used in this report provide investors with important perspectives into the company's ongoing business performance. The company does not intend for the information to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the related GAAP measure. Other companies may define the measure differently. The following definitions are provided for free cash flow and adjusted earnings per share.
Free Cash Flow
Free cash flow is defined as GAAP operating cash flow less capital expenditures for property, plant, and equipment, additions. Management believes free cash flow provides investors with an important perspective on the cash available for shareholders, debt repayment, and acquisitions after making the capital investments required to support ongoing business operations and long term value creation. Free cash flow does not represent the residual cash flow available for discretionary expenditures as it excludes certain mandatory expenditures such as repayment of maturing debt. Management uses free cash flow internally to assess both business performance and overall liquidity. Table 2 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and free cash flow.
Adjusted earnings per share
Adjusted earnings per share is defined as diluted earnings per share computed in accordance with GAAP adjusted for certain significant charges or credits. Management believes adjusted earnings per share are important to understanding the company's on-going operations and provide additional insights into underlying business performance. Significant charges or credits are described in the attachments to this release which provide reconciliations between GAAP earnings per share and adjusted earnings per share.
 
Certain statements in this report may constitute "forward-looking" statements within the meaning of the Private Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Forward-looking statements in this press release include, among others, statements regarding future results as a result of our growth and productivity initiatives, our 2006 and 2007 financial outlook and the benefits of the new IDS structure. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions as to future events that may not prove to be accurate. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak only as of the date they were made and we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise. Our actual results and future trends may differ materially depending on a variety of factors, including the continued operation, viability and growth of major airline customers and non-airline customers (such as the U.S. Government); adverse developments in the value of collateral securing customer and other financings; the occurrence of any significant collective bargaining labor dispute; our successful execution of internal performance plans including our company-wide growth and productivity initiatives, production rate increases and decreases (including any reduction in or termination of an aircraft product), acquisition and divestiture plans, and other cost-reduction and productivity efforts; charges from any future SFAS No. 142 review; an adverse development in rating agency credit ratings or assessments; the actual outcomes of certain pending sales campaigns and the launch of the 787 program and U.S. and foreign government procurement activities, including the uncertainty associated with the procurement of tankers by the U.S. Department of Defense (DoD) and funding of the C-17 program; the cyclical nature of some of our businesses; unanticipated financial market changes which may impact pension plan assumptions; domestic and international competition in the defense, space and commercial areas; continued integration of acquired businesses; performance issues with key suppliers, subcontractors and customers; significant disruption to air travel worldwide (including future terrorist attacks); global trade policies; worldwide political stability; domestic and international economic conditions; price escalation; the outcome of political and legal processes, changing priorities or reductions in the U.S. Government or foreign government defense and space budgets; termination of government or commercial contracts due to unilateral government or customer action or failure to perform; legal, financial and governmental risks related to international transactions; legal and investigatory proceedings; tax settlements with the IRS and various states; U.S. Air Force review of previously awarded contracts; and other economic, political and technological risks and uncertainties. Additional information regarding these factors is contained in our SEC filings, including, without limitation, our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2005.
Cxxxx
Contact:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
In addition to disclosing results that are determined in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), the company also discloses non-GAAP results that exclude certain significant charges or credits that are important to an understanding of the company's ongoing operations. The company provides reconciliations of its non-GAAP financial reporting to the most comparable GAAP reporting. The company believes that discussion of results excluding certain significant charges or credits provides additional insights into underlying business performance. Adjusted earnings per share is not a measure recognized under GAAP. The determination of significant charges or credits may not be comparable to similarly titled measures used by other companies and may vary from quarter to quarter.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20060504173131.txt.gz
TIME:20060504173131
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On April 30, 2006, The Boeing Company, a Delaware corporation ("Boeing"), entered into a definitive agreement and plan of merger (the "Merger Agreement") with Boeing-Avenger, Inc., a Delaware corporation and direct wholly owned subsidiary of Boeing, and Aviall, Inc., a Delaware corporation ("Aviall"), pursuant to which Boeing agreed to acquire Aviall in an all cash merger (the "Merger") for $48.00 per share or approximately $1.7 billion. Boeing will also assume approximately $350 million of net debt in the Merger.
Pursuant to the terms of the Merger Agreement and subject to the conditions thereof, each issued and outstanding share of Aviall's common stock, other than shares owned by any stockholders who are entitled to and who properly exercise dissenters' rights under the Delaware General Corporation Law, will be cancelled and converted automatically into the right to receive $48.00 in cash, without interest. Holders of options and warrants exercisable for Aviall common stock will also receive $48.00 per share for each share subject to such options and warrants less the applicable exercise price. Upon completion of the Merger, Aviall will become a wholly owned subsidiary of Boeing.
The Merger Agreement contains certain termination rights for both Boeing and Aviall, and further provides that, upon termination of the Merger Agreement under specified circumstances, Aviall may be required to pay Boeing a termination fee of $44.4 million and to reimburse Boeing for its out-of-pocket expenses in connection with the Merger in an aggregate amount of up to $2.5 million.
The Merger is expected to be completed by the end of the third quarter in 2006, subject to regulatory approvals, the approval of Aviall's stockholders, as well as other customary closing conditions. Boeing has filed a copy of the Merger Agreement as Exhibit 2.1 to this current report on Form 8-K. You are encouraged to read the Merger Agreement for a more complete understanding of the transaction. The foregoing description of the Merger Agreement is qualified in its entirety by reference to the full text of the Merger Agreement.
As a material inducement to the willingness of Boeing to enter into the Merger Agreement, simultaneously with the execution of the Merger Agreement, certain employee-stockholders of Aviall entered into amendments and restatements to their employment or severance agreements with each of Boeing and Aviall and non-competition agreements with Boeing, none of which is effective until the Effective Time.
Additional Information and Where to Find It
This current report on Form 8-K may be deemed to be solicitation material in respect of the proposed Merger of Aviall and Boeing. In connection with the proposed Merger, Aviall plans to file a proxy statement with the SEC. INVESTORS AND SECURITY HOLDERS OF AVIALL ARE ADVISED TO READ THE PROXY STATEMENT AND ANY OTHER RELEVANT DOCUMENTS FILED WITH THE SEC WHEN THEY BECOME AVAILABLE BECAUSE THOSE DOCUMENTS WILL CONTAIN IMPORTANT INFORMATION ABOUT THE PROPOSED MERGER. The final proxy statement will be mailed to stockholders of Aviall. Investors and security holders may obtain a free copy of the proxy statement when it
 
becomes available, and other documents filed by Aviall with the SEC, at the SEC's web site at http://www.sec.gov. Free copies of the proxy statement, when it becomes available, and Aviall's other filings with the SEC may also be obtained from Aviall. Free copies of Aviall's filings may be obtained by directing a request to Aviall, Inc., 2750 Regent Boulevard, DFW Airport, Texas, 75261, Attention: Secretary.
Boeing, Aviall and their respective directors, executive officers and other members of their management and employees may be deemed to be soliciting proxies from Aviall's stockholders in favor of the proposed Merger. Information regarding Boeing's directors and executive officers is available in Boeing's proxy statement for its 2006 annual meeting of stockholders, which was filed with the SEC on March 24, 2006. Information regarding Aviall's directors and executive officers is available in Aviall's proxy statement for its 2006 annual meeting of stockholders, which was filed with the SEC on April 27, 2006. Additional information regarding the interests of such potential participants will be included in the proxy statement and the other relevant documents filed with the SEC when they become available.
Forward-Looking Information Is Subject to Risk and Uncertainty
A number of the matters discussed in this current report on Form 8-K that are not historical or current facts deal with potential future circumstances and developments, in particular, whether and when the transactions contemplated by the Merger Agreement will be consummated. The discussion of such matters is qualified by the inherent risks and uncertainties surrounding future expectations generally, and also may materially differ from actual future experience involving any one or more of such matters. Such risks and uncertainties include: the result of the review of the proposed transactions by various regulatory agencies, and any conditions imposed on the companies in connection with consummation of the transactions described herein; approval of the Merger by the stockholders of Aviall; satisfaction of various other conditions to the closing of the transactions described herein; and the risks that are described from time to time in Boeing's and Aviall's respective reports filed with the SEC, including each company's annual report on Form 10K for the year ended December 31, 2005 and Boeing's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2006. This current report on Form 8-K speaks only as of its date, and Boeing disclaims any duty to update the information herein.
Item 8.01. Other Events.
On May 1, 2006, Boeing issued a press release in which it announced that it had entered into the Merger Agreement. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits
2.1 Agreement and Plan of Merger, dated April 30, 2006, by and among The Boeing Company, Boeing-Avenger, Inc., a direct wholly owned subsidiary of Boeing, and Aviall, Inc. (Certain schedules and exhibits have been omitted and Boeing agrees to furnish to the Commission supplementally a copy of any omitted schedules and exhibits upon request.)
99.1 Press Release, issued May 1, 2006.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 2.1
Execution Version
Execution Version
 
 
Execution Version
 
 
Execution Version
 
 
Execution Version
 
 
Execution Version
 
 
AGREEMENT AND PLAN OF MERGER, dated as of April 30, 2006 (this ""), by and among The Boeing Company, a Delaware corporation (""), Boeing-Avenger, Inc., a Delaware corporation and a direct wholly owned subsidiary of Parent (""), and Aviall, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "").
Agreement
Parent
Merger Sub
Company
WHEREAS, the respective Boards of Directors of Parent, Merger Sub and the Company have approved and declared advisable this Agreement and the merger of Merger Sub with and into the Company (the "") upon the terms and subject to the conditions of this Agreement and in accordance with the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (the ""); and
Merger
DGCL
WHEREAS, the respective Boards of Directors of Parent, Merger Sub and the Company have determined that the Merger is in furtherance of and consistent with their respective business strategies and is in the best interest of their respective stockholders; and
WHEREAS, as a material inducement to the willingness of Parent to enter into this Agreement, simultaneously with the execution of this Agreement, certain employee-stockholders are entering into amendments and restatements to their employment or severance agreements with each of the parties hereto and non-competition agreements with Parent (the "").
Retention and Non-Competition Agreements
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the foregoing and the respective representations, warranties, covenants and agreements set forth in this Agreement and intending to be legally bound hereby, the parties hereto agree as follows:
For purposes of this Agreement, the term:
"" means, with respect to the Company, any agreement, offer, proposal or indication of interest (other than this Agreement, the Merger or any other offer, proposal or indication of interest by Parent) relating to or involving (i) the purchase from the Company or any Company Subsidiary or any acquisition by any Person or Group of more than a 10% interest in the total outstanding voting securities of the Company or more than a 10% interest in the total outstanding voting securities of any Company Subsidiary or any tender offer or exchange offer that if consummated would result in any Person or Group Beneficially Owning 10% or more of the total outstanding voting securities of the Company or 10% or more of the total outstanding voting securities of any Company Subsidiary, (ii) any merger, consolidation, business combination or similar transaction involving the Company or any Company Subsidiary, or (iii) any sale, lease, mortgage, pledge, exchange, transfer, license, acquisition or disposition of 10% or more of the consolidated assets of the Company and the Company Subsidiaries in any single transaction or series of related transactions (other than in the ordinary course of business).
Acquisition Proposal
"" has the meaning used in Rule 145 promulgated under the Securities Act.
Affiliate
"" has the meaning set forth in the preamble.
Agreement
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 4.6(d).
Anti-Bribery Laws
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.7(c).
Antitrust Laws
 
"" (and related terms such as "Beneficially Owning" or "Beneficial Owner") shall have the meaning set forth in Rule 13d-3 under the Exchange Act.
Beneficial Ownership
"" means state securities or "blue sky" laws.
Blue Sky Laws
"" has the meaning used in Rule 14d-1(g) promulgated under the Exchange Act.
Business Day
"" means the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act of 1980, as amended as of the date hereof.
CERCLA
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.3.
Certificate of Merger
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 3.2(a).
Certificates
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 4.7(a).
Certifications
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.2.
Closing
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.2.
Closing Date
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 4.10(c).
COBRA
"" means the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.
Code
"" has the meaning set forth in the preamble.
Company
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 4.7(b).
Company Balance Sheet
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 4.7(b).
Company Balance Sheet Date
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 4.10(a).
Company Benefit Plans
"" means the Board of Directors of the Company.
Company Board
"" means the unanimous recommendation by the Company Board that the Company's stockholders vote in favor of the adoption of this Agreement.
Company Board Recommendation
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 4.2.
Company Bylaws
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 4.2.
Company Certificate of Incorporation
"" means a share of common stock, par value $0.01 per share, of the Company.
Company Common Share
"" has the meaning set forth in the preamble to Article 4.
Company Disclosure Schedule
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 4.17.
Company Financial Advisor
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 4.7(b).
Company Financial Statements
 
"" means (i) any and all Intellectual Property used or held for use in the conduct of the business of the Company and the Company Subsidiaries as currently conducted and (ii) any and all other Intellectual Property owned by the Company and the Company Subsidiaries.
Company IP Rights
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 4.14(h).
Company IP Rights Agreements
"" means any option granted, and not exercised, expired or terminated, in connection with the performance of services, to a current or former employee, director or independent contractor of the Company or any of the Company Subsidiaries or any predecessor thereof to purchase Company Common Shares pursuant to any Company Stock Option Plan.
Company Option
"" means Company IP Rights that are owned by the Company or any of the Company Subsidiaries.
Company-Owned IP Rights
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 4.6(a).
Company Permits
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 4.3(a).
Company Preferred Shares
"" means all United States, international and foreign (i) patents and patent applications (including provisional applications) and all reissues, divisions, renewals, extensions, continuations and continuations in part, (ii) registered trademarks and service marks, applications to register trademarks or service marks, intent-to-use applications, or other registrations or applications related to trademarks or service marks, (iii) registered Internet domain names, (iv) registered copyrights and applications for copyright registration, and (v) any other Intellectual Property that is the subject of an application, certificate, filing, registration or other document issued, filed with, or recorded by the United States Patent and Trademark Office, the United States Copyright Office, or any equivalent Governmental Entity, in each case of (i) through (v) that is owned by, registered or filed in the name of, the Company or any of the Company Subsidiaries.
Company Registered Intellectual Property
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 3.4(c).
Company SARs
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 4.7(a).
Company SEC Reports
"" means any software source code, any material portion or aspect thereof, or any material proprietary information or algorithm contained in or relating to any software source code of any Company-Owned IP Rights.
Company Source Code
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 4.4(a).
Company Stockholders Approval
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 4.4(a).
Company Stockholders Meeting
"" means any stock option, stock bonus, stock award or stock purchase plan, program or arrangement, as amended to date, of the Company or any of the Company Subsidiaries or any predecessor thereof, including the Company's 1998 Director's Stock Plan and the 1998 Stock Incentive Plan.
Company Stock Option Plan
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 4.1(a).
Company Subsidiary
"" means warrants to purchase Company Common Shares (other than Company Options and stock appreciation rights).
Company Warrants
 
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 4.14(s).
Confidential Information
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.5.
Confidentiality Agreement
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.11(a).
Continuing Employees
"" means any agreement, contract, subcontract, lease, sublease, power of attorney, note, loan, evidence of Indebtedness, purchase and sales order, letter of credit, undertaking, covenant not to compete, license, instrument, obligation, commitment, binding understanding, promise, indenture, option, warranty, policy or quotation, whether oral or written, express or implied.
Contract
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 4.11(c).
Cost Accounting Standards
"" means the Company's senior secured credit facility, as described in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the period ending December 31, 2005, and any footnotes, schedules or exhibits thereto including any other documents or instruments executed in connection therewith.
Credit Facility
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 4.19(a).
Dallas Lease
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 3.5.
Dissenting Shares
"" means (a) the sale, license or other disposition or holding separate (through the establishment of a trust or otherwise) of any assets or categories of assets of Parent or any of its Affiliates or the Company or any Company Subsidiary or (b) the holding separate of the Company Common Shares or any limitation or regulation on the ability of Parent or any of its Affiliates to exercise full rights of ownership of the Company Common Shares.
Divestiture
"" has the meaning set forth in the preamble.
DGCL
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.10(b).
D&O Insurance
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 4.7(a).
EDGAR
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.3.
Effective Time
"" means, with respect to any asset, any mortgage, deed of trust, lien, pledge, charge, security interest, title retention device, conditional sale or other security arrangement, collateral assignment, claim, charge, adverse claim of title, ownership or other similar encumbrance of any kind in respect of such asset (including any restriction on (i) the voting of any security or the transfer of any security or other asset, (ii) the receipt of any income derived from any asset, and (iii) the use of any asset) other than any encumbrance arising (A) under applicable Laws with respect to Taxes not yet due and payable, or (B) under the Credit Facility.
Encumbrance
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 4.18.
Engagement Letter
"" means all written or oral accusations, allegations, complaints, notices of violation, claims, demands, suits or causes of action for any damage, including personal injury or property damage, investigatory costs, clean-up costs, governmental response costs, natural resources damages, fines or penalties, arising out of or related to Environmental Conditions or pursuant to applicable Environmental Laws.
Environmental Claims
 
"" means Releases relating to or arising out of the use, handling, storage, treatment, disposal, recycling, generation or transportation of Hazardous Substances by the Company or any Company Subsidiary or any entity for which the Company has financial responsibility. With respect to Environmental Claims by third parties, Environmental Conditions also include the exposure of Persons to Hazardous Substances from the operations of the Company or any Company Subsidiary or any entity for which the Company has financial responsibility at the workplace or the exposure of Persons or property to Hazardous Substances from the operations of the Company or any Company Subsidiary or any entity for which the Company has financial responsibility migrating from or otherwise emanating from the Facilities.
Environmental Conditions
"" means all applicable foreign, federal, state, district and local laws, all rules or regulations promulgated thereunder, and all orders, consent orders, judgments, notices, or permits issued, promulgated or entered pursuant thereto (collectively, ""), relating to pollution or protection of the environment and occupational safety and health, including (i) Regulations relating to emissions, discharges, releases or threatened releases of Hazardous Substances into the environment, (ii) Regulations relating to the identification, generation, manufacture, processing, distribution, use, treatment, storage, disposal, recovery, transport or other handling of Hazardous Substances, (iii) Regulations relating to the health and safety of Persons (including employees) or property, (iv) CERCLA, (v) the Toxic Substances Control Act, (vi) the Hazardous Materials Transportation Act, (vii) the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, (viii) the Clean Water Act, (ix) the Safe Drinking Water Act, (x) the Clean Air Act, (xi) the Occupational Health and Safety Act, (xii) Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, Rodenticide Act, and (xiii) the Emergency Planning and Community Right-to-Know Act.
Environmental Laws
Regulations
"" means any and all written reports, audits, inspections, reviews, assessments, evaluations or other analyses that are in the possession or control of the Company or any Company Subsidiary of (i) any Environmental Conditions in, on or about the Facilities or (ii) compliance with applicable Environmental Laws.
Environmental Reports
"" means any share, capital stock, partnership, member or similar interest in any Person, and any option, warrant, right or security (including debt securities) convertible, exchangeable or exercisable therefor.
Equity Interest
"" means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended, and the regulations promulgated thereunder.
ERISA
"" means any entity or trade or business (whether or not incorporated), other than the Company, that together with the Company is considered under common control and treated as a single employer under Sections 414(b), (c), (m) or (o) of the Code.
ERISA Affiliate
"" means the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.
Exchange Act
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 3.2(b).
Exchange Agent
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 3.2(b).
Exchange Fund
"" includes all reasonable out-of-pocket expenses (including all fees and expenses of legal counsel, accountants, investment bankers, experts and consultants to a party hereto and its Affiliates) incurred by a party or on its behalf in connection with or related to the authorization, preparation, negotiation, execution and performance of this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby, including the preparation, printing, filing and mailing of the Proxy Statement and the solicitation of stockholder approvals and all other matters related to the transactions contemplated hereby.
Expenses
 
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 4.6(c).
Export Control Laws
"" means all plants, offices, manufacturing facilities, stores, warehouses, administration buildings and real property and related facilities and fixtures owned or leased at any time by the Company or any of the Company Subsidiaries.
Facilities
"" means each compensation and benefit plan required to be maintained or contributed to by the Law or applicable custom or rule of the relevant jurisdiction outside of the United States except for plans maintained by Governmental Entities.
Foreign Plan
"" means generally accepted accounting principles as applied in the United States.
GAAP
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 4.11(c).
Government Contract
"" means any supranational, national, state, municipal, local or foreign government, any court, tribunal, arbitrator, administrative agency, commission or other governmental official, authority or instrumentality, in each case whether domestic or foreign, any stock exchange or similar self-regulatory organization or any quasi-governmental or private body exercising any regulatory, Taxing or any other governmental or quasi-governmental entity.
Governmental Entity
"" has the meaning as used in Section 13 of the Exchange Act, except where the context otherwise requires.
Group
"" means all pollutants, contaminants, chemicals, wastes, and any other infectious, carcinogenic, ignitable, corrosive, reactive, toxic or otherwise hazardous substances or materials (whether solids, liquids or gases) subject to regulation, control or remediation under applicable Environmental Laws. By way of example only, the term Hazardous Substances includes petroleum and/or petroleum by-products, urea formaldehyde, flammable, explosive and radioactive materials, radon gas, polychlorinated biphenyls, pesticides, herbicides and asbestos.
Hazardous Substances
"" means the Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976, as amended, and the rules and regulations thereunder.
HSR Act
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.10(a).
Indemnified Parties
"" means, with respect to any Person, without duplication, (i) all obligations of such Person for borrowed money, or with respect to deposits or advances of any kind to such Person, (ii) all obligations of such Person evidenced by bonds, debentures, notes or similar instruments, (iii) all obligations of such Person upon which interest charges are customarily paid, (iv) all obligations of such Person under conditional sale or other title retention agreements relating to property purchased by such Person, (v) all obligations of such Person issued or assumed as the deferred purchase price of property or services (excluding obligations of such Person to creditors for raw materials, inventory, services and supplies incurred in the ordinary course of such Person's business), (vi) all capitalized lease obligations of such Person, (vii) all obligations of others secured by any Encumbrance on property or assets owned or acquired by such Person, whether or not the obligations secured thereby have been assumed, (viii) all obligations of such Person under interest rate or currency swap transactions (valued at the termination value thereof), (ix) all letters of credit issued for the account of such Person (excluding letters of credit issued for the benefit of suppliers to support accounts payable to suppliers incurred in the ordinary course
Indebtedness
 
of business), (x) all obligations of such Person to purchase securities (or other property) that arise out of or in connection with the sale of the same or substantially similar securities or property, and (xi) all guarantees and arrangements having the economic effect of a guarantee of such Person of any indebtedness of any other Person.
"" means any and all worldwide industrial and intellectual property rights, including all patents and applications therefor and all reissues, divisions, renewals, extensions, provisionals, continuations and continuations-in-part thereof, all inventions (whether patentable or not), invention disclosures, improvements, trade secrets, proprietary information, know-how, technology, technical data, proprietary processes and formulae, algorithms, specifications, customer lists and supplier lists, all designs and any registrations and applications therefor, all trade names, logos, common law trademarks and service marks, trademark and service mark registrations and applications therefor, Internet domain names, all copyrights, copyright registrations and applications therefor, and all other rights corresponding thereto, all computer software, including all source code, object code, firmware, and development tools, images, drawings, graphics, files, records and data, all rights in prototypes, all databases and data collections and all rights therein, all moral and economic rights of authors and inventors, however denominated, and any similar or equivalent rights to any of the foregoing.
Intellectual Property
"" means the United States Internal Revenue Service.
IRS
"" means, with respect to a Person, the actual knowledge of a fact, circumstance, event or other matter by the officers and directors of such Person.
knowledge
"" means any foreign or domestic federal, state, provincial, local, municipal or other law, statute, code, treaty, ordinance, requirement, rule, regulation, legal doctrine, order, permit, judgment, writ, stipulation, award, injunction, decree or arbitration award or finding.
Law
"" means the Company or its Representatives (i) made such materials available to Parent or its Representatives during Parent's physical due diligence inspection conducted between April 4, 2006 and April 8, 2006 at the offices of Haynes and Boone, LLP, 901 Main Street, Suite 3100, Dallas, Texas 75202-3789, which materials were (x) as set forth on the data room indices previously provided to Parent or its Representatives (true, correct and complete copies of which are posted to the electronic database referred to in (iii) below and physically delivered to Parent) or (y) physically delivered on or before April 29, 2006 to Parent in the manner described in the applicable Section of the Company Disclosure Schedule, (ii) posted such materials on the Company's website at www.aviall.com on or before April 29, 2006, (iii) provided access to such materials, to Parent or its Representatives on an electronic database managed by Haynes and Boone, LLP at www.clientconnect.net, between April 10, 2006 and April 29, 2006, or (iv) filed Company SEC Reports with the SEC which were available through EDGAR on or prior to the date of this Agreement.
Made Available
"" means any effect, event, occurrence, development, circumstance, change or condition, including without limitation a conflict with, or default or violation of, any Law (each an "") that, individually or in the aggregate with other Effects is, or is reasonably likely, to (i) be materially adverse to the capitalization, assets (including intangible assets), liabilities, business, financial condition or results of operations of the Company and the Company Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, or (ii) materially impede or delay the Company's ability to consummate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement in accordance with its terms and applicable Laws; except for the purposes of clause (i) above to the extent that such Effect results from (A) changes or conditions affecting economic or capital markets in the United States or internationally (which changes or conditions, in each case, do not affect the Company in a substantially disproportionate manner), (B) changes in international or national political conditions generally (which changes, in each case, do not affect the Company in a substantially
Material Adverse Effect
Effect
 
disproportionate manner), (C) changes or conditions affecting the aerospace industry generally (which changes or conditions, in each case, do not affect the Company in a substantially disproportionate manner), (D) changes in any Laws or GAAP or the accounting rules and regulations of the SEC (which changes, in each case, do not affect the Company in a substantially disproportionate manner), (E) the announcement of this Agreement or the transactions contemplated hereby, or (F) any changes in the trading volume or trading prices of Company Common Shares, or any failure by the Company to meet analyst's forecasts or projections (it being understood that the underlying cause of or causes of such changes or failure may be deemed to constitute a Material Adverse Effect, and this clause (F) shall be disregarded in determining whether the underlying cause of such changes or failure is itself a Material Adverse Effect).
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 4.11(a).
Material Contract
"" has the meaning set forth in the preamble.
Merger
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 3.1(a).
Merger Consideration
"" has the meaning set forth in the preamble.
Merger Sub
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.17(c).
Noteholders
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.17(b).
Notes Consents
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.17(a).
Notes Offer to Purchase
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.17(a).
Notes Tender Offer
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.17(c).
Notes Tender Offer Documents
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.6(d).
Notice of Superior Offer
"" means all software or other material that is distributed as "free software," "open source software" or under a similar licensing or distribution term.
Open Source Materials
"" means all filings made by, or required to be made by, the Company or Parent, as the case may be, with the SEC, other than the Proxy Statement.
Other Filings
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 8.1(b).
Outside Date
"" has the meaning set forth in the preamble.
Parent
"" means any Effect that, individually or in the aggregate with other Effects, is, or is reasonably likely, to (i) be materially adverse to the capitalization, assets (including intangible assets), liabilities, business, financial condition or results of operations of Parent and Parent Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, or (ii) materially impede or delay Parent's ability to consummate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement in accordance with its terms and applicable Laws; except for the purposes of clause (i) above to the extent that such Effect results from (A) changes or conditions affecting economic or capital markets in the United States or internationally (which changes or conditions, in each case, do not affect Parent in a substantially disproportionate manner), (B) changes in international or national political or regulatory conditions generally (which changes do not affect Parent in a substantially disproportionate manner), (C) changes or conditions affecting the aerospace industry
Parent Material Adverse Effect
 
generally (which changes or conditions, in each case, do not affect Parent in a substantially disproportionate manner), (D) changes in any Laws or GAAP or the accounting rules and regulations of the SEC (which changes, in each case, do not affect Parent in a substantially disproportionate manner), (E) the announcement of this Agreement or the transactions contemplated hereby, or (F), any changes in the trading volume or trading prices of the capital stock of Parent or failure by Parent to meet analyst's forecasts or projections (it being understood that the underlying cause of or causes of such changes or failure may be deemed to constitute a Parent Material Adverse Effect, and this clause (F) shall be disregarded in determining whether the underlying cause of such changes or failure is itself a Parent Material Adverse Effect).
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 5.3(a).
Parent Subsidiary
"" means an individual, corporation, limited liability company, partnership (limited, general or otherwise), association, trust, business trust, unincorporated organization, or other entity or group.
Person
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.17(d).
Proposed Amendments
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.3(a).
Proxy Statement
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 8.1(b).
Regulatory Conditions
"" means any past or present releasing, spilling, leaking, pumping, pouring, emitting, emptying, discharging, injecting, escaping, leaching, disposing or dumping into the environment or the workplace of any Hazardous Substance.
Release
"" means an entity's directors, officers, employees, Affiliates, accountants, consultants, legal counsel, advisors, investment bankers, brokers, agents and other representatives.
Representatives
"" means outstanding rights to repurchase Company Common Shares that are held by the Company or similar restrictions in the Company's favor with respect to Company Common Shares.
Repurchase Rights
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 7.1(b).
Restraint
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.12(b).
Savings Plan
"" means the Securities and Exchange Commission.
SEC
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.3.
Secretary of State
"" means the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.
Securities Act
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.17(a).
Senior Notes
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 4.7(a).
SOXA
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 4.14(g).
Standard NDAs
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 4.7(b).
Statement No. 5
 
"" of a specified entity means any corporation, partnership, limited liability company, joint venture or other entity of which the specified entity (either alone or through or together with any other subsidiary) owns, directly or indirectly, 50% or more of the stock or other equity or partnership interests.
Subsidiary
"" means, with respect to the Company, an unsolicited, bona fide written offer made by a third party for an Acquisition Proposal (except that references to "10%" in clauses (i) and (iii) of the definition of "Acquisition Proposal" shall be deemed to be a reference to "50%"), on terms that the Company Board has in good faith concluded (after consultation with its outside legal counsel and its financial advisor), taking into account, among other things, all legal, financial, regulatory and other aspects of the offer and the Person making the offer, to be more favorable, from a financial point of view, to the Company's stockholders (in their capacities as stockholders) than the terms of the Merger and is reasonably capable of being consummated.
Superior Offer
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.17(d).
Supplemental Indenture
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.1.
Surviving Corporation
"" means (i) all taxes, levies, assessments, duties, imposts or other like assessments, charges or fees (including estimated taxes, charges and fees), including income, profits, corporations, advance corporation, gross receipts, transfer, excise, property, sales, use value-added, ad valorem, license, capital, wage, employment, payroll, withholding, social security, severance, occupation, import, custom, stamp, alternative, add-on minimum, environmental, franchise or other governmental taxes or charges, imposed by any Governmental Entity responsible for the imposition of any such tax (each, a ""), including any interest, penalties or additions to tax applicable or related thereto, (ii) all liability for the payment of any amounts of the type described in clause (i) as the result of being (or ceasing to be) a member of an affiliated, consolidated, combined or unitary group (or being included (or required to be included) in any Tax Return related thereto), and (iii) all liability for the payment of any amounts as a result of an express or implied obligation to indemnify or otherwise assume or succeed to the liability of any other Person with respect to the payment of any amounts of the type described in clause (i) or clause (ii).
Taxes
Tax Authority
"" means any report, return, statement, declaration, claim for refund, information return or other written information (including any related or supporting schedules, statements or information and amended returns) filed or required to be filed in connection with any Taxes, including the administration of any Laws, regulations or administrative requirements relating to any Taxes.
Tax Return
"" means any Intellectual Property owned by a third party.
Third Party Intellectual Property Rights
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 4.10(n).
WARN Act
2.1 . Upon the terms and subject to satisfaction or waiver of the conditions set forth in this Agreement, and in accordance with the DGCL, Merger Sub, at the Effective Time, shall be merged with and into the Company. As a result of the Merger, the separate corporate existence of Merger Sub shall cease and the Company shall continue as the surviving corporation of the Merger (the "").
The Merger
Surviving Corporation
 
2.2 . The closing of the transactions contemplated hereby (the "") shall take place at 10:00 am (EST) on a date designated by Parent but that shall be no later than five Business Days after the satisfaction or waiver of each of the conditions set forth in Article 7 (other than those conditions that by their terms are to be satisfied at Closing, but subject to the satisfaction or waiver of such condition at such time) or at such other time or date as the parties hereto agree. The Closing shall take place at the offices of Sheppard, Mullin, Richter & Hampton LLP, 30 Rockefeller Plaza, Suite 2400, New York, NY 10112, or at such other location as the parties hereto agree. The date on which the Closing occurs is herein referred to as the "."
The Closing
Closing
Closing Date
2.3 . Subject to the provisions of this Agreement, a certificate of merger satisfying the applicable requirements of the DGCL (the "") shall be duly executed by the Company, and, simultaneously with or as soon as practicable following the Closing, filed with the Secretary of State of the State of Delaware (the ""). The Merger shall become effective upon the later of: (a) the date and time of the filing of the Certificate of Merger with the Secretary of State, or (b) such later date and time as may be specified in the Certificate of Merger with the prior written consent of Parent. The date and time the Merger becomes effective is referred to in this Agreement as the ""
Effective Time
Certificate of Merger
Secretary of State
Effective Time.
2.4 . At the Effective Time, the effect of the Merger shall be as provided in this Agreement, the Certificate of Merger and the applicable provisions of the DGCL. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, at the Effective Time, except as otherwise provided herein, all the property, rights, privileges, powers and franchises of the Company and Merger Sub shall vest in the Surviving Corporation, and all debts, liabilities and duties of the Company and Merger Sub shall become the debts, liabilities and duties of the Surviving Corporation.
Effect of the Merger
2.5 . At the Effective Time, the Company Certificate of Incorporation and the Company Bylaws as in effect immediately prior to the Effective Time shall be amended so as to read in the forms of and hereto, respectively, and, as so amended, shall be the certificate of incorporation and bylaws of the Surviving Corporation.
Certificate of Incorporation; Bylaws
Exhibits A
B
2.6 . The directors of Merger Sub immediately prior to the Effective Time, together with Paul E. Fulchino, shall be the directors of the Surviving Corporation, each to hold office in accordance with the certificate of incorporation and bylaws of the Surviving Corporation. The officers of the Company immediately prior to the Effective Time shall be the officers of the Surviving Corporation, together with such other Persons (if any) as set forth on Section 2.6 of the Company Disclosure Schedule, each to hold office in accordance with the certificate of incorporation and bylaws of the Surviving Corporation.
Directors and Officers
3.1 . At the Effective Time, by virtue of the Merger and without any action on the part of Merger Sub, the Company or the holders of any of the following securities:
Conversion of Securities
(a) . Each Company Common Share issued and outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time (other than any Company Common Shares to be canceled pursuant to Section 3.1(b) and Dissenting Shares referred to in Section 3.5) shall be converted, subject to other provisions of this Section 3.1 and Section 3.2(e), into the right to receive $48.00 in cash without interest (the ""). At the Effective Time, all such Company Common Shares shall no longer be outstanding and shall automatically cease to exist, and each certificate previously representing any such shares shall thereafter represent only the right to receive the Merger Consideration, subject to other provisions of this Section 3.1, Section 3.2(e) and Section 3.5.
Conversion Generally
Merger Consideration
 
(b) . Each Company Common Share held, immediately prior to the Effective Time, by the Company, Parent, Merger Sub or any Subsidiary of Company, Parent or Merger Sub shall be canceled and extinguished without any conversion thereof, and no payment shall be made with respect thereto.
Cancellation of Certain Shares
(c) . In the event of any stock split, reverse stock split, stock dividend (including any dividend or distribution of securities convertible into capital stock), reorganization, reclassification, combination, recapitalization or other like change with respect to the Company Common Shares occurring after the date of this Agreement and prior to the Effective Time, the Merger Consideration and all references in this Agreement to specified numbers of shares of any class or series affected thereby, and all calculations provided therefor that are based upon numbers of shares of any class or series (or trading prices therefor) affected thereby, shall be equitably adjusted to the extent necessary to provide the parties the same economic effect as contemplated by this Agreement prior to such stock split, reverse stock split, stock dividend, reorganization, reclassification, combination, recapitalization or other like change.
Change in Shares
(d) . At the Effective Time, each share of capital stock of Merger Sub that is issued and outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time will, by virtue of the Merger and without further action on the part of the sole stockholder of Merger Sub, be converted into and become one share of common stock of the Surviving Corporation (and the shares of Surviving Corporation into which the shares of Merger Sub capital stock are so converted shall be the only shares of the Surviving Corporation's capital stock that are issued and outstanding immediately after the Effective Time). Each certificate evidencing ownership of shares of Merger Sub common stock will evidence ownership of such shares of common stock of the Surviving Corporation.
Capital Stock of Merger Sub
3.2 .
Exchange of Certificates
(a) .
Exchange Procedures
(i) Promptly after the Effective Time, Parent will instruct the Exchange Agent to mail to each holder of record of Company Common Shares (as of immediately prior to the Effective Time) (i) a letter of transmittal that shall specify that delivery shall be effected, and risk of loss and title to the Certificates shall pass, only upon proper delivery of the certificates which immediately prior to the Effective Time represented such holder's Company Common Shares ("") to the Exchange Agent and shall contain such other provisions as Parent may reasonably specify and (ii) instructions for use in effecting surrender by such holder of Certificates to the Exchange Agent in exchange for the Merger Consideration.
Certificates
(ii) The holder of each Certificate, upon the surrender by such holder to the Exchange Agent of such Certificate, together with the letter of transmittal duly completed and validly executed by such holder in accordance with the instructions thereto, and such other documents as may reasonably be required by the Exchange Agent, shall be entitled to receive in exchange for such Certificate a check for the Merger Consideration into which the Company Common Shares theretofore represented by such Certificate have been converted pursuant to Section 3.1, and such Certificate shall forthwith thereafter be canceled. In the event of a transfer of ownership of Company Common Shares that is not registered on the transfer records of the Company, the cash consideration payable hereunder with respect to such Company Common Shares may be paid to a Person other than the Person in whose name the Certificate so surrendered is registered, if such Certificate shall be properly endorsed or
 
otherwise be in proper form for transfer. Each Certificate shall be deemed at all times from and after the Effective Time to represent only the right to receive, upon exchange as contemplated in this Section 3.2, the Merger Consideration into which the Company Common Shares formerly represented by such Certificate are converted in the Merger. No interest shall be paid or accrue on any Merger Consideration payable upon surrender of any Certificate.
(b) . At or prior to the Effective Time, Parent or a direct or indirect Subsidiary of Parent shall enter into an agreement with a nationally recognized financial institution designated by Parent (the ""), which shall establish reasonable procedures mutually acceptable to Parent and the Company, for exchange in accordance with this Article 3, through the Exchange Agent, an amount of cash sufficient to deliver to the holders of Company Common Shares (other than Dissenting Shares) the aggregate Merger Consideration (such cash being hereinafter referred to as the "") deliverable pursuant to Section 3.1 in exchange for outstanding Company Common Shares. The Exchange Agent shall, pursuant to irrevocable instructions, deliver the Merger Consideration contemplated to be issued pursuant to Section 3.1 out of the Exchange Fund.
Exchange Agent
Exchange Agent
Exchange Fund
(c) . All Merger Consideration issued and paid upon conversion of the Company Common Shares in accordance with the terms hereof shall be deemed to have been issued and paid in full satisfaction of all rights pertaining to such Company Common Shares.
Further Rights in Company Common Shares
(d) . Any portion of the Exchange Fund that remains undistributed to the holders of Company Common Shares for six (6) months after the Effective Time shall be promptly delivered to Parent upon demand, and any holders of Company Common Shares who have not theretofore complied with this Article 3 shall thereafter look only to Parent (subject to applicable abandoned property, escheat and similar Laws) for the Merger Consideration, without any interest thereon, only as a general unsecured creditor thereof. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, if any Certificate has not been surrendered prior to the fifth anniversary of the Effective Time (or immediately prior to such earlier date on which the Merger Consideration in respect of such Certificate would otherwise escheat to or become the property of any Governmental Entity), any amounts payable in respect of such Certificate shall, to the extent permitted by applicable Laws, become the property of Parent, free and clear of all claims or interests of any Person previously entitled thereto.
Termination of Exchange Fund
(e) . None of Parent, the Company, Merger Sub or the Surviving Corporation shall be liable to any Person for any cash from the Exchange Fund delivered to a Governmental Entity pursuant to any applicable abandoned property, escheat or similar Laws.
No Liability
(f) . If any Certificate shall have been lost, stolen or destroyed, upon the making of an affidavit of that fact by the Person claiming such Certificate to be lost, stolen or destroyed, and, if required by Parent or the Exchange Agent in their respective discretion, the posting by such Person of a bond, in such reasonable amount as Parent or the Exchange Agent may direct, as indemnity against any claim that may be made against it with respect to such Certificate, the Exchange Agent will deliver in exchange for such lost, stolen or destroyed Certificate the Merger Consideration, without any interest thereon.
Lost Certificates
(g) . Parent, Merger Sub or the Exchange Agent shall be entitled to deduct and withhold from the consideration otherwise payable pursuant to this Agreement to any holder of Company Common Shares, Company Options or Company Warrants such amounts as Parent, Merger Sub or the Exchange Agent are required to deduct and withhold under the Code, or any provision of state, local, provincial or foreign Tax Law, or pursuant to other applicable judgments, decrees, injunctions or orders, with respect to the making of such payment. To the extent that amounts are so withheld by Parent,
Withholding
 
Merger Sub or the Exchange Agent, such withheld amounts shall be treated for all purposes of this Agreement as having been paid to the holder of Company Common Shares, Company Options or Company Warrants in respect of whom such deduction and withholding was made by Parent, Merger Sub or the Exchange Agent.
3.3 . At the Effective Time, the share transfer books of the Company shall be closed, and, thereafter, there shall be no further registration of transfers of Company Common Shares theretofore outstanding on the records of the Company. From and after the Effective Time, the holders of certificates representing Company Common Shares outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time shall cease to have any rights with respect to such Company Common Shares, except as otherwise provided herein or by applicable Laws. On and after the Effective Time, any Certificates presented to the Exchange Agent or Parent for any reason shall be converted into the Merger Consideration, without interest.
Share Transfer Books
3.4 .
Convertible Securities
(a) . Prior to the Effective Time, the Company shall take all action, including obtaining consents from holders of Company Options, necessary to cause each then-outstanding unexpired and unexercised Company Option, whether vested or unvested, to be canceled immediately prior to, but subject to the occurrence of, the Effective Time. In consideration for such cancellation, the holder of each such Company Option shall receive, as soon as reasonably practicable at or after the Effective Time, a cash payment from Parent or the Surviving Corporation equal to the product of (i) the total number of shares that were subject to such Company Option immediately prior to the Effective Time, and (ii) the excess (if any) of (A) the Merger Consideration over (B) the exercise price per share subject to such Company Option, such cash payment to be reduced by any required withholding of Taxes.
Company Options
(b) . Following the Effective Time, each Company Warrant shall represent only the right, upon the valid exercise thereof, if any, to receive the Merger Consideration for each Company Common Share into which such Company Warrant may be exercised and shall in no event be exercisable for any equity securities of Parent, the Company or any of their Subsidiaries. In addition, the Company shall take all action necessary to cause all holders of Company Warrants to either fully exercise such Company Warrants prior to the Effective Time or agree that such Company Warrants shall be terminated upon the Effective Time; provided, however that the holder of any such terminated Company Warrant shall be entitled to receive following the Effective Time, upon surrender of the certificate representing such Company Warrant, only an amount equal to the product of (x) the number of Company Common Shares issuable upon exercise of such Company Warrant multiplied by (y) the excess, if any, of the per share Merger Consideration over the per share exercise price in effect for such Company Warrant.
Company Warrants
,
(c) . At the Effective Time, except as otherwise provided in the Retention and Non-Competition Agreements, all Company stock appreciation rights ("") then unvested shall vest in accordance with their terms and each holder of Company SARs shall receive as soon as reasonably practicable at or after the Effective Time, a cash payment from Parent or the Surviving Corporation equal to the product of (i) the total number of vested Company SARs (including those that vest pursuant to the operation of this subsection (c)), and (ii) the excess (if any) of (A) the Merger Consideration over (B) the grant price of such Company SARs, such cash payment to be reduced by any required withholding of Taxes.
Stock Appreciation Rights
Company SARs
(d) The Company shall take all action necessary in order to effect the foregoing provisions of this Section 3.4 as of the Effective Time. Any materials to be submitted to the holders of Company Options or Company Warrants shall be subject to review and approval by Parent (which approval shall not be unreasonably withheld or delayed).
 
3.5 . Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, Company Common Shares that are outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time and held by a holder who has not voted in favor of the Merger or consented thereto in writing and who has demanded appraisal for such Company Common Shares in accordance with Section 262 of the DGCL ("") shall not be converted into a right to receive the Merger Consideration and will be paid for by the Surviving Corporation in accordance with Section 262 of the DGCL; provided, however, that if any such holder shall fail to perfect or otherwise shall waive, withdraw or lose the right to appraisal and payment under the DGCL, the right of such holder to such appraisal of its Company Common Shares shall cease, and such Company Common Shares shall be deemed converted as of the Effective Time into the right to receive the Merger Consideration as provided in this Article 3. The Company shall give Parent prompt notice of any written demands (or purported demands) for appraisal received by the Company, withdrawals of such demands, and any other related instruments served pursuant to Section 262 of the DGCL and received by the Company. Parent shall direct all negotiations and proceedings with respect to demands for appraisal under the DGCL and the Company shall not, except with Parent's prior written consent, (i) voluntarily make any payment with respect to any demands for appraisal for Dissenting Shares, (ii) offer to settle, or settle, any such demands, (iii) waive any failure to timely deliver a written demand for appraisal in accordance with the DGCL, or (iv) agree to do any of the foregoing.
Dissenting Stockholders
Dissenting Shares
Except as set forth in the disclosure schedule delivered by the Company to Parent concurrently with the execution of this Agreement (the ""), which identifies exceptions by specific Section references, the Company hereby represents and warrants to Parent and Merger Sub as follows:
Company Disclosure Schedule
4.1 .
Organization and Qualification; Subsidiaries
(a) The Company is a corporation duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware. Each Subsidiary of the Company (each a "" and, collectively, the "") has been duly organized, and is validly existing and in good standing, under the laws of the jurisdiction of its incorporation or organization, as the case may be. Each of the Company and each Company Subsidiary has the requisite power and authority and all necessary governmental approvals to own, lease and operate its properties and to carry on its business as it is now being conducted and as currently proposed by it to be conducted, except where failure to have such governmental approvals would not have a Material Adverse Effect. Each of the Company and each Company Subsidiary is duly qualified or licensed to do business, and is in good standing, in each jurisdiction where the character of the properties owned, leased or operated by it or the nature of its business makes such qualification, licensing or good standing necessary, except where the failure to be so qualified, licensed or in good standing would not have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect.
Company Subsidiary
Company Subsidiaries
(b) Section 4.1(b) of the Company Disclosure Schedule sets forth a true, correct and complete list of all of the Company Subsidiaries and the jurisdictions of their incorporation or organization, as the case may be. None of the Company or any Company Subsidiary holds an Equity Interest in any other Person (other than a Company Subsidiary). The Company is the direct or indirect owner of all of the issued and outstanding shares of capital stock or limited liability company interests of
 
each Company Subsidiary, and all such shares of capital stock and limited liability company interests are duly authorized, validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable. All of the issued and outstanding shares of capital stock or limited liability company interests of each Company Subsidiary are owned directly or indirectly by the Company free and clear of all Encumbrances and are not subject to any preemptive right or right of first refusal created by statute, the Certificate of Incorporation and Bylaws or other equivalent organizational documents, as applicable, of such Company Subsidiary or any Contract to which such Company Subsidiary is a party or by which it is bound. Other than prepaid purchase obligations to suppliers, there are no outstanding contractual obligations of the Company or any Company Subsidiary to loan funds to, or make any investment (in the form of a loan, capital contribution or otherwise) in, any Person, other than a Company Subsidiary.
(c) There are no outstanding subscriptions, options, warrants, "put" or "call" rights, exchangeable or convertible securities or other Contracts of any character relating to the issued or unissued capital stock or other securities of any Company Subsidiary, or otherwise obligating the Company or any Company Subsidiary to issue, transfer, sell, purchase, redeem or otherwise acquire or sell any such securities of a Company Subsidiary.
(d) The Company has Made Available to Parent copies of all certificate or articles of incorporation, bylaws, and other organizational documents of each of the Company Subsidiaries, as currently in effect. The Company has Made Available to Parent copies of all charters of each committee of the Company Board and any code of conduct or similar policy adopted by the Company.
4.2 . The copy of the Company's Restated Certificate of Incorporation (the "") attached to Section 4.2(i) of the Company Disclosure Schedule and the copy of the Company's Amended and Restated Bylaws (the "") attached to Section 4.2(ii) of the Company Disclosure Schedule are true, correct and complete copies thereof as in effect on the date hereof. The Company has Made Available to Parent a true, correct and complete copy of the Certificate of Incorporation and Bylaws or other equivalent organizational documents, as applicable, of each Company Subsidiary, in each case as amended to date. Neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary is in violation of any of the provisions of its Certificate of Incorporation or Bylaws or equivalent organizational documents. True, correct and complete copies of all minute books of the Company and Aviall Services, Inc. (containing records of all proceedings, consents, actions and meetings of the Board of Directors, committees of the Board of Directors and stockholders of the Company and Aviall Services, Inc.) from January 1, 2003 through February 23, 2006 and January 30, 2006, respectively, have been Made Available by the Company to Parent. For the period from January 1, 2003 through the date of this Agreement, there are no records of any material proceedings, consents, actions or meetings of the Board of Directors and stockholders of any Company Subsidiary other than those that have been Made Available. The minute books of the Company and each Company Subsidiary Made Available to Parent contain materially accurate summaries of all meetings of directors and stockholders or actions by written consent of the directors and stockholders of the Company and the respective Company Subsidiaries from January 1, 2003 through January 30, 2006 and there have been no material proceedings, consents, actions or meetings of the Board of Directors or stockholders of any Company Subsidiary since January 30, 2006 until the date of this Agreement.
Certificate of Incorporation and Bylaws; Corporate Books and Records
Company Certificate of Incorporation
Company Bylaws
4.3 .
Capitalization
(a) The authorized capital shares of the Company consist of 80,000,000 Company Common Shares and 10,000,000 shares of preferred stock, par value $0.01 per share (the ""). As of April 24, 2006, (A) 34,206,454 Company Common Shares (other than treasury shares) were issued and outstanding, all of which were validly issued and fully paid, nonassessable and
Company Preferred Shares
 
free of preemptive rights of which 169,367 are subject to unvested awards of restricted stock, and (B) 2,068,165 Company Common Shares were held in the treasury of the Company. As of the date hereof, no Company Preferred Shares are issued or outstanding. There are no options, warrants, reserved Company Common Shares, or other rights, Contracts or arrangements of any character to which the Company or any Company Subsidiary is a party or by which the Company or any Company Subsidiary is bound relating to the issued or unissued Equity Interests of the Company or any Company Subsidiary, or securities convertible into or exchangeable for such Equity Interests, or obligating the Company or any Company Subsidiary to issue or sell any of its capital shares or other Equity Interests, or securities convertible into or exchangeable for such capital shares of, or other Equity Interests in, the Company or any Company Subsidiary. Since December 31, 2005, the Company has not issued any Equity Interests, or securities convertible into or exchangeable for such Equity Interests, other than those Company Common Shares reserved for issuance as set forth in this Section 4.3 or Section 4.3(a) of the Company Disclosure Schedule. All issued and outstanding Company Common Shares and all outstanding Company Options and Company Warrants were issued, and all repurchases of Company Common Shares were made, in material compliance with all applicable Laws, including federal and state securities laws and all requirements set forth in applicable Contracts.
(b) As of April 24, 2006, the Company has reserved 3,190,220 Company Common Shares for issuance to employees, non-employee directors and consultants pursuant to the Company Stock Option Plans, of which 2,862,884 shares are subject to outstanding and unexercised Company Options or Company SARs with a weighted average exercise or base price of $18.77. As of the date of this Agreement, there were no Company Common Shares that are subject to Repurchase Rights. All of the Company Common Shares subject to issuance under the Company Stock Option Plans, upon issuance prior to the Effective Time on the terms and conditions specified in the instruments pursuant to which they are issuable, will be duly authorized, validly issued, fully paid, nonassessable and free of preemptive rights. True, correct and complete copies of each of the Company Stock Option Plans and the standard form of all agreements and instruments relating to or issued under each Company Stock Option Plan and all agreements and instruments relating to or issued under the Company Stock Option Plans or Company Options that differ in any material respect from such standard form agreements have been Made Available to Parent, and such agreements and instruments have not been amended, modified or supplemented since being Made Available to Parent, and there are no agreements, understandings or commitments to amend, modify or supplement such agreements or instruments in any case from those Made Available to Parent.
(c) As of the date of this Agreement, there are outstanding and unexercised Company Warrants to purchase 262,500 Company Common Shares and 262,500 Company Common Shares were reserved for issuance pursuant thereto. Section 4.3(c) of the Company Disclosure Schedule identifies for each Company Warrant, (i) the name of the holder of such Company Warrant as of the date of this Agreement, (ii) the date on which such Company Warrant was granted, (iii) the exercise price per share of such Company Warrant, (iv) the number of shares covered by such Company Warrant, (v) the number of Company Common Shares as to which such Company Warrant had vested at such date, (vi) the applicable vesting schedule for such Company Warrant and whether the exercisability or vesting of such Company Warrant will be accelerated in any way by the Merger or the transactions contemplated hereby, (vii) whether such Company Warrant was issued in connection with the performance of services and (viii) the date on which such Company Warrant expires. All of the Company Common Shares subject to issuance pursuant to Company Warrants, upon issuance prior to or at the Effective Time on the terms and conditions specified in the instruments pursuant to which they are issuable, will be duly authorized, validly issued, fully paid, nonassessable and free of preemptive rights. The Company has Made Available to Parent complete and correct copies of all Company Warrants. All outstanding Company Warrants will represent rights to acquire only the Merger Consideration following the Effective Time pursuant to Section 3.4(b).
 
(d) Other than arising under the Credit Facility and as provided in the Company Stock Option Plans or Company's agreements granting Company Stock Options to employees of the Company or any Company Subsidiary, there are no outstanding contractual obligations of the Company or any Company Subsidiary (i) restricting the transfer of, (ii) affecting the voting rights of, (iii) requiring the repurchase, redemption or disposition of, or containing any right of first refusal with respect to, (iv) requiring the registration for sale of, or (v) granting any preemptive or antidilutive right with respect to, any Company Common Shares or any other Equity Interests in the Company or any Company Subsidiary.
4.4 .
Authority
(a) The Company has all necessary corporate power and authority to execute and deliver this Agreement, to perform its obligations hereunder and to consummate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement (other than the Company Stockholders Approval). The execution and delivery of this Agreement by the Company and the consummation by the Company of the transactions contemplated hereby have been duly and validly authorized by all necessary corporate action (other than the Company Stockholders Approval). This Agreement has been duly authorized and validly executed and delivered by the Company and constitutes a legal, valid and binding obligation of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with its terms, subject only to the effect, if any, of (i) applicable bankruptcy and other similar Laws affecting the rights of creditors generally and (ii) rules of Law governing specific performance, injunctive relief and other equitable remedies. The Company Board has unanimously (A) approved and declared advisable this Agreement and the Merger, (B) determined that this Agreement and the terms and conditions of the Merger are fair to, advisable and in the best interests of the Company and its stockholders, and (C) has directed that the adoption of this Agreement be submitted to the Company's stockholders for approval at a meeting of such stockholders and recommended that all of the Company's stockholders adopt this Agreement. The affirmative vote of the holders of a majority of all Company Common Shares issued and outstanding on the record date set for the meeting of the Company's stockholders to adopt this Agreement (the "") is the only vote of the holders of capital stock of the Company necessary to adopt this Agreement and effect the Merger under applicable Law and the Company Certificate of Incorporation (the "").
Company Stockholders Meeting
Company Stockholders Approval
(b) The Company has taken all appropriate actions so that the restrictions on "business combinations" contained in Section 203 of the DGCL will not apply with respect to or as a result of this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby, including the Merger, without any further action on the part of the Company's stockholders or the Company Board. Other than Section 203 of the DGCL, no state takeover statute or similar statute or regulation is applicable to, or purports to be applicable to, this Agreement, the Merger or any other transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
4.5 .
No Conflict; Required Filings and Consents
(a) The execution and delivery of this Agreement by the Company do not, and the performance of this Agreement by the Company or consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, subject to obtaining the Company Stockholders Approval, will not, (i) conflict with or violate any provision of the Company Certificate of Incorporation or Company Bylaws or any equivalent organizational documents of any Company Subsidiary, (ii) assuming that all consents, approvals, authorizations and permits described in Section 4.5(b) have been obtained and all filings and notifications described in Section 4.5(b) have been made and any waiting periods thereunder have terminated or expired, conflict with or violate any Law applicable to the Company or any Company Subsidiary, or by which any property or asset of the Company or any Company Subsidiary is bound or affected, (iii) result in the creation of any Encumbrance on any of the properties or assets of the Company or any Company
 
Subsidiary or (iv) require any consent or approval under, result in any breach of or any loss of any benefit under, or modify, accelerate or terminate any rights or obligations under, or constitute a change of control or default (or an event that with notice or lapse of time or both would become a default) under, or give to others any right of termination, vesting, amendment, acceleration or cancellation pursuant to, any Material Contract or Company Permit, except in the case of clauses (iii) and (iv), for such Encumbrances, or absences of consents or approvals, which would not have a Material Adverse Effect.
(b) The execution and delivery of this Agreement by the Company do not, and the performance of this Agreement by the Company will not, require any consent, approval, authorization or permit of, or filing with or notification to, any Governmental Entity, except under the Exchange Act, the Securities Act, any applicable Blue Sky Laws, the rules and regulations of the New York Stock Exchange, Antitrust Laws, and the filing of the Certificate of Merger as required by the DGCL.
4.6 .
Permits; Compliance With Law
(a) Each of the Company and each Company Subsidiary is in possession of all authorizations, licenses, permits, certificates, registrations, approvals and clearances of any Governmental Entity, and has made all filings, applications and registrations with any Governmental Entity, in each case that are necessary for the Company and each Company Subsidiary to own, lease and/or operate its properties or other assets, or to carry on its respective businesses substantially in the manner described in the Company SEC Reports filed prior to the date hereof and substantially as it is being conducted as of the date hereof (the ""), and all such Company Permits are valid and in full force and effect, except where the failure to have, or the suspension or cancellation of, or failure to be valid or in full force and effect of, any of the Company Permits would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect.
Company Permits
(b) None of the Company or any Company Subsidiary is in conflict with, or in default or violation of, (A) any Law applicable to the Company or any Company Subsidiary or by which any property or asset of the Company or any Company Subsidiary is bound or affected or (B) any Company Permit, except, with respect to both clauses (A) and (B), for any such conflicts, defaults or violations that would not, individually or in the aggregate, be material to the Company and the Company Subsidiaries taken as a whole. None of the Company Permits will become terminable, in whole or in part, as a result of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, except as would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect. Neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary has, within the last three (3) years, received any written warning, notice of violation, notice of revocation or other communication from or on behalf of any Governmental Entity, alleging (x) any material violation of any Company Permit or (y) that the Company or any Company Subsidiary requires any material Company Permit for its business as currently conducted that is not currently held by it. No investigation or material inquiry by any Governmental Entity with respect to the Company or any Company Subsidiary is pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened, in each case with respect to any alleged or claimed violation of Law applicable to the Company or any Company Subsidiary or by which any property or asset of the Company or any Company Subsidiary is bound or affected.
(c) The Company and each Company Subsidiary are in material compliance with all statutory and regulatory requirements under the Arms Export Control Act (22 U.S.C. 2778), the International Traffic in Arms Regulations (22 C.F.R.  120 et seq.), the Export Administration Regulations (15 C.F.R.  730 et seq.) and associated executive orders, the Laws implemented by the Office of Foreign Assets Controls, United States Department of Treasury and all other domestic or foreign Laws relating to export control (collectively, the "") except as would not individually or in the aggregate be material to the Company and the Company Subsidiaries taken as a whole. Neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary has received any written communication that
Export Control Laws
 
alleges that the Company or any Company Subsidiary is not, or may not be, in compliance with, or has, or may have, any liability under Export Control Laws. The Company and each Company Subsidiary has all necessary authority under the Export Control Laws to conduct their respective businesses substantially in the manner described in the Company SEC Reports filed prior to the date hereof and substantially as they are being conducted on the date hereof except as would not, individually or in the aggregate, be material to the Company or the Company Subsidiaries.
(d) The Company, each Company Subsidiary, all directors, officers, employees, Affiliates and authorized agents of each of the foregoing and any other Person associated with or acting on behalf of the Company or any Company Subsidiary are in compliance with all legal requirements under (i) the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act (15 U.S.C.  78dd-1, et seq) and the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development Convention Against Bribery of Foreign Public Officials in International Business Transactions and legislation implementing such Convention, (ii) all international anti-bribery conventions (other than the convention described in clause (i)), and (iii) all other applicable Laws where any of the foregoing Persons do business relating to corruption, bribery, ethical business conduct, money laundering, political contributions, gifts and gratuities, or lawful expenses, to public officials and private persons, and Laws requiring the disclosure of agency relationships or commissions and the anticorruption rules of any international financial institutions with which it does business (collectively, the "") except as would not, individually or in the aggregate, be material to the Company or the Company Subsidiaries. Neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary has received any written communication that alleges that the Company, any Company Subsidiary, any director, officer, employee, Affiliate or authorized agents of any of the foregoing or any other Person associated with or acting on behalf of the Company or any Company Subsidiary is, or may be, in violation of, or has, or may have, any material liability under, the Anti-Bribery Laws.
Anti-Bribery Laws
(e) Neither the Company nor any of the Company Subsidiaries (i) takes title to, or takes possession of, any products or goods (other than goods of the Company or any Company Subsidiary) that are listed for sale on the Inventory Locator Service, LLC electronic marketplace or any other electronic marketplace, auction- or exchange-related Internet or online website or postings owned or controlled by the Company or the Company Subsidiaries or (ii) receives or collects any compensation or fees from the Inventory Locator Service, LLC electronic marketplace or any other electronic marketplace, auction- or exchange-related Internet or online website or postings, owned or controlled by the Company or the Company Subsidiaries other than subscription fees for participation or membership in the Inventory Locator Service, LLC electronic marketplace.
(f) Neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary is a "Specially Designated National" or other "Blocked Person" identified by the United States government, nor a Person that is owned or controlled by or acts on behalf of a "Specially Designated National" or "Blocked Person." To the Company's knowledge, none of Company's Affiliates or brokers or any director, officer, employee, nor authorized agent of the Company or any Company Subsidiary (if any), acting or benefiting in any capacity in connection with this Agreement, and none of the funds or other assets to be transferred hereunder are the property of, or beneficially owned, directly or indirectly, by any "Specially Designated National" or "Blocked Person," nor are such funds or other assets the proceeds of any specified unlawful activity as defined by 18 U.S.C.  1956(c)(7). None of the Company or any Company Subsidiary has engaged in or facilitated any prohibited transactions with any "Specially Designated National" or other "Blocked Person" without proper prior authorization from the United States government.
4.7 .
SEC Filings; Financial Statements
(a) The Company has filed on a timely basis all forms, reports, statements, schedules and documents (including items incorporated by reference) required to be filed by it with the SEC since
 
January 1, 2003. Except to the extent available in full without redaction on the SEC's web site through the Electronic Data Gathering, Analysis and Retrieval System (""), including those filed on or after the date of this Agreement, the Company has Made Available to Parent copies of, in the form filed with the SEC, all of the following documents filed on or after January 1, 2003 through the date hereof: (i) the Company's Annual Reports on Form 10-K, (ii) the Company's Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q, (iii) all proxy and information statements relating to the Company's meetings of stockholders (whether annual or special) and all information statements relating to stockholder consents, (iv) the Company's Current Reports on Form 8-K, (v) all other forms, reports, statements, schedules and documents filed by the Company with the SEC (the forms, reports, statements, schedules and other documents referred to in clauses (i), (ii), (iii), (iv) and (v) above, whether or not available through EDGAR, are, collectively, including those filed on or after the date of this Agreement, the "" and (vi) all certifications and statements required by Rules 13a-14 and 15d-14 under the Exchange Act and Sections 302 and 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 (""), and the rules and regulations of the SEC promulgated thereunder, with respect to any report referred to in clause (i) or (ii) (collectively, the ""). To the Company's knowledge, except as disclosed in the Company SEC, each director and officer (as defined in Rule 16a-1(f) under the Exchange Act) of the Company has filed with the SEC on a timely basis all statements required by Section 16(a) of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations thereunder. No Company Subsidiary is, or since January 1, 2003 has been, required to file any form, report, statement, schedule or other document with the SEC. As used in this Section 4.7, the term "" shall be broadly construed to include any manner in which a document or information is furnished, transmitted or otherwise made available to the SEC.
EDGAR
Company SEC Reports
SOXA
Certifications
file
(b) Each of the consolidated financial statements (including, in each case, any related notes thereto) contained in the Company SEC Reports (the ""), including each of the Company SEC Reports filed after the date of this Agreement until the Closing, (i) complied as to form in all material respects with the published rules and regulations of the SEC with respect thereto, (ii) was prepared in accordance with GAAP applied on a consistent basis throughout the periods involved (except as may be indicated in the notes thereto or, in the case of unaudited interim financial statements, as may be permitted by the SEC on Form 10-Q, Form 8-K or any successor form under the Exchange Act), and (iii) fairly presented the consolidated financial position of the Company and the Company Subsidiaries as at the respective dates thereof and the consolidated results of Company's and the Company Subsidiaries' operations and cash flows for the periods indicated, except that the unaudited interim financial statements may not contain footnotes and were or are subject to normal and recurring immaterial year-end adjustments in accordance with GAAP. The balance sheet of the Company as of December 31, 2005 (the "") contained in the Company SEC Reports is hereinafter referred to as the "." Neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary has any liabilities (absolute, accrued, contingent or otherwise) required under GAAP to be set forth on a balance sheet that are, individually or in the aggregate, material to the business, results of operations or financial condition of the Company and the Company Subsidiaries taken as a whole, except for (A) liabilities incurred since the Company Balance Sheet Date in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice which are of the type that typically recur and which do not result from any breach of contract, tort or violation of any Law, (B) those specifically set forth or specifically and adequately reserved against in the Company Balance Sheet, and (C) the fees and expenses of investment bankers, attorneys and accountants incurred in connection with this Agreement. Except as reflected in the Company Financial Statements, neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary is a party to any material off-balance sheet arrangements (as defined in Item 303 of Regulation S-K). All reserves that are set forth in or reflected in the Company Balance Sheet have been established in accordance with GAAP consistently applied. At the Company Balance Sheet Date, there were no material loss contingencies (as such term is used in Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 5 ("") issued by the Financial Accounting Standards Board in March 1975) that are not adequately provided for in the Company Balance Sheet as required by Statement No. 5. The Company Financial Statements comply in all material
Company Financial Statements
Company Balance Sheet Date
Company Balance Sheet
Statement No. 5
 
respects with the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants' Statement of Position 97-2. The Company has not had any material dispute with any of its auditors regarding accounting matters or policies during any of its past three (3) full fiscal years or during the current fiscal year-to-date including without limitation any dispute that would be required to be disclosed in the Company SEC Reports. The books and records of the Company and each Company Subsidiary have been maintained, and are being maintained, in all material respects in accordance with applicable Law and accounting requirements, and the Company Financial Statements are consistent with such books and records.
(c) The Company has Made Available to Parent a true, correct and complete copy of (i) any amendments or modifications, which have not yet been filed with the SEC but that are required to be filed, to Contracts or documents that previously had been filed by the Company with the SEC pursuant to the Securities Act or the Exchange Act, and (ii) any correspondence between the Company and the SEC (including all comment letters received by the Company from the SEC and all responses to such comment letters by or on behalf of the Company) for the Company's three (3) prior fiscal years. No investigation by the SEC with respect to the Company or any Company Subsidiary is pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened.
(d) Each of the Company SEC Reports (i) as of the date of the filing of such report, complied in all material respects with the requirements of the Securities Act and the Exchange Act, as the case may be, and, to the extent then applicable, SOXA, including in each case, the rules and regulations thereunder, and (ii) as of its filing date (or, if amended or superseded by a subsequent filing prior to the date hereof, on the date of such filing) did not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements made therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
(e) Each of the principal executive officer and principal financial officer of the Company (or each former principal executive officer and each former principal financial officer of the Company) has made all of the Certifications required by Rules 13a-14 and 15d-14 under the Exchange Act and Sections 302 and 906 of SOXA, and the rules and regulations of the SEC promulgated thereunder. The Certifications complied in all material respects with Rules 13a-14 and 15d-14 under the Exchange Act and Sections 302 and 906 of SOXA, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder and the statements contained in the Certifications were true and correct as of the date of the filing thereof. For purposes of this Agreement, "" and "" shall have the meanings given to such terms in SOXA.
principal executive officer
principal financial officer
(f) The Company has implemented and maintains "" (as defined in Rules 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e) under the Exchange Act), and such disclosure controls and procedures are reasonably designed to ensure that (i) all information (both financial and non-financial) required to be disclosed by the Company in the reports that it files or submits under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the time periods specified in the rules and forms of the SEC, and (ii) all such information is accumulated and communicated to the Company's management, including its principal executive officer and principal financial officer, or Persons performing similar functions, as appropriate to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure and to make the certifications of the principal executive officer and the principal financial officer of the Company required by Section 302 of SOXA with respect to such reports. The Company has Made Available to Parent copies of all written descriptions of, and all policies, manuals and other material documents promulgating such disclosure controls and procedures.
disclosure controls and procedures
(g) The Company is, and since January 1, 2003 has been, in compliance in all material respects with (i) the applicable listing and corporate governance rules and regulations of the New York Stock Exchange, and (ii) the applicable provisions of SOXA. There has been no material correspondence between the Company and the New York Stock Exchange since January 1, 2003.
 
(h) Neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary nor, to the knowledge of the Company, any director, officer, employee, auditor, accountant or Representative of the Company or any Company Subsidiary has received any complaint, allegation, assertion or claim, in each case, regarding the accounting or auditing practices, procedures, methodologies or methods or potential fraudulent conduct of the Company or any Company Subsidiary or their respective internal controls, or any material inaccuracy in the Company's Financial Statements, including any complaint, allegation, assertion or claim that the Company or any Company Subsidiary has engaged in questionable accounting or auditing practices. No attorney representing the Company or any Company Subsidiary, or current or former employee of the Company or of any Company Subsidiary, has reported to the Company Board or any committee thereof or to any director or officer of the Company evidence of a violation of securities Laws, breach of fiduciary duty, fraudulent conduct or similar violation by the Company or any of its officers, directors, employees or agents.
(i) PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, which has expressed its opinion with respect to the Company's Financial Statements for each of the years in the five (5) year period ended December 31, 2005 included in the Company SEC Reports (including the related notes), is "" with respect to the Company and the Company Subsidiaries within the meaning of Regulation S-X and has been "independent" within such meaning at all times since December 31, 2000. The Company has made such disclosure of non-audit services performed by PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP in its proxy statements with respect to its annual meetings of stockholders as is required under the rules and regulations of the SEC, and all such non-audit services have been approved in advance by the audit committee of the Company Board.
independent
(j) The Company has implemented and maintains a system of internal control over "" (as defined in Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f) under the Exchange Act) sufficient to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with GAAP, including, without limitation, that (i) transactions are executed in accordance with management's general or specific authorizations, (ii) transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in conformity with GAAP and to maintain asset accountability, (iii) access to assets is permitted only in accordance with management's general or specific authorization, and (iv) the recorded accountability for assets is compared with the existing assets at reasonable intervals and appropriate action is taken with respect to any differences. Since January 1, 2003, other than in connection with SOXA compliance and process improvements implemented voluntarily by the Company, (a) there have not been any changes in the Company's internal control over financial reporting that have materially affected, or are reasonably likely to materially affect, the Company's internal control over financial reporting; (b) there have not been any "" or "" (as defined by the Public Company Accounting Board) in the design or operation of the Company's internal controls and procedures that could adversely affect the Company's ability to record, process, summarize and report the financial data, (c) to the extent there have been any such significant deficiencies or material weaknesses, they have been disclosed to the Company's outside auditors and the audit committee of the Company Board, and (d) there has not been any fraud, whether or not material, that involves management or other employees who have a significant role in the Company's internal control and procedures. The Company has Made Available to Parent copies of all reports and other documents concerning internal controls filed with the SEC or delivered to the Company by its auditors, in each case, prior to the date of this Agreement. The Company has Made Available to Parent accurate and complete copies of all written descriptions of, and all policies, manuals and other material documents promulgating such internal accounting controls in effect as of the date of this Agreement.
financial reporting
significant deficiencies
material weaknesses
 
4.8 .
Disclosure Documents
(a) The Proxy Statement and any Other Filings made by the Company, and any amendments or supplements thereto, at (i) the time the Proxy Statement (or any amendment thereof or supplement thereto) is first mailed to the Company's stockholders, (ii) the time of the Company Stockholders Meeting, and (iii) the Effective Time, will comply as to form in all material respects with the applicable requirements of the Securities Act, the Exchange Act and other applicable Laws.
(b) The Proxy Statement and any Other Filings made by the Company, and any amendments or supplements thereto, do not, and will not, at (i) the time the Proxy Statement (or any amendment thereof or supplement thereto) is first mailed to the Company's stockholders, (ii) the time of the Company Stockholders Meeting, and (iii) the Effective Time, contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements made therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. Notwithstanding the foregoing, no representation or warranty is made by the Company with respect to statements made or incorporated by reference therein about Parent or Merger Sub supplied by Parent or Merger Sub for inclusion or incorporation by reference in the Proxy Statement.
4.9 . Since December 31, 2005, the Company and each Company Subsidiary has, except as otherwise permitted by this Agreement, conducted its business only in the ordinary course consistent with past practice and, since such date:
Absence of Certain Changes or Events
(a) there has not been any Material Adverse Effect or an event or development that would, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect;
(b) there has not been any declaration, setting aside or payment of any dividend on, or other distribution (whether in cash, stock or property) in respect of, any of the Company's capital stock, or any purchase, redemption or other acquisition by the Company of any of the Company's capital stock or any other securities of the Company or any options, warrants, calls or rights to acquire any such shares or other securities except for repurchases from employees or consultants following their termination pursuant to the terms of existing Repurchase Rights;
(c) there has not been any split, combination or reclassification of any of the Company's capital stock;
(d) there has not been any material increase in compensation or fringe benefits paid or payable to any of the officers, directors or managers or employees of the Company or any Company Subsidiary at the Vice President or director level or higher, or who earn base salary of more than $150,000 per year, or any payment by the Company or any of the Company Subsidiaries of any bonus to any of their officers, directors or managers or employees at the Vice President or director level or higher, or who earn base salary of more than $150,000 per year, or any granting, by the Company or any of the Company Subsidiaries of any increase in severance or termination pay, or any entry by the Company or any of the Company Subsidiaries into, or material modification or amendment of, any currently effective employment, severance, termination or indemnification agreement or any agreement the benefits of which are contingent, or the terms of which are materially altered, upon the occurrence of a transaction involving the Company of the nature contemplated hereby, or any subsequent event, other than increases in the ordinary course of business in base salary and target bonuses for employees who are not officers of the Company, in an amount that does not exceed 10% of such base salary, in connection with periodic compensation or performance reviews;
 
(e) there has not been any material modification of any deferred compensation plan within the meaning of Section 409A of the Code and the proposed regulations promulgated thereunder and Internal Revenue Service Notice 2005-1;
(f) there has not been any change by the Company or any of the Company Subsidiaries in its accounting methods, principles or practices (including any material change in depreciation or amortization policies or rates or revenue recognition policies), except as required by concurrent changes in GAAP;
(g) there has not been any revaluation by the Company or any of the Company Subsidiaries of any of its material assets, including, without limitation, writing-off notes or accounts receivable other than immaterial write-offs in the ordinary course of business;
(h) neither the Company nor any of the Company Subsidiaries has cancelled or forgiven any material debts or waived any claims or rights having material value;
(i) there has not been any sale, transfer, or other disposition of any Company IP Rights or any other material properties or assets (real, personal or mixed, tangible or intangible) by the Company or any of the Company Subsidiaries, except for non-exclusive licenses in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice;
(j) there has not been any material impairment of any Company IP Rights or any material adverse change in the Company's or any of the Company Subsidiaries' rights to use any Intellectual Property licensed from a third party, in each case, other than in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice;
(k) there has not been any material damage, destruction or loss with respect to assets of the Company or any of the Company Subsidiaries;
(l) neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary has made any material loan, advance or capital contribution to, or investment in, any Person (other than a Company Subsidiary), including without limitation any loan, advance or capital contribution (regardless of amount) to any director, officer or other Affiliate of the Company, in each case, other than (i) loans, advances or capital contributions to or investments in wholly-owned Subsidiaries or entities that became wholly-owned Subsidiaries made in the ordinary course of business, (ii) investments made in accordance with the Company's investment guidelines, a copy of which has been Made Available to Parent, in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice and (iii) routine travel advances in accordance with the Company's travel and expense policy in effect as of the date of this Agreement (a copy of which has been Made Available to Parent), sales commission draws to employees of the Company or any Company Subsidiary and advance purchase payments to the suppliers set forth on Section 4.9(l) of the Company Disclosure Schedule, in an aggregate amount not in excess of $1,000,000 in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice;
(m) there has not been any material change with respect to the management, supervisory or other key personnel of the Company, any termination of employment of any such employees or a material number of employees, or any labor dispute or claim arising under the National Labor Relations Act involving the Company or any Company Subsidiary;
(n) neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary has incurred, created or assumed any Encumbrance on any material assets;
 
(o) neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary has paid or discharged any material Encumbrance or material liability other than in accordance with its terms in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practices;
(p) neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary has agreed, whether in writing or otherwise, to take any action described in this Section; and
(q) there has not been any termination or any material modification, amendment or change to, or waiver of any rights under, any Material Contract.
4.10 .
Employee Benefit Plans
(a) Section 4.10(a) of the Company Disclosure Schedule lists as of the date of this Agreement, with respect to the Company, any Company Subsidiary and any ERISA Affiliate, (i) all employee benefit plans within the meaning of Section 3(3) of ERISA, (ii) each loan from the Company or an ERISA Affiliate to an employee in excess of $10,000, (iii) all stock option, stock purchase, phantom stock, stock appreciation right, stock-based compensation, supplemental retirement, severance, sabbatical, employee relocation, cafeteria benefit (Section 125 of the Code), dependent care (Section 129 of the Code), life insurance or accident insurance plans, programs or arrangements, (iv) all bonus, pension, profit sharing, savings, retirement, deferred compensation or incentive plans, programs and arrangements, (v) other fringe and employee benefit plans, programs or arrangements that apply to senior management and that do not generally apply to all employees, and (vi) any employment or service agreements (except for offer letters providing for at-will employment that do not provide for severance, acceleration or post-termination benefits), compensation agreements and severance agreements, written or otherwise, for the benefit of, or relating to, any present or former director, officer, employee, or consultant (provided that, for former directors, officers, employees and consultants, such arrangements need only be listed if unsatisfied obligations of the Company or any Company Subsidiary of greater than $10,000 remain thereunder) under which any of the Company or any Company Subsidiary or ERISA Affiliate could reasonably be expected to have any liability (all of the foregoing described in clauses (i) through (vi), collectively, but exclusive of any Foreign Plan, the ""). There are no defined benefit or retiree medical plans outside of the United States other than any Foreign Plan. Furthermore, to the knowledge of the Company, there are no benefit plans outside the United States that have a material cost to the local business other than any Foreign Plan. The Company has not, since July 30, 2002, extended credit, arranged for the extension of credit, or renewed, modified or forgiven an extension of credit made prior to such date, in the form of a personal loan to or for any Person who was, at any time since such date, an officer or director of the Company.
Company Benefit Plans
(b) Prior to the date of this Agreement, the Company has Made Available to Parent a true, correct and complete copy of each of the Company Benefit Plans and any related plan documents (including adoption agreements, vendor Contracts and administrative services agreements, trust documents, insurance policies or Contracts including policies relating to fiduciary liability insurance, bonds required by ERISA, amendments to the Company Benefit Plans, employee booklets, summary plan descriptions, and summaries of material modifications and any material employee communications of the Company relating to changes to the Company Benefit Plans) and has, with respect to each Company Benefit Plan that is subject to ERISA reporting requirements, Made Available to Parent true, correct and complete copies of the Form 5500 reports filed for the last three (3) plan years (including all audits, financial statements, schedules and attachments thereto). Any Company Benefit Plan intended to be qualified under Section 401(a) of the Code has (i) obtained from the IRS a current favorable determination letter as to its qualified status under the Code, or (ii) has been established under a standardized master and prototype or volume submitter plan for which a current favorable IRS advisory letter or opinion letter has been obtained by the plan sponsor and is valid as to the adopting employer.
 
The Company has also Made Available to Parent a true, correct and complete copy of the most recent such IRS determination letter, advisory letter or opinion letter issued with respect to each such the Company Benefit Plan, and to the knowledge of the Company nothing has occurred since the issuance of each such letter that could reasonably be expected to cause the loss of the Tax-qualified status of any Company Benefit Plan subject to Section 401(a) of the Code. The Company has also Made Available to Parent all registration statements and prospectuses and investment policy statements prepared in connection with each Company Benefit Plan. All individuals who, pursuant to the terms of any Company Benefit Plan, are entitled to participate in any Company Benefit Plan, are currently participating in such Company Benefit Plan or have been offered an opportunity to do so and have declined in writing. Neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary nor any ERISA Affiliate sponsors or maintains any self-funded employee benefit plan, including any plan to which a stop-loss policy applies.
(c) None of the Company Benefit Plans promises or provides retiree medical or other retiree welfare benefits to any Person other than as required under the Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1985, as amended ("") or applicable state law. There has been no "" (within the meaning of Section 406 of ERISA and Section 4975 of the Code) with respect to any Company Benefit Plan that is not exempt under Section 408 of ERISA which has not been corrected and as to which any unsatisfied penalties and excise taxes are reasonably likely to exist. Each Company Benefit Plan has been administered in all material respects in accordance with its terms and the requirements prescribed by any and all statutes, rules and regulations (including ERISA and the Code), and the Company, each Company Subsidiary and each ERISA Affiliate has performed all obligations required to be performed by it under, is not in any material respect in default under or in violation of, and has no knowledge of any material default or violation by any other party to, any of the Company Benefit Plans. All contributions required to be made by the Company, any Company Subsidiary or any ERISA Affiliate to any Company Benefit Plan have been made on or before their due dates and, to the extent required by GAAP, all amounts have been accrued for the current plan year (and no further contributions will be due or will have accrued thereunder as of the Closing Date, other than contributions accrued in the ordinary course of business, consistent with past practice, after the Company Balance Sheet Date as a result of the operations of the Company and the Company Subsidiaries after the Company Balance Sheet Date). In addition, with respect to each Company Benefit Plan intended to include a Code Section 401(k) arrangement, the Company and each Company Subsidiary and ERISA Affiliate have at all times made timely deposits of employee salary reduction contributions and participant loan repayments, as determined pursuant to regulations issued by the United States Department of Labor. No Company Benefit Plan is subject to, and neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary or ERISA Affiliate has incurred or reasonably expects to incur any liability under Title IV of ERISA (other than for the payment of insurance premiums to the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation). No Company Benefit Plan has an accumulated funding deficiency within the meaning of Section 412 of the Code. With respect to each Company Benefit Plan subject to ERISA as either an employee pension benefit plan within the meaning of Section 3(2) of ERISA or an employee welfare benefit plan within the meaning of Section 3(1) of ERISA, the Company has prepared in good faith and timely filed all requisite governmental reports (which were true, correct and complete as of the date filed), including any required audit reports, and has properly and timely filed and distributed or posted all notices and reports to employees required to be filed, distributed or posted with respect to each such Company Benefit Plan. No suit, administrative proceeding, action or other litigation has been brought, or to the knowledge of the Company or any Company Subsidiary, is threatened, against the Company or any Company Subsidiary or with respect to any such Company Benefit Plan, including any audit or inquiry by the IRS or United States Department of Labor.
COBRA
prohibited transaction
(d) Neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary or ERISA Affiliate is a party to, or has made any contribution to or otherwise incurred any obligation under, any "multiemployer plan" as such term is defined in Section 3(37) of ERISA or any "multiple employer plan" as such term is
 
defined in Section 413(c) of the Code to which the Company or any Company Subsidiaries has any liability (contingent or otherwise). There has been no termination or partial termination of any Company Benefit Plan within the meaning of Section 411(d)(3) of the Code in respect of which the Company or any Company Subsidiaries has any liability (contingent or otherwise).
(e) As regards each Foreign Plan, (i) such Foreign Plan is in compliance with the provisions of the Laws of each jurisdiction in which such Foreign Plan is maintained, to the extent those Laws are applicable to such Foreign Plan, (ii) the Company, each Company Subsidiary, and each ERISA Affiliate has complied with all applicable reporting and notice requirements, and such Foreign Plan has obtained from the Governmental Entity having jurisdiction with respect to such Foreign Plan any required determinations, if any, that such Foreign Plan is in compliance with the laws of the relevant jurisdiction if such determinations are required in order to give effect to such Foreign Plan, and (iii) such Foreign Plan has been administered in all material respects in accordance with its terms and applicable Law and regulations.
(f) Section 4.10(f) of the Company Disclosure Schedule lists each Person who the Company reasonably believes is, with respect to the Company, any Company Subsidiary and/or any ERISA Affiliate, a "disqualified individual" (within the meaning of Section 280G of the Code and the regulations promulgated thereunder) determined as of the date hereof.
(g) Section 4.10(g) of the Company Disclosure Schedule lists as of the date of this Agreement the number of employees of the Company or any Company Subsidiary who are absent from active work because of disability or other leave in excess of four Business Days, the nature of such leave (e.g., short-term or long-term disability), and the number of such employees who have been absent for more than thirty (30) days.
(h) None of the execution and delivery of this Agreement, the consummation of the Merger or any other transaction contemplated hereby or any termination of employment or service in connection therewith or subsequent thereto will (i) result in any payment (including severance, unemployment compensation, golden parachute, bonus or otherwise) becoming due to any Person other than accrued payments, (ii) materially increase or otherwise enhance any benefits otherwise payable by the Company or any Company Subsidiary, (iii) result in the acceleration of the time of payment or vesting of any such benefits, except as required under Section 411(d)(3) of the Code, (iv) increase the amount of compensation due to any Person, or (v) result in the forgiveness in whole or in part of any outstanding loans made by the Company or any Company Subsidiary to any Person.
(i) To the knowledge of the Company, (i) Section 4.10(i) of the Company Disclosure Schedule lists each Company Benefit Plan that grants any compensation, equity award or bonus that could be deemed deferred compensation within the meaning of Section 409A of the Code, and (ii) such Company Benefit Plan is in compliance with Section 409A of the Code.
(j) (i) Each of the Company and each Company Subsidiary is in compliance in all material respects with all currently applicable Laws respecting employment, discrimination in employment, terms and conditions of employment, worker classification (including the proper classification of workers as independent contractors and consultants), wages, hours and occupational safety and health and employment practices, including the Immigration Reform and Control Act, (ii) the Company and each Company Subsidiary has paid in full to all employees, independent contractors and consultants all wages, salaries, commissions, bonuses, benefits, and other compensation due to or on behalf of such employees, independent contractors or consultants in accordance with applicable Law, (iii) neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary is liable for any payment to any trust or other fund or to any Governmental Entity, with respect to unemployment compensation benefits, social security or
 
other benefits or obligations for employees (other than routine payments to be made in the normal course of business and consistent with past practice), and (iv) there are no material controversies pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened, between the Company or any Company Subsidiary and any of their respective employees, which controversies have or could reasonably be expected to result in an action, suit, proceeding, claim, arbitration or investigation before any Governmental Entity.
(k) To the knowledge of the Company, neither Company nor any of the Company Subsidiaries has any obligation to pay any amount or provide any benefit to any former employee or officer, other than obligations (i) for which Company has established a reserve for such amount on the Company Balance Sheet in accordance with GAAP and (ii) pursuant to Contracts entered into after the Company Balance Sheet Date and disclosed on Section 4.10(k) of the Company Disclosure Schedule. Neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary is a party to or bound by any collective bargaining agreement or other labor union Contract, no collective bargaining agreement is being negotiated by the Company or any Company Subsidiary and neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary has any duty to bargain with any labor organization. There is no pending demand for recognition or, to the knowledge of the Company, any other request or demand from a labor organization for representative status with respect to any Person employed by the Company or any Company Subsidiary. The Company has no knowledge of any activities or proceedings of any labor union to organize their respective employees. There is no labor dispute, strike or group work stoppage against the Company or any Company Subsidiary pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened that may materially interfere with the respective business activities of the Company or any Company Subsidiary. Neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary, nor to the knowledge of the Company, any of their respective representatives or employees has been found in the past two (2) years to have committed an unfair labor practice in connection with the operation of the respective businesses of the Company or any Company Subsidiary, and there is no charge or complaint against the Company or any Company Subsidiary by the National Labor Relations Board or any comparable Governmental Entity pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened.
(l) To the knowledge of the Company, no employee of the Company or any Company Subsidiary is in violation of any term of any employment agreement, patent disclosure agreement, non-competition agreement, or any restrictive covenant to a former employer relating to the right of any such employee to be employed by the Company or any Company Subsidiary because of the nature of the business conducted or presently proposed to be conducted by the Company or any Company Subsidiary or to the use of trade secrets or proprietary information of others. No officer or director of the Company or any Company Subsidiary has given notice of termination or resignation to the Company or any Company Subsidiary, nor does the Company otherwise have knowledge that any such officer or director intends to terminate his or her employment with the Company or any Company Subsidiary. The employment of each of the U.S. employees of the Company or any Company Subsidiary is on an "at will" basis, and the Company and each Company Subsidiary does not have any obligation to provide any particular form or period of notice prior to terminating the employment of any such U.S. employees, except as may be required by applicable Law.
(m) Each of the Company and each Company Subsidiary has Made Available to Parent true, correct and complete copies of each of the following currently in force and effect as of the date of this Agreement: (i) all forms of employment agreements and severance agreements and (ii) basic forms of confidentiality, non-competition and/or invention agreements by and between current and former employees and consultants that the Company has had in place since January 1, 2004, (iii) all agreements and/or insurance policies providing for the indemnification of any officers or directors (other than entity formation or organizational documents described in Section 4.2 hereof), (iv) a summary or copy of the Company's standard severance policy, (v) a summary of material outstanding liability for termination payments and benefits to current and former directors, officers, employees and consultants, and (vi) other material bonus plans.
 
(n) The Company and each Company Subsidiary is in compliance in all material respects with the Worker Adjustment Retraining Notification Act of 1988, as amended (""), and all similar state or local Laws. In the past two (2) years (i) the Company has not effectuated a "plant closing" (as defined in the WARN Act) affecting any site of employment or one or more facilities or operating units within any site of employment or facility of its business, (ii) there has not occurred a "mass layoff" (as defined in the WARN Act) affecting any site of employment or facility of the Company or any Company Subsidiary, and (iii) the Company has not engaged in activity that may trigger application of the WARN Act or any similar state, local or foreign law or regulation. The Company has not caused any of its employees to suffer an "" (as defined in the WARN Act) during the 90-day period prior to the date of this Agreement.
WARN Act
employment loss
(o) Neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary (nor any officer of the Company or any Subsidiary) is a party to any agreement, Contract, or arrangement that, individually or collectively, either alone or together with any other event (including the execution of and consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement), could give rise to the payment of any amount (whether in cash or property, including shares of capital stock) that would not be deductible pursuant to the terms of Section 280G or 162(m) of the Code.
(p) Section 4.10(p) of the Company Disclosure Schedule sets forth the name, title, and reporting relationship for each of the Company's officers.
4.11 .
Contracts; Customers and Suppliers
(a) Section 4.11(a) of the Company Disclosure Schedule lists each of the Material Contracts that are in effect or otherwise binding on the Company or any Company Subsidiary or their respective properties or assets. The term "" shall include each of the following: (i) any credit agreement, note, bond, guarantee, mortgage, indenture, lease, or other instrument or obligation pursuant to which any Indebtedness of the Company or any Company Subsidiary is outstanding or may be incurred, in each case, other than (x) equipment leases entered into in the ordinary course of business, (y) capital or operating leases that require annual payments not in excess of $500,000, individually, and (z) guarantees of Company Subsidiary obligations (in the case of each of clauses (x)  (z), with respect to Contracts that would not otherwise be Material Contracts); (ii) any agreement, Contract or binding commitment which was or was required to be filed as an exhibit to the Company SEC Reports; (iii) any Government Contract with the United States government in excess of $500,000 annually; and (iv) any (A) collective bargaining agreement; (B) employment agreement, Contract or binding commitment providing for annual compensation or payments in excess of $250,000 in the current or any future year; (C) agreement, Contract or commitment of indemnification or guaranty not entered into in the ordinary course of business providing for indemnification which would reasonably be expected to exceed $100,000, as well as any agreement, Contract or commitment of indemnification or guaranty between the Company or any Company Subsidiary and any of their respective officers or directors, irrespective of the amount (other than pursuant to the organizational documents of the Company or any Company Subsidiary); (D) agreement, Contract or binding commitment containing any covenant directly or indirectly limiting the freedom of the Company or any of Company Subsidiary to engage in any line of business, compete with any Person, or sell any product or service (other than Contracts containing (i) geographic limitations or (ii) limitations related to sales to the aftermarket, which limitations have been entered into in the ordinary course of business and, in the case of each (i) and (ii) that would not otherwise be Material Contracts); (E) agreement, Contract or binding commitment that shall result in the payment by, or the creation of any commitment or obligation (absolute or contingent) to pay on behalf of
Material Contract
 
the Company or any Company Subsidiary any severance, termination, "golden parachute," or other similar payments to any employee following termination of employment or otherwise as a result of the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement; (F) agreement, Contract or binding commitment by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries entered into since January 1, 2004 or that has material obligations that are to be performed subsequent to date hereof, relating to the disposition or acquisition of material assets not in the ordinary course of business or any ownership interest in any Subsidiary or other Person; (G) material agreement, Contract or binding commitment regarding the development, ownership or use of Intellectual Property (including material licenses to or from third parties, but other than commercial off-the-shelf software, as the term is commonly understood); (H) original equipment manufacturer distribution agreement, material partnership, joint venture or similar agreement or arrangement; in excess of (i) $10,000,000 in annual revenue or (ii) Contracts that relate to the purchase by the Company or any Company Subsidiary of distribution rights with payments of $5,000,000 or more; (I) Contract or agreement involving a standstill or similar obligation of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries to a third party; (J) lease for real property which involves consideration or other obligation in excess of $400,000 annually; or (K) (x) any other agreement, Contract or binding commitment which is material to the operation of the Company's and the Company Subsidiaries' business, taken as a whole, or (y) which is entered into outside the ordinary course of business and which involves consideration or other obligation in excess of $100,000 annually and, in the case of clauses (x) and (y), which has not been described in the foregoing clauses (A) through (J) above.
(b) There are no material defaults or breaches under any Material Contract by the Company or any Company Subsidiary, or to the knowledge of the Company, any other party thereto. All Material Contracts are in written form. The Company has Made Available to Parent true, correct and complete copies of each Material Contract. Each Material Contract is (i) valid and binding on the Company and each Company Subsidiary party thereto and, to the Company's knowledge, each other party thereto, (ii) in full force and effect, and (iii) immediately following consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, shall remain in full force and effect, except, in each case, as would not be material to the Company and the Company Subsidiaries, taken as a whole. The Company and each Company Subsidiary has in all material respects performed all obligations required to be performed by it to the date hereof under each Material Contract and, to the Company's knowledge, each other party to each Material Contract has in all material respects performed all obligations required to be performed by it under such Material Contract. As of the date hereof, none of the Company or any Company Subsidiary has knowledge of, or has received notice of, any actual or alleged violation or default under (or any condition that with the passage of time or the giving of notice or both would cause such a violation of or default under) any Material Contract. There exists no default or event of default or event, occurrence, condition or act with respect to the Company or any Company Subsidiary or to the knowledge of the Company, with respect to any other contracting party, which, with the giving of notice, the lapse of time or the happening of any other event or conditions would reasonably be expected to (A) become a material default or event of default under any Material Contract or (B) give any third party (a) the right to declare a default or exercise any remedy under any Material Contract, (b) the right to a rebate, chargeback, refund, credit, penalty or change in delivery schedule under any Material Contract, (c) the right to accelerate the maturity or performance of any obligation of the Company or any Company Subsidiary under any Material Contract, or (d) the right to cancel, terminate or modify any Material Contract, except, in each case, as would not be material to the Company and the Company Subsidiaries, taken as a whole.
(c) With respect to each Contract, agreement, bid or proposal between the Company or any Company Subsidiary and any (i) Governmental Entity, including any facilities Contract for the use of government-owned facilities or (ii) third party relating to a Contract between such third party and any Governmental Entity (each a ""), (A) the Company and each Company Subsidiary have complied in all material respects with all requirements of all applicable Laws, or agreements pertaining to such Government Contract, including where applicable the ""
Government Contract
Cost Accounting Standards
 
disclosure statement of the Company or such Company Subsidiary; (B) all representations and certifications executed, acknowledged or set forth in or pertaining to such Government Contract were complete and correct as of their effective dates and the Company and each Company Subsidiary have complied with all such representations and certifications; (C) neither the United States government nor any prime contractor, subcontractor or other Person has notified the Company or any Company Subsidiary, in writing or orally, that the Company or any of its Subsidiaries has breached or violated any Laws, certification, representation, clause, provision or requirement pertaining to such Government Contract; (D) neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary has received any notice of termination for convenience, notice of termination for default, cure notice or show cause notice pertaining to such Government Contract; (E) other than in the ordinary course of business, no cost incurred by the Company or any Company Subsidiary pertaining to such Government Contract has been questioned or challenged, is the subject of any audit or investigation or has been disallowed by any Governmental Entity; and (F) no payments due to the Company or any Company Subsidiary pertaining to such Government Contract have been withheld or set off, nor has any claim been made to withhold or set off money, and the Company and its Subsidiaries are entitled to all progress or other payments received with respect thereto, except, in the case of (A) through (F) above, as would not be material to the Company and the Company Subsidiaries, taken as a whole.
(d) Neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary or to their knowledge, any of their respective directors, officers, employees or authorized agents is or since January 1, 2004 has been under (i) any civil or criminal investigation or indictment by any Governmental Entity or under investigation by the Company or any Company Subsidiaries or (ii) administrative investigation or audit by any Governmental Entity in either case with respect to any alleged improper act or omission arising under or relating to any Government Contract.
(e) There exist (i) no outstanding material claims against the Company or any Company Subsidiary, either by any Governmental Entity or by any prime contractor, subcontractor, vendor or other Person, arising under or relating to any Government Contract, and (ii) no material disputes between the Company or any of Company Subsidiary and the United States government under the Contract Disputes Act, as amended, or any other federal statute, or between the Company or any Company Subsidiary and any prime contractor, subcontractor or vendor arising under or relating to any Government Contract. Neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary has any interest in any material pending claim against any prime contractor, subcontractor, vendor or other Person arising under or relating to any Government Contract.
(f) Since January 1, 2004, neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary has been debarred or suspended from participation in the award of Contracts with the United States government or any other Governmental Entity. To the Company's knowledge, there exist no facts or circumstances that would warrant the institution of suspension or debarment proceedings or the finding of nonresponsibility or ineligibility on the part of the Company, any Company Subsidiary or any of their respective directors, officers or employees.
(g) Since January 1, 2004 (i) no supplier or customer of the Company or any Company Subsidiary has cancelled or otherwise terminated its relationship with the Company or any Company Subsidiary, except for such cancellations and terminations that, would not have a Material Adverse Effect, (ii) no supplier or customer of the Company or any Company Subsidiary has provided written notice to the Company or any Company Subsidiary of its intent either to terminate its relationship with the Company or any Company Subsidiary or to cancel any material agreement with the Company or any Company Subsidiary, except for such terminations and cancellations that, individually or in the aggregate, would not have a Material Adverse Effect, (iii) none of the suppliers of the Company or any Company Subsidiary is unable to continue to supply the products or services supplied to the Company or
 
any Company Subsidiary by such supplier, except for such inabilities that, individually or in the aggregate, would not have a Material Adverse Effect, and (iv) except as set forth in Section 4.11(g) of the Company Disclosure Schedule, the Company and each Company Subsidiary have no direct or indirect ownership interest in any supplier or customer of the Company or any Company Subsidiary that is material to the Company and the Company Subsidiaries taken as a whole.
(h) Neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary provides any Company warranty for products sold or services rendered by the Company and the Company Subsidiaries since January 1, 2001. With respect to the Company's and the Company Subsidiaries' businesses or assets, (i) to the Company's knowledge, there are no outstanding Federal Aviation Administration or other non U.S. civil or military aviation administration mandated retro-fit campaigns for warrantable conditions applicable to any products manufactured, sold, leased or delivered by the Company or any Company Subsidiary other than retro-fit campaigns that have already been put into effect and are not material to the Company and the Company Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, and (ii) to the Company's knowledge, there is no systemic design, manufacturing or other defect in any model or type of product or product specification of the Company or the Company Subsidiaries in connection with any product manufactured, sold, leased, or delivered by the Company or the Company Subsidiaries, in each case, other than defects for which a recall has been put into effect and is not material to the Company and the Company Subsidiaries, taken as a whole.
(i) No facility or personnel security clearances of any Governmental Entity are necessary or required to conduct the Company's and the Company Subsidiaries' businesses as currently conducted by the Company and the Company Subsidiaries. None of the Company or any Company Subsidiary possess, hold or are subject to any facility or personnel security clearances of any Governmental Entity.
4.12 . Except as set forth in the Company SEC Reports filed prior to the date of this Agreement, (i) there is no suit, claim, ethics complaint, action, proceeding or investigation pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened against the Company or any Company Subsidiary or, to the knowledge of the Company, for which the Company or any Company Subsidiary is obligated to indemnify a third party, (ii) none of the Company or any Company Subsidiary is subject to any outstanding order, writ, judgment, injunction, decree, or arbitration ruling or award, and (iii) there has been no refusal to indemnify or denial of indemnification and no intention to refuse indemnification, by any third party in connection with any past, pending or threatened suit, claim, action, proceeding, investigation, order, ruling or award with respect to which the Company or any Company Subsidiary is or may be entitled to indemnification from any third party, except, in each case, as would not be material to the Company and the Company Subsidiaries, taken as a whole. Neither the Company nor any Company or Subsidiary has any material action, suit, proceeding, claim, mediation or arbitration pending against any other Person. There has not been since December 31, 2001, nor are there currently, any internal investigations or inquiries being conducted by the Company, the Company Board (or any committee thereof) or any third party at the request of any of the foregoing concerning any financial, accounting, Tax, conflict of interest, illegal activity, fraudulent or deceptive conduct, violation of Company policy or other misfeasance or malfeasance issues.
Litigation
4.13 .
Environmental Matters
(a) The Company and each Company Subsidiary are in material compliance with all Environmental Laws.
(b) There are no Environmental Claims against the Company, any Company Subsidiary or, to the knowledge of the Company, any entity for which the Company has financial
 
responsibility, nor to the knowledge of the Company have any of them received any written or oral notification of any allegation of any actual or potential responsibility for, or any inquiry or investigation regarding, (i) any alleged violation of Environmental Laws or (ii) any Release or threatened Release of any Hazardous Substance generated or transported by the Company, any Company Subsidiary or any entity for which the Company has financial responsibility, except, in each case, as would not have a Material Adverse Effect.
(c) There have been no Releases from the Company's operations at the Facilities currently owned or leased by Company or any Company Subsidiary of Hazardous Substances or with respect to Facilities formerly owned or leased by Company or any Company Subsidiary, during the Company's or Company Subsidiary's term of ownership or lease in quantities that could trigger the need for investigation and/or remediation pursuant to Environmental Laws, except as would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect.
(d) There are no consent decrees, consent orders, judgments or judicial or administrative orders currently in force and effect under Environmental Law entered into by any Governmental Entity and the Company or any Company Subsidiary or to the knowledge of the Company any entity for which the Company has or may have financial responsibility, or judgments, judicial order or administrative orders under Environmental Law issued by any Governmental Entity against the Company, any Company Subsidiaries or to the knowledge of the Company any entity for which the Company has or may have financial responsibility.
(e) Parent has been provided with reasonable access to true and correct copies of all Environmental Reports.
4.14 .
Intellectual Property
(a) The Company and the Company Subsidiaries (i) own and have independently developed or acquired or (ii) have the valid right or license to all Company IP Rights. The Company IP Rights are sufficient for the conduct of the business of the Company and the Company Subsidiaries as currently conducted by the Company or any Company Subsidiary. Immediately following the Closing, except as would not have a Material Adverse Effect, the Company IP Rights will continue in full force and effect and shall be transferable, alienable or licensable by the Company to the same extent as immediately prior to the Closing without any additional notices or payments of any kind to any third party. The Company-Owned IP Rights and, to the Company's knowledge, the other Company IP Rights, are not subject to any material Encumbrances or restrictions or limitations regarding ownership, use, license or disclosure (including any "rights in data" claims of the United States Government), other than pursuant to a written agreement set forth in Section 4.14(a) of the Company Disclosure Schedule, or that, individually or in the aggregate, would not have a Material Adverse Effect.
(b) Neither the Company nor any of the Company Subsidiaries has transferred ownership of any Intellectual Property that consists of Company-Owned IP Rights to any third party.
(c) The Company and the Company Subsidiaries own and have good and exclusive title to each item of Company Registered Intellectual Property and each material item of Company-Owned IP Rights free and clear of any Encumbrances. The right, license and interest of the Company or a Company Subsidiary of the Company in and to all Third Party Intellectual Property Rights licensed by the Company or a Company Subsidiary from a third party are free and clear of all Encumbrances (excluding restrictions contained in the applicable license agreements with such third parties).
 
(d) Neither the execution and delivery or effectiveness of this Agreement nor the performance of the Company's obligations under this Agreement will cause the forfeiture or termination of, or give rise to a right of forfeiture or termination of, any material Company-Owned IP Right, or impair the right of the Company, any Company Subsidiary or Parent to use, possess, sell or license any material Company-Owned IP Right or any portion thereof.
(e) Section 4.14(e) of the Company Disclosure Schedule lists all Company Registered Intellectual Property including the jurisdictions in which each such item of Intellectual Property has been issued or registered or in which any application for such issuance and registration has been filed, or any other filing or recordation of Company Registered Intellectual Property has been made.
(f) Each item of Company Registered Intellectual Property is subsisting (or in the case of applications, applied for), all registration, maintenance and renewal fees currently due in connection with such Company Registered Intellectual Property have been paid and all documents, recordations and certificates in connection with such Company Registered Intellectual Property currently required to be filed have been submitted to the relevant patent, copyright, trademark or other authorities in the United States or foreign jurisdictions, as the case may be, for the purposes of prosecuting, maintaining and perfecting such Company Registered Intellectual Property and recording the Company's and the Company Subsidiaries' ownership interests therein.
(g) Section 4.14(g) of the Company Disclosure Schedule lists, respectively by subsection number, (i) other than non-disclosure agreements entered into by the Company or any Company Subsidiary in the ordinary course of business ("") and end user customer Contracts on the Company or a Company Subsidiary's standard form, all material Contracts as to which the Company or any Company Subsidiary is a party and pursuant to which any Person is authorized to use, make, offer for sale, sell, license or distribute any Company IP Rights, (ii) other than "shrink wrap" and similar generally available commercial end-user licenses to software that is not redistributed with the Company products that have an individual acquisition cost of $250,000 or less (or multi-seat licenses that have an aggregate acquisition cost of $250,000 or less) and Standard NDAs, all material Contracts to which the Company or any Company Subsidiary is a party and pursuant to which the Company or any Company Subsidiary acquired or is authorized to use or distribute any Third Party Intellectual Property Rights, including without limitation any material inbound licenses to Third Party Intellectual Property Rights included in any Company product, (iii) all material Contracts to which the Company or any Company Subsidiary is a party and pursuant to which any third party agrees to develop for or on behalf of the Company or any Company Subsidiary any part of any Company products, (iv) all Contracts (other than any Contract listed in the Company Disclosure Schedule in response to clause (i) above) pursuant to which the Company or any of the Company Subsidiaries has agreed to any material restriction on the right of the Company or any of the Company Subsidiaries to use or enforce any Company-Owned IP Rights, including all material Contracts granting any third party exclusive rights in Company-Owned IP Rights; and (v) all Contracts pursuant to which the Company or any Company Subsidiary has granted to a university, college, or other educational institution or research center any material rights in any Company-Owned IP Rights in exchange for resources provided by such institution or research center.
Standard NDAs
(h) Except as would not have a Material Adverse Effect, neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary is or shall be as a result of the execution and delivery or effectiveness of this Agreement or the performance of the Company's obligations under this Agreement in breach of any Contract described in Section 4.14(g), above, (the ""), and the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement will not result in the modification, cancellation, termination, suspension of or acceleration of any payments with respect to any Company IP Rights Agreements, or give any non-Company party to any Company IP Rights Agreement the right to do any of the foregoing. Except as would not have a Material Adverse Effect, following the Closing, the
Company IP Rights Agreements
 
Surviving Corporation (as wholly owned by Parent) will be entitled to exercise all of the Company's and the Company Subsidiaries' rights under the Company IP Rights Agreements to the same extent the Company and the Company Subsidiaries would have been able to had the transactions contemplated by this Agreement not occurred and without the payment of any additional amounts or consideration other than ongoing fees, royalties or payments that the Company or any of the Company Subsidiaries would otherwise be required to pay.
(i) There are no material royalties, honoraria, fees or other payments payable by the Company or any of the Company Subsidiaries to any Person (other than compensation payable to employees, consultants and independent contractors not contingent on or related to use of their work product) as a result of the ownership, use, possession, license-in, license-out, sale, marketing, advertising or disposition of any Company-Owned IP Rights by the Company or any of the Company Subsidiaries.
(j) To the knowledge of the Company, there is no unauthorized use, unauthorized disclosure, infringement or misappropriation of any Company-Owned IP Rights by any third party, including any employee or former employee of the Company or any Company Subsidiary. Neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary has within the past four (4) years brought any action, suit or proceeding for infringement or misappropriation of any Intellectual Property or breach of any Company IP Rights Agreement.
(k) Neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary has within the past four (4) years been sued in any suit, action or proceeding (or received any written notice or, to the knowledge of the Company, threat of suit, action or proceeding) that involves a claim of infringement or misappropriation of any Intellectual Property right of any third party or which contests the validity, ownership or right of the Company or any Company Subsidiary to exercise any Intellectual Property right or received any oral or written communication offering to license or grant any other rights or immunities in a manner that communicates or otherwise suggests or implies that the Company or any Company Subsidiary is infringing or otherwise violating any Third Party Intellectual Property Right.
(l) The operation of the business of the Company and the Company Subsidiaries as such business is currently conducted, and to the Company's knowledge, as currently proposed to be conducted by the Company or any Company Subsidiary, including without limitation the design, development, manufacturing, reproduction, marketing, licensing, sale, offer for sale, importation, distribution, provision and/or use of any Company product or provision of any Company service, has not, does not and will not infringe or misappropriate the Intellectual Property of any third party and does not and will not constitute unfair competition or unfair trade practices under the Laws of any jurisdiction and to the Company's knowledge, there is no substantial basis for such a claim.
(m) None of the Company-Owned IP Rights, the Company or any of the Company Subsidiaries is subject to any judicial or governmental proceeding or outstanding order, or material Contract or stipulation, (A) restricting in any manner the use, transfer, or licensing by the Company or any of the Company Subsidiaries of any Company-Owned IP Right or which may affect the validity, use or enforceability of any such Company-Owned IP Right, or (B) restricting the conduct of the business of the Company or any of the Company Subsidiaries in order to accommodate Third Party Intellectual Property rights, in both cases other than in connection with prosecution of Company-Owned IP Rights before the United States Patent and Trademark Office, the United States Copyright Office, or any equivalent Governmental Entity.
(n) Neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary has received any opinion of legal counsel that the operation of the business of the Company or any Company Subsidiary, as previously or currently conducted, or as currently proposed to be conducted by the Company or any Company Subsidiary, infringes or misappropriates any Third Party Intellectual Property Rights.
 
(o) The Company and the Company Subsidiaries take commercially reasonable steps to secure from all of its consultants, employees and independent contractors who independently or jointly contributed to the conception, reduction to practice, creation or development of any Company-Owned IP Rights, proprietary information and invention disclosure and assignment agreements and exclusive ownership of, all such third party's Intellectual Property in such contribution that the Company or any Company Subsidiary does not already own by operation of Law or as a work for hire and such third party has not retained any material rights or licenses with respect thereto.
(p) No current or former employee, consultant or independent contractor of the Company or any Company Subsidiary has any material right, license, claim or interest whatsoever in or with respect to any Company-Owned IP Rights.
(q) To the knowledge of the Company, no current or former employee, consultant or independent contractor of the Company or any Company Subsidiary (i) is in violation of any term or covenant of any Contract relating to employment, invention disclosure, invention assignment, non-disclosure or non-competition or any other Contract with any other party by virtue of such employee's, consultant's or independent contractor's being employed by, or performing services for, the Company or any Company Subsidiary or using trade secrets or proprietary information of others without permission or (ii) has developed any technology, software or other copyrightable, patentable or otherwise proprietary work for the Company or any Company Subsidiary that is subject to any agreement under which such employee, consultant or independent contractor has assigned or otherwise granted to any third party any material rights (including Intellectual Property rights) in or to such technology, software or other copyrightable, patentable or otherwise proprietary work.
(r) To the knowledge of the Company, the employment of any employee of the Company or any Company Subsidiary or the use by the Company or any Company Subsidiary of the services of any consultant or independent contractor does not subject the Company or any Company Subsidiary to any liability to any third party for improperly soliciting such employee, consultant or independent Contractor to work for the Company or any Company Subsidiary, whether such liability is based on contractual or other legal obligations to such third party.
(s) The Company and the Company Subsidiaries have taken commercially reasonable steps to protect and preserve the confidentiality of all confidential or non-public information or similar proprietary information included in the Company IP Rights (""), including without limitation, taking commercially reasonable steps to ensure that all use, disclosure or appropriation of Confidential Information owned by the Company or any Company Subsidiary by or to a third party has been pursuant to the terms of a written agreement or other legal binding arrangement between the Company or a Company Subsidiary and such third party. The Company and the Company Subsidiaries takes commercially reasonable steps to ensure that all use, disclosure or appropriation of Confidential Information by the Company and the Company Subsidiaries not owned by the Company or any Company Subsidiary has been pursuant to the terms of a written agreement between the Company or such Company Subsidiary and the owner of such Confidential Information, or is otherwise lawful. Without limiting the foregoing, the Company and each of the Company Subsidiaries have and enforce a policy requiring all employees and consultants of the Company and the Company Subsidiaries having access to Confidential Information of any of their respective customers or business partners to execute and deliver to the Company an agreement regarding the protection of such Confidential Information (in the case of proprietary information of the Company's and the Company Subsidiaries' customers and business partners, to the extent required by such customers and business partners).
Confidential Information
 
(t) To the knowledge of the Company and any Company Subsidiary, all software products sold, licensed, leased or delivered by the Company or any Company Subsidiary to customers of the Company or any Company Subsidiary within twenty (20) months prior to the Closing Date conform in all material respects (i) to applicable contractual commitments, and express and implied warranties (to the extent not subject to legally effective express exclusions thereof); (ii) to all packaging, advertising and marketing materials to the extent required by law; (iii) to any legally binding representations provided to customers; and (iv) applicable product or service specifications or documentation. To the knowledge of the Company and any Company Subsidiary, there is no legitimate basis for any present or future action, suit, proceeding, hearing, claim, or demand based on the foregoing against the Company or any Company Subsidiary giving rise to any material liability relating to the foregoing products for replacement or repair thereof or other damages in connection therewith in excess of any reserves therefor reflected on the Company Balance Sheet.
(u) Neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary has (i) incorporated Open Source Materials into, or combined Open Source Materials with the Company-Owned IP Rights, (ii) distributed Open Source Materials in conjunction with any Company-Owned IP Rights, or (iii) used Open Source Materials, in such a way that, with respect to (i), (ii) or (iii), creates, or purports to create, obligations for the Company or such Company Subsidiary with respect to any Company-Owned IP Rights or grant, or purport to grant, to any third party any rights or immunities under any Company-Owned IP Rights (including, but not limited to, using any Open Source Materials that require, as a condition of use, modification and/or distribution of such Open Source Materials that other software incorporated into, derived from or distributed with such Open Source Materials be (A) disclosed or distributed in source code form, (B) be licensed for the purpose of making derivative works, or (C) be redistributable at no charge).
(v) No government funding was used in the development of the Company-Owned IP Rights.
(w) (i) Neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary nor any other Person then acting on their behalf has disclosed, delivered or licensed to any Person other than an employee or consultant under an obligation to keep confidential and not use for any purpose other than carrying out duties or obligations to the Company or any Company Subsidiary, agreed to disclose, deliver or license to any Person of any material Company Source Code, and (ii) no event has occurred, and no circumstance or condition exists, that (with or without notice or lapse of time, or both) will, or would reasonably be expected to, result in the disclosure, delivery or license by the Company or any Company Subsidiary or any Person then acting on their behalf to any Person of any material Company Source Code other than a Person carrying out duties or obligations to the Company or any Company Subsidiary. Section 4.14(w) of the Company Disclosure Schedule identifies each Contract pursuant to which the Company or any Company Subsidiary has deposited, or is or may be required to deposit, with an escrow holder or any other Person, any of the Company Source Code, and describes whether the execution of this Agreement or any of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, in and of itself, would reasonably be expected to result in the release from escrow of any Company Source Code.
(x) To the Company's knowledge, except as would not have a Material Adverse Effect, no Governmental Entity is currently, nor since January 1, 2004 has been, entitled to claim any rights (including license rights) in: (i) any "" included in or related to any Company-Owned IP Rights or any of its Subsidiaries, other than ";" (ii) any "" included in the Intellectual Property owned by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, other than ";" (iii) any patents or patentable invention included in the Intellectual Property owned by the Company; or (iv) any copyright included in the Intellectual Property owned by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries. The terms "Technical Data" and "Limited Rights" have the meanings set forth at 48 C.F.R. 252.2277013, and the terms "Restricted Rights" and "Computer Software" have the meanings set forth at 48 C.F.R. 252.2277014.
Technical Data
Limited Rights
Computer Software
Restricted Rights
 
4.15 .
Taxes
(a) The Company and the Company Subsidiaries have timely filed all material federal, state, local, and foreign Tax Returns required to be filed by it in the manner prescribed by applicable Laws and all such Tax Returns were true, complete and correct in all material respects. All Taxes (other than Taxes that are not material in amount) of the Company and the Company Subsidiaries (whether or not shown or required to be shown on any Tax Return) that are due and payable have been timely paid in full and the accruals and reserves for Taxes (rather than any reserve for deferred Taxes established to reflect timing difference between book and Tax income) reflected in the Company Balance Sheet (rather than any notes thereto) are adequate to cover all unpaid Taxes (other than Taxes that are not material in amount) of the Company and the Company Subsidiaries. All reserves for Taxes as adjusted for operations and transactions and the passage of time through the Effective Time in accordance with past custom and practice of the Company and the Company Subsidiaries are adequate to cover all unpaid Taxes of the Company and the Company Subsidiaries accruing through the Effective Time (other than Taxes that are not material in amount).
(b) The Company and the Company Subsidiaries have withheld and paid over all Taxes (other than Taxes that are not material in amount) required to have been withheld and paid over and complied in all material respects with all information reporting and backup withholding requirements, including the maintenance of required records with respect thereto, in connection with amounts paid or owing to any employee, creditor, independent contractor or other third party.
(c) No audit of the Tax Returns or other examination of the Company or any Company Subsidiary is pending or, to the knowledge of Company, threatened. No deficiencies have been asserted in writing against the Company or any Company Subsidiary as a result of examinations by any state, local, federal or foreign Taxing authority which have not been fully resolved and paid and, to the knowledge of the Company, no issue has been raised by any examination conducted by any state, local, federal or foreign Taxing authority that, by application of the same principles, could reasonably be expected to result in a proposed deficiency for any other period not so examined. Each deficiency resulting from any audit or examination relating to Taxes of the Company or any Company Subsidiary by any Taxing authority has been paid or is being contested in good faith and in accordance with the Law and is fully reserved for on the Company Balance Sheet in accordance with GAAP. To the knowledge of the Company, no claim has ever been made in writing by an authority in a jurisdiction where the Company or any of the Company Subsidiaries does not file Tax Returns that the Company or any Company Subsidiary, as the case may be, is or may be subject to Tax in that jurisdiction. Neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary is subject to any private letter ruling of the IRS or comparable rulings of other Tax authorities that will be binding on the Company or any Company Subsidiary with respect to any period following the Closing Date. Neither the stock of any Company Subsidiary nor any asset, right or property of the Company or any Company Subsidiary is subject to any Encumbrance for Taxes (other than an Encumbrance for Taxes not yet due and payable). Neither the Company nor any of the Company Subsidiaries has granted any power of attorney that is currently in force with respect to any Taxes or Tax Returns.
(d) Neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary has requested any extension of time within which to file any Tax Return which Tax Return has not yet been filed. There are no agreements, waivers of statutes of limitations, or other arrangements providing for extensions of time in respect of the assessment or collection of any unpaid Taxes against the Company or any Company Subsidiary.
 
(e) To the knowledge of the Company, (i) the Company and each Company Subsidiary have disclosed on their federal income Tax returns all positions taken therein that could, if not so disclosed, be reasonably be expected to give rise to a substantial understatement penalty within the meaning of Section 6662 of the Code, and (ii) neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary has participated in a "listed transaction" within the meaning of Treasury Regulation Section 1.6011-4(b) or Treasury Regulation Section 301.6111-2.
(f) Neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary has been a member of any affiliated, combined, consolidated or unitary group other than the group of which the Company is the parent. Neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary is a party to any Tax sharing agreement, Tax indemnity obligation or similar agreement, arrangement or practice with respect to Taxes (including any advance pricing agreement, closing agreement or other agreement relating to Taxes with any Taxing authority).
(g) Neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary has agreed to or is required to make any adjustment under Code Section 481(a) or Section 482 (or an analogous provision of state, local or foreign law) by reason of a change in accounting method or otherwise. Neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary will be required to include in income, or exclude any item of deduction from, Taxable income for any Taxable period (or portion thereof) ending after the Closing Date as a result of any (i) "closing agreement" as described in Code Section 7121 (or any corresponding or similar provision of state, local or foreign income Tax law), (ii) open transaction or installment disposition made on or prior to the Closing Date, or (ii) prepaid amount received on or prior to the Closing Date.
(h) Neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary is or has been a United States real property holding corporation (as defined in Section 897(c)(2) of the Code).
(i) To the knowledge of the Company, other than as a result of the Merger, neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary is subject to any limitation on the use of its Tax attributes under Section 382, 383, and 384 of the Code or Treasury Regulation Section 1.1502-15 or -21 (regarding separate return limitation years) or any comparable provisions of state law.
(j) Neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary has constituted a "distributing corporation" or a "controlled corporation" (within the meaning of Section 355(a)(1)(A) of the Code) in a distribution of stock intended to qualify for tax-free treatment under Section 355 or 361 of the Code (A) in the two years prior to the date of this Agreement (or will constitute such a corporation in the two years prior to the Closing Date) or (B) in a distribution that otherwise constitutes part of a "plan" or "series of related transactions" (within the meaning of Section 355(e) of the Code) in conjunction with the Merger.
4.16 . The Company has Made Available to Parent a true, correct and complete list of policies and bonds of insurance maintained by the Company and each Company Subsidiary, and the Company has Made Available to Parent true, correct and complete copies of such policies and bonds of insurance. There is no material claim pending under any of such policies or bonds as to which coverage has been questioned, denied or disputed by the underwriters of such policies or bonds of insurance maintained by the Company or any Company Subsidiary. All premiums due and payable under all such policies and bonds have been paid, and the Company and each Company Subsidiary is otherwise in compliance in all material respects with the terms of such policies and bonds. Neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary has been notified of any threatened termination of, or material premium increase with respect to, any such policies or bonds of insurance maintained by the Company or any Company Subsidiary. All such policies and bonds that provide insurance against liability to third parties were written on an occurrence basis. The Company maintains insurance coverage in such amounts and covering such risks, and with such deductibles, as in the good faith judgment of the Company are adequate with respect to the business in which the Company and the Company Subsidiaries are engaged.
Insurance
 
4.17 . The Company Board has received the opinion of Credit Suisse Securities (USA) LLC (the "") addressed to the Company Board as of the date of this Agreement, to the effect that the Merger Consideration to be received by the holders of Company Common Shares, other than Parent and its Affiliates, in the Merger is fair from a financial point of view to such holders, and the Company will deliver to Parent a true, correct and complete copy of such opinion promptly following the Company's receipt thereof.
Opinion of Financial Advisor
Company Financial Advisor
4.18 . Except for fees payable to the Company Financial Advisor as set forth in the engagement letter between the Company and the Company Financial Advisor, dated March 25, 2006, (the ""), a correct and complete version of which has been Made Available by the Company to Parent, neither the Company nor any Affiliate of the Company is obligated for the payment of any fees or expenses of any investment banker, broker, advisor or similar party in connection with the origin, negotiation or execution of this Agreement or in connection with the Merger or any other transaction contemplated by this Agreement, and neither Parent nor Merger Sub will incur or succeed to any liability, either directly or indirectly, to any such investment banker, broker, advisor or similar party as a result of this Agreement, the Merger or any act or omission of the Company, any of its Affiliates or any of their respective Representatives or stockholders. No such engagement letter obligates the Company to continue to use the services of the Company Financial Advisor following the Merger or pay the fees or expenses of the Company Financial Advisor in connection with any transaction other than the Merger.
Brokers
Engagement Letter
4.19 .
Properties
(a) Neither the Company nor any of the Company Subsidiaries owns any real property interests as of the date hereof. Section 4.19 of the Company Disclosure Schedule lists all material real property leases to which the Company or a Company Subsidiary is a party as of the date hereof and each amendment thereto that is in effect as of the date hereof. The Lease Agreement between Crow Family Holdings Industrial Texas Limited Partnership, as Landlord, and Aviall Services, Inc., as Tenant, dated April 3, 2001, International Commerce Park at DFW, Dallas/Fort Worth International Airport, Texas (the ""), is in full force and effect, is valid and effective in accordance with its terms, and there is not, under such lease, any existing default or event of default (or event that with notice or lapse of time, or both, would constitute a default) by the Company or any Company Subsidiary, or to the Company's knowledge, by any other party thereto that would give rise to a material claim against the Company or any Company Subsidiary. All other current, material leases are in full force and effect, are valid and effective in accordance with their respective terms, and there is not, under any of such leases, any existing default or event of default (or event that with notice or lapse of time, or both, would constitute a default) by the Company or any Company Subsidiary, or to the Company's knowledge, by any other party thereto that would give rise to a material claim against the Company or any Company Subsidiary, except where failure to be in full force and effect or to be valid and effective, and for such default and events of default and such claims, in each case, which would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect. There is not, under the Dallas Lease any existing default or event of default (or event that with notice or lapse or time or both would constitute a default) by the landlord (or as the case may be, if applicable, sublandlord) thereunder that would give rise to a material claim by the Company or any Company Subsidiary against said landlord or sublandlord.
Dallas Lease
(b) Each of the Company and the Company Subsidiaries has good and valid title to, or in the case of leased properties and assets, valid leasehold interests in, all of its material tangible properties and assets, real, personal and mixed, used or held for use in its business, in each case, free and
 
clear of any Encumbrances, except as reflected in the Company Financial Statements and except for Encumbrances for Taxes not yet due and payable and such Encumbrances or other imperfections of title and encumbrances, if any, that are not material in character, amount or extent, and that do not materially detract from the value, or materially interfere with the present use, of the property subject thereto or affected thereby.
(c) The Facilities and equipment of the Company and each Company Subsidiary that are used in the operations of their respective businesses are (i) suitable for the uses to which they are currently employed, (ii) in good operating condition and repair, subject to normal wear and tear, (iii) regularly and properly maintained, (iv) not obsolete, dangerous or in need of renewal or replacement, except for renewal or replacement in the ordinary course of business, consistent with past practice, and (v) to the Company's knowledge, free from any material defects or deficiencies, except in the case of (i) through (v), as would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect.
4.20 . Except as disclosed in the Company's definitive proxy statements included in the Company SEC Reports, no event has occurred and no relationship exists that would be required to be reported by the Company pursuant to Item 404 of Regulation S-K.
Interested Party Transactions
Parent and Merger Sub hereby jointly and severally represent and warrant to the Company as follows:
5.1 . Each of Parent and Merger Sub is a corporation duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware, and has the requisite power and authority and all necessary governmental approvals to own, lease and operate its properties and to carry on its business as it is now being conducted and as currently proposed by it to be conducted. Each of Parent and Merger Sub is duly qualified or licensed to do business, and is in good standing, in each jurisdiction where the character of the properties owned, leased or operated by it or the nature of its business makes such qualification, licensing or good standing necessary, except where the failure to be so qualified, licensed or in good standing would not have, individually or in the aggregate, a Parent Material Adverse Effect.
Organization and Qualification; Subsidiaries
5.2 . Each of Parent and Merger Sub has all necessary corporate power and authority to execute and deliver this Agreement, to perform its obligations hereunder and to consummate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. The execution and delivery of this Agreement by each of Parent and Merger Sub and the consummation by Parent and Merger Sub, as applicable, of the transactions contemplated hereby have been duly and validly authorized by all necessary corporate action, except for the adoption of this Agreement by the sole stockholder of Merger Sub. No other corporate proceedings on the part of Parent and no vote of the holders of any shares of Parent capital stock is required to approve this Agreement or the transactions contemplated hereby. The affirmative vote or written consent of the sole stockholder of Merger Sub to adopt this Agreement is the only vote or written consent necessary to adopt this Agreement and approve the Merger under applicable Law and Merger Sub's Certificate of Incorporation. This Agreement has been duly authorized and validly executed and delivered by Parent and Merger Sub, as applicable, and constitutes a legal, valid and binding obligation of Parent and Merger Sub, enforceable against Parent and Merger Sub in accordance with its terms, subject only to the effect, if any, of (i) applicable bankruptcy and other similar Laws affecting the rights of creditors generally and (ii) rules of Law governing specific performance, injunctive relief and other equitable remedies.
Authority
 
5.3 .
No Conflict; Required Filings and Consents
(a) The execution and delivery of this Agreement by Parent and Merger Sub do not, and the performance of this Agreement by Parent and Merger Sub will not, (i) conflict with or violate any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or Bylaws of Parent or Merger Sub, (ii) assuming that all consents, approvals, authorizations and permits described in Section 5.3(b) have been obtained and all filings and notifications described in Section 5.3(b) have been made and any waiting periods thereunder have terminated or expired, conflict with or violate any Law applicable to Parent or Merger Sub or any other Subsidiary of Parent (each, a "" and, collectively, the "") or by which any property or asset of Parent, Merger Sub or any Parent Subsidiary is bound or affected, or (iii) result in any breach of or any loss of any benefit under, constitute a default (or an event that with notice or lapse of time or both would become a default) under or give to others any right of termination, amendment, acceleration or cancellation of, or result in the creation of a material Encumbrance on any property or asset of Parent, Merger Sub or any Parent Subsidiary pursuant to, any material Contract, bond, mortgage or permit, except, with respect to clause (iii), for any such conflicts, violations, breaches, defaults, other occurrences, Encumbrances, or absences of consents or approvals as would not have a Parent Material Adverse Effect.
Parent Subsidiary
Parent Subsidiaries
(b) The execution and delivery of this Agreement by Parent and Merger Sub do not, and the performance of this Agreement by Parent and Merger Sub will not, require any consent, approval, authorization or permit of, or filing with or notification to, any Governmental Entity or other Person, except (i) under the Exchange Act, the Securities Act, any applicable Blue Sky Laws, the rules and regulations of the New York Stock Exchange, Antitrust Laws, filing and recordation of the Certificate of Merger as required by the DGCL and (ii) where failure to obtain such consents, approvals, authorizations or permits, or to make such filings or notifications, would not have a Parent Material Adverse Effect.
5.4 .
Ownership of Merger Sub; No Prior Activities
(a) Merger Sub was formed solely for the purpose of engaging in the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
(b) All of the outstanding capital stock of Merger Sub is owned directly by Parent. There are no options, warrants or other rights (including registration rights), agreements, arrangements or commitments to which Merger Sub is a party of any character relating to the issued or unissued capital stock of, or other Equity Interests in, Merger Sub or obligating Merger Sub to grant, issue or sell any shares of the capital stock of, or other Equity Interests in, Merger Sub, by sale, lease, license or otherwise. There are no obligations, contingent or otherwise, of Merger Sub to repurchase, redeem or otherwise acquire any shares of the capital stock of Merger Sub.
(c) Except for obligations or liabilities incurred in connection with its incorporation or organization and the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, Merger Sub has not and, prior to the Effective Time, will not have incurred, directly or indirectly, through any Subsidiary or Affiliate, any obligations or liabilities or engaged in any business activities of any type or kind whatsoever or entered into any agreements or arrangements with any Person.
5.5 . Parent has or at the Closing will have cash available to pay the Merger Consideration as contemplated hereby.
Financing
5.6 . Neither Parent nor any Parent Subsidiary has at any time during the last three years been an "interested stockholder" of the Company as defined in Section 203 of the DGCL. Neither Parent nor any Parent Subsidiary owns (directly or indirectly, beneficially or of record), or is a
Company Stock
 
party to any agreement, arrangement or understanding for the purpose of acquiring, holding, voting or disposing of, in each case, any shares of capital stock of the Company (other than the Confidentiality Agreement and as contemplated by this Agreement).
6.1 . The Company agrees that, between the date of this Agreement and the earlier of (A) the Effective Time or (B) the date of termination of this Agreement, except as specifically permitted by any other provision of this Agreement, unless Parent shall otherwise agree in writing or as required by applicable Law, the Company will, and will cause each Company Subsidiary to, (i) conduct its operations in all material respects only in the ordinary and usual course of business consistent with past practice, and shall not take any action inconsistent therewith or with this Agreement, (ii) use its reasonable best efforts to keep available the services of the current officers, employees and consultants of the Company and each Company Subsidiary and to preserve the current relationships of the Company and each Company Subsidiary with such of the customers, suppliers, distributors, business partners and other Persons with which the Company or any Company Subsidiary has business relations, (iii) have in effect and maintain in all material respects at all times, insurance substantially of the kinds and in the amounts as is in effect as of the date of this Agreement, and (iv) keep substantially in working condition and good order and repair all of its material assets and other material properties, normal wear and tear excepted. Without limiting the foregoing, and as an extension thereof, except as specifically permitted by any other provision of this Agreement, the Company shall not, and shall not permit any Company Subsidiary to, between the date of this Agreement and the Effective Time, directly or indirectly, do, or agree to do, any of the following without Parent's prior written consent, unless required by applicable Law or in accordance with the Company's 2006 capital budget set forth on Section 6.1 of the Company Disclosure Schedule or as otherwise set forth on Section 6.1 of the Company Disclosure Schedule (with each exception specifically identified by paragraph number):
Conduct of Business by the Company Pending the Closing
(a) acquire by merging or consolidating with or by purchasing a substantial Equity Interest in or a substantial portion of the assets of, or by any other manner, any business, corporation, partnership, association or other business organization or division thereof with a value or purchase price in excess of $1,000,000, or enter into any agreement providing for any merger, acquisition, divestiture or similar transaction;
(b) sell, lease, license or otherwise dispose of any of its properties or assets, other than (i) non-exclusive licenses to customers in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice, (ii) dispositions of equipment that is no longer used or useful, (iii) sales of assets in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice and (iv) sales, leases, licenses or dispositions of assets with a fair market value not in excess of $1,000,000 in respect of any one asset and not in excess of $10,000,000 in the aggregate;
(c) amend or propose to amend the Company Certificate of Incorporation or Company Bylaws or, in the case of the Company Subsidiaries, their respective constituent documents;
(d) other than dividends from any wholly-owned Company Subsidiary to its parent, declare, set aside or pay any dividend or other distribution payable in cash, capital stock, property or otherwise with respect to any shares of its capital stock, or purchase, redeem or otherwise acquire, or offer to purchase, redeem or otherwise acquire, any shares of its capital stock, other equity securities, other ownership interests or any options, warrants or rights to acquire any such stock, securities or interests (except for repurchases of Company Common Shares to the extent required pursuant to Repurchase Rights);
 
(e) split, combine or reclassify any outstanding shares of its capital stock;
(f) issue, sell, authorize, or agree to the issuance or sale of, any shares of, or any options, warrants or rights of any kind to acquire any shares of, or any securities convertible into or exchangeable for any shares of, any Equity Interests of the Company or any Company Subsidiary, except for the Company Common Shares issuable upon exercise of (i) Company Options outstanding on the date hereof or (ii) Company Warrants outstanding on the date hereof;
(g) grant, amend or change the terms of any Company Option or stock appreciation right, phantom stock or other stock-based incentive award of any kind, or accelerate or change the period of exercisability or vesting of any Company Option or stock appreciation right, phantom stock or other stock-based incentive award of any kind, or amend any Repurchase Rights or accelerate or change the period of vesting of any Company Common Shares subject to Repurchase Rights, or authorize cash payments in exchange for any Company Option or stock appreciation right, phantom stock or other stock-based incentive award of any kind, in each case, except as a result of the Merger;
(h) (i) take any action with respect to the grant of or increase in any severance or termination pay to any current or former director, executive officer or employee (solely with respect to employees, other than in the ordinary course consistent with past practice) of the Company or any Company Subsidiary, (ii) execute any employment, deferred compensation or other similar agreement with any director, executive officer or employee (solely with respect to employees, other than in the ordinary course consistent with past practice) of the Company or any Company Subsidiary, (iii) increase the benefits payable under any existing severance or termination pay policies or employment agreements, (iv) increase the compensation, bonus, severance or other benefits of current or former directors, executive officers or employees (solely with respect to employees, other than in the ordinary course consistent with past practice) of the Company or any Company Subsidiary, (v) adopt or establish any new employee benefit plan (including any severance plan) or amend any existing employee benefit plan (including any severance plan), except as may be required by Law, or as may be required to comply with Section 409A of the Code, or (vi) pay any benefit to a current or former director, executive officer or employee of the Company or any Company Subsidiary not required by any existing agreement or employee benefit plan (including any severance plan) or, (vii) take any action that would result in its incurring any obligation for any payments or benefits described in clauses (i), (ii) or (iii) except to the extent required in a written Contract or agreement in existence as of the date of this Agreement and set forth in the Company Disclosure Schedule;
(i) hire any Person as an executive officer of the Company or, except in the ordinary course of business, enter into, amend or extend the term of, any employment or consulting agreement with any officer, employee, consultant or independent contractor (other than offer letters to new employees using the Company's standard, unmodified form of offer letter which provides for at-will employment and which does not provide for severance, acceleration or post-termination benefits, other than those generally available to employees of the Company or a Company Subsidiary), or enter into any collective bargaining agreement;
(j) (i) make any material Tax election except in the ordinary course of business and consistent with past practice; (ii) change in any material respect any accounting method in respect of Taxes; and (iii) settle any material Tax claim, action or proceeding, except (A) settlements in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice, or (B) settlements to the extent subject to reserves existing as of the date hereof in accordance with GAAP;
 
(k) commence any legal proceeding, or settle, compromise or otherwise resolve any litigation or other legal proceedings, other than resolution through trial judgment for any legal proceeding in existence as of the date hereof, involving a payment of more than $1,000,000 in any one case by or to the Company or any of the Company Subsidiaries;
(l) incur any Indebtedness (other than capitalized lease obligations permitted by clauses (o) or (s) below) in excess of $10,000,000 or which may not be prepaid without penalty, or modify the terms of any existing Indebtedness of the Company or any Company Subsidiary, except (i) draws made in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice pursuant to the Company's Credit Facility not to exceed an amount of $215,000,000 outstanding at any time or (ii) for real estate leases reasonably necessary in connection with distribution Contracts entered into after the date hereof to the extent permitted by this Agreement;
(m) assume, guarantee, endorse or otherwise as an accommodation become responsible for, the obligations of any other Person, or, subject to clause (p) below, make any loans, advances or investment in capital contribution to any Person, except (i) to or for the benefit of the Company Subsidiaries or (ii) for those not in excess of $1,000,000 in the aggregate;
(n) create or assume any material Encumbrance on any material asset;
(o) make or commit to make capital expenditures in excess of $1,000,000 in the aggregate after the date of this Agreement;
(p) make any loans or advances (other than routine travel advances, sales commission draws to employees of the Company or any Company Subsidiary and advance purchase payments to suppliers in an aggregate amount not in excess of $1,250,000 in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice) to, or any investment in or capital contribution to, any Person (including any officer, director or employee of the Company) other than intra-company transfers between the Company and a Company Subsidiary in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice, or forgive or discharge in whole or in part any outstanding loans or advances, or otherwise modify any loan previously granted to any such Person;
(q) enter into any agreement, arrangement or commitment that limits or otherwise restricts the Company or any Company Subsidiary, or that would, after the Effective Time, limit or restrict Parent or any of the Parent Subsidiaries or any of their respective Affiliates or any successor thereto, from engaging or competing in any line of business or in any geographic area, or which provides exclusive rights or "most favored nation" rights of any kind or scope to any party;
(r) other than with respect to any agreement with Parent, terminate, amend, modify or knowingly waive any material provision of any confidentiality or standstill agreement to which it is a party or, upon notice of a material breach, fail to enforce, to the fullest extent permitted by Law, the provisions of such agreement;
(s) (i) amend, terminate or modify any Company Material Contract, or (ii) enter into any Contract that would have been a Company Material Contract if it were in effect on the date hereof involving consideration or other obligation in excess of $1,000,000 annually, except for real estate leases reasonably necessary in connection with distribution Contracts entered into after the date hereof to the extent permitted by this Agreement;
 
(t) materially change the terms on which, or the manner in which, it extends warranties or indemnification rights to customers in a manner that is adverse to the Company or the Company Subsidiaries;
(u) knowingly take, or agree to commit to take, any action that would reasonably be expected to result in any of the conditions to the Merger not being satisfied, or would make any representation or warranty of the Company contained herein inaccurate in any material respect at the Effective Time, or that would materially impair the ability of the Company, Parent, Merger Sub or the holders of Company Common Shares to consummate the Merger in accordance with the terms hereof or materially delay such consummation including, without limitation, adoption or implementation of a rights plan or other anti-takeover arrangement or device;
(v) enter into any Contract to re-sell or distribute any licensed or non-licensed "Parts Manufacturer Approvals" products or parts of Parent or its Affiliates;
(w) enter into any agreement, arrangement or commitment that subjects the Company to compliance with requirements of the Federal Acquisition Regulation or Cost Accounting Standards beyond the level of compliance required as of the date of this Agreement, provided, that with respect to this subsection 6.1(w) such consent shall not be unreasonably withheld or delayed; or
(x) agree to take any of the actions described in subsections (a) through (w) of this Section 6.1.
Nothing contained in this Agreement shall give Parent, directly or indirectly, rights to control or otherwise direct the Company's operations prior to the Effective Time. Prior to the Effective Time, the Company shall exercise, consistent with the terms and conditions of this Agreement, complete control and supervision of its operations.
6.2 . The Company and the Company Board shall (i) take all actions necessary to ensure that no takeover statute or similar statute or regulation becomes applicable to this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby and (ii) if any takeover statute or similar statute or regulation becomes applicable to this Agreement or any transactions contemplated hereby, take all reasonable action necessary to ensure that the Merger and the other transactions contemplated hereby may be consummated as promptly as reasonably practicable on the terms provided for in this Agreement and otherwise to minimize the effect of such statute or regulation on the Merger and the other transactions contemplated hereby.
Takeover Statutes
6.3 .
Proxy Statement
(a) As promptly as reasonably practicable after the execution of this Agreement, the Company shall prepare and file with the SEC a proxy statement relating to the Company Stockholders Meeting (together with any amendments thereof or supplements thereto, the ""). The Company shall prepare and file with the SEC any Other Filings as and when required or requested by the SEC. The Company will use its reasonable best efforts to respond to any comments made by the SEC with respect to the Proxy Statement and any Other Filings as promptly as reasonably practicable. Parent shall furnish all information concerning it as the Company may reasonably request in connection with such actions and the preparation of the Proxy Statement and any Other Filings. At the earliest practicable time, the Company shall file definitive proxy materials with the SEC and cause the Proxy Statement to be mailed to its stockholders. The Proxy Statement shall (subject to Section 6.6(d)) include the unanimous recommendation of the Company Board that adoption of this Agreement and approval of the Merger by the Company's stockholders is advisable and that the Company Board has unanimously determined that
Proxy Statement
 
the Merger is fair to, advisable and in the best interests of the Company and its stockholders. To the extent permitted by applicable Law, prior to filing the preliminary proxy materials, definitive proxy materials or any other filing with the SEC or any other Governmental Entity, the Company shall provide Parent (which term shall in all instances in this Section 6.3 also include Parent's counsel) with reasonable opportunity to review and comment on each such filing in advance and the Company shall include in such filings all comments proposed by Parent and reasonably acceptable to Company. The Company will advise Parent, promptly after it receives notice thereof, of any request by the SEC for amendment of the Proxy Statement or any Other Filings of the Company or comments thereon and responses thereto or requests by the SEC for additional information.
(b) Parent agrees that the information supplied by Parent for inclusion in the Proxy Statement shall not, at (i) the time the Proxy Statement (or any amendment thereof or supplement thereto) is first mailed to the Company's stockholders and (ii) the time of the Company Stockholders Meeting, contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements contained therein not misleading. If, at any time prior to the Effective Time, any event or circumstance relating to Parent or any Parent Subsidiary, or their respective officers or directors, should be discovered by Parent that should be set forth in an amendment or a supplement to the Proxy Statement or any Other Filing, Parent shall promptly inform the Company and shall promptly cooperate with the Company in the prompt filing with the SEC of any amendment or supplement to the Proxy Statement and, as required by Law, in disseminating the information contained in such amendment or supplement to the Company's stockholders.
(c) The Company agrees that the Proxy Statement (other than information supplied by Parent for inclusion in the Proxy Statement) shall not, at (i) the time the Proxy Statement (or any amendment thereof or supplement thereto) is first mailed to the Company's stockholders and (ii) the time of the Company Stockholders Meeting, contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements contained therein not misleading. If, at any time prior to the Effective Time, any event or circumstance relating to the Company or any Company Subsidiary, or their respective officers or directors, should be discovered by the Company that should be set forth in an amendment or a supplement to the Proxy Statement or any Other Filing, the Company shall promptly inform Parent. All documents that the Company is responsible for filing with the SEC in connection with the transactions contemplated herein will comply as to form and substance in all material respects with the applicable requirements of the Securities Act, the Exchange Act and any other applicable Laws.
6.4 .
Company Stockholders Meeting; Board Recommendation
(a) The Company shall call and hold the Company Stockholders Meeting as promptly as reasonably practicable for the purpose of obtaining the Company Stockholders Approval. In connection with the Company Stockholders Meeting, the Company will (i) subject to applicable Laws, use its reasonable best efforts (including postponing or adjourning the Company Stockholders Meeting to obtain a quorum or to solicit additional proxies, but for no other reason without the prior consent of Parent, such consent not to be unreasonably withheld) to obtain the Company Stockholders Approval and (ii) otherwise comply with all legal requirements applicable to the Company Stockholders Meeting.
(b) Subject to Section 6.4(a) and Section 6.6(d), (i) the Company Board shall unanimously recommend that the Company's stockholders vote in favor of the adoption of this Agreement, (ii) the Proxy Statement shall be in material compliance with the requirements of Section 6.3, including the requirement that a statement to the effect that the Company Board has unanimously recommended that the Company's stockholders vote in favor of the adoption of this Agreement at the Company Stockholders Meeting be included in the Proxy Statement, and (iii) neither the Company Board nor any committee thereof shall withhold, withdraw, amend or modify, or propose or resolve to withhold, withdraw, amend or modify in a manner adverse to Parent, the Company Board Recommendation.
 
6.5 . From the date of this Agreement to the Effective Time (or earlier termination of this Agreement), to the extent permitted by applicable Law, the Company shall, and shall cause each Company Subsidiary and each of their respective directors, officers, employees or authorized agents to (i) provide to Parent and Parent's Representatives access, at reasonable times upon prior notice, to the officers, employees, agents, properties, offices and other facilities of the Company and the Company Subsidiaries and to the books and records thereof and (ii) furnish promptly such information concerning the business, properties, Contracts, assets (tangible and intangible, including Intellectual Property), liabilities, Tax Returns, Tax elections and all other workpapers (provided that with respect to workpapers the Company need only provide access to workpapers in the actual possession of the Company or any Company Subsidiary) relating to Taxes, personnel, internal financial statements and other aspects of the Company and the Company Subsidiaries as Parent or Parent's Representatives may reasonably request. The Company shall be entitled to have a representative present at any inspection. No investigation conducted pursuant to this Section 6.5 shall affect or be deemed to modify or limit any representation or warranty made in this Agreement or affect the satisfaction or non-satisfaction of any condition to the Merger set forth in this Agreement. Subject to compliance with applicable Laws, from the date of this Agreement until the earlier of the termination of this Agreement and the Effective Time, the Company shall confer from time to time as requested by Parent to meet with one or more representatives of Parent to discuss any material changes or developments in the operational matters of the Company and each Company Subsidiary and the general status of the ongoing operations of the Company and each Company Subsidiary. Notwithstanding the foregoing, neither the Company nor any Company Subsidiary shall be required to provide access to or to disclose any information (i) where such access or disclosure would result in the loss of the attorney-client privilege or work product privilege of the Company or any Company Subsidiary or contravene any Law or binding agreement entered into prior to the date of this Agreement (provided that with respect to any such binding agreements, and following execution of this Agreement, the Company will use commercially reasonable efforts, to the extent requested by Parent, to obtain all necessary third party consents to allow Parent to review all such agreements), or (ii) to the extent that outside counsel to the Company advises that such access or disclosure should not be disclosed in order to ensure compliance with any applicable Law. Parent agrees to hold confidential all information which it has received or to which it has gained access pursuant to this Section 6.5 in accordance with the Confidentiality Agreement, dated as of March 3, 2006 between the Company and Parent, as amended from time to time (the ""). As soon as practicable after delivering or making available any nonpublic information to any Person in connection with a Superior Offer, the Company shall deliver such nonpublic information to Parent (to the extent such information has not already been deliver to Parent).
Access to Information; Confidentiality
Confidentiality Agreement
6.6 .
No Solicitation of Transactions
(a) . Except as specifically permitted by Sections 6.6(c) and 6.6(d), from and after the date of this Agreement until the Effective Time or termination of this Agreement pursuant to Article 8, the Company will not, and will cause the Company Subsidiaries not to, and will use all reasonable efforts to ensure that its Representatives do not, directly or indirectly, (i) solicit, initiate, seek, entertain, encourage, facilitate, support or induce the making, submission or announcement of any inquiry, expression of interest, proposal or offer that constitutes, or could reasonably be expected to lead to, an Acquisition Proposal, (ii) enter into, participate in, maintain or continue any communications (except solely to provide written or oral notice as to the existence of these provisions) or negotiations regarding, or deliver or make available to any Person any non-public information in response to, or in connection with, any inquiry, expression of interest, proposal or offer that constitutes, or could reasonably be expected to lead to, an Acquisition Proposal, (iii) agree to, accept,
No Solicitation Generally
 
approve, endorse or recommend (or publicly propose or announce any intention or desire to agree to, accept, approve, endorse or recommend) any Acquisition Proposal, (iv) enter into any letter of intent, exclusivity agreement, term sheet or any other Contract contemplating or otherwise relating to any Acquisition Proposal, (v) submit any Acquisition Proposal to the vote of any stockholders of the Company, (vi) withhold, withdraw or modify (or publicly propose or announce any intention or desire to withhold, withdraw or modify), in a manner adverse to Parent, the approval of the Company Board of this Agreement and/or any of the transactions contemplated hereby, or (vii) take any action or position that is inconsistent with, or withdraw or modify (or publicly propose or announce any intention or desire to withdraw or modify), in a manner adverse to Parent, any determination or recommendation referred to in Section 6.4. The Company and the Company Subsidiaries will immediately cease any and all existing activities, discussions and negotiations with any Persons conducted prior to or on the date of this Agreement with respect to any Acquisition Proposal and request the prompt return or destruction of all confidential information previously furnished to any Person with which the Company has engaged in any activities related to any Acquisition Proposal within the twelve (12) month period preceding the date of this Agreement. If any Representative of the Company, whether in his or her capacity as such or in any other capacity, takes any action that the Company is obligated pursuant to this Section 6.6 to use all reasonable efforts to ensure that its Representatives do not take, then the Company shall be deemed for all purposes of this Agreement to have breached this Section 6.6.
(b) . The Company, as promptly as practicable (but in no event more than twenty-four (24) hours after receipt), shall advise Parent orally and in writing of (i) an Acquisition Proposal, (ii) any inquiry, expression of interest, proposal or offer that constitutes, or could reasonably be expected to lead to, an Acquisition Proposal, (iii) any other notice that any Person is considering making an Acquisition Proposal, or (iv) any request for non-public information that could reasonably be expected to lead to an Acquisition Proposal, as well as, in the event of any of (i)-(iv) above, (1) the material terms and conditions of such Acquisition Proposal, inquiry, expression of interest, proposal, offer, notice or request and (2) the identity of the Person or Group making any such Acquisition Proposal, inquiry, expression of interest, proposal, offer, notice or request. The Company will (x) keep Parent informed, as promptly as practicable, of the status and details (including any amendments, modifications or proposed amendments or modifications) of any such Acquisition Proposal, inquiry, expression of interest, proposal, offer, notice or request and (y) provide to Parent, as promptly as practicable, a copy of all written materials and other information provided to the Company in connection with any such Acquisition Proposal, inquiry, expression of interest, proposal, offer, notice or request. The Company shall provide Parent with at least the same prior notice provided to the members of the Company Board of any meeting of the Company Board at which the Company Board is reasonably expected to discuss any Acquisition Proposal, including to determine whether such Acquisition Proposal is a Superior Offer.
Notice
(c) . In the event that any Person submits to the Company (and does not withdraw) an Acquisition Proposal that the Company Board concludes in good faith (after consultation with its outside legal counsel and a financial advisor of national standing) is, or is reasonably likely to become, a Superior Offer, then notwithstanding Section 6.6(a), the Company may, so long as the Company Stockholders Approval has not yet been obtained, (i) enter into discussions with such Person regarding such Acquisition Proposal, and (ii) deliver or make available to such Person non-public information regarding the Company and the Company Subsidiaries; provided, that: (A) in each case, neither the Company, any Company Subsidiary nor any Representative of the Company shall have violated any of the restrictions set forth in this Section 6.6; (B) in each case, the Company Board first shall have concluded in good faith, after consultation with its outside legal counsel, that such action is reasonably required in order for the Company Board to comply with its fiduciary obligations to the Company's stockholders under applicable Laws; (C) in each case the Company first shall have provided Parent with written notice of the identity of such Person and all of the material terms and conditions of such Acquisition Proposal and of the Company's intention to take actions in response to such Superior
Superior Offers
 
Offer, specifying the actions it intends to take; and (D) in the case of clause (ii), the Company first shall have received from such Person an executed confidentiality agreement containing terms at least as restrictive with regard to the Company's Confidential Information as the Confidentiality Agreement, it being understood that such confidentiality agreement shall not include any provision for any exclusive right to negotiate with such Person or having the actual or purported effect of restricting the Company from fulfilling its obligations under this Agreement.
(d) . Nothing in this Agreement shall prevent the Company Board from (i) withholding, withdrawing, amending or modifying the Company Board Recommendation or (ii) terminating this Agreement pursuant to Section 8.1(h) simultaneously with the payment of the Termination Fee if (A) the Company Stockholders Approval has not yet been obtained, (B) the Company shall not have violated any of the restrictions set forth in Section 6.4 or this Section 6.6, (C) a Superior Offer is made to the Company and is not withdrawn, (D) the Company shall have promptly provided written notice to Parent (a "") advising Parent that the Company has received a Superior Offer and that it intends (or may intend) to change the Company Board Recommendation or terminate the Agreement pursuant to Section 8.1(h) and the manner and timing in which it intends (or may intend) to do so, (E) Parent shall not have, within four (4) Business Days of Parent's receipt of the Notice of Superior Offer, made an offer that the Company Board determines in its good faith judgment (after consultation with a financial advisor of national standing) to be at least as favorable to the Company's stockholders as such Superior Offer (it being agreed that (1) the Company Board shall convene a meeting to consider any such offer by Parent promptly following the receipt thereof, (2) that the Company Board will not withhold, withdraw, amend or modify the Company Board Recommendation or terminate the Agreement pursuant to Section 8.1(h) for four (4) Business Days after receipt by Parent of the Notice of Superior Offer, and (3) any change to the financial or other material terms of such Superior Offer shall require a new Notice of Superior Offer to Parent and a new four (4) Business Day period under this clause (E)), and (F) the Company Board concludes in good faith, after consultation with its outside legal counsel, that, in light of such Superior Offer and any offer made by Parent pursuant to Section 6.6(d)(E), the Company Board is required to withhold, withdraw, amend or modify the Company Board Recommendation or terminate this Agreement pursuant to Section 8.1(h) to comply with its fiduciary obligations to the Company's stockholders under applicable Law.
Changes of Recommendation
Notice of Superior Offer
(e) . Nothing contained in this Agreement shall prohibit the Company or the Company Board from taking and disclosing to its stockholders a position contemplated by Rules 14d-9 and 14e-2(a) promulgated under the Exchange Act or taking any action required by any order or` decree of any Governmental Entity; provided, however, that neither the Company Board nor any committee thereof shall withhold, withdraw, amend or modify the Company Board Recommendation unless specifically permitted to do so pursuant to this Section 6.6.
Compliance with Tender Offer Rules
(f) . Nothing contained in this Agreement shall prohibit the Company from making any disclosure to the stockholders of the Company if the Company Board has concluded in its good faith judgment (after receipt of advice from its outside legal counsel) that such disclosure is required in order to comply with its fiduciary obligations to the Company's stockholders under applicable Law or to comply with securities laws. Such disclosure shall not be deemed to withhold, withdraw, amend or modify the Company Board Recommendation or otherwise constitute a breach of this Section 6.6.
Stockholder Disclosures
6.7 .
Appropriate Action; Consents; Filings
(a) Promptly after the execution of this Agreement, each of Parent and the Company shall apply for or otherwise seek, and shall use its reasonable best efforts to obtain, all consents and approvals required to be obtained by it for the consummation of the Merger. Without limiting the
 
generality or effect of the foregoing, each of Parent and the Company shall, (i) as soon as practicable, and in any event no later than ten (10) Business Days after the date of this Agreement, make any initial filings required under the HSR Act and (ii) as promptly as practicable, make any additional filings required by any other applicable Antitrust Laws. The parties hereto shall consult and cooperate with one another, afford one another (or one another's counsel) an opportunity to review in advance any analyses, appearances, presentations, memoranda, briefs, arguments, opinions and proposals to be made or submitted by or on behalf of any party hereto in connection with proceedings under or relating to any Antitrust Law; and consider in good faith the views of one another, in connection with any analyses, appearances, presentations, memoranda, briefs, arguments, opinions and proposals; provided, however, that, with respect to any such analyses, appearances, presentations, memoranda, briefs, arguments, opinions or proposals, each of Parent and the Company need not supply the other (or its counsel) with copies (or in case of oral presentations, a summary) to the extent that any Law applicable to such party requires such party or the Company Subsidiaries to restrict or prohibit access to any such properties or information. Unless otherwise agreed, to the extent reasonably practicable and permitted by applicable Law, no party shall have any material discussions or communications with any Governmental Entity with respect to the Transactions contemplated by this Agreement without, where practical, consulting with a representative of the other party.
(b) Each party will notify the other promptly upon the receipt of (i) any comments from any officials of any Governmental Entity in connection with any filings made pursuant hereto and (ii) any request by any officials of any Governmental Entity for amendments or supplements to any filings made pursuant to, or information provided to comply in all material respects with, any Laws. Whenever any event occurs that is required to be set forth in an amendment or supplement to any filing made pursuant to Section 6.7(a), each party will promptly inform the other of such occurrence and cooperate in filing with the applicable Governmental Entity such amendment or supplement.
(c) Each of Parent and the Company shall use its reasonable best efforts to resolve such objections, if any, as may be asserted by any Governmental Entity with respect to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement under the HSR Act, the Sherman Act, as amended, the Clayton Act, as amended, the Federal Trade Commission Act, as amended, Council Regulation 139/2004 of the European Community and any other federal, state or foreign statutes, rules, regulations, orders or decrees that are designed to prohibit, restrict or regulate actions having the purpose or effect of monopolization, lessening of competition or restraint of trade (collectively, ""). Each of Parent and the Company shall use its reasonable best efforts to take such action as may be required to cause the expiration or termination of the waiting or notice periods or the receipt of approval decisions under the HSR Act or other Antitrust Laws with respect to such transactions as promptly as possible after the execution of this Agreement. Without limiting the foregoing, Parent and the Company shall take any and all of the following actions to the extent necessary to obtain the approval of any Governmental Entity with jurisdiction over the enforcement of any applicable Laws regarding the transactions contemplated hereby: (i) entering into negotiations, (ii) providing information required by Law, and (iii) substantially complying with any "second request" for information pursuant to the Antitrust Laws.
Antitrust Laws
(d) Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, if any administrative or judicial action or proceeding is instituted (or threatened to be instituted) challenging any transaction contemplated by this Agreement as violative of any Antitrust Law, it is expressly understood and agreed that (i) Parent and the Company shall litigate, contest or defend against any administrative or judicial action or proceeding that seeks to obtain a temporary restraining order or a preliminary injunction preventing, in whole or in part, the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, provided, however, that if a Governmental Entity issues a Restraint either Parent or the Company may, in its sole discretion, terminate this Agreement pursuant to Section 8.1(c) and (ii) Parent shall make reasonable best efforts to eliminate the grounds of objection to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, that may be
 
asserted by any Governmental Entity under any Antitrust Laws, so as to enable the Closing to occur as soon as reasonably possible (and in any event, no later than the Outside Date), provided, however, that Parent shall not be required to undertake any efforts that, in its judgment, would or could substantially impair its ability to conduct any of its businesses or the business of the Company in the manner that they have been conducted in the past.
(e) Notwithstanding Section 6.7(d) or any other provision of this Agreement, nothing in this Section 6.7 shall (i) require Parent to make proposals, execute or carry out agreements, or submit to orders, providing for a Divestiture or (ii) limit a party's right to terminate the Agreement pursuant to Sections 8.1(b) or 8.1(c) so long as such party has until such termination complied in all material respects with its obligations under this Section 6.7.
6.8 . Each of Company and Parent, as the case may be, will notify the other party in writing promptly after learning of (i) any notice or other communication from any Person alleging that the consent of such Person is or may be required in connection with the Merger, (ii) any notice or other communication from any Governmental Entity in connection with the Merger, (iii) any change, occurrence or event that, individually or in the aggregate with any other changes, occurrences and events, would reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, or that is reasonably likely to cause any of the conditions to closing set forth in Article 7 not to be satisfied, or (iv) any claim, or any verbal or written inquiry by any Tax Authority, regarding Taxes in excess of $5,000 payable by the Company. Each of Parent and Company shall give prompt notice to the other party of any representation or warranty made by it contained in this Agreement becoming untrue or inaccurate in any material respect, or any failure by it to comply with or satisfy in any material respect any covenant, condition or agreement to be complied with or satisfied by it under this Agreement, provided, however, that no such notification shall affect the representations, warranties, covenants or agreements of the parties or the conditions to the obligations of the parties under this Agreement.
Certain Notices
6.9 . Parent and the Company have agreed to the text of the press release announcing the signing of this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby. Other than with respect to any announcement relating to any action specifically permitted to be taken by the Company pursuant to Section 6.6(d), Parent and the Company shall provide to each other any subsequent press releases related to this Agreement, the Merger and the transactions contemplated hereby and shall consult with each other before issuing or making any such release. Neither Parent nor the Company shall issue any such press release or make any such public statement without the prior written consent of the other party; provided that the either party may, without obtaining the prior consent of the other party, issue such press release or make such public statements as such party determines in good faith, following consultation with legal counsel, are required by Law or the rules and regulations of the New York Stock Exchange, if it has used all reasonable efforts to consult with the other party. Each of Parent and the Company shall cause its employees, officers and directors to comply with this Section 6.9.
Public Announcements
6.10 .
Indemnification
(a) From and after the Effective Time, Parent will assume, and will cause the Surviving Corporation to fulfill and honor in all respects, the obligations of the Company pursuant to any indemnification agreements between the Company and its directors and officers set forth on Section 6.10 of the Company Disclosure Schedule as of the Effective Time (the "") and any indemnification provisions under the Company Certificate of Incorporation or Company Bylaws as in effect on the date of this Agreement, in each case, subject to applicable Law. The Certificate of Incorporation and Bylaws of the Surviving Corporation will contain provisions with respect to indemnification that are at least as favorable to the Indemnified Parties as those contained in the Company Certificate of Incorporation and Company Bylaws as in effect on the date of this Agreement, which
Indemnified Parties
 
provisions will not be amended, repealed or otherwise modified for a period of six (6) years from the Effective Time in any manner that would adversely affect the rights thereunder of the Indemnified Parties, unless such modification is required by applicable Law.
(b) For six (6) years after the Effective Time, Parent shall cause to be maintained directors' and officers' liability insurance ("") in respect of acts or omissions occurring prior to the Effective Time covering each individual who at the date of this Agreement was an Indemnified Party covered as of the date hereof or hereafter by the Company's D&O Insurance on terms with respect to coverage and amounts no less favorable than those of such policy in effect on the date hereof; Parent shall have the right to cause coverage to be extended under the Company's D&O Insurance by obtaining a six (6) year "tail" policy on terms and conditions no less advantageous than the Company's existing D&O Insurance, and such "tail" policy shall satisfy the provisions of this Section 6.10. In lieu of the foregoing, prepaid policies may be obtained prior to the Effective Time, which policies shall provide for terms and conditions no less advantageous than the Company's existing D&O Insurance with the prior written consent of Parent, which shall not be unreasonably withheld. If such prepaid policies have been obtained prior to the Effective Time, Parent shall, and shall cause the Surviving Corporation to, maintain such policies in full force and effect, and continue to honor the obligations thereunder.
D&O Insurance
(c) In the event the Surviving Corporation or any of its successors or assigns (i) consolidates with or merges into any other Person and shall not be the continuing or surviving corporation or entity of such consolidation or merger or (ii) transfers all or substantially all of its properties and assets to any Person, then and in each such case, proper provisions shall be made so that the successors and assigns of the Surviving Corporation, or at Parent's option, Parent, shall assume the obligations set forth in this Section 6.10.
(d) This Section 6.10 shall survive the consummation of the Merger, is intended to benefit each of the Indemnified Parties, shall be binding on all successors and assigns of the Surviving Corporation and Parent, shall be enforceable by each Indemnified Party and his or her heirs and representatives, and may not be amended, altered or repealed with respect to any Indemnified Party after the Effective Time without the prior written consent of such Indemnified Party (provided that any amendment, alteration or repeal prior to the Effective Time shall be governed by Section 8.3).
6.11 .
Employees
(a) From and after the Effective Time, Parent and Merger Sub shall have the rights and obligations described in this Section 6.11 and Section 6.12 regarding the individuals who were employees of the Company or a Company Subsidiary immediately prior to the Effective Time and who continue employment with the Company, a Company Subsidiary or Parent or a Parent Subsidiary following the Effective Time (including each such individual who is on vacation, temporary layoff, leave of absence, sick leave or short- or longterm disability leave) ("").
Continuing Employee
(b) All Continuing Employees shall be employed solely on an "at will" basis, except to the extent required by the provisions of written employment Contracts or as required by applicable Law.
(c) Within a reasonable period of time after the last Business Day of each month after the date of this Agreement and on or about the date that is five (5) Business Days prior to the expected date on which the Closing will occur, the Company shall, as and to the extent necessary, deliver to Parent a revised Section 4.10(f) of the Company Disclosure Schedule, which sets forth each Person who the Company reasonably believes is, with respect to the Company or any ERISA Affiliate, a "disqualified individual" (within the meaning of Section 280G of the Code and the regulations promulgated thereunder), as of the date such revised Section 4.10(f) of the Company Disclosure Schedule is made available to Parent.
 
6.12 .
Benefit Plans
(a) Subject to Section 6.11(b):
(i) Parent shall, through the period beginning at the Effective Time and ending December 31, 2007, cause each Continuing Employee to be provided compensation (including wages and cash and equity incentive compensation opportunities) and employee benefits substantially no less favorable in the aggregate than the compensation and employee benefits, respectively, to which they were entitled in the aggregate immediately before the Effective Time; provided that in no event shall Parent cause a reduction in the severance benefits to which Continuing Employees are entitled during the period ending December 31, 2007 below the level of entitlement in effect immediately before the Effective Time;
(ii) For all purposes under each employee benefit plan maintained by Parent, any Parent Subsidiary or any of their Affiliates in which Continuing Employees become eligible to participate upon or after the Effective Time, the Continuing Employees shall be given credit for all service with the Company or a Company Subsidiary, as applicable, to the same extent as if such services had been rendered to Parent or any of its Affiliates. Notwithstanding the foregoing, such credit shall not be used to determine benefit accruals, except with respect to severance and vacation benefits; and
(iii) As to the plan years then in place at the Effective Time, Parent shall, or shall cause the Company and each Company Subsidiary, to use all best efforts to: (i) waive all limitations as to pre-existing conditions, exclusions, evidence of insurability requirements and waiting periods with respect to participation and coverage requirements applicable to the Continuing Employees under any welfare or fringe benefit plan in which the Continuing Employees may be eligible to participate after the Closing; and (ii) provide each Continuing Employee with credit under any general leave, welfare plan or fringe benefit plan in which the Continuing Employee becomes eligible to participate after the Closing for any co-payments and deductibles paid by and out of pocket requirements satisfied by such Continuing Employee for the then current plan year under the corresponding welfare or fringe benefit plan maintained by the Company or any Company Subsidiary prior to the Closing.
(b) As promptly as practicable following the execution of this Agreement, the Company shall appoint an independent nationally recognized financial institution to serve as fiduciary for the Company Employee Savings Plan (the "") with respect to Company Common Shares held under the Savings Plan who, together with the trustee of the Savings Plan, shall coordinate and take any and all appropriate actions to effectuate the voting of such Company Common Shares held under the Savings Plan in the Company Stockholders Meeting.
Savings Plan
(c) As promptly as reasonably practicable following the execution of this Agreement and in no event later than thirty (30) days following execution of this Agreement, the Company shall amend in form and substance agreed to in writing by Parent the Company Supplemental Executive Retirement Income Plan to provide that, for purposes of determining whether a Company executive's "Annual Compensation" is substantially similar to his or her Annual Compensation in the year immediately preceding a Change in Control, the reference in Section 9.1 of such Plan to incentive compensation is intended to denote the incentive opportunities made available to such executive, rather than the amount of incentive compensation actually paid to him or her.
 
(d) As promptly as reasonably practicable following the execution of this Agreement and in no event later than thirty (30) days following execution of this Agreement, the Company shall duly approve and adopt resolutions of the Company Board appointing, effective as of the Effective Time, the Employee Benefit Plans Committee of Parent (provided that it consists of at least three members) as the sole Plan Administrator under all Company Benefit Plans and appointing, effective as of the Effective Time, the Employee Benefit Investment Committee of Parent as the sole fiduciary for investment of the assets of all Company Benefit Plans, each case in form and substance approved in writing by Parent.
(e) The Company acknowledges and agrees that benefits payable in the event of a change of control under the Company's Benefit Restoration Plan, effective as of January 1, 1994, as amended, shall be paid in accordance with the terms of the Company's Benefit Restoration Plan, subject to the offset for benefits payable pursuant to the Company's Retirement Plan, as amended, including but not limited to Amendment No. 13, which will be applied as if the IRS had already issued the determination letter referenced in it provided that, to the extent such Amendment No. 13 is the subject of an unfavorable IRS determination letter or the Company elects not to pursue a favorable IRS determination letter covering (or withdraws a determination application to the extent applicable to) such Amendment No. 13, the Company shall make an additional payment as soon as practical thereafter (together with interest at an annualized rate equal to the so-called composite "prime rate" as quoted from time to time during the relevant period in the Southwest Edition of The Wall Street Journal, plus two percent (2%)) to each affected participant, who participated in the Company's Benefit Restoration Plan at the Effective Time, equal to the amount that would have been paid had Amendment No. 13 not been in effect, less any amounts actually paid since the Effective Time.
(f) Notwithstanding the foregoing, this Section 6.12 is not intended to and shall not require Parent to continue any Company Benefit Plan beyond the time when it otherwise lawfully could be terminated or modified, or to provide any Continuing Employee with any rights to continued employment, severance pay (except as provided in Section 6.12(a)(i)) or similar benefits following any termination of employment.
6.13 . The parties hereto acknowledge that Parent and the Company have previously executed the Confidentiality Agreement which shall continue in full force and effect in accordance with its terms, provided, however, that the standstill restrictions on Parent and Merger Sub set forth in the Confidentiality Agreement are hereby waived by the Company, provided however, that in the event this Agreement is terminated pursuant to Section 8.1 such standstill restrictions shall survive in accordance with the terms of the Confidentiality Agreement.
Standstill Provisions
6.14 . The Company shall use commercially reasonable efforts, to the extent requested by Parent, to obtain and deliver to Parent at or prior to the Closing, all consents, waivers and approvals under each Material Contract set forth on Section 6.14 of the Company Disclosure Schedule, using a form reasonably acceptable to Parent. The Company shall give all notices and other information required to be given to the employees of the Company or any Company Subsidiary, any collective bargaining unit representing any group of employees of the Company or any Company Subsidiary and any applicable Governmental Entity under the WARN Act, the National Labor Relations Act, as amended, the Code, COBRA and other applicable Laws in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
Third Party Consents; Notices
6.15 . Prior to the Effective Time, the Company shall take all such steps as may be required (to the extent permitted under applicable Law) to cause any disposition of Company Common Shares (including derivative securities with respect to Company Common Shares) resulting from the transactions contemplated by this Agreement by each individual who is subject to the reporting requirements of Section 16(a) of the Exchange Act with respect to the Company to be exempt under Rule 16b-3 promulgated under the Exchange Act.
Section 16 Matters
 
6.16 . Subject to the limitations set forth in Section 6.6(d), each of the parties hereto agrees to use reasonable best efforts, and to cooperate with each other party hereto, to take, or cause to be taken, all actions, and to do, or cause to be done, all things reasonably necessary, appropriate or desirable to consummate and make effective, in the most expeditious manner practicable, the Merger and the other transactions contemplated hereby, including (i) taking all reasonable actions necessary to satisfy the respective conditions set forth in Article 7 and (ii) executing and delivering such other instruments and doing and performing such other acts and things as may be necessary or reasonably desirable to effect completely the consummation of the Merger and the other transactions contemplated hereby. The Company shall keep Parent reasonably informed of, and cooperate with Parent in connection with, any stockholder litigation or claim against the Company or its directors and officers relating to the Merger or the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement, provided, however, that no settlement of any such litigation shall be agreed to without Parent's consent, and provided, further that all obligations in this Section 6.16 shall be subject to obligations of the Company under applicable Laws relating to attorney-client communication and privilege.
Reasonable Efforts; Cooperation
6.17 .
Notes Tender Offer
(a) Provided that this Agreement shall not have been terminated in accordance with Section 8.1, the Company will commence a tender offer (the "") for all of the $200,000,000 aggregate principal amount at maturity of the 7-5/8% Senior Notes due 2011 (the "") as promptly as reasonably practicable after the execution of this Agreement, but in no event later than the mailing of the Company Proxy Statement. The aggregate consideration payable to each holder of Senior Notes pursuant to the Notes Tender Offer shall be an amount in cash established by Parent. The Notes Tender Offer shall be made pursuant to an Offer to Purchase and Consent Solicitation Statement prepared by the Company in connection with the Notes Tender Offer in form and substance satisfactory to Parent (as amended from time to time, the "").
Notes Tender Offer
Senior Notes
Notes Offer to Purchase
(b) As part of the Notes Tender Offer, the Company shall solicit the consent of the holders of the Senior Notes, to amend, eliminate or waive certain sections (as selected by Parent) of the Senior Notes Indenture (the ""). The Surviving Corporation's obligation to accept for payment and pay for the Senior Notes tendered pursuant to the Notes Tender Offer or make any payment for the Notes Consents shall be subject to the conditions that (i) the conditions set forth in Article 7 below shall have been satisfied or waived, (ii) the simultaneous occurrence of the Effective Time and (iii) such other conditions as are customary for transactions similar to the Notes Tender Offer. Subject to the terms and conditions of the Notes Tender Offer, the Parent agrees to cause the Surviving Corporation to accept for payment, as promptly as practicable after expiration of the Notes Tender Offer, all Senior Notes validly tendered and not withdrawn. The Company will not waive any of the conditions to the Notes Tender Offer without the prior written consent of Parent.
Notes Consents
(c) The Company shall prepare, as promptly as practicable, the Notes Offer to Purchase, together with related letters of transmittal and similar ancillary agreements (such documents, together with all supplements and amendments thereto, being referred to herein collectively as the ""), relating to the Notes Tender Offer and to disseminate to the record holders of the Senior Notes, and to the extent known by the Company, the beneficial owners of the Senior Notes (collectively, the ""), the Notes Tender Offer Documents; provided, however, that prior to the dissemination thereof, the Company shall consult with Parent with respect to the Notes Tender Offer Documents and shall include in such Notes Tender Offer Documents all comments reasonably proposed by Parent. Parent shall provide the Company with any information for inclusion in the Notes Tender
Notes Tender Offer Documents
Noteholders
 
Offer Documents which may be required under applicable Law and which is reasonably requested by the Company. If at any time prior to the acceptance of Senior Notes pursuant to the Notes Tender Offer any event should occur that is required by applicable Law to be set forth in an amendment of, or a supplement to, the Notes Tender Offer Documents, the Company will prepare and disseminate such amendment or supplement; provided, however, that prior to such dissemination, the Company shall consult with Parent with respect to such amendment or supplement and shall include in such Notes Tender Offer Documents all comments reasonably proposed by Parent. The Company will notify Parent at least 48 hours prior to the dissemination of the Notes Tender Offer Documents, or 24 hours prior to the mailing of any amendment or supplement thereto, to the Noteholders.
(d) At such time as the Company receives consents from Noteholders holding at least a majority of the aggregate principal amount of Senior Notes, the Company agrees to execute, and to cause all of the guarantors that are a party to the Senior Notes Indenture to execute, and will use reasonable best efforts to cause the trustee under the Senior Notes Indenture to execute, a supplemental indenture (the "") in order to give effect to the amendments of the Indenture contemplated in the Notes Tender Offer Documents; provided, however, that notwithstanding the fact that the Supplemental Indenture will become effective upon such execution, the proposed amendments set forth therein (the "") will not become operative unless and until all conditions to the Notes Tender Offer have been satisfied or waived by the Company and the Company accepts all Senior Notes (and related consents) validly tendered for purchase and payment pursuant to the Notes Tender Offer. In such event, the parties hereto agree that the Proposed Amendments will be deemed operative as of immediately prior to such acceptance for payment, and the Company will thereafter be obligated to make all payments for the Senior Notes (and related consents) so tendered.
Supplemental Indenture
Proposed Amendments
7.1 . The respective obligations of each party to effect the Merger and the other transactions contemplated herein shall be subject to the satisfaction, at or prior to the Effective Time, of the following conditions, any or all of which may be waived, in whole or in part, to the extent permitted by applicable Law:
Conditions to Obligations of Each Party Under This Agreement
(a) . The Company Stockholders Approval shall have been obtained.
Company Stockholders Approval
(b) . No Governmental Entity shall have obtained, enacted, issued, promulgated, enforced or entered any statute, rule, regulation, executive order, decree, judgment, injunction, arbitration award, finding or other order (whether temporary, preliminary or permanent), in any case that is in effect and prevents or prohibits consummation of the Merger (each, a "").
No Order
Restraint
(c) . Any applicable waiting periods, together with any extensions thereof, under the (i) HSR Act and (ii) other Antitrust Laws required to consummate the Merger shall have expired or been terminated.
HSR Act
7.2 . The obligations of Parent and Merger Sub to effect the Merger and the other transactions contemplated herein are also subject to the satisfaction, at or prior to the Effective Time, of the following conditions:
Additional Conditions to Obligations of Parent and Merger Sub
(a) . (i) The representations and warranties of the Company contained in Section 4.1, Section 4.3, Section 4.4, and Section 4.5 shall be true and correct in all material respects as of the date hereof and as of the Effective Time as though made on and as of the
Representations and Warranties
 
Effective Time (except that those representations and warranties that address matters only as of a particular date need only be true and correct as of such date) and (ii) all other representations and warranties of the Company contained in this Agreement and in any certificate or other writing delivered by the Company pursuant hereto, in each case disregarding and without giving any effect to all qualifications and exceptions contained herein and therein relating to materiality or Material Adverse Effect or any similar standard or qualification, shall be true and correct as of the date hereof and as of the Effective Time (except that those representations and warranties that address matters only as of a particular date need only be true and correct as of such date), except where the failure of such representations and warranties to be so true and correct has not had and would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect.
(b) . The Company shall have performed or complied in all material respects with all agreements and covenants required by this Agreement to be performed or complied with by it on or prior to the Effective Time.
Agreements and Covenants
(c) . There shall not have occurred any Material Adverse Effect.
Material Adverse Effect
(d) . No action, suit, proceeding, claim, arbitration or investigation shall be pending or threatened in which any Governmental Entity is a party wherein an unfavorable injunction, judgment, order, decree, ruling or charge would (i) prevent, restrain or otherwise interfere with the consummation of any of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement or (ii) affect adversely the right or powers of Parent to own, operate or control the Company or any portion of the business or assets of the Company or Parent, and no such injunction, judgment, order, decree, ruling or charge shall be in effect.
Court Proceedings
(e) . With respect to any of the Company SEC Reports filed with the SEC after the date of this Agreement, neither the principal executive officer nor the principal financial officer of the Company shall have failed to provide the necessary certifications in the form required under Section 302 and Section 906 of the SOXA.
SarbanesOxley Certifications
(f) . The Company shall have delivered to Parent a certificate, signed by the Chief Executive Officer of the Company and dated as of the Closing Date, to the effect that the conditions set forth in this Section 7.2 have been satisfied.
Officer's Certificate
7.3 . The obligation of the Company to effect the Merger and the other transactions contemplated herein are also subject to the satisfaction, at or prior to the Effective Time, of the following conditions:
Additional Conditions to Obligations of the Company
(a) . (i) The representations and warranties of Parent and Merger Sub contained in Section 5.1, Section 5.3 and Section 5.4 shall be true and correct in all material respects as of the date hereof and as of the Effective Time as though made on and as of the Effective Time (except that those representations and warranties that address matters only as of a particular date need only be true and correct as of such date) and (ii) all other representations and warranties of Parent and Merger Sub contained in this Agreement and in any certificate or other writing delivered by Parent or Merger Sub pursuant hereto, in each case disregarding and without giving any effect to all qualifications and exceptions contained herein and therein relating to materiality or Parent Material Adverse Effect or any similar standard or qualification pursuant hereto shall be true and correct as of the date hereof and as of the Effective Time (except that those representations and warranties that address matters only as of a particular date need only be true and correct as of such date), except where the failure of such representations and warranties to be so true and correct has not had and would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Parent Material Adverse Effect.
Representations and Warranties
 
(b) . Parent shall have performed or complied with, in all material respects, all agreements and covenants required by this Agreement to be performed or complied with by it on or prior to the Effective Time.
Agreements and Covenants
(c) . Parent shall have delivered to the Company a certificate, signed by an authorized officer of Parent and dated as of the Closing Date, to the effect that the conditions set forth in this Section 7.3 have been satisfied.
Officer's Certificate
8.1 . This Agreement may be terminated, and the Merger and the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement may be abandoned, at any time prior to the Effective Time, by action taken or authorized by the Board of Directors of the terminating party or parties, whether before or after the Company Stockholders Approval has been obtained:
Termination
(a) By mutual written consent of Parent and the Company, by action of their respective Boards of Directors;
(b) By either Parent or the Company if the Merger shall not have been consummated prior to November 30, 2006; provided, however, that such date may, from time to time, be extended by Parent (by written notice thereof to the Company) or by the Company (by written notice thereof to Parent) up to and including February 28, 2007, in the event all conditions to effect the Merger other than one or more conditions set forth in Section 7.1(c) (the "") have been or are capable of being satisfied at the time of each such extension and the Regulatory Conditions have been or are reasonably capable of being satisfied on or prior to February 28, 2007 (such earlier date, as it may be so extended, shall be referred to herein as the ""); provided, further, that the right to terminate this Agreement under this Section 8.1(b) shall not be available to any party whose failure to fulfill any of its obligations under this Agreement has been the cause of, or resulted in, the failure of the Merger to be consummated on or before such date;
Regulatory Conditions
Outside Date
(c) By either Parent or the Company subject to Section 6.7(d) of this Agreement if any Governmental Entity shall have issued a Restraint; provided that the party seeking to terminate this Agreement pursuant to this Section 8.1(c) shall have satisfied its obligations under Section 6.7;
(d) By either Parent or the Company if the Company Stockholders Approval shall not have been obtained upon a vote taken thereon at the Company Stockholders Meeting or at any adjournment or postponement thereof; provided, however, that the right to terminate this Agreement under this Section 8.1(d) shall not be available to the Company where the failure to obtain the Company Stockholders Approval is caused by any action or failure to act of the Company that constitutes a breach of this Agreement; provided, further, that no termination by the Company pursuant to this Section 8.1(d) shall be effective unless concurrently therewith it fulfills its obligations under Section 8.2;
(e) By Parent if (at any time prior to obtaining the Company Stockholders Approval) (i) the Company Board or any committee thereof shall for any reason have withheld, withdrawn, amended or modified in a manner adverse to Parent the Company Board Recommendation, (ii) the Company shall have failed to include the Company Board Recommendation in the Proxy Statement, (iii) the Company Board or any committee thereof shall have approved or publicly recommended any Acquisition Proposal,
 
(iv) the Company shall have entered into any letter of intent with respect to or other Contract for any Acquisition Proposal, (v) the Company shall have materially breached any of the provisions of Sections 6.4 or 6.6, or (vi) a tender or exchange offer relating to securities of the Company shall have been commenced by a Person unaffiliated with Parent, and the Company shall not have sent to its security holders pursuant to Rule 14e-2 promulgated under the Securities Act, within ten (10) Business Days after such tender or exchange offer is first published sent or given, a statement disclosing that the Company recommends rejection of such tender or exchange offer;
(f) By Parent, if there shall have been or have been disclosed any Effect that constitutes a Material Adverse Effect or if (i)(A) the Company shall have materially breached any of its covenants or agreements set forth in this Agreement or (B) any representation or warranty of the Company set forth in this Agreement shall have become materially untrue or incorrect, (ii) such breach or misrepresentation, if curable, is not cured within twenty (20) Business Days after written notice thereof, and (iii) such breach or misrepresentation would cause the conditions set forth in Section 7.2(a) or Section 7.2(b) not to be satisfied;
(g) By the Company, if (i)(A) either Parent or Merger Sub has materially breached any of its covenants or agreements set forth in this Agreement or (B) any representation or warranty of Parent or Merger Sub set forth in this Agreement shall have become materially untrue or incorrect, (ii) such breach or misrepresentation, if curable, is not cured within twenty (20) Business Days after written notice thereof, and (iii) such breach or misrepresentation would cause the conditions set forth in Section 7.3(a) or Section 7.3(b) not to be satisfied; or
(h) By Company, in accordance with Section 6.6(d); provided, that, in order for the termination of this Agreement pursuant to this Section 8.1(h) to be deemed effective, Company shall have complied with Section 6.6(d) and concurrently therewith fulfilled its obligation under Section 8.2.
8.2 .
Effect of Termination
(a) . In the event of termination of this Agreement by either the Company or Parent as provided in Section 8.1, this Agreement shall forthwith become void and there shall be no liability or obligation on the part of Parent or the Company or their respective Subsidiaries, officers, directors or stockholders, except (i) with respect to Section 6.5 (Confidentiality), Section 6.9 (Public Announcements), this Section 8.2 (Effects of Termination) and Article 9 (General Provisions) and (ii) with respect to any liabilities or damages incurred or suffered by a party as a result of the willful breach by the other party of any of its representations, warranties, covenants or other agreements set forth in this Agreement.
Limitation on Liability
(b) . Parent and the Company agree that if this Agreement is terminated pursuant to Section 8.1(d) (at a time when the condition described in Section 8.2(c)(iv)(B) exists), Section 8.1(e) or Section 8.1(h) then the Company shall pay Parent an amount equal to the sum of Parent's Expenses in an amount not to exceed $2,500,000. Payment of Parent's Expenses shall be made no later than two (2) Business Days after delivery to the Company of notice of demand for payment and a documented itemization setting forth in reasonable detail all of Parent's Expenses (which itemization may be supplemented and updated from time to time by Parent until the 90
Parent Expenses
th
day after Parent delivers such notice of demand for payment).
(c) . In addition to any payment required by Section 8.2(b), the Company shall pay to Parent a termination fee of $44,400,000 in immediately available funds in the event that this Agreement is terminated (i) by Parent pursuant to Section 8.1(e), (ii) by the Company pursuant to Section 8.1(d) if at such time Parent was entitled to terminate pursuant to
Company Termination Fee
 
Section 8.1(e), (iii) by Company pursuant to Section 8.1(h) or (iv) (A) in the event that this Agreement is terminated by either party pursuant to Section 8.1(d) (other than by the Company if at such time Parent was entitled to terminate pursuant to Section 8.1(e)), (B) at any time after the date of this Agreement and before the vote on this Agreement of the Company Stockholders Meeting, an Acquisition Proposal with respect to the Company shall have been publicly announced, and (C) the Company enters into a definitive agreement with respect to an Acquisition Proposal, or an Acquisition Proposal is consummated, within twelve (12) months following the termination of this Agreement. For purposes of the directly preceding sentence, references (x) to "10%" in clauses (i) and (iii) of the definition of "Acquisition Proposal" shall be deemed to be a reference to "50% and (y) to "Company Subsidiaries" in such definition shall be deemed to be a reference to "Company Subsidiaries" that constitute a "significant subsidiary" (as defined in Rule 1.-02(w) of Regulation S-X). Payment of any amount described in Section 8.2(b) and this Section shall not be in lieu of damages incurred in the event of willful breach of this Agreement. Any payment required to be made pursuant to Section 8.2(c)(i), 8.2(c)(ii) or 8.2(c)(iii) shall be made no later than two (2) Business Days after the date of termination. Any payment required to be made pursuant to Section 8.2(c)(iv) shall be made no later than two (2) Business Days after the entering into of a definitive agreement with respect to, or the consummation of, an Acquisition Proposal. All payments under this Section 8.2 shall be made by wire transfer of immediately available funds to an account designated by Parent. The Company acknowledges that the agreements contained in this Section 8.2 are an integral part of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and that, without these agreements, Parent would not enter into this Agreement. Accordingly, if the Company fails promptly to pay any amount due to the other party pursuant to this Section 8.2 and, in order to obtain such payment, Parent commences a suit that results in a judgment against the Company for all or any portion of the amounts set forth in this Section 8.2, the Company shall pay to Parent its costs and expenses (including reasonable attorneys' fees and expenses) incurred in connection with such suit, together with interest on the aggregate amount of the fees and expenses at a rate equal to the prime rate reported in on the date such payment was required to be made plus 2%.
The Wall Street Journal
8.3 . This Agreement may be amended by the parties hereto, whether before or after the Company Stockholders' Approval has been obtained, at any time prior to the Effective Time; provided, however, that, after the Company Stockholders Approval has been obtained, no amendment may be made without further stockholder approval that, by Law or in accordance with the rules of any relevant stock exchange, requires further approval by such stockholders. This Agreement may not be amended except by an instrument in writing signed by the parties hereto.
Amendment
8.4 . At any time prior to the Effective Time, any party hereto may (i) extend the time for the performance of any of the obligations or other acts of the other party hereto, (ii) waive any inaccuracies in the representations and warranties of the other party contained herein or in any document delivered pursuant hereto, and (iii) waive compliance by the other party with any of the agreements or conditions contained herein. Any such extension or waiver shall be valid only if set forth in an instrument in writing signed by the party or parties to be bound thereby, but such extension or waiver or failure to insist on strict compliance with an obligation, covenant, agreement or condition shall not operate as a waiver of, or estoppel with respect to, any subsequent or other failure.
Waiver
8.5 . Subject to Section 8.2, all Expenses incurred by the parties hereto shall be borne solely and entirely by the party that has incurred the same; provided, however, that each of Parent and the Company shall pay one-half of the filing fee(s) for filings made pursuant to Antitrust Laws; provided further that Parent shall reimburse all Expenses up to an aggregate of $625,000 incurred by the Company in connection with the Notes Tender Offer in the event this Agreement is terminated other than pursuant to Sections 8.1(d) (at a time when the condition described in Section 8.2(c)(iv)(B) exists), (e) or (h).
Fees and Expenses
 
9.1 . None of the representations and warranties in this Agreement or in any instrument delivered pursuant to this Agreement shall survive the Effective Time. This Section 9.1 shall not limit any covenant or agreement of the parties that by its terms contemplates performance after the Effective Time.
Non-Survival of Representations and Warranties
9.2 . Any notices or other communications required or permitted under, or otherwise in connection with, this Agreement shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given when delivered in person or upon confirmation of receipt when transmitted by facsimile transmission (but only if followed by transmittal by national overnight courier or hand delivery on the next Business Day) or upon receipt after dispatch by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, or on the next Business Day if transmitted by national overnight courier, in each case addressed as follows:
Notices
If to Parent or Merger Sub, addressed to it at:
 
with a mandated copy, which shall not constitute notice, to:
 
 
If to the Company, addressed to it at:
 
with a mandated copy, which shall not constitute notice, to:
 
with a further mandated copy, which shall not constitute notice, to:
 
9.3 . The headings contained in this Agreement are for reference purposes only and shall not affect in any way the meaning or interpretation of this Agreement.
Headings
9.4 . If any term or other provision of this Agreement is invalid, illegal or incapable of being enforced by any rule of Law or public policy, all other terms and provisions of this Agreement shall nevertheless remain in full force and effect so long as the economic or legal substance of the transactions contemplated hereby is not affected in any manner materially adverse to any party. Upon such determination that any term or other provision is invalid, illegal or incapable of being enforced, the parties hereto shall negotiate in good faith to modify this Agreement so as to effect the original intent of the parties as closely as possible in an acceptable manner to the end that transactions contemplated hereby are fulfilled to the extent possible.
Severability
9.5 . This Agreement (together with the Exhibits, Company Disclosure Schedule, and the other documents entered into in connection with the Merger) and the Confidentiality Agreement constitute the entire agreement of the parties and supersede all prior agreements and undertakings, both written and oral, among the parties, or any of them, with respect to the subject matter hereof.
Entire Agreement
9.6 . None of this Agreement or any of the rights, interests or obligations hereunder shall be assigned by any of the parties hereto, in whole or in part, by operation of Law or otherwise, without the prior written consent of the other parties, and any attempt to make any such
Assignment
 
assignment without such consent shall be null and void. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Merger Sub may assign, in its sole discretion, any and all rights, interests and obligations under this Agreement to any wholly owned Parent Subsidiary without the Company's consent.
9.7 . This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure solely to the benefit of each party hereto and their respective successors and assigns, and nothing in this Agreement, express or implied, other than pursuant to Section 6.10, is intended to or shall confer upon any other Person any right, benefit or remedy of any nature whatsoever under or by reason of this Agreement.
Parties in Interest
9.8 . Each party hereto has participated in the preparation and drafting of this Agreement, which each party acknowledges is the result of extensive negotiations between the parties.
Mutual Drafting
9.9 .
Governing Law; Consent to Jurisdiction; Waiver of Trial by Jury
(a) This Agreement shall be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the Laws of the State of Delaware without reference to such state's principles of conflicts of law.
(b) Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably and unconditionally submits, for itself and its property, to the exclusive jurisdiction of the Court of Chancery of the State of Delaware or Federal court of the United States of America, located in the State of Delaware, and any appellate court from any thereof, in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or the agreements delivered in connection herewith or the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby or for recognition or enforcement of any judgment relating thereto, and each of the parties hereby irrevocably and unconditionally (i) agrees not to commence any such action or proceeding except in such courts, (ii) agrees that any claim in respect of any such action or proceeding may be heard and determined in such Delaware state court or, to the extent permitted by Law, in such Federal court, (iii) waives, to the fullest extent it may legally and effectively do so, any objection that it may now or hereafter have to the laying of venue of any such action or proceeding in any such Delaware state or Federal court, and (iv) waives, to the fullest extent permitted by Law, the defense of an inconvenient forum to the maintenance of such action or proceeding in any such Delaware state or Federal court. Each of the parties hereto agrees that a final judgment in any such action or proceeding shall be conclusive and may be enforced in other jurisdictions by suit on the judgment or in any other manner provided by Law. Each party to this Agreement irrevocably consents to service of process in the manner provided for notices in Section 9.2. Nothing in this Agreement will affect the right of any party to this Agreement to serve process in any other manner permitted by Law.
(c) EACH PARTY ACKNOWLEDGES AND AGREES THAT ANY CONTROVERSY THAT MAY ARISE UNDER THIS AGREEMENT IS LIKELY TO INVOLVE COMPLICATED AND DIFFICULT ISSUES, AND THEREFORE IT HEREBY IRREVOCABLY AND UNCONDITIONALLY WAIVES ANY RIGHT IT MAY HAVE TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN RESPECT OF ANY LITIGATION DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS AGREEMENT AND ANY OF THE AGREEMENTS DELIVERED IN CONNECTION HEREWITH OR THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED HEREBY OR THEREBY. EACH PARTY CERTIFIES AND ACKNOWLEDGES THAT (1) NO REPRESENTATIVE, AGENT OR ATTORNEY OF ANY OTHER PARTY HAS REPRESENTED, EXPRESSLY OR OTHERWISE, THAT SUCH OTHER PARTY WOULD NOT, IN THE EVENT OF LITIGATION, SEEK TO ENFORCE EITHER OF SUCH WAIVERS, (2) IT UNDERSTANDS AND HAS CONSIDERED THE IMPLICATIONS OF SUCH WAIVERS, (3) IT MAKES SUCH WAIVERS VOLUNTARILY, AND (4) IT HAS BEEN INDUCED TO ENTER INTO THIS AGREEMENT BY, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THE MUTUAL WAIVERS AND CERTIFICATIONS IN THIS SECTION 9.9(c).
 
9.10 . Any matter disclosed in any section of a party's disclosure schedule shall be considered disclosed for other sections of such disclosure schedule, but only to the extent that it would be readily apparent that such matter on its face would apply to a particular section of a party's disclosure schedule. The provision of monetary or other quantitative thresholds for disclosure does not and shall not be deemed to create or imply a standard of materiality hereunder.
Disclosure
9.11 . This Agreement may be executed in one or more original or facsimile counterparts, and by the different parties hereto in separate counterparts, each of which when executed shall be deemed to be an original but all of which taken together shall constitute one and the same agreement.
Counterparts
9.12 . Except as otherwise provided herein, any and all remedies herein expressly conferred upon a party hereto shall be deemed cumulative with and not exclusive of any other remedy conferred hereby, or by Law or equity upon such party, and the exercise by a party hereto of any one remedy shall not preclude the exercise of any other remedy and nothing in this Agreement shall be deemed a waiver by any party of any right to specific performance or injunctive relief. The parties hereto agree that irreparable damage would occur in the event that any of the provisions of this Agreement were not performed in accordance with their specific terms or were otherwise breached. It is accordingly agreed that the parties shall be entitled to an injunction or injunctions to prevent breaches of this Agreement and to enforce specifically the terms and provisions hereof in addition to any other remedy to which they are entitled at Law or in equity. Each party hereto agrees to waive any requirement for the posting of, or securing of, a bond in connection with any such remedy.
Remedies Cumulative; Specific Performance
9.13 . As part of the Merger, certain employee stockholders have executed non-competition agreements agreeing not to compete, not to solicit employees, and not to solicit customers during the time they are employed by Parent and for two (2) years thereafter, and the parties hereto agree that such agreements are necessary to protect the legitimate business interest of Parent in acquiring the Company including the goodwill of the Company and that the covenants set forth in such agreements are ancillary to this Agreement.
Agreement to Protect Parent's Acquired Goodwill
9.14 .
Interpretation
(a) When a reference is made in this Agreement to Articles, Sections, Exhibits or Schedules, such reference shall be to an Article or Section of, or an Exhibit or Schedule to, this Agreement unless otherwise indicated. Where a reference is made to a Law, such reference is to such Law as amended.
(b) The words "include," "includes" and "including" when used herein shall be deemed in each case to be followed by the words "without limitation." The phrases "provided to," "furnished to," and phrases of similar import when used herein, unless the context otherwise requires, shall mean that a true, correct and complete paper copy of the information or material referred to has been delivered to the party to whom such information or material is to be provided. Unless the context of this Agreement otherwise requires, (i) words of any gender include each other gender, (ii) words using the singular or plural number also include the plural or singular number, respectively, and (iii) the terms "hereof," "herein," "hereunder" and derivative or similar words refer to this entire Agreement.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, Parent, Merger Sub and the Company have caused this Agreement to be executed as of the date first written above by their respective officers thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
Exhibit B

Exhibit 99.1
 
Boeing to Acquire Aviall to Enhance Its Growing Services Businesses
 
 
 
 
CHICAGO, May 1, 2006  The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] and Aviall, Inc. [NYSE: AVL] announced today that they have entered into a definitive agreement for Boeing's acquisition of Aviall in an all cash merger for $48 per share or $1.7 billion. Boeing will also assume approximately $350 million of net debt as part of the transaction.
Aviall is the largest independent provider of new aviation parts and services in the aerospace industry. Its capabilities include global parts distribution and supply chain services for aerospace, defense and marine industries worldwide. Aviall's 2005 revenue was $1.3 billion, with more than 25 percent growth expected in 2006.
"The aviation services market offers us tremendous opportunities to profitably grow our business, internally and externally, to better serve our commercial and military customers," said Boeing Chairman, President and Chief Executive W. James McNerney. "This acquisition is uniquely powerful in that it leverages the strong and growing services units of both our commercial and military businesses. It demonstrates our commitment to create a Boeing that is more than just the sum of its parts," McNerney said.
"We are delighted to become part of The Boeing Company," said Paul Fulchino, chairman, president and chief executive officer of Aviall. "Our combined industry knowledge creates a dynamic team that will continue to enable our customers to achieve greater efficiency, operational savings and profitability."
Aviall will report to Boeing Commercial Aviation Services and operate as a wholly-owned subsidiary. Commercial Aviation Services offers Integrated Materials Management (IMM) services to airline customers. Through this program, Boeing and selected suppliers maintain an airline's inventory of maintenance supplies  including spare parts  and provide items only as needed, reducing the airline's cost and complexity of doing business. Aviall's parts ordering and supply chain management capabilities will also be utilized by Boeing's Integrated Defense Systems' Support Systems business.
"Aviall will quickly become an integral part of our Commercial Aviation Services business and accelerate our Integrated Materials Management program," said Alan Mulally, Boeing Commercial Airplanes president and CEO. "Aviall is customer focused, has a strong growth plan and proven track record of solid financial performance. It is a perfect fit for our strategy of providing supply chain management solutions that help our airline and military customers operate more efficiently and productively," Mulally said. Commercial Aviation Services is led by Lou Mancini, vice president and general manager.
The completion of the transaction is subject to customary conditions and relevant authorities' approval and is expected to close by the end of the third quarter 2006. Boeing plans to fund the transaction with existing cash. The acquisition is expected to be modestly accretive to Boeing's earnings in 2007 and have an immaterial earnings impact in 2006.
With approximately 1,000 employees, Aviall is headquartered in Dallas with customer service centers located in North America, Europe and Asia. As the world's largest independent provider of new aviation parts and related aftermarket services, Aviall markets and distributes products for approximately 220 manufacturers and offers approximately 700,000 catalog items. Aviall also offers a full line of aviation batteries, hoses, wheels and brakes, and paint services.
For more information on Aviall, see its World Wide Web site at www.aviall.com.
This press release may be deemed to be solicitation material in respect of the proposed merger of Aviall and Boeing. In connection with the proposed merger, Aviall plans to file a proxy statement with the SEC. INVESTORS AND SECURITY HOLDERS OF AVIALL ARE ADVISED TO READ THE PROXY STATEMENT AND ANY OTHER RELEVANT DOCUMENTS FILED WITH THE SEC WHEN THEY BECOME AVAILABLE BECAUSE THOSE DOCUMENTS WILL CONTAIN IMPORTANT INFORMATION ABOUT THE PROPOSED MERGER. The final proxy statement will be mailed to stockholders of Aviall. Investors and security holders may obtain a free copy of the proxy statement, when it becomes available, and other documents filed by Aviall with the SEC, at the SEC's web site at http://www.sec.gov. Free copies of the proxy statement, when it becomes available, and Aviall's other filings with the SEC may also be obtained from Aviall. Free copies of Aviall's filings may be obtained by directing a request to Aviall, Inc., 2750 Regent Boulevard, DFW Airport, Texas, 75261, Attention: Secretary.
Aviall, Boeing and their respective directors, executive officers and other members of their management and employees may be deemed to be soliciting proxies from Aviall's stockholders in favor of the proposed merger. Information regarding Aviall's directors and executive officers is available in Aviall's proxy statement for its 2006 annual meeting of stockholders, which was filed with the SEC on April 27, 2006. Information regarding Boeing's directors and executive officers is available in Boeing's proxy statement for its 2006 annual meeting of stockholders, which was filed with the SEC on March 24, 2006. Additional information regarding the interests of such potential participants will be included in the proxy statement and the other relevant documents filed with the SEC when they become available.
Certain statements in this report may constitute "forward-looking" statements within the meaning of the Private Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Forward-looking statements in this press release include, among others, statements regarding future results as a result of our growth and productivity initiatives, our 2006 and 2007 financial outlook and the benefits of the new IDS structure. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions as to future events that may not prove to be accurate. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak only as of the date they were made and we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise. Our actual results and future trends may differ materially depending on a variety of factors, including the continued operation, viability and growth of major airline customers and non-airline customers (such as the U.S. Government); adverse developments in the value of collateral securing customer and other financings; the occurrence of any significant collective bargaining labor dispute; our successful execution of internal performance plans including our company-wide growth and productivity initiatives, production rate increases and decreases (including any reduction in or termination of an aircraft product), acquisition and divestiture plans, and other cost-reduction and productivity efforts; charges from any future SFAS No. 142 review; an adverse development in rating agency credit ratings or assessments; the actual outcomes of certain pending sales campaigns and the launch of the 787 program and U.S. and foreign government procurement activities, including the uncertainty associated with the procurement of tankers by the U.S. Department of Defense (DoD) and funding of the C-17 program; the cyclical nature of some of our businesses; unanticipated financial market changes which may impact pension plan assumptions; domestic and international competition in the defense, space and commercial areas; continued integration of acquired businesses; performance issues with key suppliers, subcontractors and customers; significant disruption to air travel worldwide (including future terrorist attacks); global trade policies; worldwide political stability; domestic and international economic conditions; price escalation; the outcome of political and legal processes, changing priorities or reductions in the U.S. Government or foreign government defense and space budgets; termination of government or commercial contracts due to unilateral government or customer action or failure to perform; legal, financial and governmental risks related to international transactions; legal and investigatory proceedings; tax settlements with the IRS and various states; U.S. Air Force review of previously awarded contracts; and other economic, political and technological risks and uncertainties. Additional information regarding these factors is contained in our SEC filings, including, without limitation, our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2005 and the Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2006.
Contacts:
Shannon Frew
Director, Communications
Boeing Commercial Aviation Services
Office: (206) 766-1392
Mobile: (206) 852-4957
Shannon.m.frew@boeing.com
David Leedy
Director, Investor Relations
Aviall, Inc.
Office: (972) 586-1703
dleedy@aviall.com
Todd Blecher
Director, Finance Communications
Boeing Corporate Offices
Office: (312) 544-2002
Mobile: (312) 543-4311
todd.h.blecher@boeing.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20060505170828.txt.gz
TIME:20060505170828
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
On May 1, 2006, at the 2006 Annual Meeting of Shareholders ("") of The Boeing Company (the ""), the Company's shareholders approved (i) The Boeing Company Elected Officer Annual Incentive Plan (the "") to qualify certain executive compensation under the Internal Revenue Code's criteria for tax deductibility and (ii) amendment of The Boeing Company 2003 Incentive Stock Plan (the ""), including amendments to increase the number of shares available for issuance under the 2003 Plan by 30 million, to 60 million, and to enhance the ability to make tax-efficient awards. The Board of Directors, on the recommendation of its Compensation Committee and subject to shareholder approval, initially adopted the Annual Incentive Plan and the amendments to the 2003 Plan effective as of February 27, 2006.
2006 Annual Meeting
Company
Annual Incentive Plan
2003 Plan
This summary of the Annual Incentive Plan and the 2003 Plan, and more detailed summaries set forth in the Company's proxy statement for the 2006 Annual Meeting filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 24, 2006, are qualified in their entirety by reference to the full texts of the Annual Incentive Plan and the 2003 Plan, which are included as Appendix A and Appendix B, respectively, to the definitive proxy statement filed by the Company on March 24, 2006.
 
At the 2006 Annual Meeting, the Company's shareholders also approved amendments to the Company's Restated Certificate of Incorporation and By-Laws. The amendments eliminated the remaining supermajority vote provisions in the Company's organizational documents relating to certain fundamental aspects of the Company's governing instruments such as shareholder meetings, the number and removal of directors, the filling of vacancies on the Board of Directors and cumulative voting. The Board of Directors approved these amendments on February 27, 2006, subject to approval by the shareholders.
The Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation was filed with the Secretary of State of the State of Delaware on May 5, 2006 and was effective upon filing. The amendments to the By-Laws were effective on May 1, 2006.
The foregoing summary of the amendments to the Restated Certificate of Incorporation and the By-Laws is qualified in its entirety by reference to the text of the Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation and to the text of the By-Laws, as amended and restated, both of which are filed as exhibits to this report.
 
(d) Exhibits.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: May 5, 2006
 
 
 

Exhibit 3.1
THE BOEING COMPANY, a corporation organized and existing under the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware, does hereby certify that:
1. The original Certificate of Incorporation was filed with the Secretary of State of Delaware on July 19, 1934, and the name under which it was originally incorporated is Boeing Airplane Company.
2. The following Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation was duly proposed by the Corporation's Board of Directors and adopted by the Corporation's stockholders in accordance with the provisions of Sections 242 and 245 of the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware:
FIRST: The name of the Corporation is THE BOEING COMPANY.
SECOND: Its registered office or place of business in the State of Delaware is to be located at 2711 Centerville Road, Suite 400, in the City of Wilmington, County of New Castle. The name of its registered agent is Corporation Service Company, and the address of said registered agent is 2711 Centerville Road, Suite 400, in said City of Wilmington.
THIRD: The nature of the business, or objects or purposes to be transacted, promoted, or carried on, are those necessary to engage in any lawful act or activity for which corporations may be organized under the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware.
FOURTH: The total number of shares of stock of all classes which the Corporation shall have authority to issue is 1,220,000,000 shares, of which 20,000,000 shares shall be Preferred Stock of the par value of $1 each (hereinafter called "Preferred Stock") and 1,200,000,000 shares shall be Common Stock of the par value of $5 each (hereinafter called "Common Stock").
The designations and the powers, preferences, and rights and the qualifications, limitations, or restrictions thereof of the shares of each class are as follows:
1. The Preferred Stock may be issued from time to time in one or more series, the shares of each series to have such voting powers, full or limited, and such designations, preferences, and relative, participating, optional, or other special rights
and qualifications, limitations, or restrictions thereof as are stated and expressed herein or in the resolution or resolutions providing for the issue of such series adopted by the Board of Directors as hereinafter provided.
2. Authority is hereby expressly granted to the Board of Directors of the Corporation, subject to the provisions of this Article FOURTH and to the limitations prescribed by law, to authorize the issue of one or more series of Preferred Stock and with respect to each such series to fix by resolution or resolutions providing for the issue of such series the voting powers, full or limited, if any, of the shares of such series and the designations, preferences, and relative, participating, optional, or other special rights and the qualifications, limitations, or restrictions thereof. The authority of the Board of Directors with respect to each series shall include but not be limited to the determination or fixing of the following:
(a) The designation of such series.
(b) The dividend rate of such series, the conditions and dates upon which such dividends shall be payable, the relation which such dividends shall bear to the dividends payable on any other class or classes of stock, and whether such dividends shall be cumulative or noncumulative.
(c) Whether the shares of such series shall be subject to redemption by the Corporation and, if made subject to such redemption, the times, prices, and other terms and conditions of such redemption.
(d) The terms and amount of any sinking fund provided for the purchase or redemption of the shares of such series.
(e) Whether or not the shares of such series shall be convertible into or exchangeable for shares of any other class or classes or of any other series of any class or classes of stock of the Corporation, and, if provision be made for conversion or exchange, the times, prices, rates, adjustments, and other terms and conditions of such conversion or exchange.
(f) The extent, if any, to which the holders of the shares of such series shall be entitled to vote with respect to the election of directors or otherwise.
(g) The restrictions, if any, on the issue or reissue of any additional Preferred Stock.
 
(h) The rights of the holders of the shares of such series upon the dissolution of, or upon the distribution of assets of, the Corporation.
3. Except as otherwise required by law and except for such voting powers with respect to the election of directors or other matters as may be stated in the resolution or resolutions of the Board of Directors providing for the issue of any series of Preferred Stock, the holders of any such series shall have no voting power whatsoever. Subject to such restrictions as may be stated in the resolution or resolutions of the Board of Directors providing for the issue of any series of Preferred Stock, any amendment to the Certificate of Incorporation which shall increase or decrease the authorized stock of any class or classes may be adopted by the affirmative vote of the holders of a majority of the outstanding shares of the stock of the Corporation entitled to vote for the election of directors ("Voting Stock").
4. No holder of stock of any class of the Corporation shall have, as such holder, any preemptive or preferential right of subscription to any stock of any class of the Corporation or to any obligations convertible into stock of the Corporation, issued or sold, or to any right of subscription to, or to any warrant or option for the purchase of any thereof, other than such (if any) as the Board of Directors of the Corporation, in its discretion, may determine from time to time.
5. The Corporation may from time to time issue and dispose of any of the authorized and unissued shares of Common Stock or of Preferred Stock for such consideration not less than its par value, as may be fixed from time to time by the Board of Directors, without action by the stockholders. The Board of Directors may provide for payment therefor to be received by the Corporation in cash, property, or services. Any and all such shares of the Preferred or Common Stock of the Corporation the issuance of which has been so authorized, and for which consideration so fixed by the Board of Directors has been paid or delivered, shall be deemed fully paid stock and shall not be liable to any further call or assessment thereon.
6. Effective as of August 1, 1966, the stock of the Corporation is changed to eliminate all fractions of one share that may then exist. In lieu of each such fraction of one share there is created a money obligation of the Corporation in an amount equal to said fraction multiplied by the closing price per share of such stock on the New York Stock Exchange on August 1, 1966, such amount to be paid by the Corporation after such date to the person or persons entitled thereto conditioned only upon the surrender of the fractional share certificate to the Corporation's Transfer Agent. No money obligation or payment provided for in this paragraph shall be a charge upon or against the capital stock account of the Corporation.
 
FIFTH: The minimum amount of capital with which the Corporation will commence business is One Thousand Dollars.
SIXTH: The Corporation is to have perpetual existence.
SEVENTH: The private property of the stockholders shall not be subject to the payment of corporate debts.
EIGHTH: Any action by stockholders of the Corporation shall be taken at a meeting of stockholders and no action may be taken by written consent of stockholders entitled to vote upon such action unless such action shall have been submitted to the stockholders after approval by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors. For purposes of Article EIGHTH and Article TENTH hereof and Articles I, II and VIII of the By-Laws of the Corporation, the following definitions shall apply:
 
 
 
 
NINTH: Subject to the provisions of the laws of the State of Delaware, the following provisions are adopted for the management of the business and for the conduct of the affairs of the Corporation, and for defining, limiting, and regulating the powers of the Corporation, the directors, and the stockholders:
(a) The books of the Corporation may be kept outside the State of Delaware at such place or places as may from time to time be designated by the Board of Directors.
(b) The business of the Corporation shall be managed by its Board of Directors, and the Board of Directors shall have power to exercise all the powers of the Corporation, including (but without limiting the generality hereof) the power to create mortgages upon the whole or any part of the property of the Corporation, real or personal, without any action of or by the stockholders, except as otherwise provided by statute or by the By-Laws.
(c) The number of the directors shall be fixed by the By-Laws, subject to alteration from time to time by amendment of the By-Laws either by the Board of Directors or the stockholders. An increase in the number of directors shall be deemed to create vacancies in the Board, to be filled in the manner provided in the By-Laws. Any director or any officer elected or appointed by the stockholders or by the Board of Directors may be removed in such manner as shall be provided in the By-Laws.
(d) The Board of Directors shall have power to make and alter By-Laws, subject to such restrictions upon the exercise of such power as are contained in this Certificate or the By-Laws.
(e) The Board of Directors shall have power, in its discretion, to fix, determine, and vary from time to time the amount to be retained as surplus and the amount or amounts to be set apart out of any of the funds of the Corporation available for dividends as working capital or a reserve or reserves for any proper purpose, and to abolish any such reserve in the manner in which it was created.
 
(f) The Board of Directors shall have power, in its discretion, from time to time to determine whether and to what extent and at what times and places and under what conditions and regulations the books and accounts of the Corporation, or any of them, other than the stock ledger, shall be open to the inspection of stockholders; and no stockholder shall have any right to inspect any account, book, or document of the Corporation, except as conferred by law or authorized by resolution of the directors or the stockholders.
(g) Upon any sale, exchange, or other disposal of the property and/or assets of the Corporation, payment therefor may be made either to the Corporation or directly to the stockholders in proportion to their interests, upon the surrender of their respective stock certificates, or otherwise, as the Board of Directors may determine.
(h) The right to cumulate votes in the election of directors shall not exist with respect to shares of stock of the Corporation.
(i) In case the Corporation shall enter into any contract or transact any business with one or more of its directors, or with any firm of which any director is a member, or with any corporation or association of which any director is a stockholder, director, or officer, such contract or transaction shall not be invalidated or in any way affected by the fact that such director has or may have an interest therein which is or might be adverse to the interests of the Corporation, even though the vote of such director might have been necessary to obligate the Corporation upon such contract or transaction; provided, that the fact of such interest shall have been disclosed to the other directors or the stockholders of the Corporation, as the case may be, acting upon or with reference to such contract or transaction.
(j) Whenever a compromise or arrangement is proposed between the Corporation and its creditors or any class of them and/or between the Corporation and its stockholders or any class of them, any court of equitable jurisdiction within the State of Delaware may, on the application in a summary way of the Corporation or of any creditor or stockholder thereof, or on the application of any receiver or receivers appointed for the Corporation under the provisions of Section 291 of Title 8 of the Delaware Code, or on the application of trustees in dissolution or of any receiver or receivers appointed for the Corporation under the provisions of Section 279 of Title 8 of the Delaware Code, order a meeting of the creditors or class of creditors, and/or of the stockholders or class of stockholders of the Corporation, as the case may be, to be summoned in such manner as the court directs. If a majority in
 
number representing three- fourths in value of the creditors or class of creditors, and/or of the stockholders or class of stockholders of the Corporation, as the case may be, agree to any compromise or arrangement and to any reorganization of the Corporation as a consequence of such compromise or arrangement, said compromise or arrangement and said reorganization shall, if sanctioned by the court to which said application has been made, be binding on all the creditors or class of creditors, and/or on all the stockholders or class of stockholders, of the Corporation, as the case may be, and also on the Corporation.
TENTH: The Corporation reserves the right to amend, alter, change, add to, or repeal any provision contained in this Certificate of Incorporation in the manner now or hereafter prescribed by statute; and all rights herein conferred are granted subject to this reservation.
ELEVENTH: To the full extent that the Delaware General Corporation Law, as it exists on the date hereof or may hereafter be amended, permits the limitation or elimination of the liability of directors, a director of the Corporation shall not be liable to the Corporation or its stockholders for monetary damages for conduct as a director. Any amendment to or repeal of this Article ELEVENTH shall not adversely affect any right or protection of a director of the Corporation for or with respect to any acts or omissions of such director occurring prior to such amendment or repeal.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned has signed this Certificate this 5th day of May, 2006.
 
 

Exhibit 3.2
 
 
 
 
 
SECTION 1. 
.
Annual Meetings
The Annual Meeting of the stockholders shall be held on such date and at such time as the Board of Directors shall determine, for the election of directors and the transaction of such other business as may come before the meeting.
SECTION 2. 
.
Special Meetings
A special meeting of the stockholders may be called at any time by the Board of Directors, or by stockholders holding together at least twenty-five percent of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, except as otherwise provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto.
SECTION 3. 
.
Place of Meeting
All meetings of the stockholders of the Corporation shall be held at such place or places within or without the State of Delaware as may from time to time be fixed by the Board of Directors or as shall be specified or fixed in the respective notices or waivers of notice thereof.
SECTION 4. 
.
Notice of Meetings
Except as otherwise required by statute and as set forth below, notice of each annual or special meeting of stockholders shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than thirty nor more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date. If the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, notice of each special meeting of stockholders shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than fifty-five nor more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date, unless the calling of such meeting is ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, in which case notice of such special meeting shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than thirty nor more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date. Such notice shall be given by delivering to each stockholder a written or printed notice thereof either personally or by mailing such notice in a postage-prepaid envelope addressed to the stockholder's address as it appears on the stock books of the Corporation. Except as otherwise required by statute, no publication of any notice of a meeting of stockholders shall be required. Every notice of a meeting of stockholders shall state the place, date, and hour of the meeting and, in the case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called.
SECTION 5. 
.
Waivers of Notice
Whenever any notice is required to be given to any stockholder under the provisions of these By-Laws, the Certificate of Incorporation, or the Delaware General Corporation Law, a waiver thereof in writing, signed by the person or persons entitled to such notice, whether before or after the time stated therein, shall be deemed equivalent to the giving of such notice. The attendance of a stockholder at a meeting, in person or by proxy, shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when a stockholder attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened.
 
SECTION 6. 
.
Quorum
At all meetings of stockholders, except when otherwise provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by the By-Laws, the presence, in person or by proxy duly authorized, of the holders of one-third of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and except as otherwise provided by statute or rule of law, or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by the By-Laws, the vote, in person or by proxy, of the holders of a majority of the shares constituting such quorum shall be binding upon all stockholders of the Corporation. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote may adjourn any meeting, from time to time but not for a period of more than thirty days at any one time, until a quorum shall attend. At any such adjourned meeting at which a quorum shall be present, any business may be transacted which might have been transacted at the meeting as originally called. Unless otherwise provided by statute, no notice of an adjourned meeting need be given.
SECTION 7. 
.
Proxies
7.1  Each stockholder entitled to vote at a meeting of stockholders or to express consent or dissent to corporate action in writing without a meeting may authorize another person or persons to act for such stockholder by proxy. Such authorization may be accomplished by (a) the stockholder or such stockholder's authorized officer, director, employee, or agent executing a writing or causing his or her signature to be affixed to such writing by any reasonable means, including facsimile signature, or (b) by transmitting or authorizing the transmission of a telegram, cablegram, or other means of electronic transmission to the intended holder of the proxy or to a proxy solicitation firm, proxy support service, or similar agent duly authorized by the intended proxy holder to receive such transmission; provided, that any such telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission must either set forth or be accompanied by information from which it can be determined that the telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission was authorized by the stockholder. Any copy, facsimile telecommunication, or other reliable reproduction of the writing or transmission by which a stockholder has authorized another person to act as proxy for such stockholder may be substituted or used in lieu of the original writing or transmission for any and all purposes for which the original writing or transmission could be used, provided that such copy, facsimile telecommunication, or other reproduction shall be a complete reproduction of the entire original writing or transmission.
.
Appointment
7.2  Proxy shall be filed with the Secretary of the Corporation before or at the time of the meeting or the delivery to the Corporation of the consent to corporate action in writing. A proxy shall become invalid three years after the date of its execution, unless otherwise provided in the proxy. A proxy with respect to a specified meeting shall entitle the holder thereof to vote at any reconvened meeting following adjournment of such meeting but shall not be valid after the final adjournment thereof.
.
Delivery to Corporation; Duration
SECTION 8. 
.
Inspectors of Election
8.1  In advance of any meeting of stockholders, the Board of Directors of the Corporation shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspectors of election at such meeting and to make a written report thereof. The Board of Directors may designate one or more persons to serve as alternate inspectors to serve in place of any inspector who is unable or fails to act. If no inspector or alternate is able to act at a meeting of stockholders, the chairman of such meeting shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspector of elections at such meeting.
.
Appointment
8.2  The inspectors shall: (a) ascertain the number of shares of the Corporation outstanding and the voting power of each such share; (b) determine the shares represented at the meeting and the validity of proxies and ballots; (c) count all votes and ballots; (d) determine and retain for a reasonable period of time a record of the disposition of any challenges made to any determination by them; and (e) certify their determination of the number of shares represented at the meeting and their count of the votes and ballots. Each inspector of election shall, before entering upon the discharge of his or her duties, take and sign an oath to faithfully execute the duties of inspector with strict impartiality and according to the best of his or her ability. The inspectors of election may appoint or retain other persons or entities to assist them in the performance of their duties.
.
Duties
8.3  The validity of any proxy or ballot executed for a meeting of stockholders shall be determined by the inspectors of election in accordance with the applicable provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law as then in effect. In determining the validity of any proxy transmitted by telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission, the inspectors shall record in writing the information upon which they relied in making such determination.
.
Determination of Proxy Validity
 
SECTION 9. 
.
Fixing the Record Date
9.1  For the purpose of determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at any meeting of stockholders or any adjournment thereof, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which record date shall be not fewer than thirty nor more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the date of such meeting. If the corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, the record date for each special meeting of stockholders shall be not fewer than fifty-five nor more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date, unless the calling of such meeting is ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation. If no record date is fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall be at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which notice is given, or, if notice is waived, at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which the meeting is held. A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting; provided, however, that the Board of Directors may fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
.
Meetings
9.2  For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which date shall not be more than ten (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days after the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, when no prior action by the Board of Directors is required by Chapter 1 of the Delaware General Corporation Law as now or hereafter amended, shall be the first date on which a signed written consent setting forth the action taken or proposed to be taken is delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the records of proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Delivery made to the Corporation's registered office shall be by hand or by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors and prior action by the Board of Directors is required by Chapter 1 of the Delaware General Corporation Law as now or hereafter amended, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution taking such prior action.
.
Consent to Corporate Action Without a Meeting
9.3  For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to receive payment of any dividend or other distribution or allotment of any rights or the stockholders entitled to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion, or exchange of stock, or for the purpose of any other lawful action, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted, and which record date shall be not more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days prior to such action. If no record date is fixed, the record date for determining stockholders for any such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution relating thereto.
.
Dividends, Distributions, and Other Rights
9.4  At least ten days before each meeting of stockholders, a complete list of the stockholders entitled to vote at such meeting shall be made, arranged in alphabetical order, and showing the address of each stockholder and the number of shares registered in the name of each stockholder. This list shall be open to examination by any stockholder, for any purpose germane to the meeting, during ordinary business hours, for a period of ten days prior to the meeting, either at a place within the city where the meeting is to be held, which place shall be specified in the notice of the meeting, or, if not so specified, at the place where the meeting is to be held. The list shall also be produced and kept at such meeting for inspection by any stockholder who is present.
.
Voting List
 
SECTION 10. 
.
Action by Stockholders Without a Meeting
Subject to the provisions of Article NINTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, any action which could be taken at any annual or special meeting of stockholders may be taken without a meeting, without prior notice, and without a vote, if a consent or consents in writing, setting forth the action so taken, are (a) signed by the holders of outstanding stock having not fewer than the minimum number of votes that would be necessary to authorize or take such action at a meeting at which all shares entitled to vote thereon were present and voted and (b) delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the records of proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Delivery made to the Corporation's registered office shall be by hand or by certified mail or registered mail, return receipt requested. Every written consent shall bear the date of signature of each stockholder who signs the consent and no written consent shall be effective to take the corporate action referred to therein unless written consents signed by a sufficient number of stockholders to take such action are delivered to the Corporation, in the manner required by this section, within sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days of the date of the earliest dated consent delivered to the Corporation in the manner required by this section. The validity of any consent executed by a proxy for a stockholder pursuant to a telegram, cablegram, or other means of electronic transmission transmitted to such proxy holder by or upon the authorization of the stockholder shall be determined by or at the direction of the Secretary of the Corporation. A written record of the information upon which the person making such determination relied shall be made and kept in the records of the proceedings of the stockholders. Any such consent shall be inserted in the minute book as if it were the minutes of a meeting of the stockholders. Prompt notice of the taking of the corporate action without a meeting by less than unanimous written consent shall be given to those stockholders who have not consented in writing.
SECTION 11. 
.
Business and Nominations at Stockholders' Meetings
11.1  In addition to the election of directors, other proper business may be transacted at the annual meeting of stockholders, provided that such business is a proper matter for stockholder action and is properly brought before such meeting. To be properly brought before an annual meeting, nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors and business to be considered by stockholders must be (a) made or brought by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, or (b) made or brought before the meeting by a stockholder of the Corporation who is a stockholder of record at the time of giving notice as required in this By-Law, who is entitled to vote at the meeting, and who complies with the notice procedures set forth in this By-Law. Notice by a stockholder pursuant to (b) above must be in writing, in accordance with Section 12 of this Article I, and received by the Secretary not earlier than the one-hundred and twentieth day nor later than the close of business on the ninetieth day prior to the date specified in Section 1 of this Article I for such annual meeting; provided, however, that in the event that the date of the annual meeting is more than thirty days before or more than sixty days after such date, notice by the stockholder must be received by the Secretary not earlier than the one-hundred and twentieth day prior to such annual meeting and not later than the close of business on the ninetieth day prior to such annual meeting or the tenth day following the day on which public announcement of the date of such meeting is first made by the Corporation.
.
Business and Nominations at Annual Meetings
11.2  Any stockholder notice given pursuant to Section 11.1 shall set forth (i) the name and address of the stockholder proposing such business and of the beneficial owner, if any, on whose behalf the proposal or nomination is made; (ii) a representation that the stockholder is entitled to vote at such meeting and a statement of the number of shares of the Corporation which are owned by the stockholder and the number of shares which are beneficially owned by the beneficial owner, if any; (iii) a representation that the stockholder intends to appear in person or by proxy at the meeting to nominate the person or persons or to propose the business specified in the notice; and (iv) as to each person the stockholder proposes to nominate for election or re-election as a director, the name and address of such person and such other information regarding such nominee as would be required in a proxy statement filed pursuant to the proxy rules of the Securities and Exchange Commission had such nominee been nominated by the Board of Directors, and a description of any arrangements or understandings, between the stockholder and such nominee and any other persons (including their names), pursuant to which the nomination is to be made, and the written consent of each such nominee to being named in the proxy statement as a nominee and to serving as a director if elected; or, as to each matter the stockholder proposes to bring before the meeting, a brief description of the business desired to be brought before the meeting, the reasons for conducting such business at the meeting, the language of the business matter (if appropriate), and any material interest of the stockholder in such business.
.
Stockholder Notice
 
11.3  At any special meeting of the stockholders, only such business as is specified in the notice of such special meeting given by or at the direction of the person or persons calling such meeting, in accordance with Section 2 of this Article I, shall come before such meeting. Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors may be made at a special meeting of stockholders at which directors are to be elected pursuant to the Corporation's notice of meeting (a) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or (b) provided that the Board of Directors has determined that directors shall be elected at such meeting, by any stockholder of the Corporation who is a stockholder of record at the time of giving of notice provided for in this By-Law, who shall be entitled to vote at the meeting and who complies with the notice procedures set forth in this By-Law. In the event the Corporation calls a special meeting of stockholders for the purpose of electing one or more directors to the Board of Directors, any such stockholder may nominate a person or persons for election to such position(s) as specified in the Corporation's notice of meeting, if the stockholder's notice required by paragraph 11.1 of this By-Law shall be delivered to the Secretary not earlier than the one hundred and twentieth day nor later than the ninetieth day prior to such special meeting or the tenth day following the day on which public announcement is first made of the date of the special meeting and of the nominees proposed by the Board of Directors to be elected at such meeting.
.
Business and Nominations at Special Meetings
11.4  No business shall be conducted nor director nominations made at any meeting of stockholders except in accordance with this Section 11. If the facts warrant, the Board of Directors, or the chairman of a stockholders' meeting at which directors are to be elected, may determine and declare (a) that a proposal does not constitute proper business to be transacted at the meeting or (b) that business was not properly brought before the meeting in accordance with the provisions of this Section 11 or (c) that a nomination was not made in accordance with this Section 11; and, if it is so determined, the defective proposal or nomination shall be disregarded and shall not be transacted or acted upon. The right of stockholders to bring business before or to make nominations pursuant to the foregoing procedure is subject to the rights of the holders of any class or series of stock having a preference over the Common Stock as to dividends or upon liquidation. The procedures set forth in this Section 11 for stockholders' bringing business before a stockholders' meeting or stockholders' making nominations for the election of directors are in addition to, and not in lieu or limitation of, (a) any procedures now in effect or hereafter adopted by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof and (b) the requirements set forth in Rule 14a-8 and Rule 14a-11 under Section 14 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, or any successor provisions.
.
Stockholder Meeting Procedures
11.5  For purposes of this By-Law, "public announcement" as to an annual or special meeting of stockholders shall mean disclosure in a press release reported by the Dow Jones News Service, Associated Press or comparable national news service or in a document publicly filed by the Corporation with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to Section 13, 14 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act. In no event shall the public announcement of an adjournment of an annual or special meeting commence a new time period for the giving of a stockholder's notice as described above.
.
Public Announcement of Stockholders' Meetings
SECTION 12. 
.
Notice to Corporation
Any written notice required to be delivered by a stockholder to the Corporation pursuant to Section 11.1 of this Article I or Section 2.1 of Article II must be given, either by personal delivery or by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, to the Secretary at the Corporation's executive offices in the City of Seattle, State of Washington.
 
SECTION 1. 
.
Number and Term of Office
The number of directors shall be eleven, but the number may be increased, or decreased to not less than three, from time to time, either by the directors by adoption of a resolution to such effect or by the stockholders by amendment of the By-Laws in accordance with Article VIII hereof. Until the annual meeting of stockholders of the Corporation to be held in 2006, the directors shall be divided into three classes, each of which shall be composed as nearly as possible of one-third of the directors. Until the annual meeting of stockholders to be held in 2006, each director shall serve for the term to which the director was elected, and until a successor shall have been elected and qualified or until the director's prior death, resignation, or removal. The terms of all directors in office immediately prior to the opening of the polls for the 2006 annual meeting of stockholders of the Corporation shall expire at the time of the opening of the polls for the 2006 annual meeting of stockholders of the Corporation. At each succeeding annual meeting of stockholders of the Corporation, each director shall be elected to hold office until the next annual meeting of stockholders or until his or her successor shall be elected and qualified or until his or her earlier resignation or removal.
SECTION 2. 
.
Nomination and Election
2.1  Only persons who are nominated in accordance with Article I, Section 11 of these By-Laws shall be eligible for election as directors.
.
Nomination
2.2  At each election of directors, the persons receiving the greatest number of votes shall be the directors.
.
Election
SECTION 3. 
.
Place of Meeting
Meetings of the Board of Directors, or of any committee thereof, may be held either within or without the State of Delaware.
SECTION 4. 
.
Annual Meeting
Each year the Board of Directors shall meet in connection with the annual meeting of stockholders for the purpose of electing officers and for the transaction of other business. No notice of such meeting is required. Such annual meeting may be held at any other time or place which shall be specified in a notice given as hereinafter provided for special meetings of the Board, or in a consent and waiver of notice thereof, signed by all the directors.
SECTION 5. 
.
Stated Meetings
The Board of Directors may, by resolution adopted by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board, from time to time appoint the time and place for holding stated meetings of the Board, if by it deemed advisable; and such stated meetings shall thereupon be held at the time and place so appointed, without the giving of any special notice with regard thereto. In case the day appointed for a stated meeting shall fall upon a legal holiday, such meeting shall be held on the next following day, not a legal holiday, at the regularly appointed hour. Except as otherwise provided in the By-Laws, any and all business may be transacted at any stated meeting.
SECTION 6. 
.
Special Meetings
6.1  Special meetings of the Board of Directors may be called by or at the request of the Chairman of the Board or any two directors. Notice of a special meeting of the Board of Directors, stating the place, day, and hour of the meeting, shall be given to each director in writing (by mail, wire, facsimile, or personal delivery) or orally (by telephone or in person).
.
Convenors and Notice
6.2  With respect to a special meeting of the Board of Directors, a written waiver, signed by a director, shall be deemed equivalent to notice to that director. A director's attendance at a meeting shall constitute that director's waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the director attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting was not lawfully called or convened. Neither the business to be transacted at, nor the purpose of, any regular or special meeting of the Board of Directors need be specified in the waiver of notice of such meeting.
.
Waiver of Notice
 
SECTION 7. 
.
Quorum and Manner of Acting
Except as herein otherwise provided, forty percent of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided in these By-Laws at the time of any stated or special meeting of the Board or, if vacancies exist on the Board of Directors, forty percent of such number of directors then in office, provided, however, that such number may not be less than one-third of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided in these By-Laws, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and, except as otherwise required by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by the By-Laws, the act of a majority of the directors present at any such meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of the Board of Directors. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the directors present may adjourn any meeting, from time to time, until a quorum is present. No notice of any adjourned meeting need be given.
SECTION 8. 
.
Chairman of the Board
The Chairman of the Board shall preside, when present, at all meetings of the Board, except as otherwise provided by law.
SECTION 9. 
.
Resignations
Any director of the Corporation may resign at any time by giving written notice thereof to the Secretary. Such resignation shall take effect at the time specified therefor or if the time is not specified, upon delivery thereof; and, unless otherwise specified with respect thereto, the acceptance of such resignation shall not be necessary to make it effective.
SECTION 10. 
.
Removal of Directors
Until the 2006 annual meeting of stockholders of the Corporation, any director may be removed solely for cause by the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, at a meeting of the stockholders called for that purpose; and the vacancy on the Board caused by any such removal may be filled by the stockholders at such meeting or at any subsequent meeting. All directors elected at and after the 2006 annual meeting of stockholders of the Corporation may be removed with or without cause by the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, at a meeting of the stockholders called for that purpose; and the vacancy on the Board caused by any such removal may be filled by the stockholders at such meeting or at any subsequent meeting.
SECTION 11. 
.
Filling of Vacancies Not Caused by Removal
In case of any increase in the number of directors, or of any vacancy created by death or resignation, the additional director or directors may be elected or, as the case may be, the vacancy or vacancies may be filled, either (a) by the Board of Directors at any meeting, (i) if the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH, or (ii) if the Corporation does not have an Interested Stockholder, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the remaining directors, though less than a quorum; or (b) by the stockholders entitled to vote, either at an annual meeting or at a special meeting thereof called for the purpose, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the outstanding shares entitled to vote at such meeting.
SECTION 12. 
.
Directors' Fees
The Board of Directors shall have authority to determine from time to time the amount of compensation which shall be paid to its members for attendance at meetings of the Board or of any committee of the Board.
SECTION 13. 
.
Action Without a Meeting
Any action required or permitted to be taken at any meeting of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof may be taken without a meeting if all members of the Board or committee, as the case may be, consent thereto in writing, and the writing or writings are filed with the minutes of proceedings of the Board or committee.
 
SECTION 1. 
.
Audit Committee
In addition to any committees appointed pursuant to Section 2 of this Article, there shall be an Audit Committee, appointed annually by the Board of Directors, consisting of at least three directors who are not members of management. It shall be the responsibility of the Audit Committee to review the scope and results of the annual independent audit of books and records of the Corporation and its subsidiaries and to discharge such other responsibilities as may from time to time be assigned to it by the Board of Directors. The Audit Committee shall meet at such times and places as the members deem advisable, and shall make such recommendations to the Board of Directors as they consider appropriate.
SECTION 2. 
.
Other Committees
2.1 The Board of Directors may appoint standing or temporary committees and invest such committees with such powers as it may see fit, with power to subdelegate such powers if deemed desirable by the Board of Directors; but no such committee shall have the power or authority of the Board of Directors to adopt, amend, or repeal the By-Laws of the Corporation or approve, adopt or recommend to the stockholders of the Corporation any action or matter expressly required by the Certificate of Incorporation, these By-Laws or the Delaware General Corporation Law to be submitted to stockholders for approval.
2.2 The Board of Directors may designate one or more directors as alternate members of any committee, who may replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of the committee. In the absence or disqualification of a member of a committee, the member or members thereof present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, whether or not such member or members constitute a quorum, may unanimously appoint another member of the Board to act at the meeting in the place of any such absent or disqualified member.
SECTION 3. 
.
Quorum and Manner of Acting
A majority of the number of directors composing any committee of the Board of Directors, as established and fixed by resolution of the Board of Directors, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at any meeting of such committee but, if less than a majority are present at a meeting, a majority of such directors present may adjourn the meeting from time to time without further notice. The act of a majority of the members of a committee present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of such committee.
SECTION 1. 
.
Officers
The elected officers of the Corporation shall be a Chairman of the Board (who shall be a director) and, at the discretion of the Board, a President (who shall be a director), and one or more Vice Presidents (each of whom may be assigned by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer an additional title descriptive of the functions assigned to such officer and one or more of whom may be designated Executive or Senior Vice President). The Board may also elect one or more Vice Chairmen. The Board of Directors shall also designate either the Chairman of the Board or the President as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation. The Board of Directors shall appoint a Controller, a Secretary, and a Treasurer. Any number of offices, whether elective or appointive, may be held by the same person. The Chief Executive Officer may, by a writing filed with the Secretary, designate titles as officers for employees and agents and appoint Assistant Secretaries and Assistant Treasurers, as, from time to time, may appear to be necessary or advisable in the conduct of the affairs of the Corporation and may, in the same manner, terminate or change such titles.
 
SECTION 2. 
.
Term of Office
So far as practicable, all elected officers shall be elected at the annual meeting of the Board in each year, and shall hold office until the annual meeting of the Board in the next subsequent year and until their respective successors are chosen. The Controller, Secretary, and Treasurer shall hold office at the pleasure of the Board.
SECTION 3. 
.
Salaries of Elected Officers
The salaries paid to the elected officers of the Corporation shall be authorized or approved by the Board of Directors.
SECTION 4. 
.
Bonuses
None of the officers, directors, or employees of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations shall at any time be paid any bonus or share in the earnings or profits of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations except pursuant to a plan approved by affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members of the Board of Directors.
SECTION 5. 
.
Removal of Elected and Appointed Officers
Any elected or appointed officer may be removed at any time, either for or without cause, by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors, at any meeting called for the purpose.
SECTION 6. 
.
Vacancies
If any vacancy occurs in any office, the Board of Directors may elect or appoint a successor to fill such vacancy for the remainder of the term.
SECTION 1. 
.
Chairman of the Board
The Chairman of the Board shall preside, when present, at all meetings of the stockholders (except as otherwise provided by statute) and at all meetings of the Board of Directors. The Chairman shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation; to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the Chairman by the Board of Directors.
SECTION 2. 
.
President
The President shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation and to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; during the absence or disability of the Chairman of the Board to exercise the Chairman's powers and to perform the Chairman's duties; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the President by the Board of Directors; provided, that if the office of President is vacant, the Chairman shall exercise the duties ordinarily exercised by the President until such time as a President is elected or appointed.
SECTION 3. 
.
Chief Executive Officer
The officer designated by the Board of Directors as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation shall have general and active control of its business and affairs. The Chief Executive Officer shall have general power to appoint or designate all employees and agents of the Corporation whose appointment or designation is not otherwise provided for and to fix the compensation thereof, subject to the provisions of these By-Laws; to remove or suspend any employee or agent who shall not have been elected or appointed by the Board of Directors or other body; to suspend for cause any employee, agent, or officer, other than an elected officer, pending final action by the body which shall have appointed such employee, agent, or officer; and to exercise all the powers usually pertaining to the office held by the Chief Executive Officer of a corporation.
 
SECTION 4. 
.
Vice Presidents and Controller
The several Vice Presidents and the Controller shall perform all such duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of them, from time to time, by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer, respectively.
SECTION 5. 
.
Secretary
The Secretary shall attend to the giving of notice of all meetings of stockholders and of the Board of Directors and shall keep and attest true records of all proceedings thereat. The Secretary shall have charge of the corporate seal and have authority to attest any and all instruments or writings to which the same may be affixed and shall keep and account for all books, documents, papers, and records of the Corporation relating to its corporate organization. The Secretary shall have authority to sign stock certificates and shall generally perform all the duties usually appertaining to the office of secretary of a corporation. In the absence of the Secretary, an Assistant Secretary or Secretary pro tempore shall perform the duties of the Secretary.
SECTION 6. 
.
Treasurer
The Treasurer shall have the care and custody of all moneys, funds, and securities of the Corporation, and shall deposit or cause to be deposited all funds of the Corporation in accordance with directions or authorizations of the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer. The Treasurer shall have power to sign stock certificates, to indorse for deposit or collection, or otherwise, all checks, drafts, notes, bills of exchange, or other commercial paper payable to the Corporation, and to give proper receipts or discharges therefor. In the absence of the Treasurer, an Assistant Treasurer shall perform the duties of the Treasurer.
SECTION 7. 
.
Additional Powers and Duties
In addition to the foregoing especially enumerated duties and powers, the several officers of the Corporation shall perform such other duties and exercise such further powers as may be provided in these By-Laws or as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine, or as may be assigned to them by any superior officer.
SECTION 8. 
.
Disaster Emergency Powers of Acting Officers
If, as a result of a disaster or other state of emergency, the Chief Executive Officer is unable to perform the duties of that office, (a) the powers and duties of the Chief Executive Officer shall be performed by the employee with the highest base salary who shall be available and capable of performing such powers and duties and, if more than one such employee has the same base salary, by the employee whose surname begins with the earliest letter of the alphabet among the group of those employees with the same base salary; and (b) the officer performing such duties shall continue to perform such powers and duties until the Chief Executive Officer becomes capable of performing those duties or until the Board of Directors shall have elected a new Chief Executive Officer or designated another individual as Acting Chief Executive Officer; and (c) such officer shall have the power in addition to all other powers granted to the Chief Executive Officer by these By-Laws and by the Board of Directors to appoint an acting President, acting Vice PresidentFinance, acting Controller, acting Secretary, and acting Treasurer, if any of the persons duly elected to any such office is not by reason of such disaster or emergency able to perform the duties of such office, each of such acting appointees to serve in such capacities until the officer for whom the appointee is acting becomes capable of performing the duties of such office or until the Board of Directors shall have designated another individual to perform such duties or have elected another person to fill such office; and (d) any such acting officer so appointed shall be entitled to exercise all powers vested by the By-Laws or the Board of Directors in the duly elected officer for whom the acting officer is acting; and (e) anyone transacting business with this Corporation may rely upon a certification by any two officers of the Corporation that a specified individual has succeeded to the powers of the Chief Executive Officer and that such person has appointed other acting officers as herein provided and any person, firm, corporation, or other entity to which such certification has been delivered by such officers may continue to rely upon it until notified of a change in writing signed by two officers of this Corporation.
 
SECTION 1. 
.
Stock Certificates
Every stockholder shall be entitled to a certificate, signed by the Chairman of the Board or the President or a Vice President and the Treasurer or an Assistant Treasurer or the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary, certifying the number of shares owned by the stockholder in the Corporation. Any and all of the signatures on a certificate may be a facsimile. If any officer, transfer agent, or registrar who has signed or whose facsimile signature has been placed upon a certificate shall have ceased to be such officer, transfer agent, or registrar before such certificate is issued, it may be issued by the Corporation with the same effect as if he or she were such officer, transfer agent, or registrar at the date of issue.
SECTION 2. 
.
Transfer Agents and Registrars
The Board of Directors may, in its discretion, appoint responsible banks or trust companies in the Borough of Manhattan, in the City of New York, State of New York, and in such other city or cities as the Board may deem advisable, from time to time, to act as transfer agents and registrars of the stock of the Corporation; and, when such appointments shall have been made, no stock certificate shall be valid until countersigned by one of such transfer agents and registered by one of such registrars.
SECTION 3. 
.
Transfers of Stock
Shares of stock may be transferred by delivery of the certificates therefor, accompanied either by an assignment in writing on the back of the certificates or by written power of attorney to sell, assign, and transfer the same, signed by the record holder thereof; but no transfer shall affect the right of the Corporation to pay any dividend upon the stock to the holder of record thereof, or to treat the holder of record as the holder in fact thereof for all purposes, and no transfer shall be valid, except between the parties thereto, until such transfer shall have been made upon the books of the Corporation.
SECTION 4. 
.
Lost Certificates
The Board of Directors may provide for the issuance of new certificates of stock to replace certificates of stock lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, or alleged to be lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, upon such terms and in accordance with such procedures as the Board of Directors shall deem proper and prescribe.
SECTION 1. 
.
Fiscal Year
The fiscal year of the Corporation shall be the calendar year.
SECTION 2. (Repealed in its entirety by vote of the stockholders, May 5, 1975.)
SECTION 3. 
.
Signing of Negotiable Instruments
All bills, notes, checks, or other instruments for the payment of money shall be signed or countersigned by such officer or officers and in such manner as from time to time may be prescribed by resolution (whether general or special) of the Board of Directors.
 
SECTION 4. 
.
Indemnification of Directors and Officers
4.1.  Each person who was or is made a party or is threatened to be made a party to or is otherwise involved (including, without limitation, as a witness) in any actual or threatened action, suit, or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative, or investigative (hereinafter a "proceeding"), by reason of the fact that he or she is or was a director or officer of the Corporation or that, being or having been such a director or officer or an employee of the Corporation, he or she is or was serving at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation as a director, officer, employee, or agent of another corporation or of a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise, including service with respect to an employee benefit plan (hereinafter an "indemnitee"), whether the basis of such proceeding is alleged action in an official capacity as such a director, officer, employee, or agent or in any other capacity while serving as such a director, officer, employee, or agent, shall be indemnified and held harmless by the Corporation to the full extent permitted by the Delaware General Corporation Law, as the same exists or may hereafter be amended (but, in the case of any such amendment, only to the extent that such amendment permits the Corporation to provide broader indemnification rights than permitted prior thereto), or by other applicable law as then in effect, against all expense, liability, and loss (including attorneys' fees, judgments, fines, ERISA excise taxes or penalties, and amounts paid in settlement) actually and reasonably incurred or suffered by such indemnitee in connection therewith and such indemnification shall continue as to an indemnitee who has ceased to be a director, officer, employee, or agent and shall inure to the benefit of the indemnitee's heirs, executors, and administrators; provided, however, that except as provided in Section 4.2 with respect to proceedings seeking to enforce rights to indemnification, the Corporation shall indemnify any such indemnitee in connection with a proceeding (or part thereof) initiated by such indemnitee only if such proceeding (or part thereof) was authorized or ratified by the Board of Directors of the Corporation. The right to indemnification conferred in this Section 4.1 shall be a contract right and shall include the right to be paid by the Corporation the expenses incurred in defending any such proceeding in advance of its final disposition (hereinafter an "advancement of expenses"); provided, however, that an advancement of expenses incurred by an indemnitee in his or her capacity as a director or officer (and not in any other capacity in which service was or is rendered by such indemnitee, including, without limitation, service to an employee benefit plan) shall be made only upon delivery to the Corporation of an under-taking (hereinafter an "undertaking"), by or on behalf of such indemnitee, to repay all amounts so advanced if it shall ultimately be determined by final judicial decision from which there is no further right to appeal that such indemnitee is not entitled to be indemnified for such expenses under this Section 4.1 or otherwise; and provided, further, that an advancement of expenses shall not be made if the Corporation's Board of Directors makes a good faith determination that such payment would violate law or public policy.
.
Right to Indemnification
4.2  If a claim under Section 4.1 is not paid in full by the Corporation within sixty days after a written claim has been received by the Corporation, except in the case of a claim for an advancement of expenses, in which case the applicable period shall be twenty days, the indemnitee may at any time thereafter bring suit against the Corporation to recover the unpaid amount of the claim. If successful in whole or in part in any such suit, or in a suit brought by the Corporation to recover an advancement of expenses pursuant to the terms of an undertaking, the indemnitee shall also be entitled to be paid the expense of prosecuting or defending such suit. The indemnitee shall be presumed to be entitled to indemnification under this Section 4 upon submission of a written claim (and, in an action brought to enforce a claim for an advancement of expenses, where the required undertaking has been tendered to the Corporation), and thereafter the Corporation shall have the burden of proof to overcome the presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled. Neither the failure of the Corporation (including its Board of Directors, independent legal counsel, or its stockholders) to have made a determination prior to the commencement of such suit that indemnification of the indemnitee is proper in the circumstances, nor an actual determination by the Corporation (including its Board of Directors, independent legal counsel, or its stockholders) that the indemnitee is not entitled to indemnification shall be a defense to the suit or create a presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled.
.
Right of Indemnitee to Bring Suit
4.3  The rights to indemnification and to the advancement of expenses conferred in this Section 4 shall not be exclusive of any other right which any person may have or hereafter acquire under any statute, provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation, By-Laws, agreement, vote of stockholders or disinterested directors, or otherwise. Notwithstanding any amendment to or repeal of this Section 4, or of any of the procedures established by the Board of Directors pursuant to Section 4.7, any indemnitee shall be entitled to indemnification in accordance with the provisions hereof and thereof with respect to any acts or omissions of such indemnitee occurring prior to such amendment or repeal.
.
Nonexclusivity of Rights
 
4.4  The Corporation may maintain insurance, at its expense, to protect itself and any director, officer, employee, or agent of the Corporation or another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise against any expense, liability, or loss, whether or not the Corporation would have the power to indemnify such person against such expense, liability, or loss under the Delaware General Corporation Law. The Corporation may, without further stockholder approval, enter into contracts with any indemnitee in furtherance of the provisions of this Section 4 and may create a trust fund, grant a security interest, or use other means (including, without limitation, a letter of credit) to ensure the payment of such amounts as may be necessary to effect indemnification as provided in this Section 4.
.
Insurance, Contracts, and Funding
4.5  Any person who is or was a director, officer, or employee of the Corporation who is or was serving (i) as a director or officer of another corporation of which a majority of the shares entitled to vote in the election of its directors is held by the Corporation or (ii) in an executive or management capacity in a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise of which the Corporation or a wholly owned subsidiary of the Corporation is a general partner or has a majority ownership shall be deemed to be so serving at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation and entitled to indemnification and advancement of expenses under Section 4.1.
.
Persons Serving Other Entities
4.6  The Corporation may, by action of its Board of Directors, authorize one or more executive officers to grant rights to advancement of expenses to employees or agents of the Corporation on such terms and conditions as such officer or officers deem appropriate under the circumstances. The Corporation may, by action of its Board of Directors, grant rights to indemnification and advancement of expenses to employees or agents or groups of employees or agents of the Corporation with the same scope and effect as the provisions of this Section 4 with respect to the indemnification and advancement of expenses of directors and officers of the Corporation; provided, however, that an undertaking shall be made by an employee or agent only if required by the Board of Directors.
.
Indemnification of Employees and Agents of the Corporation
4.7  The Board of Directors may establish reasonable procedures for the submission of claims for indemnification pursuant to this Section 4, determination of the entitlement of any person thereto, and review of any such determination. Such procedures shall be set forth in an appendix to these By-Laws and shall be deemed for all purposes to be a part hereof.
.
Procedures for the Submission of Claims
SECTION 1. 
.
Amendment of the By-Laws: General
Except as herein otherwise expressly provided, the By-Laws of the Corporation may be altered or repealed in any particular and new By-Laws, not inconsistent with any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or any provision of law, may be adopted, either by the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority in number of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote at an annual meeting of stockholders or at a special meeting thereof, the notice of which special meeting shall include the form of the proposed alteration or repeal or of the proposed new By-Laws, or a summary thereof; or either
 
 
provided, in either of the latter cases, that the notice of such meeting shall include the form of the proposed alteration or repeal or of the proposed new By-Laws, or a summary thereof.
SECTION 2. 
.
Amendments as to Compensation and Removal of Officers
Notwithstanding anything contained in these By-Laws to the contrary, the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the Voting Stock, as defined in Article FOURTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, at a meeting of the stockholders called for the purpose, shall be required to alter, amend, repeal, or adopt any provision inconsistent with Sections 3, 4 and 5 of Article IV hereof, notice of which meeting shall include the form of the proposed amendment, or a summary thereof.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20060627165315.txt.gz
TIME:20060627165315
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
Item 8.01. Other Events.
On June 26, 2006, The Boeing Company ("Boeing") issued a press release in which Boeing announced that it was accelerating an evaluation of Connexion by Boeing. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
Boeing Accelerates Evaluation of Connexion by Boeing Business
 Boeing will be taking a series of near-term actions as the company accelerates the evaluation of options for the future of its Connexion by Boeing high-speed broadband communications business.
CHICAGO, June 26, 2006
Boeing has pursued the business vigorously, developing technology that has worked well and evolved into a useful product. However, the market for the service has not developed satisfactorily. Therefore, the company will be working in conjunction with customers to thoroughly evaluate the Connexion marketplace and business model to determine next steps.
Meetings are being scheduled with customers across all Connexion business channelsincluding airline, defense, maritime, corporate aircraft and general aviationto assess the current state of the market and develop plans that address market conditions. In the meantime, Boeing will limit further commercial expansion of the service.
The full extent of possible changes to the business model associated with this evaluation processincluding a sale, partnering arrangement or termination of servicewon't be decided until meetings with customers have taken place. Any financial impact from the company's decisions will be disclosed at the appropriate time.
###
Contact Info:
John Dern
312-544-2002


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20060630170115.txt.gz
TIME:20060630170115
EVENTS:	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
On June 26, 2006, the Board of Directors amended and restated the By-Laws of The Boeing Company (the "") by decreasing the number of directors from eleven to ten. A copy of the Company's By-Laws, as amended and restated on June 26, 2006 (the "") is attached hereto as Exhibit 3.2 and is incorporated by reference.
Company
By-Laws
 
The following description of common stock, par value $5.00 per share (the ""), updates and supersedes the description of Common Stock contained in the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K (Commission File No. 1-442) filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on February 2, 1998, including any amendments or reports filed prior to the date hereof for the purpose of updating such description. The following description is a summary, does not purport to be complete or to give a complete description of applicable statutory or common law, and is subject in all respects to the applicable provisions of law, and to the Company's Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation (the ""), and the Company's By-Laws, which are included as Exhibits 3.1 and 3.2 hereto, respectively, and are incorporated herein by reference.
Common Stock
Certificate
The total number of shares of capital stock of the Company authorized by the Certificate is 1,220,000,000 consisting of 1,200,000,000 shares of Common Stock, and 20,000,000 shares of preferred stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""). Holders of Common Stock are entitled to receive such dividends as may be declared by the Board of Directors out of legally available funds, and are entitled to share pro rata in any distributions to shareholders, subject to the preferences of any Preferred Stock which may be issued and to restrictions contained in agreements to which the Company is a party. No preemptive, conversion or redemption rights or sinking funds provisions are applicable to the Common Stock. All outstanding shares of Common Stock are fully paid and nonassessable. All holders of the Common Stock are entitled to one vote per share on all matters to be voted on by Boeing shareholders, including the election of directors. Shareholders do not have cumulative voting rights in election of directors. The affirmative vote of the holders of a majority of the shares present or represented by proxy and entitled to vote at a shareholders' meeting is required for shareholder action, except for (i) the election of directors, in which case the candidates receiving the greatest number of votes are elected as directors and (ii) amendments to the provisions in the By-Laws related to compensation and removal of officers, which require the approval of a majority of the outstanding shares entitled to vote for the election of directors.
Preferred Stock
The Certificate authorizes the Board, without any further approval, to (i) divide the Preferred Stock into series, (ii) designate each such series, (iii) fix and determine dividend rights, (iv) determine the price, terms and conditions on which shares of Preferred Stock may be redeemed, (v) determine the amount payable to holders of Preferred Stock in the event of voluntary or involuntary liquidation, (vi) determine any sinking fund provisions, and (vii) establish any voting, preemption or conversion privileges.
(d) Exhibits.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: June 30, 2006
 
 
 

Exhibit 3.2
 
 
 
 
 
 
SECTION 1. 
.
Annual Meetings
The Annual Meeting of the stockholders shall be held on such date and at such time as the Board of Directors shall determine, for the election of directors and the transaction of such other business as may come before the meeting.
SECTION 2. 
.
Special Meetings
A special meeting of the stockholders may be called at any time by the Board of Directors, or by stockholders holding together at least twenty-five percent of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, except as otherwise provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto.
SECTION 3. 
.
Place of Meeting
All meetings of the stockholders of the Corporation shall be held at such place or places within or without the State of Delaware as may from time to time be fixed by the Board of Directors or as shall be specified or fixed in the respective notices or waivers of notice thereof.
SECTION 4. 
.
Notice of Meetings
Except as otherwise required by statute and as set forth below, notice of each annual or special meeting of stockholders shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than thirty nor more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date. If the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, notice of each special meeting of stockholders shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than fifty-five nor more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date, unless the calling of such meeting is ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, in which case notice of such special meeting shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than thirty nor more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date. Such notice shall be given by delivering to each stockholder a written or printed notice thereof either personally or by mailing such notice in a postage-prepaid envelope addressed to the stockholder's address as it appears on the stock books of the Corporation. Except as otherwise required by statute, no publication of any notice of a meeting of stockholders shall be required. Every notice of a meeting of stockholders shall state the place, date, and hour of the meeting and, in the case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called.
SECTION 5. 
.
Waivers of Notice
Whenever any notice is required to be given to any stockholder under the provisions of these By-Laws, the Certificate of Incorporation, or the Delaware General Corporation Law, a waiver thereof in writing, signed by the person or persons entitled to such notice, whether before or after the time stated therein, shall be deemed equivalent to the giving of such notice. The attendance of a stockholder at a meeting, in person or by proxy, shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when a stockholder attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened.
 
SECTION 6. 
.
Quorum
At all meetings of stockholders, except when otherwise provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by the By-Laws, the presence, in person or by proxy duly authorized, of the holders of one-third of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and except as otherwise provided by statute or rule of law, or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by the By-Laws, the vote, in person or by proxy, of the holders of a majority of the shares constituting such quorum shall be binding upon all stockholders of the Corporation. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote may adjourn any meeting, from time to time but not for a period of more than thirty days at any one time, until a quorum shall attend. At any such adjourned meeting at which a quorum shall be present, any business may be transacted which might have been transacted at the meeting as originally called. Unless otherwise provided by statute, no notice of an adjourned meeting need be given.
SECTION 7. 
.
Proxies
7.1  Each stockholder entitled to vote at a meeting of stockholders or to express consent or dissent to corporate action in writing without a meeting may authorize another person or persons to act for such stockholder by proxy. Such authorization may be accomplished by (a) the stockholder or such stockholder's authorized officer, director, employee, or agent executing a writing or causing his or her signature to be affixed to such writing by any reasonable means, including facsimile signature, or (b) by transmitting or authorizing the transmission of a telegram, cablegram, or other means of electronic transmission to the intended holder of the proxy or to a proxy solicitation firm, proxy support service, or similar agent duly authorized by the intended proxy holder to receive such transmission; provided, that any such telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission must either set forth or be accompanied by information from which it can be determined that the telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission was authorized by the stockholder. Any copy, facsimile telecommunication, or other reliable reproduction of the writing or transmission by which a stockholder has authorized another person to act as proxy for such stockholder may be substituted or used in lieu of the original writing or transmission for any and all purposes for which the original writing or transmission could be used, provided that such copy, facsimile telecommunication, or other reproduction shall be a complete reproduction of the entire original writing or transmission.
.
Appointment
7.2  Proxy shall be filed with the Secretary of the Corporation before or at the time of the meeting or the delivery to the Corporation of the consent to corporate action in writing. A proxy shall become invalid three years after the date of its execution, unless otherwise provided in the proxy. A proxy with respect to a specified meeting shall entitle the holder thereof to vote at any reconvened meeting following adjournment of such meeting but shall not be valid after the final adjournment thereof.
.
Delivery to Corporation; Duration
SECTION 8. 
.
Inspectors of Election
8.1  In advance of any meeting of stockholders, the Board of Directors of the Corporation shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspectors of election at such meeting and to make a written report thereof. The Board of Directors may designate one or more persons to serve as alternate inspectors to serve in place of any inspector who is unable or fails to act. If no inspector or alternate is able to act at a meeting of stockholders, the chairman of such meeting shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspector of elections at such meeting.
.
Appointment
8.2  The inspectors shall: (a) ascertain the number of shares of the Corporation outstanding and the voting power of each such share; (b) determine the shares represented at the meeting and the validity of proxies and ballots; (c) count all votes and ballots; (d) determine and retain for a reasonable period of time a record of the disposition of any challenges made to any determination by them; and (e) certify their determination of the number of shares represented at the meeting and their count of the votes and ballots. Each inspector of election shall, before entering upon the discharge of his or her duties, take and sign an oath to faithfully execute the duties of inspector with strict impartiality and according to the best of his or her ability. The inspectors of election may appoint or retain other persons or entities to assist them in the performance of their duties.
.
Duties
8.3  The validity of any proxy or ballot executed for a meeting of stockholders shall be determined by the inspectors of election in accordance with the applicable provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law as then in effect. In determining the validity of any proxy transmitted by telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission, the inspectors shall record in writing the information upon which they relied in making such determination.
.
Determination of Proxy Validity
 
SECTION 9. 
.
Fixing the Record Date
9.1  For the purpose of determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at any meeting of stockholders or any adjournment thereof, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which record date shall be not fewer than thirty nor more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the date of such meeting. If the corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, the record date for each special meeting of stockholders shall be not fewer than fifty-five nor more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date, unless the calling of such meeting is ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation. If no record date is fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall be at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which notice is given, or, if notice is waived, at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which the meeting is held. A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting; provided, however, that the Board of Directors may fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
.
Meetings
9.2  For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which date shall not be more than ten (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days after the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, when no prior action by the Board of Directors is required by Chapter 1 of the Delaware General Corporation Law as now or hereafter amended, shall be the first date on which a signed written consent setting forth the action taken or proposed to be taken is delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the records of proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Delivery made to the Corporation's registered office shall be by hand or by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors and prior action by the Board of Directors is required by Chapter 1 of the Delaware General Corporation Law as now or hereafter amended, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution taking such prior action.
.
Consent to Corporate Action Without a Meeting
9.3  For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to receive payment of any dividend or other distribution or allotment of any rights or the stockholders entitled to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion, or exchange of stock, or for the purpose of any other lawful action, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted, and which record date shall be not more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days prior to such action. If no record date is fixed, the record date for determining stockholders for any such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution relating thereto.
.
Dividends, Distributions, and Other Rights
9.4.  At least ten days before each meeting of stockholders, a complete list of the stockholders entitled to vote at such meeting shall be made, arranged in alphabetical order, and showing the address of each stockholder and the number of shares registered in the name of each stockholder. This list shall be open to examination by any stockholder, for any purpose germane to the meeting, during ordinary business hours, for a period of ten days prior to the meeting, either at a place within the city where the meeting is to be held, which place shall be specified in the notice of the meeting, or, if not so specified, at the place where the meeting is to be held. The list shall also be produced and kept at such meeting for inspection by any stockholder who is present.
.
Voting List
 
SECTION 10. 
.
Action by Stockholders Without a Meeting
Subject to the provisions of Article NINTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, any action which could be taken at any annual or special meeting of stockholders may be taken without a meeting, without prior notice, and without a vote, if a consent or consents in writing, setting forth the action so taken, are (a) signed by the holders of outstanding stock having not fewer than the minimum number of votes that would be necessary to authorize or take such action at a meeting at which all shares entitled to vote thereon were present and voted and (b) delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the records of proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Delivery made to the Corporation's registered office shall be by hand or by certified mail or registered mail, return receipt requested. Every written consent shall bear the date of signature of each stockholder who signs the consent and no written consent shall be effective to take the corporate action referred to therein unless written consents signed by a sufficient number of stockholders to take such action are delivered to the Corporation, in the manner required by this section, within sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days of the date of the earliest dated consent delivered to the Corporation in the manner required by this section. The validity of any consent executed by a proxy for a stockholder pursuant to a telegram, cablegram, or other means of electronic transmission transmitted to such proxy holder by or upon the authorization of the stockholder shall be determined by or at the direction of the Secretary of the Corporation. A written record of the information upon which the person making such determination relied shall be made and kept in the records of the proceedings of the stockholders. Any such consent shall be inserted in the minute book as if it were the minutes of a meeting of the stockholders. Prompt notice of the taking of the corporate action without a meeting by less than unanimous written consent shall be given to those stockholders who have not consented in writing.
SECTION 11. 
.
Business and Nominations at Stockholders' Meetings
11.1  In addition to the election of directors, other proper business may be transacted at the annual meeting of stockholders, provided that such business is a proper matter for stockholder action and is properly brought before such meeting. To be properly brought before an annual meeting, nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors and business to be considered by stockholders must be (a) made or brought by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, or (b) made or brought before the meeting by a stockholder of the Corporation who is a stockholder of record at the time of giving notice as required in this By-Law, who is entitled to vote at the meeting, and who complies with the notice procedures set forth in this By-Law. Notice by a stockholder pursuant to (b) above must be in writing, in accordance with Section 12 of this Article I, and received by the Secretary not earlier than the one-hundred and twentieth day nor later than the close of business on the ninetieth day prior to the date specified in Section 1 of this Article I for such annual meeting; provided, however, that in the event that the date of the annual meeting is more than thirty days before or more than sixty days after such date, notice by the stockholder must be received by the Secretary not earlier than the one-hundred and twentieth day prior to such annual meeting and not later than the close of business on the ninetieth day prior to such annual meeting or the tenth day following the day on which public announcement of the date of such meeting is first made by the Corporation.
.
Business and Nominations at Annual Meetings
11.2  Any stockholder notice given pursuant to Section 11.1 shall set forth (i) the name and address of the stockholder proposing such business and of the beneficial owner, if any, on whose behalf the proposal or nomination is made; (ii) a representation that the stockholder is entitled to vote at such meeting and a statement of the number of shares of the Corporation which are owned by the stockholder and the number of shares which are beneficially owned by the beneficial owner, if any; (iii) a representation that the stockholder intends to appear in person or by proxy at the meeting to nominate the person or persons or to propose the business specified in the notice; and (iv) as to each person the stockholder proposes to nominate for election or re-election as a director, the name and address of such person and such other information regarding such nominee as would be required in a proxy statement filed pursuant to the proxy rules of the Securities and Exchange Commission had such nominee been nominated by the Board of Directors, and a description of any arrangements or understandings, between the stockholder and such nominee and any other persons (including their names), pursuant to which the nomination is to be made, and the written consent of each such nominee to being named in the proxy statement as a nominee and to serving as a director if elected; or, as to each matter the stockholder proposes to bring before the meeting, a brief description of the business desired to be brought before the meeting, the reasons for conducting such business at the meeting, the language of the business matter (if appropriate), and any material interest of the stockholder in such business.
.
Stockholder Notice
 
11.3  At any special meeting of the stockholders, only such business as is specified in the notice of such special meeting given by or at the direction of the person or persons calling such meeting, in accordance with Section 2 of this Article I, shall come before such meeting. Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors may be made at a special meeting of stockholders at which directors are to be elected pursuant to the Corporation's notice of meeting (a) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or (b) provided that the Board of Directors has determined that directors shall be elected at such meeting, by any stockholder of the Corporation who is a stockholder of record at the time of giving of notice provided for in this By-Law, who shall be entitled to vote at the meeting and who complies with the notice procedures set forth in this By-Law. In the event the Corporation calls a special meeting of stockholders for the purpose of electing one or more directors to the Board of Directors, any such stockholder may nominate a person or persons for election to such position(s) as specified in the Corporation's notice of meeting, if the stockholder's notice required by paragraph 11.1 of this By-Law shall be delivered to the Secretary not earlier than the one hundred and twentieth day nor later than the ninetieth day prior to such special meeting or the tenth day following the day on which public announcement is first made of the date of the special meeting and of the nominees proposed by the Board of Directors to be elected at such meeting.
.
Business and Nominations at Special Meetings
11.4  No business shall be conducted nor director nominations made at any meeting of stockholders except in accordance with this Section 11. If the facts warrant, the Board of Directors, or the chairman of a stockholders' meeting at which directors are to be elected, may determine and declare (a) that a proposal does not constitute proper business to be transacted at the meeting or (b) that business was not properly brought before the meeting in accordance with the provisions of this Section 11 or (c) that a nomination was not made in accordance with this Section 11; and, if it is so determined, the defective proposal or nomination shall be disregarded and shall not be transacted or acted upon. The right of stockholders to bring business before or to make nominations pursuant to the foregoing procedure is subject to the rights of the holders of any class or series of stock having a preference over the Common Stock as to dividends or upon liquidation. The procedures set forth in this Section 11 for stockholders' bringing business before a stockholders' meeting or stockholders' making nominations for the election of directors are in addition to, and not in lieu or limitation of, (a) any procedures now in effect or hereafter adopted by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof and (b) the requirements set forth in Rule 14a-8 and Rule 14a-11 under Section 14 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, or any successor provisions.
.
Stockholder Meeting Procedures
11.5  For purposes of this By-Law, "public announcement" as to an annual or special meeting of stockholders shall mean disclosure in a press release reported by the Dow Jones News Service, Associated Press or comparable national news service or in a document publicly filed by the Corporation with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to Section 13, 14 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act. In no event shall the public announcement of an adjournment of an annual or special meeting commence a new time period for the giving of a stockholder's notice as described above.
.
Public Announcement of Stockholders' Meetings
SECTION 12. 
.
Notice to Corporation
Any written notice required to be delivered by a stockholder to the Corporation pursuant to Section 11.1 of this Article I or Section 2.1 of Article II must be given, either by personal delivery or by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, to the Secretary at the Corporation's executive offices in the City of Seattle, State of Washington.
 
SECTION 1. 
.
Number and Term of Office
The number of directors shall be ten, but the number may be increased, or decreased to not less than three, from time to time, either by the directors by adoption of a resolution to such effect or by the stockholders by amendment of the By-Laws in accordance with Article VIII hereof. Until the annual meeting of stockholders of the Corporation to be held in 2006, the directors shall be divided into three classes, each of which shall be composed as nearly as possible of one-third of the directors. Until the annual meeting of stockholders to be held in 2006, each director shall serve for the term to which the director was elected, and until a successor shall have been elected and qualified or until the director's prior death, resignation, or removal. The terms of all directors in office immediately prior to the opening of the polls for the 2006 annual meeting of stockholders of the Corporation shall expire at the time of the opening of the polls for the 2006 annual meeting of stockholders of the Corporation. At each succeeding annual meeting of stockholders of the Corporation, each director shall be elected to hold office until the next annual meeting of stockholders or until his or her successor shall be elected and qualified or until his or her earlier resignation or removal.
SECTION 2. 
.
Nomination and Election
2.1  Only persons who are nominated in accordance with Article I, Section 11 of these By-Laws shall be eligible for election as directors.
.
Nomination
2.2  At each election of directors, the persons receiving the greatest number of votes shall be the directors.
.
Election
SECTION 3. 
.
Place of Meeting
Meetings of the Board of Directors, or of any committee thereof, may be held either within or without the State of Delaware.
SECTION 4. 
.
Annual Meeting
Each year the Board of Directors shall meet in connection with the annual meeting of stockholders for the purpose of electing officers and for the transaction of other business. No notice of such meeting is required. Such annual meeting may be held at any other time or place which shall be specified in a notice given as hereinafter provided for special meetings of the Board, or in a consent and waiver of notice thereof, signed by all the directors.
SECTION 5. 
.
Stated Meetings
The Board of Directors may, by resolution adopted by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board, from time to time appoint the time and place for holding stated meetings of the Board, if by it deemed advisable; and such stated meetings shall thereupon be held at the time and place so appointed, without the giving of any special notice with regard thereto. In case the day appointed for a stated meeting shall fall upon a legal holiday, such meeting shall be held on the next following day, not a legal holiday, at the regularly appointed hour. Except as otherwise provided in the By-Laws, any and all business may be transacted at any stated meeting.
SECTION 6. 
.
Special Meetings
6.1  Special meetings of the Board of Directors may be called by or at the request of the Chairman of the Board or any two directors. Notice of a special meeting of the Board of Directors, stating the place, day, and hour of the meeting, shall be given to each director in writing (by mail, wire, facsimile, or personal delivery) or orally (by telephone or in person).
.
Convenors and Notice
6.2  With respect to a special meeting of the Board of Directors, a written waiver, signed by a director, shall be deemed equivalent to notice to that director. A director's attendance at a meeting shall constitute that director's waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the director attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting was not lawfully called or convened. Neither the business to be transacted at, nor the purpose of, any regular or special meeting of the Board of Directors need be specified in the waiver of notice of such meeting.
.
Waiver of Notice
 
SECTION 7. 
.
Quorum and Manner of Acting
Except as herein otherwise provided, forty percent of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided in these By-Laws at the time of any stated or special meeting of the Board or, if vacancies exist on the Board of Directors, forty percent of such number of directors then in office, provided, however, that such number may not be less than one-third of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided in these By-Laws, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and, except as otherwise required by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by the By-Laws, the act of a majority of the directors present at any such meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of the Board of Directors. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the directors present may adjourn any meeting, from time to time, until a quorum is present. No notice of any adjourned meeting need be given.
SECTION 8. 
.
Chairman of the Board
The Chairman of the Board shall preside, when present, at all meetings of the Board, except as otherwise provided by law.
SECTION 9. 
.
Resignations
Any director of the Corporation may resign at any time by giving written notice thereof to the Secretary. Such resignation shall take effect at the time specified therefor or if the time is not specified, upon delivery thereof; and, unless otherwise specified with respect thereto, the acceptance of such resignation shall not be necessary to make it effective.
SECTION 10. 
.
Removal of Directors
Until the 2006 annual meeting of stockholders of the Corporation, any director may be removed solely for cause by the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, at a meeting of the stockholders called for that purpose; and the vacancy on the Board caused by any such removal may be filled by the stockholders at such meeting or at any subsequent meeting. All directors elected at and after the 2006 annual meeting of stockholders of the Corporation may be removed with or without cause by the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, at a meeting of the stockholders called for that purpose; and the vacancy on the Board caused by any such removal may be filled by the stockholders at such meeting or at any subsequent meeting.
SECTION 11. 
.
Filling of Vacancies Not Caused by Removal
In case of any increase in the number of directors, or of any vacancy created by death or resignation, the additional director or directors may be elected or, as the case may be, the vacancy or vacancies may be filled, either (a) by the Board of Directors at any meeting, (i) if the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH, or (ii) if the Corporation does not have an Interested Stockholder, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the remaining directors, though less than a quorum; or (b) by the stockholders entitled to vote, either at an annual meeting or at a special meeting thereof called for the purpose, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the outstanding shares entitled to vote at such meeting.
SECTION 12. 
.
Directors' Fees
The Board of Directors shall have authority to determine from time to time the amount of compensation which shall be paid to its members for attendance at meetings of the Board or of any committee of the Board.
SECTION 13. 
.
Action Without a Meeting
Any action required or permitted to be taken at any meeting of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof may be taken without a meeting if all members of the Board or committee, as the case may be, consent thereto in writing, and the writing or writings are filed with the minutes of proceedings of the Board or committee.
 
SECTION 1. 
.
Audit Committee
In addition to any committees appointed pursuant to Section 2 of this Article, there shall be an Audit Committee, appointed annually by the Board of Directors, consisting of at least three directors who are not members of management. It shall be the responsibility of the Audit Committee to review the scope and results of the annual independent audit of books and records of the Corporation and its subsidiaries and to discharge such other responsibilities as may from time to time be assigned to it by the Board of Directors. The Audit Committee shall meet at such times and places as the members deem advisable, and shall make such recommendations to the Board of Directors as they consider appropriate.
SECTION 2. 
.
Other Committees
2.1 The Board of Directors may appoint standing or temporary committees and invest such committees with such powers as it may see fit, with power to subdelegate such powers if deemed desirable by the Board of Directors; but no such committee shall have the power or authority of the Board of Directors to adopt, amend, or repeal the By-Laws of the Corporation or approve, adopt or recommend to the stockholders of the Corporation any action or matter expressly required by the Certificate of Incorporation, these By-Laws or the Delaware General Corporation Law to be submitted to stockholders for approval.
2.2 The Board of Directors may designate one or more directors as alternate members of any committee, who may replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of the committee. In the absence or disqualification of a member of a committee, the member or members thereof present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, whether or not such member or members constitute a quorum, may unanimously appoint another member of the Board to act at the meeting in the place of any such absent or disqualified member.
SECTION 3. 
.
Quorum and Manner of Acting
A majority of the number of directors composing any committee of the Board of Directors, as established and fixed by resolution of the Board of Directors, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at any meeting of such committee but, if less than a majority are present at a meeting, a majority of such directors present may adjourn the meeting from time to time without further notice. The act of a majority of the members of a committee present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of such committee.
SECTION 1. 
.
Officers
The elected officers of the Corporation shall be a Chairman of the Board (who shall be a director) and, at the discretion of the Board, a President (who shall be a director), and one or more Vice Presidents (each of whom may be assigned by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer an additional title descriptive of the functions assigned to such officer and one or more of whom may be designated Executive or Senior Vice President). The Board may also elect one or more Vice Chairmen. The Board of Directors shall also designate either the Chairman of the Board or the President as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation. The Board of Directors shall appoint a Controller, a Secretary, and a Treasurer. Any number of offices, whether elective or appointive, may be held by the same person. The Chief Executive Officer may, by a writing filed with the Secretary, designate titles as officers for employees and agents and appoint Assistant Secretaries and Assistant Treasurers, as, from time to time, may appear to be necessary or advisable in the conduct of the affairs of the Corporation and may, in the same manner, terminate or change such titles.
 
SECTION 2. 
.
Term of Office
So far as practicable, all elected officers shall be elected at the annual meeting of the Board in each year, and shall hold office until the annual meeting of the Board in the next subsequent year and until their respective successors are chosen. The Controller, Secretary, and Treasurer shall hold office at the pleasure of the Board.
SECTION 3. 
.
Salaries of Elected Officers
The salaries paid to the elected officers of the Corporation shall be authorized or approved by the Board of Directors.
SECTION 4. 
.
Bonuses
None of the officers, directors, or employees of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations shall at any time be paid any bonus or share in the earnings or profits of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations except pursuant to a plan approved by affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members of the Board of Directors.
SECTION 5. 
.
Removal of Elected and Appointed Officers
Any elected or appointed officer may be removed at any time, either for or without cause, by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors, at any meeting called for the purpose.
SECTION 6. 
.
Vacancies
If any vacancy occurs in any office, the Board of Directors may elect or appoint a successor to fill such vacancy for the remainder of the term.
SECTION 1. 
.
Chairman of the Board
The Chairman of the Board shall preside, when present, at all meetings of the stockholders (except as otherwise provided by statute) and at all meetings of the Board of Directors. The Chairman shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation; to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the Chairman by the Board of Directors.
SECTION 2. 
.
President
The President shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation and to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; during the absence or disability of the Chairman of the Board to exercise the Chairman's powers and to perform the Chairman's duties; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the President by the Board of Directors; provided, that if the office of President is vacant, the Chairman shall exercise the duties ordinarily exercised by the President until such time as a President is elected or appointed.
SECTION 3. 
.
Chief Executive Officer
The officer designated by the Board of Directors as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation shall have general and active control of its business and affairs. The Chief Executive Officer shall have general power to appoint or designate all employees and agents of the Corporation whose appointment or designation is not otherwise provided for and to fix the compensation thereof, subject to the provisions of these By-Laws; to remove or suspend any employee or agent who shall not have been elected or appointed by the Board of Directors or other body; to suspend for cause any employee, agent, or officer, other than an elected officer, pending final action by the body which shall have appointed such employee, agent, or officer; and to exercise all the powers usually pertaining to the office held by the Chief Executive Officer of a corporation.
 
SECTION 4. 
.
Vice Presidents and Controller
The several Vice Presidents and the Controller shall perform all such duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of them, from time to time, by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer, respectively.
SECTION 5. 
.
Secretary
The Secretary shall attend to the giving of notice of all meetings of stockholders and of the Board of Directors and shall keep and attest true records of all proceedings thereat. The Secretary shall have charge of the corporate seal and have authority to attest any and all instruments or writings to which the same may be affixed and shall keep and account for all books, documents, papers, and records of the Corporation relating to its corporate organization. The Secretary shall have authority to sign stock certificates and shall generally perform all the duties usually appertaining to the office of secretary of a corporation. In the absence of the Secretary, an Assistant Secretary or Secretary pro tempore shall perform the duties of the Secretary.
SECTION 6. 
.
Treasurer
The Treasurer shall have the care and custody of all moneys, funds, and securities of the Corporation, and shall deposit or cause to be deposited all funds of the Corporation in accordance with directions or authorizations of the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer. The Treasurer shall have power to sign stock certificates, to indorse for deposit or collection, or otherwise, all checks, drafts, notes, bills of exchange, or other commercial paper payable to the Corporation, and to give proper receipts or discharges therefor. In the absence of the Treasurer, an Assistant Treasurer shall perform the duties of the Treasurer.
SECTION 7. 
.
Additional Powers and Duties
In addition to the foregoing especially enumerated duties and powers, the several officers of the Corporation shall perform such other duties and exercise such further powers as may be provided in these By-Laws or as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine, or as may be assigned to them by any superior officer.
SECTION 8. 
.
Disaster Emergency Powers of Acting Officers
If, as a result of a disaster or other state of emergency, the Chief Executive Officer is unable to perform the duties of that office, (a) the powers and duties of the Chief Executive Officer shall be performed by the employee with the highest base salary who shall be available and capable of performing such powers and duties and, if more than one such employee has the same base salary, by the employee whose surname begins with the earliest letter of the alphabet among the group of those employees with the same base salary; and (b) the officer performing such duties shall continue to perform such powers and duties until the Chief Executive Officer becomes capable of performing those duties or until the Board of Directors shall have elected a new Chief Executive Officer or designated another individual as Acting Chief Executive Officer; and (c) such officer shall have the power in addition to all other powers granted to the Chief Executive Officer by these By-Laws and by the Board of Directors to appoint an acting President, acting Vice PresidentFinance, acting Controller, acting Secretary, and acting Treasurer, if any of the persons duly elected to any such office is not by reason of such disaster or emergency able to perform the duties of such office, each of such acting appointees to serve in such capacities until the officer for whom the appointee is acting becomes capable of performing the duties of such office or until the Board of Directors shall have designated another individual to perform such duties or have elected another person to fill such office; and (d) any such acting officer so appointed shall be entitled to exercise all powers vested by the By-Laws or the Board of Directors in the duly elected officer for whom the acting officer is acting; and (e) anyone transacting business with this Corporation may rely upon a certification by any two officers of the Corporation that a specified individual has succeeded to the powers of the Chief Executive Officer and that such person has appointed other acting officers as herein provided and any person, firm, corporation, or other entity to which such certification has been delivered by such officers may continue to rely upon it until notified of a change in writing signed by two officers of this Corporation.
 
SECTION 1. 
.
Stock Certificates
Every stockholder shall be entitled to a certificate, signed by the Chairman of the Board or the President or a Vice President and the Treasurer or an Assistant Treasurer or the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary, certifying the number of shares owned by the stockholder in the Corporation. Any and all of the signatures on a certificate may be a facsimile. If any officer, transfer agent, or registrar who has signed or whose facsimile signature has been placed upon a certificate shall have ceased to be such officer, transfer agent, or registrar before such certificate is issued, it may be issued by the Corporation with the same effect as if he or she were such officer, transfer agent, or registrar at the date of issue.
SECTION 2. 
.
Transfer Agents and Registrars
The Board of Directors may, in its discretion, appoint responsible banks or trust companies in the Borough of Manhattan, in the City of New York, State of New York, and in such other city or cities as the Board may deem advisable, from time to time, to act as transfer agents and registrars of the stock of the Corporation; and, when such appointments shall have been made, no stock certificate shall be valid until countersigned by one of such transfer agents and registered by one of such registrars.
SECTION 3. 
.
Transfers of Stock
Shares of stock may be transferred by delivery of the certificates therefor, accompanied either by an assignment in writing on the back of the certificates or by written power of attorney to sell, assign, and transfer the same, signed by the record holder thereof; but no transfer shall affect the right of the Corporation to pay any dividend upon the stock to the holder of record thereof, or to treat the holder of record as the holder in fact thereof for all purposes, and no transfer shall be valid, except between the parties thereto, until such transfer shall have been made upon the books of the Corporation.
SECTION 4. 
.
Lost Certificates
The Board of Directors may provide for the issuance of new certificates of stock to replace certificates of stock lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, or alleged to be lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, upon such terms and in accordance with such procedures as the Board of Directors shall deem proper and prescribe.
SECTION 1. 
.
Fiscal Year
The fiscal year of the Corporation shall be the calendar year.
SECTION 2. (Repealed in its entirety by vote of the stockholders, May 5, 1975.)
SECTION 3. 
.
Signing of Negotiable Instruments
All bills, notes, checks, or other instruments for the payment of money shall be signed or countersigned by such officer or officers and in such manner as from time to time may be prescribed by resolution (whether general or special) of the Board of Directors.
 
SECTION 4. 
.
Indemnification of Directors and Officers
4.1.  Each person who was or is made a party or is threatened to be made a party to or is otherwise involved (including, without limitation, as a witness) in any actual or threatened action, suit, or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative, or investigative (hereinafter a "proceeding"), by reason of the fact that he or she is or was a director or officer of the Corporation or that, being or having been such a director or officer or an employee of the Corporation, he or she is or was serving at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation as a director, officer, employee, or agent of another corporation or of a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise, including service with respect to an employee benefit plan (hereinafter an "indemnitee"), whether the basis of such proceeding is alleged action in an official capacity as such a director, officer, employee, or agent or in any other capacity while serving as such a director, officer, employee, or agent, shall be indemnified and held harmless by the Corporation to the full extent permitted by the Delaware General Corporation Law, as the same exists or may hereafter be amended (but, in the case of any such amendment, only to the extent that such amendment permits the Corporation to provide broader indemnification rights than permitted prior thereto), or by other applicable law as then in effect, against all expense, liability, and loss (including attorneys' fees, judgments, fines, ERISA excise taxes or penalties, and amounts paid in settlement) actually and reasonably incurred or suffered by such indemnitee in connection therewith and such indemnification shall continue as to an indemnitee who has ceased to be a director, officer, employee, or agent and shall inure to the benefit of the indemnitee's heirs, executors, and administrators; provided, however, that except as provided in Section 4.2 with respect to proceedings seeking to enforce rights to indemnification, the Corporation shall indemnify any such indemnitee in connection with a proceeding (or part thereof) initiated by such indemnitee only if such proceeding (or part thereof) was authorized or ratified by the Board of Directors of the Corporation. The right to indemnification conferred in this Section 4.1 shall be a contract right and shall include the right to be paid by the Corporation the expenses incurred in defending any such proceeding in advance of its final disposition (hereinafter an "advancement of expenses"); provided, however, that an advancement of expenses incurred by an indemnitee in his or her capacity as a director or officer (and not in any other capacity in which service was or is rendered by such indemnitee, including, without limitation, service to an employee benefit plan) shall be made only upon delivery to the Corporation of an under-taking (hereinafter an "undertaking"), by or on behalf of such indemnitee, to repay all amounts so advanced if it shall ultimately be determined by final judicial decision from which there is no further right to appeal that such indemnitee is not entitled to be indemnified for such expenses under this Section 4.1 or otherwise; and provided, further, that an advancement of expenses shall not be made if the Corporation's Board of Directors makes a good faith determination that such payment would violate law or public policy.
.
Right to Indemnification
4.2  If a claim under Section 4.1 is not paid in full by the Corporation within sixty days after a written claim has been received by the Corporation, except in the case of a claim for an advancement of expenses, in which case the applicable period shall be twenty days, the indemnitee may at any time thereafter bring suit against the Corporation to recover the unpaid amount of the claim. If successful in whole or in part in any such suit, or in a suit brought by the Corporation to recover an advancement of expenses pursuant to the terms of an undertaking, the indemnitee shall also be entitled to be paid the expense of prosecuting or defending such suit. The indemnitee shall be presumed to be entitled to indemnification under this Section 4 upon submission of a written claim (and, in an action brought to enforce a claim for an advancement of expenses, where the required undertaking has been tendered to the Corporation), and thereafter the Corporation shall have the burden of proof to overcome the presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled. Neither the failure of the Corporation (including its Board of Directors, independent legal counsel, or its stockholders) to have made a determination prior to the commencement of such suit that indemnification of the indemnitee is proper in the circumstances, nor an actual determination by the Corporation (including its Board of Directors, independent legal counsel, or its stockholders) that the indemnitee is not entitled to indemnification shall be a defense to the suit or create a presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled.
.
Right of Indemnitee to Bring Suit
4.3  The rights to indemnification and to the advancement of expenses conferred in this Section 4 shall not be exclusive of any other right which any person may have or hereafter acquire under any statute, provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation, By-Laws, agreement, vote of stockholders or disinterested directors, or otherwise. Notwithstanding any amendment to or repeal of this Section 4, or of any of the procedures established by the Board of Directors pursuant to Section 4.7, any indemnitee shall be entitled to indemnification in accordance with the provisions hereof and thereof with respect to any acts or omissions of such indemnitee occurring prior to such amendment or repeal.
.
Nonexclusivity of Rights
 
4.4  The Corporation may maintain insurance, at its expense, to protect itself and any director, officer, employee, or agent of the Corporation or another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise against any expense, liability, or loss, whether or not the Corporation would have the power to indemnify such person against such expense, liability, or loss under the Delaware General Corporation Law. The Corporation may, without further stockholder approval, enter into contracts with any indemnitee in furtherance of the provisions of this Section 4 and may create a trust fund, grant a security interest, or use other means (including, without limitation, a letter of credit) to ensure the payment of such amounts as may be necessary to effect indemnification as provided in this Section 4.
.
Insurance, Contracts, and Funding
4.5  Any person who is or was a director, officer, or employee of the Corporation who is or was serving (i) as a director or officer of another corporation of which a majority of the shares entitled to vote in the election of its directors is held by the Corporation or (ii) in an executive or management capacity in a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise of which the Corporation or a wholly owned subsidiary of the Corporation is a general partner or has a majority ownership shall be deemed to be so serving at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation and entitled to indemnification and advancement of expenses under Section 4.1.
.
Persons Serving Other Entities
4.6  The Corporation may, by action of its Board of Directors, authorize one or more executive officers to grant rights to advancement of expenses to employees or agents of the Corporation on such terms and conditions as such officer or officers deem appropriate under the circumstances. The Corporation may, by action of its Board of Directors, grant rights to indemnification and advancement of expenses to employees or agents or groups of employees or agents of the Corporation with the same scope and effect as the provisions of this Section 4 with respect to the indemnification and advancement of expenses of directors and officers of the Corporation; provided, however, that an undertaking shall be made by an employee or agent only if required by the Board of Directors.
.
Indemnification of Employees and Agents of the Corporation
4.7  The Board of Directors may establish reasonable procedures for the submission of claims for indemnification pursuant to this Section 4, determination of the entitlement of any person thereto, and review of any such determination. Such procedures shall be set forth in an appendix to these By-Laws and shall be deemed for all purposes to be a part hereof.
.
Procedures for the Submission of Claims
SECTION 1. 
.
Amendment of the By-Laws: General
Except as herein otherwise expressly provided, the By-Laws of the Corporation may be altered or repealed in any particular and new By-Laws, not inconsistent with any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or any provision of law, may be adopted, either by the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority in number of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote at an annual meeting of stockholders or at a special meeting thereof, the notice of which special meeting shall include the form of the proposed alteration or repeal or of the proposed new By-Laws, or a summary thereof; or either
 
 
provided, in either of the latter cases, that the notice of such meeting shall include the form of the proposed alteration or repeal or of the proposed new By-Laws, or a summary thereof.
SECTION 2. 
.
Amendments as to Compensation and Removal of Officers
Notwithstanding anything contained in these By-Laws to the contrary, the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the Voting Stock, as defined in Article FOURTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, at a meeting of the stockholders called for the purpose, shall be required to alter, amend, repeal, or adopt any provision inconsistent with Sections 3, 4 and 5 of Article IV hereof, notice of which meeting shall include the form of the proposed amendment, or a summary thereof.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20060726091958.txt.gz
TIME:20060726091958
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
 
On July 26, 2006, The Boeing Company issued a press release announcing its financial results for the second quarter of 2006.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
(a) Not applicable
 
(b) Not applicable
 
(c) Not applicable
 
(d) Exhibits
 
99.1    Press Release of The Boeing Company dated July 26, 2006, reporting Boeing's financial results for the second quarter of 2006.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Boeing Reports Second-Quarter Results including Previously-Disclosed Charges; Raises 2007 Guidance on Strong Commercial Airplanes Performance
 
 
 
 
 
Table 1. Summary Financial Results
 
 The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] today reported a second-quarter net loss of $160 million, or $0.21 per share, which includes $1.15 per share of previously-disclosed charges for a legal settlement and an international airborne surveillance program. The company also increased its 2007 earnings per share and revenue guidance to reflect the continuing strength of its commercial airplanes business.
CHICAGO, July 26, 2006
Revenue for the second quarter rose 2 percent to $15.0 billion. In the year-ago quarter Boeing posted net earnings of $566 million, or $0.70 per share, on revenues of $14.7 billion. The year-ago revenue total included a $0.4 billion benefit from a customer's buyout of several operating leases.
The charges disclosed on June 29 included $615 million for the global settlement with the U.S. Department of Justice, which yielded a net charge of $571 million after
 
reserves, or $0.75 per share. Boeing will not claim a tax deduction for this payment. The company also disclosed it would record a charge for a reach-forward loss provision on an international Airborne Early Warning & Control (AEW&C) program; the charge recognized in the quarter was $496 million or $0.40 per share.
Because of the charges, which were partially offset by improvements in the commercial airplanes business and by lower pension expense, Boeing reduced its 2006 earnings per share guidance (provided on a GAAP basis) to between $2.40 and $2.55. Based on the strength of the commercial airplane business and companywide productivity improvements, the company's 2007 earnings per share guidance was raised 15 cents per share to between $4.25 and $4.45 per share and its revenue guidance was increased $1 billion to between $64.5 billion and $65.5 billion. Additional details on financial guidance are provided below.
"Boeing's outlook is strengthening due to sustained demand for our commercial airplanes, our steady but modestly growing defense business, and our companywide focus on growth and productivity," said Boeing Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer Jim McNerney. "This quarter's charges overshadowed solid fundamentals that reflect our commitment to providing exceptional value for all our stakeholders."
Operating cash flow remains very strong, totaling $2.4 billion in the second quarter. Free cash flow* was $2.1 billion after an investment of $0.3 billion in property, plant & equipment during the quarter (Table 2). For the first six months of 2006, operating cash flow increased 10 percent to $4.5 billion. Free cash flow* increased to $3.8 billion, 14 percent higher than last year due to strong operating and working capital performance.
Table 2. Cash Flow
 
Boeing's backlog at quarter-end grew to a record $220 billion, up 3 percent from the end of the first quarter and 7 percent for the first six months of 2006. That growth primarily reflects strong demand for Boeing's commercial airplane products.
 
Boeing's cash and investments in marketable securities totaled $10.6 billion at the end of the second quarter, up from $9.8 billion at the end of the first quarter and $8.4 billion at year-end 2005 (Table 3). This cash position reflects strong operating cash flow partially offset by share repurchases and planned investment increases in Boeing's core businesses. The company repurchased 6.3 million shares for $525 million during the quarter and 11.8 million shares for $929 million during the first six months of the year, leaving 12.6 million shares available under the existing repurchase authorization. The company made no contributions to its pension plans during the quarter; contributions for the first half of 2006 totaled $500 million.
Total consolidated debt was reduced by over $500 million during the quarter as Boeing Capital repaid maturing debt with available cash. The Boeing Company debt increased slightly to $4.3 billion due to consolidation of an equity investment with $56 million of debt.
 
Segment Results
Commercial Airplanes
Boeing Commercial Airplanes (BCA) second-quarter revenues increased 10 percent to $7.1 billion. Airplane deliveries rose 14 percent to 97, as BCA has successfully increased production rates to support the 395 deliveries forecast for the full year (Table 4). Operating earnings grew 51 percent and margins expanded to 10.1 percent, reflecting higher deliveries and continued productivity improvements.
For the first half of the year, BCA revenues rose 26 percent to $14.2 billion on a 26 percent increase in deliveries. Operating earnings grew 65 percent to $1.4 billion and margins expanded to 10.0 percent.
 
Contractual backlog rose to a record $142 billion, as BCA booked 311 gross orders during the quarter and 487 for the first half of 2006 on strong customer demand.
The 787 Dreamliner program continues preparing for the start of flight testing next year and has begun manufacturing and major assembly. While on track to meet performance commitments and entry into service, the company is making additional investments in R&D primarily to reduce risk on achieving goals relating to weight and schedule. From program launch to date, 25 customers have booked 364 firm orders for the new airplane.
Table 4. Commercial Airplanes Operating Results
 
Integrated Defense Systems
Boeing Integrated Defense Systems (IDS) revenues were steady in the quarter at $7.8 billion (Table 5). Operating margins were 4.0 percent, a decrease from 10.5 percent primarily driven by the previously announced AEW&C program charge totaling $496 million. Without that charge, adjusted IDS operating margins* for the quarter would have been 10.4 percent.
For the first half of the year, IDS revenues were $15.0 billion and operating margins decreased to 7.5 percent from 10.8 percent in 2005 due to the AEW&C charge. Without the charge, adjusted IDS operating margins* would have been 10.8 percent.
In Precision Engagement & Mobility Systems, IDS remains focused on system development and deliveries. Revenues were $3.4 billion for the quarter as higher volume on the P-8A program was offset by timing of deliveries of C-17s and F-15s and lower milestone completions on AEW&C. The operating loss of $5 million was driven by the AEW&C charge for cost growth due to technical and flight test issues.
In Network & Space Systems, IDS achieved significant milestones on several key programs and executed six successful launches. Second quarter revenues declined to $2.9 billion due to lower volume in Proprietary programs and the sale of
 
Rocketdyne, which was partially offset by increased activity in Future Combat Systems. Operating margins of 3.7 percent were driven by charges of $74 million on the Delta IV program due to a settlement on EELV launch capability services and mission manifest changes.
Table 5. Integrated Defense Systems Operating Results
 
Support Systems generated very strong profitability on its broad portfolio of services and logistics programs. Revenues climbed 20 percent to $1.4 billion while operating earnings grew 15 percent to $205 million. Higher volume in Maintenance, Modification & Upgrade programs and Integrated Logistics programs increased revenues, while contract mix affected operating margins.
IDS's industry-leading backlog at quarter-end was $77.8 billion, down 3 percent from the end of the first quarter as IDS continued progress on large multi-year contracts. Contractual backlog at the end of the second quarter was $38.8 billion, and unobligated backlog was $39.0 billion.
Boeing Capital Corporation
Boeing Capital Corporation (BCC) continued to support the operations of Boeing's business units and reduce portfolio risk. Revenues for the second quarter declined 7 percent to $243 million, and pre-tax income declined to $62 million on lower portfolio size and favorable dispositions and restructurings that occurred in the same quarter of 2005 (Table 6).
BCC's portfolio balance at the end of the second quarter was $8.5 billion, down from $9.0 billion at the end of the first quarter as normal portfolio run-off, asset sales and depreciation more than offset new business volume. BCC contributed $182 million in cash dividends (including return of capital) to the company during the quarter and
 
$232 million for the first half of the year. BCC reduced its debt balance by $0.6 billion during the quarter and recorded leverage of 5.0-to-1, as measured by the ratio of debt-to-equity.
Table 6. Boeing Capital Corporation Operating Results
 
Additional Information
The "Other" segment consists primarily of Boeing Technology and Connexion by Boeing, as well as certain results related to the consolidation of all business units. For the second quarter, losses from operations improved to $90 million from $110 million last year.
Pre-tax (non-cash) pension expense for the quarter was $127 million, down $28 million or $0.02 per share from the same period of 2005. Share-based-plans expense was $250 million, unchanged from the same period of 2005. Deferred stock compensation expense was $38 million, or $0.03 per share, as Boeing's stock price rose during the period.
As previously disclosed, the company is evaluating strategic alternatives related to Connexion by Boeing.
 
Outlook
The company's financial guidance for 2006 has been adjusted to reflect the previously-announced charges, partially offset by improvements in BCA's outlook and lower pension expense. The company is forecasting continued growth during the remainder of 2006 and 2007 that reflects strong performance from its core businesses, higher commercial airplane deliveries, and companywide productivity gains (Table 7).
Boeing's 2006 revenue guidance has been increased to between $60 billion and $60.5 billion. Revenue guidance for 2007 is raised $1 billion to between $64.5 billion and $65.5 billion due to higher BCA revenue from improved airplane mix and features. Earnings per share guidance (given on a GAAP basis) for 2006 is reduced to between $2.40 and $2.55 due to the charges and partially offsetting improvements in BCA outlook and pension expense. Boeing is raising its 2007 EPS guidance 15 cents per share to between $4.25 and $4.45 per share driven by higher BCA revenues and earnings.
The $615 million settlement amount paid to the US Government will reduce operating cash flow in 2006. However, Boeing is maintaining its operating cash flow guidance for 2006 as well as 2007 at greater than $5.5 billion each year.
Commercial Airplanes' revenue guidance for 2006 is being raised to approximately $28.0 billion, with operating margins greater than 9 percent, while revenue for 2007 is now expected to be between $30.5 billion to $31.5 billion, with operating margins improving to greater than 10 percent. The 2006 commercial airplane delivery forecast remains at approximately 395 airplanes, 36 percent higher than in 2005, while deliveries in 2007 are expected to be between 440 and 445 airplanes. The 2006 forecast is sold out and the 2007 forecast is now more than 99% sold out.
IDS revenue guidance is being reaffirmed at approximately $31.5 billion, with operating margins reduced to approximately 9 percent for 2006 due to the AEW&C charge. For 2007, IDS expects 2 to 5 percent revenue growth and operating margins above 10.5 percent.
Precision Engagement & Mobility Systems expects revenues of approximately $14 billion and operating margins of approximately 10 percent in 2006 due to the AEW&C charge, with a moderate growth outlook for 2007 and operating margins increasing to the low double-digits. Network & Space Systems expects revenues of
 
approximately $11.5 billion and margins of approximately 5.5 percent, with a moderate growth outlook for 2007 and operating margins in the high single digits. Support Systems expects revenue to be approximately $6 billion in 2006 with operating margins of about 14 percent, followed by moderate revenue growth in 2007 and operating margins continuing in the low double-digit range.
The current guidance doesn't reflect the impact of the pending Aviall acquisition or the United Launch Alliance (ULA) transaction. Network & Space Systems revenue guidance for 2006 includes approximately $1 billion for business planned to be part of ULA. Upon completion of the ULA transaction, Boeing will use the equity method of accounting for the joint venture, recognizing Boeing's proportionate share of the venture's earnings in the Network & Space Systems segment.
The company previously disclosed that it is evaluating strategic alternatives for Connexion by Boeing. It is possible that a decision could trigger a charge to earnings this year of up to $350 million. Were this to happen, the company would expect to realize lower annual operating expenses and higher earnings beginning in 2007 without its continued investment in this business.
Boeing's research and development outlays are now forecast to be approximately $3 billion in 2006 and in 2007, reflecting higher investment in planned product development programs such as the 787, 747-8 and international tanker. Annual capital expenditures should be approximately $1.6 billion in 2006 and $1.5 billion in 2007.
The company's non-cash pension expense is now expected to be approximately $800 million for 2006 and about $1 billion for 2007. Pension cash funding is expected to be approximately $500 million in each of those years, and the planned funding for 2006 was completed in the first quarter. The company will continue to evaluate making additional discretionary contributions to its pension plans.
 
Table 7. Financial Outlook
(Billions, except per share data)
 
Non-GAAP Measure Disclosure
Management believes that the non-GAAP (Generally Accepted Accounting Principles) measures (indicated by an asterisk *) used in this report provide investors with important perspectives into the company's ongoing business performance. The company does not intend for the information to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the related GAAP measure. Other companies may define the measure differently. The following definitions are provided for free cash flow and adjusted IDS operating margins.
Free Cash Flow
Free cash flow is defined as GAAP less capital expenditures for . Management believes free cash flow provides investors with an important perspective on the cash available for shareholders, debt repayment, and acquisitions after making the capital investments required to support ongoing business operations and long term value creation. Free cash flow does not represent the residual cash flow available for discretionary expenditures as it excludes certain mandatory expenditures such as repayment of maturing debt. Management uses free cash flow internally to assess both business performance and overall liquidity. Table 2 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and free cash flow.
operating cash flow
property, plant and equipment, additions
Adjusted IDS Operating Margins
Adjusted IDS Operating Margins is defined as computed in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles excluding the charge for AEW&C performance. Management believes adjusted IDS operating margins are important to understanding the company's on-going operations and provide additional insights into underlying business performance. Management derived the adjusted IDS operating margins by dividing GAAP IDS revenues into GAAP IDS operating margin adjusted for the $496 million charge. The calculation is (309 + 496)  7,774 = 10.4% for the quarter, and (1,126 + 496)  14,960 = 10.8% for the first half of the year.
IDS operating margins
 
Certain statements in this report may constitute "forward-looking" statements within the meaning of the Private Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Forward-looking statements in this press release include, among others, statements regarding future results as a result of the company's growth and productivity initiatives, its 2006 and 2007 financial outlook and the benefits of the new IDS structure. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions as to future events that may not prove to be accurate. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak only as of the date they were made and the company undertakes no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise. The company's actual results and future trends may differ materially depending on a variety of factors, including the continued operation, viability and growth of major airline customers and non-airline customers (such as the U.S. Government); adverse developments in the value of collateral securing customer and other financings; the occurrence of any significant collective bargaining labor dispute; its successful execution of internal performance plans including its company-wide growth and productivity initiatives, production rate increases and decreases (including any reduction in or termination of an aircraft product), availability of raw materials, acquisition and divestiture plans, and other cost-reduction and productivity efforts; charges from any future SFAS No. 142 review; ability to meet development, production and certification schedules for the 787 program; technical or quality issues in development programs or in the commercial satellite industry; an adverse development in rating agency credit ratings or assessments; the actual outcomes of certain pending sales campaigns and the launch of the 787 program and U.S. and foreign government procurement activities, including the uncertainty associated with the procurement of tankers by the U.S. Department of Defense (DoD) and funding of the C-17 program; the cyclical nature of some of its businesses; unanticipated financial market changes which may impact pension plan assumptions; domestic and international competition in the defense, space and commercial areas; continued integration of acquired businesses; performance issues with key suppliers, subcontractors and customers; significant disruption to air travel worldwide (including future terrorist attacks); global trade policies; worldwide political stability; domestic and international economic conditions; price escalation; the outcome of political and legal processes, changing priorities or reductions in the U.S. Government or foreign government defense and space budgets; termination of government or commercial contracts due to unilateral government or customer action or failure to perform; legal, financial and governmental risks related to international transactions; legal and investigatory proceedings; tax settlements with the IRS and various states; U.S. Air Force review of previously awarded contracts; and other economic, political and technological risks and uncertainties. Additional information regarding these factors is contained in the company's SEC filings, including, without limitation, its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2005 and its Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2006.
Cxxxx
Contact:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20060822161523.txt.gz
TIME:20060822161523
EVENTS:	Cost Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Cost Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.05 Costs Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities
On August 17, 2006, The Boeing Company (the "Company") announced it would exit the Connexion by Boeing high speed broadband communications business having completed a detailed business and market analysis. The Company's decision is expected to result in a pre-tax charge of up to $320 million of which approximately $290 million is expected to be recognized in third quarter 2006 and approximately $30 million is expected to be recognized in the fourth quarter 2006. The Company's second quarter 10-Q had disclosed that the charge was expected to be up to $350 million.
The estimated charge of $320 million includes the following:
 
 
 
 
The exit of the Connexion by Boeing business is expected to result in cash expenditures of approximately $235 million.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
(a) Not applicable
(b) Not applicable
(c) Not applicable
(d) Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
Boeing to Discontinue Connexion by Boeing Service
 
 
 The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] today announced that a detailed business and market analysis of Connexion by Boeing is complete, and the company has decided to exit the high-speed broadband communications connectivity markets. Boeing will work with its customers to facilitate an orderly phase out of the Connexion by Boeing service.
CHICAGO, Aug. 17, 2006
"Over the last six years, we have invested substantial time, resources and technology in Connexion by Boeing," said Boeing Chairman, President and CEO Jim McNerney. "Regrettably, the market for this service has not materialized as had been expected. We believe this decision best balances the long-term interests of all parties with a stake in Connexion by Boeing."
As initially disclosed in the company's second-quarter 2006 financial results on July 26, Boeing now expects to recognize a pre-tax charge of up to $320 million, or $0.26 per share, in the second half of 2006, of which approximately $290 million will be taken in the third quarter and the balance in the fourth quarter. The company also expects a benefit to earnings of approximately $0.15 per share starting in 2007 without further investment in Connexion. The company will update its financial guidance when it releases third quarter results on October 25.
The charge relates to writing down certain assets, payments of early termination fees and other costs related to shutting down the service. Boeing expects the majority of Connexion employees will find other jobs within the company.
Boeing acknowledged it was reviewing the Connexion business on June 26. This effort included an assessment of the market and discussions with existing customers and potential new business partners.
Forward-Looking Information Is Subject to Risk and Uncertainty
Certain statements in this report may constitute "forward-looking" statements within the meaning of the Private Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Forward-looking statements in this press release include, among others, statements regarding the expected pre-tax charge and cost savings associated with the phase out of
the Connexion by Boeing service. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions as to future events that may not prove to be accurate. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak only as of the date they were made and the company undertakes no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise. The company's actual results and future trends may differ materially depending on a variety of factors, including the continued operation, viability and growth of major airline customers and non-airline customers (such as the U.S. Government); adverse developments in the value of collateral securing customer and other financings; the occurrence of any significant collective bargaining labor dispute; its successful execution of internal performance plans including its company-wide growth and productivity initiatives, production rate increases and decreases (including any reduction in or termination of an aircraft product), availability of raw materials, acquisition and divestiture plans, and other cost-reduction and productivity efforts; charges from any future SFAS No. 142 review; ability to meet development, production and certification schedules for the 787 program; technical or quality issues in development programs or in the commercial satellite industry; an adverse development in rating agency credit ratings or assessments; the actual outcomes of certain pending sales campaigns and the launch of the 787 program and U.S. and foreign government procurement activities, including the uncertainty associated with the procurement of tankers by the U.S. Department of Defense (DoD) and funding of the C-17 program; the cyclical nature of some of its businesses; unanticipated financial market changes which may impact pension plan assumptions; domestic and international competition in the defense, space and commercial areas; continued integration of acquired businesses; performance issues with key suppliers, subcontractors and customers; significant disruption to air travel worldwide (including future terrorist attacks); global trade policies; worldwide political stability; domestic and international economic conditions; price escalation; the outcome of political and legal processes, changing priorities or reductions in the U.S. Government or foreign government defense and space budgets; termination of government or commercial contracts due to unilateral government or customer action or failure to perform; legal, financial and governmental risks related to international transactions; legal and investigatory proceedings; tax settlements with the IRS and various states; U.S. Air Force review of previously awarded contracts; and other economic, political and technological risks and uncertainties. Additional information regarding these factors is contained in the company's SEC filings, including, without limitation, its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2005 and its Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2006 and for the quarter ended June 30, 2006.
###
Contact Info:
John Dern
Communications
(312) 544-2002


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20060925140505.txt.gz
TIME:20060925140505
EVENTS:	Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
       Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
       Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
       Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
       Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
Item 2.01               Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets
On September 20, 2006, The Boeing Company, a Delaware corporation ("Boeing") completed its acquisition of Aviall Inc., a Delaware corporation ("Aviall") pursuant to an agreement and plan of merger, dated as of April 30, 2006 among Boeing, Boeing Avenger, Inc., a Delaware corporation and a direct wholly owned subsidiary of Boeing, and Aviall.  Boeing purchased Aviall for $48 per share or $1.7 billion, plus the assumption of debt, net of cash existing on Aviall's balance sheet, of $448 million.  Aviall will report to Boeing Commercial Aviation Services and operate as a wholly owned subsidiary.
A press release announcing the completion of the purchase of Aviall is attached hereto and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01               Financial Statements and Exhibits
.
(d)           Exhibits
 
2
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
3
 
4

Exhibit 99.1
Boeing Concludes Purchase of Aviall, Inc.
Boeing acquires Aviall, Inc. for $48 per share or $1.7 billion, plus the assumption of debt, net
   
of cash existing on Aviall's balance sheet, of $448 million.
   
Aviall is the largest independent provider of new aviation parts and related aftermarket
services in the aerospace industry.
company for faster growth in a $25 billion industry of new aviation parts and services.
   
Aviall expands Boeing; leadership in Integrated Materials Management and positions the
SEATTLE, Sept. 20, 2006 
The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] has concluded its purchase of
Aviall, Inc., the largest independent provider of new aviation parts and related aftermarket services
in the aerospace industry. Aviall supports Boeing's strategy of providing a wide array of value-
added products and services that help our commercial and military customers operate more efficiently.
Boeing has purchased Aviall Inc. for $48 per share or $1.7 billion, plus the assumption of debt, net of cash existing on Aviall's balance sheet, of $448 million. Aviall's capabilities include global parts
distribution and supply chain services for aerospace, defense and marine industries worldwide.
"We are excited to welcome the Aviall team to Boeing," said Lou Mancini, vice president and general manager of Boeing Commercial Aviation Services. "We will add Aviall's great products
and people to our expanding Integrated Materials Management program that is so important to our
customers."
"We are delighted to become part of The Boeing Company," said Paul Fulchino, chairman,
president and chief executive officer of Aviall. "Our combined industry knowledge creates a
dynamic team that will continue to enable our customers to achieve greater efficiency, operational savings and profitability."
Aviall will report to Boeing Commercial Aviation Services and operate as a wholly-owned
subsidiary. Commercial Aviation Services offers Integrated Materials Management services to
airline customers. Through this program, Boeing and selected suppliers maintain an airline's
inventory of maintenance supplies  including spare parts  and provide items only as needed,
reducing the airline's cost and complexity of doing business. Aviall's parts ordering and supply
chain management capabilities will also be utilized by Boeing's Integrated Defense Systems'
Support Systems business.
"This is an exciting time for Boeing with the addition of Aviall's capabilities," said Pat Finneran, president of Support Systems. "Their strengths and abilities are well aligned with our current
business strategies and I look forward to leveraging our combined strengths to improve our supply chain services for our customers."
With approximately 1,000 employees, Aviall is headquartered in Dallas with customer service
1
centers located in North America, Europe and Asia. As the world's largest independent provider of
new aviation parts and related aftermarket services, Aviall markets and distributes products for
approximately 220 manufacturers and offers approximately 700,000 catalog items. Aviall also
offers a full line of aviation batteries, hoses, wheels and brakes, and paint services. For more
information on Aviall, see its World Wide Web site at www.aviall.com.
Additional Information and Where to Find It
This press release may be deemed to be solicitation material in respect of the proposed merger of Aviall and Boeing. In connection with the proposed merger, Aviall plans to file a proxy statement with the SEC. INVESTORS AND other filings with the SEC may also be obtained from Aviall. Free copies of Aviall's filings may be obtained by
SECURITY HOLDERS OF AVIALL ARE ADVISED TO READ THE PROXY STATEMENT AND ANY
OTHER RELEVANT DOCUMENTS FILED WITH THE SEC WHEN THEY BECOME AVAILABLE BECAUSE
THOSE DOCUMENTS WILL CONTAIN IMPORTANT INFORMATION ABOUT THE PROPOSED MERGER.
The final proxy statement will be mailed to stockholders of Aviall. Investors and security holders may obtain a free copy of the proxy statement, when it becomes available, and other documents filed by Aviall with the SEC, at the SEC's web site at http://www.sec.gov. Free copies of the proxy statement, when it becomes available, and Aviall's
directing a request to Aviall, Inc., 2750 Regent Boulevard, DFW Airport, Texas, 75261, Attention: Secretary.
employees may be deemed to be soliciting proxies from Aviall's stockholders in favor of the proposed merger. directors and executive officers is available in Boeing's proxy statement for its 2006 annual meeting of stockholders, become available.
Aviall, Boeing and their respective directors, executive officers and other members of their management and
Information regarding Aviall's directors and executive officers is available in Aviall's proxy statement for its 2006 annual meeting of stockholders, which was filed with the SEC on April 27, 2006. Information regarding Boeing's
which was filed with the SEC on March 24, 2006. Additional information regarding the interests of such potential participants will be included in the proxy statement and the other relevant documents filed with the SEC when they
Forward-Looking Information Is Subject to Risk and Uncertainty
Certain statements in this report may constitute "forward-looking" statements within the meaning of the Private
Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," and
similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions as to future events that may not prove to be accurate. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak only as of the date they were made and the company undertakes no obligation to publicly
update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise. The company's actual results and future trends may differ materially depending on a variety of factors, including the
continued operation, viability and growth of major airline customers and non-airline customers (such as the U.S. Government); adverse developments in the value of collateral securing customer and other financings; the occurrence of any significant collective bargaining labor dispute; its successful execution of internal performance plans including its company-wide growth and productivity initiatives, production rate increases and decreases (including any reduction in or termination of an aircraft product), availability of raw materials, acquisition and divestiture plans, and other cost-reduction and productivity efforts; charges from any future SFAS No. 142 review;
ability to meet development, production and certification schedules for the 787 program; technical or quality issues
in development programs or in the commercial satellite industry; an adverse development in rating agency credit ratings or assessments; the actual outcomes of certain pending sales campaigns and the launch of the 787 program
and U.S. and foreign government procurement activities, including the uncertainty associated with the procurement
of tankers by the U.S. Department of Defense (DoD) and funding of the C-17 program; the cyclical nature of some
2
of its
businesses; unanticipated financial market changes which may impact pension plan assumptions; domestic and
international competition in the defense, space and commercial areas; continued integration of acquired businesses; performance issues with key suppliers, subcontractors and customers; significant disruption to air travel worldwide (including future terrorist attacks); global trade policies; worldwide political stability; domestic and international
economic conditions; price escalation; the outcome of political and legal processes, changing priorities or reductions in the U.S. Government or foreign government defense and space budgets; termination of government or commercial
contracts due to unilateral government or customer action or failure to perform; legal, financial and governmental risks related
to international transactions; legal and investigatory proceedings; tax settlements with the IRS and various states; U.S. Air Force review of previously awarded contracts; and other economic, political and technological risks and
uncertainties. Additional information regarding these factors is contained in the company's SEC filings, including,
without limitation, its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2005 and its Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2006 and for the quarter ended June 30, 2006.
CONTACT INFO:
 
3


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20061025084247.txt.gz
TIME:20061025084247
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
 
On October 25, 2006, The Boeing Company issued a press release announcing its financial results for the second quarter of 2006.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
(a) Not applicable
 
(b) Not applicable
 
(c) Not applicable
 
(d) Exhibits
 
99.1    Press Release of The Boeing Company dated October 25, 2006, reporting Boeing's financial results for the third quarter of 2006.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
Boeing Reports Third-Quarter Results and Raises 2007 Guidance
 
 
 
 
 
Table 1. Summary Financial Results
 
 The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] today reported third quarter net earnings of $694 million, or $0.89 per share, compared with $1,011 million, or $1.26 per share, a year ago (Table 1).
CHICAGO, Oct. 25, 2006
Special items that affected core operating results include the previously disclosed $0.22 per share charge this quarter to exit the Connexion business, and benefits totaling $0.93 per share a year ago for tax settlements and asset sales. Adjusting for these items, third-quarter adjusted earnings per share* was $1.11 compared to $0.33 for the same period last year. The year-ago figure was not adjusted for the impact of a labor strike, which reduced earnings in that period by an estimated $0.25 to $0.30 per share.
 
Revenue for the quarter rose 19 percent to $14.7 billion from $12.4 billion in the same period last year.
Boeing updated its earnings per share guidance for 2006 to between $2.40 and $2.50 per share, which reflects the termination charges for Connexion offset by better performance across Boeing's businesses. Boeing increased its 2007 EPS guidance by $0.20 per share to between $4.45 and $4.65, reflecting the discontinuance of its Connexion investment, contributions from the Aviall acquisition and additional performance improvements. Revenue guidance for 2007 is increased to between $65.5 billion and $66.0 billion driven by additional services revenue from Aviall.
"Our strong performance during the third quarter and our growth outlook for 2007 underscore what Boeing can accomplish by an unwavering focus on execution and meeting our commitments," said Boeing Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer Jim McNerney. "As we continue to drive our growth and productivity efforts, we aim to achieve a new level of consistently strong financial performance."
Third-quarter operating cash flow was $0.6 billion driven by strong business performance, partially offset by a $615 million payment for the previously announced settlement with the U.S. Department of Justice (Table 2). For the first nine months of 2006, operating cash flow was $5.1 billion, and free cash flow* was $4.0 billion driven by strong operating and working capital performance.
Table 2. Cash Flow
 
Boeing's backlog at quarter-end grew to a record $229 billion, up 4 percent from the end of the second quarter and 12 percent for the first nine months of 2006, reflecting strong orders for Boeing's commercial airplane products.
Cash and investments in marketable securities totaled $8.2 billion at the end of the third quarter, down from $10.6 billion at the end of the second quarter (Table 3). Principal uses of cash during the quarter included the purchase of Aviall Inc. for $2.2 billion (including debt), the previously mentioned legal settlement, share repurchases and planned investment increases in Boeing's core businesses. In August, Boeing's board of directors authorized a new share repurchase program for up to $3 billion of
 
common stock. The company repurchased 8.0 million shares for $627 million during the quarter and 19.8 million shares for $1.6 billion during the first nine months of the year. This leaves $2.8 billion available under the current repurchase authorization. The company contributed $513 million to its pension plans during the first nine months of the year. Total consolidated debt decreased during the quarter to $10.1 billion due to the cancellation of capital leases associated with Connexion.
Table 3. Cash, Marketable Securities and Debt Balances
 
Segment Results
Commercial Airplanes
Boeing Commercial Airplanes (BCA) third-quarter revenues increased 45 percent to $6.7 billion. Airplane deliveries were up 61 percent while modification services and spares volumes also increased during the period. (Table 4). BCA delivered 100 airplanes as it successfully increased production rates, supporting our guidance of approximately 395 deliveries for the year. In the same quarter last year, BCA delivered 62 airplanes, 21 fewer than planned due to a strike.
BCA operating earnings increased to $646 million. Margins expanded to 9.7 percent due to higher operating leverage and productivity improvements, partially offset by planned increases in R&D spending and lower supplier development cost-sharing payments.
For the first nine months, BCA revenues rose 32 percent to $20.9 billion on a 36 percent increase in deliveries. Operating earnings grew 88 percent to $2.1 billion as margins expanded to 9.9 percent.
 
Table 4. Commercial Airplanes Operating Results
 
Contractual backlog rose to a record $154 billion, or more than five times current annual BCA revenues. BCA booked 243 gross orders during the quarter and 730 for the first nine months of 2006.
The 787 Dreamliner program has won 432 firm orders from 34 customers to date. We achieved important development milestones during the quarter as we prepare for flight testing next year and entry into service during 2008. The 787 program continues to experience pressures with respect to weight and supplier implementation. The company is raising its R&D forecast to reflect these increasing pressures, as well as modified and increased scope on the 747-8 program as we act on customer feedback to optimize this airplane. Boeing continues to expect that these programs will be delivered on time and in accord with our contractual obligations.
Integrated Defense Systems
Boeing Integrated Defense Systems (IDS) revenues increased 4 percent during the quarter to $7.8 billion on higher Precision Engagement & Mobility Systems and Support Systems volume (Table 5). Operating margins were 11.3 percent, compared to 17.6 percent in the same quarter last year when IDS benefited from a $569 million gain from selling Rocketdyne. Without that gain, adjusted IDS operating margins* for the year-ago quarter would have been 9.9 percent.
For the first nine months of 2006, IDS revenues were $22.8 billion. Operating margins were 8.8 percent and were reduced by 2.2 points due to the $496 million charge taken in the second quarter for an international airborne early warning and control (AEW&C) program. IDS margins for the same period last year were 13.0 percent, and adjusted IDS operating margins* were 10.4 percent after excluding the gains from divestitures.
 
Table 5. Integrated Defense Systems Operating Results
 
Precision Engagement & Mobility Systems performance remained strong as revenues grew 15 percent to $3.5 billion for the quarter driven by higher volume and deliveries on the F-15, C-17, F-22 and P-8A Poseidon programs. Operating earnings grew 16 percent to $472 million driven by operating leverage, favorable contract mix and lower R&D expense.
Network & Space Systems achieved significant milestones on several key programs. Third-quarter revenues declined to $2.9 billion due to lower volume in the Ground-based Midcourse Defense program and fewer planned milestone completions in the commercial satellite business. Earnings from operations were $228 million, compared to $712 million last year which included a $569 million gain from Rocketdyne.
Support Systems again generated strong profitability on its broad portfolio of services and logistics programs. Revenues increased 4 percent to $1.5 billion while operating earnings were $179 million driven by higher volume in integrated logistics programs and maintenance, modification & upgrade programs. Operating margins were 12.2 percent, below the same quarter last year due to contract mix.
IDS's backlog at quarter-end was $74.2 billion, down 5 percent from the end of the second quarter and 8 percent for the nine months as progress continued on large multi-year contracts. Contractual backlog at the end of the third quarter was $36.1 billion, and unobligated backlog was $38.1 billion.
 
Boeing Capital Corporation
Boeing Capital Corporation (BCC) delivered record pre-tax earnings of $122 million during the quarter, while continuing to support the operations of Boeing's businesses and reduce portfolio risk. Pre-tax earnings grew by $94 million from the same quarter of 2005 on strong core performance, favorable portfolio dispositions, and the absence of impairments related to airline restructurings that occurred in the same quarter of 2005. Revenues for the third quarter climbed 32 percent to $304 million (Table 6).
BCC's portfolio balance at the end of the third quarter was $8.2 billion, down from $8.5 billion at the end of the second quarter on normal portfolio run-off, asset sales and depreciation. BCC contributed $52 million in cash dividends to the company during the quarter and $284 million in cash for the first nine months of the year. BCC recorded leverage of 5.0-to-1, as measured by the ratio of debt-to-equity.
Table 6. Boeing Capital Corporation Operating Results
 
Additional Information
The "Other" segment consists primarily of Boeing Technology and the Connexion business, as well as certain results related to the consolidation of all business units. As previously disclosed, the company decided to exit its Connexion business, which resulted in a pre-tax charge of $280 million in the quarter, or $0.22 per share. A further charge of approximately $0.03 per share is expected in the fourth quarter of 2006. As a result, Other segment loss from operations grew to $494 million in the third quarter from $105 million in the same period last year driven by the Connexion charge and the write-down of previously capitalized environmental costs.
Pre-tax (non-cash) pension expense for the quarter was $208 million, down $188 million from the same period of 2005 which included pension settlement and curtailment expenses related to the sale of our Wichita operations. Share-based-plans expense was $101 million, down 65 percent from the same period of 2005.
 
Outlook
The company is forecasting continued growth during the remainder of 2006 and 2007 that reflects strong performance from its core businesses, higher commercial airplane deliveries, higher R&D, and companywide productivity gains (Table 7).
Boeing's revenue guidance for 2006 is increased to approximately $60.5 billion, which is the high end of the previous guidance range. Revenue guidance for 2007 is increased to between $65.5 billion and $66.0 billion due to the Aviall acquisition offset somewhat by lower revenue growth than planned at IDS. Earnings per share guidance for 2006 is revised to between $2.40 and $2.50 due to charges totaling $0.25 per share for Connexion that are mostly offset by company wide performance improvements totaling $0.20 per share. Boeing is raising its 2007 EPS guidance $0.20 per share to between $4.45 and $4.65 due to the absence of further investment in Connexion, contributions from Aviall, and additional productivity improvements. Operating cash flow guidance is unchanged at greater than $5.5 billion for both 2006 and 2007.
Commercial Airplanes' 2006 guidance remains unchanged at approximately $28 billion for revenue and greater than 9 percent operating margin. BCA revenue guidance for 2007 is being raised to reflect higher services revenue from Aviall and is now expected to be between $32.5 billion and $33.0 billion, with operating margins improving to greater than 10 percent. The 2006 commercial airplane delivery forecast remains at approximately 395 airplanes, 36 percent higher than in 2005, while deliveries in 2007 are expected to be between 440 and 445 airplanes. The 2006 forecast is sold out and the 2007 forecast is now essentially sold out. Airplane deliveries in 2008 are expected to be higher than in 2007.
IDS revenue guidance for 2006 is reaffirmed at approximately $31.5 billion, while operating margin guidance is increased from 9.0 percent to approximately 9.5 percent. For 2007, IDS expects revenue to be in the range of $32.0 billion and $32.5 billion, with operating margins expected to exceed 10.5 percent.
The current guidance doesn't reflect the impact of the pending United Launch Alliance (ULA) transaction. Network & Space Systems revenue guidance for 2006 and 2007 each includes approximately $1 billion for business planned to be part of ULA. Upon completion of the transaction, Boeing will use the equity method of accounting for the joint venture, recognizing Boeing's proportionate share of the venture's earnings in the Network & Space Systems segment.
 
Boeing's research and development forecast is increased to between $3.1 billion and $3.2 billion in 2006 and between $3.2 billion and $3.4 billion in 2007. Annual capital expenditures are expected to be approximately $1.6 billion in 2006 and $1.5 billion in 2007.
The company's non-cash pension expense is expected to be approximately $800 million for 2006 and about $1 billion for 2007. Discretionary cash funding of Boeing's pension plans is expected to be approximately $500 million in each of those years. The company will continue to evaluate making additional discretionary contributions to its pension plans.
Table 7. Financial Outlook
 
 
Non-GAAP Measure Disclosure
Management believes that the non-GAAP (Generally Accepted Accounting Principles) measures (indicated by an asterisk *) used in this report provide investors with important perspectives into the company's ongoing business performance. The company does not intend for the information to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the related GAAP measure. Other companies may define the measure differently. The following definitions are provided:
Free Cash Flow
Free cash flow is defined as GAAP less capital expenditures for . Management believes free cash flow provides investors with an important perspective on the cash available for shareholders, debt repayment, and acquisitions after making the capital investments required to support ongoing business operations and long term value creation. Free cash flow does not represent the residual cash flow available for discretionary expenditures as it excludes certain mandatory expenditures such as repayment of maturing debt. Management uses free cash flow internally to assess both business performance and overall liquidity. Table 2 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and free cash flow.
operating cash flow
property, plant and equipment, additions
Adjusted Earnings per Share
Adjusted earnings per share is defined as GAAP diluted earnings per share adjusted for certain significant charges or credits. Management believes adjusted earnings per share are important to understanding the company's on-going operations and provide additional insights into underlying business performance. Significant charges or credits are described in the attachments to this release which provide reconciliations between GAAP earnings per share and adjusted earnings per share.
Adjusted IDS Operating Margins
Adjusted IDS Operating Margins is defined as GAAP IDS operating margins excluding the $569 million gain on the Rocketdyne sale recognized in IDS in the third quarter of 2005 and the $25 million gain on the EDD sale recognized in IDS in the first quarter of 2005. Management believes adjusted IDS operating margins are important to understanding the company's on-going operations and provide additional insights into underlying business performance. Management derived the adjusted IDS
 
operating margins by dividing GAAP IDS revenues into GAAP IDS operating earnings adjusted for the $569 million and $25 million gains in 2005. The calculation is (1311 - 569)  7468 = 9.9% for the third quarter of 2005, and (2982 - 569 - 25)  22878 = 10.4% for the first nine months of 2005. Adjusted IDS operating margins for 2006 are the same as GAAP.
Certain statements in this report may constitute "forward-looking" statements within the meaning of the Private Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Forward-looking statements in this press release include, among others, statements regarding future results as a result of our growth and productivity initiatives, our 2006 and 2007 financial outlook and the benefits of the new IDS structure. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions as to future events that may not prove to be accurate. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak only as of the date they were made and we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise. Our actual results and future trends may differ materially depending on a variety of factors, including the continued operation, viability and growth of major airline customers and non-airline customers (such as the U.S. Government); adverse developments in the value of collateral securing customer and other financings; the occurrence of any significant collective bargaining labor dispute; our successful execution of internal performance plans including our company-wide growth and productivity initiatives, production rate increases and decreases (including any reduction in or termination of an aircraft product), availability of raw materials, acquisition and divestiture plans, and other cost-reduction and productivity efforts; charges from any future SFAS No. 142 review; ability to meet development, production and certification schedules for the 787 program; technical or quality issues in development programs or in the commercial satellite industry; an adverse development in rating agency credit ratings or assessments; the actual outcomes of certain pending sales campaigns and the launch of the 787 program and U.S. and foreign government procurement activities, including the uncertainty associated with the procurement of tankers by the U.S. Department of Defense (DoD) and funding of the C-17 program; the cyclical nature of some of our businesses; unanticipated financial market changes which may impact pension plan assumptions; domestic and international competition in the defense, space and commercial areas; continued integration of acquired businesses; performance issues with key suppliers, subcontractors and customers; significant disruption to air travel worldwide (including future terrorist attacks); global trade policies; worldwide political stability; domestic and international economic conditions; price escalation; the outcome of political and legal processes, changing priorities or reductions in the U.S. Government or foreign government defense and space budgets; termination of government or commercial contracts due to unilateral government or customer action or failure to perform; legal, financial and governmental risks related to international transactions; legal and investigatory proceedings; tax settlements with the IRS and various states; U.S. Air Force review of previously awarded contracts; and other economic, political and technological risks and uncertainties. Additional information regarding these factors is contained in our SEC filings, including, without limitation, our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2005 and our Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarters ended March 31, 2006 and June 30, 2006.
Contact:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
In addition to disclosing results that are determined in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), the company also discloses non-GAAP results that exclude certain significant charges or credits that are important to an understanding of the company's ongoing operations. The company provides reconciliations of its non-GAAP financial reporting to the most comparable GAAP reporting. The company believes that discussion of results excluding certain significant charges or credits provides additional insights into underlying business performance. Adjusted earnings per share is not a measure recognized under GAAP. The determination of significant charges or credits may not be comparable to similarly titled measures used by other companies and may vary from quarter to quarter.
 
 
 
 
 
 
In addition to disclosing results that are determined in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), the company also discloses non-GAAP results that exclude certain significant charges or credits that are important to an understanding of the company's ongoing operations. The company provides reconciliations of its non-GAAP financial reporting to the most comparable GAAP reporting. The company believes that discussion of results excluding certain significant charges or credits provides additional insights into underlying business performance. Adjusted earnings per share is not a measure recognized under GAAP. The determination of significant charges or credits may not be comparable to similarly titled measures used by other companies and may vary from quarter to quarter.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20061122110738.txt.gz
TIME:20061122110738
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
 
1.    364-Day Revolving Credit Agreement.
 
On November 17, 2006, we entered into a $1.0 billion, 364-day revolving credit agreement (the "364-Day Credit Agreement"), replacing an earlier $1.5 billion credit agreement with Citigroup Global Markets Inc. and J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. as joint lead arrangers and joint book managers, JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. as syndication agent and Citibank, N.A. as administrative agent, and a syndicate of lenders as defined in the 364-Day Credit Agreement.
 
Under the 364-Day Credit Agreement, we pay a commitment fee that varies between .030% and .100%, depending on our credit rating. Borrowings under the 364-Day Credit Agreement (that are not based on Eurodollar rates) bear interest at an annual rate based on the "base rate" of interest in effect plus the applicable margin and applicable utilization fees payable quarterly in arrears as defined in the 364-Day Credit Agreement. The "base rate" of interest is the higher of (i) the base rate announced publicly by Citibank, N.A., from time to time and (ii) the Federal Funds Rate plus 0.50%. The applicable margin will vary depending upon our credit rating and whether the payment is made before or after the termination date. For payments made before the termination date, the applicable margin may vary from a low of 0.070% to a high of 0.450%. The applicable utilization fee varies between 0.050% and 0.100% depending on our credit rating and applies on any date the aggregate principal amount of outstanding advances exceeds 50% of the aggregate commitments.
 
The 364-Day Credit Agreement contains customary terms and conditions, including certain financial covenants that are substantially similar to those contained in the previous facility, including, without limitation, covenants restricting our ability to incur liens, merge or consolidate with another entity. Further, the 364-Day Credit Agreement contains a covenant restricting our ability to permit consolidated debt (as defined in the 364-Day Credit Agreement) to exceed 60% of our total capital (as defined in the 364-Day Credit Agreement) until the Credit Agreement terminates and all amounts borrowed under the Credit Agreement are paid in full.
 
Some of the lenders under the 364-Day Credit Agreement and their affiliates have various relationships with us and our subsidiaries involving the provision of financial service, including cash management, investment banking, trust and leasing services. In addition, we and some of our subsidiaries have entered into foreign exchange and other derivative arrangements with certain of the lenders and their affiliates.
 
2.    Five-Year Revolving Credit Agreement.
 
On November 17, 2006, we entered into a $2.0 billion, five-year revolving credit agreement (the "Five-Year Credit Agreement"), replacing an earlier $1.5 billion credit agreement with Citigroup Global Markets Inc. and J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. as joint lead arrangers and joint book managers, JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. as syndication agent and Citibank, N.A. as administrative agent, and a syndicate of lenders as defined in the Five-Year Credit Agreement.
 
Under the Five-Year Credit Agreement, we pay a commitment fee that varies between .040% and .125%, depending on our credit rating. Borrowings under the Five-Year Credit Agreement (that are not based on Eurodollar rates) bear interest at an annual rate based on the "base rate" of interest in effect plus the applicable margin and applicable utilization fees payable quarterly in arrears as defined in the Five-Year Credit Agreement. The "base rate" of interest is the higher of (i) the base rate announced publicly by Citibank, N.A., from time to time and (ii) the Federal Funds Rate plus 0.50%. The applicable margin will vary depending upon our credit rating and may vary from a low of 0.060% to a high of 0.425%. The applicable utilization fee varies between 0.050% and 0.100% depending on our credit rating and applies on any date the aggregate principal amount of outstanding advances exceeds 50% of the aggregate commitments.
 
The Five-Year Credit Agreement contains customary terms and conditions, including certain financial covenants that are substantially similar to those contained in the previous facility, including, without limitation, covenants restricting our ability to incur liens, merge or consolidate with another entity. Further, the Five-Year Credit Agreement contains a covenant restricting our ability to permit consolidated debt (as defined in the Five-Year Credit Agreement) to exceed 60% of our total capital (as defined in the Five-Year Credit Agreement) until the Credit Agreement terminates and all amounts borrowed under the Credit Agreement are paid in full.
 
Some of the lenders under the Five-Year Credit Agreement and their affiliates have various relationships with us and our subsidiaries involving the provision of financial service, including cash management, investment banking, trust and leasing services. In addition, we and some of our subsidiaries have entered into foreign exchange and other derivative arrangements with certain of the lenders and their affiliates.
 
Item 2.03. Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation Under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
 
The information described above under "Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement" with respect to the 364-Day Credit Agreement and the Five-Year Credit Agreement is hereby incorporated by reference.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20070131092611.txt.gz
TIME:20070131092611
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
 
(a) On January 31, 2007, The Boeing Company issued a press release announcing its financial results for the fourth quarter of 2006.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
(a) Not applicable
 
(b) Not applicable
 
(c) Not applicable
 
(d) Exhibits
 
99.1    Press Release of The Boeing Company dated January 31, 2007, reporting Boeing's financial results for the fourth quarter of 2006.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Boeing Fourth-Quarter EPS Doubles; Revenue up 26%; 2007 EPS Outlook Raised
 
 
 
 
 
Table 1. Summary Financial Results
 
 The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] fourth quarter net earnings more than doubled to $989 million, or $1.29 per share, from $460 million, or $0.58 per share, a year ago (Table 1). Adjusted earnings per share*, removing effects of tax benefits and discontinued businesses, rose 57 percent to $1.16 per share.
CHICAGO, Jan. 31, 2007
Boeing boosted its 2007 earnings per share guidance to between $4.55 and $4.75, and set its 2008 guidance at between $5.55 and $5.75, reflecting expected strong revenue growth and expanding margins across its businesses. The company's 2007 R&D forecast is unchanged and R&D spending is expected to decline in 2008.
 
"2006 was a very good year for Boeing. We achieved new records in revenue, cash flow and backlog, and overcame some meaningful challenges by focusing on improving productivity and meeting our commitments," said Boeing Chairman, President and Chief Executive Jim McNerney. "This focus on performance gives us the confidence to set high expectations for 2007 and 2008."
Boeing's fourth-quarter revenue rose 26 percent to $17.5 billion on double-digit growth in its Commercial Airplanes and Integrated Defense Systems businesses. The 57 percent increase in fourth-quarter adjusted EPS* was due to strong business performance, partially offset by an additional charge on the Airborne Early Warning & Control (AEW&C) program. Operating cash flow for the quarter was $2.4 billion driven by strong earnings growth and a large volume of commercial airplane orders (Table 2).
For 2006, the company's reported earnings totaled $2.85 per share, down from $3.20, while revenue rose 15 percent to $61.5 billion. Adjusted EPS* for the year grew 51 percent to $3.62 per share. Record operating cash flow of $7.5 billion provided outstanding liquidity to the company, while free cash flow* increased to $5.8 billion.
Table 2. Cash Flow
 
Reflecting a second consecutive year of record commercial airplane orders, Boeing's backlog at year-end also reached a record level. The backlog rose to $250 billion, up 22 percent for the year.
Cash and investments in marketable securities totaled $9.3 billion at year end, up from $8.2 billion at the end of the third quarter (Table 3). Principal uses of cash during the quarter included $444 million for share repurchases, retirement of $583 million of maturing debt, and planned investment increases in Boeing's core businesses.
The company spent $2.0 billion repurchasing 25.0 million shares during the year. This leaves $2.4 billion remaining available under the current repurchase authorization. During 2006, the company also contributed $526 million to its pension plans and retired approximately $1 billion of maturing debt.
 
In December, Boeing's board of directors increased the quarterly dividend by 17 percent to $0.35 per share, or $1.40 annually, based on the company's strong operating performance and outlook, excellent cash generation and commitment to delivering value to shareholders.
Table 3. Cash, Marketable Securities and Debt Balances
 
Segment Results
Commercial Airplanes
Boeing Commercial Airplanes (BCA) fourth-quarter revenues increased 37 percent to $7.6 billion driven by a 41 percent increase in airplane deliveries and higher services revenue (Table 4). BCA operating earnings doubled to $665 million. Margins expanded to 8.7 percent due to higher operating leverage and productivity improvements, partially offset by planned R&D spending increases and the absence of supplier development cost-sharing payments.
For the year, BCA deliveries rose 37 percent to 398 airplanes and revenue rose 33 percent to $28.5 billion. Operating earnings grew 91 percent to $2.7 billion as margins reached 9.6 percent.
Table 4. Commercial Airplanes Operating Results
 
Contractual backlog rose to a record $174 billion, increasing 40 percent during the year to more than six times current annual BCA revenues. BCA booked 320 gross orders during the quarter and a record 1,050 during the year. Net orders for 2006 were a
 
record 1,044 airplanes. For the second consecutive year, the 737 program achieved a record tally, bringing in 729 net orders. Boeing twin-aisle airplanes had another strong order year, with the 747 program achieving its highest order total since 1990.
The 787 Dreamliner program has won 452 firm orders from 36 customers since program launch in 2004. Important milestones were achieved during the fourth quarter, including validation of the manufacturing plan which culminated in a "virtual rollout" in December. The program continues to address pressures with respect to weight and supplier implementation. Flight testing of the Dreamliner begins this year, with entry into service scheduled for May 2008. Boeing continues to expect the 787 will be delivered on time and in accord with its contractual obligations.
Integrated Defense Systems
Boeing Integrated Defense Systems (IDS) revenues increased 18 percent during the quarter to a record $9.7 billion on higher volume across all segments (Table 5). Operating margins were 10.6 percent driven by strong execution and productivity improvements, offset by revised cost estimates on the AEW&C program totaling $274 million which reduced fourth-quarter IDS operating margins by 2.8 points.
IDS revenues grew 4 percent in 2006 to a record $32.4 billion driven by growth in Precision Engagement & Mobility Systems and Support Systems. Operating margins were 9.3 percent due to strong performance across IDS's balanced portfolio of programs, after a 2.4 point reduction for AEW&C. In 2005, IDS operating margins were 12.6 percent, including a 1.9 point benefit from gains on divestitures.
Table 5. Integrated Defense Systems Operating Results
 
 
Precision Engagement & Mobility Systems revenue grew 15 percent to $4.3 billion for the quarter on higher deliveries and volume on the F-15 and Chinook programs. Overall program performance was strong, yet operating margins were 6.9 percent for the quarter due to the charge mentioned above, which reduced PE&MS operating margins by 6.3 points.
Network & Space Systems achieved significant milestones on several key development programs including Future Combat Systems (FCS), Family of Beyond-line-of-sight Terminals (FAB-T), Ground-based Midcourse Defense (GMD), Airborne Laser and proprietary programs. The company also completed the United Launch Alliance joint venture during the quarter. Fourth-quarter revenues increased 19 percent to $3.4 billion driven in part by a new Delta IV launch capability services contract. Operating margins increased to 13.7 percent in the quarter driven by strong earnings on FCS and Delta IV, further boosted by a post-closing adjustment on the divestiture of Electron Dynamic Devices, Inc.
Support Systems again generated strong profits on its broad portfolio of services and logistics programs. Revenues for the quarter increased 22 percent to $1.9 billion while operating earnings increased 16 percent to $262 million resulting in 13.5 percent operating margins. Results were driven by higher volume on integrated logistics programs; international support programs; and maintenance, modification and upgrade programs such as AC-130 and KC-10.
IDS' backlog at quarter-end increased to $75.7 billion. For the year, backlog declined 6 percent as progress continued on large multi-year contracts. Contractual backlog grew 16 percent during the year to $42.3 billion while unobligated backlog declined to $33.4 billion.
Boeing Capital Corporation
Boeing Capital Corporation (BCC) continued to deliver strong financial performance while reducing portfolio risk (Table 6). For the quarter, BCC delivered pre-tax earnings of $37 million driven by continued strong financing portfolio performance and aircraft finance restructurings. BCC's portfolio balance at the end of the fourth quarter was $8.0 billion, down from $8.2 billion at the end of the third quarter and $9.2 billion in the fourth quarter of 2005 on normal portfolio run-off, asset sales and
 
depreciation. Despite the smaller portfolio size, revenues for the fourth quarter increased slightly to $241 million due to aircraft finance restructurings. For the year, BCC revenues grew 6 percent to $1.0 billion, and pre-tax income increased 25 percent to a record $291 million.
BCC contributed $60 million in cash dividends to the company during the quarter and $344 million in cash for the year. BCC recorded leverage of 5.0-to-1, as measured by the ratio of debt-to-equity.
Table 6. Boeing Capital Corporation Operating Results
 
Additional Information
The "Other" segment consists primarily of Boeing Engineering, Operations and Technology and the Connexion business, as well as certain results related to the consolidation of all business units. As previously disclosed, the company decided to exit its Connexion business which resulted in a pre-tax charge of $40 million in the quarter, or $0.03 per share. Other segment losses from operations grew to $93 million in the fourth quarter, up from $73 million in the same period last year.
Pre-tax (non-cash) pension expense for the quarter was $221 million, down from $451 million in the same period of 2005 which included pension settlement and curtailment expenses related to the sale of our Rocketdyne operations. Unallocated share-based-plans expense was $140 million, down 23 percent from the same period of 2005 due to changes in the company's long-term compensation plans implemented at the beginning of 2006.
Boeing's pension plans are 101 percent funded on a projected benefit obligation basis, and cash contribution requirements for the pension plans are expected to be modest over the next few years. As previously disclosed, shareholders' equity was reduced by approximately $6.5 billion at the end of the year to reflect implementation of new accounting rules for pensions and other post-retirement benefits (SFAS 158).
 
Outlook
The company expects continued growth in 2007 and 2008 that reflects strong performance from its core businesses, higher commercial airplane deliveries, leveling R&D, and companywide productivity gains (Table 7).
Boeing's revenue guidance for 2007 is now between $64.5 billion and $65 billion, reflecting completion of the United Launch Alliance transaction. For 2008, the company expects revenues between $71 and $72 billion. The 2007 earnings per share guidance is being raised to between $4.55 and $4.75 per share. EPS guidance for 2008 is set at between $5.55 and $5.75 per share. Operating cash flow for 2007 is now expected to be greater than $4 billion, as portions of cash flow previously expected in 2007 accelerated into the $7.5 billion achieved in 2006. Cash flow for 2008 is expected to again exceed $7 billion.
Commercial Airplanes' 2007 delivery guidance remains 440 to 445 airplanes and is completely sold out. Revenue guidance for 2007 remains between $32.5 and $33 billion, and operating margin guidance remains at greater than 10 percent. Airplane deliveries in 2008 are expected to rise to between 515 and 520 airplanes and are essentially sold out. Commercial Airplanes' revenue in 2008 is expected to grow to between $39 billion and $40 billion accompanied by margin expansion to approximately 11 percent. The company expects airplane deliveries in 2009 to be higher than in 2008.
IDS revenue guidance for 2007 is approximately $31 billion, and now excludes approximately $1 billion of launch business revenue due to the change to equity method accounting following completion of the ULA joint venture. Operating margins are expected to expand to approximately 11 percent in 2007. For 2008, IDS expects revenue to grow to between $32 billion and $33 billion, with operating margins of approximately 11 percent.
Boeing's research and development forecast for 2007 is unchanged at between $3.2 billion and $3.4 billion. Research and development spending is expected to decline in 2008 to between $2.8 billion and $3.0 billion. Annual capital expenditures are expected to be approximately $1.6 billion in 2007 and in 2008.
 
The company's non-cash pension expense is expected to be approximately $1.1 billion for 2007 and approximately $0.9 billion for 2008. The company expects pension expense to continue to decline after the guidance period with 2009 pension expense likely to be approximately half of the 2008 level. Discretionary cash funding of Boeing's pension plans is expected to be approximately $500 million in each of 2007 and 2008, though the company will continue to evaluate making additional discretionary contributions to its pension plans.
Table 7. Financial Outlook
 
 
Non-GAAP Measure Disclosure
Management believes that the non-GAAP (Generally Accepted Accounting Principles) measures (indicated by an asterisk *) used in this report provide investors with important perspectives into the company's ongoing business performance. The company does not intend for the information to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the related GAAP measure. Other companies may define the measure differently. The following definitions are provided:
Free Cash Flow
Free cash flow is defined as GAAP less capital expenditures for . Management believes free cash flow provides investors with an important perspective on the cash available for shareholders, debt repayment, and acquisitions after making the capital investments required to support ongoing business operations and long term value creation. Free cash flow does not represent the residual cash flow available for discretionary expenditures as it excludes certain mandatory expenditures such as repayment of maturing debt. Management uses free cash flow internally to assess both business performance and overall liquidity. Table 2 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and free cash flow.
operating cash flow
property, plant and equipment, additions
Adjusted Earnings per Share
Adjusted earnings per share is defined as GAAP adjusted for certain significant charges or credits. Management believes adjusted earnings per share are important to understanding the company's on-going operations and provide additional insights into underlying business performance. Significant charges or credits are described in the attachments to this release which provide reconciliations between GAAP earnings per share and adjusted earnings per share.
diluted earnings per share
 
Certain statements in this report may constitute "forward-looking" statements within the meaning of the Private Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Forward-looking statements in this press release include, among others, statements regarding future results as a result of our growth and productivity initiatives, our 2007 and 2008 financial outlook and the benefits of the new IDS structure. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions as to future events that may not prove to be accurate. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak only as of the date they were made and we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise. Our actual results and future trends may differ materially depending on a variety of factors, including the continued operation, viability and growth of major airline customers and non-airline customers (such as the U.S. Government); adverse developments in the value of collateral securing customer and other financings; the occurrence of any significant collective bargaining labor dispute; our successful execution of internal performance plans including our company-wide growth and productivity initiatives, production rate increases and decreases (including any reduction in or termination of an aircraft product), availability of raw materials, acquisition and divestiture plans, and other cost-reduction and productivity efforts; charges from any future SFAS No. 142 review; ability to meet development, production and certification schedules for the 787 program; technical or quality issues in development programs (affecting schedule and cost estimates) or in the satellite industry; an adverse development in rating agency credit ratings or assessments; the actual outcomes of certain pending sales campaigns and the timely launch of the 787 program and U.S. and foreign government procurement activities, including the uncertainty associated with the procurement of tankers by the U.S. Department of Defense (DoD) and funding of the C-17 program; the cyclical nature of some of our businesses; unanticipated financial market changes which may impact pension plan assumptions; domestic and international competition in the defense, space and commercial areas; continued integration of acquired businesses; performance issues with key suppliers, subcontractors and customers; significant disruption to air travel worldwide (including future terrorist attacks); global trade policies; worldwide political stability; domestic and international economic conditions; price escalation; the outcome of political and legal processes, changing priorities or reductions in the U.S. Government or foreign government defense and space budgets; termination of government or commercial contracts due to unilateral government or customer action or failure to perform; legal, financial and governmental risks related to international transactions; legal and investigatory proceedings; tax settlements with the IRS and various states; U.S. Air Force review of previously awarded contracts; costs associated with the exit of the Connexion by Boeing business; and other economic, political and technological risks and uncertainties. Additional information regarding these factors is contained in our SEC filings, including, without limitation, our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2005 and our Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarters ended March 31, 2006, June 30, 2006, and September 30, 2006.
Contact:
Investor Relations: David Dohnalek or Rob Young (312) 544-2140
Communications:    Anne Eisele or Todd Blecher (312) 544-2002
 
 
 
 
 
 
In addition to disclosing results that are determined in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), the company also discloses non-GAAP results that exclude certain significant charges or credits that are important to an understanding of the company's ongoing operations. The company provides reconciliations of its non-GAAP financial reporting to the most comparable GAAP reporting. The company believes that discussion of results excluding certain significant charges or credits provides additional insights into underlying business performance. Adjusted earnings per share is not a measure recognized under GAAP. The determination of significant charges or credits may not be comparable to similarly titled measures used by other companies and may vary from quarter to quarter.
 
In addition to disclosing results that are determined in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), the company also discloses non-GAAP results that exclude certain significant charges or credits that are important to an understanding of the company's ongoing operations. The company provides reconciliations of its non-GAAP financial reporting to the most comparable GAAP reporting. The company believes that discussion of results excluding certain significant charges or credits provides additional insights into underlying business performance. Adjusted earnings per share is not a measure recognized under GAAP. The determination of significant charges or credits may not be comparable to similarly titled measures used by other companies and may vary from quarter to quarter.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20070305165415.txt.gz
TIME:20070305165415
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
On February 27, 2007, the Board of Directors of The Boeing Company (the ""), upon the recommendation of the Governance, Organization and Nominating Committee, elected Arthur D. Collins, Jr., Chairman of the Board and Chief Executive Officer of Medtronic, Inc., as a new director. Mr. Collins, along with all incumbent directors, will be a nominee for the director election by shareholders at the 2007 Annual Meeting of Shareholders. Mr. Collins will serve on the Audit Committee and the Finance Committee. There was no arrangement or understanding between Mr. Collins and any other persons pursuant to which Mr. Collins was selected as a director and there are no related persons transactions between Mr. Collins and the Company.
Company
Mr. Collins will receive the standard compensation provided to all Boeing nonemployee directors. This compensation consists of a cash retainer fee of $75,000 per year and a grant of retainer stock units equal in number to the number of shares of Boeing stock that could be purchased with an aggregate of $130,000 per year. The Company reimburses nonemployee directors for actual travel and out-of-pocket expenses incurred in connection with their services. The nonemployee director compensation program is described in further detail in the Company's proxy statement for its 2006 Annual Meeting filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 24, 2006 as supplemented by Exhibit (10)(i) to the Company's Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2006 filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on October 25, 2006. A copy of the Company's press release announcing the election of Mr. Collins is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
Number of Directors
On February 27, 2007, the Board of Directors amended the Company's By-Laws by increasing the number of directors from ten to eleven.
Majority Vote Amendments
On February 27, 2007, the Board of Directors also amended Article I, Section 11; Article II, Section 2.2; and Article VIII, Section 1 of the Company's By-Laws, to adopt a new majority vote standard in uncontested director elections. The new majority vote standard in Article I, Section 11 replaces plurality voting in uncontested director elections, and requires a nominee to receive more "For" votes than "Against" votes cast at a meeting for the election of directors at which a quorum is present. Plurality voting will continue to be the standard for the election of directors in contested elections. The change to Article II, Section 2.2 was a conforming amendment.
The amendments to Section 11 also require that any shareholder nominating a candidate for election as director give a timely notice to the Company that includes information regarding the shareholder and the candidate that would be required to be disclosed in proxy statements or other filings made in connection with solicitations of proxies for contested elections, including the candidate's statement whether, if elected, the candidate intends to tender, upon being elected or re-elected, an irrevocable resignation effective upon his or her failure to receive the required vote for re-election at the next meeting and Board acceptance of the resignation. The candidate must also deliver to the Company a written questionnaire with respect to the candidate's background and qualification, as well as a written representation and agreement requiring the candidate to disclose certain types of voting commitments and compensation arrangements. The representation and agreement must also contain an assurance that the candidate, if elected as director, would be in compliance with all applicable publicly disclosed corporate governance, conflict of interest, confidentiality and stock ownership and trading policies and guidelines of the Company.
Article VIII, Section 1 of the By-Laws was amended to provide that amendments to Article I, Section 11.2 regarding the voting standard in director elections can only be made by the shareholders, except that the Board may make technical or administrative amendments to that section.
Amendment to Deadline for Rule 14a-4(c) Shareholder Proposals
A conforming amendment to Article I, Section 11 of the By-Laws changed the dates during which shareholders may timely submit proposals for consideration at shareholder annual meetings that will not be included in the proxy statement, such as shareholder nominations of candidates for the election of directors. This change will be reflected in the Company's 2007 proxy statement.
The Board of Directors ordered the By-Laws as so amended to be restated. The foregoing summary of the By-Law amendments is qualified in its entirety by reference to the text of the Company's By-Laws, as amended and restated on February 27, 2007, a copy of which is attached hereto as Exhibit 3.2 and is incorporated by reference.
 
Corporate Governance Principles: Director Resignation
In connection with the By-Law amendments referred to in Item 5.03 of this Form 8-K, the Board of Directors on February 27, 2007 also approved amendments to the Company's Corporate Governance Principles (the ""), to provide that the Board will nominate only those persons who tender, in advance, irrevocable resignations. The irrevocable resignations will be effective upon the failure to receive the required vote at any annual meeting at which they are nominated for re-election and Board acceptance of the resignation. The Board will act on the resignation, taking into account the recommendation of the Governance, Organization and Nominating Committee (the ""), and publicly disclose its decision within ninety days from the date of the certification of the election results. The director who resigned in accordance with the Principles will not participate in the Committee recommendation or Board decision on the resignation. If the Board does not accept the resignation, the director will continue to serve until the next annual meeting and until his or her successor is duly elected, or until his or her earlier resignation or removal. If the Board accepts the resignation, then the Board, in its sole discretion, may fill any resulting vacancy or may decrease the size of the Board.
Principles
Committee
Corporate Governance Principles: Recoupment Policy
On February 27, 2007, the Board of Directors also amended the Corporate Governance Principles to include a recoupment policy that the Board had previously adopted on December 11, 2006. The policy provides that the Board may require reimbursement of incentive compensation paid to an executive officer in the event it is later determined that the executive officer's intentional misconduct caused or substantially caused a substantial restatement of financial statements that led to the awarding of unearned incentive compensation.
The foregoing summary of the amendments to the Corporate Governance Principles is qualified in its entirety by reference to the text of the Company's Corporate Governance Principles, as amended on February 27, 2007, a copy of which is attached hereto as 99.2 and is incorporated by reference.
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: March 5, 2007
 
 
 

Exhibit 3.2
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
SECTION 1. 
.
Annual Meetings
The Annual Meeting of the stockholders shall be held on such date and at such time as the Board of Directors shall determine, for the election of directors and the transaction of such other business as may come before the meeting.
SECTION 2. 
.
Special Meetings
A special meeting of the stockholders may be called at any time by the Board of Directors, or by stockholders holding together at least twenty-five percent of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, except as otherwise provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto.
SECTION 3. 
.
Place of Meeting
All meetings of the stockholders of the Corporation shall be held at such place or places within or without the State of Delaware as may from time to time be fixed by the Board of Directors or as shall be specified or fixed in the respective notices or waivers of notice thereof.
SECTION 4. 
.
Notice of Meetings
Except as otherwise required by statute and as set forth below, notice of each annual or special meeting of stockholders shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than thirty nor more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date. If the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, notice of each special meeting of stockholders shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than fifty-five nor more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date, unless the calling of such meeting is ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, in which case notice of such special meeting shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than thirty nor more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date. Such notice shall be given by delivering to each stockholder a written or printed notice thereof either personally or by mailing such notice in a postage-prepaid envelope addressed to the stockholder's address as it appears on the stock books of the Corporation. Except as otherwise required by statute, no publication of any notice of a meeting of stockholders shall be required. Every notice of a meeting of stockholders shall state the place, date, and hour of the meeting and, in the case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called.
SECTION 5. 
.
Waivers of Notice
Whenever any notice is required to be given to any stockholder under the provisions of these By-Laws, the Certificate of Incorporation, or the Delaware General Corporation Law, a waiver thereof in writing, signed by the person or persons entitled to such notice, whether before or after the time stated therein, shall be deemed equivalent to the giving of such notice. The attendance of a stockholder at a meeting, in person or by proxy, shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when a stockholder attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened.
SECTION 6. 
.
Quorum
At all meetings of stockholders, except when otherwise provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by the By-Laws, the presence, in person or by proxy duly authorized, of the holders of one-third of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business;
 
and except as otherwise provided by statute or rule of law, or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by the By-Laws, the vote, in person or by proxy, of the holders of a majority of the shares constituting such quorum shall be binding upon all stockholders of the Corporation. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote may adjourn any meeting, from time to time but not for a period of more than thirty days at any one time, until a quorum shall attend. At any such adjourned meeting at which a quorum shall be present, any business may be transacted which might have been transacted at the meeting as originally called. Unless otherwise provided by statute, no notice of an adjourned meeting need be given.
SECTION 7. 
.
Proxies
7.1  Each stockholder entitled to vote at a meeting of stockholders or to express consent or dissent to corporate action in writing without a meeting may authorize another person or persons to act for such stockholder by proxy. Such authorization may be accomplished by (a) the stockholder or such stockholder's authorized officer, director, employee, or agent executing a writing or causing his or her signature to be affixed to such writing by any reasonable means, including facsimile signature, or (b) by transmitting or authorizing the transmission of a telegram, cablegram, or other means of electronic transmission to the intended holder of the proxy or to a proxy solicitation firm, proxy support service, or similar agent duly authorized by the intended proxy holder to receive such transmission; provided, that any such telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission must either set forth or be accompanied by information from which it can be determined that the telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission was authorized by the stockholder. Any copy, facsimile telecommunication, or other reliable reproduction of the writing or transmission by which a stockholder has authorized another person to act as proxy for such stockholder may be substituted or used in lieu of the original writing or transmission for any and all purposes for which the original writing or transmission could be used, provided that such copy, facsimile telecommunication, or other reproduction shall be a complete reproduction of the entire original writing or transmission.
.
Appointment
7.2  A proxy shall be filed with the Secretary of the Corporation before or at the time of the meeting or the delivery to the Corporation of the consent to corporate action in writing. A proxy shall become invalid three years after the date of its execution, unless otherwise provided in the proxy. A proxy with respect to a specified meeting shall entitle the holder thereof to vote at any reconvened meeting following adjournment of such meeting but shall not be valid after the final adjournment thereof.
.
Delivery to Corporation; Duration
SECTION 8
. .
Inspectors of Election
8.1  In advance of any meeting of stockholders, the Board of Directors of the Corporation shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspectors of election at such meeting and to make a written report thereof. The Board of Directors may designate one or more persons to serve as alternate inspectors to serve in place of any inspector who is unable or fails to act. If no inspector or alternate is able to act at a meeting of stockholders, the chairman of such meeting shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspector of elections at such meeting.
.
Appointment
8.2  The inspectors shall: (a) ascertain the number of shares of the Corporation outstanding and the voting power of each such share; (b) determine the shares represented at the meeting and the validity of proxies and ballots; (c) count all votes and ballots; (d) determine and retain for a reasonable period of time a record of the disposition of any challenges made to any determination by them; and (e) certify their determination of the number of shares represented at the meeting and their count of the votes and ballots. Each inspector of election shall, before entering upon the discharge of his or her duties, take and sign an oath to faithfully execute the duties of inspector with strict impartiality and according to the best of his or her ability. The inspectors of election may appoint or retain other persons or entities to assist them in the performance of their duties.
.
Duties
8.3  The validity of any proxy or ballot executed for a meeting of stockholders shall be determined by the inspectors of election in accordance with the applicable provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law as then in effect. In determining the validity of any proxy transmitted by telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission, the inspectors shall record in writing the information upon which they relied in making such determination.
.
Determination of Proxy Validity
 
SECTION 9.
 .
Fixing the Record Date
9.1  For the purpose of determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at any meeting of stockholders or any adjournment thereof, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which record date shall be not fewer than thirty nor more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the date of such meeting. If the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, the record date for each special meeting of stockholders shall be not fewer than fifty-five nor more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date, unless the calling of such meeting is ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation. If no record date is fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall be at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which notice is given, or, if notice is waived, at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which the meeting is held. A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting; provided, however, that the Board of Directors may fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
.
Meetings
9.2  For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which date shall not be more than ten (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days after the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, when no prior action by the Board of Directors is required by Chapter 1 of the Delaware General Corporation Law as now or hereafter amended, shall be the first date on which a signed written consent setting forth the action taken or proposed to be taken is delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the records of proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Delivery made to the Corporation's registered office shall be by hand or by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors and prior action by the Board of Directors is required by Chapter 1 of the Delaware General Corporation Law as now or hereafter amended, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution taking such prior action.
.
Consent to Corporate Action Without a Meeting
9.3  For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to receive payment of any dividend or other distribution or allotment of any rights or the stockholders entitled to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion, or exchange of stock, or for the purpose of any other lawful action, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted, and which record date shall be not more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days prior to such action. If no record date is fixed, the record date for determining stockholders for any such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution relating thereto.
.
Dividends, Distributions, and Other Rights
9.4  At least ten days before each meeting of stockholders, a complete list of the stockholders entitled to vote at such meeting shall be made, arranged in alphabetical order, and showing the address of each stockholder and the number of shares registered in the name of each stockholder. This list shall be open to examination by any stockholder, for any purpose germane to the meeting, during ordinary business hours, for a period of ten days prior to the meeting, either at a place within the city where the meeting is to be held, which place shall be specified in the notice of the meeting, or, if not so specified, at the place where the meeting is to be held. The list shall also be produced and kept at such meeting for inspection by any stockholder who is present.
.
Voting List
 
SECTION 10. 
.
Action by Stockholders Without a Meeting
Subject to the provisions of Article NINTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, any action which could be taken at any annual or special meeting of stockholders may be taken without a meeting, without prior notice, and without a vote, if a consent or consents in writing, setting forth the action so taken, are (a) signed by the holders of outstanding stock having not fewer than the minimum number of votes that would be necessary to authorize or take such action at a meeting at which all shares entitled to vote thereon were present and voted and (b) delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the records of proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Delivery made to the Corporation's registered office shall be by hand or by certified mail or registered mail, return receipt requested. Every written consent shall bear the date of signature of each stockholder who signs the consent and no written consent shall be effective to take the corporate action referred to therein unless written consents signed by a sufficient number of stockholders to take such action are delivered to the Corporation, in the manner required by this Section, within sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days of the date of the earliest dated consent delivered to the Corporation in the manner required by this Section 10. The validity of any consent executed by a proxy for a stockholder pursuant to a telegram, cablegram, or other means of electronic transmission transmitted to such proxy holder by or upon the authorization of the stockholder shall be determined by or at the direction of the Secretary of the Corporation. A written record of the information upon which the person making such determination relied shall be made and kept in the records of the proceedings of the stockholders. Any such consent shall be inserted in the minute book as if it were the minutes of a meeting of the stockholders. Prompt notice of the taking of the corporate action without a meeting by less than unanimous written consent shall be given to those stockholders who have not consented in writing.
SECTION 11.
 Notice of Stockholder Business and Nominations; Required Vote for Directors; Director Qualification.
11.1 
.
Notice of Stockholder Business and Nominations
A. (1) Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors and the proposal of business to be considered by the stockholders may be made at an annual meeting of stockholders (a) pursuant to the Corporation's notice of meeting, (b) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or (c) by any stockholder of the Corporation who (i) was a stockholder of record at the time of giving of notice provided for in this By-Law and at the time of the annual meeting, (ii) is entitled to vote at the meeting and (iii) complies with the notice procedures set forth in this By-Law.
.
Annual Meetings of Stockholders
(2) For nominations or other business to be properly brought before an annual meeting by a stockholder pursuant to Section 11.1.A(1)(c) of this By-Law, the stockholder must have given timely notice thereof in writing to the Secretary and such other business must otherwise be a proper matter for stockholder action. To be timely, a stockholder's notice shall be delivered to the Secretary at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not earlier than the close of business on the one hundred and twentieth day and not later than the close of business on the ninetieth day prior to the first anniversary of the preceding year's annual meeting; provided, however, that in the event that the date of the annual meeting is more than thirty days before or more than sixty days after such anniversary date, notice by the stockholder to be timely must be so delivered not earlier than the close of business on the one hundred and twentieth day prior to such annual meeting and not later than the close of business on the later of the ninetieth day prior to such annual meeting and the tenth day following the day on which public announcement of the date of such meeting is first made by the Corporation. In no event shall the public announcement of an adjournment of an annual meeting commence a new time period for the giving of a stockholder's notice as described above. To be in proper form, a stockholder's notice to the Secretary must: (a) set forth, as to the stockholder giving the notice and the beneficial owner, if any, on whose behalf the nomination or proposal is made (i) the name and address of such stockholder, as they appear on the Corporation's books, and of such beneficial owner, if any, (ii) the class or series and number of shares of the Corporation which are owned beneficially and of record by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, as of the date of such notice (which information shall be supplemented by such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, not later than ten days after the record date for the meeting to disclose such ownership as of the record date), and (iii) any other information relating to such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, that would be required to be disclosed in a proxy statement or other filings required to be made in connection with solicitations of proxies for, as applicable, the proposal and/or for the election of directors in a contested election pursuant to Section 14 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder (the "Exchange Act"); (b) if the notice relates to any business other
 
than the nomination of a director that the stockholder proposes to bring before the meeting, set forth (i) a brief description of the business desired to be brought before the meeting, the reasons for conducting such business at the meeting and any material interest of such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, in such business and (ii) a description of all agreements, arrangements and understandings between such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, and any other person or persons (including their names) in connection with the proposal of such business by such stockholder; (c) set forth, as to each person, if any, whom the stockholder proposes to nominate for election or reelection as a director (i) all information relating to such person that would be required to be disclosed in a proxy statement or other filings required to be made in connection with solicitations of proxies for election of directors in a contested election pursuant to Section 14 of the Exchange Act (including such person's written consent to being named in the proxy statement as a nominee and to serving as a director if elected and a statement whether such person, if elected, intends to tender, promptly following such person's election or re-election, an irrevocable resignation effective upon such person's failure to receive the required vote for re-election at the next meeting at which such person would face re-election and upon acceptance of such resignation by the Board of Directors) and (ii) a description of all direct and indirect compensation and other material monetary agreements, arrangements and understandings during the past three years, and any other material relationships, between or among such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, and their respective affiliates and associates, or others acting in concert therewith, on the one hand, and each proposed nominee, and his or her respective affiliates and associates, or others acting in concert therewith, on the other hand, including, without limitation all information that would be required to be disclosed pursuant to Rule 404 promulgated under Regulation S-K if the stockholder making the nomination and any beneficial owner on whose behalf the nomination is made, if any, or any affiliate or associate thereof or person acting in concert therewith, were the "registrant" for purposes of such rule and the nominee were a director or executive officer of such registrant; and (d) with respect to each nominee for election or reelection to the Board of Directors, include the completed and signed questionnaire, representation and agreement required by Section 11.3 of this By-Law. The Corporation may require any proposed nominee to furnish such other information as may reasonably be required by the Corporation to determine the eligibility of such proposed nominee to serve as an independent director of the Corporation or that could be material to a reasonable stockholder's understanding of the independence, or lack thereof, of such nominee.
(3) Notwithstanding anything in the second sentence of Section 11.1.A(2) of this By-Law to the contrary, in the event that the number of directors to be elected to the Board of Directors of the Corporation is increased and there is no public announcement by the Corporation naming all of the nominees for director or specifying the size of the increased Board of Directors at least one hundred days prior to the first anniversary of the preceding year's annual meeting, a stockholder's notice required by this By-Law shall also be considered timely, but only with respect to nominees for any new positions created by such increase, if it shall be delivered to the Secretary at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not later than the close of business on the tenth day following the day on which such public announcement is first made by the Corporation.
B.  Only such business shall be conducted at a special meeting of stockholders as shall have been brought before the meeting pursuant to the Corporation's notice of meeting. Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors may be made at a special meeting of stockholders at which directors are to be elected pursuant to the Corporation's notice of meeting (a) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or (b) provided that the Board of Directors has determined that directors shall be elected at such meeting, by any stockholder of the Corporation who (i) is a stockholder of record at the time of giving of notice provided for in this By-Law and at the time of the special meeting, (ii) is entitled to vote at the meeting and (iii) complies with the notice procedures set forth in this By-Law. In the event the Corporation calls a special meeting of stockholders for the purpose of electing one or more directors to the Board of Directors, any such stockholder may nominate a person or persons (as the case may be) for election to such position(s) as specified in the Corporation's notice of meeting, if the stockholder's notice required by Section 11.1.A(2) of this By-Law (including the completed and signed questionnaire, representation and agreement required by Section 11.3 of this By-Law) shall be delivered to the Secretary at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not earlier than the close of business on the one hundred and twentieth day prior to such special meeting and not later than the close of business on the later of the ninetieth day prior to such special meeting and the tenth day following the day on which public announcement is first made of the date of the special meeting and of the nominees proposed by the Board of Directors to be elected at such meeting. In no event shall the public announcement of an adjournment of a special meeting commence a new time period for the giving of a stockholder's notice as described above.
.
Special Meetings of Stockholders
 
C.(1) Only such persons who are nominated in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law shall be eligible to serve as directors and only such business shall be conducted at a meeting of stockholders as shall have been brought before the meeting in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law. Except as otherwise provided by law, the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, the chairman of the meeting shall have the power and duty to determine whether a nomination or any business proposed to be brought before the meeting was made or proposed, as the case may be, in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law and, if any proposed nomination or business is not in compliance with this By-Law, to declare that such defective proposal or nomination shall be disregarded.
 
.
General
(2) For purposes of this By-Law, "public announcement" shall mean disclosure in a press release reported by the Dow Jones News Service, Associated Press or comparable national news service or in a document publicly filed by the Corporation with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to Section 13, 14 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act.
(3) Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this By-Law, a stockholder shall also comply with all applicable requirements of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations thereunder with respect to the matters set forth in this By-Law. Nothing in this By-Law shall be deemed to affect any rights (i) of stockholders to request inclusion of proposals in the Corporation's proxy statement pursuant to Rule 14a-8 under the Exchange Act or (ii) of the holders of any series of Preferred Stock if and to the extent provided for under law, the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws.
11.2  A nominee for director shall be elected to the Board of Directors if the votes cast for such nominee's election exceed the votes cast against such nominee's election; provided, however, that the directors shall be elected by a plurality of the votes cast at any meeting of stockholders for which (i) the Secretary of the Corporation receives a notice that a stockholder has nominated a person for election to the Board of Directors in compliance with the advance notice requirements for stockholder nominees for director set forth in Section 11.1 of this By-law and (ii) such nomination has not been withdrawn by such stockholder on or prior to the tenth day preceding the date the Corporation first mails its notice of meeting for such meeting to stockholders. If directors are to be elected by a plurality of the votes cast, stockholders shall not be permitted to vote against a nominee. Votes cast shall exclude abstentions with respect to that director's election.
.
Required Vote for Directors
11.3  To be eligible to be a nominee for election or reelection as a director of the Corporation, a person must deliver (in accordance with the time periods prescribed for delivery of notice under Section 11.1 of this By-Law) to the Secretary at the principal executive offices of the Corporation a written questionnaire with respect to the background and qualification of such person and the background of any other person or entity on whose behalf the nomination is being made (which questionnaire shall be provided by the Secretary upon written request) and a written representation and agreement (in the form provided by the Secretary upon written request), which agreement shall (i) provide that such person (A) is not and will not become a party to (1) any agreement, arrangement or understanding with, and has not given any commitment or assurance to, any person or entity as to how such person, if elected as a director of the Corporation, will act or vote on any issue or question (a "Voting Commitment") that has not been disclosed to the Corporation or (2) any Voting Commitment that could limit or interfere with such person's ability to comply, if elected as a director of the Corporation, with such person's fiduciary duties under applicable law, (B) is not and will not become a party to any agreement, arrangement or understanding with any person or entity other than the Corporation with respect to any direct or indirect compensation, reimbursement or indemnification in connection with service or action as a director that has not been disclosed therein, and (C) in such person's individual capacity and on behalf of any person or entity on whose behalf the nomination is being made, would be in compliance, if elected as a director of the Corporation, and will comply with all applicable publicly disclosed corporate governance, conflict of interest, confidentiality and stock ownership and trading policies and guidelines of the Corporation.
.
Director Qualification: Submission of Questionnaire, Representation and Agreement
SECTION 12.
 .
Notice to Corporation
Corporation pursuant to Section 11.1 of this Article I or Section 2.1 of Article II of these By-Laws must be given, either by personal delivery or by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, to the Secretary at the Corporation's executive offices in the City of Seattle, State of Washington.
Any written notice required to be delivered by a stockholder to the
 
SECTION 1. 
.
Number and Term of Office
The number of directors shall be eleven, but the number may be increased, or decreased to not less than three, from time to time, either by the directors by adoption of a resolution to such effect or by the stockholders by amendment of the By-Laws in accordance with Article VIII hereof. Until the annual meeting of stockholders of the Corporation to be held in 2006, the directors shall be divided into three classes, each of which shall be composed as nearly as possible of one-third of the directors. Until the annual meeting of stockholders to be held in 2006, each director shall serve for the term to which the director was elected, and until a successor shall have been elected and qualified or until the director's prior death, resignation, or removal. The terms of all directors in office immediately prior to the opening of the polls for the 2006 annual meeting of stockholders of the Corporation shall expire at the time of the opening of the polls for the 2006 annual meeting of stockholders of the Corporation. At each succeeding annual meeting of stockholders of the Corporation, each director shall be elected to hold office until the next annual meeting of stockholders or until his or her successor shall be elected and qualified or until his or her earlier resignation or removal.
SECTION 2. 
.
Nomination and Election
2.1  Only persons who are nominated in accordance with Article I, Section 11 of these By-Laws shall be eligible for election as directors.
.
Nomination
2.2  At each election of directors by stockholders, the persons who are elected in accordance with Article I, Section 11 of these By-Laws shall be the directors.
.
Election
SECTION 3. 
.
Place of Meeting
Meetings of the Board of Directors, or of any committee thereof, may be held either within or without the State of Delaware.
SECTION 4. 
.
Annual Meeting
Each year the Board of Directors shall meet in connection with the annual meeting of stockholders for the purpose of electing officers and for the transaction of other business. No notice of such meeting is required. Such annual meeting may be held at any other time or place which shall be specified in a notice given as hereinafter provided for special meetings of the Board, or in a consent and waiver of notice thereof, signed by all the directors.
SECTION 5. 
.
Stated Meetings
The Board of Directors may, by resolution adopted by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board, from time to time appoint the time and place for holding stated meetings of the Board, if by it deemed advisable; and such stated meetings shall thereupon be held at the time and place so appointed, without the giving of any special notice with regard thereto. In case the day appointed for a stated meeting shall fall upon a legal holiday, such meeting shall be held on the next following day, not a legal holiday, at the regularly appointed hour. Except as otherwise provided in the By-Laws, any and all business may be transacted at any stated meeting.
SECTION 6. 
.
Special Meetings
6.1  Special meetings of the Board of Directors may be called by or at the request of the Chairman of the Board or any two directors. Notice of a special meeting of the Board of Directors, stating the place, day, and hour of the meeting, shall be given to each director in writing (by mail, wire, facsimile, or personal delivery) or orally (by telephone or in person).
.
Convenors and Notice
6.2  With respect to a special meeting of the Board of Directors, a written waiver, signed by a director, shall be deemed equivalent to notice to that director. A director's attendance at a meeting shall constitute
.
Waiver of Notice
 
that director's waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the director attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting was not lawfully called or convened. Neither the business to be transacted at, nor the purpose of, any regular or special meeting of the Board of Directors need be specified in the waiver of notice of such meeting.
SECTION 7. 
.
Quorum and Manner of Acting
Except as herein otherwise provided, forty percent of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided in these By-Laws at the time of any stated or special meeting of the Board or, if vacancies exist on the Board of Directors, forty percent of such number of directors then in office, provided, however, that such number may not be less than one-third of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided in these By-Laws, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and, except as otherwise required by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by the By-Laws, the act of a majority of the directors present at any such meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of the Board of Directors. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the directors present may adjourn any meeting, from time to time, until a quorum is present. No notice of any adjourned meeting need be given.
SECTION 8. 
.
Chairman of the Board
The Chairman of the Board shall preside, when present, at all meetings of the Board, except as otherwise provided by law.
SECTION 9. 
.
Resignations
Any director of the Corporation may resign at any time by giving written notice thereof to the Secretary. Such resignation shall take effect at the time specified therefor or if the time is not specified, upon delivery thereof; and, unless otherwise specified with respect thereto, the acceptance of such resignation shall not be necessary to make it effective.
SECTION 10. 
.
Removal of Directors
Until the 2006 annual meeting of stockholders of the Corporation, any director may be removed solely for cause by the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, at a meeting of the stockholders called for that purpose; and the vacancy on the Board caused by any such removal may be filled by the stockholders at such meeting or at any subsequent meeting. All directors elected at and after the 2006 annual meeting of stockholders of the Corporation may be removed with or without cause by the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, at a meeting of the stockholders called for that purpose; and the vacancy on the Board caused by any such removal may be filled by the stockholders at such meeting or at any subsequent meeting.
SECTION 11. 
.
Filling of Vacancies Not Caused by Removal
In case of any increase in the number of directors, or of any vacancy created by death or resignation, the additional director or directors may be elected or, as the case may be, the vacancy or vacancies may be filled, either (a) by the Board of Directors at any meeting, (i) if the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH, or (ii) if the Corporation does not have an Interested Stockholder, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the remaining directors, though less than a quorum; or (b) by the stockholders entitled to vote, either at an annual meeting or at a special meeting thereof called for the purpose, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the outstanding shares entitled to vote at such meeting.
SECTION 12. 
.
Directors' Fees
The Board of Directors shall have authority to determine from time to time the amount of compensation which shall be paid to its members for attendance at meetings of the Board or of any committee of the Board.
 
SECTION 13. 
.
Action Without a Meeting
Any action required or permitted to be taken at any meeting of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof may be taken without a meeting if all members of the Board or committee, as the case may be, consent thereto in writing, and the writing or writings are filed with the minutes of proceedings of the Board or committee.
SECTION 1. 
.
Audit Committee
In addition to any committees appointed pursuant to Section 2 of this Article, there shall be an Audit Committee, appointed annually by the Board of Directors, consisting of at least three directors who are not members of management. It shall be the responsibility of the Audit Committee to review the scope and results of the annual independent audit of books and records of the Corporation and its subsidiaries and to discharge such other responsibilities as may from time to time be assigned to it by the Board of Directors. The Audit Committee shall meet at such times and places as the members deem advisable, and shall make such recommendations to the Board of Directors as they consider appropriate.
SECTION 2. 
.
Other Committees
2.1  The Board of Directors may appoint standing or temporary committees and invest such committees with such powers as it may see fit, with power to subdelegate such powers if deemed desirable by the Board of Directors; but no such committee shall have the power or authority of the Board of Directors to adopt, amend, or repeal the By-Laws of the Corporation or approve, adopt or recommend to the stockholders of the Corporation any action or matter expressly required by the Certificate of Incorporation, these By-Laws or the Delaware General Corporation Law to be submitted to stockholders for approval.
.
Committee Powers
2.2  The Board of Directors may designate one or more directors as alternate members of any committee, who may replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of the committee. In the absence or disqualification of a member of a committee, the member or members thereof present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, whether or not such member or members constitute a quorum, may unanimously appoint another member of the Board to act at the meeting in the place of any such absent or disqualified member.
.
Committee Members
SECTION 3. 
.
Quorum and Manner of Acting
A majority of the number of directors composing any committee of the Board of Directors, as established and fixed by resolution of the Board of Directors, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at any meeting of such committee but, if less than a majority are present at a meeting, a majority of such directors present may adjourn the meeting from time to time without further notice. The act of a majority of the members of a committee present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of such committee.
 
SECTION 1. 
.
Officers
The elected officers of the Corporation shall be a Chairman of the Board (who shall be a director) and, at the discretion of the Board, a President (who shall be a director), and one or more Vice Presidents (each of whom may be assigned by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer an additional title descriptive of the functions assigned to such officer and one or more of whom may be designated Executive or Senior Vice President). The Board may also elect one or more Vice Chairmen. The Board of Directors shall also designate either the Chairman of the Board or the President as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation. The Board of Directors shall appoint a Controller, a Secretary, and a Treasurer. Any number of offices, whether elective or appointive, may be held by the same person. The Chief Executive Officer may, by a writing filed with the Secretary, designate titles as officers for employees and agents and appoint Assistant Secretaries and Assistant Treasurers, as, from time to time, may appear to be necessary or advisable in the conduct of the affairs of the Corporation and may, in the same manner, terminate or change such titles.
SECTION 2. 
.
Term of Office
So far as practicable, all elected officers shall be elected at the annual meeting of the Board in each year, and shall hold office until the annual meeting of the Board in the next subsequent year and until their respective successors are chosen. The Controller, Secretary, and Treasurer shall hold office at the pleasure of the Board.
SECTION 3. 
.
Salaries of Elected Officers
The salaries paid to the elected officers of the Corporation shall be authorized or approved by the Board of Directors.
SECTION 4. 
.
Bonuses
None of the officers, directors, or employees of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations shall at any time be paid any bonus or share in the earnings or profits of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations except pursuant to a plan approved by affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members of the Board of Directors.
SECTION 5. 
.
Removal of Elected and Appointed Officers
Any elected or appointed officer may be removed at any time, either for or without cause, by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors, at any meeting called for the purpose.
SECTION 6. 
.
Vacancies
If any vacancy occurs in any office, the Board of Directors may elect or appoint a successor to fill such vacancy for the remainder of the term.
 
SECTION 1. 
.
Chairman of the Board
The Chairman of the Board shall preside, when present, at all meetings of the stockholders (except as otherwise provided by statute) and at all meetings of the Board of Directors. The Chairman shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation; to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the Chairman by the Board of Directors.
SECTION 2. 
.
President
The President shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation and to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; during the absence or disability of the Chairman of the Board to exercise the Chairman's powers and to perform the Chairman's duties; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the President by the Board of Directors; provided, that if the office of President is vacant, the Chairman shall exercise the duties ordinarily exercised by the President until such time as a President is elected or appointed.
SECTION 3. 
.
Chief Executive Officer
The officer designated by the Board of Directors as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation shall have general and active control of its business and affairs. The Chief Executive Officer shall have general power to appoint or designate all employees and agents of the Corporation whose appointment or designation is not otherwise provided for and to fix the compensation thereof, subject to the provisions of these By-Laws; to remove or suspend any employee or agent who shall not have been elected or appointed by the Board of Directors or other body; to suspend for cause any employee, agent, or officer, other than an elected officer, pending final action by the body which shall have appointed such employee, agent, or officer; and to exercise all the powers usually pertaining to the office held by the Chief Executive Officer of a corporation.
SECTION 4. 
.
Vice Presidents and Controller
The several Vice Presidents and the Controller shall perform all such duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of them, from time to time, by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer, respectively.
SECTION 5. 
.
Secretary
The Secretary shall attend to the giving of notice of all meetings of stockholders and of the Board of Directors and shall keep and attest true records of all proceedings thereat. The Secretary shall have charge of the corporate seal and have authority to attest any and all instruments or writings to which the same may be affixed and shall keep and account for all books, documents, papers, and records of the Corporation relating to its corporate organization. The Secretary shall have authority to sign stock certificates and shall generally perform all the duties usually appertaining to the office of secretary of a corporation. In the absence of the Secretary, an Assistant Secretary or Secretary pro tempore shall perform the duties of the Secretary.
SECTION 6. 
.
Treasurer
The Treasurer shall have the care and custody of all moneys, funds, and securities of the Corporation, and shall deposit or cause to be deposited all funds of the Corporation in accordance with directions or authorizations of the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer. The Treasurer shall have power to sign stock certificates, to indorse for deposit or collection, or otherwise, all checks, drafts, notes, bills of exchange, or other commercial paper payable to the Corporation, and to give proper receipts or discharges therefor. In the absence of the Treasurer, an Assistant Treasurer shall perform the duties of the Treasurer.
 
SECTION 7. 
.
Additional Powers and Duties
In addition to the foregoing especially enumerated duties and powers, the several officers of the Corporation shall perform such other duties and exercise such further powers as may be provided in these By-Laws or as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine, or as may be assigned to them by any superior officer.
SECTION 8. 
.
Disaster Emergency Powers of Acting Officers
If, as a result of a disaster or other state of emergency, the Chief Executive Officer is unable to perform the duties of that office, (a) the powers and duties of the Chief Executive Officer shall be performed by the employee with the highest base salary who shall be available and capable of performing such powers and duties and, if more than one such employee has the same base salary, by the employee whose surname begins with the earliest letter of the alphabet among the group of those employees with the same base salary; and (b) the officer performing such duties shall continue to perform such powers and duties until the Chief Executive Officer becomes capable of performing those duties or until the Board of Directors shall have elected a new Chief Executive Officer or designated another individual as Acting Chief Executive Officer; and (c) such officer shall have the power in addition to all other powers granted to the Chief Executive Officer by these By-Laws and by the Board of Directors to appoint an acting President, acting Vice President  Finance, acting Controller, acting Secretary, and acting Treasurer, if any of the persons duly elected to any such office is not by reason of such disaster or emergency able to perform the duties of such office, each of such acting appointees to serve in such capacities until the officer for whom the appointee is acting becomes capable of performing the duties of such office or until the Board of Directors shall have designated another individual to perform such duties or have elected another person to fill such office; and (d) any such acting officer so appointed shall be entitled to exercise all powers vested by the By-Laws or the Board of Directors in the duly elected officer for whom the acting officer is acting; and (e) anyone transacting business with this Corporation may rely upon a certification by any two officers of the Corporation that a specified individual has succeeded to the powers of the Chief Executive Officer and that such person has appointed other acting officers as herein provided and any person, firm, corporation, or other entity to which such certification has been delivered by such officers may continue to rely upon it until notified of a change in writing signed by two officers of this Corporation.
 
SECTION 1. 
.
Stock Certificates
Every stockholder shall be entitled to a certificate, signed by the Chairman of the Board or the President or a Vice President and the Treasurer or an Assistant Treasurer or the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary, certifying the number of shares owned by the stockholder in the Corporation. Any and all of the signatures on a certificate may be a facsimile. If any officer, transfer agent, or registrar who has signed or whose facsimile signature has been placed upon a certificate shall have ceased to be such officer, transfer agent, or registrar before such certificate is issued, it may be issued by the Corporation with the same effect as if he or she were such officer, transfer agent, or registrar at the date of issue.
SECTION 2. 
.
Transfer Agents and Registrars
The Board of Directors may, in its discretion, appoint responsible banks or trust companies in the Borough of Manhattan, in the City of New York, State of New York, and in such other city or cities as the Board may deem advisable, from time to time, to act as transfer agents and registrars of the stock of the Corporation; and, when such appointments shall have been made, no stock certificate shall be valid until countersigned by one of such transfer agents and registered by one of such registrars.
SECTION 3. 
.
Transfers of Stock
Shares of stock may be transferred by delivery of the certificates therefor, accompanied either by an assignment in writing on the back of the certificates or by written power of attorney to sell, assign, and transfer the same, signed by the record holder thereof; but no transfer shall affect the right of the Corporation to pay any dividend upon the stock to the holder of record thereof, or to treat the holder of record as the holder in fact thereof for all purposes, and no transfer shall be valid, except between the parties thereto, until such transfer shall have been made upon the books of the Corporation.
SECTION 4. 
.
Lost Certificates
The Board of Directors may provide for the issuance of new certificates of stock to replace certificates of stock lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, or alleged to be lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, upon such terms and in accordance with such procedures as the Board of Directors shall deem proper and prescribe.
 
SECTION 1. 
.
Fiscal Year
The fiscal year of the Corporation shall be the calendar year.
SECTION 2. (Repealed in its entirety by vote of the stockholders, May 5, 1975.)
SECTION 3. 
.
Signing of Negotiable Instruments
All bills, notes, checks, or other instruments for the payment of money shall be signed or countersigned by such officer or officers and in such manner as from time to time may be prescribed by resolution (whether general or special) of the Board of Directors.
SECTION 4. 
.
Indemnification of Directors and Officers
4.1  Each person who was or is made a party or is threatened to be made a party to or is otherwise involved (including, without limitation, as a witness) in any actual or threatened action, suit, or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative, or investigative (hereinafter a "proceeding"), by reason of the fact that he or she is or was a director or officer of the Corporation or that, being or having been such a director or officer or an employee of the Corporation, he or she is or was serving at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation as a director, officer, employee, or agent of another corporation or of a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise, including service with respect to an employee benefit plan (hereinafter an "indemnitee"), whether the basis of such proceeding is alleged action in an official capacity as such a director, officer, employee, or agent or in any other capacity while serving as such a director, officer, employee, or agent, shall be indemnified and held harmless by the Corporation to the full extent permitted by the Delaware General Corporation Law, as the same exists or may hereafter be amended (but, in the case of any such amendment, only to the extent that such amendment permits the Corporation to provide broader indemnification rights than permitted prior thereto), or by other applicable law as then in effect, against all expense, liability, and loss (including attorneys' fees, judgments, fines, ERISA excise taxes or penalties, and amounts paid in settlement) actually and reasonably incurred or suffered by such indemnitee in connection therewith and such indemnification shall continue as to an indemnitee who has ceased to be a director, officer, employee, or agent and shall inure to the benefit of the indemnitee's heirs, executors, and administrators; provided, however, that except as provided in Section 4.2 with respect to proceedings seeking to enforce rights to indemnification, the Corporation shall indemnify any such indemnitee in connection with a proceeding (or part thereof) initiated by such indemnitee only if such proceeding (or part thereof) was authorized or ratified by the Board of Directors of the Corporation. The right to indemnification conferred in this Section 4.1 shall be a contract right and shall include the right to be paid by the Corporation the expenses incurred in defending any such proceeding in advance of its final disposition (hereinafter an "advancement of expenses"); provided, however, that an advancement of expenses incurred by an indemnitee in his or her capacity as a director or officer (and not in any other capacity in which service was or is rendered by such indemnitee, including, without limitation, service to an employee benefit plan) shall be made only upon delivery to the Corporation of an under-taking (hereinafter an "undertaking"), by or on behalf of such indemnitee, to repay all amounts so advanced if it shall ultimately be determined by final judicial decision from which there is no further right to appeal that such indemnitee is not entitled to be indemnified for such expenses under this Section 4.1 or otherwise; and provided, further, that an advancement of expenses shall not be made if the Corporation's Board of Directors makes a good faith determination that such payment would violate law or public policy.
.
Right to Indemnification
4.2  If a claim under Section 4.1 is not paid in full by the Corporation within sixty days after a written claim has been received by the Corporation, except in the case of a claim for an advancement of expenses, in which case the applicable period shall be twenty days, the indemnitee may at any time thereafter bring suit against the Corporation to recover the unpaid amount of the claim. If successful in whole or in part in any such suit, or in a suit brought by the Corporation to recover an advancement of expenses pursuant to the terms of an undertaking, the indemnitee shall also be entitled to be paid the expense of prosecuting or defending such suit. The indemnitee shall be presumed to be entitled to indemnification under this Section 4 upon submission of a written claim (and, in an action brought to enforce a claim for an advancement of expenses, where the required undertaking has been tendered to the Corporation), and thereafter the Corporation shall have the burden of proof to overcome the presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled. Neither the failure of the Corporation (including its
.
Right of Indemnitee to Bring Suit
 
Board of Directors, independent legal counsel, or its stockholders) to have made a determination prior to the commencement of such suit that indemnification of the indemnitee is proper in the circumstances, nor an actual determination by the Corporation (including its Board of Directors, independent legal counsel, or its stockholders) that the indemnitee is not entitled to indemnification shall be a defense to the suit or create a presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled.
4.3  The rights to indemnification and to the advancement of expenses conferred in this Section 4 shall not be exclusive of any other right which any person may have or hereafter acquire under any statute, provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation, By-Laws, agreement, vote of stockholders or disinterested directors, or otherwise. Notwithstanding any amendment to or repeal of this Section 4, or of any of the procedures established by the Board of Directors pursuant to Section 4.7, any indemnitee shall be entitled to indemnification in accordance with the provisions hereof and thereof with respect to any acts or omissions of such indemnitee occurring prior to such amendment or repeal.
.
Nonexclusivity of Rights
4.4  The Corporation may maintain insurance, at its expense, to protect itself and any director, officer, employee, or agent of the Corporation or another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise against any expense, liability, or loss, whether or not the Corporation would have the power to indemnify such person against such expense, liability, or loss under the Delaware General Corporation Law. The Corporation may, without further stockholder approval, enter into contracts with any indemnitee in furtherance of the provisions of this Section 4 and may create a trust fund, grant a security interest, or use other means (including, without limitation, a letter of credit) to ensure the payment of such amounts as may be necessary to effect indemnification as provided in this Section 4.
.
Insurance, Contracts, and Funding
4.5  Any person who is or was a director, officer, or employee of the Corporation who is or was serving (i) as a director or officer of another corporation of which a majority of the shares entitled to vote in the election of its directors is held by the Corporation or (ii) in an executive or management capacity in a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise of which the Corporation or a wholly owned subsidiary of the Corporation is a general partner or has a majority ownership shall be deemed to be so serving at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation and entitled to indemnification and advancement of expenses under Section 4.1.
.
Persons Serving Other Entities
4.6  The Corporation may, by action of its Board of Directors, authorize one or more executive officers to grant rights to advancement of expenses to employees or agents of the Corporation on such terms and conditions as such officer or officers deem appropriate under the circumstances. The Corporation may, by action of its Board of Directors, grant rights to indemnification and advancement of expenses to employees or agents or groups of employees or agents of the Corporation with the same scope and effect as the provisions of this Section 4 with respect to the indemnification and advancement of expenses of directors and officers of the Corporation; provided, however, that an undertaking shall be made by an employee or agent only if required by the Board of Directors.
.
Indemnification of Employees and Agents of the Corporation
4.7  The Board of Directors may establish reasonable procedures for the submission of claims for indemnification pursuant to this Section 4, determination of the entitlement of any person thereto, and review of any such determination. Such procedures shall be set forth in an appendix to these By-Laws and shall be deemed for all purposes to be a part hereof.
.
Procedures for the Submission of Claims
 
SECTION 1. 
.
Amendment of the By-Laws: General
Except as herein otherwise expressly provided, the By-Laws of the Corporation may be altered or repealed in any particular and new By-Laws, not inconsistent with any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or any provision of law, may be adopted, either by
(A) the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority in number of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote at an annual meeting of stockholders or at a special meeting thereof, the notice of which special meeting shall include the form of the proposed alteration or repeal or of the proposed new By-Laws, or a summary thereof; or
(B) either by
 
 
 
SECTION 2. 
.
Amendments as to Compensation and Removal of Officers
Notwithstanding anything contained in these By-Laws to the contrary, the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the Voting Stock, as defined in Article FOURTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, at a meeting of the stockholders called for the purpose, shall be required to alter, amend, repeal, or adopt any provision inconsistent with Sections 3, 4 and 5 of Article IV hereof, notice of which meeting shall include the form of the proposed amendment, or a summary thereof.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
Boeing Board Elects Medtronic Chairman and CEO Collins as New Member
CHICAGO, March 1, 2007 - The Boeing Company's [NYSE: BA] board of directors has elected Arthur D. Collins Jr., chairman and chief executive officer of Medtronic, Inc., as a new member of the board, effective immediately. He has been appointed to the board's audit and finance committees.
Collins, 59, has been CEO of Medtronic since April 2001 and chairman since April 2002. In August he will pass the CEO role to a successor and remain as a director and chairman of the board. He joined the company in 1992 as president, Medtronic International with responsibility for all Medtronic operations outside the United States. Collins came to Medtronic after 14 years with Abbott Laboratories where he was corporate vice president with responsibility for Abbott's worldwide diagnostic business units, and held a number of management positions in the United States and Europe.
Before joining Abbott, Collins was a consultant with Booz, Allen & Hamilton in Chicago, working for clients in the areas of business strategy development, marketing, organization planning, financial analysis and financial systems design.
Prior to his business career, Collins served as a U.S. naval officer, completing Officers Candidate School as a Distinguished Naval Graduate.
"Art Collins is an accomplished businessman with diverse experience, a record of achievement and a global perspective," said Jim McNerney, Boeing chairman, president and CEO. "He's a terrific addition to an already strong and independent board."
Collins holds a Bachelor of Science degree and an honorary Doctor of Laws degree from Miami University in Oxford, Ohio, and an M.B.A. from the Wharton School at the University of Pennsylvania, where he was a member of the undergraduate faculty.
The election of Collins brings the Boeing board to 11 members.
Contacts: John Dern, 312-544-2002

Exhibit 99.2
The Boeing Company Corporate Governance Principles
In order to help shareholders understand the roles and responsibilities of the Board of Directors and the Company's governance practices, the following is a description of the Company's corporate governance principles and current practices. The Governance, Organization and Nominating Committee reviews these practices regularly.
Responsibilities of the Board
Role of the Board
The Company's business is conducted by its employees, managers and corporate officers led by the Chief Executive Officer ("CEO"), with oversight from the Board. The Board selects the CEO and works with the CEO to elect/appoint other corporate officers who are charged with managing the business of the Company. The Board has the responsibility of overseeing, counseling and directing the corporate officers to ensure that the long-term interests of the Company and its shareholders are being served. The Board and the corporate officers recognize that the long-term interests of the Company and its shareholders are advanced when they take into account the concerns of employees, customers, suppliers and communities.
Board Responsibilities
The basic responsibility of the directors is to exercise their reasonable business judgment on behalf of the Company. In discharging this obligation, directors rely on, among other things, the Company's corporate officers, outside advisors and auditors.
The Board's general oversight responsibilities include, but are not limited to, the following: (1) evaluate the CEO's performance and review the Company's succession plan for the CEO and other elected officers; (2) review the long-range business plans of the Company and monitor performance relative to achievement of those plans; (3) consider long-range strategic issues and risks to the Company; and (4) approve policies of corporate conduct that continue to promote and maintain the integrity of the Company. In addition, the Board shall be knowledgeable about the content and operation of Boeing's ethics and compliance program, and shall exercise reasonable oversight with respect to its implementation and effectiveness.
CEO Performance Evaluation
At the end of each year, the CEO presents his performance objectives for the upcoming year to the nonemployee directors for their approval. The nonemployee directors then meet privately to discuss the CEO's performance for the current year against his current performance objectives; they review that evaluation with the CEO. The Compensation Committee uses this performance evaluation in the course of its deliberations when considering the CEO's compensation in accordance with the policies and procedures in that Committee's charter.
CEO and Management Succession
The Board views CEO selection and management succession as one of its most important responsibilities. The CEO reports annually to the Governance, Organization and Nominating Committee on planning for CEO succession. The Board also reviews and monitors the plan of succession for elected officers. When succession of the CEO occurs, this Committee manages the process of identifying and selecting the new CEO with the full participation of each of the nonemployee directors.
It has been the policy of the Company that the Board should determine whether the positions of CEO and Chairman should be held by the same person. The Board believes that it is in the best interests of the Company to make such a determination when it elects a new CEO. Because the CEO currently holds the position of Chairman, the Board has appointed a lead director.
Ethics and Conflicts of Interest
The Board expects the directors, officers and employees to act ethically at all times and acknowledge their adherence to the policies comprising the Company's codes of ethical conduct. Shareholders may access a copy of each code of ethical conduct on the Company's web site at www.boeing.com/corp-gov/. The Board will promptly disclose any waivers from the Company's Code of Ethical Business Conduct, which applies to the Board. If an actual or potential conflict of interest arises for a director, the director shall promptly inform the Chairman of the Board or the Chairperson of the Governance, Organization and Nominating Committee. All directors will recuse themselves from any discussion or decision affecting their personal, business or professional interests. If the Board exercises its right to grant a waiver from the Company's code of Ethical Conduct for any officer or other employee, such waiver shall also be promptly disclosed. The Company shall not, directly or indirectly, extend or maintain credit, arrange for or renew an extension of credit in the form of a personal loan to or for any director or executive officer.
Board's Interaction With Stakeholders
The CEO and other corporate officers are responsible for establishing effective communications with the Company's stakeholders, including shareholders, customers, communities, employees, suppliers, creditors, governments and corporate partners. It is the policy of the Board that management speaks for the Company. This policy, however, does not preclude independent directors from meeting with stakeholders, but it is the norm that, where appropriate, directors notify and consult with management before any such meetings.
Board Composition
Board Size and Composition
At least 75% of the Board shall meet the NYSE criteria for independence or be non-employee directors. Shareholders may access a copy of the Company's Director Independence Standards on the Company's website at www.boeing.com/corp-gov/. The Governance, Organization and Nominating Committee reviews annually the appropriate skills and characteristics required of Board members in light of the current make-up of the Board. This assessment includes issues of expertise (including international experience and industry background), independence, integrity, diversity and age, as well as skills relating to operations, manufacturing, finance, marketing, technology and public policy. The Committee has not established specific minimum eligibility requirements for Board members other than integrity, the commitment to act in the best interests of all shareholders, requirements relating to age and ensuring that a substantial majority of the Board remains independent.
 
Selection of Directors
The shareholders of the Company vote on the nominees, as proposed by the Board, for election as directors at the annual meeting of shareholders. Shareholders may propose director nominees in accordance with the procedures set forth in the Company's By-Laws and the charter of the Governance, Organization and Nominating Committee. The screening process for nominees is handled by the Governance, Organization and Nominating Committee in accordance with the policies and principles in its charter with direct input from the other directors. Between the annual meeting of shareholders, the Board has authority under the By-Laws to fill vacant positions and to determine in which class that director should be placed.
Effect of a Failure to Receive a Majority of the Votes in Director Elections.
In accordance with the Company's By-Laws, if none of the Company's shareholders provides the Company notice of an intention to nominate one or more candidates to compete with the Board's nominees in a director election, or if the Company's shareholders have withdrawn all such nominations on or prior to the tenth day preceding the date the Company mails its notice of meeting to shareholders, a nominee must receive more votes cast for than against his or her election or re-election in order to be elected or re-elected to the Board. The Board shall nominate for re-election as directors only incumbent candidates who tender, prior to the mailing of the proxy statement for the annual meeting at which they are to be re-elected as directors, irrevocable resignations that will be effective upon (i) the failure to receive the required vote at any annual meeting at which they are nominated for re-election and (ii) Board acceptance of such resignation. In addition, the Board shall fill director vacancies and new directorships only with candidates who tender, at or prior to the time of their appointment to the Board, the same form of resignation tendered by other directors in accordance with this Guideline.
The Governance, Organization and Nominating Committee (or such other committee as the Board may appoint) shall make a recommendation to the Board as to whether to accept or reject the tendered resignation, or whether other action should be taken. The Board shall act on the tendered resignation, taking into account the recommendation of such committee, and publicly disclose (by a press release, a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission or other broadly disseminated means of communication) its decision regarding the tendered resignation within ninety days from the date of the certification of the election results. The committee in making its recommendation, and the Board in making its decision, may each consider any factors or other information that it considers appropriate and relevant, including whether the acceptance of any resignation would cause the Company to fail to comply with any requirement of the New York Stock Exchange or any rule or regulation promulgated under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The director whose resignation is under consideration shall not participate in the recommendation of the committee with respect to his or her resignation. If such incumbent director's resignation is not accepted by the Board, the director shall continue to serve until the next annual meeting and until his or her successor is duly elected, or his or her earlier resignation or removal. If a director's resignation is accepted by the Board, then the Board, in its sole discretion, may fill any resulting vacancy or may decrease the size of the Board.
Lead Director
The Board has selected an independent director to serve as Lead Director. The Lead Director is elected annually by a majority of the independent directors upon a recommendation from the Governance, Organization and Nominating Committee. The responsibilities of the Lead Director
 
can be accessed on the Company's website at www.boeing.com/corp-gov/. Shareholders may communicate with the Lead Director by writing to the Office of the Corporate Secretary, Boeing Corporate Headquarters, 100 North Riverside Plaza, 311Al, MC 5003-1001, Chicago, Illinois 60606-1596.
Outside Board Memberships
The CEO and other elected officers must seek the approval of the Governance, Organization and Nominating Committee before accepting outside board memberships with for-profit entities. While the Company acknowledges the value in having directors and officers with significant experience in other businesses and activities, each director is expected to ensure that other commitments, including outside board memberships, do not interfere with their duties and responsibilities as a member of the Company's Board. Directors should notify the Governance, Organization and Nominating Committee before accepting an invitation to serve on another board to enable the Company to consider whether (1) any regulatory issues or potential conflicts are raised by the director accepting such an invitation and (2) the director will have the time required for preparation, participation and attendance at Board meetings. Directors who also serve as CEOs or in equivalent positions should not serve on more than two boards of public companies in addition to the Company's Board and other directors should not serve on more than four other boards of public companies in addition to the Board.
Director Retirement
Each nonemployee director must retire at the annual meeting following his or her 72nd birthday. Directors who change the occupation they held when initially elected are expected to offer to resign from the Board. At that time, the Governance, Organization and Nominating Committee reviews the continued appropriateness of Board membership under the new circumstances. Unless waived by the Board, the Board has adopted a policy calling for employee directors, including the CEO, to retire from the Board at the time of a change in his or her status as an officer of the Company.
Director Compensation and Stock Ownership
It is the general policy of the Board that its compensation should be a mix of cash and equity-based compensation with a significant portion of such compensation in the form of the Company's stock or stock-equivalent units. Nonemployee directors receive a substantial portion of their compensation in deferred stock units, which must be held until retirement or other termination of Board service. The components of director compensation, along with the nonemployee director stock ownership guidelines, are disclosed in the Company's proxy statement, a copy of which may be accessed on the Company's website at www.boeing.com/investor_relations/.
The form and amount of director compensation will be determined by the Governance, Organization and Nominating Committee. The Committee regularly reviews and compares the Company's Board compensation to director compensation at peer companies that are also benchmarks for the Company's executive compensation program. Independent directors may not receive, directly or indirectly, any consulting, advisory or other compensatory fees from the Company. Directors who are employees of the Company do not receive any compensation for their service as directors.
 
Board and Committee Meetings
Board Agenda and Meetings
The CEO and the committee chairpersons establish the agendas for Board and committee meetings. The Lead Director shall review the Board and committee agendas, as appropriate. Each director is free to suggest items for the agenda, and each director is free to raise at any Board meeting subjects that are not on the agenda for that meeting. Information and data that are important to the Board's understanding of the matters to be covered at a Board meeting will be distributed to the directors before the meeting. Directors should review in advance any materials sent to them in order to take part in a meaningful deliberation at the meeting. Directors are expected to attend all Board meetings, as well as the annual meeting of shareholders.
Executive Sessions
The nonemployee directors have the opportunity to meet in executive session to consider such matters as they deem appropriate, without management being present, as a regularly scheduled agenda item for every Board meeting. Among the items that the nonemployee directors meet privately in executive sessions to review is the performance of the CEO and recommendations of the Compensation Committee concerning compensation for employee directors and other elected officers. The Lead Director acts as the chair of the executive sessions of the nonemployee directors.
Director Access to Officers and Employees
Directors have full and free access to officers and employees of the Company.
Committees of the Board
The Board has the following five committees: Audit, Compensation, Finance, Special Programs, and Governance, Organization and Nominating. All members of the Audit, Compensation, and Governance, Organization and Nominating Committees of the Board shall be non-employees and meet the criteria for independence of the NYSE. Chairpersons and members of these five committees are rotated regularly, as appropriate. Members of the Audit Committee regularly meet privately with representatives of Deloitte & Touche LLP, the Company's independent auditors, and with the Company vice president responsible for carrying out the internal audit function. The Audit Committee shall report to the Board, no less than annually, with respect to the implementation and effectiveness of Boeing's ethics and compliance program to support the Board's oversight responsibility.
Each committee has a written charter, approved by the Board, which describes the committee's general authority and responsibilities. Shareholders may access a copy of each committee charter on the Company's website at www.boeing.com/corp-gov/. The committee chair reports on the items discussed and actions taken at their meetings to the Board following each committee meeting. Committee materials are provided to the committee members in advance of the meeting so as to allow members time to prepare for a discussion of the items at the meeting. Each committee undertakes an annual review of its charter and works with the Board to make appropriate revisions. The Board may, from time to time, establish and maintain additional committees. Members of the Board's committees are expected to attend all meetings.
 
Independent Advice
The Board and its committees may seek legal, financial or other expert advice from a source independent of management.
Confidential Voting
It is the Company's policy that all proxy, ballot and voting materials that identify the vote of a specific shareholder on any matter submitted for a vote of shareholders will be kept secret from directors and officers of the Company, except (1) when disclosure is required by applicable law or regulation, (2) when a shareholder expressly requests such disclosure, or (3) in a contested proxy solicitation of the shareholder is an employee of the Company or a participant in the Company's stock fund or one of its retirement, savings or employee stock ownership plans, the information will not be disclosed to management unless clause (1) or (2) above applies.
Board and Committee Performance Evaluation
With the goal of increasing the effectiveness of the Board and its relationship to management, the Governance, Organization and Nominating Committee evaluates the Board's performance as a whole. The evaluation process, which occurs annually, includes a survey of the individual views of all directors, which are then shared with the full Board. In addition, each of the committees performs a similar annual self-evaluation.
Director Orientation and Continuing Education
All new directors must participate in the Company's Orientation Program, which should be conducted within six months of election. This orientation will include presentations by senior management to familiarize new directors with the Company's strategic plans, significant financial, accounting and risk management issues, compliance programs, the Code of Ethical Business Conduct, its principal officers, and internal and independent auditors. In addition, the Orientation Program will include visits to Company headquarters and, to the extent practical, the Company's significant facilities. A third-party continuing education program will be scheduled in conjunction with Board or committee meetings, as appropriate. In addition, Board members shall receive training on at least an annual basis in conjunction with regularly scheduled Board meetings, on topics relating to corporate governance policies and roles and responsibilities of Board members. Board members shall have at least one annual on-site visit to a Boeing operating unit, familiarizing Board members on operations of that unit and facilitating direct interaction between Board members and operating personnel as appropriate. All directors are also encouraged to attend, at the Company's expense, director continuing education programs offered by various organizations. The Corporate Secretary will inform the directors of such educational opportunities.
Shareholder Rights Plan
Boeing does not have a shareholder rights plan and has no present intention to adopt one. Subject to its continuing fiduciary duties, which may dictate otherwise depending on the circumstances, the Board shall submit the adoption of any future rights plan to a vote of the shareholders. Any shareholder rights plan adopted without shareholder approval shall be approved by a majority of the independent members of the Board. If the Board adopts a rights plan without prior shareholder approval, the Board shall, within one year, either submit the plan to a vote of the shareholders or redeem the plan or cause it to expire of the rights plan is not approved by a majority of the votes cast on this issue, the plan will immediately terminate.
 
Clawback Policy
The Board shall, in all appropriate circumstances, require reimbursement of any annual incentive payment or long-term incentive payment to an executive officer where: (1) the payment was predicated upon achieving certain financial results that were subsequently the subject of a substantial restatement of Company financial statements filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission; (2) the Board determines the executive engaged in intentional misconduct that caused or substantially caused the need for the substantial restatement; and (3) a lower payment would have been made to the executive based upon the restated financial results. In each such instance, the Company will, to the extent practicable, seek to recover from the individual executive the amount by which the individual executive's incentive payments for the relevant period exceeded the lower payment that would have been made based on the restated financial results. For purposes of this policy, the term "executive officer" means any officer who has been designated an executive officer by the Board.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20070425093738.txt.gz
TIME:20070425093738
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
 
(a) On April 25, 2007, The Boeing Company issued a press release announcing its financial results for the first quarter of 2007.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
(a) Not applicable
 
(b) Not applicable
 
(c) Not applicable
 
(d) Exhibits
 
99.1    Press Release of The Boeing Company dated April 25, 2007, reporting Boeing's financial results for the first quarter of 2007.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Boeing First-Quarter EPS Up 28 Percent, Backlog Grows to Record $262 Billion
 
 
 
 
 
Table 1. Summary Financial Results
 
 The Boeing Company's [NYSE: BA] first-quarter net earnings increased 27 percent to $877 million, or $1.13 per share (Table 1). Revenue grew 8 percent to $15.4 billion and earnings from operations rose 36 percent to $1.3 billion, yielding an 8.5 percent operating margin.
CHICAGO, April 25, 2007
The higher first-quarter operating margin reflects the company's exit from the Connexion by Boeing business and lower expense from compensation plan changes, both of which were implemented and disclosed during 2006. The margin also reflects a planned and previously disclosed increase in research and development spending, which is expected to moderate later this year. Given anticipated performance for the remainder of the year, including growth in airplane deliveries and expansion of business unit margins, Boeing reaffirmed its financial guidance for 2007 and 2008.
 
Boeing's backlog at quarter-end reached a record $262 billion, up 23 percent in the last twelve months due to continued strength in commercial airplane orders and additional defense orders.
"These results are in line with our expectations for the quarter and represent solid progress toward the high goals we have for ourselves in 2007 and beyond," said Boeing Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer Jim McNerney. "Our record backlog, increasing productivity, and the progress of our development programs have us on track to achieve our growth and profitability objectives."
Table 2. Cash Flow
 
Operating cash flow was $0.7 billion (Table 2), reflecting higher net earnings offset by a planned $509 million pension contribution, planned increases in working capital, and the timing of receipts. Cash and investments in marketable securities totaled $8.1 billion at March 31, down from $9.3 billion at the end of 2006 (Table 3). Boeing repaid $0.8 billion of maturing Boeing Capital Corporation (BCC) debt, made planned investments in its core businesses, and contributed to its pension as described above. The BCC repayment reduced total debt by 8 percent.
The company spent $360 million repurchasing 4.0 million shares during the quarter, leaving $2.0 billion remaining under the current repurchase authorization.
Table 3. Cash, Marketable Securities and Debt Balances
 
 
Segment Results
Commercial Airplanes
Boeing Commercial Airplanes (BCA) first-quarter revenues increased 7 percent to $7.6 billion on an 8 percent increase in deliveries to 106 airplanes, as well as higher commercial aviation services revenue (Table 4). BCA delivered a higher proportion of single-aisle airplanes than in last year's first quarter. Operating earnings were $706 million and operating margins were 9.3 percent. Margins in the latest quarter reflect higher operating leverage and productivity improvements offset by planned R&D spending that was $258 million higher than in the first quarter of 2006. R&D is forecast to decline in the second half of the year which, along with increased airplane deliveries, is expected to drive BCA margin expansion consistent with company guidance.
Table 4. Commercial Airplanes Operating Results
 
BCA booked 189 gross orders during the quarter. Its contractual backlog rose to a record $188 billion, increasing 42 percent in the last year to more than six times its 2006 revenues.
The 787 program has won 544 firm orders to date from 44 customers, the most ever achieved by a commercial jet program within three years of program launch. The program achieved important development milestones during the quarter, including delivery of large structural sections in preparation for final assembly beginning next month and the first flight of the second Dreamlifter freighter. The program continues to address pressures with respect to weight, schedule and supplier implementation as it moves into the very critical final assembly and software and systems integration phases. Rollout of the first airplane is scheduled in July, first flight is targeted for late August and entry into service is scheduled for May 2008. While risks inherent in the latter stages of major airplane development programs remain for the 787, Boeing continues to expect the 787 will be delivered on time and in accord with its contractual obligations.
 
Integrated Defense Systems
Boeing Integrated Defense Systems (IDS) revenues grew 7 percent during the quarter to $7.7 billion generating operating earnings of $784 million and an operating margin of 10.2 percent. IDS results reflect higher volume across all segments and productivity improvements, offset by a change in product mix and fewer benefits from contract closeouts compared to the year ago quarter.
Precision Engagement & Mobility Systems revenue grew 6 percent to $3.3 billion on higher deliveries from the F/A-18 and Chinook programs and increased volume on the P-8A Poseidon and F-22, partially offset by lower Apache revenues. Operating margin was 12.9 percent, which reflects the impact of aircraft delivery and product mix in the quarter, and the absence of favorable contract closeouts mentioned above.
Network & Space Systems achieved significant milestones on several key development programs such as Future Combat Systems and Ground-based Missile Defense (GMD). First-quarter revenues increased 4 percent to $2.9 billion on increased volume in satellites and GMD programs, which offset the expected loss of reported revenue from the recent formation of the United Launch Alliance (ULA) joint venture. Operating margin was 5.7 percent in the quarter, which included adjustments related to the ULA joint venture and revised cost estimates on satellite programs.
Table 5. Integrated Defense Systems Operating Results
 
Support Systems again generated strong profits on its broad portfolio of services and logistics programs. Revenues for the quarter increased 17 percent to $1.6 billion while operating earnings increased to $200 million resulting in a 12.6 percent operating margin. Results reflect higher volume on integrated logistics programs, maintenance, modification & upgrades, and international support programs.
 
IDS' backlog at quarter-end was $73.6 billion as progress continued on large multi-year contracts.
Boeing Capital Corporation
Boeing Capital Corporation (BCC) increased pre-tax earnings to $73 million on continued improvement in aircraft valuations, while revenues declined consistent with the portfolio (Table 6). BCC's portfolio balance at the end of the first quarter was $7.9 billion, down from $8.0 billion at the end of the fourth quarter of 2006 and $9.0 billion a year ago on normal portfolio run-off, asset sales and depreciation.
BCC contributed $173 million in cash to the company (dividends and return of capital) during the quarter. BCC also repaid 14 percent of its outstanding debt during the quarter as $0.8 billion of long-term debt matured. As a result, BCC's debt-to-equity ratio remained steady at 5.0-to-1.
Table 6. Boeing Capital Corporation Operating Results
 
Additional Information
The "Other" segment consists primarily of Boeing Engineering, Operations and Technology and the Connexion business (which was closed at the end of 2006), as well as certain results related to the consolidation of all business units. Other segment expense was $2 million in the first quarter, a significant improvement from a $61 million loss in the same period last year which included $56 million of expense from Connexion.
Total unallocated expense in the quarter decreased to $252 million from $570 million in the first quarter of 2006. These results reflect lower share-based plans and deferred compensation expense, and increased pension expense. Unallocated share-based-plans expense was $36 million and deferred compensation was $10 million, both down sharply from the same period of 2006 due to higher stock price appreciation in the year-ago quarter and changes in the company's long-term compensation plans
 
implemented last year. Pension expense for the quarter was $252 million, of which $130 million was recorded in unallocated expense and the balance was recorded as expense at BCA and IDS.
Boeing's pension plans are fully funded on a projected benefit obligation basis, and cash contribution requirements for the pension plans are expected to be modest over the next few years.
Outlook
The company's financial guidance for 2007 and 2008 is reaffirmed as indicated below and summarized in Table 7, reflecting strong performance from core businesses, higher commercial airplane deliveries, lower R&D in 2008, and company wide productivity gains.
Boeing's 2007 revenue guidance is between $64.5 billion and $65 billion, and 2008 revenue guidance is between $71 billion and $72 billion. Earnings per share guidance remains between $4.55 and $4.75 per share for 2007 and $5.55 to $5.75 per share for 2008. Operating cash flow for 2007 is expected to be greater than $4 billion, while cash flow guidance for 2008 is expected to exceed $7 billion.
Commercial Airplanes' deliveries in 2007 are expected to be between 440 to 445 airplanes and are sold out. Revenue guidance for 2007 is between $32.5 billion and $33 billion, and operating margin guidance is greater than 10 percent. Airplane deliveries in 2008 are expected to be between 515 and 520 airplanes and are essentially sold out. Commercial Airplanes' revenue in 2008 is expected to grow to between $39 billion and $40 billion accompanied by margin expansion to approximately 11 percent. The company expects airplane deliveries in 2009 to be higher than in 2008.
IDS revenue guidance for 2007 is approximately $31 billion and excludes approximately $1 billion of launch business revenue due to the transfer of launch activity into the ULA joint venture. Operating margins are expected to expand to approximately 11 percent in 2007. For 2008, IDS expects revenue to grow to between $32 billion and $33 billion, with operating margins of approximately 11 percent.
Boeing's research and development forecast for 2007 is unchanged at between $3.2 billion and $3.4 billion, with an expected decline in 2008 to between $2.8 billion and $3.0 billion. Annual capital expenditures are expected to be approximately $1.6 billion in 2007 and in 2008.
 
The company's non-cash pension expense is expected to be approximately $1.1 billion for 2007 and approximately $0.9 billion for 2008. The company expects pension expense to continue to decline after the guidance period with 2009 pension expense likely to be approximately half of the 2008 level. Discretionary funding of Boeing's pension plans is expected to be approximately $500 million per year in 2007 and 2008. The company contributed $500 million during the first quarter of 2007. The company will continue to evaluate making additional discretionary contributions to its pension plans.
Table 7. Financial Outlook
 
 
Non-GAAP Measure Disclosure
Management believes that the non-GAAP (Generally Accepted Accounting Principles) measures (indicated by an asterisk *) used in this report provide investors with important perspectives into the company's ongoing business performance. The company does not intend for the information to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the related GAAP measure. Other companies may define the measure differently. The following definitions are provided:
Free Cash Flow
Free cash flow is defined as GAAP less capital expenditures for . Management believes free cash flow provides investors with an important perspective on the cash available for shareholders, debt repayment, and acquisitions after making the capital investments required to support ongoing business operations and long term value creation. Free cash flow does not represent the residual cash flow available for discretionary expenditures as it excludes certain mandatory expenditures such as repayment of maturing debt. Management uses free cash flow internally to assess both business performance and overall liquidity. Table 2 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and free cash flow.
operating cash flow
property, plant and equipment, additions
 
Certain statements in this report may constitute "forward-looking" statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Forward-looking statements in this press release include, among others, statements regarding future results as a result of our growth and productivity initiatives, our 2007 and 2008 financial outlook and the benefits of the new IDS structure. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions as to future events that may not prove to be accurate. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak only as of the date they were made and we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise. Our actual results and future trends may differ materially depending on a variety of factors, including the continued operation, viability and growth of major airline customers and non-airline customers (such as the U.S. Government); adverse developments in the value of collateral securing customer and other financings; the occurrence of any significant collective bargaining labor dispute; our successful execution of internal performance plans including our company-wide growth and productivity initiatives, production rate increases and decreases (including any reduction in or termination of an aircraft product), availability of raw materials, acquisition and divestiture plans, and other cost-reduction and productivity efforts; charges from any future SFAS No. 142 review; ability to meet development, production and certification schedules for the 787 program; technical or quality issues in development programs (affecting schedule and cost estimates) or in the satellite industry; an adverse development in rating agency credit ratings or assessments; the actual outcomes of certain pending sales campaigns and the timely launch of the 787 program and U.S. and foreign government procurement activities, including the uncertainty associated with the procurement of tankers by the U.S. Department of Defense (DoD) and funding of the C-17 program; the cyclical nature of some of our businesses; unanticipated financial market changes which may impact pension plan assumptions; domestic and international competition in the defense, space and commercial areas; continued integration of acquired businesses; performance issues with key suppliers, subcontractors and customers; significant disruption to air travel worldwide (including future terrorist attacks); global trade policies; worldwide political stability; domestic and international economic conditions; price escalation; the outcome of political and legal processes, changing priorities or reductions in the U.S. Government or foreign government defense and space budgets; termination of government or commercial contracts due to unilateral government or customer action or failure to perform; legal, financial and governmental risks related to international transactions; legal and investigatory proceedings; tax settlements with the IRS and various states; U.S. Air Force review of previously awarded contracts; costs associated with the exit of the Connexion by Boeing business; and other economic, political and technological risks and uncertainties. Additional information regarding these factors is contained in our SEC filings, including, without limitation, our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2006.
Contact:
Investor Relations: David Dohnalek or Rob Young (312) 544-2140
Communications:    Anne Eisele or Todd Blecher (312) 544-2002
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20070504163305.txt.gz
TIME:20070504163305
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
Item 8.01 Other Events
On May 3, 2007, the U.S. Court of Federal Claims issued a decision upholding the government's default termination of the A-12 contract. This is the latest decision relating to litigation begun in 1991 resulting from the A-12 contract termination.
The Company disagrees with this most recent ruling and continues to believe that the government's default termination was not justified. The Company also believes that the ruling raises serious issues for appeal, and has filed a Notice of Appeal with the Court.
Final resolution of the A-12 litigation will depend on the outcome of further proceedings or possible negotiations with the government.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: May 4, 2007
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20070504163645.txt.gz
TIME:20070504163645
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
On May 4, 2007, The Boeing Company (the "Company") announced that Richard D. Nanula resigned as a Director of the Company. Mr. Nanula was a member of the Audit, Finance and Special Programs Committees. Mr. Nanula has confirmed that his resignation was not due to a disagreement with the Company on any matter relating to the Company's operations, policies or practices. Mr. Nanula's resignation is effective immediately.
 
The Company's press release announcing Mr. Nanula's resignation is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
Dated: May 4, 2007
 
 
 

Boeing Director Nanula Resigns from Board
CHICAGO, May 4, 2007  Richard D. Nanula today resigned from The Boeing Company's board of directors. Nanula, former executive vice president and chief financial officer of Amgen, had served on the board since January 2005.
"We are grateful to Richard for his service to the board and we wish him well," said Boeing Chairman, President and CEO Jim McNerney.
Contact: Tim Neale, 312-544-2002


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20070627161758.txt.gz
TIME:20070627161758
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.02. Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
Effective June 21, 2007, the Board of Directors of The Boeing Company ("" or the ""), upon the recommendation of the Governance, Organization and Nominating Committee, elected retired Marine Corps General James L. Jones, former Supreme Allied Commander Europe, and Commander of the United States European Command, as a new director. General Jones has served as the President and Chief Executive Officer of the Institute for 21
Boeing
Company
st
Century Energy, an affiliate of the U.S. Chamber of Commerce, since March 2007. He served as the Supreme Allied Commander Europe, and Commander of the United States European Command from January 2003 to February 2007. Previously, General Jones served as the 32
nd
Commandant of the United States Marine Corps from July 1999 to January 2003. General Jones will be proposed to shareholders at the 2008 Annual Meeting of Shareholders for election as a director. General Jones will serve on the Audit Committee and the Finance Committee. There was no arrangement or understanding between General Jones and any other persons pursuant to which General Jones was selected as a director, and there are no related person transactions between General Jones and the Company.
General Jones will receive the standard compensation provided to all Boeing nonemployee directors. This compensation consists of a cash retainer fee of $75,000 per year and a grant of retainer stock units equal in number to the number of shares of Boeing stock that could be purchased with an aggregate of $130,000 per year. The Company reimburses nonemployee directors for actual travel and out-of-pocket expenses incurred in connection with their services. The nonemployee director compensation program is described in further detail in the Company's proxy statement for its 2007 Annual Meeting filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 23, 2007. A copy of the Company's press release announcing the election of General Jones is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

EXHIBIT 99.1
 
 
Gen. Jim Jones, Former Head of U.S. and NATO Forces in Europe, Joins Boeing Board
CHICAGO, June 26, 2007  Jim McNerney, chairman, president and CEO of The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA], today announced the election of retired Marine Corps Gen. James L. Jones, 63, to the Boeing board of directors, effective immediately.
Gen. Jones, former Supreme Allied Commander Europe, and Commander of the United States European Command, currently is President and CEO of the Institute for 21
st
Century Energy, an affiliate of the U.S. Chamber of Commerce in Washington, D.C. He began his association with the institute on March 1 of this year after 40 years of active duty military service.
"We are very pleased to add an individual with such outstanding leadership qualities as Gen. Jones to our board," McNerney said in making the announcement. "With his many years of service to our country and allies around the world, he has an in-depth understanding of military and global affairs. As a result of the work he is doing for the institute, he also is knowledgeable about the energy and climate change issues that are so important to the future of all of us," McNerney added.
Gen. Jones has a bachelor of science degree from the School of Foreign Service at Georgetown University as well as an honorary doctorate from the same university. Following graduation in 1966, he was commissioned as a second lieutenant in the Marine Corps, served in Vietnam, and was decorated for his performance in combat. He held numerous domestic and foreign assignments during his long military career, culminating in his assignments to lead all U.S. and NATO forces in Europe in January 2003.
The election of Gen. Jones brings the total number of members on the Boeing board to eleven.
Contact: John Dern, 312-544-2002


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20070725085512.txt.gz
TIME:20070725085512
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
 
(a) On July 25, 2007, The Boeing Company issued a press release announcing its financial results for the second quarter of 2007.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
(a) Not applicable
 
(b) Not applicable
 
(c) Not applicable
 
(d) Exhibits
 
99.1    Press Release issued by The Boeing Company dated July 25, 2007, reporting Boeing's financial results for the second quarter of 2007.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Boeing Reports Second-Quarter EPS of $1.35 and Raises 2007 Outlook
 
 
 
 
 
Table 1. Summary Financial Results
 
 The Boeing Company's [NYSE: BA] second-quarter net earnings increased to $1.1 billion, or $1.35 per share, compared to a loss of $160 million, or ($0.21) per share, after charges totaling $1.18 per share a year ago (Table 1). Second-quarter revenues grew 14 percent to $17.0 billion and earnings from operations rose to $1.5 billion, yielding an 8.8 percent operating margin.
CHICAGO, July 25, 2007
Boeing increased its 2007 guidance for revenue, earnings per share and cash flow based on strength in its core businesses and company-wide growth and productivity efforts. These efforts more than offset an increased research and development forecast. Boeing reaffirmed its 2008 outlook.
 
"Our results and increased outlook reflect strong markets, preferred products and services, and a focus on execution, growth and productivity," said Boeing Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer Jim McNerney. "Our extensive productivity gains enable us to invest to protect key growth programs while still improving our financial performance. In short, we are taking on our challenges directly as we continue to realize this company's potential."
This year's second-quarter results reflect strong performance across the commercial airplane and defense businesses. Last year's results included charges of $571 million, or $0.77 per share, for a legal settlement and $496 million, or $0.41 per share, related to the Airborne Early Warning & Control (AEW&C) program. Excluding only the legal settlement, adjusted EPS* grew 141 percent, from $0.56 per share to $1.35 per share.
Second-quarter operating cash flow grew 49 percent to $3.6 billion, reflecting higher net earnings, aircraft financing prepayments and working capital management. Free cash flow* grew 53 percent to $3.2 billion after capital expenditures (Table 2).
Table 2. Cash Flow
 
 
For the first half of the year, revenues increased 11 percent to $32.4 billion. Earnings increased to $2.48 per share, a $1.79 per share increase over 2006 which included charges for the legal settlement and for AEW&C. Total company backlog at quarter-end reached a record $279 billion, up 27 percent in the last twelve months due to continued strength in commercial airplane orders and additional defense orders.
Cash and investments in marketable securities totaled $10.5 billion at June 30, up 30 percent from $8.1 billion at the end of the first quarter (Table 3). The company increased its share repurchases, spending $620 million for 6.5 million shares during the quarter, leaving $1.4 billion remaining under the current repurchase authorization. Consolidated debt was stable during the quarter.
 
Table 3. Cash, Marketable Securities and Debt Balances
 
Segment Results
Commercial Airplanes
Boeing Commercial Airplanes (BCA) second-quarter revenues increased 22 percent to $8.7 billion, on an 18 percent increase in deliveries to 114 airplanes as well as higher commercial aviation services revenue (Table 4). Operating earnings grew 34 percent to $960 million and operating margins expanded to 11.0 percent. Margins in the latest quarter reflect higher operating leverage and productivity improvements offset by planned R&D spending that was $243 million higher than in the second quarter of 2006. R&D spending in the second quarter was slightly lower than in the first quarter.
While R&D spending is still expected to be lower in the second half of this year than in the first six months, the decline will be less rapid than previously anticipated in order to meet commitments primarily on the 787 program. As a result, Boeing increased its R&D guidance for 2007. BCA expects its growth and productivity gains will more than offset the higher R&D forecast.
Table 4. Commercial Airplanes Operating Results
 
For the first half of the year, BCA revenues rose 15 percent to $16.3 billion on a 13 percent increase in airplane deliveries. Operating earnings grew 17 percent to $1.7 billion and margins expanded to 10.2 percent, driven by higher airplane deliveries and higher aircraft modification services and spares sales.
 
BCA booked 360 gross orders during the quarter and 549 in the first half. Its contractual backlog rose to a record $208 billion, increasing 47 percent in the last year to more than seven times BCA's 2006 revenues.
Recent important milestones for the 787 Dreamliner program include rollout of the first airplane and certification of the Dreamlifter aircraft. The program has won 683 firm orders to date from 47 customers. The program is performing the production, testing and integration activities that will lead to its first flight, which is targeted to occur by the end of September. Boeing continues to address and manage pressures with respect to supplier performance, schedule and weight. While the risks inherent in the latter stages of major airplane development programs remain, Boeing continues to expect on-time delivery of the 787 in May 2008, in accordance with its contractual obligations.
Integrated Defense Systems
Boeing Integrated Defense Systems (IDS) revenues rose 3 percent to $8.0 billion on higher aircraft deliveries and higher volume in support services, more than offsetting the loss of reported revenue from last year's formation of the United Launch Alliance (ULA) joint venture. Operating earnings grew to $854 million and operating margin expanded to 10.7 percent.
For the first half of the year, revenues increased 5 percent to $15.7 billion generating higher operating earnings of $1.6 billion and expanding operating margins to 10.4 percent. IDS results reflect higher volume across all segments combined with productivity improvements, partially offset by the ULA revenue exclusion.
Table 5. Integrated Defense Systems Operating Results
 
 
Precision Engagement & Mobility Systems revenues grew 2 percent to $3.4 billion on higher deliveries from the F-15 and Chinook programs, partially offset by lower Apache revenues. Operating margin of 11.9 percent was driven by higher earnings on tactical aircraft and rotorcraft programs, partially offset by lower earnings on international tanker. Margins in last year's second quarter were affected by the AEW&C charge.
Network & Space Systems achieved significant milestones on development programs such as Future Combat Systems and Wideband Global SATCOM. Second-quarter revenues were $2.9 billion despite the loss of reported revenue from ULA. In the quarter, a commercial Delta launch and proprietary volume offset this reduction. Operating margin grew to 8.7 percent in the quarter reflecting strong performance across the segment's portfolio of programs.
Support Systems generated strong growth and profitability on its broad business base during the quarter. Revenues increased 8 percent to $1.6 billion and operating margin was 11.9 percent. The higher revenues reflect increased volume on integrated logistics programs and international support programs, while the margins were affected by a less favorable contract mix.
IDS' backlog at quarter-end was $70.5 billion as progress continued on large multi-year contracts.
Boeing Capital Corporation
Boeing Capital Corporation's (BCC) portfolio balance at the end of the second quarter was $7.0 billion, down $0.9 billion from the end of the first quarter of 2007 and down 18% from $8.5 billion a year ago on normal run-off, prepayments, asset sales and depreciation. Revenues declined consistent with portfolio reductions and the absence of asset sales from the year-ago period (Table 6). BCC increased pre-tax earnings 13 percent to $70 million on lower asset impairments and lower provisions for losses on receivables. BCC's debt-to-equity ratio remained steady at 5.0-to-1.
Table 6. Boeing Capital Corporation Operating Results
 
 
Additional Information
The "Other" segment consists primarily of Boeing Engineering, Operations and Technology and the Connexion business (which was closed at the end of 2006), as well as certain results related to the consolidation of all business units. Other segment expense was $30 million in the second quarter, a significant improvement from $90 million of expense in the same period last year which included Connexion.
Unallocated share-based plans expense was $133 million, down from $248 million in the same period of 2006 due to changes in the company's long-term compensation plans implemented last year, despite higher stock price appreciation. Pension expense for the quarter was $251 million, of which $141 million was recorded in unallocated expense, and the balance was recorded as expense at BCA and IDS. Boeing's pension plans are fully funded on a projected benefit obligation basis, and there were no significant cash contributions made during the quarter.
Outlook
The company's financial guidance summarized in Table 7 reflects strong performance from core businesses, higher commercial airplane deliveries, and company-wide productivity gains. Guidance is increased for 2007 revenue, earnings per share, cash flow, and R&D. Guidance for 2008 is reaffirmed.
Boeing's 2007 revenue guidance is now approximately $65 billion, up from $64.5 billion to $65 billion, and 2008 revenue guidance is reaffirmed at $71 billion to $72 billion. Earnings-per-share guidance for 2007 is now $4.80 to $4.95 per share, up from $4.55 to $4.75 per share. Guidance for 2008 EPS is reaffirmed at $5.55 per share to $5.75 per share. Operating cash flow for 2007 is now expected to be greater than $6 billion versus prior guidance of greater than $4 billion, and cash flow guidance for 2008 is reaffirmed at greater than $7 billion.
Commercial Airplanes expects to deliver between 440 and 445 airplanes this year, and is sold out. BCA revenue guidance for 2007 has been increased to approximately $33 billion, from a range of $32.5 billion to $33 billion, and operating margin guidance is increased to approximately 10.5 percent from greater than 10 percent. Airplane deliveries in 2008 are expected to be between 515 and 520 and are essentially sold out. Commercial Airplanes' 2008 revenue is expected to grow to
 
between $39 billion and $40 billion, accompanied by margin expansion to approximately 11 percent. The company expects to deliver more airplanes in 2009 than in 2008.
IDS guidance for 2007 and 2008 is unchanged. Revenue this year is expected to be approximately $31 billion, and operating margins are expected to expand to approximately 11 percent. For 2008, IDS expects revenues to grow to between $32 billion and $33 billion, with operating margins of approximately 11 percent.
Boeing's research and development forecast for 2007 has been increased to approximately $3.7 billion from between $3.2 billion and $3.4 billion. This increase is due to higher spending than previously forecasted to maintain schedule on the 787 development program. While R&D spending in 2008 is expected to decline to between $2.8 billion and $3.0 billion, certain development program challenges could push spending above that range. Annual capital expenditures are expected to be approximately $1.6 billion in 2007 and in 2008.
The company's non-cash pension expense is expected to be approximately $1.1 billion for 2007 and approximately $0.9 billion for 2008. The company expects pension expense to continue to decline after the guidance period with 2009 pension expense likely to be approximately half of the 2008 level. Discretionary funding of Boeing's pension plans is expected to be approximately $500 million per year in 2007 and 2008. The company has already contributed approximately $500 million this year but will continue to evaluate making additional discretionary contributions to its pension plans.
 
Table 7. Financial Outlook
 
 
Non-GAAP Measure Disclosure
Management believes that the non-GAAP (Generally Accepted Accounting Principles) measures (indicated by an asterisk *) used in this report provide investors with important perspectives into the company's ongoing business performance. The company does not intend for the information to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the related GAAP measure. Other companies may define the measures differently. The following definitions are provided:
Free Cash Flow
Free cash flow is defined as GAAP less capital expenditures for . Management believes free cash flow provides investors with an important perspective on the cash available for shareholders, debt repayment, and acquisitions after making the capital investments required to support ongoing business operations and long term value creation. Free cash flow does not represent the residual cash flow available for discretionary expenditures as it excludes certain mandatory expenditures such as repayment of maturing debt. Management uses free cash flow internally to assess both business performance and overall liquidity. Table 2 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and free cash flow.
operating cash flow
property, plant and equipment additions
Adjusted Earnings per Share
Adjusted earnings per share is defined as GAAP adjusted for certain significant charges or credits. Management believes adjusted earnings per share is important to understanding the company's on-going operations and provide additional insights into underlying business performance. Significant charges or credits are described in the attachments to this release which provide reconciliations between GAAP earnings per share and adjusted earnings per share.
diluted earnings per share
 
Certain statements in this report may constitute "forward-looking" statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Forward-looking statements in this press release include, among others, statements regarding future results as a result of our growth and productivity initiatives, our 2007 and 2008 financial outlook and the benefits of the IDS structure. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions as to future events that may not prove to be accurate. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak only as of the date they were made and we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise. Our actual results and future trends may differ materially depending on a variety of factors, including the continued operation, viability and growth of major airline customers and non-airline customers (such as the U.S. Government); adverse developments in the value of collateral securing customer and other financings; the occurrence of any significant collective bargaining labor dispute; our successful execution of internal performance plans including our company-wide growth and productivity initiatives, production rate increases and decreases (including any reduction in or termination of an aircraft product), availability of raw materials, acquisition and divestiture plans, and other cost-reduction and productivity efforts; charges from any future SFAS No. 142 review; ability to meet development, production and certification schedules for the 787 program; technical or quality issues in development programs (affecting schedule and cost estimates) or in the satellite industry; an adverse development in rating agency credit ratings or assessments; the actual outcomes of certain pending sales campaigns and the timely launch of the 787 program and U.S. and foreign government procurement activities, including the uncertainty associated with the procurement of tankers by the U.S. Department of Defense (DoD) and funding of the C-17 program; the cyclical nature of some of our businesses; unanticipated financial market changes which may impact pension plan assumptions; domestic and international competition in the defense, space and commercial areas; continued integration of acquired businesses; performance issues with key suppliers, subcontractors and customers; significant disruption to air travel worldwide (including future terrorist attacks); global trade policies; worldwide political stability; domestic and international economic conditions; price escalation; the outcome of political and legal processes, changing priorities or reductions in the U.S. Government or foreign government defense and space budgets; termination of government or commercial contracts due to unilateral government or customer action or failure to perform; legal, financial and governmental risks related to international transactions; legal and investigatory proceedings; tax settlements with the IRS and various states; U.S. Air Force review of previously awarded contracts; costs associated with the exit of the Connexion by Boeing business; and other economic, political and technological risks and uncertainties. Additional information regarding these factors is contained in our SEC filings, including, without limitation, our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2006 and our Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2007.
Contact:
Investor Relations: David Dohnalek or Rob Young (312) 544-2140
Communications: Anne Eisele or Todd Blecher (312) 544-2002
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
In addition to disclosing results that are determined in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), the company also discloses non-GAAP results that exclude certain significant charges or credits that are important to an understanding of the company's ongoing operations. The company provides reconciliations of its non-GAAP financial reporting to the most comparable GAAP reporting. The company believes that discussion of results excluding certain significant charges or credits provides additional insights into underlying business performance. Adjusted earnings per share is not a measure recognized under GAAP. The determination of significant charges or credits may not be comparable to similarly titled measures used by other companies and may vary from quarter to quarter.
 
 
In addition to disclosing results that are determined in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), the company also discloses non-GAAP results that exclude certain significant charges or credits that are important to an understanding of the company's ongoing operations. The company provides reconciliations of its non-GAAP financial reporting to the most comparable GAAP reporting. The company believes that discussion of results excluding certain significant charges or credits provides additional insights into underlying business performance. Adjusted earnings per share is not a measure recognized under GAAP. The determination of significant charges or credits may not be comparable to similarly titled measures used by other companies and may vary from quarter to quarter.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20070830170130.txt.gz
TIME:20070830170130
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
Effective August 28, 2007, the Board of Directors of The Boeing Company (the ""), upon the recommendation of the Governance, Organization and Nominating Committee, elected Edward M. Liddy, Chairman of The Allstate Corporation (""), as a new director. Mr. Liddy has served as Allstate's Chairman since January 1999, and he also served as its Chief Executive Officer from January 1999 to December 2006, its President from January 1995 to May 2005, and its Chief Operating Officer from August 1994 to January 1999. Mr. Liddy serves on the boards of directors of 3M Company and The Goldman Sachs Group, Inc.
Company
Allstate
Mr. Liddy will be proposed to shareholders at the 2008 Annual Meeting of Shareholders for election as a director. Mr. Liddy will serve on the Compensation Committee and the Governance, Organization and Nominating Committee. There was no arrangement or understanding between Mr. Liddy and any other persons pursuant to which Mr. Liddy was selected as a director, and there are no related person transactions between Mr. Liddy and the Company.
Mr. Liddy will receive the standard compensation provided to all Boeing nonemployee directors. This compensation consists of a cash retainer fee of $75,000 per year and a grant of retainer stock units equal in number to the number of shares of Boeing stock that could be purchased with an aggregate of $130,000 per year. The Company reimburses nonemployee directors for actual travel and out-of-pocket expenses incurred in connection with their services. The nonemployee director compensation program is described in further detail in the Company's proxy statement for its 2007 Annual Meeting filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 23, 2007. A copy of the Company's press release announcing the election of Mr. Liddy is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
On August 28, 2007, the Board of Directors approved and adopted an amendment to Article II, Section 1 of the By-Laws of The Boeing Company to increase the number of directors from eleven to twelve. A copy of the text of the amendment to the By-Laws is attached hereto as Exhibit 3.2 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: August 30, 2007
 
 
 

Exhibit 3.2
Article II, Section 1 of the By-Laws is amended to read in its entirety as follows:
"SECTION 1. Number and Term of Office.
The number of directors shall be twelve, but the number may be increased, or decreased to not less than three, from time to time, either by the directors by adoption of a resolution to such effect or by the stockholders by amendment of the By Laws in accordance with Article VIII hereof. Until the annual meeting of stockholders of the Corporation to be held in 2006, the directors shall be divided into three classes, each of which shall be composed as nearly as possible of one third of the directors. Until the annual meeting of stockholders to be held in 2006, each director shall serve for the term to which the director was elected, and until a successor shall have been elected and qualified or until the director's prior death, resignation, or removal. The terms of all directors in office immediately prior to the opening of the polls for the 2006 annual meeting of stockholders of the Corporation shall expire at the time of the opening of the polls for the 2006 annual meeting of stockholders of the Corporation. At each succeeding annual meeting of stockholders of the Corporation, each director shall be elected to hold office until the next annual meeting of stockholders or until his or her successor shall be elected and qualified or until his or her earlier resignation or removal."

Exhibit 99.1
 
Allstate's Liddy Elected to Boeing Board of Directors
CHICAGO, August 29, 2007  Edward M. Liddy has been elected to the Boeing board of directors, effective immediately.
Liddy, 61, is current chairman of The Allstate Corporation, a position he has held since January 1999. He served as chief executive officer of Allstate from January 1999 to December 2006, president from January 1995 to May 2005, and chief operating officer from August 1994 to January 1999.
"Ed's broad experience and extensive business acumen will further strengthen the Boeing board," said Boeing Chairman, President and CEO Jim McNerney. "He is a proven corporate and community leader, and we are excited to have him as a director," he added.
Prior to joining Allstate, Liddy worked for Sears, Roebuck and Co. from April 1988 until August 1994. He served in a variety of financial and operating positions at Sears, becoming chief financial officer of the company in February 1992. He was executive vice president and a member of the board of ADT Inc. from 1986 to 1988, and prior to ADT he worked for G.D. Searle & Co., rising over the course of seven years to the position of senior vice president and CFO.
Liddy is a member of the board of directors of 3M Company and The Goldman Sachs Group Inc. He is a member of the Financial Services Forum, the Business Roundtable, and Catalyst, the leading non-profit organization for the advancement of women in business. He also is chairman of Northwestern Memorial HealthCare and serves on the boards of Northwestern University and the Museum of Science and Industry. He is the past chair of the Boys and Girls Clubs of America and remains active with that organization. He is a 1968 graduate of Catholic University and holds a master's degree in business administration from George Washington University.
Contact: Tim Neale, 312-544-2002


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20071017165620.txt.gz
TIME:20071017165620
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.02.    Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On October 16, 2007, The Boeing Company (the "Company") announced that Laurette T. Koellner, Senior Vice President, President, Boeing International, and a "named executive officer" within the meaning of Instruction 4 to Item 5.02 of Form 8-K, will retire from the Company effective January 31, 2008. Ms. Koellner will continue to serve as President, Boeing International until November 1, 2007, after which she will no longer be an Elected Officer but will remain an employee of the Company until her retirement date.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: October 17, 2007


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20071024092134.txt.gz
TIME:20071024092134
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
 
(a) On October 24, 2007, The Boeing Company issued a press release reporting its financial results for the third quarter of 2007.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
(a) Not applicable
 
(b) Not applicable
 
(c) Not applicable
 
(d) Exhibits
 
99.1    Press Release issued by The Boeing Company dated October 24, 2007, reporting Boeing's financial results for the third quarter of 2007.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
                The Boeing Company
                100 North Riverside Plaza
                Chicago, IL 60606-1596
                
www.boeing.com
Boeing Reports Third-Quarter EPS of $1.44 and Updates Guidance
 
 
 
 
 
 
 The Boeing Company's [NYSE: BA] third-quarter net earnings increased to $1.1 billion, or $1.44 per share, from $694 million, or $0.89 per share, in the same period last year (Table 1). Third-quarter revenues increased 12 percent to $16.5 billion while earnings from operations rose to $1.5 billion, yielding a 9.1 percent operating margin. Excluding last year's charge of $0.22 per share in the period to exit the Connexion business, adjusted earnings per share* rose 30 percent.
CHICAGO, October 24, 2007
Boeing increased its 2007 guidance for revenue, earnings per share and cash flow due to core business performance and lower corporate costs, and now expects earnings per share this year to be between $5.05 and $5.15. The company's guidance now
 
reflects the previously disclosed revision to the 787 delivery schedule, and the 2008 EPS outlook is reaffirmed.
"Our focus on growth and productivity is driving strong financial performance across our company," said Boeing Chairman, President and CEO Jim McNerney. "With our record backlog and healthy, growing markets, the tasks at hand are to execute our programs, continue expanding our business base, and become more efficient every day."
Third-quarter operating cash flow grew to $3.3 billion, reflecting increased operating earnings, continued strong commercial airplane orders, and a decrease in working capital. Free cash flow* grew to $2.9 billion after capital expenditures (Table 2).
 
For the first nine months of the year revenues increased 11 percent to $48.9 billion and earnings per share more than doubled to $3.92 per share. The year-earlier period included charges for Connexion, a legal settlement and Airborne Early Warning and Control programs. Total company backlog as of September 30, 2007 reached a record $295 billion, up 29 percent in the last twelve months due to continued strength in commercial airplane orders and additional defense orders.
Cash and investments in marketable securities totaled $12.2 billion at September 30, up 16 percent from $10.5 billion at the end of the second quarter (Table 3). The company increased its share repurchases, spending $905 million for 9.1 million shares during the quarter, leaving $0.5 billion remaining under the current repurchase authorization. Consolidated debt decreased slightly on lower aircraft financing debt.
 
 
Segment Results
Commercial Airplanes
Boeing Commercial Airplanes (BCA) third-quarter revenues increased 23 percent to $8.3 billion on a 9 percent increase in deliveries to 109 airplanes, as well as higher commercial aviation services revenue (Table 4). Operating earnings grew 46 percent to $945 million and operating margins expanded to 11.4 percent. Margins in the latest quarter primarily reflect higher operating leverage.
 
For the first nine months of the year, BCA revenues rose 18 percent to $24.5 billion on a 12 percent increase in airplane deliveries. Operating earnings grew 26 percent to $2.6 billion and margins expanded to 10.6 percent, driven by higher delivery volume and services sales.
BCA booked 354 gross orders during the quarter and 903 in the first nine months. Its contractual backlog rose to a record $224 billion, increasing 46 percent in the last year to more than seven times BCA's 2006 revenues.
As previously disclosed, the company recently rescheduled first flight of the 787 Dreamliner and initial deliveries. The company expects the first flight to occur around the end of the first quarter of 2008 and first delivery in late November or December of 2008. Boeing continues to address challenges associated with assembly of the first airplanes, including completion of out-of-sequence production work, software integration and parts availability. Recent important milestones for the 787 Dreamliner program include airworthiness certification of the Rolls-Royce engine and completion of the third and final crashworthiness test. The program has won 710 firm orders to date from 50 customers.
 
Integrated Defense Systems
Boeing Integrated Defense Systems (IDS) third-quarter revenues rose 3 percent to $8.0 billion on higher volume in the Network & Space Systems and Support Systems segments, which more than offset the loss of reported revenue from last year's formation of the United Launch Alliance (ULA) joint venture. Strong performance across IDS was partially offset by a $94 million impact associated with a change in market conditions for the Delta II launch program. As a result, operating earnings declined to $824 million, yielding an operating margin of 10.3 percent.
For the first nine months of the year, revenues increased 4 percent to $23.7 billion generating higher operating earnings of $2.5 billion and expanding operating margins to 10.4 percent. IDS results reflect higher volume across all segments combined with productivity improvements, partially offset by the ULA revenue exclusion.
 
Precision Engagement & Mobility Systems third-quarter revenues fell slightly to $3.4 billion due to lower volume on the F-22 program and changes in aircraft delivery mix. Operating margin of 12.0 percent was driven by contract mix and timing on tactical aircraft, rotorcraft and weapons programs.
Network & Space Systems revenues increased 6 percent to $3.0 billion on increased volume on missile defense and several satellite programs, which more than offset the expected loss of ULA-reported revenue. Based on ULA's market assessment and discussions with our customers, it became evident that the cost of unsold Delta II inventory exceeded market prices. As a result, the company has taken a charge of $94 million for Delta II inventories and our share of ULA losses. Operating margin of 5.9
 
percent in the quarter reflects the Delta II charge which was partially offset by strong performance on missile defense programs.
Support Systems generated solid growth and profitability on its broad business base during the quarter. Revenues increased 7 percent to $1.6 billion and operating margin increased to 14.7 percent. The higher revenues reflect increased volume on integrated logistics programs while the higher margins reflect improved contract mix.
IDS' backlog at quarter-end was down slightly to $70.4 billion reflecting current year deliveries and sales on multi-year contracts awarded in prior years which were nearly offset by new orders.
Boeing Capital Corporation
Boeing Capital Corporation (BCC) continued to deliver strong financial performance while reducing portfolio risk (Table 6). For the quarter, BCC reported pre-tax earnings of $61 million compared to $122 million in the same period last year which included favorable portfolio dispositions and a larger portfolio. BCC's portfolio balance at the end of the quarter was $6.8 billion, down from $8.0 billion at the beginning of the year primarily on normal portfolio run-off, customer prepayments and depreciation. BCC contributed $52 million in cash dividends to the company during the quarter and $316 million in the first nine months of the year. BCC's debt-to-equity ratio remained steady at 5.0-to-1.
 
Additional Information
The "Other" segment consists primarily of Boeing Engineering, Operations and Technology and the Connexion business (which was closed at the end of 2006), as well as certain results related to the consolidation of all business units. Other segment expense was $46 million in the third quarter, a significant improvement from $494 million of expense in the same period last year which included a $280 million charge to exit the Connexion business.
 
Unallocated share-based-plans expense was $58 million, down from $97 million in the same period of 2006 due to changes in the company's long-term compensation plans implemented last year. Pension expense for the quarter was $278 million, of which $149 million was recorded in unallocated expense, and the balance was recorded as expense at BCA and IDS. Boeing's pension plans are fully funded on a projected benefit obligation basis, and there were $40 million in cash contributions made during the quarter.
Outlook
The company's financial guidance summarized in Table 7 reflects strong performance from core businesses, higher commercial airplane deliveries, and company-wide productivity gains. The guidance also reflects the recently announced rescheduling of initial 787 deliveries, the impact of which is expected to shift associated deliveries, revenue and cash flow from 2008 to 2009.
Boeing's 2007 revenue guidance is now approximately $66 billion, up from approximately $65 billion. Revenue guidance for 2008 is now $67.5 billion to $68.5 billion, down from $71 billion to $72 billion due to the revised 787 delivery schedule. Earnings-per-share guidance for 2007 is now $5.05 to $5.15 per share, up from $4.80 to $4.95 per share. Guidance for 2008 EPS is reaffirmed at $5.55 to $5.75 per share, as productivity gains from business units and corporate are expected to offset R&D pressure and the 787 delivery shift. Operating cash flow for 2007 is now expected to be greater than $9 billion compared to prior guidance of greater than $6 billion, and cash flow guidance for 2008 is reduced to greater than $3 billion from greater than $7 billion. The change in cash flow guidance for this year and next reflects strong core business performance, higher airplane orders this year, timing of working capital changes, and the cash impact of shifting 787 deliveries from 2008 into 2009.
Commercial Airplanes expects to deliver approximately 440 airplanes this year, and is sold out. BCA revenue guidance for 2007 is unchanged at approximately $33 billion and operating margin guidance remains approximately 10.5 percent. Airplane deliveries in 2008 are sold out and are expected to be between 480 and 490, down from 515 to 520, based on the new 787 delivery schedule. Commercial Airplanes' 2008 revenue is expected to grow to between $35 billion and $36 billion, down from previous guidance of $39 billion to $40 billion, while margins are expected to expand to
 
approximately 11 percent. The company expects to deliver more airplanes in 2009 than in 2008.
IDS revenue guidance for 2007 is increased to approximately $32 billion from approximately $31 billion. Revenue guidance for 2008 is unchanged. Guidance for 2007 IDS operating margin is reduced to greater than 10 percent from approximately 11 percent due to the Delta II market assessment and contract mix. IDS margin guidance for 2008 is now approximately 10.5 percent from approximately 11 percent due to additional R&D requirements and contract mix.
Boeing's total research and development forecast for 2007 is unchanged at approximately $3.7 billion. R&D guidance for 2008 has been increased to between $3.2 billion and $3.4 billion from $2.8 billion to $3.0 billion. Approximately half of the increase in R&D is associated with IDS: for international tanker and for a customer-requested change that results in certain proposal costs being charged to R&D. The other half is primarily due to the rescheduling of the 787 program flight test and initial deliveries. Annual capital expenditures are expected to be approximately $1.7 billion in 2007 and approximately $1.8 billion in 2008, up from previous guidance due to higher expenditures to support company growth.
The company's non-cash pension expense is expected to be approximately $1.1 billion for 2007 and approximately $0.8 billion for 2008. The company expects pension expense to continue to decline after the guidance period with 2009 pension expense likely to be approximately half of the 2008 level. Discretionary funding of Boeing's pension plans is expected to be approximately $500 million per year in 2007 and 2008.
 
 
Non-GAAP Measure Disclosure
Management believes that the non-GAAP (Generally Accepted Accounting Principles) measures (indicated by an asterisk *) used in this report provide investors with important perspectives into the company's ongoing business performance. The company does not intend for the information to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the related GAAP measures. Other companies may define the measures differently. The following definitions are provided:
Adjusted Earnings per Share
Adjusted earnings per share is defined as GAAP adjusted for certain significant charges or credits. Management believes adjusted earnings per share is important to understanding the company's on-going operations and provide additional insights into underlying business performance. Significant charges or credits are described in the attachments to this release which provide reconciliations between GAAP earnings per share and adjusted earnings per share.
diluted earnings per share
Free Cash Flow
Free cash flow is defined as GAAP less capital expenditures for . Management believes free cash flow provides investors with an important perspective on the cash available for shareholders, debt repayment, and acquisitions after making the capital investments required to support ongoing business operations and long term value creation. Free cash flow does not represent the residual cash flow available for discretionary expenditures as it excludes certain mandatory expenditures such as repayment of maturing debt. Management uses free cash flow internally to assess both business performance and overall liquidity. Table 2 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and free cash flow.
operating cash flow
property, plant and equipment additions
 
 
Certain statements in this report may constitute "forward-looking" statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Forward-looking statements in this press release include, among others, statements regarding future results as a result of our growth and productivity initiatives, our 2007 and 2008 financial outlook and the benefits of the IDS structure. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions as to future events that may not prove to be accurate. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak only as of the date they were made and we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise. Our actual results and future trends may differ materially depending on a variety of factors, including the continued operation, viability and growth of major airline customers and non-airline customers (such as the U.S. Government); adverse developments in the value of collateral securing customer and other financings; the occurrence of any significant collective bargaining labor dispute; our successful execution of internal performance plans including our company-wide growth and productivity initiatives, production rate increases and decreases (including any reduction in or termination of an aircraft product), availability of raw materials, acquisition and divestiture plans, and other cost-reduction and productivity efforts; charges from any future SFAS No. 142 review; ability to meet development, production and certification schedules for the 787 program and the ability to meet scheduled deliveries of the 787 airplane; technical or quality issues in development programs (affecting schedule and cost estimates) or in the satellite industry; an adverse development in rating agency credit ratings or assessments; the actual outcomes of certain pending sales campaigns and U.S. and foreign government procurement activities, including the uncertainty associated with the procurement of tankers by the U.S. Department of Defense (DoD) and funding of the C-17 program; the cyclical nature of some of our businesses; unanticipated financial market changes which may impact pension plan assumptions; domestic and international competition in the defense, space and commercial areas; continued integration of acquired businesses; performance issues with key suppliers, subcontractors and customers; significant disruption to air travel worldwide (including future terrorist attacks); global trade policies; worldwide political stability; domestic and international economic conditions; price escalation; the outcome of political and legal processes, changing priorities or reductions in the U.S. Government or foreign government defense and space budgets; termination of government or commercial contracts due to unilateral government or customer action or failure to perform; legal, financial and governmental risks related to international transactions; legal and investigatory proceedings; tax settlements with the IRS and various states; U.S. Air Force review of previously awarded contracts; costs associated with the exit of the Connexion by Boeing business; and other economic, political and technological risks and uncertainties. Additional information regarding these factors is contained in our SEC filings, including, without limitation, our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2006 and our Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarters ended March 31, 2007 and June 30, 2007.
Contact:
Investor Relations: David Dohnalek or Rob Young (312) 544-2140
Communications: Anne Eisele or Todd Blecher (312) 544-2002
 
 
 
 
 
 
In addition to disclosing results that are determined in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), the company also discloses non-GAAP results that exclude certain significant charges or credits that are important to an understanding of the company's ongoing operations. The company provides reconciliations of its non-GAAP financial reporting to the most comparable GAAP reporting. The company believes that discussion of results excluding certain significant charges or credits provides additional insights into underlying business performance. Adjusted earnings per share is not a measure recognized under GAAP. The determination of significant charges or credits may not be comparable to similarly titled measures used by other companies and may vary from quarter to quarter.
 
In addition to disclosing results that are determined in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), the company also discloses non-GAAP results that exclude certain significant charges or credits that are important to an understanding of the company's ongoing operations. The company provides reconciliations of its non-GAAP financial reporting to the most comparable GAAP reporting. The company believes that discussion of results excluding certain significant charges or credits provides additional insights into underlying business performance. Adjusted earnings per share is not a measure recognized under GAAP. The determination of significant charges or credits may not be comparable to similarly titled measures used by other companies and may vary from quarter to quarter.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20071101151625.txt.gz
TIME:20071101151625
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
On October 28, 2007, the Compensation Committee adopted and approved, or recommended to the Board of Directors (the "Board") of The Boeing Company ("Boeing" or the "Company"), as appropriate, and on October 29, 2007, the Board adopted amendments generally effective January 1, 2008 to certain compensation plans of the Company in which the Company's named executive officers or directors participate.
For the following plans, these amendments were adopted primarily to conform the plans to the requirements and final and transition regulations promulgated under Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the "Code"):
 
 
 
For the following plans, these amendments were adopted primarily to clarify the Company's intention that all payments under the plans will satisfy the requirements for exemption from Code Section 409A:
 
 
 
 
 
 
In addition to the amendments related to Code Section 409A, the Board amended the SBP to: (1) provide that, beginning in 2009, participants will be permitted to elect to invest their account balances among the same array of funds (other than the Boeing Stock Fund and the Stable Value Fund) as the funds available under the DCP and the Company's Voluntary Investment Plan, a 401(k) retirement savings plan (the "VIP"), in addition to the current interest crediting method; and (2) set the deferral election rate to the maximum permissible percentage that an employee can elect to contribute under the VIP.
The Board also amended the ISP, the AIP and the ICP to incorporate the Company's executive clawback policy adopted in 2006. This policy is contained in the Company's Corporate Governance Principles and may be viewed on the Boeing website at www.boeing.com/corp_gov/.
The foregoing description of these amendments to the Company's plans is qualified in its entirety by reference to the amended and restated plans, which are filed herewith as Exhibits 10.1 through 10.9 and are incorporated herein by reference.
 
 
 
SIGNATURE
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: November 1, 2007
 

Exhibit 10.1
 
 
"" means the recordkeeping account established for each Participant in the Plan, for purposes of accounting for Deferrals, Matching Contributions and Earnings Credits.
Account
"" means a member of a controlled group of corporations (as defined in Code section 1563(a), determined without regard to Code sections 1563(a)(4) and (e)(3)(c)), a group of trades or businesses (whether incorporated or not) which are under common control within the meaning of Code section 414(c), or an affiliated service group (as defined in Code sections 414(m) or 414(o)) of which the Company is a part.
Affiliate or Subsidiary
"" means the annual cash incentive award under Incentive Compensation Plan for Employees of The Boeing Company and Subsidiaries or The Boeing Company Elected Officer Annual Incentive Plan, as applicable.
Annual Incentive Award
"" means a leave of absence approved by the Company.
Authorized Period of Absence
"" means an Employee's annual base rate of pay from the Company.
Base Salary
"" means the person or persons designated by the Participant to receive distributions from the Plan, upon the Participant's death. If no beneficiary has been designated, the Participant's beneficiary shall be the personal representative of the participant's estate.
Beneficiary
"" means the board of directors of The Boeing Company.
Board of Directors
"" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
Code
"" means the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors.
Committee
"" means The Boeing Company, its successors in interest, and any Affiliate or Subsidiary.
Company
"" means the Company and any Affiliate or Subsidiary.
Controlled Group
"" means the portion of a Participant's Base Salary, Annual Incentive Award or Performance Award, if any, that he or she elects to defer on a pre-tax basis under this Plan in accordance with Section 4.
Deferrals
"" means the election made by an Eligible Employee to defer a portion of his or her Base Salary, Annual Incentive Award or Performance Award in accordance with Section 4.
Deferral Election
"" means the executive designation of level E1 to E6 at the Company.
E-Series Payroll
"" means the amount credited to a Participant's Account under Section 6(B).
Earnings Credit
"" means with respect to any Plan Year, an Employee of the Company who has satisfied the requirements of Section 3.
Eligible Employee
"" means any person who is employed as a common law employee by any member of the Controlled Group.
Employee
"" means Company Matching Contributions made pursuant to Section 5.
Matching Contributions
" means an Eligible Employee who has elected to defer his or her Base Salary, Annual Incentive Award or Performance Award under the Plan in accordance with Section 4, or an Employee or former Employee who has amounts credited to his or her Account.
"Participant
"" means this Deferred Compensation Plan for Employees of The Boeing Company, as herein set forth, together with any amendments that may be adopted.
Plan
"" means the calendar year.
Plan Year
"" or "" means an Employee's death, retirement or termination of employment from the Controlled Group within the meaning of Code section 409A. For purposes of determining whether a Separation from Service has occurred, the Controlled Group is defined by using the language "at least 80 percent" under Code section 1563(a) in lieu of the 50 percent default rule stated in Treasury Regulation section 1.409A-1(h)(3).
Separation from Service
Separates from Service
A Separation from Service is deemed to include a reasonably anticipated permanent reduction in the level of services performed by an Employee, to less than 50 percent of the average level of services performed by the Employee during the immediately preceding 36-month period.
"" means an Employee who is a "specified employee" within the meaning of Code section 409A. Specified Employee status is determined on the last day of the prior Plan Year, to take effect as of April 1 of the Plan Year for a 12-month period. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Specified Employees shall be determined by including the employees whom the Company reasonably determines to be the 75 top-paid officers of the Company rather than the 50 top-paid officers as provided under Code section 416(i)(1)(A), to the extent permitted under Code section 409A.
Specified Employee
 
"" means "unforeseeable emergency" within the meaning of Code section 409A, as determined by the Committee.
Unforeseeable Emergency
 
An Eligible Employee will become a Participant when he or she elects to defer his or her Base Salary, Annual Incentive Award or Performance Award by filing a timely Deferral Election in accordance with Section 4 below.
 
in the case of Base Salary, the percentage of the Participant's Base Salary (but not more than 50% thereof) to be deferred in each regular pay period, by December 1 to be effective for the following Plan Year, and
in the case of Annual Incentive Awards payable in cash, the percentage of the Annual Incentive Award to be deferred (which shall be all or any portion thereof), by December 1 of the year preceding the performance period for such Annual Incentive Award, and
in the case of Performance Awards, the percentage of the Performance Award to be deferred (which shall be all or any portion thereof), by December 1 of the year preceding the year of grant.
A Deferral Election will remain in effect until changed with respect to future Deferrals by a filing a new Deferral Election with the Company increasing or decreasing the percentage of future Base Salary, Annual Incentive Awards, or Performance Awards to be deferred. Any such change in Deferral Election must be made by December 1 of the year for which new elections of the same type are due and shall supersede any election previously made. All previous Deferral Elections for Boeing Stock Unit (BSU) grants, Performance Share grants and related Earnings Credit method elections made prior to January 1, 2008, will continue in effect until such time as the grants are vested or forfeited, as appropriate.
An Employee who becomes an Eligible Employee during the Plan Year (as a new hire, rehire or due to raise or promotion) will not be eligible to participate during such Plan Year. In the case of an Employee who ceases to be an Eligible Employee during the Plan Year (e.g., due to a reclassification as other than E-Series Payroll or Separation from Service) the Employee's Deferral Election shall remain in effect with respect to Deferral
 
Elections of Base Salary, Annual Incentive Awards and Performance Awards in effect with respect to the Plan Year in which the Employee ceases to be an Eligible Employee, but will automatically be cancelled with respect to future Deferrals (i.e., Deferrals for subsequent Plan Years).
Notwithstanding the election procedures described above, a Participant will be permitted to cancel an existing Deferral Election of Base Salary with regard to a Plan Year during that Plan Year, where the Participant incurs an Unforeseeable Emergency, as determined by the Committee. To the extent that a Participant has elected and received a distribution due to an Unforeseeable Emergency under Section 7(G), the Participant will be deemed to have elected to cancel his or her Base Salary Deferral Election for the remainder of the applicable Plan Year.
If a Participant ceases to be an Eligible Employee or ceases to have a Deferral election on file (in accordance with Section 4), all amounts accumulated in the Participant's account prior to termination will continue to be held subject to the Plan.
 
 
Effective with respect to amounts deferred on or after January 1, 2006 (including amounts for which Deferral Elections were made prior to January 1, 2006) the Company will no longer provide any Matching Contribution under this Section 5 on any Deferrals into a Boeing Stock Fund account; provide that in the case of Deferrals that were the subject of a Deferral Election into a Boeing Stock Fund account made prior to January 1, 2005, the Company will continue to match such Deferrals of Boeing Stock Units and Performance Share Awards that are not yet vested (upon vesting) and such Deferrals of 2005 Annual Incentive Awards that were paid in 2006. To the extent that the Company makes or has made a Matching Contribution with respect to all or part of any amounts deferred under this Plan, each such Matching Contribution shall be deferred together with the Participant Deferral to which it relates, and shall be subject to all of the Participant elections (including default elections) with respect to such Deferral.
 
Any Matching Contribution made pursuant to this Section 5 shall be canceled and forfeited if the Participant Separates from Service for any reason other than retirement under a retirement plan sponsored by the Company, disability as determined by the Company, layoff, or death. The forfeited Matching Contribution (and any Earnings Credits that would have accrued but for the forfeiture) will be reinstated upon rehire, only where (i) the Participant's Separation from Service occurred while the Participant was on an Authorized Period of Absence or due to a reasonably anticipated permanent reduction in the level of services performed by the Participant to less than 50 percent of the average level of services performed by the Participant during the immediately preceding 36-month period, and (ii) the Participant's Separation from Service was deemed a Separation from Service under Code section 409A or the terms of this Plan (i.e., the Participant did
 
not incur a termination of employment with the Controlled Group). Reinstatement of the Participant's forfeited benefits will occur upon (i) return to active employment with the Company within the Authorized Period of Absence, (ii) termination of the Authorized Period of Absence or period of a reduced level of services due to retirement under a plan sponsored by the Company, disability as determined by the Company, layoff or death, or (iii) the Participant's return to active employment at a level of services that is 50 percent or more of the average level of services performed by the Participant prior to his or her prior deemed Separation from Service due to a reduction in services. Such reinstated benefits will remain subject to the forfeiture provisions of the first sentence of this section 5(B) and the payment timing rules under Section 7(A).
 
 
The Committee will establish and maintain an Account for each participant. The Account will be credited with Deferrals, as well as Company Matching Contributions and Earnings Credits as described below. The Account will be reduced as payments are made.
All amounts deferred under the Plan, and any Company Matching Contribution with respect thereto, shall be credited to the Participant's Account at the time at which they would otherwise first have become payable to the Participant or, if earlier, the time at which the Participant's interest in the award becomes vested. Non-cash awards shall be credited to the Participant's account at the time at which they would otherwise first have become distributable to the Participant.
Each Account shall be credited with earnings thereon, under the Interest Fund method the Boeing Stock Fund method, or the Other Investment Funds method, subject to the restrictions on diversification described below, at the election of the Participant. In the absence of an election the Interest Fund method shall be used.
 
 
Interest will be computed during each calendar year at the mean between the high and the low during the first eleven months of the preceding year of yields on Aa-rated industrial Bonds as reported by Moody's Investors Service, Inc., rounded to the nearest 1/4th of one percent. The Company will notify Participants annually of the established interest rate.
 
Each Participant's Boeing Stock Fund Account periodically shall be credited with the number of shares of the Company's common stock that could be purchased, as set forth in the preceding paragraph, with an amount equal to the cash dividends that would be payable on the number of shares of the Company's common stock that equals the number of stock units in a Participant's Boeing Stock Fund account. The Company will notify Participants annually of the number of stock units, and the dividend equivalents, credited to their Boeing Stock Fund account.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Performance Shares that were unvested as of December 31, 2005, and deferred into the Boeing Stock Fund account shall not be eligible for diversification, even upon vesting. Matching contributions (except as described in (vi) above) also shall not be eligible for diversification. Amounts eligible for diversification are sometimes referred to as "transferable amounts" and amounts not eligible for diversification are sometimes referred to as "nontransferable amounts."
 
The Participant may make a separate election for each type of Deferral (Base Salary, Annual Incentive Award and Performance Award) and may change how future Deferrals are invested anytime during the Plan Year. The Participant may also transfer Deferrals eligible for diversification from one fund to another on a daily basis, provided that a Participant may not transfer funds from one investment fund to another and back on the same day.
In addition, transfers cannot be made into the Boeing Stock Fund for 30 calendar days after transferring funds out of the Boeing Stock Fund. This restriction applies regardless of the number of units or the dollar value of the transfer. However, the Participant may continue to direct future Deferrals into the Boeing Stock Fund and make transfers out of this fund at any time, subject to insider trading rules.
 
 
A Participant may elect the form and timing of distribution with regard to his or her entire Account (including future Deferrals, Matching Credits and Earnings Credits) as described below. This distribution election must be made at the same time the Participant makes his or her Deferral Election.
Distribution elections made with regard to a Participant's entire Account may be changed solely to the extent permitted under subsection (B) below.
 
 
The lump sum distribution option is a single lump sum payable in January of any Plan Year following the Participant's Separation from Service. The amount of such distribution will be based on the value of the Participant's Account determined as of the date of payment.
Payment of the lump sum will be made the later of: (i) January of the first Plan Year following Separation from Service, or (ii) January of the first Plan Year following the Participant's attainment of a specified age (subject to (E) below), as elected by the Participant under this Section 7.
 
The installment payment option is a series of annual installment payments for a period between 2 and 15 years. The amount payable to the Participant each year shall be computed by multiplying the balance in the Account (or the applicable portion of the Account) by a fraction, the numerator of which is one and the denominator of which is the number of years remaining in the distribution period on the first day of January of such year.
Prior to January 1, 2006, a Participant could elect that annual installments be determined under the "Approximately Equal" method, under which the amount payable to the Participant each year shall be computed by the Company so that the aggregate amount of cash or stock in a Participant's Account under the Plan shall be distributed in approximately equal installments in each year for which payments are to be made. The Approximately Equal method is only available for payment elections on file as of December 31, 2005.
Annual installment payments will begin the later of: (i) January of the first Plan Year following Separation from Service, or (ii) January of the first Plan Year following the Participant's attainment of a specified age (subject to (E) below), as elected by the Participant under this Section 7. Payments will continue until the full balance in the Participant's Account has been paid.
In the event that no distribution option is elected, the Participant will be deemed to have elected to receive a single lump sum payable in January of the first Plan Year following the Participant's Separation from Service.
 
Effective January 1, 2008, a Participant may change a distribution election with regard to his or her entire Account only once after the initial distribution election is made (subject to (E) below), in accordance with the conditions stated below. To the extent such change would defer commencement of any portion of the Participant's Account beyond both age 70
 1
/
2
and Separation from Service, the change will not be effective with respect to such portion.
 
 
 
In no event can installment payments be revoked once they have begun.
Prior to January 1, 2008, a Participant may change a distribution election with regard to his or her entire Account, in accordance with procedures established by the Committee, without the restrictions stated above. Any changes made under this paragraph will be invalid to the extent they affect distributions scheduled for the Plan Year in which the change is made.
 
Notwithstanding the foregoing subsections (A) and (B), for Participants who terminates employment on or after January 1, 2006, the Participant may make a separate election under (A) above as to the time and form of distribution of (i) the Participants Company Matching Contributions and (ii) the balance of the Participant's Plan Account. Such a Participant may also make a separate one-time distribution election change under (B) above with respect to each such separate election under this (C).
 
If a Participant makes a separate election under (C)(ii) above to receive the balance of the Participant's Plan Account in annual installment payments, the Participant may further elect to receive either:
 
 
 
Payment of benefits under this Plan will begin not later than the first January following the calendar year in which the Participant both attains (or would have attained) age 70
 1
/
2
and is Separated from Service. Payment of benefits for Participants actively employed beyond age 70
 1
/
2
will begin no later than the first January following the calendar year in which the Participant Separates from Service. In the event that no distribution option is elected under (A) above, the Participant will be deemed to have elected to receive a single lump sum distribution.
 
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary under this Section 7, a Specified Employee will not receive any distribution under this Plan during the six-month period immediately following his or her Separation from Service.
The Account of a Specified Employee will be distributed in the form elected under subsection (A) above. This distribution will commence as of the later of:
 
 
 
If a Participant has elected installments under (A) above, subsequent installment payments will be made in January of each successive year until the Account is exhausted.
In the event of a Specified Employee's death during the six-month waiting period, the waiting period will cease to apply. The Specified Employee's benefits will be distributed in accordance with Section 8 (Death Benefits) below.
 
A Participant or Beneficiary may elect to receive a distribution of all or a portion of his or her Accounts immediately, regardless of whether benefit payments have commenced, to the extent that the Participant or Beneficiary incurs an Unforeseeable Emergency.
The amount of the distribution will be limited to the amount reasonably necessary to satisfy the emergency need, including any taxes or penalties reasonably anticipated to result from the distribution, as determined by the Committee.
 
If a Participant dies before his or her entire Account has been distributed, the remaining Account balance will be distributed to his or her Beneficiary in accordance with the Deferral Elections filed with the Committee. Distributions to the Beneficiary will be made at the same time and in the same form as the payment that otherwise would have been made to the Participant.
 
To the extent no distribution election has been filed, the remaining Account balance will be paid to the Beneficiary in a single sum in January of the calendar year following the Participant's death.
Prior to October 1, 2006, a Participant could elect one or more fixed payments be made from the Plan to the Participant's personal representative or designated beneficiary, following the Participant's death. Such payments, if approved by the Committee, shall be made within 15 months after the Participant's death. Any amounts thereafter remaining in the Participant's Account will be distributed in accordance with the Participants elections. Any such elections on file as of October 1, 2006 will continue in effect unless a subsequent Beneficiary designation has been filed.
 
 
 
This Section 11 addresses the form and timing of payment for a Participant who rehires to the Company following a Separation from Service. For purposes of this Section 11, a rehire includes a Participant who returns to the Company following a Separation from Service that is deemed to occur under Code section 409A due to an Authorized Period of Absence or a period of a reduced level services.
 
This subsection (A) applies to a rehired Participant who has received or begun receiving benefits under the Plan.
. Installment payments that commenced prior to the Participant's rehire with respect to Deferrals made before the Participant's Separation from Service ("Old Deferrals") will not be suspended by reason of the Participant's rehire. These Old Deferrals will continue to be paid until exhausted, without regard to the period of rehire.
Old Deferrals
 
. To the extent a Participant made additional Deferrals while on an Authorized Period of Absence or during a period of a reduced level of services that constituted a deemed Separation from Service under Code section 409A, such Deferrals will be distributed in January of the first Plan Year following the year in which they are made, in accordance with the Participant's earlier distribution election. This is because the Participant has already satisfied the conditions for payment under Section 7(a); namely, he or she has attained the specified age and has experienced a Separation from Service attributable to such Deferrals.
Interim Deferrals
. Deferrals attributable to periods after the date of rehire ("New Deferrals") will remain subject to the Participant's earlier distribution election as to the timing and form of payment under Section 7(A) (subject to the change rules in Section 7(B)), without regard to any Separation from Service that occurred prior to rehire. As a result, New Deferrals will be distributed in January following the Participant's Separation from Service , in the form selected under the original distribution election. This is because the Participant already has attained the specified age under Section 7(A) but has not yet experienced a Separation from Service attributable to the New Deferrals.
New Deferrals
after rehire
 
This subsection (B) applies to a rehired Participant who has not begun receiving benefits under the Plan because he or she has not attained the specified age under Section 7(A).
. The rehired Participant's Old Deferrals (and any Deferrals made during an Authorized Period of Absence or a period of a reduced level of services) will remain subject to the Participant's earlier distribution election as to the timing and form of payment under Section 7(A) (subject to the change rules in Section 7(B)). This means that if the Participant's original distribution election selected benefits in the form of a lump sum (or installments) payable in January following attainment of a specified age under Section 7(A), then the Participant's Old Deferrals (and any Deferrals made during an Authorized Period of Absence or period of a reduced level of services) will be payable as a lump sum (or installments, if elected) in January following the year in which he or she attains the specified age, even if the Participant has not had a subsequent Separation from Service after rehire. This result will not change in the event that the Participant attains the specified age after the initial Separation from Service (or while on Authorized Period of Absence or during a period of a reduced level of services), but is rehired before benefits actually began.
Old and Interim Deferrals
. The Participant's New Deferrals will remain subject to the Participant's earlier distribution election as to the timing and form of payment under Section 7(A) (subject to the change rules in Section 7(B)), without regard to any Separation from Service that occurred prior to rehire, as described in Section 11(A) above. As a result, New Deferrals will be distributed either (i) in January following the Participants Separation from Service , or (ii) in January
New Deferrals
after rehire
 
following both the Participant's Separation from Service and after attainment of the specified age, in accordance with the original distribution election. This is because the Participant has not yet experienced a Separation from Service attributable to the New Deferrals.
after rehire
 
 
Except to the extent provided in Section 10 of the Plan, the right of a Participant, legal representative or beneficiary to receive payments from the Plan shall not be subject to anticipation, sale, assignment, pledge, encumbrance or charge, nor shall such right be liable for or subject to the debts, contracts, liabilities or torts of the Participant or the Participant's legal representative or beneficiaries.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the Stock Purchase Agreement between The Boeing Company, Hughes Electronics Corporation and Hughes Telecommunications and Space Company dated as of January 13, 2000 (the "Agreement") and effective as of the closing date under the Agreement ("Closing Date"), the Committee designated certain employees of Boeing Satellite Systems, Inc. ("BSS") as Executive Payroll employees eligible to participate in this Plan ("Satellite Executives").
The deferral elections of Satellite Executives in effect pursuant to the Hughes Electronic Corporation Executive Deferred Compensation Plan ("Hughes Plan") as of the Closing Date were deemed to be irrevocable deferral elections in effect for purposes of this Plan for salary and cash payments related to the Hughes Annual Incentive Plan and Long-Term Achievement Plan paid by BSS in 2000 and 2001.
Satellite Executives eligible for Company performance shares and restricted stock units in lieu of payments under the Hughes Long-Term Achievement Plan were provided the opportunity to make a deferral election with respect to such awards.
Accounts under this Plan were established for Satellite Executives in an amount equal to their account balances as of the Closing Date under the Hughes Plan. Such accounts shall be paid in accordance with the distribution rules under Section 7. Except for such account balances, no Liability, as defined in the Agreement, shall accrue or be paid with respect to any Satellite Employee or Retired Satellite Employee, as defined in the Agreement, under the Hughes Plan on or after the Closing Date.
Satellite Executives with account balances established as of the Closing Date and/or who have irrevocable deferral elections in effect as of the Closing Date may elect earnings credits on deferred amounts in accordance with Section 5.
 

Exhibit 10.2
 
 
"" means the recordkeeping account established for each Participant in the Plan, for purposes of accounting for Deferrals, Matching Contributions and Earnings Credits.
Account
"" means the person or persons designated by the Participant to receive distributions from the Plan, upon the Participant's death. If no beneficiary has been designated, the Participant's beneficiary shall be the personal representative of the participant's estate.
Beneficiary
"" means the board of directors of The Boeing Company.
Board of Directors
"" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
Code
"" means the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors.
Committee
"" means The Boeing Company.
Company
"" means the compensation required to be paid in Boeing stock units plus the portion of a Participant's cash retainers, if any, that he or she elects to defer on a pre-tax basis under this Plan in accordance with Section 4.
Deferrals
"" means the election made by a Participant to defer a portion of his or her cash retainers in accordance with Section 4.
Deferral Election
"" means the amount credited to a Participant's Account under Section 5.3.
Earnings Credit
"" means Company Matching Contributions made pursuant to Section 5.1.
Matching Contributions
"" means any member of the Board of Directors.
Participant
 
PAGE 1
"" means this Deferred Compensation Plan for Directors of The Boeing Company, as herein set forth, together with any amendments that may be adopted.
Plan
"" means the calendar year.
Plan Year
"" or "" means a Participant's death, retirement or termination from service with the Board of Directors within the meaning of Code section 409A.
Separation from Service
Separates from Service
"" means a Participant who is a "specified employee" within the meaning of Code section 409A. Specified Employee status is determined on the last day of the prior Plan Year, to take effect as of April 1 of the Plan Year for a 12-month period. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Specified Employees shall be determined by including the employees whom the Company reasonably determines to be the 75 top-paid officers of the Company rather than the 50 top-paid officers as provided under Code section 416(i)(1)(A), to the extent permitted under Code section 409A.
Specified Employee
"" means "unforeseeable emergency" within the meaning of Code section 409A, as determined by the Committee.
Unforeseeable Emergency
 
 
 
 
 
PAGE 2
 
 
 
 
PAGE 3
. A Participant's Interest Credit Account shall be credited monthly with interest on all amounts in that account during the preceding month. Interest will be computed during each calendar year at the mean between the high and the low during the first eleven months of the preceding year of yields on Aa-rated Industrial Bonds as reported by Moody's Investors Service, Inc., rounded to the nearest 1/4th of one percent. The Company will notify Participants annually of the established interest rate and the status of their respective Interest Credit Accounts.
Interest Credit Account
. As of each of the Company's dividend payment dates, each Participant's Stock Unit Account shall be credited with the number of shares of the Company's common stock that could be purchased, as set forth in paragraph 5.2, by an amount equal to the cash dividends that would be payable on the number of shares of the Company's common stock that equals the number of stock units in the Participant's Stock Unit Account. The Company will notify Participants annually of the number of stock units, and the dividend equivalents, credited to their respective Stock Unit Accounts.
Stock Unit Account
 
 
A Participant may elect the form and timing of distribution with regard to his or her entire Account as described below. This distribution election must be made at the same time the Participant makes his or her Deferral Election.
Distribution elections made with regard to a Participant's entire Account may be changed solely to the extent permitted under subsection 6.2 below.
 
The lump sum distribution option is a single lump sum payable in January of any Plan Year following the Participant's Separation from Service. The amount of such distribution will be based on the value of the Participant's Account determined as of the date of payment.
Payment of the lump sum will be made the later of: (i) January of the first Plan Year following Separation from Service, or (ii) January of the first Plan Year following the Participant's attainment of a specified age (subject to Section 6.3 below), as elected by the Participant under this Section 6.
 
The installment payment option is a series of annual installment payments for a period between 2 and 15 years. The amount payable to the Participant each year shall be computed by multiplying the balance in the Account (or the applicable portion of the Account) by a fraction, the numerator of which is one and the denominator of which is the number of years remaining in the distribution period on the first day of January of such year.
 
PAGE 4
Prior to January 1, 2006, a Participant could elect that annual installments be determined under the "Approximately Equal" method, under which the amount payable to the Participant each year shall be computed by the Company so that the aggregate amount of cash or stock in a Participant's Account under the Plan shall be distributed in approximately equal installments in each year for which payments are to be made. The Approximately Equal method is only available for payment elections on file as of December 31, 2005.
Annual installment payments will begin the later of: (i) January of the first Plan Year following Separation from Service, or (ii) January of the first Plan Year following the Participant's attainment of a specified age (subject to Section 6.3 below), as elected by the Participant under this Section 6. Payments will continue until the full balance in the Participant's Account has been paid.
In the event that no distribution option is elected, the Participant will be deemed to have elected to receive a single lump sum payable in January of the first Plan Year following the Participant's Separation from Service.
 
Effective January 1, 2008, a Participant may change a distribution election with regard to his or her entire Account only once after the initial distribution election is made (subject to Section 6.3 below), in accordance with the conditions stated below. To the extent such change would defer commencement of any portion of the Participant's Account beyond both age 70
 1
/
2
and Separation from Service, the change will not be effective with respect to such portion.
 
 
 
In no event can installment payments be revoked once they have begun.
Prior to January 1, 2008, a Participant may change a distribution election with regard to his or her entire Account, in accordance with procedures established by the Committee, without the restrictions stated above. Any changes made under this paragraph will be invalid to the extent they affect distributions scheduled for the Plan Year in which the change is made.
 
PAGE 5
Payment of benefits under this Plan will begin not later than the first January following the calendar year in which the Participant both attains (or would have attained) age 70
 1
/
2
and is Separated from Service. Payment of benefits for Participants actively in service on the Board beyond age 70
 1
/
2
will begin no later than the first January following the calendar year in which the Participant Separates from Service. In the event that no distribution option is elected under Section 6.1 above, the Participant will be deemed to have elected to receive a single lump sum distribution.
 
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary under this Section 6, a Specified Employee will not receive any distribution under this Plan during the six-month period immediately following his or her Separation from Service.
The Account of a Specified Employee will be distributed in the form elected under Section 6.1 above. This distribution will commence as of the later of:
 
 
 
If a Participant has elected installments under Section 6.1 above, subsequent installment payments will be made in January of each successive year until the Account is exhausted.
In the event of a Specified Employee's death during the six-month waiting period, the waiting period will cease to apply. The Specified Employee's benefits will be distributed in accordance with Section 7 (Death Benefits) below.
 
A Participant or Beneficiary may elect to receive a distribution of all or a portion of his or her Accounts immediately, regardless of whether benefit payments have commenced, to the extent that the Participant or Beneficiary incurs an Unforeseeable Emergency.
 
PAGE 6
The amount of the distribution will be limited to the amount reasonably necessary to satisfy the emergency need, including any taxes or penalties reasonably anticipated to result from the distribution, as determined by the Committee.
 
If a Participant dies before his or her entire Account has been distributed, the remaining Account balance will be distributed to his or her Beneficiary in accordance with the Deferral Elections filed with the Committee. Distributions to the Beneficiary will be made at the same time and in the same form as the payment that otherwise would have been made to the Participant.
To the extent no distribution election has been filed, the remaining Account balance will be paid to the Beneficiary in a single sum in January of the calendar year following the Participant's death.
Prior to October 1, 2006, a Participant could elect one or more fixed payments be made from the Plan to the Participant's personal representative or designated beneficiary, following the Participant's death. Such payments, if approved by the Committee, shall be made within 15 months after the Participant's death. Any amounts thereafter remaining in the Participant's Account will be distributed in accordance with the Participants elections. Any such elections on file as of October 1, 2006 will continue in effect unless a subsequent Beneficiary designation has been filed.
 
 
The right of a Participant or the Participant's legal representative or beneficiary to receive payments from the Plan shall not be subject to anticipation, sale, assignment, pledge, encumbrance or charge, nor shall such right be liable for or subject to the debts, contracts, liabilities or torts of the Participant or the Participant's legal representative or beneficiaries.
 
 
PAGE 7
 
 
 
 
 
PAGE 8

Exhibit 10.3
 
 
 
The Supplemental Benefit Plan for Employees of The Boeing Company (Plan) was originally established effective January 1, 1978 by The Boeing Company. The Plan is hereby amended and restated effective January 1, 2008 to comply with section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (Code).
The purpose of the Plan is to supplement the benefits of certain employees under The Boeing Company Voluntary Investment Plan, to the extent that these qualified plan benefits are limited by sections 415 and 401(a)(17) of the Code.
For periods prior to January 1, 1999, the Plan also supplemented participants' benefits under The Boeing Company Employee Retirement Plan and The Boeing Company Employee Financial Security Plan, to the extent these benefits were limited by sections 415 and 401(a)(17) of the Code. For the period January 1, 1987 through May 31, 1987, the Plan also supplemented benefits reduced by the limitation on Elective Deferrals imposed by section 402(g)(1) of the Code.
It is intended that the Plan shall be an excess benefit plan as defined in section 3(36) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (ERISA) to the extent benefits are paid in excess of the limits imposed by section 415 of the Code. To the extent any part of the Plan is not an excess benefit plan, it is intended that the Plan is an unfunded plan maintained primarily for the purpose of providing deferred compensation to a select group of management or highly compensated employees under sections 201(2), 301(a)(3), and 401(a)(1) of ERISA.
 
"Account" means the recordkeeping account established for each Participant in the Plan, for purposes of accounting for Deferrals, Matching Credits and Earnings Credits.
 
"Affiliate or Subsidiary" means a member of a controlled group of corporations (as defined in Code section 1563(a), determined without regard to Code sections 1563(a)(4) and (e)(3)(c)), a group of trades or businesses (whether incorporated or not) which are under common control within the meaning of Code section 414(c), or an affiliated service group (as defined in Code sections 414(m) or 414(o)) of which The Boeing Company is a part.
 
"Authorized Period of Absence" means a leave of absence approved by the Company.
 
"Base Salary" means an Employee's annual base rate of pay from the Company.
 
"Beneficiary" generally means the person or persons designated by a Participant under the VIP to receive any benefit payable from the VIP upon the death of the Participant. If no designation is filed under the VIP, or if the designated beneficiary does not survive the Participant, the default rules stated in the VIP will apply.
 
"BCERP" means The Boeing Company Employee Retirement Plan.
 
"Board of Directors" means the board of directors of The Boeing Company.
 
"Code" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
 
"Committee" means the Employee Benefit Plans Committee.
 
"Company" means The Boeing Company, its successors in interest, and its Affiliates and Subsidiaries.
 
"Compensation" means a Participant's Compensation as defined under the VIP, but determined without regard to the limitation on Compensation under Code section 401(a)(17). In no event will Compensation include payments under any incentive compensation plan, without regard to whether it is included in compensation under the VIP.
 
"Deferrals" means the portion of a Participant's Compensation, if any, that he or she elects to defer on a pre-tax basis under this Plan in accordance with Section 4.1.
 
"Deferral Election" means the election made by an Eligible Employee to defer a portion of his or her Compensation in accordance with Section 4.1.
 
"Disability" means a physical or mental impairment as defined under Code section 409A.
 
"Earnings Credit" means the adjustment to a Participant's Account under Section 4.2(B).
 
"Eligible Employee" means, with respect to any Plan Year, an Employee of the Company who has satisfied the requirements of Article III.
 
"Employee" means any person who is employed as a common law employee by any member of the Company.
 
"FSP" means The Boeing Company Employee Financial Security Plan.
 
"Matching Credit" means the amount credited to a Participant's Account under Section 4.2(A).
 
"Participant" means an Eligible Employee who has elected to defer Compensation under the Plan in accordance with Article IV, or an Employee or former Employee who has amounts credited to his or her Account.
 
"Plan" means this Supplemental Benefit Plan for Employees of The Boeing Company as herein set forth, together with any amendments that may be adopted.
 
"Plan Year" means the calendar year.
 
"SERP" means the Supplemental Executive Retirement Plan for Employees of The Boeing Company.
 
"Separation from Service" or "Separates from Service" means an Employee's death, retirement or termination of employment from the Company within the meaning of Code section 409A. For purposes of determining whether a Separation from Service has occurred, Affiliates and Subsidiaries are defined by using the language "at least 80 percent" to define the controlled group under Code section 1563(a) in lieu of the 50 percent default rule stated in Treasury Regulation section 1.409A-1(h)(3).
 
A Separation from Service is deemed to include a reasonably anticipated permanent reduction in the level of services performed by an Employee, to less than 50 percent of the average level of services performed by the Employee during the immediately preceding 36-month period.
 
"Specified Employee" means an Employee who is a "specified employee" within the meaning of Code section 409A. Specified Employee status is determined on the last day of the prior Plan Year, to take effect as of April 1 of the Plan Year for a 12-month period. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Specified Employees shall be determined by including the employees whom the Company reasonably determines to be the 75 top-paid officers of the Company rather than the 50 top-paid officers as provided under Code section 416(i)(1)(A), to the extent permitted under Code section 409A.
 
"Unforeseeable Emergency" means "unforeseeable emergency" within the meaning of Code section 409A, as determined by the Committee.
 
"VIP" means The Boeing Company Voluntary Investment Plan.
 
 
An Employee is eligible to participate in the Plan for a Plan Year if he or she satisfies each of the conditions described in (A)-(C) below:
 
 
 
The dollar limit imposed by section 415(c) of the Code for the prior Plan Year, divided by the percentage equal to the sum of (i), (ii) and (iii), as applicable.
 
 
 
Example: Assume that the Code section 415(c) limit is $45,000 for the current Plan Year, the maximum VIP employee contribution is 20% of compensation, and the maximum VIP employer matching contribution is 6% (75% of up to 8% of compensation), for the current Plan Year. To be eligible to participate in this Plan during the Plan Year, the Employee's Base Salary as of October 1
following
st
must be at least $173,000 ($45,000/(20% + 6%) = $45,000/.26). If the Employee actively participates in the BSS Plan, which requires a 3% employee contribution, his or her Base Salary as of October 1
st
must be at least $155,000 ($45,000/(20% + 6% + 3%) = $45,000/.29).
 
Effective March 22, 2003, participants in the Boeing Satellite Systems Voluntary Savings Plan (the "BSS Voluntary Savings Plan") became eligible to participate in the VIP. Consequently, a former participant in the BSS Voluntary Savings Plan who met the eligibility requirements of this Plan as of March 22, 2003 became eligible for benefits under this Plan based upon his or her participation in the VIP.
 
An Eligible Employee will become a Participant when he or she elects to defer Compensation by filing a timely Deferral Election in accordance with Article IV below.
 
Each Participant shall be entitled to benefits under this Plan as follows:
 
An Eligible Employee may elect to defer a percentage of his or her Compensation otherwise payable by the Company for a Plan Year by executing and delivering a Deferral Election, as described further below. This percentage is limited to the maximum percentage described in Section 3.1(C)(i), as applicable to the Eligible Employee. A new Deferral Election must be executed with respect to each Plan Year.
Deferrals will be made from the Participant's Compensation only to the extent that either: (i) Compensation for the applicable Plan Year exceeds the limitation under Code section 401(a)(17), as indexed, or (ii) the Participant's annual additions under the VIP for the applicable Plan Year reach the dollar limitation of Code section 415(c), as indexed.
Deferred Compensation will be credited to the Participant's Account on the date the Compensation would otherwise be payable, or as soon thereafter as administratively feasible.
 
A Participant's Deferral Election must be executed and delivered to the Company in accordance with rules established by the Committee.
 
In general, the Deferral Election must be filed during the election period established by the Committee. This election will become irrevocable as of the end of the election period, but in no event later than December 31 of the Plan Year in which the election is made. Each election will apply solely to the Compensation payable in the succeeding Plan Year. Participants must execute a new Deferral Election to defer Compensation payable in each succeeding Plan Year.
Deferral Elections generally may not be modified during the Plan Year. Likewise, an Employee eligible for this Plan remains subject to restrictions on mid-year contribution election changes under the VIP, in accordance with the terms of the VIP.
 
See Section 4.4 for a limited exception to the general rule on the irrevocability of Deferral Elections, in the event of Unforeseeable Emergency.
 
An Employee who becomes an Eligible Employee during the Plan Year (as a new hire, rehire or due to raise or promotion) will not be eligible to participate during such Plan Year.
 
The Committee will establish and maintain an Account for each Participant. The Account will be credited with Deferrals, as well as Matching Credits and Earnings Credits as described below. The Account will be reduced as payments are made.
 
A Participant who defers Compensation for a Plan Year will be credited with a Matching Credit from the Company. This Matching Credit will equal a percentage of the Participant's Deferrals for the Plan Year, subject to a limit on the Participant's Compensation from which Deferrals are made under this Plan for the Plan Year. The relevant net percentage will be limited to the maximum rate described in Section 3.1(C)(ii), as applicable to each Participant.
Matching Credits will be credited to the Participant's Account on the date that the underlying Deferral is credited to the Participant's Account.
 
For periods prior to January 1, 2009, a Participant's Account will be credited with earnings under the Interest Fund Method described in (i) below.
For periods on or after January 1, 2009, a Participant's Account will be credited, at the Participant's election, with earnings under either: (i) the Interest Fund Method, or (ii) the Other Investment Funds method, each as described below. In the absence of an election the Interest Fund method will be used.
 
Under the Interest Fund Method for periods prior to January 1, 2009, a Participant's Account will be adjusted each month in accordance with changes in the unit value of the Account to reflect interest, as of the first business day of that month. Interest will be calculated based on the value of the Account as of the last day of the preceding month.
 
For periods on or after January 1, 2009, a Participant's Account will be adjusted daily in accordance with changes in the unit value of the Account to reflect interest, based on the Participant's Account balance.
Interest will be calculated for each Plan Year as the mean between the high and low (during the first eleven months of the preceding Plan Year) of yields on AA-rated industrial bonds as reported by Moody's Investors Service, Inc., rounded to the nearest
 1
/
4
th
of one percent. The Company will notify Participants annually of the established interest rate.
 
For periods on or after January 1, 2009, in addition to the Interest Fund method of allocating earnings on Deferrals and Matching Credits, a Participant may choose to diversify his or her Account by electing that it be credited (or charged) with the expenses, income, gains and losses on investment funds similar to those offered under The Boeing Company Voluntary Investment Plan (excluding the Boeing Stock Fund and Stable Value Fund offered thereunder) as designated by the Committee from time to time, pursuant to an election by the Participant to have the Participant's Account credited as though the Participant had elected to invest in such funds in such increments as the Participant will direct in accordance with rules to be established by the Committee or its delegates; provided that the Committee may disregard such elections in its discretion.
 
For periods on or after January 1, 2009, a Participant may change how future Deferrals and Matching Credits are invested anytime during the Plan Year. The Participant may also transfer any portion of his or her Account from one fund to another on a daily basis, provided that a Participant may not transfer funds from one investment fund to another and back on the same day.
 
For Heritage BSS Participants, the benefits under this Plan shall also include any account as of April 3, 2003 under the BSS Excess Plan, as adjusted after April 3, 2003 for earnings, losses and expenses. As of April 4, 2003, all accounts of Heritage BSS Participants under the BSS Excess Plan were transferred to this Plan.
 
For purposes of this subsection (D), "Heritage BSS Participant" means any Participant in this Plan having a prior benefit under the BSS Excess Plan based on his or her participation in the BSS Voluntary Savings Plan.
 
A Participant's interest in his or her Accounts generally will be 100% vested at all times.
A Participant's Account may be forfeited or reduced in the event of one of the following events:
 
 
See Section 8.3 regarding the unfunded nature of this Plan.
 
Notwithstanding the election procedures described in Section 4.1, a Participant will be permitted to cancel an existing Deferral Election with regard to a Plan Year during that Plan Year, where the Participant incurs an Unforeseeable Emergency, as determined by the Committee.
To the extent that a Participant has elected and received a distribution due to an Unforeseeable Emergency under Section 5.1(F), the Participant will be deemed to have elected to cancel his or her Deferral Election for the remainder of the applicable Plan Year.
 
 
 
A Participant may elect the form and timing of distribution with regard to his or her entire Account (including future Deferrals, Matching Credits and Earnings Credits) as described below, subject to the cashout rule in subsection (B) below. This distribution election must be made at the same time the Participant makes his or her Deferral Election.
Distribution elections made with regard to a Participant's entire Account may be changed solely to the extent permitted under subsection (C) below.
 
The lump sum distribution option is a single lump sum payable in January of any Plan Year following the Participant's Separation from Service. The amount of such distribution will be based on the value of the Participant's Account determined as of the date of payment.
Payment of the lump sum will be made the later of: (i) January of the first Plan Year following Separation from Service, or (ii) January of the first Plan Year following the Participant's attainment of a specified age (subject to (D) below), as elected by the Participant under this Section 5.1.
 
The installment payment option is a series of annual installment payments for a period between 2 and 15 years. The amount payable to the Participant each year generally shall be computed by multiplying the balance in the Account (or the applicable portion of the Account) by a fraction, the numerator of which is one and the denominator of which is the number of years remaining in the distribution period on the first day of January of such year. See Section 5.1(B) below for application of the cashout rule to installment payments.
Annual installment payments will begin the later of: (i) January of the first Plan Year following Separation from Service, or (ii) January of the first Plan Year following the Participant's attainment of a specified age (subject to (D) below), as elected by the Participant under this Section 5.1. Payments will continue until the full balance in the Participant's Account has been paid.
 
The Plan will respect previous distribution elections made by certain Participants who are former participants in the Boeing Satellite Systems Salaried Employees' Excess Benefit Plan ("BSS Excess Plan"). For these Participants, any distribution election made prior to April 4, 2003 under section 3(b)(5) of the BSS Excess Plan will apply, unless the Participant elects otherwise under this Article V.
In the event that no distribution option is elected, the Participant will be deemed to have elected to receive a single lump sum payable in January of the first Plan Year following the Participant's Separation from Service.
 
Notwithstanding the foregoing, the following rules shall apply, subject to the six-month delay in payment for Specified Employees under (E):
 
 
 
Effective January 1, 2008, a Participant may change a distribution election with regard to his or her entire Account only once after the initial distribution election is made, in accordance with the conditions stated below. To the extent such change would defer commencement of any portion of the Participant's Account beyond both age 70
 1
/
2
and Separation from Service, the change will not be effective with respect to such portion.
 
 
 
In no event can installment payments be revoked once they have begun.
Prior to January 1, 2008, a Participant may change a distribution election with regard to his or her entire Account, in accordance with procedures established by the Committee, without the restrictions stated above. Any changes made under this paragraph will be invalid to the extent they affect distributions scheduled for the Plan Year in which the change is made.
 
Payment of benefits under this Plan will begin not later than the first January following the calendar year in which the Participant both attains (or would have attained) age 70
 1
/
2
and is Separated from Service. Payment of benefits for Participants actively employed beyond age 70
 1
/
2
will begin no later than the first January following the calendar year in which the Participant Separates from Service. In the event that no distribution option is elected under (A) above, the Participant will be deemed to have elected to receive a single lump sum distribution.
 
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary under this Article V, a Specified Employee will not receive any distribution under this Plan during the six-month period immediately following his or her Separation from Service.
The Account of a Specified Employee will be distributed in the form elected under subsection (A) above. This distribution will commence as of the later of:
 
 
 
If a Participant has elected installments under (A) above, subsequent installment payments will be made in January of each successive year until the Account is exhausted.
 
In the event of a Specified Employee's death during the six-month waiting period, the waiting period will cease to apply. The Specified Employee's benefits will be distributed in accordance with Section 5.2 (Death Benefits) below.
 
A Participant or Beneficiary may elect to receive a distribution of all or a portion of his or her Accounts immediately, regardless of whether benefit payments have commenced, to the extent that the Participant or Beneficiary incurs an Unforeseeable Emergency.
The amount of the distribution will be limited to the amount reasonably necessary to satisfy the emergency need, including any taxes or penalties reasonably anticipated to result from the distribution, as determined by the Committee.
 
If a Participant dies before his or her entire Account has been distributed, the remaining Account balance will be distributed to his or her Beneficiary in accordance with the Deferral Elections filed with the Committee. Distributions to the Beneficiary will be made at the same time and in the same form as the payment that otherwise would have been made to the Participant.
To the extent no distribution election has been filed, the remaining Account balance will be paid to the Beneficiary in a single sum in January of the calendar year following the Participant's death.
 
This Section 5.3 addresses the form and timing of payment for a Participant who rehires to the Company following a Separation from Service. For purposes of this Section 5.3, a rehire includes a Participant who returns to the Company following a Separation from Service that is deemed to occur under Code section 409A due to an Authorized Period of Absence or a period of a reduced level of services.
 
This subsection (A) applies to a rehired Participant who has received or begun receiving benefits under the Plan because he or she has experienced a Separation from Service and has attained the specified age (if applicable).
 
Installment payments that commenced prior to the Participant's rehire with respect to Deferrals made before the Participant's Separation from Service ("Old Deferrals") will not be suspended by reason of the Participant's rehire. These Old Deferrals will continue to be paid until exhausted, without regard to the period of rehire.
Old Deferrals.
To the extent a Participant made additional Deferrals while on an Authorized Period of Absence or during a period of a reduced level of services that constituted a deemed Separation from Service under Code section 409A, such Deferrals will be distributed in January of the first Plan Year following the year in which they are made, in accordance with the Participant's earlier distribution election. This is because the Participant has already satisfied the conditions for payment under Section 5.1(A); namely, he or she has attained the specified age and has experienced a Separation from Service attributable to such Deferrals.
Interim Deferrals.
Deferrals attributable to periods after the date of rehire ("New Deferrals") will remain subject to the Participant's earlier distribution election as to the timing and form of payment under Section 5.1(A) (subject to the change rules in Section 5.1(C)), without regard to any Separation from Service that occurred prior to rehire. As a result, New Deferrals will be distributed in January following the Participant's Separation from Service , in the form selected under the original distribution election. This is because the Participant already has attained the specified age under Section 5.1(A) but has not yet experienced a Separation from Service attributable to the New Deferrals.
New Deferrals.
after rehire
 
This subsection (B) applies to a rehired Participant who has not begun receiving benefits under the Plan because he or she has not attained the specified age under Section 5.1(A).
. The rehired Participant's Old Deferrals (and any Deferrals made during an Authorized Period of Absence or a period of a reduced level of services) will remain subject to the Participant's earlier distribution election as to the timing and form of payment under Section 5.1(A) (subject to the change rules in Section 5.1(C)). This means that if the Participant's original distribution election selected benefits in the form of a lump sum (or installments) payable in January following attainment of a specified age under Section 5.1(A), then the Participant's Old Deferrals (and any Deferrals made during an Authorized Period of Absence or a period of a reduced level of services) will be payable as a lump sum (or installments, if so elected) in January following the year in which he or she attains the specified age, even if the Participant has not had a subsequent Separation from Service after rehire. This result will not change in the event that the Participant attains the specified age after the initial Separation from Service (or while on Authorized Period of Absence or during a period of a reduced level of services), but is rehired before benefits actually begin.
Old and Interim Deferrals
 
. The Participant's New Deferrals will remain subject to the Participant's earlier distribution election as to the timing and form of payment under Section 5.1(A) (subject to the change rules in Section 5.1(C)), without regard to any Separation from Service that occurred prior to rehire, as described in Section 5.3(A) above. As a result, New Deferrals will be distributed either (i) in January following the Participant's Separation from Service , or (ii) in January following both the Participant's Separation from Service and after attainment of the specified age, in accordance with the original distribution election. This is because the Participant has not yet experienced a Separation from Service attributable to the New Deferrals.
New Deferrals
after rehire
after rehire
 
 
The Plan shall be administered by the Committee. The Committee shall make such rules, interpretations, determinations of fact and computations as it may deem appropriate. Any decision of the Committee with respect to the Plan, including (without limitation) any determination of eligibility to participate in the Plan and any calculation of plan benefits, shall be conclusive and binding on all persons. The Committee shall submit to the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors periodic reports covering the operation of the Plan.
 
The procedures for making claims for benefits under the Plan and for having the denial of a benefits claim reviewed shall be the same as those procedures set forth in the VIP.
 
The Board of Directors of The Boeing Company shall have the authority to amend or terminate the Plan at any time. The Board of Directors may delegate its authority to amend the Plan at any time, in its sole discretion. In the event of Plan amendment or termination, a Participant's benefits under the Plan shall not be less than the Plan benefits to which the Participant would be entitled if the Participant had terminated employment immediately prior to such amendment or termination of the Plan.
In general, upon the termination of the Plan with respect to any Participant, the affected Participants will not be entitled to receive a distribution until the time specified in Article V. Notwithstanding the foregoing, The Boeing Company may, in its discretion, terminate the entire Plan and pay each Participant a single lump-sum distribution of his or her entire accrued benefit to the extent permitted under conditions set forth in Code section 409A and any IRS or Treasury guidance thereunder.
 
 
Nothing in the Plan shall be deemed to give any person any right to remain in the employ of the Company or affect any right of the Company to terminate a person's employment with or without cause.
 
No benefit under the Plan shall be subject in any manner to anticipation, alienation, sale, transfer, assignment, pledge, encumbrance, charge, execution, attachment, garnishment, or any other legal process. Any attempt to take such action shall be void and shall authorize the Committee, in its sole and absolute discretion, to forfeit all further right and interest in any benefit under this Plan. In addition, a Participant's Account may be reduced by the amount of any tax obligation paid by the Company on behalf of a Participant or surviving spouse, if the Participant or surviving spouse fails to reimburse the Company for such obligation.
 
No funds shall be segregated or earmarked for any current or former participant, Beneficiary or other person under the Plan. However, the Company may establish one or more trusts to assist in meeting its obligations under the Plan, the assets of which shall be subject to the claims of the Company's general creditors. No current or former Participant, Beneficiary or other person, individually or as a member of a group, shall have any right, title or interest in any account, fund, grantor trust, or any asset that may be acquired by the Company in respect of its obligations under the Plan (other than as a general creditor of the Company with an unsecured claim against its general assets).
 
Payment of benefits under this Plan may be delayed to the extent permitted by Code section 409A, as determined by the Committee.
 
If a determination is made that the Account of any Participant (or his or her Beneficiary) is subject to current income taxation under Code section 409A, then the taxable portion of such Account will be immediately distributed to the Participant (or his or her Beneficiary), notwithstanding the general timing rules described in Article V above.
 
It is intended that amounts deferred under this Plan will not be taxable under section 409A of the Code with respect to any individual. All provisions of this Plan shall be construed in a manner consistent with this intent.
 
The validity of the Plan or any of its provisions will be determined under and will be construed according to federal law and, to the extent permissible, according to the internal laws of the state of Illinois. If any provision of the Plan is held illegal or invalid for any reason, such determination will not affect the remaining provisions of the Plan and the Plan will be construed and enforced as if said illegal or invalid provision had never been included.
 
No legal action may be brought in court on a claim for benefits under the Plan after 180 days following the decision on appeal (or 180 days following the expiration of the time to make an appeal if no appeal is made).
 
 
In July 1998, Hughes Space and Communications Company, Hughes Electron Dynamics, Inc. and Spectrolab, Inc. ("Hughes") adopted a special appendix (the "Hughes Appendix") to the Hughes Excess Plan. Individuals affected by the Hughes Appendix are referred to in this Special Appendix as "Hughes Participants".
That Hughes Appendix was adopted to provide certain Hughes Participants whose benefits from the Hughes Retirement Plan were initially miscalculated an election to receive alternative benefits. These benefits are referred to as the "Substitute Benefit".
The initial miscalculation for these Hughes Participants was the subject of a filing with the Internal Revenue Service under the Voluntary Compliance Resolution ("VCR") program on August 22, 1997. On January 28, 1998, the Internal Revenue Service issued a compliance statement concerning the VCR application. Under the compliance statement, Hughes corrected the miscalculation by reducing the benefits payable to the affected Hughes Participants under the Hughes Retirement Plan from the initially calculated amount. Under the correction approved by the IRS in the VCR application, payments under the Hughes Retirement Plan would continue at the monthly amount originally scheduled under the initial calculation. When the actuarial equivalent value of a Hughes Participant's benefits paid under the Hughes Retirement Plan reaches the maximum limit imposed by section 415 of the Code, then the remaining payments to the Hughes Participant will be made under the Hughes Excess Plan. The benefits which were originally scheduled for payment under the Hughes Retirement Plan under the initial calculation, but which will instead be paid pursuant to the Hughes Excess Plan after the maximum limit of section 415 has been reached, are referred to in this Appendix as the "Reclassified Payments." Benefits paid under the Hughes Retirement Plan are not considered Reclassified Payments, even if the payments exceeded the limits of section 415 of the Code and therefore are not afforded the tax treatment (including the ability to elect a rollover) afforded to qualified plan payments.
As a result of the initial miscalculation, some benefit payments from the Hughes Retirement Plan which Hughes Participants rolled over into their individual retirement accounts were withdrawn to avoid or minimize excise taxes ("Required IRA Withdrawals"). Hughes Participants who made Required IRA Withdrawals were entitled to elect the Substitute Benefit.
 
Furthermore, certain Hughes Participants received payments from the Hughes Retirement Plan in 1998 which were in excess of the maximum benefit allowed by Code section 415 under the method of calculating the maximum benefit as described in the VCR application ("1998 Excess Payments"). Such Hughes Participants were entitled to elect the Substitute Benefit.
In addition, under their original benefit elections, certain Hughes Participants were scheduled to have received Reclassified Payments which were not yet paid as of July 31, 1999. Such Hughes Participants were entitled to elect the Substitute Benefit.
Under the Hughes Appendix, each affected Hughes Participant was given an election to be paid the Substitute Benefit. In order to elect the Substitute Benefit, a Hughes Participant must have signed and delivered to Hughes a written release in the form and manner acceptable to Hughes. The Substitute Benefit was provided in consideration for the Hughes Participant's agreement, made pursuant to the release, to forego legal action against Hughes and the other persons specified in the release.
This Special Appendix is intended to provide the unpaid balance of the Substitute Benefit to Hughes Participants who are Acquired Hughes Participants. Only Acquired Hughes Participants are affected by this Special Appendix to the Plan.
Effective as of April 4, 2003, this Appendix A was transferred in its entirety from the Boeing Satellite Systems Salaried Employees' Excess Benefit Plan to the Plan.
 
 
The following Hughes Participants were provided an opportunity to elect the Substitute Benefit: (1) Hughes Participants for whom Reclassified Payments were to be made on or after August 1, 1998, (2) Hughes Participants who received 1998 Excess Payments, and (3) Hughes Participants who made Required IRA Withdrawals. The election of the Substitute Benefit was made in the time and manner prescribed by Hughes. The election must have specified the date on which the Hughes Participant elected to commence payment of the Substitute Benefit, which must have been a date which was the first through fifteenth anniversary of the Hughes Participant's "Deferral Start Date." The Deferral Start Date for a Hughes Participant is the later of (x) August 1, 1998, or (y) the day as of which the initial Reclassified Payment would have been scheduled for payment to the Hughes Participant, but for the election to receive the Substitute Benefit. The election must have specified whether the Hughes
 
Participant elected payment in a single installment, two substantially equal annual installments, or five substantially equal annual installments. The election must have been accompanied by a properly executed release acceptable to Hughes. If a Hughes Participant did not effectively elect the Substitute Benefit, then the Hughes Participant's remaining Reclassified Payments (if any) would be made to the Hughes Participant pursuant to the general provisions in the Hughes Excess Plan applicable to payments attributable to the Hughes Retirement Plan, as contemplated in the VCR application.
Any election described above by an Acquired Hughes Participant will continue to apply under this Special Appendix. Any Acquired Hughes Participant who did not make an effective election will continue to have his or her remaining Reclassified Payments (if any) made pursuant to the general provisions in the Plan (as successor to the Hughes Excess Plan) applicable to payments attributable to the Retirement Plan (as successor to the Hughes Retirement Plan), as contemplated in the VCR application.
 
If a Hughes Participant elected the Substitute Benefit, then in lieu of payment from the generally applicable provisions of the Hughes Excess Plan of the Hughes Participant's remaining Reclassified Payments (if any), the Substitute Benefit became payable. The Substitute Benefit was the amount credited to the Hughes Participant's Hughes Account, calculated as described in Section A.2.4(a) of this Appendix.
 
 
Certain Hughes Participants elected a short-term deferral of Reclassified Payments which, but for such election, would have been paid between January 1, 1998 and July 1, 1998. Under this Appendix, the term "Suspended Payments" refers to the Reclassified Payments which were subject to the short-term deferral described in the preceding sentence.
 
The term "Proximate Reclassified Payments" refers to those Reclassified Payments (other than Suspended Payments) which, in the absence of an election of the Substitute Benefit, would have been scheduled for payment under the Hughes Excess Plan on or prior to July 1, 1999.
 
The term "Distant Reclassified Payments" refers to Reclassified Payments which, in the absence of an election of the Substitute Benefit, would have been scheduled for payment under the Hughes Excess Plan after July 1, 1999. Distant Reclassified Payments may be recalculated to reflect how the Retirement Plan implemented the repeal of section 415(e) of the Code.
 
The term "Settlement Credit" refers to an amount calculated for each Hughes Participant which is the greater of (i) or (ii) below:
 
 
 
The term "Acquired Hughes Participant" means any person who became a Participant or a Former Participant under the terms of the Employee Matters Agreement between The Boeing Company and Hughes Electronics Corporation.
 
The term "Hughes Retirement Plan" means the Hughes Non-Bargaining Retirement Plan.
 
 
Hughes established an account, for bookkeeping purposes only, for each Hughes Participant who elected the Substitute Benefit (the "Hughes Account"). The Hughes Account was to be credited as follows:
 
 
 
 
 
On the Closing Date, the Company shall establish an account, for bookkeeping purposes only, for each Acquired Hughes Participant who elected the Substitute Benefit (the "BSS Account"). The BSS Account shall be credited as follows:
 
 
 
 
 
The BSS Account will be paid to the Acquired Hughes Participant as specified in the election described in Section A.2.1 of this Appendix.
 
The unpaid balance of the BSS Account will be paid to the Acquired Hughes Participant's Beneficiary as follows.
Unless the Hughes Participant elected otherwise, one-half of the unpaid balance of the BSS Account shall be paid as soon as feasible following the Acquired Hughes Participant's death and the remaining one-half shall be paid in January of the following year.
Each Hughes Participant was entitled to elect, at the time of the Hughes Participant's election under Section A.2.1 of this Appendix, that the benefit payable to the Beneficiary following the death of the Hughes Participant shall be made at the time and in the manner payment would have been made to the Hughes Participant during the Hughes Participant's life. This election will continue to apply to Acquired Hughes Participants.
If Reclassified Payments remain unpaid following payment of the BSS Account to the Beneficiary, then the Reclassified Payments shall be paid to the Beneficiary at the time the Reclassified Payments would have been paid but for the election of the Substitute Benefit. Unless an Acquired Hughes Participant elects otherwise, the Beneficiary for purposes of this Appendix shall be the Beneficiary otherwise designated under the Retirement Plan. The Acquired Hughes Participant shall be entitled to name a different Beneficiary for purposes of this Appendix.
 
 
This Appendix is incorporated by reference into the Plan as if set forth fully therein. Any capitalized terms used in this Appendix which are not defined in this Appendix shall have the meanings specified in the Plan.
 
Elections by a Hughes Participant under this Appendix are irrevocable.
 
In 1997, the Hughes' defense businesses were acquired by Raytheon Company. As part of that transaction, the Hughes and Raytheon Company agreed that the liabilities of the Plan and the assets and liabilities of the Retirement Plan attributable to defense employees and retirees will be transferred to plans sponsored by Raytheon Company. Accordingly, the provisions of this Appendix apply only to non-defense retirees, and no benefit is created under this Appendix for defense retirees.
 
Code section 415(e) was repealed effective for limitation years beginning on or after January 1, 2000. The repeal may increase the limitation on benefits payable from the Retirement Plan to some or all Acquired Hughes Participants who elected the Substitute Benefit. The Company reserves the right to pay the Substitute Benefit from the Retirement Plan in lieu of the benefits payable hereunder to the extent permitted by law.
 
 
Prior to January 1, 1999, this Plan offered certain benefits to participants in the BCERP whose benefits were affected by the limitations on benefits or contributions imposed by section 415 and 401(a)(17) of the Code. Effective January 1, 1999, certain of those participants were transferred to the SERP and ceased to be eligible for benefits under this Plan based upon their participation in the BCERP. To the extent any participant eligible for benefits under this Plan based upon his or her participation in the BCERP was not transferred to the SERP, such participant shall remain eligible to participate in this Plan and to receive such benefits. Effective January 1, 2008, all such benefits remaining under this Plan have commenced and are not subject to the deferral and distribution rules under Articles IV & V of the 2008 restatement.
With respect to the BCERP, the benefits under this Plan represent the difference between the actual benefits of a Participant under the BCERP and the benefits that would have been payable under that plan except for the limitations on benefits imposed by sections 415 and 401(a)(17) of the Code. The benefits payable under this Plan with respect to the BCERP were payable to the Participant or to any other person who is receiving or entitled to receive benefits with respect to the Participant under the BCERP, and were paid in the same form, at the same times and for the same period as benefits were paid with respect to the Participant under the BCERP.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the Actuarial Equivalent of the benefit payable under this Plan with respect to the BCERP was $10,000 or less, the Actuarial Equivalent value of the benefit was paid in the form of an automatic lump sum at the same time as benefits began or were paid under the BCERP. Actuarial Equivalent is defined in the BCERP. This paragraph applies to Participants who retire or begin receiving termination benefits under the BCERP on or after February 1, 1997, and for this purpose the Actuarial Equivalent shall be determined as of the Participant's Retirement Date under the Employee Retirement Plan. This paragraph shall also apply to Participants who are receiving benefits under this Plan as of February 1, 1997, and for this purpose the Actuarial Equivalent shall be determined with respect to each participant's remaining benefits payable under this Plan determined as of February 1, 1997.
Effective January 1, 1999, any Employee who is eligible to participate in the SERP shall no longer be entitled to any benefit under this Appendix B1.1. To the extent any such Employee is determined to be entitled to a benefit under this Appendix B1.1 of the Plan, such benefit shall be offset by any benefits received under the SERP. Any Employee who was a Participant in this Plan as of December 31, 1998 and eligible for a benefit under this Appendix B1.1 shall remain eligible for such benefit unless and until such Employee becomes eligible to participate in the SERP. The Plan will respect beneficiary designations made by a Participant at the time of commencement of the benefit under this Section B.1.1, notwithstanding any contrary definition of Beneficiary under the Plan.
 
Prior to January 1, 1999, salaried employees who were not represented by a collective bargaining agent were eligible to participate in the FSP. Accordingly, participants in the FSP were eligible to participate in this Plan prior to that date, to the extent that their FSP benefits were limited by Code sections 415 and 401(a)(17).
The benefits under this Plan with respect to a particular year were the additional benefits that would have been payable under the FSP if the reduction on contributions and other additions had not been made. All amounts deferred under this Plan were credited to the Accounts of Participants at the time such amounts would otherwise have been credited to their accounts under the FSP.
For periods before January 1, 2009, a Participant's Account is credited with interest in accordance with the Interest Fund method under Section 4.2(B)(i).
For periods on or after January 1, 2009, a Participant's Account is credited with earnings in accordance with the method elected by the Participant under Section 4.2(B) (Earnings Credit Methods).
The benefits payable under this Plan with respect to the FSP will be payable to the Participant in accordance with the distribution rules under Article V.
 

Exhibit 10.4
The purpose of The Boeing Company 2003 Incentive Stock Plan (the "Plan"), as amended and restated subject to shareholder approval, is to attract, retain and motivate employees, officers, directors, consultants, agents, advisors and independent contractors of The Boeing Company (the "Company") by providing them the opportunity to acquire a proprietary interest in the Company and to link their interests and efforts to the long-term interests of the Company's shareholders.
As used in the Plan,
means the net cash provided by operating activities of the Company as reported in the Company's consolidated statement of cash flows included in its Annual Report on Form 10-K, adjusted to eliminate the effect on operating cash flows of net customer financing cash flows, as reported in the Company's consolidated statement of cash flows included in its Annual Report on Form 10-K.
"Adjusted Operating Cash Flow"
means any Option, Stock Appreciation Right, Restricted Stock, Stock Unit, Performance Share, Performance Unit, dividend equivalent, cash-based award or other incentive payable in cash or in shares of Common Stock as may be designated by the Committee from time to time.
"Award"
means the Board of Directors of the Company.
"Board"
means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended from time to time.
"Code"
has the meaning set forth in Section 3.1.
"Committee"
means the common stock, par value $5.00 per share, of the Company.
"Common Stock"
means The Boeing Company, a Delaware corporation.
"Company"
means a "covered employee" as that term is defined in Section 162(m)(3) of the Code or any successor provision.
"Covered Employee"
means "Disability" as defined by the Committee or the Company's vice president of compensation and benefits for purposes of the Plan or an Award or in the instrument evidencing the Award or in a written employment or services agreement between the Participant and the Company or a Related Company.
"Disability"
has the meaning set forth in Section 18.
"Effective Date"
means the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended from time to time.
"Exchange Act"
means the average of the high and low per share trading prices (or the average of the opening and closing prices, or the closing price, if so determined by the Committee) for the Common Stock on the New York Stock Exchange during regular session trading as reported to the Company by or such other source the Committee deems reliable for a single trading day. The Committee may vary its determination of the Fair Market Value as provided in this Section 2 depending on whether Fair Market Value is in reference to the grant, exercise, vesting, settlement or payout of an Award and, for Awards subject to 409A, as provided in Section 409A.
"Fair Market Value"
The Wall Street Journal
means the date on which the Committee completes the corporate action authorizing the grant of an Award or such later date specified by the Committee, provided that conditions to the exercisability or vesting of Awards shall not defer the Grant Date.
"Grant Date"
 
Page 1
means an Option granted with the intention that it qualify as an "incentive stock option" as that term is defined in Section 422 of the Code or any successor provision.
"Incentive Stock Option"
means "Layoff" as defined by the Committee or the Company's vice president of compensation and benefits for purposes of the Plan or an Award or in the instrument evidencing the Award or in a written employment or services agreement between the Participant and the Company or a Related Company.
"Layoff"
means an Option other than an Incentive Stock Option.
"Nonqualified Stock Option"
means nonrecurring items deemed not reflective of the Company's core operating performance, including, but not limited to, exogenous events, acquisitions, divestitures, changes in accounting principles or "extraordinary items" determined under generally accepted accounting principles.
"Nonrecurring Items"
means a right to purchase Common Stock granted under Section 7.
"Option"
means any eligible person as set forth in Section 5 to whom an Award is granted.
"Participant"
has the meaning set forth in Section 11.2.
"Performance Criteria"
means any period as determined by the Committee in its sole discretion. The Committee may establish different Performance Periods for different Participants, and the Committee may establish concurrent or overlapping Performance Periods.
"Performance Period"
has the meaning set forth in Section 10.1.
"Performance Share"
has the meaning set forth in Section 10.2.
"Performance Unit"
means The Boeing Company 2003 Incentive Stock Plan.
"Plan"
means any corporation in which the Company owns, directly or indirectly, at least 50% of the total combined voting power of all classes of stock, or any other entity (including, but not limited to, partnerships and joint ventures) in which the Company owns, directly or indirectly, at least 50% of the combined equity thereof. Notwithstanding the foregoing, for purposes of determining whether any individual may be a Participant for purposes of any grant of Incentive Stock Options, the term "Related Company" shall have the meaning ascribed to the term "subsidiary" in Section 424(f), and for purposes of determining whether any individual may be a Participant for purposes of any grant of Options or Stock Appreciation Rights, the term "Related Company" shall mean any "Service Recipient" as that term is defined for purposes of Section 409A.
"Related Company"
means an Award of shares of Common Stock granted under Section 9, the rights of ownership of which may be subject to restrictions prescribed by the Committee.
"Restricted Stock"
means termination of employment voluntarily at a time when a Participant is entitled to begin immediate receipt of early or normal retirement benefits under one or more of the Company's defined benefit pension plans, or under comparable terms of a Related Company's pension plan, as then in effect, unless provided otherwise in the instrument evidencing the Award or in a written employment or services agreement between the Participant and the Company or a Related Company.
"Retirement"
means Code Section 162(m), including any proposed and final regulations and other guidance issued thereunder by the Department of the Treasury and/or the Internal Revenue Service.
"Section 162(m)"
means Code Section 409A, including any proposed and final regulations and other guidance issued thereunder by the Department of the Treasury and/or the Internal Revenue Service.
"Section 409A"
means the Securities Act of 1933, as amended from time to time.
"Securities Act"
has the meaning set forth in Section 8.1.
"Stock Appreciation Right" or "SAR"
means an Award granted under Section 9 denominated in units of Common Stock.
"Stock Unit"
 
Page 2
means Awards granted or shares of Common Stock issued by the Company in assumption of, or in substitution or exchange for, awards previously granted by a company acquired by the Company or with which the Company combines.
"Substitute Awards"
, unless otherwise defined by the Committee or the Company's vice president of compensation and benefits or in the instrument evidencing the Award or in a written employment or services agreement, means a termination of employment or service relationship with the Company or a Related Company for any reason, whether voluntary or involuntary, including by reason of death, Disability, Retirement or Layoff. Any question as to whether and when there has been a Termination of Service for the purposes of an Award and the cause of such Termination of Service shall be determined by the Company's vice president of compensation and benefits or by the Committee with respect to officers subject to the reporting requirements of Section 16(a) of the Securities Act, and such determination shall be final. Transfer of a Participant's employment or service relationship between wholly owned subsidiaries of the Company, or between the Company and any wholly owned subsidiaries of the Company, shall not be considered a Termination of Service for purposes of an Award. Unless the Committee determines otherwise, a Termination of Service shall be deemed to occur if the Participant's employment or service relationship is with an entity that has ceased to be a Related Company.
"Termination of Service
"
3.1 Administration of the Plan
The Plan shall be administered by the Compensation Committee of the Board; provided, however, that with respect to nonemployee directors, the Plan shall be administered by the Governance, Organization and Nominating Committee of the Board unless otherwise determined by the Board. Each such committee shall be comprised of at least three directors, each of whom shall qualify as an "outside director" as defined by Section 162(m), an "independent director" as defined under the New York Stock Exchange listing standards and a "non-employee director" as defined in Rule 16b-3 promulgated under the Exchange Act. However, the fact that a Committee member shall fail to qualify under the foregoing requirements shall not invalidate any Award made by the Committee which is otherwise validly made under the Plan.
3.2 Delegation by Committee
Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Board or the Committee may delegate responsibility for administering the Plan with respect to designated classes of eligible persons to different committees consisting of one or more members of the Board, subject to such limitations as the Board or the Compensation Committee deems appropriate, except with respect to benefits to nonemployee directors and to officers subject to Section 16 of the Exchange Act or officers who are or may be Covered Employees. Members of any committee shall serve for such term as the Board may determine, subject to removal by the Board at any time. To the extent consistent with applicable law, the Board or the Committee may authorize one or more officers of the Company to grant Awards to designated classes of eligible persons, within limits specifically prescribed by the Board or the Committee; provided, however, that no such officer shall have or obtain authority to grant Awards to himself or herself or to any person subject to Section 16 of the Exchange Act. All references in the Plan to the "Committee" shall be, as applicable, to the Compensation Committee, the Governance, Organization and Nominating Committee or any other committee or any officer to whom the Board or the Compensation Committee has delegated authority to administer the Plan.
3.3 Administration and Interpretation by Committee
Except for the terms and conditions explicitly set forth in the Plan, the Committee shall have full power and exclusive authority, subject to such orders or resolutions not inconsistent with the provisions of the Plan as may from time to time be adopted by the Board, to (a) select the eligible persons as set forth in Section 5 to whom Awards may from time to time be granted under the Plan; (b) determine the type or types of Award to be granted to each Participant under the Plan; (c) determine the number of shares of Common Stock to be covered by each Award granted under the Plan; (d) determine the terms and conditions of any Award granted under the Plan; (e) approve the forms of agreements for use under the Plan; (f) determine whether, to what extent and under what circumstances Awards may be settled in cash, shares of Common Stock or other property or canceled or suspended; (g) determine whether, to what extent and under what circumstances cash, shares of Common Stock, other property and other amounts payable with respect to an Award shall be deferred either automatically or at the election of the Participant, subject to Section 409A and in accordance with Section 6.3; (h) interpret and administer the Plan and any instrument or agreement entered into under the Plan;
 
Page 3
(i) establish such rules and regulations and appoint such agents as it shall deem appropriate for the proper administration of the Plan; (j) delegate ministerial duties to such of the Company's officers as it so determines; and (k) make any other determination and take any other action that the Committee deems necessary or desirable for administration of the Plan. Decisions of the Committee shall be final, conclusive and binding on all persons, including the Company, any Participant, any shareholder and any eligible person. A majority of the members of the Committee may determine its actions and fix the time and place of its meetings.
4.1 Authorized Number of Shares
Subject to adjustment from time to time as provided in Section 15, the maximum number of shares of Common Stock available for issuance under the Plan shall be 60 million.
4.2 Share Usage
(a) Shares of Common Stock covered by an Award shall not be counted as used unless and until they are actually issued and delivered to a Participant. If any Award lapses, expires, terminates or is canceled prior to the issuance of shares thereunder or if shares of Common Stock are issued under the Plan to a Participant and thereafter are reacquired by the Company, the shares subject to such Awards and the reacquired shares shall again be available for issuance under the Plan. In addition, the following shares of Common Stock shall not be treated as having been issued under the Plan: (i) shares tendered by a Participant or retained by the Company as full or partial payment to the Company for the purchase price of an Award or to satisfy tax withholding obligations in connection with an Award, (ii) shares covered by an Award that is settled in cash, (iii) the number of shares subject to a SAR in excess of the number of shares that are delivered to the Participant upon exercise of the SAR, or (iv) shares issued pursuant to Substitute Awards. The number of shares available for issuance under the Plan shall not be reduced to reflect any dividends or dividend equivalents that are reinvested into additional shares or credited as additional Restricted Stock, Stock Units or Performance Shares. All shares issued under the Plan may be either authorized and unissued shares or issued shares reacquired by the Company.
(b) The Committee shall have the authority to grant Awards as an alternative to or as the form of payment for grants or rights earned or due under other compensation plans or arrangements of the Company.
(c) Notwithstanding the foregoing, the maximum number of shares that may be issued upon the exercise of Incentive Stock Options shall equal the aggregate share number stated in Section 4.1, subject to adjustment as provided in Section 15.
4.3 Limitations
(a) Subject to adjustment as provided in Section 15, the aggregate number of shares that may be issued pursuant to Awards granted under the Plan (other than Awards of Options or Stock Appreciation Rights) that are not (i) subject to restrictions based on the satisfaction of specified performance goals or (ii) granted in lieu of the payment of performance-based cash incentive awards shall not exceed 12 million.
(b) Subject to adjustment as provided in Section 15, the aggregate number of shares that may be issued pursuant to Awards granted under the Plan (other than Awards of Options or Stock Appreciation Rights) that contain no restrictions or restrictions based solely on continuous employment or services for less than three years (except where Termination of Service occurs by reason of death, Retirement, Disability or Layoff) shall not exceed 3 million.
An Award may be granted to any employee, officer or director of the Company or a Related Company whom the Committee from time to time selects. An Award may also be granted to any consultant, agent, advisor or independent contractor for bona fide services rendered to the Company or any Related Company that (a) are not in connection with the offer and sale of the Company's securities in a capital-raising transaction and (b) do not directly or indirectly promote or maintain a market for the Company's securities. The above are "eligible persons."
 
Page 4
6.1 Form and Grant of Awards
The Committee shall have the authority, in its sole discretion, to determine the type or types of Awards to be granted under the Plan. Such Awards may be granted either alone, in addition to or in tandem with any other type of Award.
6.2 Evidence of Awards
Awards granted under the Plan shall be evidenced by a written instrument that shall contain such terms, conditions, limitations and restrictions as the Committee shall deem advisable and that are not inconsistent with the Plan.
6.3 Deferrals
The Committee may permit a Participant to defer receipt of the payment of any Award. If any such deferral election is permitted, the Committee, in its sole discretion, shall establish rules and procedures for such payment deferrals, which may include the grant of additional Awards or provisions for the payment or crediting of interest or dividend equivalents, including converting such credits to deferred stock unit equivalents. The value of the payment so deferred may be allocated to a deferred account established for a Participant under any deferred compensation plan of the Company designated by the Committee. Notwithstanding the foregoing, any deferral made under this Section 6.3 will be made under a deferred compensation plan of the Company or pursuant to the terms of an employment agreement, either of which satisfies the requirements for exemption from or complies with Section 409A.
6.4 Dividends and Distributions
Participants holding Awards may, if the Committee so determines, be credited with dividends paid with respect to the underlying shares or dividend equivalents while the Awards are so held in a manner determined by the Committee in its sole discretion. The Committee may apply any restrictions to the dividends or dividend equivalents that the Committee deems appropriate. The Committee, in its sole discretion, may determine the form of payment of dividends or dividend equivalents, including cash, shares of Common Stock, Restricted Stock or Stock Units. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the right to any dividends or dividend equivalents declared and paid on the number of shares underlying an Option or a Stock Appreciation Right may not be contingent, directly or indirectly on the exercise of the Option or a Stock Appreciation Right, and an Award providing a right to dividends or dividend equivalents declared and paid on the number of shares underlying an Option or a Stock Appreciation Right, the payment of which is not contingent upon, or otherwise payable on, the exercise of the Option or a Stock Appreciation Right, must comply with or qualify for an exemption under Section 409A.
7.1 Grant of Options
The Committee may grant Options designated as Incentive Stock Options or Nonqualified Stock Options.
7.2 Option Exercise Price
The exercise price for shares purchased under an Option shall be as determined by the Committee, but shall not be less than 100% of the Fair Market Value of the Common Stock for the Grant Date, except in the case of Substitute Awards. In no event shall the Committee, without the prior approval of the Company's shareholders, cancel any outstanding Option for the purpose of reissuing the Option to the Participant at a lower exercise price or reduce the exercise price of an outstanding Option.
7.3 Term of Options
Subject to earlier termination in accordance with the terms of the Plan and the instrument evidencing the Option, the maximum term of an Option shall be a term not to exceed ten years from the Grant Date as established for that Option by the Committee or, if not so established, shall be ten years from the Grant Date.
 
Page 5
7.4 Exercise of Options
The Committee shall establish and set forth in each instrument that evidences an Option the time at which, or the installments in which, the Option shall vest and become exercisable, any of which provisions may be waived or modified by the Committee at any time.
To the extent an Option has vested and become exercisable, the Option may be exercised in whole or from time to time in part by delivery as directed by the Company to the Company or a brokerage firm designated or approved by the Company of a written stock option exercise agreement or notice, in a form and in accordance with procedures established by the Committee, setting forth the number of shares with respect to which the Option is being exercised, the restrictions imposed on the shares purchased under such exercise agreement, if any, and such representations and agreements as may be required by the Committee, accompanied by payment in full as described in Section 7.5. An Option may be exercised only for whole shares and may not be exercised for less than a reasonable number of shares at any one time, as determined by the Committee.
7.5 Payment of Exercise Price
The exercise price for shares purchased under an Option shall be paid in full as directed by the Company to the Company or a brokerage firm designated or approved by the Company by delivery of consideration equal to the product of the Option exercise price and the number of shares purchased. Such consideration must be paid before the Company will issue the shares being purchased and must be in a form or a combination of forms acceptable to the Committee for that purchase, which forms may include: (a) check; (b) wire transfer; (c) tendering by attestation shares of Common Stock already owned by the Participant that on the day prior to the exercise date have a Fair Market Value equal to the aggregate exercise price of the shares being purchased under the Option, provided that the Participant must have held for at least six months any such tendered shares that were acquired by the Participant under a Company-sponsored stock compensation program; (d) to the extent permitted by applicable law, delivery of a properly executed exercise notice, together with irrevocable instructions to a brokerage firm designated or approved by the Company to deliver promptly to the Company the aggregate amount of sale or loan proceeds to pay the Option exercise price and any tax withholding obligations that may arise in connection with the exercise, all in accordance with the regulations of the Federal Reserve Board; or (e) such other consideration as the Committee may permit in its sole discretion.
7.6 Post-Termination Exercise
The Committee shall establish and set forth in each instrument that evidences an Option whether the Option shall continue to be exercisable, and the terms and conditions of such exercise, after a Termination of Service, any of which provisions may be waived or modified by the Committee at any time, provided that any such waiver or modification shall satisfy the requirements for exemption under Section 409A.
7.7 Incentive Stock Options
The terms of any Incentive Stock Options shall comply in all respects with the provisions of Section 422 of the Code, or any successor provision, and any regulations promulgated thereunder. Individuals who are not employees of the Company or one of its parent or subsidiary corporations (as such terms are defined for purposes of Section 422 of the Code) may not be granted Incentive Stock Options. To the extent that the aggregate Fair Market Value of Common Stock with respect to which Incentive Stock Options are exercisable for the first time by a Participant during any calendar year exceeds $100,000 or, if different, the maximum limitation in effect at the time of grant under the Code (the Fair Market Value being determined as of the Grant Date for the Option), such portion in excess of $100,000 shall be treated as Nonqualified Stock Options.
8.1 Grant of Stock Appreciation Rights
The Committee may grant stock appreciation rights ("Stock Appreciation Rights" or "SARs") to Participants at any time. An SAR may be granted in tandem with an Option or alone ("freestanding"). The grant price of a tandem SAR shall be equal to the exercise price of the related Option, and the grant price of a freestanding SAR shall be equal to the Fair Market Value of the Common Stock for the Grant Date, except for Substitute Awards. An SAR may be exercised upon such terms and conditions and for the term as the
 
Page 6
Committee determines in its sole discretion; provided, however, that, subject to earlier termination in accordance with the terms of the Plan and the instrument evidencing the SAR, the term of a freestanding SAR shall be a term not to exceed ten years from the Grant Date as established for that SAR by the Committee or, if not so established, shall be ten years, and in the case of a tandem SAR, (a) the term shall not exceed the term of the related Option and (b) the tandem SAR may be exercised for all or part of the shares subject to the related Option upon the surrender of the right to exercise the equivalent portion of the related Option, except that the tandem SAR may be exercised only with respect to the shares for which its related Option is then exercisable.
8.2 Payment of SAR Amount
Upon the exercise of an SAR, a Participant shall be entitled to receive payment from the Company in an amount determined by multiplying (a) the difference between the Fair Market Value of the Common Stock for the date of exercise over the grant price by (b) the number of shares with respect to which the SAR is exercised. At the discretion of the Committee, the payment upon exercise of an SAR may be in cash, in shares of equivalent value, in some combination thereof or in any other manner approved by the Committee in its sole discretion.
8.3 Post-Termination Exercise
The Committee shall establish and set forth in each instrument that evidences a freestanding SAR whether the SAR shall continue to be exercisable, and the terms and conditions of such exercise, after a Termination of Service, any of which provisions may be waived or modified by the Committee at any time, provided that any such waiver or modification shall satisfy the requirements for exemption under Section 409A.
9.1 Grant of Restricted Stock and Stock Units
The Committee may grant Restricted Stock and Stock Units on such terms and conditions and subject to such forfeiture restrictions, if any (which may be based on continuous service with the Company or a Related Company or the achievement of any of the Performance Criteria set forth in Section 11.2), as the Committee shall determine in its sole discretion, which terms, conditions and restrictions shall be set forth in the instrument evidencing the Award.
9.2 Issuance of Shares
Upon the satisfaction of any terms, conditions and restrictions prescribed with respect to Restricted Stock or Stock Units, or upon a Participant's release from any terms, conditions and restrictions of Restricted Stock or Stock Units, as determined by the Committee, and subject to the provisions of Section 13, (a) the shares of Restricted Stock covered by each Award of Restricted Stock shall become freely transferable by the Participant, and (b) Stock Units shall be paid in cash, shares of Common Stock or a combination of cash and shares of Common Stock as the Committee shall determine in its sole discretion. Any fractional shares subject to such Awards shall be paid to the Participant in cash.
9.3 Waiver of Restrictions
Notwithstanding any other provisions of the Plan, the Committee, in its sole discretion, may waive the repurchase or forfeiture period and any other terms, conditions or restrictions on any Restricted Stock or Stock Unit under such circumstances and subject to such terms and conditions as the Committee shall deem appropriate; provided, however, that the Committee may not adjust performance goals for any Restricted Stock or Stock Unit intended to be exempt under Section 162(m) for the year in which the Restricted Stock or Stock Unit is settled in such a manner as would increase the amount of compensation otherwise payable to a Participant.
10.1 Grant of Performance Shares
The Committee may grant Awards of performance shares ("Performance Shares") and designate the Participants to whom Performance Shares are to be awarded and determine the number of Performance Shares, the length of the Performance Period and the other terms and conditions of each such Award. Each Award of Performance Shares shall entitle the Participant to a payment in
 
Page 7
the form of shares of Common Stock upon the attainment of performance goals and other terms and conditions specified by the Committee. Notwithstanding satisfaction of any performance goals, the number of shares issued under an Award of Performance Shares may be adjusted on the basis of such further consideration as the Committee shall determine in its sole discretion. The Committee, in its sole discretion, may make a cash payment equal to the Fair Market Value of the Common Stock otherwise required to be issued to a Participant pursuant to an Award of Performance Shares. It is generally expected that the Committee will exercise its discretion to make cash settlements of Awards of Performance Shares only with respect to Awards granted to Participants in countries other than the United States.
10.2 Grant of Performance Units
The Committee may grant Awards of performance units ("Performance Units") and designate the Participants to whom Performance Units are to be awarded and determine the number of Performance Units and the terms and conditions of each such Award. Performance Units shall entitle the Participant to a payment in cash upon the attainment of performance goals and other terms and conditions specified by the Committee, provided that the performance period for any Performance Unit Award shall be at least one year. Notwithstanding the satisfaction of any performance goals, the amount to be paid under an Award of Performance Units may be adjusted on the basis of such further consideration as the Committee shall determine in its sole discretion. The Committee, in its sole discretion, may substitute actual shares of Common Stock for the cash payment otherwise required to be made to a Participant pursuant to a Performance Unit.
11.1 Terms of Section 162(m) Awards Generally
In addition to any other Awards under the Plan, the Committee may, at the time of grant of an Award (other than an Option or a Stock Appreciation Right) to a Participant who is then a Covered Employee or is likely to be a Covered Employee as of the end of the tax year in which the Company would claim a tax deduction in connection with such Award, specify that all or any portion of such Award is intended to satisfy the requirements for qualified performance-based compensation under Section 162(m). With respect to each such Award, the Committee shall establish, in writing, that the vesting and/or payment pursuant to the Award shall be conditioned on the attainment for the specified Performance Period of specified performance targets related to designated performance goals for such period selected by the Committee from among the Performance Criteria specified in Section 11.2. Such action shall be taken no later than the earlier of (a) the date 90 days after the commencement of the applicable Performance Period or (b) the date on which 25% of the Performance Period has elapsed and, in any event, at a time when the outcome of the performance goals remain substantially uncertain.
11.2 Performance Criteria
For purposes of this Section 11, the term "Performance Criteria" shall mean any one or more of the following performance criteria: profits (including, but not limited to, profit growth, net operating profit or economic profit); profit-related return ratios; return measures (including, but not limited to, return on assets, capital, equity or sales); cash flow (including, but not limited to, operating cash flow, free cash flow or cash flow return on capital); earnings (including, but not limited to, net earnings, earnings per share, or earnings before or after taxes); net sales growth; net income (before or after taxes, interest, depreciation and/or amortization); gross or operating margins; productivity ratios; share price (including, but not limited to, growth measures and total shareholder return); expense targets; margins; operating efficiency; customer satisfaction; and working capital targets.
11.3 Use and Calculation of Performance Criteria
Any Performance Criteria may be used to measure the performance of the Company as a whole or with respect to one or more business units, divisions, acquired businesses, minority investments, partnerships or joint ventures. Performance Criteria may be stated in absolute terms or relative to comparison companies or indices to be achieved during a period of time. Performance Criteria shall be calculated in accordance with the Company's financial statements or generally accepted accounting principles, or under a methodology established by the Committee prior to the issuance of an Award that is consistently applied and identified in the audited financial statements, including footnotes, or the Management's Discussion and Analysis section of the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K. The Committee shall have the right to specify, at the time the performance goals are established in accordance with this Section 11, that any Performance Criteria may be adjusted to exclude the impact of any Nonrecurring Item, provided that such Nonrecurring Item may be identified in the audited financial statements, including footnotes, or the Management's Discussion and Analysis section of the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K.
 
Page 8
11.4 Committee Certification and Authority
After the completion of each Performance Period, the Committee shall certify the extent to which any Performance Criteria has been satisfied, and the amount payable as a result thereof, prior to payment, settlement or vesting of any Award subject to this Section 11. Notwithstanding any provision of the Plan other than Section 11, with respect to any Award subject to this Section 11, the Committee may adjust downwards, but not upwards, the amount payable pursuant to such Award.
The Committee shall have the power to impose such other restrictions on Awards subject to this Section 11 as it may deem necessary or appropriate to ensure that such Awards satisfy all requirements for "performance-based compensation" within the meaning of Section 162(m).
11.5 Maximum Awards
Subject to adjustment as provided in Section 15, and in accordance with the requirements under Section 162(m), no Participant shall receive in any one calendar year grants of Awards that are intended to qualify as performance-based compensation under Section 162(m), other than Options, Stock Appreciation Rights or Performance Units, covering an aggregate of more than 1 million shares of Common Stock.
In accordance with the requirements under Section 162(m), the maximum aggregate dollar amount paid to an individual Participant in any one calendar year pursuant to a Performance Unit or other cash-based Award that is intended to qualify as performance-based compensation under Section 162(m) shall not exceed (i) 0.50% of the cumulative Adjusted Operating Cash Flow for the specific Performance Period for which the Award is granted for a Participant who is the Company's Chief Executive Officer and (ii) 0.20% of the cumulative Adjusted Operating Cash Flow for the specific Performance Period for which the Award is granted for any other Participant.
11.6 Options and SARs
Subject to adjustment as provided in Section 15, and in accordance with the requirements under Section 162(m), no Participant shall receive in any one calendar year grants of Options or Stock Appreciation Rights covering an aggregate of more than 2 million shares of Common Stock. Notwithstanding any other provision of the Plan to the contrary, any Option or Stock Appreciation Right intended to qualify as performance-based compensation under Section 162(m) shall have an exercise or grant price, as applicable, of no less than 100% of the Fair Market Value of the Common Stock for the Grant Date, except in the case of Substitute Awards.
In addition to the Awards described in Sections 7 through 10, and subject to the terms of the Plan, the Committee may grant other incentives payable in cash or in shares of Common Stock under the Plan as it determines to be in the best interests of the Company and subject to such other terms and conditions as it deems appropriate.
The Company may require a Participant to pay to the Company the amount of (a) any taxes that the Company is required by applicable federal, state, local or foreign law to withhold with respect to the grant, vesting or exercise of an Award ("tax withholding obligations") and (b) any amounts due from the Participant to the Company or to any Related Company ("other obligations"). The Company shall not be required to issue any shares of Common Stock under the Plan until such tax withholding obligations and other obligations are satisfied.
The Committee may permit or require a Participant to satisfy all or part of his or her tax withholding obligations and other obligations by (a) paying cash to the Company, (b) having the Company withhold an amount from any cash amounts otherwise due or to become due from the Company to the Participant, (c) having the Company withhold a number of shares of Common Stock that would otherwise be issued to the Participant (or become vested in the case of Restricted Stock) having a Fair Market Value equal to the tax withholding obligations and other obligations, or (d) surrendering a number of shares of Common Stock the Participant already owns having a value equal to the tax withholding obligations and other obligations.
 
Page 9
No Award or interest in an Award may be sold, assigned, pledged (as collateral for a loan or as security for the performance of an obligation or for any other purpose) or transferred by the Participant or made subject to attachment or similar proceedings otherwise than by will or by the applicable laws of descent and distribution, except that to the extent permitted by the Committee, in its sole discretion, a Participant may designate one or more beneficiaries on a Company-approved form who may receive payment under an Award after the Participant's death. During a Participant's lifetime, an Award may be exercised only by the Participant.
In the event, at any time or from time to time, a stock dividend, stock split, spin-off, combination or exchange of shares, recapitalization, merger, consolidation, distribution to shareholders other than a normal cash dividend or other change in the Company's corporate or capital structure results in (a) the outstanding shares of Common Stock, or any securities exchanged therefor or received in their place, being exchanged for a different number or kind of securities of the Company or of any other company or (b) new, different or additional securities of the Company or of any other company being received by the holders of shares of Common Stock, then the Committee shall make proportional adjustments in (i) the maximum number and kind of securities available for issuance under the Plan; (ii) the maximum number and kind of securities issuable as Incentive Stock Options as set forth in Section 4.2; (iii) the maximum number and kind of securities that may be issued to an individual in any one calendar year as set forth in Section 4.3; (iv) the maximum number and kind of securities that may be made subject to the different types of Awards available under the Plan; and (v) the number and kind of securities that are subject to any outstanding Award and the per share price of such securities, without any change in the aggregate price to be paid therefor.
The determination by the Committee as to the terms of any of the foregoing adjustments shall be conclusive and binding.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, the issuance by the Company of shares of stock of any class, or securities convertible into shares of stock of any class, for cash or property, or for labor or services rendered, either upon direct sale or upon the exercise of rights or warrants to subscribe therefor, or upon conversion of shares or obligations of the Company convertible into such shares or other securities, shall not affect, and no adjustment by reason thereof shall be made with respect to, outstanding Awards.
16.1 Amendment, Suspension or Termination of the Plan
The Board or the Committee may amend, suspend or terminate the Plan or any portion of the Plan at any time and in such respects as it shall deem advisable; provided, however, that, to the extent required by applicable law, regulation or stock exchange rule, shareholder approval shall be required for any amendment to the Plan.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, an amendment that constitutes a "material revision," as defined by the rules of the New York Stock Exchange shall be submitted to the Company's shareholders for approval. In addition, any revision that deletes or limits the scope of the provisions in Section 7.2 prohibiting repricing of options without shareholder approval and any revision that increases the number of shares stated in Section 4.1 as available for issuance under the Plan shall be considered material revisions that require shareholder approval.
16.2 Term of the Plan
Unless sooner terminated as provided herein, the Plan shall terminate ten years from the Effective Date. After the Plan is terminated, no future Awards may be granted, but Awards previously granted shall remain outstanding in accordance with their applicable terms and conditions and the Plan's terms and conditions. Notwithstanding the foregoing, no Incentive Stock Options may be granted more than ten years after the earlier of (a) the adoption of the Plan by the Board and (b) the Effective Date.
16.3 Consent of Participant
The amendment, suspension or termination of the Plan or a portion thereof or the amendment of an outstanding Award shall not, without the Participant's consent, materially adversely affect any rights under any Award theretofore granted to the Participant under
 
Page 10
the Plan. Any change or adjustment to an outstanding Incentive Stock Option shall not, without the consent of the Participant, be made in a manner so as to constitute a "modification" that would cause such Incentive Stock Option to fail to continue to qualify as an Incentive Stock Option. Notwithstanding the foregoing, any adjustments made pursuant to Section 15 shall not be subject to these restrictions.
17.1 Clawback Policy
The Board shall, in all appropriate circumstances, require reimbursement of any annual incentive payment or long-term incentive payment under any Award to an executive officer where: (1) the payment was predicated upon achieving certain financial results that were subsequently the subject of a substantial restatement of Company financial statements filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission; (2) the Board determines the executive engaged in intentional misconduct that caused or substantially caused the need for the substantial restatement; and (3) a lower payment would have been made to the executive based upon the restated financial results. In each such instance, the Company will, to the extent practicable, seek to recover from the individual executive the amount by which the individual executive's incentive payments for the relevant period exceeded the lower payment that would have been made based on the restated financial results. For purposes of this policy, the term "executive officer" means any officer who has been designated an executive officer by the Board.
17.2 No Individual Rights
No individual or Participant shall have any claim to be granted any Award under the Plan, and the Company has no obligation for uniformity of treatment of Participants under the Plan.
Furthermore, nothing in the Plan or any Award granted under the Plan shall be deemed to constitute an employment contract or confer or be deemed to confer on any Participant any right to continue in the employ of, or to continue any other relationship with, the Company or any Related Company or limit in any way the right of the Company or any Related Company to terminate a Participant's employment or other relationship at any time, with or without cause.
17.3 Issuance of Shares
Notwithstanding any other provision of the Plan, the Company shall have no obligation to issue or deliver any shares of Common Stock under the Plan or make any other distribution of benefits under the Plan unless, in the opinion of the Company's counsel, such issuance, delivery or distribution would comply with all applicable laws (including, without limitation, the requirements of the Securities Act or the laws of any state or foreign jurisdiction) and the applicable requirements of any securities exchange or similar entity.
The Company shall be under no obligation to any Participant to register for offering or resale or to qualify for exemption under the Securities Act, or to register or qualify under the laws of any state or foreign jurisdiction, any shares of Common Stock, security or interest in a security paid or issued under, or created by, the Plan, or to continue in effect any such registrations or qualifications if made. The Company may issue certificates for shares with such legends and subject to such restrictions on transfer and stop-transfer instructions as counsel for the Company deems necessary or desirable for compliance by the Company with federal, state and foreign securities laws. The Company may also require such other action or agreement by the Participants as may from time to time be necessary to comply with applicable securities laws.
To the extent the Plan or any instrument evidencing an Award provides for issuance of stock certificates to reflect the issuance of shares of Common Stock, the issuance may be effected on a noncertificated basis, to the extent not prohibited by applicable law or the applicable rules of any stock exchange.
17.4 Indemnification
Each person who is or shall have been a member of the Board, or a committee appointed by the Board, or an officer of the Company to whom authority was delegated in accordance with Section 3 shall be indemnified and held harmless by the Company against and from any loss, cost, liability or expense that may be imposed upon or reasonably incurred by him or her in connection with or resulting from any claim, action, suit or proceeding to which he or she may be a party or in which he or she may be involved by
 
Page 11
reason of any action taken or failure to act under the Plan and against and from any and all amounts paid by him or her in settlement thereof, with the Company's approval, or paid by him or her in satisfaction of any judgment in any such claim, action, suit or proceeding against him or her; provided, however, that he or she shall give the Company an opportunity, at its own expense, to handle and defend the same before he or she undertakes to handle and defend it on his or her own behalf, unless such loss, cost, liability or expense is a result of his or her own willful misconduct or except as expressly provided by statute.
The foregoing right of indemnification shall not be exclusive of any other rights of indemnification to which such persons may be entitled under the Company's certificate of incorporation or bylaws, as a matter of law, or otherwise, or of any power that the Company may have to indemnify them or hold them harmless.
17.5 No Rights as a Shareholder
Unless otherwise provided by the Committee or in the instrument evidencing the Award or in a written employment or services agreement, no Option or Award denominated in units shall entitle the Participant to any cash dividend, voting or other right of a shareholder unless and until the date of issuance under the Plan of the shares that are the subject of such Award.
17.6 Compliance With Laws and Regulations
Notwithstanding anything in the Plan to the contrary, the Committee, in its sole discretion, may bifurcate the Plan so as to restrict, limit or condition the use of any provision of the Plan to Participants who are officers or directors subject to Section 16 of the Exchange Act without so restricting, limiting or conditioning the Plan with respect to other Participants.
Additionally, in interpreting and applying the provisions of the Plan, any Option granted as an Incentive Stock Option pursuant to the Plan shall, to the extent permitted by law, be construed as an "incentive stock option" within the meaning of Code Section 422.
Additionally, notwithstanding anything contained in the Plan to the contrary, it is the Company's intention that any and all Awards and compensation payable under the Plan shall satisfy the requirements for exemption under Section 409A and that all terms and provisions shall be interpreted to satisfy such requirements. If the Committee determines that an Award, payment, distribution, deferral election, transaction or any other action or arrangement contemplated by the provisions of the Plan would, if undertaken, cause a Participant to become subject to Section 409A, the Committee, to the extent it deems necessary or advisable in its sole discretion, reserves the right , but shall not be required, to unilaterally amend or modify the Plan and any Award granted under the Plan so that the Award qualifies for exemption from or compliance with Section 409A. Awards not deferred under Section 6.3 and not otherwise exempt from the requirements of Section 409A are intended to qualify for the short-term deferral exemption to Section 409A, and payment shall be made as soon as administratively feasible after the Award became vested, but in no event shall such payment be made later than 2-1/2 months after the end of the calendar year in which the Award became vested unless otherwise permitted under the exemption provisions of Section 409A.
17.7 Participants in Other Countries
The Committee shall have the authority to adopt such modifications, procedures and subplans as may be necessary or desirable to comply with provisions of the laws of other countries in which the Company or any Related Company may operate to ensure the viability of the benefits from Awards granted to Participants employed in such countries, to comply with applicable foreign laws and to meet the objectives of the Plan.
Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 7.2 and 8.1, where applicable foreign law requires that compensatory stock right be priced based upon a specific price averaging method and period, a stock right granted in accordance with such applicable foreign law will be treated as meeting the requirements of Sections 7.2 or 8.1, provided that the averaging period does not exceed 30 days.
17.8 No Trust or Fund
The Plan is intended to constitute an "unfunded" plan. Nothing contained herein shall require the Company to segregate any monies or other property, or shares of Common Stock, or to create any trusts, or to make any special deposits for any immediate or deferred amounts payable to any Participant, and no Participant shall have any rights that are greater than those of a general unsecured creditor of the Company.
 
Page 12
17.9 Successors
All obligations of the Company under the Plan with respect to Awards shall be binding on any successor to the Company, whether the existence of such successor is the result of a direct or indirect purchase, merger, consolidation, or otherwise, of all or substantially all the business and/or assets of the Company.
17.10 Severability
If any provision of the Plan or any Award is determined to be invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any jurisdiction, or as to any person, or would disqualify the Plan or any Award under any law deemed applicable by the Committee, such provision shall be construed or deemed amended to conform to applicable laws, or, if it cannot be so construed or deemed amended without, in the Committee's determination, materially altering the intent of the Plan or the Award, such provision shall be stricken as to such jurisdiction, person or Award, and the remainder of the Plan and any such Award shall remain in full force and effect.
17.11 Choice of Law
The Plan, all Awards granted thereunder and all determinations made and actions taken pursuant thereto, to the extent not otherwise governed by the laws of the United States, shall be governed by the laws of the State of Illinois without giving effect to principles of conflicts of law.
The Plan is amended and restated effective January 1, 2008 (the "Effective Date").
 
Page 13

Exhibit 10.5
1. Purpose
The purpose of this 1997 Incentive Stock Plan (the "Plan") is to attract, retain and motivate key employeeofficers, consultants, agents, advisors and independent contractors of The Boeing Company (the "Company") by providing them the opportunity to acquire a proprietary interest in the Company and to link their interests and efforts to the long-term interests of the Company's shareholders.
s,
2. Plan Administration
2.1 The Compensation Committee
The Plan shall be administered by the Compensation Committee (the "Committee") of the Company's Board of Directors (the "Board"). Except for the terms and conditions explicitly set forth in the Plan, the Committee shall have the authority, in its sole discretion, to determine all matters relating to awards under the Plan, including selection of the individuals to be granted awards, the type of awards granted, the number of shares of the Company's common stock (the "Common Stock") subject to an award, all terms, conditions, restrictions and limitations, if any, of an award, and the terms of any award agreement or notice.
2.2 Other Plans
The Committee shall also have authority to grant awards as an alternative to or as the form of payment for grants or rights earned or due under other compensation plans or arrangements of the Company, including the plan of any entity acquired by the Company.
2.3 Delegation to Stock Plan Committee
Except for the power to amend the Plan as provided in Section 12, the Board or the Committee, in its sole discretion, may delegate the Committee's authority and duties under the Plan to the Stock Plan Committee of the Board or to such other committee appointed by the Board consisting of one or more senior executive officers of the Company who are also members of the Board, under such conditions and limitations as the Board or the Committee may from time to time establish, except that only the Committee may make any determinations regarding awards to participants who are subject to Section 16 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "1934 Act").
2.4 Finality of Committee Determinations
All decisions made by the Committee or its delegate pursuant to the provisions of the Plan and all determinations and selections made by the Committee or its delegate pursuant to such provisions and related orders or resolutions of the Board shall be final and conclusive.
 
3. Eligibility
Awards may be granted under the Plan to those officers and employees of the Company as the Committee, the Board or a delegate designated in accordance with Section 2.3 from time to time selects. Awards may also be made to consultants, agents, advisors and independent contractors who provide services to the Company. Individuals who are not employees of the Company may not be granted Incentive Stock Options (as defined in Section 6.2). For purposes of this Section 3, the "Company," with respect to all awards under the Plan other than Incentive Stock Options, includes any entity that is directly or indirectly controlled by the Company or any entity in which the Company has a significant equity interest, as determined by the Committee. With respect to Incentive Stock Options, the "Company" includes any parent or subsidiary of the Company in accordance with Section 422 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the "Code").
4. Shares Subject to the Plan
4.1 Number and Source
The stock offered under the Plan shall be shares of Common Stock and may be unissued shares or shares now held or subsequently acquired by the Company as treasury shares, as the Board, or a Board committee to which the Board may delegate such authority, may from time to time determine. Subject to adjustment as provided in Sections 4.3 and 5, the aggregate number of shares that may be issued under the Plan shall not exceed ). Subject to adjustment as provided in Sections 4.3 and 5, the aggregate number of shares that may be issued under awards granted pursuant to Section 6.4 that are not subject to restrictions based on the achievement of specified performance goals shall not exceed six million (6,000,000). The aggregate number of shares that may be covered by awards granted to any one individual in any one calendar year shall not exceed one million two hundred thousand (1,200,000).
sixty-one million (61,000,000
4.2 Shares Available
Any shares subject to an award granted under the Plan that is forfeited, terminated or canceled or, in the case of awards granted under Section 6.4, any shares that do not vest shall again be available for the granting of awards under the Plan. In instances where a stock appreciation right is settled in cash, the shares covered by such award shall remain available for the granting of other awards. Likewise, the payment of cash dividends and dividend equivalents paid in cash in conjunction with outstanding awards shall not be counted against the shares available for issuance.
4.3 Acquisitions
The Board, in its sole discretion, may increase the aggregate number of shares of Common Stock to be delivered under Section 4.1 by up to three million (3,000,000) shares in the event the Company acquires any other corporation or business entity and the Company agrees to assume the acquired entity's obligations for outstanding stock options or stock grant commitments or otherwise grants awards to individuals in connection with such acquisition.
 
5. Adjustment of Shares Available
The aggregate numbers and kind of shares available for awards under the Plan, the maximum number and kind of shares that may be subject to awards to any individual under the Plan, the number and kind of shares covered by each outstanding award, and the exercise price per share (but not the total price) for stock options, stock appreciation rights or similar awards outstanding under the Plan shall all be proportionately adjusted for any increase or decrease in the number of issued shares of Common Stock resulting from any split-up, combination or exchange of shares, consolidation, spin-off or recapitalization of shares or any like capital adjustment or the payment of any stock dividend.
6. Awards
6.1 Types of Awards
The Committee shall have the authority, in its sole discretion, to determine the type or types of awards to be granted under the Plan. Such awards may include, but are not limited to, Incentive Stock Options, Nonqualified Stock Options (as defined in Section 6.2), stock appreciation rights or restricted stock awards. Such awards may be granted either alone, in addition to or in tandem with any other type of award granted under the Plan.
6.2 Stock Options
The Committee may grant stock options, designated as "Incentive Stock Options," which comply with the provisions of Section 422 of the Code or any successor statutory provision, or "Nonqualified Stock Options." The price at which shares may be purchased upon exercise of a particular option shall be determined by the Committee but shall not be less than 100% of the Fair Market Value of such shares at the time such option is granted. For purposes of the Plan, "Fair Market Value" as to a particular day equals the mean of the high and low per share trading prices for the Common Stock as reported for such day in or such other source as the Committee deems reliable. The Committee shall set the term of each stock option, but no Incentive Stock Option shall be exercisable more than 10 years after the date such option is granted and, to the extent the aggregate Fair Market Value (determined as of the date the option is granted) of Common Stock with respect to which Incentive Stock Options granted to a particular individual become exercisable for the first time during any calendar year (under the Plan and all other stock option plans of the Company) exceeds $100,000 (or such corresponding amount as may be set by the Code), such options shall be treated as Nonqualified Stock Options.
The Wall Street Journal
6.3 Stock Appreciation Rights
The Committee may grant stock appreciation rights to individuals, either in tandem with stock options that have been or are granted under the Plan or with respect to a number of shares on which an option is not granted. A stock appreciation right shall entitle the holder to receive, with respect to each share of stock as to which the right is exercised, payment in an amount equal to the excess of the share's Fair Market Value on the date the right is exercised over its Fair Market Value on the date the right was granted. Such payment may be made in cash or in shares of Common Stock valued at the Fair Market Value as of the date of the surrender, or partly in cash and partly in shares of Common Stock, as determined by the Committee in its sole discretion. The Committee may establish a maximum appreciation value payable for stock appreciation rights.
 
6.4 Restricted Stock Awards
(a) The Committee may grant restricted stock awards under the Plan in Common Stock or denominated in units of Common Stock. The Committee, in its sole discretion, will make such awards subject to conditions and restrictions, as set forth in the instrument evidencing the award, which may be based on continuous service with the Company or the attainment of certain performance goals related to profits, profit growth, profit-related return ratios, cash flow or shareholder returns, where such goals may be stated in absolute terms or relative to comparison companies or indices to be achieved during a period of time. No more than three million (3,000,000) shares may be issued subject to restrictions based on continuous employment or services for less than three years (except where employment or services are terminated because an individual dies, retires, is laid off or becomes disabled).
(b) The Committee may choose, at the time of granting an award or at any time thereafter up to the time of payment of the award, to include as part of such award an entitlement to receive dividends or dividend equivalents, subject to such terms as the Committee may establish. All dividends or dividend equivalents that are not paid currently may, in the Committee's sole discretion, accrue interest and be paid to the participant if, when and to the extent such award is paid.
6.5 Payment; Deferral
Awards granted under the Plan may be settled through cash payments, the delivery of Common Stock or the granting of awards or combinations thereof as the Committee shall determine. Any award settlement, including payment deferrals, may be subject to such conditions, restrictions and contingencies as the Committee shall determine. The Committee may permit or require the deferral of any award payment, subject to such rules and procedures as it may establish, which may include provisions for the payment or crediting of interest, or dividend equivalents, including converting such credits to deferred stock unit equivalents. Notwithstanding the forgoing, any deferral made under this Section 6.5 will be made under a deferred compensation plan of the Company or pursuant to an employment agreement, either of which satisfies the requirements for exemption from or complies with Code Section 409A.
6.6. Dividend Equivalents
The right to any dividends or dividend equivalents declared and paid on the number of shares underlying an option or a stock appreciation right may not be contingent, directly or indirectly on the exercise of the option or stock appreciation right, and an award providing a right to dividends or dividend equivalents declared and paid on the number of shares underlying an option or a stock appreciation right, the payment of which is not contingent upon, or otherwise payable on, the exercise of the option or stock appreciation right, must comply with or qualify for an exemption under Code Section 409A.
7. Option Exercise
7.1 Employment or Service Requirement
Each award agreement or notice for a stock option or stock appreciation right shall contain a provision that the option or right shall not be exercisable unless the optionee remains in the Company's employ or service at least 12 months after the granting of the option or right.
7.2 Precondition to Stock Issuance
No shares shall be delivered pursuant to the exercise of any stock option or stock appreciation right, in whole or in part, until qualified for delivery under such securities laws and regulations as may be deemed
 
by the Committee to be applicable thereto and until, in the case of the exercise of an option, payment in full of the option price thereof (in cash or stock as provided in Section 7.4) is received by the Company. No holder of an option or stock appreciation right, or any legal representative, legatee or distributee shall be or be deemed to be a holder of any shares subject to such option or right unless and until such shares are issued.
7.3 No Fractional Shares
No stock option may at any time be exercised with respect to a fractional share. No fractional share shall be issued in the event shares are issued pursuant to the exercise of a stock appreciation right; however, a fractional stock appreciation right may be exercised for cash.
7.4 Form of Payment
An optionee may exercise a stock option using as the form of payment (a) cash or cash equivalent (b) stock-for-stock payment (as described in Section 7.5), (c) any combination of the above or (d) such other means as the Committee may approve.
7.5 Stock for Stock
An optionee who owns Common Stock may use such shares, the value of which shall be determined as the Fair Market Value of such shares on the date the stock option is exercised, as a form of payment to exercise stock options under the Plan. The Committee, in its sole discretion, may restrict or rescind this right by notice to optionees. A stock option may be exercised in such manner only by tendering (actually or by attestation) to the Company whole shares of Common Stock having a Fair Market Value equal to or less than the exercise price. If an option is exercised by surrender of stock having a Fair Market Value less than the exercise price, the optionee must pay the difference in cash.
8. Transferability
The right of any award recipient to exercise an award granted under the Plan shall, during such recipient's lifetime, be exercisable only by such recipient, and shall not be assignable or transferable by such recipient other than by will or the laws of descent and distribution.
9. Withholding Taxes; Other Deductions
The Company shall have the right to deduct from any settlement of an award made under the Plan, including the delivery or vesting of shares, (a) an amount sufficient to cover withholding as required by law for any federal, state or local taxes and (b) any amounts due from the recipient of such award to the Company or to any subsidiary of the Company or to take such other action as may be necessary to satisfy any such withholding or other obligations, including withholding from any other cash amounts due or to become due from the Company to such recipient an amount equal to such taxes or obligations.
10. Termination of Employment or Services
The terms and conditions under which an award may be exercised following termination of a participant's employment or services with the Company shall be determined by the Committee; provided, that if a participant's employment or services terminate for any reason within 12 months of the grant date of a stock option or stock appreciation right, such option or right shall expire as of the date of such termination of employment or services and the participant and the participant's legal representative shall forfeit any and all rights pertaining to such award.
 
11. Term of the Plan
The Plan shall become effective as of May 1, 1997 and shall remain in full force and effect through April 30, 2007, unless sooner terminated by the Board. After the Plan is terminated, no future awards may be granted but awards previously granted shall remain outstanding in accordance with their applicable terms and conditions and the Plan's terms and conditions.
12. Plan Amendment
The Committee or the Board may amend, suspend or terminate the Plan at any time; provided that no such amendment shall be made without the approval of the Company's shareholders (a) that would increase the number of shares available for issuance in accordance with Section 4 or (b) if such approval is required (i) to comply with Section 422 of the Code with respect to Incentive Stock Options or (ii) for purposes of Section 162(m) of the Code.
13. Bifurcation of the Plan
Notwithstanding anything in the Plan to the contrary, the Board, in its sole discretion, may bifurcate the Plan so as to restrict, limit or condition the use of any provision of the Plan to participants who are officers subject to Section 16 of the 1934 Act without so restricting, limiting or conditioning the Plan with respect to other participants.
14. Code Section 409A
Notwithstanding anything contained in the Plan to the contrary, it is the Company's intention that any and all awards and compensation payable under the Plan shall satisfy the requirements for exemption under Code Section 409A, and that all terms and provisions shall be interpreted to satisfy such requirements. If the Committee determines that an award, payment, distribution, deferral election, transaction or any other action or arrangement contemplated by the provisions of the Plan would, if undertaken, cause an award recipient to become subject to Code Section 409A, the Committee, to the extent it deems necessary or advisable in its sole discretion, reserves the right , but shall not be required, to unilaterally amend or modify the Plan and any Award granted under the Plan so that the Award qualified for an exemption from or compliance with Section 409A. Awards not deferred under Section 6.5 and not otherwise exempt from the requirements of Code Section 409A are intended to qualify for the short-term deferral exemption to Code Section 409A, and payment shall be made as soon as administratively feasible after the award became vested, but in no event shall such payment be made later than 2
 1
/
2
months after the end of the calendar year in which the award became vested unless otherwise permitted under the exemption provisions of Code Section 409A.
 

Exhibit 10.6
The Board of Directors of The Boeing Company (the "Company") has adopted this Elected Officer Annual Incentive Plan (the "Plan"), subject to shareholder approval as described in Section 10.
1. PURPOSE
The purpose of the Plan is two-fold: first, to enhance the ability of the Company and its affiliates to attract, motivate and retain executives and thereby promote the sustained progress, growth and profitability of the Company; and second, to obtain for federal income tax purposes the deductibility of bonus awards made under the Plan. Accordingly, the bonus awards are intended to constitute "qualified performance-based compensation" within the meaning of Section 162(m) of the Internal Revenue Code.
2. DEFINITIONS
"" means the net cash provided by operating activities of the Company as reported in the Company's consolidated statement of cash flows included in its Annual Report on Form 10-K, adjusted to eliminate the effect on operating cash flows of net customer financing cash flows, as reported in the Company's consolidated statement of cash flows included in its Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Adjusted Operating Cash Flow
"" means the amount granted to a Participant by the Committee for a Performance Period.
Award
"" means the Board of Directors of the Company.
Board
"" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
Code
"" means the Compensation Committee of the Board, which shall be comprised of at least three members of the Board who are "outside directors" within the meaning of Section 162(m).
Committee
"" means the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.
Exchange Act
"" means any elected "officer" of the Company as the term "officer" is defined for purposes of Section 16(a) of the Exchange Act.
Officer
"" means, for each Performance Period, each Officer who is a "covered employee" (as defined in Section 162(m)) for that Performance Period, unless otherwise determined by the Committee in its sole discretion.
Participant
"" means the period with respect to which the Awards are to be measured. Each Performance Period shall consist of one fiscal year of the Company or any shorter period designated by the Committee with respect to which an Award may be granted.
Performance Period
 
"" means The Boeing Company Elected Officer Annual Incentive Plan, as amended from time to time.
Plan
"" means any corporation in which the Company owns, directly or indirectly, at least 50% of the total combined voting power of all classes of stock, or any other entity (including, but not limited to, partnerships and joint ventures) in which the Company owns, directly or indirectly, at least 50% of the combined equity thereof.
Related Company
"" means Code Section 162(m), including any proposed and final regulations and other guidance issued thereunder by the Department of the Treasury and/or the Internal Revenue Service.
Section 162(m)
"" means Code Section 409A, including any proposed and final regulations and other guidance issued thereunder by the Department of the Treasury and/or the Internal Revenue Service.
Section 409A
"" means The Boeing Company 2003 Incentive Stock Plan and any successor stock plans adopted or assumed by the Company.
Stock Plans
3. ADMINISTRATION
The Plan shall be administered by the Committee. Except for the terms and conditions explicitly set forth in the Plan, the Committee shall have full power and exclusive authority, subject to such orders or resolutions not inconsistent with the provisions of the Plan as may from time to time be adopted by the Board, to (a) select Participants; (b) determine the maximum Awards and the amounts of any Awards; (c) determine the terms and conditions of any Awards granted under the Plan; (d) approve the forms of agreements, if any, for use under the Plan; (e) determine whether, to what extent and under what circumstances Awards may be settled in cash, shares of Common Stock or other property or canceled or suspended; (f) determine whether, to what extent and under what circumstances cash, shares of Common Stock, other property and other amounts payable with respect to an Award shall be deferred either automatically or at the election of the Participant; (g) interpret and administer the Plan and any instrument or agreement entered into under the Plan; (h) establish such rules and regulations and appoint such agents as it shall deem appropriate for the proper administration of the Plan; (i) delegate ministerial duties to such of the Company's officers as it so determines; and (j) make any other determination and take any other action that the Committee deems necessary or desirable for administration of the Plan. Decisions of the Committee shall be final, conclusive and binding on all persons, including the Company, any Participant, any shareholder and any Officer, former Officer and their respective successors and assigns.
4. PERFORMANCE GOAL; MAXIMUM AWARDS
The performance goal for a Performance Period shall require positive Adjusted Operating Cash Flow. The maximum Award for an individual Participant for a Performance Period shall not exceed (a) 0.40% of the Adjusted Operating Cash Flow for the specific Performance Period for which the Award is granted for a Participant who is the Company's Chief Executive Officer and (b) 0.15% of the Adjusted Operating Cash Flow for the specific Performance Period for which the Award is granted for any other Participant. The Committee may decrease, but shall not increase, such maximum Award pursuant to Section 5.
 
5. COMMITTEE CERTIFICATION
After completion of each Performance Period, the Committee shall determine, in accordance with the terms of Section 4 and Company and individual performance and competitive pay levels, the amounts to be awarded to each Participant under the Plan for the Performance Period. The Committee's determinations shall be final and binding on the Company and all Participants, and their respective successors and beneficiaries. These determinations must be certified in writing before Awards for such period are paid, which requirement may be satisfied by approved minutes of the Committee meeting or such other document prepared by the secretary of the meeting. The Committee shall have the discretion to pay less, but shall not have discretion to pay more, than the maximum Award specified under Section 4.
6. PAYMENT OF AWARDS
 As soon as administratively feasible after the certification pursuant to Section 5, each Participant will receive payment (i) in cash, (ii) in an award of stock, restricted stock rights, stock options, other stock-based or stock-denominated units granted under the Stock Plans, or (iii) in any combination thereof as determined by the Committee in its sole discretion. In no event shall the payments or awards made under this Section 6(a) that are intended to be exempt from the requirements of Section 409A be made later than 2-1/2 months after the end of the calendar year in which the award became vested unless (i) deferred pursuant to Section 6(b) or (ii) otherwise permitted under the exemption provisions of Section 409A.
(a)
Form and Timing.
 Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 6(a), the Committee may permit or require a Participant to defer receipt of the payment of an Award to the extent provided under any deferred compensation plan of the Company or pursuant to the terms of an employment agreement, either of which satisfies the requirements for exemption from or complies with Section 409A.
(b)
Deferral Opportunity.
7. AMENDMENTS
The Board may amend the Plan at any time in accordance with applicable law; provided, however, that to the extent it would cause the Plan to fail to constitute "qualified performance-based compensation" under Section 162(m) with respect to any Participant, the Committee shall not have the power to change the material terms of the performance goals unless (a) the modified performance goals are established by the Committee no later than the deadline established under Section 162(m) and (b) no Awards are paid under the modified performance goals until after the material terms of the modified performance goals are disclosed to and approved by the Company's shareholders to the extent required by Section 162(m). No amendment that adversely affects a Participant's right to or interest in an Award granted by the Committee prior to the date of the amendment shall be effective unless the Participant agrees to the amendment in writing.
8. TERMINATION
The Board may terminate this Plan at any time and for any reason in accordance with applicable law. In no event shall the termination of the Plan adversely affect the rights of any Participant to deferred amounts previously awarded such Participant, plus any earnings thereon. Participants shall be provided with written notice of the Plan's termination as soon as practicable following such termination.
 
9. GENERAL PROVISIONS
The Board shall, in all appropriate circumstances, require reimbursement of any annual incentive payment or long-term incentive payment under any award to an executive officer where: (1) the payment was predicated upon achieving certain financial results that were subsequently the subject of a substantial restatement of Company financial statements filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission; (2) the Board determines the executive engaged in intentional misconduct that caused or substantially caused the need for the substantial restatement; and (3) a lower payment would have been made to the executive based upon the restated financial results. In each such instance, the Company will, to the extent practicable, seek to recover from the individual executive the amount by which the individual executive's incentive payments for the relevant period exceeded the lower payment that would have been made based on the restated financial results. For purposes of this policy, the term "executive officer" means any officer who has been designated an executive officer by the Board.
(a) Clawback Policy.
No individual or Participant shall have any claim to be granted any Award under the Plan, and the Company has no obligation for uniformity of treatment of Participants under the Plan.
(b) No Individual Rights.
Furthermore, nothing in the Plan or any Award granted under the Plan shall be deemed to constitute an employment contract or confer or be deemed to confer on any Participant any right to continue in the employ of, or to continue any other relationship with, the Company or any Related Company or limit in any way the right of the Company or any Related Company to terminate a Participant's employment or other relationship at any time, with or without cause.
Unless otherwise provided by the Committee or in the instrument evidencing the Award or in a written employment or services agreement, no Award shall entitle the Participant to any dividend, voting or other right of a shareholder.
(c) No Rights as a Shareholder.
The Company shall have the right to withhold from the payment of any Award under the Plan any federal, state or local taxes in accordance with applicable law.
(d) Tax Withholding.
Nothing contained in the Plan shall prevent the Company or any Related Company from making awards or payments to a Participant under any other incentive plan or arrangement, whether generally or specifically applicable to such Participant, including any award or payment that does not qualify as performance-based compensation under Section 162(m).
(e) Other Plans.
 Each person who is or shall have been a member of the Board or the Committee shall be indemnified and held harmless by the Company against and from any loss, cost, liability or expense that may be imposed upon or reasonably incurred by him or her in connection with or resulting from any claim, action, suit or proceeding to which he or she may be a party or in which he or she may be involved by reason of any action taken or failure to act under the Plan and against and from any and all amounts paid by him or her in settlement thereof, with the Company's approval, or paid by him or her in satisfaction of any judgment in
(f)
Indemnification.
 
any such claim, action, suit or proceeding against him or her; provided, however, that he or she shall give the Company an opportunity, at its own expense, to handle and defend the same before he or she undertakes to handle and defend it on his or her own behalf, unless such loss, cost, liability or expense is a result of his or her own willful misconduct or except as expressly provided by statute.
The foregoing right of indemnification shall not be exclusive of any other rights of indemnification to which such persons may be entitled under the Company's certificate of incorporation or by-laws, as a matter of law, or otherwise, or of any power that the Company may have to indemnify them or hold them harmless.
Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 6(b) to the contrary, it is the Company's intention that any and all compensation payable under the Plan shall satisfy the requirements for exemption under Section 409A, and all terms and provisions shall be interpreted to satisfy such requirements.
(g) Compliance With Section 409A.
 The Plan is intended to constitute an "unfunded" plan. Nothing contained herein shall require the Company to segregate any monies or other property, or shares of common stock of the Company, or to create any trusts, or to make any special deposits for any immediate or deferred amounts payable to any Participant, and no Participant shall have any rights that are greater than those of a general unsecured creditor of the Company.
(h) No Trust or Fund.
 All obligations of the Company under the Plan with respect to Awards shall be binding on any successor to the Company, whether the existence of such successor is the result of a direct or indirect purchase, merger, consolidation, or otherwise, of all or substantially all the business and/or assets of the Company.
(i) Successors.
 If any provision of the Plan or any Award is determined to be invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any jurisdiction, or as to any person, or would disqualify the Plan or any Award under any law deemed applicable by the Committee, such provision shall be construed or deemed amended to conform to applicable laws, or, if it cannot be so construed or deemed amended without, in the Committee's determination, materially altering the intent of the Plan or the Award, such provision shall be stricken as to such jurisdiction, person or Award, and the remainder of the Plan and any such Award shall remain in full force and effect.
(j) Severability.
 The Plan, all Awards granted under the Plan and all determinations made and actions taken pursuant to the Plan, to the extent not otherwise governed by the laws of the United States, shall be governed by the laws of the State of Illinois without giving effect to principles of conflicts of law.
(k) Choice of Law.
10. EFFECTIVE DATE
The Plan is amended and restated effective January 1, 2008 (the "Effective Date").
 

Exhibit 10.7
 
As used in this plan (the "Plan"), the following terms have the meanings set forth below:
"Board of Directors" means the Board of Directors of The Boeing Company;
"Code" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
"Company" means The Boeing Company;
"Committee" means the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors;
"Section 162(m)" means Code Section 162(m), including any proposed and final regulations and other guidance issued thereunder by the Department of the Treasury and/or the Internal Revenue Service.
"Section 409A" means Code Section 409A, including any proposed and final regulations and other guidance issued thereunder by the Department of the Treasury and/or the Internal Revenue Service.
"Subsidiary" means any corporation or association more than 50% of the voting securities of which are owned directly or indirectly by the Company or by one or more of its other Subsidiaries and the accounts of which are customarily consolidated with those of the Company for the purpose of reporting to stockholders.
 
The Committee shall have full power and authority to administer the Plan, and to construe and interpret its terms and provisions. Decisions of the Committee shall be final and binding upon all parties.
 
 
 
 
 
and who would have been eligible for an award but for such retirement or termination of service, may be eligible for an award for the year in which such employee retires or so leaves the service of the Company or of a Subsidiary. In the case of a former employee who would have been eligible for an award but for death, an award may be granted to the surviving spouse or children or to the estate of such former employee, as the Committee may determine in its sole discretion.
 
 
 
Except as provided in Section 4.2, the Committee shall have complete discretion in determining to whom awards under the Plan shall be made; provided, however, in making awards the Committee shall request and consider the recommendations of the Chief Executive Officer of the Company and others whom it may designate.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 10.8
 
Examples of types of compensation and programs to be permitted under this Plan are:
 
 
 
 
 
 
Examples include, but are not limited to, signing bonuses, retention incentive arrangements, completion bonuses and similar types of compensation.
 
 
1
Examples include, but are not limited to, incentive plans tied to unique business requirements, such as acquired plans, commission plans, and incentive plans for collective bargaining units.
 
 
In addition, the head of the relevant business unit (Vice President level or above) must also adopt the program. If the program is established to cover employees of a subsidiary of the Company, then the board of directors or similar governing body of the subsidiary (or its delegate) must adopt the program, in place of the head of the business unit.
 
 
 
In addition, the head of the relevant business unit (Vice President level or above) must also approve the goals and related potential awards established for a performance period prior to the beginning of the performance period. If the program is established to cover employees of a subsidiary of the Company, then the board of directors or similar governing body of the subsidiary (or its delegate) must adopt the program, in place of the business unit head.
 
 
2
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
3
 
 
 
 
4

Exhibit 10.9
 
 
The Boeing Company established The Boeing Company Executive Layoff Benefits Plan to provide for lump sum payments as layoff benefits for its executive employees effective August 1, 1997. This document is an amendment and complete restatement of the Plan and is effective for Layoff Events occurring on or after January 1, 2008.
It is intended that this Plan constitute a welfare benefit severance pay plan under ERISA and that any and all amounts payable under this Plan satisfy the requirements for exemption from Code Section 409A. The Plan shall be construed and interpreted in a manner consistent with such intentions.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
It is intended all amounts payable under this Plan shall satisfy the requirements for exemption under Code Section 409A, and all terms and provisions shall be interpreted to satisfy such requirements. Specifically, it is intended that an amount payable under this Plan qualify as a short-term deferral (as described in Treas. Reg.  1.409A-1(b)(4)) and, to the extent not a short-term deferral, as a separation payment due to an involuntary separation from service (as described in Treas. Reg.  1.409A-1(b)(9)(iii)). However, in the unlikely event that a portion of a Layoff Benefit payable to a Specified Employee is not exempt from the requirements of Code Section 409A (a "Non-Exempt Amount"), such Non-Exempt Amount will be paid to the Specified Employee as soon as practicable on or after the later of (i) the first day of the seventh month following the Specified Employee's Layoff Event, or (ii) the time specified in the paragraph above.
All payments under this Plan shall be net of any and all applicable withholding taxes, and interest shall not accrue on any portion of the Layoff Benefit, regardless of the time of payment.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20071121110117.txt.gz
TIME:20071121110117
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
1. 364-Day Revolving Credit Agreement.
On November 16, 2007, we entered into a $1.0 billion, 364-day revolving credit agreement (the "364-Day Credit Agreement"), with Citigroup Global Markets Inc. and J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. as joint lead arrangers and joint book managers, JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. as syndication agent and Citibank, N.A. as administrative agent, and a syndicate of lenders as defined in the 364-Day Credit Agreement. This facility replaces the $1.0 billion, 364 day credit agreement entered into on November 17, 2006.
Under the 364-Day Credit Agreement, we pay a commitment fee that varies between .030% and .100%, depending on our credit rating. Borrowings under the 364-Day Credit Agreement (that are not based on Eurodollar rates) bear interest at an annual rate based on the "base rate" of interest in effect plus the applicable margin and applicable utilization fees payable quarterly in arrears as defined in the 364-Day Credit Agreement. The "base rate" of interest is the higher of (1) the base rate announced publicly by Citibank, N.A., from time to time and (2) the Federal Funds Rate plus 0.50%. The applicable margin will vary depending upon our credit rating and whether the payment is made before or after the termination date. For payments made before the termination date, the applicable margin may vary from a low of 0.070% to a high of 0.450%. The applicable utilization fee varies between 0.050% and 0.100% depending on our credit rating and applies on any date the aggregate principal amount of outstanding advances exceeds 50% of the aggregate commitments.
The 364-Day Credit Agreement contains customary terms and conditions, including certain financial covenants that are substantially similar to those contained in the previous facility, including, without limitation, covenants restricting our ability to incur liens, merge or consolidate with another entity. Further, the 364-Day Credit Agreement contains a covenant restricting our ability to permit consolidated debt (as defined in the 364-Day Credit Agreement) to exceed 60% of our total capital (as defined in the 364-Day Credit Agreement) until the Credit Agreement terminates and all amounts borrowed under the Credit Agreement are paid in full. The events of default under the 364-Day Credit Agreement, include but are not limited to, the following: (1) failure to pay outstanding principal or interest, (2) failure of representations or warranties to be correct, in any material respects, (3) failure to perform any other term, covenant or agreement and such failure is not remedied within 30 days of notice of such failure, (4) a cross-default with other debt in certain circumstances, (5) certain defaults upon obligations under the Employee Retirement Income Security Act or (6) bankruptcy. Such events of default would require the repayment of any outstanding borrowings and the termination of the right to borrow additional funds under the 364-Day Credit Agreement.
Some of the lenders under the 364-Day Credit Agreement and their affiliates have various relationships with us and our subsidiaries involving the provision of financial service, including cash management, investment banking, trust and leasing services. In addition, we and some of our subsidiaries have entered into foreign exchange and other derivative arrangements with certain of the lenders and their affiliates.
2. Five-Year Revolving Credit Agreement.
On November 16, 2007, we entered into a $2.0 billion, five-year revolving credit agreement (the "Five-Year Credit Agreement"), with Citigroup Global Markets Inc. and J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. as joint lead arrangers and joint book managers, JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. as syndication agent and Citibank, N.A. as administrative agent, and a syndicate of lenders as defined in the Five-Year Credit Agreement. This facility replaces the $2.0 billion, five-year credit agreement entered into on November 17, 2006.
Under the Five-Year Credit Agreement, we pay a commitment fee that varies between .040% and .125%, depending on our credit rating. Borrowings under the Five-Year Credit Agreement (that are not based on Eurodollar rates) bear interest at an annual rate based on the "base rate" of interest in effect plus the applicable margin and applicable utilization fees payable quarterly in arrears as defined in the Five-Year Credit Agreement. The "base rate" of interest is the higher of (1) the base rate announced publicly by Citibank, N.A., from time to time and (2) the Federal Funds Rate plus 0.50%. The applicable margin will vary depending upon our credit rating and may vary from a low of 0.060% to a high of 0.425%. The applicable utilization fee varies between 0.050% and 0.100% depending on our credit rating and applies on any date the aggregate principal amount of outstanding advances exceeds 50% of the aggregate commitments.
The Five-Year Credit Agreement contains customary terms and conditions, including certain financial covenants that are substantially similar to those contained in the previous facility, including, without limitation, covenants restricting our ability to incur liens, merge or consolidate with another entity. Further, the Five-Year Credit Agreement contains a covenant restricting our ability to permit consolidated debt (as defined in the Five-Year Credit Agreement) to exceed 60% of our total capital (as defined in the Five-Year Credit Agreement) until the Credit Agreement terminates and all amounts borrowed under the Credit Agreement are paid in full. The events of default under the Five-Year Credit Agreement, include but are not limited to, the following: (1) failure to pay outstanding principal or interest, (2) failure of representations or warranties to be correct, in any material respects, (3) failure to perform any other term, covenant or agreement and such failure is not remedied within 30 days of notice of such failure, (4) a cross-default with other debt in certain circumstances, (5) certain defaults upon obligations under the Employee Retirement Income Security Act or (6) bankruptcy. Such events of default would require the repayment of any outstanding borrowings and the termination of the right to borrow additional funds under the Five-Year Credit Agreement.
Some of the lenders under the Five-Year Credit Agreement and their affiliates have various relationships with us and our subsidiaries involving the provision of financial service, including cash management, investment banking, trust and leasing services. In addition, we and some of our subsidiaries have entered into foreign exchange and other derivative arrangements with certain of the lenders and their affiliates.
 
The information described above under "Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement" with respect to the 364-Day Credit Agreement and the Five-Year Credit Agreement is hereby incorporated by reference.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Date: November 21, 2007


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20071214155431.txt.gz
TIME:20071214155431
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.02. Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
(e) On December 10, 2007, the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of The Boeing Company (the "Company") adopted and approved amendments effective January 1, 2008 to the Supplemental Executive Retirement Plan for Employees of The Boeing Company (the "SERP") in which the Company's named executive officers participate.
The amendments to the SERP were adopted primarily to conform the plan to the requirements of final and transition regulations promulgated under Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the "Code"). The Committee, in connection with a review of the Company's executive retirement benefits against the benefits provided by the Company's peers, also amended the SERP to eliminate the payment of an additional supplemental benefit to executives who are hired or rehired on or after January 1, 2008. The additional supplemental benefit is paid to executives to the extent the Company's Pension Value Plan benefit formula yields a number less than a target benefit. Under the amended SERP, executives hired or rehired on or after January 1, 2008 will be eligible to receive the same excess benefits payable to non-executives, but not the supplemental benefit. Executives hired before January 1, 2008 will remain eligible for the greater of the additional supplemental benefit or the excess benefit, as described in the SERP, once they satisfy the SERP's eligibility requirements.
The foregoing description of the amendments to the SERP is qualified in its entirety by reference to the amended and restated SERP, which is filed as Exhibit 10.1 to this Form 8-K and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: December 14, 2007
 

EXHIBIT 10.1
SECTION 1. PURPOSE OF THE PLAN
The Supplemental Executive Retirement Plan for Employees of The Boeing Company was originally effective January 1, 1999. Prior to 2008, the plan provided two separate benefits to participants, the Supplemental Benefit and the Excess Benefit. The purpose of the Supplemental Benefit is to provide retirement benefits to supplement the benefits provided by the Pension Value Plan, for a select group of management or highly compensated employees of The Boeing Company and its Affiliates or Subsidiaries who are participants in the Pension Value Plan. The purpose of the Excess Benefit component is to provide restoration and excess benefits to eligible employees of The Boeing Company and its Affiliates or Subsidiaries who are participants in the Pension Value Plan. Effective January 1, 2008, for ease of communications with participants, the plan was restated to merge both components into a single SERP Benefit. This change was not intended to have a substantive impact on participant benefits.
The adoption of the Plan is not intended to result in any duplication of benefits by awarding additional benefits for any period of service with the Company for which the participant is otherwise entitled to benefits under another non-qualified plan. The Committee will have sole and absolute discretion in determining whether an adjustment in benefits under this Plan is necessary to prevent a prohibited duplication of benefits.
The Plan is restated effective January 1, 2008 to comply with section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS
Except as otherwise specified in this Section, capitalized terms have the same meaning as provided for those terms under the Pension Value Plan.
 means an amount of equal value determined as follows:
Actuarial Equivalent or Actuarially Equivalent
 
 
 means a member of a controlled group of corporations (as defined in Code section 1563(a), determined without regard to Code sections 1563(a)(4) and (e)(3)(C)),
Affiliate or Subsidiary
 
a group of trades or businesses (whether incorporated or not) which are under common control within the meaning of Code section 414(c), or an affiliated service group (as defined in Code sections 414(m) or 414(o)) of which The Boeing Company is a part.
 means the Benefit Service recognized under the PVP, except as modified below.
Benefit Service
If a Participant has commenced a benefit under this Plan following a deemed Separation from Service under Code section 409A due to an Authorized Period of Absence classified as Pre-Retirement Leave, additional Benefit Service will not be recognized during this Authorized Period of Absence. Nor will Benefit Service be recognized for a period of reduced services, where a Participant Separates from Service due to a reasonably anticipated permanent reduction in services of at least 50 percent (for reasons other than an Authorized Period of Absence).
 means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
Code
 means the date as of which an Employee's payments commence under Section 6.A.2. of this Plan.
Commencement Date
 means the Employee Benefit Plans Committee.
Committee
 means The Boeing Company, its successors in interest, and its Affiliates and Subsidiaries.
Company
 means annualized base rate of pay from the Company.
Compensation
 means the executive designation of level E1 to E6 at the Company.
E-Series Payroll
 means any person who is employed as a common law employee of the Company.
Employee
 means the benefits provided by Section 5 of this Plan.
Excess Benefit
 means the greater of the following:
Final Average Pay
 
 
 
For purposes of computing Final Average Pay, periods during an Authorized Period of Absence generally will be included as if the Participant were compensated at the rate of pay he or she was receiving immediately before the Authorized Period of Absence. However, if a Participant has commenced a benefit under this Plan following a deemed Separation from Service under Code section 409A due to an Authorized Period of Absence classified as Pre-Retirement Leave, Compensation will not be counted during this Authorized Period of Absence.
Similarly, Compensation will not be counted toward Final Average Pay to the extent paid during a Participant's period of reduced services, where the Participant has Separated from Service due to a reasonably anticipated permanent reduction in services of at least 50 percent (for reasons other than an Authorized Period of Absence).
. For purposes of determining Final Average Pay for a Participant who transfers employment directly from the Company to ULA or USA, the term Compensation generally includes the Participant's annualized base rate of pay with ULA or USA for the period of uninterrupted executive service at ULA or USA, as applicable, provided that the Participant transfers directly from the E-Series Payroll at the Company to executive status at ULA or USA. ULA and USA base pay will not be included under this Plan for any period following the Participant's removal from this executive status. In addition, ULA and USA base pay will not be included as Compensation under this Plan for any period after a Participant has commenced a benefit under this Plan.
ULA and USA Pay
 means the five consecutive awards made under the Incentive Compensation Plan that produce the highest sum, divided by five. The term "awards" include amounts awarded instead of cash and amounts not yet vested, but it does not include any accrued awards not yet made or awards made after the month in which a Termination of Employment occurs. Where fewer than five awards have been made to a Participant under the Incentive Compensation Plan during the five-year averaging period, all awards during this period will be counted.
Final Average Incentive Pay
However, if a Participant has commenced a benefit under this Plan following a deemed Separation from Service under Code section 409A due to an Authorized Period of Absence classified as Pre-Retirement Leave, awards made during this Authorized Period of Absence will not be included. Similarly, incentive awards will not be counted toward Final Average Incentive Pay to the extent awarded during a Participant's period of reduced services, where the Participant has Separated from Service due to a reasonably anticipated permanent reduction in services of at least 50 percent (for reasons other than an Authorized Period of Absence).
In addition, Final Average Incentive Pay will not include any portion of an incentive award that the Company seeks to recover under the Clawback Policy provision of the Incentive Compensation Plan.
. For purposes of determining Final Average Incentive Pay for a Participant who transfers employment directly from the Company to ULA or USA, the term
ULA and USA Incentive Pay
 
Incentive Compensation Plan generally includes any applicable annual incentive plan at ULA or USA for the period of uninterrupted executive service at ULA or USA, as applicable, provided that the Participant transfers directly from the E-Series Payroll at the Company to executive status at ULA or USA. ULA and USA annual incentive plans will not be included under this Plan for any period following the Participant's removal from this executive status. Solely for the Plan Year in which the Participant transfers to ULA or USA, Final Average Incentive Pay will include awards made under both the Incentive Compensation Plan of the Company and the similar plan maintained by ULA or USA, as applicable. In addition, ULA and USA incentive pay will not be included as Compensation under this Plan for any period after a Participant has commenced a benefit under this Plan.
 has the meaning given in Section 4.F.3.
Frozen Benefit
 means a Participant who has a Heritage Benefit from The Boeing Company Employee Retirement Plan.
Heritage Boeing Participant
 means a Participant who has a Heritage Benefit from the Employee Retirement Income Plan of McDonnell Douglas Corporation, Salaried Plan.
Heritage MDC Participant
 means a Participant who has a Heritage Benefit from the Boeing North American Retirement Plan.
Heritage BNA Participant
 means The Boeing Company Elected Officer Annual Incentive Plan or the Incentive Compensation Plan for Employees of The Boeing Company and Subsidiaries, as applicable.
Incentive Compensation Plan
 means the date on which a Participant with a Heritage MDC Benefit both attains age 50 and earns 30 years of Accumulated Benefit Service.
MDC 50/30 Date
 has the meaning given in Section 4.B.
Offset Benefit
 means an Employee who satisfies the eligibility criteria in either Section 4.A. or Section 5.A.
Participant
 means The Pension Value Plan for Employees of The Boeing Company (formerly known as The Boeing Company Pension Value Plan for Heritage MDC Employees and The Boeing Company Pension Value Plan), as amended from time to time.
PVP or Pension Value Plan
 means the Supplemental Executive Retirement Plan for Employees of The Boeing Company as herein set forth, together with any amendments that may be adopted.
Plan
 means the calendar year.
Plan Year
 means an Employee's death, retirement, or termination of employment from the Company within the meaning of Code section 409A. For purposes of determining whether a Separation from Service has occurred, Affiliates and
Separation from Service or Separates from Service
 
Subsidiaries are defined by using the language "at least 80 percent" to define the controlled group under Code section 1563(a) in lieu of the 50 percent default rule stated in Treasury Regulation section 1.409A-1(h)(3).
A Separation from Service is deemed to include a reasonably anticipated permanent reduction in the level of services performed by an Employee, to less than 50 percent of the average level of services performed by the Employee during the immediately preceding 36-month period.
 For a Participant whose most recent date of hire or rehire was before January 1, 2008, the SERP Benefit equals the greater of the Participant's vested Supplemental Benefit, to the extent eligible, or the Participant's vested Excess Benefit.
SERP Benefit
For a Participant hired or rehired on or after January 1, 2008, the SERP Benefit will equal the vested Excess Benefit for periods after this date. No Supplemental Benefit will accrue for periods after January 1, 2008. Solely for purposes of eligibility for the Supplemental Benefit, the term "rehire" will not include a Participant's return directly from an Authorized Period of Absence or a Participant's rehire during a Layoff Period.
The SERP Benefit will be calculated after the Supplemental Benefit (if eligible) and Excess Benefit are each reduced to reflect commencement before age 65, if applicable, in accordance with the actuarial factors described in Sections 4 and 5 herein. Supplemental Benefits or Excess Benefits that are not 100% vested will be disregarded for purposes of calculating the SERP Benefit.
 means an Employee who is a "specified employee" within the meaning of Code section 409A. Specified Employee status is determined on the last day of the prior Plan Year, to take effect as of April 1 of the Plan Year for a 12-month period. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Specified Employees shall be determined by including the employees whom the Company reasonably determines to be the 75 top-paid officers of the Company rather than the 50 top-paid officers as provided under Code section 416(i)(1)(A), to the extent permitted under Code section 409A.
Specified Employee
 means the benefits provided by Section 4 of this Plan.
Supplemental Benefit
 has the meaning given in Section 4.B.
Target Benefit
 means Final Average Pay plus Final Average Incentive Pay, with the result divided by twelve. Total Average Compensation for a Participant who ceased to be on the E-Series Payroll before January 1, 1999 will be determined as of January 1, 1999. Total Average Compensation for a Participant who ceases to be on the E-Series Payroll on or after January 1, 1999 will be determined as of the date the Participant first ceases to be on the E-Series Payroll.
Total Average Compensation
 
 means United Launch Alliance, LLC, a joint venture of The Boeing Company and Lockheed Martin Corporation. The term ULA includes its subsidiary United Launch Services, LLC.
ULA
 means United Space Alliance, LLC, a joint venture of The Boeing Company and Lockheed Martin Corporation.
USA
 
SECTION 3. THE SERP BENEFIT
The SERP Benefit under this Plan generally is calculated as the greater of a Participant's vested Supplemental Benefit (to the extent eligible) or the Participant's vested Excess Benefit, each reduced to reflect commencement prior to age 65, if applicable. However, a Participant hired or rehired on or after January 1, 2008 will not be eligible to accrue a Supplemental Benefit for periods after this date. Solely for purposes of eligibility for the Supplemental Benefit, the term "rehire" will not include a Participant's return directly from an Authorized Period of Absence or a Participant's rehire during a Layoff Period.
Supplemental Benefits are described in Section 4. Excess Benefits are described in Section 5. Rules applicable to both Supplemental Benefits and Excess Benefits are provided under this Section 3.
Prior to 2008, the Supplemental Benefit and Excess Benefit were described herein and communicated to Participants as two separate benefits. For ease of communication, these dual components are restated as a single benefit effective as of January 1, 2008. In all cases, the restatement will provide the same total benefit as of December 31, 2007 as the formulas of the pre-2008 plan.
In no event will the SERP Benefit for any Participant who is transferred to ULA or USA duplicate any benefits provided under an individual agreement with the Company.
 
Special bridging rules apply to a Participant who is described in both Sections 3.A.1. and 3.A.2. below. In this case, the Participant's SERP Benefit will be calculated as of the date on which he or she would satisfy the conditions for an Early Retirement Date under the PVP. The SERP Benefit will be reduced to reflect early commencement as follows. First, the separate components of the SERP Benefit will be reduced as of the Early Retirement Date, in accordance with the actuarial reduction described in Section 4.C.1. (Supplemental Benefit) or Section 5 (Excess Benefit), as applicable. Second, the SERP Benefit will be further reduced for each month that the Participant's Commencement Date under this Plan precedes the month in which the Participant would satisfy the conditions for an Early Retirement Date, in accordance with the Actuarial Equivalent factors for calculating lump sums under the PVP.
Benefits under this Section 3.A. remain payable in accordance with the timing rules of Section 6.A.2.
 
 
 
 
 
Special calculation rules apply to a Participant described in both Sections 3.B.1. and 3.B.2.
 
 
In this case, the Participant's SERP Benefit will remain payable in accordance with the timing rules of Section 6.A.2.
In addition, upon the Participant's Early Retirement Date, a separate lump sum payment will be made to the Participant to represent any missed payments as a result of the delayed commencement beyond the Participant's MDC 50/30 Date. Specifically, this lump sum will equal the total of the monthly payments that would have been payable to the Participant, beginning on the first of the month following the Participant's MDC 50/30 Date and ending immediately prior to his or her Early Retirement Date, plus interest at the rate used to calculate lump sums under the PVP.
 
The Committee may determine, in its sole discretion, that a Participant will forfeit any part or all of his or her SERP Benefit (whether or not vested) if any of the following circumstances occur while employed by the Company or within five (5) years after termination of such employment, provided that the provisions of paragraphs 3. and 4. shall apply only with respect to benefits accrued on or after January 1, 2008:
 
 
 
 
 
To the extent the Participant has already commenced payment of his or her SERP benefit, the Committee will be entitled to pursue any and all legal and equitable relief against the Participant to enforce the forfeiture of and recover such SERP benefit. The forfeiture provisions will continue to apply unless and to the extent modified by a court of competent jurisdiction. However, if any portion of these forfeiture provisions is held by such a court to be unenforceable, these provisions shall be deemed amended to limit their scope to the broadest scope that such authority determines is enforceable, and as so amended shall continue in effect.
In addition, the Committee will, in all appropriate circumstances, require reimbursement of any SERP Benefit attributable to an incentive award that the Company seeks to recover under the Clawback Policy provision of the Incentive Compensation Plan.
 
 
The SERP Benefit of a Participant who is rehired (or who returns from an Authorized Period of Absence or a period of a reduced level of services that constitutes a deemed Separation from Service under Code section 409A) after his or her Commencement Date will be determined under this Section 3.D.
 
The portion of the Participant's SERP Benefit that accrued before the initial Commencement Date (or during an Authorized Period of Absence or a period of a reduced level of services that constitutes a deemed Separation from Service) will be referred to as the "Old SERP Benefit" for purposes of this Section 3.D.
A Participant's Old SERP Benefit will not be suspended by reason of the Participant's rehire or return from Authorized Period of Absence or a period of a reduced level of services. This portion of the SERP Benefit will continue to be paid following rehire or return, in the form originally elected by the Participant, without regard to the period following rehire or return.
 
 
In general, a Participant rehired on or after January 1, 2008 will not be eligible to accrue a Supplemental Benefit for periods after this date. (This exclusion does not apply to a Participant hired before January 1, 2008, who returns on or after this date directly from an Authorized Period of Absence or a period of a reduced level of services or who is rehired on or after this date but during a Layoff Period). Following rehire, this Participant will be entitled to accrue only an Excess Benefit attributable to periods after the date of rehire ("New SERP Benefit"). The New SERP Benefit for this Participant will equal: (a) the Participant's benefits under the PVP for periods after rehire determined without regard to the limitations under Code sections 415 and 401(a)(17), reduced (but not below zero) by (b) any benefit payable to or on account of the Participant under the PVP for periods after rehire. The New SERP Benefit will be determined without regard to benefits, compensation, and Benefit Service accrued before rehire.
,
The Participant's New SERP Benefit will remain subject to the timing rules under Section 6.A.2., without regard to any Separation from Service that occurred prior to rehire. The Participant may elect the form of payment for the New SERP Benefit at the time of commencement, in accordance with Section 6.A.1.
 
A Supplemental Benefit can accrue (to the extent eligible) for a Participant hired before January 1, 2008, who returns on or after this date directly from an Authorized Period of Absence or a period of a reduced level of services, or who is rehired on or after this date but during a Layoff Period. For such Participant, the total SERP Benefit will be recalculated (as described below) as of the subsequent Commencement Date as if no prior Separation from Service had
 
occurred, then reduced by the payments previously received. This total SERP Benefit will be further reduced by the Old SERP, but to no less than zero, to produce the New SERP Benefit payable.
The total SERP Benefit equals the greater of (i) and (ii) below.
 
 
The Participant's total SERP Benefit is further offset by the value of payments made prior to the subsequent Commencement Date from this Plan, or from any other non-qualified defined benefit-type pension plan or arrangement (including under an individual contract) sponsored or paid for by the Company. The value of these benefit payments will be determined by (i) increasing each benefit payment with interest from the time such benefit payment was made to the time of the subsequent Commencement Date in accordance with the Actuarial Equivalent factors for calculating lump sums under the PVP (the "Commencement Date Factors"), and then (ii) converting the sum of the interest-adjusted benefit payments from (i) above at the subsequent Commencement Date to a Single Life Annuity using the Commencement Date Factors. No reduction will be made for benefit payments payable under any tax-qualified pension plan (and its corresponding non-qualified plan) attributable to service not treated as Benefit Service taken into account under Section 4.B.1.(a).
For any Participant hired on or after January 1, 2008 who returns directly from an Authorized Period of Absence or a period of a reduced level of services, or who is rehired during a Layoff Period, the total SERP Benefit will be recalculated following the methodology described above (with regard to the Excess Benefit only). No Supplemental Benefit will be payable.
In no event will this Participant's recalculated total SERP Benefit be less than the Old SERP Benefit which is in pay status.
For purposes of this Section 3.D.2.(b), the New SERP Benefit will equal: (i) the recalculated total SERP Benefit described above, minus (ii) the Old SERP Benefit defined in Section 3.D.1.
The Participant's New SERP Benefit will remain subject to the timing rules under Section 6.A.2., without regard to any Separation from Service that occurred prior to rehire. The
 
Participant may elect the form of payment for the New SERP Benefit at the time of commencement, in accordance with Section 6.A.1.
 
For a Participant who rehired and had a subsequent Commencement Date before January 1, 2008, the New SERP Benefit was comprised of a New Supplemental Benefit and a New Excess Benefit (both as defined below) which were calculated and paid separately, in accordance with the terms of the Plan at that time.
The New Supplemental Benefit was recalculated as if no prior retirement had occurred, and then offset for all payments previously made, as described in Section 3.D.2.(b) above.
The New Excess Benefit was recalculated solely with regard to new accruals under the PVP, as described in Section 3.D.2.(a) above.
 
The SERP Benefit of a Participant who is rehired before his or her Commencement Date will be determined under this Section 3.E.
 
The Participant's Old SERP Benefit for purposes of this Section 3.E. is calculated as the amount that would have been payable to the Participant at age 55, attributable to the prior period of employment, if he or she had not rehired or returned. This amount will be the greater of (a) and (b) below:
 
 
For purposes of calculating the Participant's Supplemental Benefit, his or her Target Benefit will equal the amount determined under Section 4.B., taking account of the Participant's Benefit Service and Total Average Compensation as of the prior Separation from Service (or as of the end of an Authorized Period of Absence or a period of a reduced level of services that constitutes a deemed Separation from Service). The Target Benefit will be reduced for early commencement by the applicable terminated vested reduction factors described in Section 4.C.2. and further reduced by the Offset Benefit. The Participant's Offset Benefit will be calculated as the PVP benefit earned prior to the original Separation from Service and payable at age 55 (i.e., with
 
interest credits projected to age 55), in accordance with the applicable reduction factors under the PVP for calculating a Vested Termination Benefit.
The Participant's Old SERP Benefit will remain subject to the timing rules under Section 6.A.2. With regard to the Participant's Old SERP Benefit, the Participant will be treated as having experienced a Separation from Service. Payment of the Old SERP Benefit will commence as of the first of the month following the Participant's attainment of age 55. Payment of the Old SERP Benefit will commence as of this date even if the Participant attains age 55 while on an Authorized Period of Absence, or after he or she rehires. The Participant may elect the form of payment for this Old SERP Benefit at the time of commencement, in accordance with Section 6.A.1.
 
In general, a Participant rehired on or after January 1, 2008 will not be eligible to accrue a Supplemental Benefit for periods after this date. (This exclusion does not apply to a Participant hired before January 1, 2008, who returns on or after this date directly from an Authorized Period of Absence or a period of a reduced level of services, or who is rehired on or after this date but during a Layoff Period). Following rehire, this Participant will be entitled to accrue only an Excess Benefit attributable to periods after the date of rehire ("New SERP Benefit"). The New SERP Benefit for this Participant will equal: (a) the Participant's benefits under the PVP for periods after rehire determined without regard to the limitations under Code sections 415 and 401(a)(17), reduced (but not below zero) by (b) any benefit payable to or on account of the Participant under the PVP for periods after rehire. The New SERP Benefit will be determined without regard to benefits, compensation, and service accrued before rehire.
A Supplemental Benefit can accrue (to the extent eligible) for a Participant hired before January 1, 2008, who returns on or after this date directly from an Authorized Period of Absence or a period of a reduced level of services, or who is rehired on or after this date but during a Layoff Period. For such Participant, the total SERP Benefit will be recalculated as of the subsequent Commencement Date as if no prior Separation from Service had occurred, following the methodology in Section 3.D.2.(b). For purposes of this Section 3.E.2., the New SERP Benefit will equal: (i) the recalculated total SERP Benefit described above, minus (ii) the Old SERP Benefit defined in Section 3.E.1.
For any Participant hired on or after January 1, 2008 who returns directly from an Authorized Period of Absence or a period of a reduced level of servicesor who is rehired during a Layoff Period, the total SERP Benefit will be recalculated as of the subsequent Commencement Date as if no prior Separation from Service had occurred, subject to offset for the value of any non-qualified benefits previously paid following the methodology in Section 3.D.2.(b) (with regard to the Excess Benefit only). For purposes of this Section 3.E.2., the New SERP Benefit will equal: (i) the recalculated total SERP Benefit described above, minus (ii) the Old SERP Benefit defined in Section 3.E.1. No Supplemental Benefit will be payable.
,
,
With regard to the timing of payment of the New SERP Benefit, the Participant will be treated as if no Separation from Service had occurred prior to rehire or return. The Participant may elect
 
the form of payment for the New SERP Benefit at the time of commencement, in accordance with Section 6.A.1.
 
An annual recalculation will be made for a Participant who commences benefits under Section 6.A.2.(a) following a deemed Separation from Service under Code section 409A due to an Authorized Period of Absence classified as Pilot Early Leave.
For this Participant, the benefit payable under this Plan will be recalculated as of January 1 of each Plan Year following the year in which benefits commence following the methodology in Section 3.D.2.(b), as if no prior Separation from Service had occurred. For purposes of this calculation, the Participant's benefit will be reduced by early retirement reduction factors and further offset by the value of payments previously made, to compute additional accruals (if any) earned during the period of Pilot Early Leave in the prior Plan Year, calculated using the same methodology of Section 3.D.2.(b). Such additional accruals (if any) will be paid commencing February 1 of each year in which recalculation occurs, in the form originally elected by the Participant. In no event will this recalculation reduce a participant's benefit.
Recalculation will cease after the Plan Year following the end of the Pilot Early Leave.
 
SECTION 4. THE SUPPLEMENTAL BENEFIT
 
An Employee will be eligible for the Supplemental Benefit if the Employee either (1) is on the E-Series Payroll on or after January 1, 1999, or (2) was a participant in the Supplemental Retirement Plan for Executives of The Boeing Company as of December 31, 1998 and as of January 1, 1999 was (a) on an Authorized Period of Absence from the E-Series Payroll, (b) on a layoff (bridging period) from the E-Series Payroll that began on or after January 1, 1996, or (c) on the management payroll but had been on the E-Series Payroll for some period on or after January 1, 1989.
An Employee who retired on January 1, 1999 is not eligible to participate in the Plan.
An Employee eligible to participate in the Plan will become a Participant on the later of (1) the date the Employee satisfies the eligibility conditions or (2) the date the Employee becomes an Active Participant in the PVP. A rehired Employee who previously participated in the Plan will become a Participant again on the later of (1) the date the Employee satisfies the eligibility conditions again after rehire or (2) the date the Employee becomes an Active Participant in the PVP again after rehire.
If a Participant remains actively employed by the Company, but is no longer on the E-Series Payroll, the Target Benefit will remain frozen as of the later of January 1, 1999 or the date the Participant was removed from the E-Series Payroll.
 
Except as otherwise provided in Section F, the Supplemental Benefit payable to a Participant retiring at his or her Normal Retirement Date is a monthly amount equal to (1) minus (2) below, provided that the monthly Supplemental Benefit shall not be less than zero.
 
(a) the Target Benefit  a monthly amount equal to 1.6% multiplied by the Participant's Benefit Service multiplied by the Participant's Total Average Compensation, or
(b) the Frozen Benefit, as described in Section 4.F.3., if applicable,
provided, however, that the amount determined under this Section 4.B.1. shall not exceed the Participant's Compensation at Termination of Employment divided by twelve.
 
 
If the Participant retires after his or her Normal Retirement Date, calculation of the Target Benefit will include Compensation and Benefit Service attained before and after the Normal Retirement Date, and the Offset Benefit will be adjusted to reflect the late retirement according to the provisions of the PVP.
 
Subject to the timing rules in Section 6 and the actuarial reductions described below, a Participant will be entitled to retire and commence benefits before his or her Normal Retirement Date in accordance with the provisions of the PVP governing early retirement benefits and vested retirement benefits. An unreduced benefit will not be available, even to a Heritage MDC Participant who has attained age 50 with 30 years of Accumulated Benefit Service.
 
If the Participant retires directly from active employment with the Company and commences benefits before his or her Normal Retirement Date, the Target Benefit will be reduced by
 1
/
4
% for each month that the Participant's Commencement Date precedes his or her sixty-second birthday. The Offset Benefit will be adjusted to reflect the early retirement according to the provisions of the PVP.
 
If a Participant terminates employment with a vested Supplemental Benefit and commences benefits before his or her Normal Retirement Date, the Target Benefit will be reduced by
 1
/
2
% for each month that the Vested Terminated Participant's Commencement Date precedes his or her sixty-fifth birthday. The Offset Benefit will be adjusted to reflect the Vested Terminated Participant's early commencement of benefits according to the provisions of the PVP.
 
A Participant who was on an approved medical leave of absence on or before April 1, 2003 and who otherwise met the eligibility requirements for a Disability Retirement Date under the PVP on or before December 1, 2004 would be entitled to a disability retirement benefit equal to his unreduced Supplemental Benefit in accordance with the provisions of the PVP governing disability retirement benefits. Disability benefits were payable under this Plan only when and to the extent that the Participant received disability retirement benefits under the PVP. This Section 4.D. applies only to benefits that accrued and commenced payment before December 31, 2004, and it has no application after that date.
 
No Supplemental Benefit shall be payable to a Participant until such Participant is vested in such Supplemental Benefit. A Participant will vest 100% in his Supplemental Benefit at the later of the following: (1) the date the Participant vests 100% in retirement benefits provided under the PVP, or (2) the date the Participant has been on the E-Series Payroll for a period of 36 consecutive months. For these purposes, an Authorized Period of Absence from the E-Series Payroll will count as a period on the E-Series Payroll. If an Employee ceases to be on the E-Series Payroll for any reason other than an Authorized Period of Absence, and the Employee later returns to the E-Series Payroll, periods of service on E-Series Payroll will not be aggregated for purpose of determining whether the 36-consecutive month requirement has been met.
For purposes of computing vesting for a Participant who transfers employment directly from the Company to ULA or USA, uninterrupted service at ULA or USA as an executive will be credited toward the 36 consecutive months requirement described herein, provided that the Participant transfers directly from the E-Series Payroll at the Company to executive status at ULA or USA, as applicable. ULA and USA service will not be credited toward vesting under this Plan for any period following the Participant's removal from this executive status. For purposes of computing vesting for a participant who transfers employment directly from ULA or USA to the Company, uninterrupted service at ULA or USA as an executive will be credited toward the 36 consecutive months requirement described herein, provided that the Participant transfers directly from executive status at ULA or USA to the E-Series Payroll at the Company. ULA and USA service will not be credited toward vesting under this Plan for any period prior to the Participant's attainment of this executive status at ULA or USA, as applicable.
Any Participant who was on the E-Series Payroll on January 1, 1999 or was a Participant in the Supplemental Retirement Plan for Executives of The Boeing Company as of December 31, 1998, will be 100% vested in his or her Supplemental Benefit if he or she is vested in his or her benefits under the PVP. A Participant will also be 100% vested if he or she dies before benefits commence with a surviving spouse or becomes eligible for a disability retirement benefit, but only if he or she has vested in his or her benefits under the PVP.
If a Participant retires or Separates from Service (other than a deemed Separation from Service due to an Authorized Period of Absence) vesting in the Supplemental Benefit, the Participant generally will forfeit all rights to the Supplemental Benefit. To the extent the benefit under this Plan becomes 100% vested during an Authorized Period of Absence that constitutes a deemed Separation from Service, it will remain subject to the payment timing rules under Section 6.A.2.
before
If a Participant Separates from Service becoming vested in the Supplemental Benefit, and the Participant is subsequently rehired or returns from an Authorized Period of Absence, the Supplemental Benefit accrued after rehire and return will be 100% vested (even if the Participant fails to be on the E-Series Payroll for 36 consecutive months following rehire or return).
after
 
Effective January 1, 1999, certain participants in certain of the qualified plans sponsored by the Company and its Affiliates or Subsidiaries were transferred from those qualified plans to the PVP. In addition, effective July 1, 1999, certain participants in the Boeing North American Retirement Plan were transferred from that plan to the PVP. In conjunction with the transfer to the PVP, those participants were also transferred from various non-qualified plans in which they participated into this Plan. As of October 5, 2000, certain participants in The Times Mirror Pension Plan became participants in the PVP.
The following provisions are intended to insure that no benefits were lost as a result of transfers into this Plan or otherwise. These provisions are not intended to result in any duplication of benefits by awarding additional benefits for any period of service with the Company for which the Participant is otherwise entitled to benefits under another non-qualified plan.
 
For Heritage Boeing and Heritage MDC Participants, Final Average Pay will equal the greater of (1) Final Average Pay as defined in Section 2, or (2) the following amount as calculated solely for the period ending January 1, 1999:
 
 
 
For Heritage Boeing and Heritage MDC Participants, Final Average Incentive Pay will equal the greater of (1) Final Average Incentive Pay as defined in Section 2, or (2) the following amount as calculated solely for the period ending January 1, 1999:
 
 
 
For Heritage Boeing Participants retiring during February or March 1999, this section will be applicable through such Participant's Commencement Date, so that the Final Average Incentive Pay calculated under (a) above will include awards made in 1999 under the Incentive Compensation Plan.
 
For a Heritage Boeing Participant, the Frozen Benefit will be the Participant's benefits under the Supplemental Retirement Plan for Executives of The Boeing Company determined as of January 1, 1999, adjusted according to the provisions of the PVP for commencement of benefits on the Participant's Commencement Date and for payment in the form of a Single Life Annuity.
For a Participant on the E-Series Payroll as of July 1, 1999 who was eligible to retire from the Boeing North American Retirement Plan as of June 30, 1999, that Participant's Frozen Benefit as of June 30, 1999 will equal the Target Benefit (as defined in Section 4.B.) as of June 30, 1999 plus the Participant's benefit under the Boeing North American Retirement Plan and Boeing North American non-qualified plans as of June 30, 1999, all adjusted according to the provisions of the PVP for commencement of benefits on June 30, 1999 and for payment in the form of a Single Life Annuity.
 
As the result of the Company's acquisition of Jeppesen Sanderson, Inc., its two subsidiaries (Jeppesen DataPlan, Inc. and Nobeltec Corporation), and Airspace Safety Analysis Corporation ("ASAC"), certain participants in the PVP were provided a Jeppesen/ASAC Indexing Benefit, but no Benefit Service was provided for Periods of Service prior to October 5, 2000. Notwithstanding Section 4.B., the calculation of the Offset Benefit under this Plan shall not include the Jeppesen/ASAC Indexing Benefit.
 
SECTION 5. THE EXCESS BENEFITS
 
An Employee will be eligible for an Excess Benefit if the Employee is entitled to a benefit from the PVP and such benefit is limited by Code sections 415 and/or 401(a)(17).
 
A Participant's Excess Benefit is equal to the Participant's benefits under the PVP determined without regard to the limitations under Code sections 415 and 401(a)(17), reduced (but not below zero) by any benefit payable to or on account of the Participant under the PVP.
For Heritage BNA Participants, the Excess Benefit shall also include any benefit accrued as of June 30, 1999 under the Unfunded Supplemental Deferred Compensation Plan for Employees who are Participating in the Rockwell International Deferred Compensation Plan due to the failure to include deferred bonuses as compensation under the Boeing North American Retirement Plan, indexed after June 30, 1999 for increases in compensation in accordance with the provisions governing the Participant's Heritage Benefit under the PVP.
The Excess Benefit is not intended to duplicate any similarly determined benefit under any other non-qualified plan.
 
The Excess Benefit generally will be adjusted for a Participant's Commencement Date that is not his or her Normal Retirement Date according to the same rules governing such adjustments under the PVP.
However, where a Participant's Commencement Date occurs after January 1, 2008, and after April 1
st
of the Plan Year following the Plan Year in which he or she attains age 70
 1
/
2
, his or her Excess Benefit will be calculated as if the Participant's benefit under the PVP had not previously commenced.
 
The Excess Benefit will vest and be forfeited according to the same rules governing vesting and forfeitures under the PVP.
 
SECTION 6. PAYMENT OF BENEFITS
 
 
In general, a Participant's SERP Benefit will be paid in the form of a Single Life Annuity. Married Participants may elect at the time of commencement to receive the SERP Benefit in the form of either a Single Life Annuity or an Actuarially Equivalent Surviving Spouse Option (with a 50%, 75%, or 100% survivor benefit). Marital status will be determined at the time of commencement of benefits. To the extent a Participant does not elect a Surviving Spouse Option before the Commencement Date, the SERP Benefit will be paid in the form of a Single Life Annuity for unmarried Participants and in the form of a 50% Surviving Spouse Option for married Participants.
If the Participant receives his or her benefit in the form of a Surviving Spouse Option and survives his or her Spouse, the Participant's monthly payment will increase on a prospective basis, commencing as of the Spouse's death, to equal the monthly payment the Participant would have received had he or she been paid in the form of a Single Life Annuity.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, the SERP Benefit will be paid in a single lump sum if the Actuarial Equivalent present value is $15,000 or less as of the commencement date.
In the event that guidance issued by the IRS or Treasury Department under Code section 409A requires application of the aggregation rule provided under Treasury Regulation section 1.409A-3(j)(4)(v)(A) to a nondiscretionary cashout, the cashout described above will operate only to the extent that this aggregation rule is satisfied.
 
 
The SERP Benefit will be paid or commence as of the first day of the month following the later of the events described in (A) and (B) below.
(A) The Participant's attainment of age 55.
(B) The Participant's Separation from Service.
 
A special rule applies to a Heritage MDC Participant who Separates from Service after attaining age 50, and who has 30 years of Accumulated Benefit Service. For this Heritage MDC Participant, the SERP Benefit will be paid as of the first of the month following the Separation from Service.
See subsection (c) below for special timing rules applicable to Specified Employees.
 
Effective January 1, 2008, the SERP Benefit for a Participant who continues to work past age 70
 1
/
2
will be paid as of the first of the month following the Participant's Separation from Service. This rule does not apply to any Participant whose benefits commenced prior to January 1, 2008.
 
A Specified Employee will not receive any distribution under this Plan during the six-month period immediately following his or her Separation from Service.
The SERP Benefit of a Specified Employee will be calculated as of the first day of the month immediately following his or her Separation from Service (or age 55 if later). All payments missed during the six-month waiting period described above will be paid in a single sum after the completion of this six-month waiting period.
In the event of a Specified Employee's death during the six-month waiting period, the waiting period will cease to apply. The Specified Employee's benefits will be distributed in accordance with Section 6.B.2. (Death Benefits).
 
 
If a Participant dies before benefit commencement under the Plan, a death benefit based upon the Participant's accrued SERP Benefit at the time of death will be payable to his or her surviving Spouse, as of the first of the month following the Participant's death.
 
If a Participant dies after commencing a portion of his or her benefit, but less than the entire benefit, the survivor benefit described herein will apply solely to the portion of the benefit that has not yet commenced.
In general, where a Participant dies after attaining age 55, death benefits under this subsection B.1. will be paid to the Spouse in the form of a 100% Surviving Spouse Option. Where a Participant dies before attaining age 55, except as provided below, these death benefits will be paid in the form of a 50% Surviving Spouse Option.
A special rule applies to a Heritage MDC Participant who dies after attaining age 50. For this Heritage MDC Participant, death benefits under this subsection B.1. will be paid to the Spouse in the form of a 100% Surviving Spouse Option rather than a 50% Surviving Spouse Option.
Benefits payable in the form of a Surviving Spouse Option generally will be reduced by the appropriate actuarial factors under this Plan, based on whether the Participant satisfied the requirements for an Early Retirement Benefit or Vested Terminated Benefit at the time of death. Benefits payable before a Participant's earliest commencement date under Section 6.A.2.(a) will be further reduced below this age based on the Actuarial Equivalent factors used to calculate lump sum benefits under the PVP.
No death benefit will be payable to a non-Spouse.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, the SERP Benefit will be paid in a single lump sum if the Actuarial Equivalent present value is $15,000 or less as of the commencement date. In the event that guidance issued by the IRS or Treasury Department under Code section 409A requires application of the aggregation rule provided under Treasury Regulation section 1.409A-3(j)(4)(v)(A) to a nondiscretionary cashout, the cashout described above will operate only to the extent that this aggregation rule is satisfied.
 
If the Participant dies after his or her benefits commence, benefits will be paid in accordance with the form of benefits elected under Section 6.A.1. above.
If a Participant dies after commencing a portion of his or her benefit, but less than the entire benefit, the survivor benefit described herein will apply solely to the portion of the benefit that has already commenced.
If the surviving Spouse dies while receiving benefit payments, no further payments will be made to the Spouse's estate or beneficiaries.
 
Payment of benefits under this Article may be delayed to the extent permitted under Code section 409A, as determined by the Committee.
 
If a determination is made by the Internal Revenue Service that the benefit of any Participant (or his or her beneficiary) is subject to current income taxation under Code section 409A, then the taxable portion of such benefit will be immediately distributed to the Participant (or his or her beneficiary), notwithstanding the general timing rule described in Section 6.A.2. above.
 
SECTION 7. NONASSIGNABILITY
Except as otherwise provided herein, the SERP Benefit shall not be subject in any manner to anticipation, alienation, sale, transfer, assignment, pledge, charge, execution, attachment, garnishment or any other legal process. Any attempt to take any such action shall be void and shall authorize the Committee, in its sole and absolute discretion, to forfeit all further right and interest in any benefit under this Plan. The Committee may, however, recognize domestic relations orders, generally subject to the same rules and procedures governing qualified domestic relations orders under the PVP, and provided that any benefits transferred due to such domestic relations order shall reduce any benefits to which the Participant would otherwise be entitled under this Plan. Notwithstanding the foregoing, a domestic relations order will be recognized under this Plan solely to the extent that benefits commence to the alternate payee or beneficiary at the same time as benefit payments commence to the Participant. In addition, the SERP Benefit may be reduced by the amount of any tax obligation paid by the Company, its Affiliates or Subsidiaries on behalf of a Participant or surviving spouse if the Participant or surviving spouse fails to reimburse the Company or an Affiliate or Subsidiary for such obligation.
SECTION 8. UNFUNDED STATUS OF PLAN
No funds shall be segregated or earmarked for any current or former Participant, beneficiary or other person under the Plan. However, the Company may establish one or more trusts to assist in meeting its obligations under the Plan, the assets of which shall be subject to the claims of the Company's general creditors. No current or former Participant, beneficiary or other person, individually or as a member of a group, shall have any right, title or interest in any account, fund, grantor trust, or any asset that may be acquired by the Company or an Affiliate in respect of its obligations under the Plan (other than as a general creditor of the Company or such Affiliate with an unsecured claim against its general assets.
SECTION 9. ADMINISTRATION
The Plan shall be administered by the Committee. The Committee shall make such rules, interpretations, determinations of fact and computations as it may, in its sole and absolute discretion, deem appropriate. Any decision of the Committee with respect to the Plan, including (without limitation) any calculation of a benefit, shall be conclusive and binding on all persons.
SECTION 10. AMENDMENT AND TERMINATION
The Board of Directors of The Boeing Company shall have the authority to amend or terminate the Plan at any time. The Board of Directors of The Boeing Company may delegate the authority to amend the Plan at any time, in its sole discretion. Such amendment or termination shall not adversely affect or impair the benefit entitlements in course of payment to retired employees and surviving spouses, the contingent rights to the continuance of benefit payments of the spouses of retired employees named as joint annuitants, or the accrued benefit as defined in this Section of all eligible employees then in the employ of the Company.
 
For the purpose of this section, an accrued benefit will be determined for each eligible employee in accordance with the provisions of Sections 3 through 5 but based on Benefit Service, Total Average Compensation, Compensation and the accrued benefit provided by the PVP, all determined as of the effective date of the amendment or termination.
In general, upon the termination of the Plan with respect to any Participant, the affected Participants will not be entitled to receive a distribution until the time specified in Section 6. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Company may, in its discretion, terminate the entire Plan and pay each Participant a single lump-sum distribution of his or her entire accrued benefit to the extent permitted under conditions set forth in Code section 409A and IRS or Treasury guidance thereunder.
SECTION 11. DISTINCT STATUS OF PLANS
For purposes of Title I of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended, the Plan shall consist of the following three distinct employee benefit plans: (1) a plan granting the Supplemental Benefit; (2) a plan granting the portion of the Excess Benefit determined by disregarding the limitations imposed by section 415 of the Code; and (3) a plan granting the portion of the Excess Benefit determined by disregarding the limitations imposed by section 401(a)(17) of the Code.
SECTION 12. EMPLOYMENT RIGHTS
Nothing in the Plan shall be deemed to give any person any right to remain in the employ of the Company or affect any right of the Company to terminate a person's employment with or without cause.
SECTION 13. CLAIMS PROCEDURE
The procedures for making claims for benefits under the Plan and for having the denial of a benefits claim reviewed shall be the same as those procedures set forth in the PVP.
SECTION 14. COMPLIANCE WITH CODE SECTION 409A
It is intended that amounts deferred under this Plan will not be taxable under section 409A of the Code with respect to any individual. All provisions of this Plan shall be construed in a manner consistent with this intent.
SECTION 15. CONSTRUCTION
The validity of the Plan or any of its provisions will be determined under and will be construed according to federal law and, to the extent permissible, according to the internal laws of the state of Illinois. If any provision of the Plan is held illegal or invalid for any reason, such determination will not affect the remaining provisions of the Plan and the Plan will be construed and enforced as if said illegal or invalid provision had never been included.
 
SECTION 16. LEGAL ACTION
No legal action may be brought in court on a claim for benefits under the Plan after 180 days following the decision on appeal (or
180 days following the expiration of the time to make an appeal if no appeal is made).
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20080130095130.txt.gz
TIME:20080130095130
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
 
(a) On January 30, 2008, The Boeing Company issued a press release reporting its financial results for the fourth quarter of 2007.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
(a) Not applicable
 
(b) Not applicable
 
(c) Not applicable
 
(d) Exhibits
 
99.1    Press Release issued by The Boeing Company dated January 30, 2008, reporting Boeing's financial results for the fourth quarter of 2007.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Boeing Reports Record Revenues, Earnings, Cash Flow & Backlog for 2007
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 The Boeing Company's [NYSE: BA] 2007 net income increased 84 percent to a record $4.1 billion, or $5.28 per share, up from $2.2 billion, or $2.85 per share, in 2006 on higher commercial airplane deliveries, strong growth in defense earnings, companywide productivity improvements, and certain charges recorded in 2006 (Table 1). Revenue rose 8 percent to a record $66.4 billion, while the operating margin expanded to 8.8 percent driven by double-digit margins in its commercial airplanes and defense businesses.
CHICAGO, January 30, 2008
Fourth-quarter revenue held at $17.5 billion while the operating margin increased to 8.7 percent driven by margin expansion in its core businesses. Operating earnings grew 32 percent, while earnings per share increased 5 percent to $1.36 per share affected by a higher effective tax rate.
 
Boeing raised its 2008 earnings per share guidance to between $5.70 and $5.85, as productivity gains are being realized ahead of earlier plans.
"Our 2007 results demonstrate the kind of quality financial performance we can achieve through our simultaneous focus on growth and productivity," said Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer Jim McNerney. "We added substantial backlog, made major efficiency gains, and executed well on our production and services programs. Despite some development program challenges, we are a strong company growing stronger, and we expect continued improvement in our financial results in 2008 and beyond."
Full-year operating cash flow grew 28 percent to a record $9.6 billion, reflecting strong operating earnings, higher commercial airplane orders, and a decrease in working capital requirements. Free cash flow* increased 35 percent to a record $7.9 billion (Table 2). Total company backlog at year-end reached a record $327 billion, up 31 percent in the last twelve months driven by commercial airplane orders and defense program wins.
 
 
Cash and investments in marketable securities totaled $12.1 billion at year-end, up 30 percent from the same period last year and down slightly from the end of the third quarter (Table 3). During the fourth quarter, the company increased its share repurchase authorization by $7 billion and spent $890 million for 9.4 million shares. Share repurchases for the year totaled $2.8 billion for 29.0 million shares. Also in the fourth quarter, the company increased its dividend by 14 percent. Consolidated debt decreased 5 percent as Boeing Capital Corporation repaid maturing debt.
Table 3. Cash, Marketable Securities and Debt Balances
 
 
 
Segment Results
Commercial Airplanes
Boeing Commercial Airplanes (BCA) fourth-quarter revenues increased 17 percent to $8.9 billion on a 9 percent increase in deliveries, to 112 airplanes, and higher commercial aviation services revenue (Table 4). Operating earnings grew 46 percent to $973 million on favorable product mix, and operating margins expanded to 11.0 percent. Margins in the latest quarter primarily reflect higher operating leverage and expanding productivity.
 
For the full year, BCA revenues rose 17 percent to $33.4 billion on an 11 percent increase in airplane deliveries and higher services volume. Operating earnings grew 31 percent to $3.6 billion while margins expanded to 10.7 percent, driven by higher delivery volume and services sales, partially offset by increased R&D spending.
BCA booked 520 gross orders during the quarter and a record 1,423 during the year. Contractual backlog rose to a record $255 billion, increasing 46 percent in 2007 to more than seven times BCA's annual revenues.
Progress on the new 787 Dreamliner continues on the revised schedule announced earlier this month. Boeing continues to address challenges associated with assembly of the first airplanes, including start-up issues in our factory and in our extended global supply chain. The company expects the first flight to occur around the end of the second quarter of 2008 with first delivery in early 2009. The program won a record 369 787 orders in 2007, bringing total firm orders since launch to 857 airplanes from 56 customers.
 
Integrated Defense Systems
Boeing Integrated Defense Systems (IDS) expanded operating margins more than 100 basis points to 11.7 percent in the fourth-quarter on revenue of $8.4 billion. Revenues declined from the same period last year driven by timing of aircraft deliveries and the December 2006 formation of the United Launch Alliance (ULA) joint venture.
For the full year, IDS grew operating earnings by 13 percent to $3.4 billion and expanded operating margins to 10.7 percent on revenues of $32.1 billion. IDS results reflect strong execution in all segments and extensive productivity improvements. During the year, IDS won nine out of eleven significant competitions, demonstrating the value its defense products provide to customers worldwide.
Table 5. Integrated Defense Systems Operating Results
 
Precision Engagement & Mobility Systems expanded fourth-quarter operating margin to 11.0 percent on lower revenue of $3.6 billion. Margin results were driven by strong execution across aircraft production programs, including EA-18G and C-17. The change in revenues reflects lower aircraft deliveries compared to the year-ago period.
Network & Space Systems achieved significant milestones on several key programs. Operating margin expanded to 10.2 percent in the quarter driven by strong performance across the segment's broad array of programs, including Future Combat Systems and Ground-based Midcourse Defense, which captured 100 percent of award fees. Revenues fell to $2.9 billion on the removal of ULA-reported revenue.
Support Systems again generated strong profits on its broad portfolio of services and logistics programs. Operating margin grew to 15.4 percent on solid program execution and contract mix, while revenues for the quarter fell to $1.9 billion on lower volume and timing of aircraft modifications.
 
IDS' backlog at quarter-end grew to $71.7 billion reflecting new orders that exceeded current-period revenues. Significant new orders in the quarter include the Tracking & Data Relay Satellites, Singapore F-15SGs and Ares I Instrument Unit Avionics award.
Boeing Capital Corporation
Boeing Capital Corporation (BCC) reported fourth-quarter pre-tax earnings of $30 million compared to $37 million in the same period last year which included a larger portfolio (Table 6). BCC's portfolio balance at the end of the quarter was $6.5 billion, down from $8.0 billion at the beginning of the year primarily on normal portfolio run-off, customer prepayments and depreciation. BCC contributed $92 million in cash dividends to the company during the quarter and $408 million in 2007. BCC's debt-to-equity ratio remained steady at 5.0-to-1.
Table 6. Boeing Capital Corporation Operating Results
 
Additional Information
The "Other" segment consists primarily of Boeing Engineering, Operations and Technology and the Connexion business (which was exited at the end of 2006), as well as certain results related to the consolidation of all business units. Other segment expense was $165 million in the fourth quarter, up from $93 million of expense in the same period last year due to higher environmental remediation expenses.
Unallocated share-based-plans expense was $6 million, down from $140 million in the same period last year due to changes in the company's long-term compensation plans implemented in 2006. Reversal of deferred compensation expense recorded earlier in the year contributed $66 million to earnings due to a lower share price and broad stock market conditions. Pension expense for the quarter rose $80 million to $301 million, of which $141 million was recorded in unallocated expense, and the balance was recorded as expense at BCA and IDS. At year-end, Boeing's pension plans were more than fully funded at 110 percent of the projected benefit obligation.
 
Outlook
The company's financial guidance summarized in Table 7 reflects strong business performance forecasts at IDS and BCA, increasing commercial airplane deliveries, continued investment in new airplane development and company-wide productivity gains. As previously disclosed, Boeing will provide complete financial guidance for 2009 when the company issues its first-quarter 2008 earnings report in late April, which will follow the assessment of the impact of the previously announced 787 schedule changes.
Boeing's 2008 revenue guidance is now between $67 billion and $68 billion, down from between $67.5 billion and $68.5 billion due to the 787 delay. Earnings-per-share guidance for 2008 is raised to $5.70 to $5.85 per share, from $5.55 to $5.75 per share, as productivity gains are being realized ahead of earlier plans. Operating cash flow guidance for 2008 is reduced to greater than $2.5 billion reflecting the 787 schedule, from greater than $3 billion.
For 2009, the outlook for the company's defense business and in-production commercial airplane programs remains very strong. As a result, the company continues to expect strong earnings per share growth in 2009.
Commercial Airplanes now expects to deliver between 475 and 480 airplanes in 2008 and is sold out, down slightly from 480 to 490 airplanes to reflect the rescheduling of initial 787 deliveries into 2009. BCA revenue guidance for 2008 is now $34.5 billion to $35 billion, down from $35 billion to $36 billion, and operating margin guidance is increased to approximately 11.5 percent from approximately 11 percent as productivity gains are being realized ahead of earlier plans.
IDS revenue guidance for 2008 is unchanged at $32 billion to $33 billion. Guidance for 2008 IDS operating margin is unchanged at approximately 10.5 percent.
Boeing's total R&D forecast for 2008 is unchanged at between $3.2 billion and $3.4 billion, a decline of approximately 14 percent from the 2007 level. Annual capital expenditures are expected to be approximately $1.8 billion in 2008.
 
The company's non-cash pension expense is expected to be approximately $0.8 billion for 2008. Discretionary funding of Boeing's pension plans in 2008 is expected to be approximately $500 million.
 
 
 
Non-GAAP Measure Disclosure
Management believes that the non-GAAP (Generally Accepted Accounting Principles) measures (indicated by an asterisk *) used in this report provide investors with important perspectives into the company's ongoing business performance. The company does not intend for the information to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the related GAAP measures. Other companies may define the measures differently. The following definitions are provided:
Adjusted Earnings per Share
Adjusted earnings per share is defined as GAAP adjusted for certain significant charges or credits. Management believes adjusted earnings per share is important to understanding the company's on-going operations and provide additional insights into underlying business performance. Significant charges or credits are described in the attachments to this release which provide reconciliations between GAAP earnings per share and adjusted earnings per share.
diluted earnings per share
Free Cash Flow
Free cash flow is defined as GAAP less capital expenditures for . Management believes free cash flow provides investors with an important perspective on the cash available for shareholders, debt repayment, and acquisitions after making the capital investments required to support ongoing business operations and long term value creation. Free cash flow does not represent the residual cash flow available for discretionary expenditures as it excludes certain mandatory expenditures such as repayment of maturing debt. Management uses free cash flow internally to assess both business performance and overall liquidity. Table 2 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and free cash flow.
operating cash flow
property, plant and equipment additions
 
Certain statements in this report may constitute "forward-looking" statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Forward-looking statements in this press release include, among others, statements regarding future results as a result of our growth and productivity initiatives, our 2007 and 2008 financial outlook and the benefits of the IDS structure. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions as to future events that may not prove to be accurate. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak only as of the date they were made and we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise. Our actual results and future trends may differ materially depending on a variety of factors, including the continued operation, viability and growth of major airline customers and non-airline customers (such as the U.S. Government); adverse developments in the value of collateral securing customer and other financings; the occurrence of any significant collective bargaining labor dispute; our successful execution of internal performance plans including our company-wide growth and productivity initiatives, production rate increases and decreases (including any reduction in or termination of an aircraft product), availability of raw materials, acquisition and divestiture plans, and other cost-reduction and productivity efforts; charges from any future SFAS No. 142 review; ability to meet development, production and certification schedules for the 787 program and the ability to meet scheduled deliveries of the 787 airplane; technical or quality issues in development programs (affecting schedule and cost estimates) or in the satellite industry; an adverse development in rating agency credit ratings or assessments; the actual outcomes of certain pending sales campaigns and U.S. and foreign government procurement activities, including the uncertainty associated with the procurement of tankers by the U.S. Department of Defense (DoD) and funding of the C-17 program; the cyclical nature of some of our businesses; unanticipated financial market changes which may impact pension plan assumptions; domestic and international competition in the defense, space and commercial areas; continued integration of acquired businesses; performance issues with key suppliers, subcontractors and customers; significant disruption to air travel worldwide (including future terrorist attacks); global trade policies; worldwide political stability; domestic and international economic conditions; price escalation; the outcome of political and legal processes, changing priorities or reductions in the U.S. Government or foreign government defense and space budgets; termination of government or commercial contracts due to unilateral government or customer action or failure to perform; legal, financial and governmental risks related to international transactions; legal and investigatory proceedings; tax settlements with the IRS and various states; U.S. Air Force review of previously awarded contracts; costs associated with the exit of the Connexion by Boeing business; and other economic, political and technological risks and uncertainties. Additional information regarding these factors is contained in our SEC filings, including, without limitation, our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2006 and our Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarters ended March 31, 2007, June 30, 2007 and September 30, 2007.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
In addition to disclosing results that are determined in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), the company also discloses non-GAAP results that exclude certain significant charges or credits that are important to an understanding of the company's ongoing operations. The company provides reconciliations of its non-GAAP financial reporting to the most comparable GAAP reporting. The company believes that discussion of results excluding certain significant charges or credits provides additional insights into underlying business performance. Adjusted earnings per share is not a measure recognized under GAAP. The determination of significant charges or credits may not be comparable to similarly titled measures used by other companies and may vary from quarter to quarter.
 
 
 
In addition to disclosing results that are determined in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), the company also discloses non-GAAP results that exclude certain significant charges or credits that are important to an understanding of the company's ongoing operations. The company provides reconciliations of its non-GAAP financial reporting to the most comparable GAAP reporting. The company believes that discussion of results excluding certain significant charges or credits provides additional insights into underlying business performance. Adjusted earnings per share is not a measure recognized under GAAP. The determination of significant charges or credits may not be comparable to similarly titled measures used by other companies and may vary from quarter to quarter.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20080318150542.txt.gz
TIME:20080318150542
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(e) On March 13, 2008, The Boeing Company (the "Company") and W. James McNerney, Jr. ("Mr. McNerney") entered into an amended and restated Executive Employment Agreement (the "Amended Executive Employment Agreement") dated as of March 13, 2008 and effective January 1, 2008 to conform the employment agreement between the Company and Mr. McNerney dated as of June 29, 2005 to the requirements of final regulations and transitional guidance promulgated under Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
The foregoing description of the Amended Executive Employment Agreement is qualified in its entirety by reference to that agreement, which is filed as Exhibit 10.1 to this Form 8-K and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
(d) .
Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: March 18, 2008
 

Exhibit 10.1
EXECUTION VERSION
(the "") dated as of March 13, 2008, between The Boeing Company, a Delaware corporation (the ""), and W. James McNerney, Jr. (the "").
AMENDED AND RESTATED EXECUTIVE EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENT
Agreement
Company
Executive
, the Company and the Executive entered into an employment agreement dated as of June 29, 2005 ("");
WHEREAS
Prior Agreement
, the Company desires to continue to employ the Executive as Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company;
WHEREAS
, the Company and the Executive desire to amend and restate the Prior Agreement, effective January 1, 2008, so as to conform the existing terms of his employment with Section 409A ("") of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (""), by the Company and otherwise effective on the date hereof;
WHEREAS
409A
Code
, in consideration of the foregoing, of the mutual promises contained herein and of other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto hereby agree as follows:
NOW THEREFORE
1. .
POSITION/DUTIES
(a) During the Employment Term (as defined in Section 2 below), the Executive shall serve as the Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company. In this capacity the Executive shall have such duties, authorities and responsibilities commensurate with the duties, authorities and responsibilities of persons in similar capacities in similarly sized companies and such other duties and responsibilities as the Board of Directors of the Company (the "") shall designate that are consistent with the Executive's position as Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company. The Executive shall report exclusively to the Board.
Board
(b) During the Employment Term, the Executive shall devote substantially all of his business time (excluding periods of vacation and other approved leaves of absence) to the performance of his duties with the Company, provided the foregoing shall not prevent the Executive from (i) participating in charitable, civic, educational, professional, community or industry affairs or, with prior written approval of the Board, serving on the board of directors or advisory boards of other companies; and (ii) managing his and his family's personal investments, so long as such activities do not materially interfere with the performance of his duties hereunder or create a potential business conflict or the appearance thereof. If at any time service on any board of directors or advisory board would, in the good faith judgment of the Board, conflict with the Executive's fiduciary duty to the Company or create any appearance thereof, the Executive shall, as soon as reasonably practicable considering any fiduciary duty to the other entity, resign from such other board of directors or advisory board after written notice of the conflict is received from the Board. Service on the boards of directors or advisory boards disclosed by the Executive to the Company on which he is serving as of the Effective Date are hereby approved.
(c) During the Employment Term, the Board shall nominate the Executive for re-election as a member of the Board at the expiration of each then-current term.
(d) The Executive further agrees to serve without additional compensation as an officer and director of any of the Company's subsidiaries and agrees that any amounts received from such corporation may be offset against the amounts due hereunder. In addition, it is agreed that the Company may assign the Executive to one of its subsidiaries for payroll purposes, but such assignment shall not relieve the Company of its obligations hereunder.
2. . The Executive's term of employment under this Agreement (such term of employment, as it may be extended or terminated, is herein referred to as the "") shall be for the unexpired period of the initial term commencing on July 1, 2005 (the "") and, unless terminated earlier as provided in Section 7 hereof, ending on the third anniversary of the Effective Date (the ""), provided that effective beginning on the first anniversary of the Effective Date, the Employment Term shall automatically be extended by one (1) day for each day that passes, so that the Employment Term shall always be two (2) years, until such time as either the Company or the Executive gives notice to the other that the Employment Term shall cease to be so extended, subject to earlier termination as provided in Section 7 hereof.
EMPLOYMENT TERM
Employment Term
Effective Date
Original Employment Term
3. . The Company agrees to pay the Executive a base salary (the "") at an annual rate of not less than $1,750,000, payable in accordance with the regular payroll practices of the Company, but not less frequently than monthly. The Executive's Base Salary shall be subject to annual review by the Board (or a committee thereof) and may be increased, but not decreased, from time to time by the Board. No increase to Base Salary shall be used to offset or otherwise reduce any obligations of the Company to the Executive hereunder or otherwise. The base salary as determined herein from time to time shall constitute "Base Salary" for purposes of this Agreement.
BASE SALARY
Base Salary
4. . During the Employment Term, the Executive shall be eligible to participate in the Company's bonus and other incentive compensation plans and programs for the Company's senior executives at a level commensurate with his position. The Executive shall have the opportunity to earn an annual target bonus measured against objective financial criteria to be determined by the Board (or a committee thereof) of at least 170% of Base Salary, with a maximum annual bonus of 230% of Base Salary and a potential reduced bonus for achievements below target in accordance with the applicable bonus plan. Annual bonuses payable to Executive for the performance years 2007 through 2010 shall be fully paid in cash; beginning with the 2011 performance year and for all performance years thereafter, the Executive's annual bonus shall be paid to the Executive in the same form (and subject to the same terms) as are annual bonuses earned by and paid to other senior executives of the Company.
ANNUAL BONUS
 
5. .
EQUITY AWARDS
(a) .
BUY-OUT RESTRICTED STOCK GRANTS
(i) The Company granted the Executive as of the Effective Date an equity award of 159,000 shares of restricted stock, of which 40% of the award is vested and unrestricted on the date of this Agreement and the unvested portion of which shall vest and the restrictions thereon shall lapse 20% of the award on each of May 10, 2008, May 10, 2009 and May 10, 2010, provided that the Executive is continuously employed with the Company through each such vesting date hereafter for such restricted shares to vest (except as otherwise provided herein).
(ii) The Company granted the Executive as of the Effective Date an equity award of 162,000 shares of restricted stock, of which 50% of the award is vested and unrestricted on the date of this Agreement and the unvested portion of which shall vest and the restrictions thereon shall lapse 16 2/3% of the award on each of January 1, 2009, January 1, 2010 and January 1, 2011, provided that the Executive is continuously employed with the Company through each such vesting date for such restricted shares to vest (except as otherwise provided herein).
(iii) The Company granted the Executive as of the Effective Date an award of 70,000 shares of restricted stock, of which 66 2/3% of the award is vested and unrestricted on the date of this Agreement and the unvested portion of which shall vest and the restrictions thereon shall lapse on the third anniversary of the Effective Date, provided that the Executive is continuously employed with the Company through each such vesting date for such restricted shares to vest (except as otherwise provided herein).
(iv) The restricted stock awards granted to the Executive pursuant to Section 5(a)(i), (ii) and (iii) are, collectively, the "."
Buy-Out Restricted Stock Awards
(v) The Executive will receive fully vested dividend equivalents in cash on the Buy-Out Restricted Stock Awards as and when declared and paid.
(vi) The Buy-Out Restricted Stock Awards were granted pursuant to and, to the extent not contrary to the terms of the Prior Agreement, shall be subject to all of the terms and conditions imposed upon such awards granted under The Boeing Company 2003 Incentive Stock Plan (the "").
Plan
(vii) Award agreements memorializing the grants of the Buy-Out Restricted Stock Awards were executed by the parties as provided in the Prior Agreement. The Buy-Out Restricted Stock Awards shall be subject to no forfeiture provisions (except as set forth in this Agreement) and shall be adjusted in the same manner as any other outstanding stock in connection with any stock split, stock dividend or other recapitalization or any corporate transaction. The Executive may reduce the number of shares upon vesting to cover the minimum required tax withholding. The Company represents and warrants that (A) the shares were issued under the Plan, (B) the Plan and the Buy-Out Restricted Stock Awards are covered under a Form S-8 (which shall continue to be maintained so that the Executive can resell the shares on a current basis once vested), (C) there were adequate shares available under the Plan for the issuance of the Buy-Out Restricted Stock Awards and (D) the Plan permits the contemplated provisions of such grants.
 
(b) . The Executive will participate in all Company long term incentive programs extended to senior executives of the Company generally at levels commensurate with the Executive's position.
FUTURE EQUITY AWARDS
(c) . The Executive shall be subject to, and shall comply with, the stock ownership guidelines of the Company as may be in effect from time to time; provided that the Buy-Out Restricted Stock Awards shall be included as Company stock owned by the Executive for purposes of such guidelines.
STOCK OWNERSHIP
6. .
EMPLOYEE BENEFITS
(a) . The Executive shall be entitled to participate in all employee and executive benefit plans of the Company including, but not limited to, equity, pension, thrift, profit sharing, 401(k), medical coverage, education, or other retirement or welfare benefits that the Company has adopted or may adopt, maintain or contribute to for the benefit of its senior executives at a level commensurate with his positions subject to satisfying the applicable eligibility requirements. Such benefits, in the aggregate, shall be no less favorable than the level of benefits in effect on the Effective Date; provided, however, that in the event there is a reduction of employee benefits applicable to senior executives generally, nothing herein shall preclude the Company's ability to reduce the Executive's benefits consistent with such reduction. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, during the Employment Term, the Company will provide the Executive with universal life insurance providing a death benefit of at least $16,400,000 at the premium level expense for such coverage (or reimbursement to the Executive for such coverage) in effect on the date hereof, but not to exceed $262,937 annually, through use of existing policies or such other arrangements as mutually agreed by the Company and the Executive.
BENEFIT PLANS
(b) .
SUPPLEMENTAL RETIREMENT BENEFIT
(i) The Executive will receive a supplemental pension benefit ("") in an amount equal to (A) the Hypothetical Prior Employer Pension Benefits, minus (B) the sum of the Actual Company Pension Benefits, Actual Prior Employer Pension Benefits, and benefits paid or payable to the Executive under any other employer's qualified and non-qualified defined benefit pension plan with respect to service prior to the Effective Date. If the remainder is zero or less, no amount shall be payable by the Company hereunder.
Supplemental Pension
(ii) The Supplemental Pension will vest on the Effective Date. Notwithstanding, the Supplemental Pension benefit will be forfeited (and any amount paid to the Executive shall be promptly refunded to the Company) upon the Executive's Separation from Service (as hereinafter defined) without Good Reason (as hereinafter defined), before the third (3rd) anniversary of the Effective Date, to accept employment or any other position with in either case substantially comparable compensation elsewhere at any time within one (1) year after such Separation from Service.
 
(iii) The Supplemental Pension will be payable as of the date of Executive's Separation from Service or an earlier 409A Change in Control (both such terms as hereinafter defined; and, for the avoidance of doubt, no further amount shall be payable upon any Separation from Service occurring after a 409A Change in Control), or such later date as required under 409A, in a lump sum equal to the Actuarial Equivalent present value of an annuity, based on the accrued vested benefit due under the first sentence of Section 6(b)(i), determined as of the date payment is due. If the Executive is a Specified Employee (as hereinafter defined) as of his Separation from Service, the Supplemental Pension shall be paid in a lump sum or payments will commence, as provide herein, to the Executive on the date that is the first day of the seventh (7
th
) month after the date of his Separation from Service or, if earlier, the date of the Executive's death following such Separation from Service (with the amount of such Actuarial Equivalent lump sum (or other form of payment as may be provided, below) calculated as of such payment date as if such date was the date of Separation from Service) (the ""). In the event of a Separation from Service by reason of the Executive's death or the Executive's death after a Separation from Service but before payments under this Section 6(b)(iii), the amount of such lump sum payment to the beneficiary designated by the Executive in writing to the Company during his lifetime (or, if no such beneficiary is designated, to the Executive's estate) shall equal the lump sum payment that would have been payable to the Executive if he had been alive on the date of payment. The Supplemental Pension benefit may, at the election of the Executive (made in accordance with 409A), also be paid in the form of a mutually agreeable commercially available annuity, life insurance contract or such other Actuarially Equivalent mutually agreeable forms. The parties acknowledge that, prior to December 31, 2007, the Executive elected, and the Company agreed, to change the form of payment to the form of fifteen (15) equal annual installments, by executing a mutually acceptable payment election form with the Company. During the period January 1, 2008 through December 31, 2008, in allowable circumstances under 409A, as determined by the Board, the Executive shall be permitted to elect to change the form of payment to another form of payment permitted under this Section 6(b)(iii), provided that such election shall not provide for any payment during 2008 not otherwise then payable hereunder and shall not postpone any payment otherwise payable during 2008 hereunder. In addition to the right of the Executive to make an election under the immediately preceding sentence, on or after January 1, 2008 Executive may elect to change the form of payment under this Section 6(b)(iii), by executing a mutually acceptable payment election form with the Company, provided that, to the extent required by 409A and except as provided in the preceding sentence, such payment election form (A) shall be executed at least twelve (12) months prior to the date payment was otherwise scheduled to be made, (B) shall not take effect until at least twelve (12) months after the date on which the election is made, and (C) shall specify a payment or payment commencement date that is at least five (5) years after the date payment was otherwise scheduled to be made or commenced.
Six-Month Delay Requirement
 
(iv) For purposes of this Agreement, the terms set forth below have the following meanings:
(A) "" means a single life annuity amount commencing at age sixty-two (62) and payable in monthly installments to the Executive for his life of the Actuarial Equivalent of the amounts that the Executive has actually received, or is entitled to receive, from the Company's qualified and non-qualified defined benefit pension plans.
Actual Company Pension Benefits
(B) "" means a single life annuity amount commencing at age sixty-two (62) and payable in monthly installments to the Executive for his life of the Actuarial Equivalent of the amounts that the Executive has actually received, or is entitled to receive, from the Prior Employers' qualified and non-qualified defined benefit pension plans.
Actual Prior Employer Pension Benefits
(C) "" of any amount shall be determined in accordance with generally accepted actuarial principles using interest rate, mortality and other methods and assumptions that the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation ("") would have used in determining the value of an immediate annuity payment of benefits with regard to terminations of plans immediately prior to enactment of the Retirement Protection Act of 1994, or if such interest rate and mortality assumptions are no longer published by the PBGC, interest rate and mortality assumptions determined in a manner as similar as practicable to the manner by which the PBGC's interest rate and mortality assumptions were determined immediately prior to the PBGC's cessation of publication of such assumptions.
Actuarial Equivalent
PBGC
(D) "" means a Change of Control (as defined herein) that also constitutes a change in the ownership or effective control of the Company or a sale of a substantial portion of the assets of the Company, in accordance with the requirements of Code Section 409A(a)(2)(A)(v) and Treas. Reg. 1.409A-3(i)(5) (or any successor provision) thereunder.
409A Change in Control
(E) "" means the Executive's average annual compensation for the three (3) consecutive calendar years out of the last ten (10) calendar years preceding his Separation from Service or Change of Control, as the case may be, during which such average is the highest. For purposes of determining the Executive's Highest Average Annual Compensation, compensation paid by the Company or the Prior Employers shall be taken into account to the same extent as such compensation would have been taken into account for purposes of such determination under the General Electric Company qualified and non-qualified defined benefit pension plans as in effect on December 31, 2000 if such compensation were with or paid by the General Electric Company. In addition, solely for purposes of calculating the Executive's average annual compensation, in the event of an involuntary Separation from Service without Cause (as hereinafter defined) or a Separation from Service for
Highest Average Annual Compensation
 
Good Reason (as hereinafter defined), in which the Executive is entitled to severance benefits under this Agreement, applicable Company plans or otherwise, the Executive shall be treated as having earned any severance paid to the Executive ratably over the course of the period to which it relates (e.g., two (2) years for severance equal to two (2) years of base salary).
(F) "" means a benefit payable in the form of a single life annuity amount commencing at age 62 and payable in monthly installments for the Executive's life equal to one-twelfth (1/12th) multiplied by fifty percent (50%) of the Executive's Highest Average Annual Compensation. Provided, upon a Separation from Service of the Executive for any reason prior to January 1, 2011, the Executive's Hypothetical Prior Employer Pension Benefits will be reduced so that he receives a prorated Supplemental Pension, determined by multiplying the Supplemental Pension benefit amount, as determined under the preceding sentence, by a fraction (not to exceed 1.0) the numerator of which is the sum of (x) five (5) plus (y) the number of the Executive's whole and partial Years of Service with the Company as of the date of the Separation from Service, and the denominator of which is ten (10).
Hypothetical Prior Employer Pension Benefits
(G) The "" means the 3M Corporation and the General Electric Company.
Prior Employers
(H) "" or "" means the Executive's death, retirement or termination of employment from the Company and all subsidiaries and affiliates, within the meaning of 409A; provided, however, that the foregoing shall not, alone, include the Executive's service as a director of the Company or any of its subsidiaries or affiliates. For purposes of determining whether a Separation from Service has occurred, subsidiaries and affiliates of the Company are only those included by using the language "at least eighty percent (80%)" to define the controlled group under Code Section 1563(a) in lieu of the fifty percent (50%) default rule stated in Treas. Reg. 1.409A-1(h)(3). A "" shall be deemed to include a reasonably anticipated permanent reduction in the level of services performed by the Executive, to less than fifty percent (50%) of the average level of services performed by the Executive during the thirty-six (36)-month period immediately preceding such separation.
Separation from Service
Separates from Service
Separation from Service
(I) The Executive is a "" if on the date of his Separation from Service he is a "specified employee" within the meaning of 409A and Treas. Reg. 1.409A-1(i) (or any successor provision). For such purpose, the "specified employee" identification date shall be December 31, the "specified employee" effective date shall be the April 1 following such December 31 and the seventy-five (75) top-paid officers of the Company (and its subsidiaries and affiliates, provided above) shall be treated as within the definition of Specified Employee.
Specified Employee
 
(J) "" means the twelve (12)-month period beginning on January 1, 2006 and each twelve (12)-month period beginning on each anniversary thereof in which the Executive remains continuously employed by the Company. For such purpose, "Years of Service" will be measured from January 1 of each year following the Effective Date. In the event of an involuntary Separation from Service without Cause or a Separation from Service for Good Reason, in which the Executive is entitled to severance benefits under this Agreement, applicable Company plans or otherwise, the Executive shall also be credited with an additional number of Years of Service equal to the period over which any such severance relates (e.g., two (2) Years of Service for severance equal to two (2) years of base salary).
Year of Service
(c) . The Executive shall be entitled to annual paid vacation in accordance with the Company's policy applicable to senior executives, but in no event less than four (4) weeks per calendar year (as prorated for partial years), which vacation may be taken at such times as the Executive elects with due regard to the needs of the Company.
VACATIONS
(d) . The Company shall provide to the Executive all employee and executive perquisites which other senior executives of the Company are generally entitled to receive, in accordance with Company policy set by the Board from time to time, including (i) business and personal use of Company plane (pursuant to security policy); (ii) club memberships (initiation and dues); (iii) leased automobile; and (iv) financial services allowance.
PERQUISITES
(e) . Upon presentation of appropriate documentation, the Executive shall be promptly reimbursed in accordance with the Company's expense reimbursement policy for all reasonable and necessary business and entertainment expenses incurred in connection with the performance of his duties hereunder.
BUSINESS AND ENTERTAINMENT EXPENSES
(f) . [Intentionally Omitted]
RELOCATION
(g) . Upon completion of five (5) years of continuous employment with the Company from the Effective Date, the Executive will be deemed retiree eligible under all welfare benefit, equity and other incentive plans and programs applicable to senior executives of the Company with regard to any termination thereafter. The Company may amend or terminate any and all such benefits plans and programs (other than respecting the Executive's eligibility) at any time and from time to time.
RETIREE BENEFITS
7. . The Executive's employment and the Employment Term shall terminate, and the Executive shall Separate from Service, on the first of the following to occur:
TERMINATION
(a) . Upon written notice by the Company to the Executive of termination due to Disability, while the Executive remains Disabled. For purposes of this Agreement, "Disability" shall be defined as the inability of the Executive to have performed his material duties hereunder due to a physical or mental injury, infirmity or incapacity for 180 days (including weekends and holidays) in any 365-day period. The existence or nonexistence of a physical or mental injury, infirmity or incapacity shall be determined by an independent physician mutually agreed to by the Company and the Executive (provided that neither party shall unreasonably withhold their agreement).
DISABILITY
 
(b) . Automatically on the date of death of the Executive.
DEATH
(c) . Immediately upon written notice by the Company to the Executive of a termination for Cause.
CAUSE
(i) "" shall mean any of the following:
Cause
(A) the Executive's conviction of:
(a) a felony, or
(b) a misdemeanor excluding a petty offense (as defined in Illinois or a comparable misdemeanor under the laws of another state) involving fraud, dishonesty or moral turpitude,
other than Limited Vicarious Liability or a routine traffic violation,
(B) the Executive's material breach of this Agreement, provided that such breach is not cured within ten (10) days after delivery to the Executive of a notice from the Board requesting cure,
(C) the willful or intentional material misconduct by the Executive in the performance of his duties under this Agreement, including a material breach of the Company's Code of Conduct which is willful or intentional material misconduct, or
(D) the willful or intentional failure by the Executive to materially comply (to the best of his ability) with a specific, written direction of the Board that is consistent with normal business practice and not inconsistent with this Agreement and the Executive's responsibilities hereunder, provided that such refusal or failure (i) is not cured to the best of the Executive's ability within ten (10) days after the delivery thereof to the Executive and (ii) is not based on the Executive's good faith belief, as expressed by written notice to the Board given within such ten (10)-day period, that the implementation of such direction of the Board would be unlawful or unethical.
(ii) For purposes of Section 7(c)(i), "" shall mean any liability which is (A) based on acts of the Company for which the Executive is responsible solely as a result of his office(s) with the Company and (B) provided that (x) he was not directly involved in such acts and either had no prior knowledge of such intended actions or promptly acted reasonably and in good faith to attempt to prevent the acts causing such liability or (y) he did not have a reasonable basis to believe that a law was being violated by such acts.
Limited Vicarious Liability
 
(iii) For purposes of clause (B) and (C) of Section 7(c)(i) above, "Cause" shall not include any one or more of the following:
(A) bad judgment,
(B) negligence,
(C) any act or omission that the Executive believed in good faith to have been in or not opposed to the interest of the Company (without intent of the Executive to gain therefrom, directly or indirectly, a profit to which he was not legally entitled), or
(D) any act or omission of which any member of the Board who is not a party to such act or omission has had actual knowledge for at least six (6) months.
(iv) The Company may not terminate the Executive's employment for Cause unless:
(A) no fewer than thirty (30) days prior to the date of termination, the Company provides the Executive with written notice (the "Notice of Consideration") of its intent to consider termination of the Executive's employment for Cause, including a detailed description of the specific reasons which form the basis for such consideration;
(B) after providing Notice of Consideration, the Board may, by the affirmative vote of a majority of its members (excluding for this purpose the Executive if he is a member of the Board, any other management member of the Board and any other member of the Board reasonably believed by the Board to be involved in the events leading to the Notice of Consideration), suspend the Executive with pay until a final determination pursuant to this Section has been made;
(C) on a date designated in the Notice of Consideration, which date shall be at least thirty (30) days following the date the Notice of Consideration is provided, the Executive shall have the opportunity to appear before the Board, with or without legal representation, at the Executive's election, to present arguments and evidence on his own behalf; and
(D) following the presentation to the Board as provided in (C) above or the Executive's failure to appear before the Board at the date and time specified in the Notice of Consideration, the Executive may be terminated for Cause only if the Board, by the two-thirds (2/3) vote of its members (excluding the Executive if he is a member of the Board, any other management member of the Board and any other member of the Board reasonably believed by the Board to be involved in the events leading the Board to consider terminating the Executive for Cause), determines that the actions or inactions of the Executive specified in the Notice of Consideration occurred, that such actions or inactions constitute Cause, and that the Executive's employment should accordingly be terminated for Cause.
 
(d) . Upon written notice by the Company to the Executive of an involuntary termination without Cause, other than for death or Disability.
WITHOUT CAUSE
(e) . Upon written notice by the Executive to the Company of a termination for Good Reason that he intends to terminate his employment hereunder for one of the reasons set forth below. "" means the occurrence of any one of the following events, unless the Executive specifically agrees in writing that such event shall not be Good Reason:
GOOD REASON
Good Reason
(i) any material breach of the Agreement by the Company, including:
(A) the material failure of the Company to comply with the provisions of Sections 1(a), 1(c), 2, 3, 4, 5 and 6 of this Agreement;
(B) any material adverse change in the status, responsibilities or perquisites of the Executive;
(C) any diminution in the Executive's titles (except for the Executive's no longer serving as the Chairman of the Company's Board due to legislative or other regulatory requirements mandating the appointment of a non-executive Chairman of the Company's Board);
(D) any failure to nominate or elect the Executive as Chief Executive Officer of the Company or as Chairman of the Company's Board, subject to the exception in subparagraph (C), above, and as a Director of the Company;
(E) causing or requiring the Executive to report to anyone other than the Board;
(F) assignment of duties materially inconsistent with his positions and duties described in this Agreement; or
(G) the Company giving a notice terminating the renewal feature of the Employment Term under Section 2;
provided, however, that no act or omission described above shall constitute "Good Reason" unless the Executive gives the Company thirty (30) days' prior written notice of such act or omission and the Company fails to cure such act or omission within the thirty (30)-day period (except that the Executive shall not be required to provide such notice in a case of intentional acts or omissions by the Company);
 
(ii) the failure of the Company to assign the Agreement to a successor to the Company or failure of a successor to the Company to explicitly assume and agree to be bound by the Agreement in a writing delivered to the Executive, or
(iii) the requiring of the Executive to be principally based at any office or location more than thirty (30) miles from the current corporate offices of the Company in Chicago, Illinois.
(f) . Upon five (5) days' prior written notice by the Executive to the Company of the Executive's termination of employment without Good Reason (which the Company may, in its sole discretion, make effective earlier than any notice date).
WITHOUT GOOD REASON
8. . Any termination payments made and benefits provided under this Agreement to the Executive shall offset any termination or severance payments or benefits for which the Executive may be eligible under any of the plans, policies or programs of the Company or its affiliates. Subject to Section 9, the following amounts and benefits shall be due to the Executive.
CONSEQUENCES OF TERMINATION
(a) . Upon a termination on account of the Executive's Disability, the Company shall pay or provide the Executive (i) any unpaid Base Salary through the date of termination and any accrued vacation in accordance with Company policy; (ii) any unpaid bonus earned with respect to any fiscal year ending on or preceding the date of termination at the time such bonuses are otherwise paid to executive employees of the Company; (iii) reimbursement for any unreimbursed expenses incurred through the date of termination in accordance with the terms of the Company's expense reimbursement policy; (iv) following expiration of the medical benefits provided under the Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1985, as amended ("COBRA"), COBRA-equivalent medical benefits, at the Executive's expense (which shall be equivalent to the COBRA cost), following such termination for the Executive and his covered dependents until he and his wife, respectively, attain age 65 (and for any other covered dependent, until such other covered dependent otherwise would be no longer eligible for coverage under the terms of the applicable medical benefits plan) (provided, that upon a termination of the Executive's employment by the Company without Cause or by the Executive for Good Reason, the Executive shall first be entitled to health benefit continuation upon the terms and conditions, and for the period, provided in Section 8(d)(ii) or (10)(b)(iii), as the case may be, and after the expiration of such continued coverage, the Executive shall thereafter be entitled to the foregoing COBRA-equivalent benefit); and (v) all other payments, benefits or fringe benefits to which the Executive may be entitled under the terms of any applicable compensation arrangement or benefit, equity or fringe benefit plan or program or grant or this Agreement (collectively, ""). Upon Executive's Disability termination, the Buy-Out Restricted Stock Awards shall fully vest and all restrictions thereon shall lapse, and the Executive shall be entitled to the Supplemental Pension benefit accrued through the date of termination as provided, and paid at such time as set forth, in Section 6(b), above, and the Executive shall receive a Pro Rata Bonus as defined, and paid at such time as set forth, in Section 8(d) below. Further, to the extent required by Section 409A(a)(2)(B) of the Code, the payment of any compensation (other than amounts accrued as of the date of SFS Disability (as defined below) that are paid at such time as they otherwise would
DISABILITY
Accrued Amounts
 
have been paid) to the Executive under this Agreement shall be suspended for a period of six months commencing at such time that Executive shall be deemed to have had, prior to the occurrence of a Disability termination as provided in Section 7(a) hereof, a Separation from Service because either (A) a sick leave ceases to be a bona fide sick leave of absence, or (B) the permitted time period for a sick leave of absence expires (an ""), without regard to whether such SFS Disability actually results in a Disability termination. Promptly following the expiration of such six-month period, all compensation suspended pursuant to the foregoing sentence (whether it would have otherwise been payable in a single sum or in installments in the absence of such suspension) shall be paid or reimbursed to the Executive in a lump sum.
SFS Disability
(b) . Upon a termination on account of the Executive's death, the Executive's estate (or to the extent a beneficiary has been designated in accordance with a program, the beneficiary under such program) shall be entitled to any Accrued Amounts. In addition, upon such termination, the Buy-Out Restricted Stock Awards shall fully vest and all restrictions thereon shall lapse, and the Executive's beneficiary shall be entitled to the Supplemental Pension benefit accrued through the date of termination as provided in Section 6(b), above, and the Executive's beneficiary shall receive a Pro Rata Bonus as defined in Section 8(d) below.
DEATH
(c) . If the Executive's employment should be terminated (i) by the Company for Cause, or (ii) by the Executive without Good Reason, the Company shall pay to the Executive any Accrued Amounts.
TERMINATION FOR CAUSE OR WITHOUT GOOD REASON
(d) .
TERMINATION WITHOUT CAUSE OR FOR GOOD REASON
(i) If the Executive's employment by the Company is terminated by the Company other than for Cause (other than a termination for Disability or due to the Executive's death) or by the Executive for Good Reason, the Company shall pay or provide the Executive with the Accrued Amounts. In addition, upon such termination, the Buy-Out Restricted Stock Awards shall fully vest and all restrictions thereon shall lapse, and the Executive shall be entitled to the Supplemental Pension benefit accrued through the date of termination as provided in Section 6(b), above (including additional credit for Supplemental Pension service as provided therein).
(ii) Upon such termination, subject to the Six-Month Delay Requirement, the Executive shall also be entitled to severance and any welfare benefit continuation provided in accordance with any applicable Company plan (in the form and when provided herein), but in no event less than (I) a lump sum payment equal to two (2) times the sum of (A) the Executive's Base Salary plus (B) his then-current target bonus amount; (II) a lump-sum cash payment equal to product of twenty-four (24) multiplied by the premium amount charged by the Company in providing continued medical benefit coverage under COBRA; and (III) a pro-rata portion of the Executive's bonus for the performance year in which the Executive's termination occurs, payable at the time that annual bonuses are paid to other senior executives, but in no event later than 2
 1
/
2
months following the end of the performance year in which the Executive's termination occurred, determined by multiplying the amount the Executive would have received based upon actual performance had employment continued through the end of
 
the performance year by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of days during the performance year of termination that the Executive is employed by the Company and the denominator of which is 365 (the ""). The Executive and his covered dependents shall also be entitled to participate in the Company's medical benefit plans and programs for two (2) years after such termination subject to the payment by the Executive monthly of an amount equal to the then COBRA premium charged by the Company to its former employees. In the event that the Executive obtains other employment that offers substantially similar or improved benefits as to any particular medical plan, such COBRA (or COBRA-equivalent) benefits and any retiree medical benefits shall not cease but they shall become secondary to the extent permitted by law (or suspended in the case of COBRA or COBRA equivalent benefits) while such other benefits are in effect. Any termination by the Company other than for Cause (other than a termination for Disability or due to the Executive's death) or by the Executive for Good Reason will be treated as a "layoff" under Company layoff plans that are applicable to senior executives (with severance and benefits payable as provided in this Section 8(d)). Provided, this Section 8(d)(ii) shall not apply to any termination of Executive's employment by the Company or by the Executive at or after the Executive has attained age 62.Each payment under this Section 8(d)(ii) or any Company plan pursuant thereto is intended to be treated as one of a series of separate payments for purposes of 409A and Treas. Reg. 1.409A-2(b)(2)(iii).
Pro Rata Bonus
9. . Any and all amounts payable and benefits or additional rights provided pursuant to this Agreement beyond Accrued Amounts shall be payable only if the Executive delivers to the Company a general release of all claims of the Executive occurring up to the release date in the form of Exhibit A hereto (with such changes therein as may be necessary to make it valid and encompassing under applicable law) which release is not revoked, and if so delivered and not revoked, shall, subject to the Six-Month Delay Requirement, be paid on the fifty-fifth (55
RELEASE
th
) day following the Executive's Separation from Service.
10. .
CHANGE IN CONTROL BENEFITS
(a) For purposes of this Agreement, "" shall mean the first to occur of any of the following events:
Change in Control
(i) any "person" (as defined in Section 13(d) and 14(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "")), excluding for this purpose, (A) the Company or any subsidiary of the Company, or (B) any employee benefit plan of the Company or any subsidiary of the Company, or any person or entity organized, appointed or established by the Company for or pursuant to the terms of any such plan which acquires beneficial ownership of voting securities of the Company, is or becomes the "beneficial owner" (as defined in Rule 13d-3 under the Exchange Act), directly or indirectly of securities of the Company representing more than thirty percent (30%) of the combined voting power of the Company's then outstanding securities; provided, however, that no Change in Control will be deemed to have occurred as a result of a change in ownership percentage resulting solely from an acquisition of securities by the Company; or
Exchange Act
 
(ii) persons who, as of the Effective Date constitute the Board (the "") cease for any reason, including without limitation, as a result of a tender offer, proxy contest, merger or similar transaction, to constitute at least a majority thereof, provided that any person becoming a director of the Company subsequent to the Effective Date shall be considered an Incumbent Director if such person's election or nomination for election was approved by a vote of at least fifty percent (50%) of the Incumbent Directors; but provided further, that any such person whose initial assumption of office is in connection with an actual or threatened election contest relating to the election of members of the Board or other actual or threatened solicitation of proxies or consents by or on behalf of a "person" (as defined in Section 13(d) and 14(d) of the Exchange Act) other than the Board, including by reason of agreement intended to avoid or settle any such actual or threatened contest or solicitation, shall not be considered an Incumbent Director; or
Incumbent Directors
(iii) consummation of a reorganization, merger or consolidation or sale or other disposition of at least eighty percent (80%) of the assets of the Company (a ""), in each case, unless, following such Business Combination, all or substantially all of the individuals and entities who were the beneficial owners of outstanding voting securities of the Company immediately prior to such Business Combination beneficially own, directly or indirectly, more than fifty percent (50%) of the combined voting power of the then outstanding voting securities entitled to vote generally in the election of directors of the company resulting from such Business Combination (including, without limitation, a company which, as a result of such transaction, owns the Company or all or substantially all of the Company's assets either directly or through one or more subsidiaries) in substantially the same proportions as their ownership, immediately prior to such Business Combination, of the outstanding voting securities of the Company; or
Business Combination
(iv) approval by the stockholders of the Company of a complete liquidation or dissolution of the Company.
(b) Upon a Change in Control of the Company, which is a 409A Change in Control, the Executive will receive such change-in-control benefits as may be provided to other senior executives of the Company; provided, in the event of a termination of the Executive's employment by the Company without Cause (and not due to the Executive's death or Disability) or by the Executive for Good Reason (i) on the day of or during the 2-year period immediately following a Change in Control or (ii) prior to a Change in Control but at the request of any third party participating in or causing the Change in Control or otherwise in connection thereto, the Executive shall be entitled to receive the following:
(i) The Company shall pay or provide the Executive with the Accrued Amounts.
(ii) In addition, upon such termination, the Buy-Out Restricted Stock Awards shall fully vest and all restrictions thereon shall lapse, and the Executive shall be entitled to the Supplemental Pension benefit accrued through the date of termination as provided in, and subject to, Section 6(b) above (including additional credit for Supplemental Pension service as provided therein).
 
(iii) Subject to Section 9 and, if applicable, the Six-Month Delay Requirement, the Executive shall also be entitled to severance and any welfare benefit continuation provided in accordance with any applicable Company plan, but in no event less than (I) a lump sum payment equal to three (3) times the sum of (A) the Executive's Base Salary, plus (B) his then-current target bonus amount; (II) a lump-sum cash payment equal to product of thirty-six (36) multiplied by the premium amount charged by the Company in providing continued medical benefit coverage under COBRA; and (III) a Pro Rata Bonus as provided in Section 8(d) above. The Executive and his covered dependents shall also be entitled to participate in the Company's medical benefit plans and programs for three (3) years after such termination subject to the payment monthly of an amount equal to the then COBRA premium charged by the Company to its former employees. In the event that the Executive obtains other employment that offers substantially similar or improved benefits as to any particular medical plan, such COBRA (or COBRA-equivalent) benefits and any retiree medical benefits shall not cease but they shall become secondary to the extent permitted by law (or suspended in the case of COBRA or COBRA equivalent benefits) while such other benefits are in effect. Any termination by the Company other than for Cause (other than a termination for Disability or due to the Executive's death) or by the Executive for Good Reason will be treated as a "layoff" under Company layoff plans that are applicable to senior executives (with severance and benefits payable as provided in this Section 10(b)).
(iv) Each payment under Section 10(b)(iii) of this Agreement or any Company plan pursuant thereto is intended to be treated as one of a series of separate payments for purposes of 409A and Treas. Reg. 1.409A-2(b)(2)(iii).
11. (a) . The Executive agrees that he shall not, directly or indirectly, use, make available, sell, disclose or otherwise communicate to any person, other than in the course of the Executive's employment and for the benefit of the Company (as determined by the Executive in good faith), either during the period of the Executive's employment or at any time thereafter, any nonpublic, proprietary or confidential information, knowledge or data relating to the Company, any of its subsidiaries, affiliated companies or businesses, which shall have been obtained by the Executive during the Executive's employment by the Company. The foregoing shall not apply to information that (i) was known to the public prior to its disclosure to the Executive; (ii) becomes known to the public subsequent to disclosure to the Executive through no wrongful act of the Executive or any representative of the Executive; or (iii) the Executive is required to disclose by applicable law, regulation or legal process (provided that the Executive provides the Company with prior notice of the contemplated disclosure and reasonably cooperates with the Company at its expense in seeking a protective order or other appropriate protection of such information). Notwithstanding clauses (i) and (ii) of the preceding sentence, the Executive's obligation to maintain such disclosed information in confidence shall not terminate where only portions of the information are in the public domain.
CONFIDENTIALITY
 
(b) . During the Executive's employment with the Company and for the one (1) year period thereafter, the Executive agrees that he will not, directly or indirectly, individually or on behalf of any other person, firm, corporation or other entity, knowingly solicit, aid or induce (i) any managerial level employee of the Company or any of its subsidiaries or affiliates to leave such employment in order to accept employment with or render services to or with any other person, firm, corporation or other entity unaffiliated with the Company or knowingly take any action to materially assist or aid any other person, firm, corporation or other entity in identifying or hiring any such employee (provided, that the foregoing shall not be violated by general advertising not targeted at Company employees nor by serving as a reference for an employee with regard to an entity with which the Executive is not affiliated), or (ii) any customer of the Company or any of its subsidiaries or affiliates to purchase goods or services then sold by the Company or any of its subsidiaries or affiliates from another person, firm, corporation or other entity or assist or aid any other persons or entity in identifying or soliciting any such customer (provided, that the foregoing shall not apply to any product or service which is not covered by the noncompetition provision set forth in Section 11(c), below).
NONSOLICITATION
(c) . The Executive acknowledges that he performs services of a unique nature for the Company that are irreplaceable, and that his performance of such services to a competing business (other than respecting a product or service of the Company involving less than one percent (1%) of the Company's revenues) in the prior fiscal year ("")) will result in irreparable harm to the Company. Accordingly, during the Executive's employment hereunder and for the one (1) year period thereafter, the Executive agrees that the Executive will not, directly or indirectly, own, manage, operate, control, be employed by (whether as an employee, consultant, independent contractor or otherwise, and whether or not for compensation) or render services to any person, firm, corporation or other entity, in whatever form, engaged in any business of the same type as any business in which the Company or any of its subsidiaries or affiliates is engaged on the date of termination or in which they have proposed, on or prior to such date, to be engaged in on or after such date and in which the Executive has been involved to any extent (other than De Minimis) at any time during the twelve (12)-month period ending with the date of termination, in any locale of any country in which the Company conducts business. This Section 11(c) shall not prevent the Executive from owning not more than one percent (1%) of the total shares of all classes of stock outstanding of any publicly held entity engaged in such business, nor will it restrict the Executive from rendering services to charitable organizations, as such term is defined in Section 501(c) of the Code.
NONCOMPETITION
De Minimis
(d) . Each of the Executive and the Company (for purposes hereof, "the Company" shall mean only (i) the Company by press release or other formally released announcement and (ii) the executive officers and directors thereof and not any other employees) agrees that during the Employment Term and for five (5) years thereafter not to make any public statements that disparage the other party, or in the case of the Company, its respective affiliates, employees, officers, directors, products or services. Notwithstanding the foregoing, statements made in the course of sworn testimony in administrative, judicial or arbitral proceedings (including, without limitation, depositions in connection with such proceedings) shall not be subject to this Section 11(d). This provision shall also not cover normal competitive statements which do not cite the Executive's employment by the Company.
NONDISPARAGEMENT
(e) . The parties acknowledge and agree that the other party's remedies at law for a breach or threatened breach of any of the provisions of this Section would be inadequate and, in recognition of this fact, the
EQUITABLE RELIEF AND OTHER REMEDIES
 
parties agree that, in the event of such a breach or threatened breach, in addition to any remedies at law, the other party, without posting any bond, shall be entitled to obtain equitable relief in the form of specific performance, temporary restraining order, a temporary or permanent injunction or any other equitable remedy which may then be available.
(f) . If it is determined by a court of competent jurisdiction in any state that any restriction in this Section 11 is excessive in duration or scope or is unreasonable or unenforceable under the laws of that state, it is the intention of the parties that such restriction may be modified or amended by the court to render it enforceable to the maximum extent permitted by the law of that state.
REFORMATION
(g) . The obligations contained in this Section 11 shall survive the termination or expiration of the Executive's employment with the Company and shall be fully enforceable thereafter.
SURVIVAL OF PROVISIONS
12. . The Company shall pay all of the reasonable professional fees and expenses, incurred by the Executive in the negotiation and preparation of this Agreement and related arrangements, on or before the last day of the Executive's taxable year following the taxable year in which the fee or expense was incurred, and in accordance with the other requirements of 409A and Treas. Reg. 1.409A-3(i)(1)(iv)(A).
ATTORNEY'S FEES
13. .
NO ASSIGNMENTS
(a) This Agreement is personal to each of the parties hereto. Except as provided in Section 13(b) below, no party may assign or delegate any rights or obligations hereunder without first obtaining the written consent of the other party hereto.
(b) The Company shall assign this Agreement to any successor to all or substantially all of the business and/or assets of the Company provided the Company shall require such successor to expressly assume and agree to perform this Agreement in the same manner and to the same extent that the Company would be required to perform it if no such succession had taken place and shall deliver a copy of such assignment to the Executive.
14. . For the purpose of this Agreement, notices and all other communications provided for in this Agreement shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given (i) on the date of delivery if delivered by hand, (ii) on the date of transmission, if delivered by confirmed facsimile, (iii) on the first business day following the date of deposit if delivered by guaranteed overnight delivery service, or (iv) on the fourth business day following the date delivered or mailed by United States registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, postage prepaid, addressed as follows:
NOTICE
If to the Executive:
At the address (or to the facsimile number) shown
on the records of the Company
If to the Company:
The Boeing Company
 
100 North Riverside Plaza
Chicago, Illinois 60606-1596
Attention: Senior Vice President and General Counsel
Fax No.: 312/544-2828
or to such other address as either party may have furnished to the other in writing in accordance herewith, except that notices of change of address shall be effective only upon receipt.
15. . The section headings used in this Agreement are included solely for convenience and shall not affect, or be used in connection with, the interpretation of this Agreement. In the event of any inconsistency between the terms of this Agreement and any form, award, plan or policy of the Company, the terms of this Agreement shall control. No provision in any policy, code, plan or program related to a violation thereof being grounds for termination, or similar language, shall result in a "cause" termination unless such violation is also Cause under this Agreement and the provisions hereof are complied with, and the foregoing shall apply even if the Executive signs an acknowledgement or otherwise agrees to the provisions of such policy, code, plan or program.
SECTION HEADINGS; INCONSISTENCY
16. . The provisions of this Agreement shall be deemed severable and the invalidity of unenforceability of any provision shall not affect the validity or enforceability of the other provisions hereof.
SEVERABILITY
17. . This Agreement may be executed in several counterparts, each of which shall be deemed to be an original but all of which together will constitute one and the same instruments. One or more counterparts of this Agreement may be delivered by facsimile, with the intention that delivery by such means shall have the same effect as delivery of an original counterpart thereof.
COUNTERPARTS
18. . Any dispute or controversy arising under or in connection with this Agreement, other than injunctive relief under Section 11(e) hereof or damages for breach of Section 11, shall be settled exclusively by arbitration, conducted before a single arbitrator in Chicago, Illinois, administered by the American Arbitration Association ("") in accordance with its Commercial Arbitration Rules then in effect. The single arbitrator shall be selected by the mutual agreement of the Company and the Executive, unless the parties are unable to agree to an arbitrator, in which case, the arbitrator will be selected under the procedures of the AAA. The arbitrator will have the authority to permit discovery and to follow the procedures that he or she determines to be appropriate. The arbitrator will have no power to award consequential (including lost profits), punitive or exemplary damages. The decision of the arbitrator will be final and binding upon the parties hereto. Judgment may be entered on the arbitrator's award in any court having jurisdiction. Each party shall bear its own legal fees and costs and equally divide the forum fees and cost of the arbitrator; provided, that if the Executive is a Prevailing Party (as defined below), the Executive shall be entitled to recover all of his reasonable attorneys' fees and expenses incurred in connection with the dispute, which shall be paid to him within thirty (30) days after the entry of a final nonappealable order awarding the Executive such fees and costs. A "" is one who is successful on any material substantive issue in the action and achieves either a judgment in such party's favor or some other affirmative recovery.
ARBITRATION
AAA
Prevailing Party
 
19. . The Company hereby agrees to indemnify the Executive and hold him harmless to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law against and in respect to any and all actions, suits, proceedings, claims, demands, judgments, costs, expenses (including reasonable attorney's fees), losses, and damages resulting from the Executive's good faith performance of his duties and obligations with the Company. This provision is in addition to any other rights of indemnification the Executive may have.
INDEMNIFICATION
20. . The Company shall cover the Executive under directors and officers liability insurance both during and, while potential liability exists, after the term of this Agreement in the same amount and to the same extent as the Company covers its other officers and directors.
LIABILITY INSURANCE
21. . No provision of this Agreement may be modified, waived or discharged unless such waiver, modification or discharge is agreed to in writing and signed by the Executive and such officer or director as may be designated by the Board. No waiver by either party hereto at any time of any breach by the other party hereto of, or compliance with, any condition or provision of this Agreement to be performed by such other party shall be deemed a waiver of similar or dissimilar provisions or conditions at the same or at any prior or subsequent time. This Agreement together with all exhibits hereto sets forth the entire agreement of the parties hereto in respect of the subject matter contained herein. No agreements or representations, oral or otherwise, express or implied, with respect to the subject matter hereof have been made by either party which are not expressly set forth in this Agreement. The validity, interpretation, construction and performance of this Agreement shall be governed by the laws of the State of Illinois without regard to its conflicts of law principles.
MISCELLANEOUS
22. .
CODE SECTION 409A
(a) It is intended that any amounts payable under this Agreement and the Company's and the Executive's exercise of authority or discretion hereunder shall comply with the provisions of 409A and the treasury regulations relating thereto so as not to subject the Executive to the payment of interest and tax penalty that may be imposed under 409A. In furtherance of this intent, (a) the parties intend that the terms and provisions of this Agreement be interpreted and applied in a manner that satisfies the requirements and exemptions of 409A, and (b) the parties agree to amend this Agreement in order to bring this Agreement into compliance with 409A.
(b) With regard to any provision herein that provides for reimbursement of expenses or in-kind benefits, except as permitted by 409A, (i) the right to reimbursement or in-kind benefits is not subject to liquidation or exchange for another benefit, (ii) the amount of expenses eligible for reimbursement, or in-kind benefits, provided during any taxable year shall not affect the expenses eligible for reimbursement, or in-kind benefits to be provided, in any other taxable year, other than as excepted under Treas. Reg. 1.409A-3(i)(iv)(B) with regard to expenses reimbursed under any arrangement covered by Section 105(b) of the Code solely because such expenses are subject to a limit related to the period the arrangement is in effect.
 
(c) Without limiting the discretion of either the Company or the Executive to terminate the Executive's employment hereunder for any reason (or no reason), solely for purposes of compliance with 409A a termination of employment shall not be deemed to have occurred for purposes of any provision of this Agreement providing for the payment of any amounts or benefits upon or following a termination of employment unless such termination is also a Separation from Service as an employee and, for purposes of any such provision of this Agreement, references to a "termination" or "termination of employment" shall mean Separation from Service as an employee and such payments shall thereupon be made at or following such Separation from Service as an employee as provided hereunder.
23. . Except as set forth in this Agreement, the Company's obligation to make the payments provided for in this Agreement and otherwise to perform its obligations hereunder shall not be affected by any circumstances, including without limitation, set-off, counterclaim, recoupment, defense or other claim, right or action which the Company may have against the Executive or others, except to the extent any amounts are due the Company or its subsidiaries or affiliates pursuant to a judgment against the Executive. In no event shall the Executive be obliged to seek other employment or take any other action by way of mitigation of the amounts payable to the Executive under any of the provisions of this Agreement, nor shall the amount of any payment hereunder be reduced by any compensation earned by the Executive as a result of employment by another employer, except as set forth in this Agreement.
FULL SETTLEMENT
24. .
REPRESENTATIONS
(a) The Company represents and warrants to the Executive that the execution of this Agreement and the provision of all benefits and grants provided herein have been duly authorized by the Company, including action of the Board and Compensation Committee and, upon the execution and delivery of this Agreement by the Executive, this Agreement shall be the valid and binding obligation of the Company, enforceable in accordance with its terms, except to the extent enforceability may be limited by applicable bankruptcy, insolvency or similar laws affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally and by the effect of general principles of equity (regardless of whether enforceability is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law).
(b) The Executive represents and warrants to the Company that he has the legal right to enter into this Agreement and to perform all of the obligations on his part to be performed hereunder in accordance with its terms and that he is not a party to any agreement or understanding, written or oral, which could prevent him from entering into this Agreement or performing all of his obligations hereunder.
25. . The Company may withhold from any and all amounts payable under this Agreement such federal, state and local taxes as may be required to be withheld pursuant to any applicable law or regulation.
WITHHOLDING
26. . The Company shall give the Executive a reasonable opportunity to review and comment on any public announcement (including any filing with a governmental agency or stock exchange) relating to this Agreement or the Executive's employment by the Company.
PUBLIC ANNOUNCEMENTS
 
 
, the parties hereto have executed this Agreement as of the date first written above.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF
 
 
The Boeing Company, its affiliates, subsidiaries, divisions, successors and assigns in such capacity, and the current, future and former employees, officers, directors, trustees and agents thereof (collectively referred to throughout this Agreement as "") and W. James McNerney, Jr., his heirs, executors, administrators, successors and assigns (collectively referred to throughout this Agreement as "") agree:
Employer
Employee
1. . Employee's last day of employment with Employer is DATE. In addition, effective as of DATE, Employee resigns from his position as Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer of The Boeing Company and will not be eligible for any benefits or compensation after DATE, other than as specifically provided in Sections 6 and 8 of the employment agreement between The Boeing Company and Employee dated as of June 29, 2005 (the "") and his right to indemnification and directors and officers liability insurance. Employee further acknowledges and agrees that, after DATE, he will not represent himself as being a director, employee, officer, trustee, agent or representative of the Employer for any purpose. In addition, effective as of DATE, Employee resigns from all offices, directorships, trusteeships, committee memberships and fiduciary capacities held with, or on behalf of, the Employer or any benefit plans of the Employer. These resignations will become irrevocable as set forth in Section 3 below.
Last Day of Employment
Employment Agreement
2. . The parties acknowledge that this Agreement and General Release is being executed in accordance with Section 9 of the Employment Agreement.
Consideration
3. . Employee may revoke this Agreement and General Release for a period of seven (7) calendar days following the day he executes this Agreement and General Release. Any revocation within this period must be submitted, in writing, to Employer and state, "I hereby revoke my acceptance of our Agreement and General Release." The revocation must be personally delivered to the Company's Senior Vice President and General Counsel, or his/her designee, or mailed to Employer, 100 North Riverside Plaza, Chicago, Illinois 60606-1596 and postmarked within seven (7) calendar days of execution of this Agreement and General Release. This Agreement and General Release shall not become effective or enforceable until the revocation period has expired. If the last day of the revocation period is a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday in Illinois, then the revocation period shall not expire until the next following day which is not a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday.
Revocation
4. . Employee knowingly and voluntarily releases and forever discharges Employer from any and all claims, causes of action, demands, fees and liabilities of any kind whatsoever, whether known and unknown, against Employer, Employee has, has ever had or may have as of the date of execution of this Agreement and General Release, including, but not limited to, any alleged violation of:
General Release of Claim
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, the sole matters to which the Agreement and General Release do not apply are: (i) the Employee's rights of indemnification and directors and officers liability insurance coverage to which he was entitled immediately prior to DATE with regard to his service as an officer and director of the Employer (including, without limitation, under Sections 19 and 20 of the Employment Agreement); (ii) the Employee's rights under any tax-qualified pension or claims for accrued vested benefits under any other employee benefit plan, policy or arrangement maintained by the Employer or under COBRA; (iii) the Employee's rights under the provisions of the Employment Agreement which are intended to survive termination of employment; or (iv) the Employee's rights as a stockholder.
5. . Employee waives his right to file any charge or complaint against Employer arising out of his employment with or separation from Employer before any federal, state or local court or any state or local administrative agency, except where such
No Claims Permitted
 
waivers are prohibited by law. This Agreement, however, does not prevent Employee from filing a charge with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission, any other federal government agency, and/or any government agency concerning claims of discrimination, although Employee waives his right to recover any damages or other relief in any claim or suit brought by or through the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission or any other state or local agency on behalf of Employee under the Age Discrimination in Employment Act, Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 as amended, the Americans with Disabilities Act, or any other federal or state discrimination law, except where such waivers are prohibited by law.
6. . Employee affirms he has not filed, has not caused to be filed, and is not presently a party to, any claim, complaint, or action against Employer in any forum or form. Employee further affirms that he has been paid and/or has received all compensation, wages, bonuses, commissions, and/or benefits to which he may be entitled and no other compensation, wages, bonuses, commissions and/or benefits are due to him, except as provided in Sections 6 and 8 of the Employment Agreement. Employee also affirms he has no known workplace injuries.
Affirmations
7. . Employee agrees to reasonably cooperate with the Employer and its counsel in connection with any investigation, administrative proceeding or litigation relating to any matter that occurred during his employment in which he was involved or of which he has knowledge. The Employer will reimburse the Employee for any reasonable out-of-pocket travel, delivery or similar expenses incurred in providing such service to the Employer. Employee represents that he has returned to the Employer all property belonging to the Employer, including but not limited to any leased vehicle, laptop, cell phone, keys, access cards, phone cards and credit cards, provided that the Executive may retain, and the Company shall cooperate in transferring, his cell phone number and any home communication and security equipment as well as his rolodex and other address books.
Cooperation; Return of Property
8. . This Agreement and General Release shall be governed and conformed in accordance with the laws of the State of Illinois without regard to its conflict of laws provision. In the event Employee or Employer breaches any provision of this Agreement and General Release, Employee and Employer affirm either may institute an action to specifically enforce any term or terms of this Agreement and General Release. Should any provision of this Agreement and General Release be declared illegal or unenforceable by any court of competent jurisdiction and should the provision be incapable of being modified to be enforceable, such provision shall immediately become null and void, leaving the remainder of this Agreement and General Release in full force and effect. Nothing herein, however, shall operate to void or nullify any general release language contained in the Agreement and General Release.
Governing Law and Interpretation
9. . Employee agrees neither this Agreement and General Release nor the furnishing of the consideration for this Release shall be deemed or construed at any time for any purpose as an admission by Employer of any liability or unlawful conduct of any kind.
Nonadmission of Wrongdoing
 
10. . This Agreement and General Release may not be modified, altered or changed except upon express written consent of both parties wherein specific reference is made to this Agreement and General Release.
Amendment
11. . This Agreement and General Release sets forth the entire agreement between the parties hereto and fully supersedes any prior agreements or understandings between the parties; provided, however, that notwithstanding anything in this Agreement and General Release, the provisions in the Employment Agreement which are intended to survive termination of the Employment Agreement, including but not limited to those contained in Section 11 thereof, shall survive and continue in full force and effect. Employee acknowledges he has not relied on any representations, promises, or agreements of any kind made to him in connection with his decision to accept this Agreement and General Release.
Entire Agreement
EMPLOYEE HAS BEEN ADVISED THAT HE HAS UP TO TWENTY-ONE (21) CALENDAR DAYS TO REVIEW THIS AGREEMENT AND GENERAL RELEASE AND HAS BEEN ADVISED IN WRITING TO CONSULT WITH AN ATTORNEY PRIOR TO EXECUTION OF THIS AGREEMENT AND GENERAL RELEASE.
EMPLOYEE AGREES ANY MODIFICATIONS, MATERIAL OR OTHERWISE, MADE TO THIS AGREEMENT AND GENERAL RELEASE DO NOT RESTART OR AFFECT IN ANY MANNER THE ORIGINAL TWENTY-ONE (21) CALENDAR DAY CONSIDERATION PERIOD.
HAVING ELECTED TO EXECUTE THIS AGREEMENT AND GENERAL RELEASE, TO FULFILL THE PROMISES SET FORTH HEREIN, AND TO RECEIVE THE SUMS AND BENEFITS SET FORTH IN THE EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENT, EMPLOYEE FREELY AND KNOWINGLY, AND AFTER DUE CONSIDERATION, ENTERS INTO THIS AGREEMENT AND GENERAL RELEASE INTENDING TO WAIVE, SETTLE AND RELEASE ALL CLAIMS HE HAS OR MIGHT HAVE AGAINST EMPLOYER.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto knowingly and voluntarily executed this Agreement and General Release as of the date set forth below:
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20080423094427.txt.gz
TIME:20080423094427
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
 
(a) On April 23, 2008, The Boeing Company issued a press release reporting its financial results for the first quarter of 2008.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
(a) Not applicable
 
(b) Not applicable
 
(c) Not applicable
 
(d) Exhibits
 
99.1    Press Release issued by The Boeing Company dated April 23, 2008, reporting Boeing's financial results for the first quarter of 2008.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
Boeing Reports Double-Digit First-Quarter Earnings Growth and Record Backlog
 
 
 
 
 
 
Table 1. Summary Financial Results
 
 The Boeing Company's [NYSE: BA] first-quarter 2008 earnings per share increased 43 percent to $1.62 as net income rose 38 percent to $1.2 billion and operating margin rose to 11.3 percent, driven by solid overall execution in both its commercial airplane and defense businesses as well as lower unallocated costs (Table 1).
CHICAGO, April 23, 2008
Boeing's quarterly revenue rose 4 percent to $16.0 billion while its operating cash flow more than doubled to $1.9 billion reflecting the strong operating earnings and higher commercial airplane orders. Free cash flow* increased to $1.5 billion (Table 2).
Boeing reaffirmed its 2008 earnings per share guidance at between $5.70 and $5.85. For 2009, Boeing expects EPS between $6.80 and $7.00 per share on strong production program performance and decreases in R&D and pension expense.
 
"We're off to a good start in what we expect to be another strong year of financial performance for Boeing," said Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer Jim McNerney. "We are methodically working through our challenges, including the start-up of the 787, and our people remain focused on satisfying our customers and leveraging growth and productivity into better bottom-line and top-line performance for our company."
Total company backlog at quarter-end reached a record $346 billion, up 32 percent in the last year, with growth in the quarter driven by commercial airplane and V-22 multi-year orders.
Table 2. Cash Flow
 
 
Cash and investments in marketable securities totaled $12.1 billion at quarter-end, up 49 percent from the same period last year but unchanged during the first quarter (Table 3). The company spent $1.2 billion to acquire 15.6 million of its shares in the quarter, enabled by the recent $7 billion share repurchase authorization. Also in the first quarter, the company contributed $506 million to its pension plans.
Table 3. Cash, Marketable Securities and Debt Balances
 
 
 
Segment Results
Commercial Airplanes
Boeing Commercial Airplanes (BCA) first-quarter revenues rose to $8.2 billion on an 8 percent increase in airplane deliveries and higher services volume, partially offset by lower aircraft trading volume (Table 4). Operating earnings grew 39 percent to $983 million while margins expanded to 12.0 percent, driven by higher delivery volume and services sales and lower R&D spending. During the quarter, the company delivered its 1,400
th
747 airplane and its 700
th
777 airplane.
Table 4. Commercial Airplanes Operating Results
 
BCA booked 289 gross orders during the quarter. Contractual backlog rose to a record $271 billion, increasing to more than seven times BCA's expected 2008 revenues.
Progress on the new 787 Dreamliner continues on the revised schedule announced earlier this month. As reported at that time, Boeing continues to address slower-than-expected completion of work that traveled from supplier facilities into Boeing's final assembly line and unanticipated rework. The company expects the first flight to occur in the fourth quarter of 2008 with first deliveries to begin in the third quarter of 2009. Recent milestones include successful completion of structural testing of the horizontal stabilizer, completion of full-scale test flights in our simulators, completion of integration testing required for putting electrical power on the airplane, and airworthiness certification of the General Electric engine. The program won 75 orders in the quarter, and total firm orders since launch rose to 892 airplanes from 57 customers.
 
Integrated Defense Systems
Boeing Integrated Defense Systems (IDS) expanded operating margins by 120 basis points to 11.4 percent on revenues of $7.6 billion. IDS results reflect strong execution in all segments and extensive productivity improvements.
Table 5. Integrated Defense Systems Operating Results
 
Precision Engagement & Mobility Systems delivered first-quarter operating earnings of $389 million on $3.3 billion in revenue. Revenue was affected by fewer deliveries on several aircraft programs offset by initial deliveries of two KC-767 international tankers and higher F-15 deliveries. Operating margin was 11.9 percent reflecting product mix and aircraft deliveries in the quarter. In this segment, the company captured a multi-year contract for V-22s and a CH-47 contract. The Air Force awarded the initial KC-X Tanker contract to Northrop Grumman-EADS; Boeing has filed a protest of that award with the Government Accountability Office.
Network & Space Systems achieved significant milestones on several key programs. Operating margin nearly doubled to 9.9 percent driven by strong performance across the segment's array of programs and a favorable settlement on a satellite program. Last year's results were affected by adjustments related to the United Launch Alliance joint venture and revised cost estimates on a satellite program.
Support Systems continues to generate strong profits on its broad portfolio of services and logistics programs. Operating margin was a strong 12.5 percent, reflecting solid program execution and contract mix. In this segment, the company captured the first multi-year sustainment contract for the F-22 Raptor fleet.
 
The IDS backlog increased during the quarter to $74.8 billion driven by the new V-22 multi-year procurement contract. IDS' backlog is currently more than two times expected 2008 revenues.
Boeing Capital Corporation
Boeing Capital Corporation (BCC) reported first-quarter pre-tax earnings of $61 million compared to $73 million in the same period last year which included a larger portfolio (Table 6). BCC's portfolio balance at the end of the quarter was $6.3 billion, down 20 percent from $7.9 billion last year primarily on customer prepayments, normal portfolio run-off and depreciation. BCC contributed $35 million in cash dividends to the company during the quarter. BCC's debt-to-equity ratio was unchanged at 5.0-to-1.
Table 6. Boeing Capital Corporation Operating Results
 
Additional Information
The "Other" segment consists primarily of Boeing Engineering, Operations and Technology, as well as certain results related to the consolidation of all business units. Other segment expense was $50 million in the first quarter, reduced slightly from $55 million of expense in the same period last year.
Unallocated expense was $55 million, down from $199 million in the same quarter last year, driven by lower deferred compensation and pension expense.
Total pension expense for the quarter decreased by $61 million to $191 million, of which $124 million was allocated to BCA and IDS, and the remaining $67 million recorded as unallocated expense.
 
Outlook
The company's financial guidance summarized in Table 7 reflects strong business performance forecasts at IDS and BCA, increasing commercial airplane deliveries, decreasing investment in new airplane development and company-wide productivity gains. The outlook reflects the impact of the previously announced 787 schedule changes.
Boeing's 2008 revenue guidance is unchanged at between $67 billion and $68 billion. For 2009, the company expects revenues between $72 billion and $73 billion. Earnings-per-share guidance for 2008 is reaffirmed at $5.70 to $5.85 per share. EPS guidance for 2009 is set at between $6.80 and $7.00 per share. Operating cash flow guidance for 2008 is unchanged at greater than $2.5 billion. Operating cash flow for 2009 is expected to exceed $6 billion.
Commercial Airplanes' 2008 delivery guidance remains between 475 and 480 airplanes and is sold out. BCA revenue guidance for 2008 remains between $34.5 billion and $35 billion, and operating margin guidance is unchanged at approximately 11.5 percent. In 2009 BCA expects to deliver between 500 and 505 commercial airplanes  including approximately 25 Dreamliners  and is essentially sold out. Commercial Airplanes' revenue in 2009 is expected to grow to between $37 billion and $38 billion accompanied by margins of approximately 11.5 percent. The company expects to deliver more airplanes in 2010 than in 2009.
IDS revenue guidance for 2008 is unchanged at $32 billion to $33 billion. Operating margins are expected to be approximately 10.5 percent. For 2009, IDS expects revenue to grow to $33.5 billion to $34.5 billion, with operating margins exceeding 10.5 percent.
Boeing's total R&D forecast for 2008 is increased to between $3.6 billion and $3.8 billion, up from between $3.2 billion and $3.4 billion due to the new 787 schedule announced earlier this month and additional 747-8 costs. R&D spending is expected to decline in 2009 to between $3.1 billion and $3.3 billion. Annual capital expenditures are expected to be approximately $1.8 billion in 2008, declining in 2009 to approximately $1.7 billion.
The company's non-cash pension expense is expected to be approximately $0.8 billion for 2008, falling to approximately $0.5 billion in 2009, though it may vary due to
 
discount rates and investment returns. Discretionary cash funding of Boeing's pension plans is expected to be approximately $0.5 billion in each of 2008 (contributed during the first quarter) and 2009, though the company will continue to evaluate making additional discretionary contributions to its pension plans.
Table 7. Financial Outlook
 
 
 
Non-GAAP Measure Disclosure
Management believes that the non-GAAP (Generally Accepted Accounting Principles) measures (indicated by an asterisk *) used in this report provide investors with important perspectives into the company's ongoing business performance. The company does not intend for the information to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the related GAAP measures. Other companies may define the measures differently. The following definitions are provided:
Free Cash Flow
Free cash flow is defined as GAAP less capital expenditures for . Management believes free cash flow provides investors with an important perspective on the cash available for shareholders, debt repayment, and acquisitions after making the capital investments required to support ongoing business operations and long term value creation. Free cash flow does not represent the residual cash flow available for discretionary expenditures as it excludes certain mandatory expenditures such as repayment of maturing debt. Management uses free cash flow internally to assess both business performance and overall liquidity. Table 2 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and free cash flow.
operating cash flow
property, plant and equipment additions
 
Certain statements in this report may constitute "forward-looking" statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Forward-looking statements in this press release include, among others, statements regarding future results as a result of our growth and productivity initiatives, our 2008 and 2009 financial outlook and the benefits of the IDS structure. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions as to future events that may not prove to be accurate. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak only as of the date they were made and we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise. Our actual results and future trends may differ materially depending on a variety of factors, including the continued operation, viability and growth of major airline customers and non-airline customers (such as the U.S. Government); adverse developments in the value of collateral securing customer and other financings; the occurrence of any significant collective bargaining labor dispute; our successful execution of internal performance plans including our company-wide growth and productivity initiatives, production rate increases and decreases (including any reduction in or termination of an aircraft product), availability of raw materials, acquisition and divestiture plans, and other cost-reduction and productivity efforts; charges from any future SFAS No. 142 review; ability to meet development, production and certification schedules for the 787 program and the ability to meet scheduled deliveries of the 787 airplane; technical or quality issues in development programs (affecting schedule and cost estimates) or in the satellite industry; an adverse development in rating agency credit ratings or assessments; the actual outcomes of certain pending sales campaigns and U.S. and foreign government procurement activities, including the uncertainty associated with the procurement of tankers by the U.S. Department of Defense (DoD) and funding of the C-17 program; the cyclical nature of some of our businesses; unanticipated financial market changes which may impact pension plan assumptions; domestic and international competition in the defense, space and commercial areas; continued integration of acquired businesses; performance issues with key suppliers, subcontractors and customers; significant disruption to air travel worldwide (including future terrorist attacks); global trade policies; worldwide political stability; domestic and international economic conditions; price escalation; the outcome of political and legal processes, changing priorities or reductions in the U.S. Government or foreign government defense and space budgets; termination of government or commercial contracts due to unilateral government or customer action or failure to perform; legal, financial and governmental risks related to international transactions; legal and investigatory proceedings; tax settlements with the IRS and various states; U.S. Air Force review of previously awarded contracts; costs associated with the exit of the Connexion by Boeing business; and other economic, political and technological risks and uncertainties. Additional information regarding these factors is contained in our SEC filings, including, without limitation, our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20080430124652.txt.gz
TIME:20080430124652
EVENTS:	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On April 28, 2008, the Board of Directors amended and restated the By-Laws of The Boeing Company (the ""), revising Article II, Section 1 to decrease the number of directors from twelve to eleven. A copy of the Company's By-Laws, as amended and restated on April 28, 2008, is attached hereto as Exhibit 3.2 and is incorporated by reference.
Company
 
 
 
 
SIGNATURE
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: April 29, 2008
 
 

Exhibit 3.2
 
 
 
 
 
SECTION 1.    .
Annual Meetings
The Annual Meeting of the stockholders shall be held on such date and at such time as the Board of Directors shall determine, for the election of directors and the transaction of such other business as may come before the meeting.
SECTION 2.    .
Special Meetings
A special meeting of the stockholders may be called at any time by the Board of Directors, or by stockholders holding together at least twenty-five percent of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, except as otherwise provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto.
SECTION 3.    .
Place of Meeting
All meetings of the stockholders of the Corporation shall be held at such place or places within or without the State of Delaware as may from time to time be fixed by the Board of Directors or as shall be specified or fixed in the respective notices or waivers of notice thereof.
SECTION 4.    .
Notice of Meetings
Except as otherwise required by statute and as set forth below, notice of each annual or special meeting of stockholders shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than thirty nor more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date. If the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, notice of each special meeting of stockholders shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than fifty-five nor more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date, unless the calling of such meeting is ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, in which case notice of such special meeting shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than thirty nor more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date. Such notice shall be given by delivering to each stockholder a written or printed notice thereof either personally or by mailing such notice in a postage-prepaid envelope addressed to the stockholder's address as it appears on the stock books of the Corporation. Except as otherwise required by statute, no publication of any notice of a meeting of stockholders shall be required. Every notice of a meeting of stockholders shall state the place, date, and hour of the meeting and, in the case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called.
SECTION 5.    .
Waivers of Notice
Whenever any notice is required to be given to any stockholder under the provisions of these By-Laws, the Certificate of Incorporation, or the Delaware General Corporation Law, a waiver thereof in writing, signed by the person or persons entitled to such notice, whether before or after the time stated therein, shall be deemed equivalent to the giving of such notice. The attendance of a stockholder at a meeting, in person or by proxy, shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when a stockholder attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened.
SECTION 6.    .
Quorum
At all meetings of stockholders, except when otherwise provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by the By-Laws, the presence, in person or by proxy duly authorized, of the holders of one-third of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and except as otherwise provided by statute or rule of law, or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by the By-Laws, the vote, in person or by proxy, of the holders of a majority of the shares constituting such quorum shall be binding upon all stockholders of the Corporation. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote may adjourn any meeting, from time to time but not for a period of more than thirty days at any one time, until a quorum shall attend. At any such adjourned meeting at which a quorum shall be present, any business may be transacted which might have been transacted at the meeting as originally called. Unless otherwise provided by statute, no notice of an adjourned meeting need be given.
SECTION 7.    .
Proxies
7.1 . Each stockholder entitled to vote at a meeting of stockholders or to express consent or dissent to corporate action in writing without a meeting may authorize another person or persons to act for such stockholder by proxy. Such authorization may be accomplished by (a) the stockholder or such stockholder's authorized officer, director, employee, or agent executing a writing or causing his or her signature to be affixed to such writing by any reasonable means, including facsimile signature, or (b) by transmitting or authorizing the transmission of a telegram, cablegram, or other means of electronic transmission to the intended holder of the proxy or to a proxy solicitation firm, proxy support service, or similar agent duly authorized by the intended proxy holder to receive such transmission; provided, that any such telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission must either set forth or be accompanied by information from which it can be determined that the telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission was authorized by the stockholder. Any copy, facsimile telecommunication, or other reliable reproduction of the writing or transmission by which a stockholder has authorized another person to act as proxy for such stockholder may be substituted or used in lieu of the original writing or transmission for any and all purposes for which the original writing or transmission could be used, provided that such copy, facsimile telecommunication, or other reproduction shall be a complete reproduction of the entire original writing or transmission.
Appointment
 
7.2 . A proxy shall be filed with the Secretary of the Corporation before or at the time of the meeting or the delivery to the Corporation of the consent to corporate action in writing. A proxy shall become invalid three years after the date of its execution, unless otherwise provided in the proxy. A proxy with respect to a specified meeting shall entitle the holder thereof to vote at any reconvened meeting following adjournment of such meeting but shall not be valid after the final adjournment thereof.
Delivery to Corporation; Duration
SECTION 8.     .
Inspectors of Election
8.1 . In advance of any meeting of stockholders, the Board of Directors of the Corporation shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspectors of election at such meeting and to make a written report thereof. The Board of Directors may designate one or more persons to serve as alternate inspectors to serve in place of any inspector who is unable or fails to act. If no inspector or alternate is able to act at a meeting of stockholders, the chairman of such meeting shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspector of elections at such meeting.
Appointment
8.2 . The inspectors shall: (a) ascertain the number of shares of the Corporation outstanding and the voting power of each such share; (b) determine the shares represented at the meeting and the validity of proxies and ballots; (c) count all votes and ballots; (d) determine and retain for a reasonable period of time a record of the disposition of any challenges made to any determination by them; and (e) certify their determination of the number of shares represented at the meeting and their count of the votes and ballots. Each inspector of election shall, before entering upon the discharge of his or her duties, take and sign an oath to faithfully execute the duties of inspector with strict impartiality and according to the best of his or her ability. The inspectors of election may appoint or retain other persons or entities to assist them in the performance of their duties.
Duties
8.3 . The validity of any proxy or ballot executed for a meeting of stockholders shall be determined by the inspectors of election in accordance with the applicable provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law as then in effect. In determining the validity of any proxy transmitted by telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission, the inspectors shall record in writing the information upon which they relied in making such determination.
Determination of Proxy Validity
SECTION 9.    .
Fixing the Record Date
9.1 . For the purpose of determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at any meeting of stockholders or any adjournment thereof, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which record date shall be not fewer than thirty nor more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the date of such meeting. If the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, the record date for each special meeting of stockholders shall be not fewer than fifty-five nor more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date, unless the calling of such meeting is ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation. If no record date is fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for
Meetings
 
determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall be at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which notice is given, or, if notice is waived, at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which the meeting is held. A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting; provided, however, that the Board of Directors may fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
9.2 . For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which date shall not be more than ten (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days after the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, when no prior action by the Board of Directors is required by Chapter 1 of the Delaware General Corporation Law as now or hereafter amended, shall be the first date on which a signed written consent setting forth the action taken or proposed to be taken is delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the records of proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Delivery made to the Corporation's registered office shall be by hand or by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors and prior action by the Board of Directors is required by Chapter 1 of the Delaware General Corporation Law as now or hereafter amended, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution taking such prior action.
Consent to Corporate Action Without a Meeting
9.3 . For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to receive payment of any dividend or other distribution or allotment of any rights or the stockholders entitled to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion, or exchange of stock, or for the purpose of any other lawful action, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted, and which record date shall be not more than sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days prior to such action. If no record date is fixed, the record date for determining stockholders for any such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution relating thereto.
Dividends, Distributions, and Other Rights
9.4 . At least ten days before each meeting of stockholders, a complete list of the stockholders entitled to vote at such meeting shall be made, arranged in alphabetical order, and showing the address of each stockholder and the number of shares registered in the name of each stockholder. This list shall be open to examination by any stockholder, for any purpose germane to the meeting, during ordinary business hours, for a period of ten days prior to the meeting, either at a place within the city where the meeting is to be held, which place shall be specified in the notice of the meeting, or, if not so specified, at the place where the meeting is to be held. The list shall also be produced and kept at such meeting for inspection by any stockholder who is present.
Voting List
 
SECTION 10.    .
Action by Stockholders Without a Meeting
Subject to the provisions of Article NINTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, any action which could be taken at any annual or special meeting of stockholders may be taken without a meeting, without prior notice, and without a vote, if a consent or consents in writing, setting forth the action so taken, are (a) signed by the holders of outstanding stock having not fewer than the minimum number of votes that would be necessary to authorize or take such action at a meeting at which all shares entitled to vote thereon were present and voted and (b) delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the records of proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Delivery made to the Corporation's registered office shall be by hand or by certified mail or registered mail, return receipt requested. Every written consent shall bear the date of signature of each stockholder who signs the consent and no written consent shall be effective to take the corporate action referred to therein unless written consents signed by a sufficient number of stockholders to take such action are delivered to the Corporation, in the manner required by this Section, within sixty (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days of the date of the earliest dated consent delivered to the Corporation in the manner required by this Section 10. The validity of any consent executed by a proxy for a stockholder pursuant to a telegram, cablegram, or other means of electronic transmission transmitted to such proxy holder by or upon the authorization of the stockholder shall be determined by or at the direction of the Secretary of the Corporation. A written record of the information upon which the person making such determination relied shall be made and kept in the records of the proceedings of the stockholders. Any such consent shall be inserted in the minute book as if it were the minutes of a meeting of the stockholders. Prompt notice of the taking of the corporate action without a meeting by less than unanimous written consent shall be given to those stockholders who have not consented in writing.
SECTION 11.    .
Notice of Stockholder Business and Nominations; Required Vote for Directors; Director Qualification
11.1 .
Notice of Stockholder Business and Nominations
A. .
Annual Meetings of Stockholders
(1) Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors and the proposal of business to be considered by the stockholders may be made at an annual meeting of stockholders (a) pursuant to the Corporation's notice of meeting, (b) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or (c) by any stockholder of the Corporation who (i) was a stockholder of record at the time of giving of notice provided for in this By-Law and at the time of the annual meeting, (ii) is entitled to vote at the meeting and (iii) complies with the notice procedures set forth in this By-Law.
 
(2) For nominations or other business to be properly brought before an annual meeting by a stockholder pursuant to Section 11.1.A(1)(c) of this By-Law, the stockholder must have given timely notice thereof in writing to the Secretary and such other business must otherwise be a proper matter for stockholder action. To be timely, a stockholder's notice shall be delivered to the Secretary at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not earlier than the close of business on the one hundred and twentieth day and not later than the close of business on the ninetieth day prior to the first anniversary of the preceding year's annual meeting; provided, however, that in the event that the date of the annual meeting is more than thirty days before or more than sixty days after such anniversary date, notice by the stockholder to be timely must be so delivered not earlier than the close of business on the one hundred and twentieth day prior to such annual meeting and not later than the close of business on the later of the ninetieth day prior to such annual meeting and the tenth day following the day on which public announcement of the date of such meeting is first made by the Corporation. In no event shall the public announcement of an adjournment of an annual meeting commence a new time period for the giving of a stockholder's notice as described above. To be in proper form, a stockholder's notice to the Secretary must: (a) set forth, as to the stockholder giving the notice and the beneficial owner, if any, on whose behalf the nomination or proposal is made (i) the name and address of such stockholder, as they appear on the Corporation's books, and of such beneficial owner, if any, (ii) the class or series and number of shares of the Corporation which are owned beneficially and of record by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, as of the date of such notice (which information shall be supplemented by such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, not later than ten days after the record date for the meeting to disclose such ownership as of the record date), and (iii) any other information relating to such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, that would be required to be disclosed in a proxy statement or other filings required to be made in connection with solicitations of proxies for, as applicable, the proposal and/or for the election of directors in a contested election pursuant to Section 14 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder (the "Exchange Act"); (b) if the notice relates to any business other than the nomination of a director that the stockholder proposes to bring before the meeting, set forth (i) a brief description of the business desired to be brought before the meeting, the reasons for conducting such business at the meeting and any material interest of such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, in such business and (ii) a description of all agreements, arrangements and understandings between such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, and any other person or persons (including their names) in connection with the proposal of such business by such stockholder; (c) set forth, as to each person, if any, whom the stockholder proposes to nominate for election or reelection as a director (i) all information relating to such person that would be required to be disclosed in a proxy statement or other filings required to be made in connection with solicitations of proxies for election of directors in a contested election pursuant to Section 14 of the Exchange Act (including such person's written consent to being named in the proxy statement as a nominee and to serving as a director if elected and a statement whether such person, if elected, intends to tender, promptly following such person's election or re-election, an irrevocable resignation effective upon such person's failure to receive the required vote for re-election at the next meeting at which such person would face re-election and upon acceptance of such resignation by the Board of Directors) and (ii) a description of all direct and indirect compensation and other material monetary agreements, arrangements and understandings during the past three years, and any other material relationships, between or among such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, and their respective affiliates and associates,
 
or others acting in concert therewith, on the one hand, and each proposed nominee, and his or her respective affiliates and associates, or others acting in concert therewith, on the other hand, including, without limitation all information that would be required to be disclosed pursuant to Rule 404 promulgated under Regulation S-K if the stockholder making the nomination and any beneficial owner on whose behalf the nomination is made, if any, or any affiliate or associate thereof or person acting in concert therewith, were the "registrant" for purposes of such rule and the nominee were a director or executive officer of such registrant; and (d) with respect to each nominee for election or reelection to the Board of Directors, include the completed and signed questionnaire, representation and agreement required by Section 11.3 of this By-Law. The Corporation may require any proposed nominee to furnish such other information as may reasonably be required by the Corporation to determine the eligibility of such proposed nominee to serve as an independent director of the Corporation or that could be material to a reasonable stockholder's understanding of the independence, or lack thereof, of such nominee.
(3) Notwithstanding anything in the second sentence of Section 11.1.A(2) of this By-Law to the contrary, in the event that the number of directors to be elected to the Board of Directors of the Corporation is increased and there is no public announcement by the Corporation naming all of the nominees for director or specifying the size of the increased Board of Directors at least one hundred days prior to the first anniversary of the preceding year's annual meeting, a stockholder's notice required by this By-Law shall also be considered timely, but only with respect to nominees for any new positions created by such increase, if it shall be delivered to the Secretary at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not later than the close of business on the tenth day following the day on which such public announcement is first made by the Corporation.
B. . Only such business shall be conducted at a special meeting of stockholders as shall have been brought before the meeting pursuant to the Corporation's notice of meeting. Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors may be made at a special meeting of stockholders at which directors are to be elected pursuant to the Corporation's notice of meeting (a) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or (b) provided that the Board of Directors has determined that directors shall be elected at such meeting, by any stockholder of the Corporation who (i) is a stockholder of record at the time of giving of notice provided for in this By-Law and at the time of the special meeting, (ii) is entitled to vote at the meeting and (iii) complies with the notice procedures set forth in this By-Law. In the event the Corporation calls a special meeting of stockholders for the purpose of electing one or more directors to the Board of Directors, any such stockholder may nominate a person or persons (as the case may be) for election to such position(s) as specified in the Corporation's notice of meeting, if the stockholder's notice required by Section 11.1.A(2) of this By-Law (including the completed and signed questionnaire, representation and agreement required by Section 11.3 of this By-Law) shall be delivered to the Secretary at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not earlier than the close of business on the one hundred and twentieth day prior to such special meeting and not later than the close of business on the later of the ninetieth day prior to such special meeting and the tenth day following the day on which public announcement is first made of the date of the special meeting and of the nominees proposed by the Board of Directors to be elected at such meeting. In no event shall the public announcement of an adjournment of a special meeting commence a new time period for the giving of a stockholder's notice as described above.
Special Meetings of Stockholders
 
C. .
General
(1) Only such persons who are nominated in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law shall be eligible to serve as directors and only such business shall be conducted at a meeting of stockholders as shall have been brought before the meeting in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law. Except as otherwise provided by law, the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, the chairman of the meeting shall have the power and duty to determine whether a nomination or any business proposed to be brought before the meeting was made or proposed, as the case may be, in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law and, if any proposed nomination or business is not in compliance with this By-Law, to declare that such defective proposal or nomination shall be disregarded.
(2) For purposes of this By-Law, "public announcement" shall mean disclosure in a press release reported by the Dow Jones News Service, Associated Press or comparable national news service or in a document publicly filed by the Corporation with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to Section 13, 14 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act.
(3) Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this By-Law, a stockholder shall also comply with all applicable requirements of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations thereunder with respect to the matters set forth in this By-Law. Nothing in this By-Law shall be deemed to affect any rights (i) of stockholders to request inclusion of proposals in the Corporation's proxy statement pursuant to Rule 14a-8 under the Exchange Act or (ii) of the holders of any series of Preferred Stock if and to the extent provided for under law, the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws.
11.2 . A nominee for director shall be elected to the Board of Directors if the votes cast for such nominee's election exceed the votes cast against such nominee's election; provided, however, that the directors shall be elected by a plurality of the votes cast at any meeting of stockholders for which (i) the Secretary of the Corporation receives a notice that a stockholder has nominated a person for election to the Board of Directors in compliance with the advance notice requirements for stockholder nominees for director set forth in Section 11.1 of this By-law and (ii) such nomination has not been withdrawn by such stockholder on or prior to the tenth day preceding the date the Corporation first mails its notice of meeting for such meeting to stockholders. If directors are to be elected by a plurality of the votes cast, stockholders shall not be permitted to vote against a nominee. Votes cast shall exclude abstentions with respect to that director's election.
Required Vote for Directors
11.3 . To be eligible to be a nominee for election or reelection as a director of the Corporation, a person must deliver (in accordance with the time periods prescribed for delivery of notice under Section 11.1 of this By-Law) to the Secretary at the principal executive offices of the Corporation a written questionnaire with respect to the background and qualification of such person and the background of any other person or entity on whose behalf the nomination is being made (which questionnaire shall be provided by the Secretary upon written request) and a written representation and agreement (in the form provided by the Secretary upon written request), which agreement shall (i) provide
Director Qualification: Submission of Questionnaire, Representation and Agreement
 
that such person (A) is not and will not become a party to (1) any agreement, arrangement or understanding with, and has not given any commitment or assurance to, any person or entity as to how such person, if elected as a director of the Corporation, will act or vote on any issue or question (a "Voting Commitment") that has not been disclosed to the Corporation or (2) any Voting Commitment that could limit or interfere with such person's ability to comply, if elected as a director of the Corporation, with such person's fiduciary duties under applicable law, (B) is not and will not become a party to any agreement, arrangement or understanding with any person or entity other than the Corporation with respect to any direct or indirect compensation, reimbursement or indemnification in connection with service or action as a director that has not been disclosed therein, and (C) in such person's individual capacity and on behalf of any person or entity on whose behalf the nomination is being made, would be in compliance, if elected as a director of the Corporation, and will comply with all applicable publicly disclosed corporate governance, conflict of interest, confidentiality and stock ownership and trading policies and guidelines of the Corporation.
SECTION 12.    .
Notice to Corporation
Any written notice required to be delivered by a stockholder to the Corporation pursuant to Section 11.1 of this Article I or Section 2.1 of Article II of these By-Laws must be given, either by personal delivery or by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, to the Secretary at the Corporation's executive offices in the City of Seattle, State of Washington.
SECTION 1.    .
Number and Term of Office
The number of directors shall be eleven, but the number may be increased, or decreased to not less than three, from time to time, either by the directors by adoption of a resolution to such effect or by the stockholders by amendment of the By-Laws in accordance with Article VIII hereof. At each annual meeting of stockholders of the Corporation, each director shall be elected to hold office until the next annual meeting of stockholders or until his or her successor shall be elected and qualified or until his or her earlier resignation or removal.
SECTION 2.    .
Nomination and Election
2.1 . Only persons who are nominated in accordance with Article I, Section 11 of these By-Laws shall be eligible for election as directors.
Nomination
2.2 . At each election of directors by stockholders, the persons who are elected in accordance with Article I, Section 11 of these By-Laws shall be the directors.
Election
SECTION 3.    .
Place of Meeting
Meetings of the Board of Directors, or of any committee thereof, may be held either within or without the State of Delaware.
 
SECTION 4.    .
Annual Meeting
Each year the Board of Directors shall meet in connection with the annual meeting of stockholders for the purpose of electing officers and for the transaction of other business. No notice of such meeting is required. Such annual meeting may be held at any other time or place which shall be specified in a notice given as hereinafter provided for special meetings of the Board, or in a consent and waiver of notice thereof, signed by all the directors.
SECTION 5.    .
Stated Meetings
The Board of Directors may, by resolution adopted by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board, from time to time appoint the time and place for holding stated meetings of the Board, if by it deemed advisable; and such stated meetings shall thereupon be held at the time and place so appointed, without the giving of any special notice with regard thereto. In case the day appointed for a stated meeting shall fall upon a legal holiday, such meeting shall be held on the next following day, not a legal holiday, at the regularly appointed hour. Except as otherwise provided in the By-Laws, any and all business may be transacted at any stated meeting.
SECTION 6.    .
Special Meetings
6.1 . Special meetings of the Board of Directors may be called by or at the request of the Chairman of the Board or any two directors. Notice of a special meeting of the Board of Directors, stating the place, day, and hour of the meeting, shall be given to each director in writing (by mail, wire, facsimile, or personal delivery) or orally (by telephone or in person).
Convenors and Notice
6.2 . With respect to a special meeting of the Board of Directors, a written waiver, signed by a director, shall be deemed equivalent to notice to that director. A director's attendance at a meeting shall constitute that director's waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the director attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting was not lawfully called or convened. Neither the business to be transacted at, nor the purpose of, any regular or special meeting of the Board of Directors need be specified in the waiver of notice of such meeting.
Waiver of Notice
SECTION 7.    .
Quorum and Manner of Acting
Except as herein otherwise provided, forty percent of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided in these By-Laws at the time of any stated or special meeting of the Board or, if vacancies exist on the Board of Directors, forty percent of such number of directors then in office, provided, however, that such number may not be less than one-third of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided in these By-Laws, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and, except as otherwise required by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by the By-Laws, the act of a majority of the directors present at any such meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of the Board of Directors. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the directors present may adjourn any meeting, from time to time, until a quorum is present. No notice of any adjourned meeting need be given.
 
SECTION 8.    .
Chairman of the Board
The Chairman of the Board shall preside, when present, at all meetings of the Board, except as otherwise provided by law.
SECTION 9.    .
Resignations
Any director of the Corporation may resign at any time by giving written notice thereof to the Secretary. Such resignation shall take effect at the time specified therefor or if the time is not specified, upon delivery thereof; and, unless otherwise specified with respect thereto, the acceptance of such resignation shall not be necessary to make it effective.
SECTION 10.    .
Removal of Directors
Any directors may be removed with or without cause by the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, at a meeting of the stockholders called for that purpose; and the vacancy on the Board caused by any such removal may be filled by the stockholders at such meeting or at any subsequent meeting.
SECTION 11.    .
Filling of Vacancies Not Caused by Removal
In case of any increase in the number of directors, or of any vacancy created by death or resignation, the additional director or directors may be elected or, as the case may be, the vacancy or vacancies may be filled, either (a) by the Board of Directors at any meeting, (i) if the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH, or (ii) if the Corporation does not have an Interested Stockholder, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the remaining directors, though less than a quorum; or (b) by the stockholders entitled to vote, either at an annual meeting or at a special meeting thereof called for the purpose, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the outstanding shares entitled to vote at such meeting.
SECTION 12.    .
Directors' Fees
The Board of Directors shall have authority to determine from time to time the amount of compensation which shall be paid to its members for attendance at meetings of the Board or of any committee of the Board.
SECTION 13.    .
Action Without a Meeting
Any action required or permitted to be taken at any meeting of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof may be taken without a meeting if all members of the Board or committee, as the case may be, consent thereto in writing, and the writing or writings are filed with the minutes of proceedings of the Board or committee.
 
SECTION 1.    .
Audit Committee
In addition to any committees appointed pursuant to Section 2 of this Article, there shall be an Audit Committee, appointed annually by the Board of Directors, consisting of at least three directors who are not members of management. It shall be the responsibility of the Audit Committee to review the scope and results of the annual independent audit of books and records of the Corporation and its subsidiaries and to discharge such other responsibilities as may from time to time be assigned to it by the Board of Directors. The Audit Committee shall meet at such times and places as the members deem advisable, and shall make such recommendations to the Board of Directors as they consider appropriate.
SECTION 2.    .
Other Committees
2.1 . The Board of Directors may appoint standing or temporary committees and invest such committees with such powers as it may see fit, with power to subdelegate such powers if deemed desirable by the Board of Directors; but no such committee shall have the power or authority of the Board of Directors to adopt, amend, or repeal the By-Laws of the Corporation or approve, adopt or recommend to the stockholders of the Corporation any action or matter expressly required by the Certificate of Incorporation, these By-Laws or the Delaware General Corporation Law to be submitted to stockholders for approval.
Committee Powers
2.2 . The Board of Directors may designate one or more directors as alternate members of any committee, who may replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of the committee. In the absence or disqualification of a member of a committee, the member or members thereof present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, whether or not such member or members constitute a quorum, may unanimously appoint another member of the Board to act at the meeting in the place of any such absent or disqualified member.
Committee Members
SECTION 3.    .
Quorum and Manner of Acting
A majority of the number of directors composing any committee of the Board of Directors, as established and fixed by resolution of the Board of Directors, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at any meeting of such committee but, if less than a majority are present at a meeting, a majority of such directors present may adjourn the meeting from time to time without further notice. The act of a majority of the members of a committee present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of such committee.
 
SECTION 1.    .
Officers
The elected officers of the Corporation shall be a Chairman of the Board (who shall be a director) and, at the discretion of the Board, a President (who shall be a director), and one or more Vice Presidents (each of whom may be assigned by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer an additional title descriptive of the functions assigned to such officer and one or more of whom may be designated Executive or Senior Vice President). The Board may also elect one or more Vice Chairmen. The Board of Directors shall also designate either the Chairman of the Board or the President as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation. The Board of Directors shall appoint a Controller, a Secretary, and a Treasurer. Any number of offices, whether elective or appointive, may be held by the same person. The Chief Executive Officer may, by a writing filed with the Secretary, designate titles as officers for employees and agents and appoint Assistant Secretaries and Assistant Treasurers, as, from time to time, may appear to be necessary or advisable in the conduct of the affairs of the Corporation and may, in the same manner, terminate or change such titles.
SECTION 2.    .
Term of Office
So far as practicable, all elected officers shall be elected at the annual meeting of the Board in each year, and shall hold office until the annual meeting of the Board in the next subsequent year and until their respective successors are chosen. The Controller, Secretary, and Treasurer shall hold office at the pleasure of the Board.
SECTION 3.    .
Salaries of Elected Officers
The salaries paid to the elected officers of the Corporation shall be authorized or approved by the Board of Directors.
SECTION 4.    .
Bonuses
None of the officers, directors, or employees of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations shall at any time be paid any bonus or share in the earnings or profits of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations except pursuant to a plan approved by affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members of the Board of Directors.
SECTION 5.    .
Removal of Elected and Appointed Officers
Any elected or appointed officer may be removed at any time, either for or without cause, by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors, at any meeting called for the purpose.
SECTION 6.    .
Vacancies
If any vacancy occurs in any office, the Board of Directors may elect or appoint a successor to fill such vacancy for the remainder of the term.
 
SECTION 1.    .
Chairman of the Board
The Chairman of the Board shall preside, when present, at all meetings of the stockholders (except as otherwise provided by statute) and at all meetings of the Board of Directors. The Chairman shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation; to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the Chairman by the Board of Directors.
SECTION 2.    .
President
The President shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation and to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; during the absence or disability of the Chairman of the Board to exercise the Chairman's powers and to perform the Chairman's duties; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the President by the Board of Directors; provided, that if the office of President is vacant, the Chairman shall exercise the duties ordinarily exercised by the President until such time as a President is elected or appointed.
SECTION 3.    .
Chief Executive Officer
The officer designated by the Board of Directors as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation shall have general and active control of its business and affairs. The Chief Executive Officer shall have general power to appoint or designate all employees and agents of the Corporation whose appointment or designation is not otherwise provided for and to fix the compensation thereof, subject to the provisions of these By-Laws; to remove or suspend any employee or agent who shall not have been elected or appointed by the Board of Directors or other body; to suspend for cause any employee, agent, or officer, other than an elected officer, pending final action by the body which shall have appointed such employee, agent, or officer; and to exercise all the powers usually pertaining to the office held by the Chief Executive Officer of a corporation.
SECTION 4.    .
Vice Presidents and Controller
The several Vice Presidents and the Controller shall perform all such duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of them, from time to time, by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer, respectively.
SECTION 5.    .
Secretary
The Secretary shall attend to the giving of notice of all meetings of stockholders and of the Board of Directors and shall keep and attest true records of all proceedings thereat. The Secretary shall have charge of the corporate seal and have authority to attest any and all instruments or writings to which the same may be affixed and shall keep and account for all books, documents, papers, and records of the Corporation relating to its corporate organization. The Secretary shall have authority to sign stock certificates and shall generally perform all the duties usually appertaining to the office of secretary of a corporation. In the absence of the Secretary, an Assistant Secretary or Secretary pro tempore shall perform the duties of the Secretary.
 
SECTION 6.    .
Treasurer
The Treasurer shall have the care and custody of all moneys, funds, and securities of the Corporation, and shall deposit or cause to be deposited all funds of the Corporation in accordance with directions or authorizations of the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer. The Treasurer shall have power to sign stock certificates, to indorse for deposit or collection, or otherwise, all checks, drafts, notes, bills of exchange, or other commercial paper payable to the Corporation, and to give proper receipts or discharges therefor. In the absence of the Treasurer, an Assistant Treasurer shall perform the duties of the Treasurer.
SECTION 7.    .
Additional Powers and Duties
In addition to the foregoing especially enumerated duties and powers, the several officers of the Corporation shall perform such other duties and exercise such further powers as may be provided in these By-Laws or as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine, or as may be assigned to them by any superior officer.
SECTION 8.    .
Disaster Emergency Powers of Acting Officers
If, as a result of a disaster or other state of emergency, the Chief Executive Officer is unable to perform the duties of that office, (a) the powers and duties of the Chief Executive Officer shall be performed by the employee with the highest base salary who shall be available and capable of performing such powers and duties and, if more than one such employee has the same base salary, by the employee whose surname begins with the earliest letter of the alphabet among the group of those employees with the same base salary; and (b) the officer performing such duties shall continue to perform such powers and duties until the Chief Executive Officer becomes capable of performing those duties or until the Board of Directors shall have elected a new Chief Executive Officer or designated another individual as Acting Chief Executive Officer; and (c) such officer shall have the power in addition to all other powers granted to the Chief Executive Officer by these By-Laws and by the Board of Directors to appoint an acting President, acting Vice President  Finance, acting Controller, acting Secretary, and acting Treasurer, if any of the persons duly elected to any such office is not by reason of such disaster or emergency able to perform the duties of such office, each of such acting appointees to serve in such capacities until the officer for whom the appointee is acting becomes capable of performing the duties of such office or until the Board of Directors shall have designated another individual to perform such duties or have elected another person to fill such office; and (d) any such acting officer so appointed shall be entitled to exercise all powers vested by the By-Laws or the Board of Directors in the duly elected officer for whom the acting officer is acting; and (e) anyone transacting business with this Corporation may rely upon a certification by any two officers of the Corporation that a specified individual has succeeded to the powers of the Chief Executive Officer and that such person has appointed other acting officers as herein provided and any person, firm, corporation, or other entity to which such certification has been delivered by such officers may continue to rely upon it until notified of a change in writing signed by two officers of this Corporation.
 
SECTION 1.    .
Stock Certificates
Every stockholder shall be entitled to a certificate, signed by the Chairman of the Board or the President or a Vice President and the Treasurer or an Assistant Treasurer or the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary, certifying the number of shares owned by the stockholder in the Corporation. Any and all of the signatures on a certificate may be a facsimile. If any officer, transfer agent, or registrar who has signed or whose facsimile signature has been placed upon a certificate shall have ceased to be such officer, transfer agent, or registrar before such certificate is issued, it may be issued by the Corporation with the same effect as if he or she were such officer, transfer agent, or registrar at the date of issue.
SECTION 2.    .
Transfer Agents and Registrars
The Board of Directors may, in its discretion, appoint responsible banks or trust companies in the Borough of Manhattan, in the City of New York, State of New York, and in such other city or cities as the Board may deem advisable, from time to time, to act as transfer agents and registrars of the stock of the Corporation; and, when such appointments shall have been made, no stock certificate shall be valid until countersigned by one of such transfer agents and registered by one of such registrars.
SECTION 3.    .
Transfers of Stock
Shares of stock may be transferred by delivery of the certificates therefor, accompanied either by an assignment in writing on the back of the certificates or by written power of attorney to sell, assign, and transfer the same, signed by the record holder thereof; but no transfer shall affect the right of the Corporation to pay any dividend upon the stock to the holder of record thereof, or to treat the holder of record as the holder in fact thereof for all purposes, and no transfer shall be valid, except between the parties thereto, until such transfer shall have been made upon the books of the Corporation.
SECTION 4.    .
Lost Certificates
The Board of Directors may provide for the issuance of new certificates of stock to replace certificates of stock lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, or alleged to be lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, upon such terms and in accordance with such procedures as the Board of Directors shall deem proper and prescribe.
 
SECTION 1.    .
Fiscal Year
The fiscal year of the Corporation shall be the calendar year.
 
SECTION 2.    
(Repealed in its entirety by vote of the stockholders, May 5, 1975.)
SECTION 3.    .
Signing of Negotiable Instruments
All bills, notes, checks, or other instruments for the payment of money shall be signed or countersigned by such officer or officers and in such manner as from time to time may be prescribed by resolution (whether general or special) of the Board of Directors.
SECTION 4.    .
Indemnification of Directors and Officers
4.1 . Each person who was or is made a party or is threatened to be made a party to or is otherwise involved (including, without limitation, as a witness) in any actual or threatened action, suit, or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative, or investigative (hereinafter a "proceeding"), by reason of the fact that he or she is or was a director or officer of the Corporation or that, being or having been such a director or officer or an employee of the Corporation, he or she is or was serving at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation as a director, officer, employee, or agent of another corporation or of a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise, including service with respect to an employee benefit plan (hereinafter an "indemnitee"), whether the basis of such proceeding is alleged action in an official capacity as such a director, officer, employee, or agent or in any other capacity while serving as such a director, officer, employee, or agent, shall be indemnified and held harmless by the Corporation to the full extent permitted by the Delaware General Corporation Law, as the same exists or may hereafter be amended (but, in the case of any such amendment, only to the extent that such amendment permits the Corporation to provide broader indemnification rights than permitted prior thereto), or by other applicable law as then in effect, against all expense, liability, and loss (including attorneys' fees, judgments, fines, ERISA excise taxes or penalties, and amounts paid in settlement) actually and reasonably incurred or suffered by such indemnitee in connection therewith and such indemnification shall continue as to an indemnitee who has ceased to be a director, officer, employee, or agent and shall inure to the benefit of the indemnitee's heirs, executors, and administrators; provided, however, that except as provided in Section 4.2 with respect to proceedings seeking to enforce rights to indemnification, the Corporation shall indemnify any such indemnitee in connection with a proceeding (or part thereof) initiated by such indemnitee only if such proceeding (or part thereof) was authorized or ratified by the Board of Directors of the Corporation. The right to indemnification conferred in this Section 4.1 shall be a contract right and shall include the right to be paid by the Corporation the expenses incurred in defending any such proceeding in advance of its final disposition (hereinafter an "advancement of expenses"); provided, however, that an advancement of expenses incurred by an indemnitee in his or her capacity as a director or officer (and not in any other capacity in which service was or is rendered by such indemnitee, including, without limitation, service to an employee benefit plan) shall be made only upon delivery to the Corporation of an under-taking (hereinafter an "undertaking"), by or on behalf of such indemnitee, to repay all amounts so advanced if it shall ultimately be determined by final judicial decision from which there is no further right to appeal that such indemnitee is not entitled to be indemnified for such expenses under this Section 4.1 or otherwise; and provided, further, that an advancement of expenses shall not be made if the Corporation's Board of Directors makes a good faith determination that such payment would violate law or public policy.
Right to Indemnification
 
4.2 . If a claim under Section 4.1 is not paid in full by the Corporation within sixty days after a written claim has been received by the Corporation, except in the case of a claim for an advancement of expenses, in which case the applicable period shall be twenty days, the indemnitee may at any time thereafter bring suit against the Corporation to recover the unpaid amount of the claim. If successful in whole or in part in any such suit, or in a suit brought by the Corporation to recover an advancement of expenses pursuant to the terms of an undertaking, the indemnitee shall also be entitled to be paid the expense of prosecuting or defending such suit. The indemnitee shall be presumed to be entitled to indemnification under this Section 4 upon submission of a written claim (and, in an action brought to enforce a claim for an advancement of expenses, where the required undertaking has been tendered to the Corporation), and thereafter the Corporation shall have the burden of proof to overcome the presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled. Neither the failure of the Corporation (including its Board of Directors, independent legal counsel, or its stockholders) to have made a determination prior to the commencement of such suit that indemnification of the indemnitee is proper in the circumstances, nor an actual determination by the Corporation (including its Board of Directors, independent legal counsel, or its stockholders) that the indemnitee is not entitled to indemnification shall be a defense to the suit or create a presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled.
Right of Indemnitee to Bring Suit
4.3 . The rights to indemnification and to the advancement of expenses conferred in this Section 4 shall not be exclusive of any other right which any person may have or hereafter acquire under any statute, provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation, By-Laws, agreement, vote of stockholders or disinterested directors, or otherwise. Notwithstanding any amendment to or repeal of this Section 4, or of any of the procedures established by the Board of Directors pursuant to Section 4.7, any indemnitee shall be entitled to indemnification in accordance with the provisions hereof and thereof with respect to any acts or omissions of such indemnitee occurring prior to such amendment or repeal.
Nonexclusivity of Rights
4.4 . The Corporation may maintain insurance, at its expense, to protect itself and any director, officer, employee, or agent of the Corporation or another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise against any expense, liability, or loss, whether or not the Corporation would have the power to indemnify such person against such expense, liability, or loss under the Delaware General Corporation Law. The Corporation may, without further stockholder approval, enter into contracts with any indemnitee in furtherance of the provisions of this Section 4 and may create a trust fund, grant a security interest, or use other means (including, without limitation, a letter of credit) to ensure the payment of such amounts as may be necessary to effect indemnification as provided in this Section 4.
Insurance, Contracts, and Funding
4.5 . Any person who is or was a director, officer, or employee of the Corporation who is or was serving (i) as a director or officer of another corporation of which a majority of the shares entitled to vote in the election of its directors is held by the Corporation or (ii) in an executive or management capacity in a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise of which the Corporation or a wholly owned subsidiary of the Corporation is a general partner or has a majority ownership shall be deemed to be so serving at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation and entitled to indemnification and advancement of expenses under Section 4.1.
Persons Serving Other Entities
 
4.6 . The Corporation may, by action of its Board of Directors, authorize one or more executive officers to grant rights to advancement of expenses to employees or agents of the Corporation on such terms and conditions as such officer or officers deem appropriate under the circumstances. The Corporation may, by action of its Board of Directors, grant rights to indemnification and advancement of expenses to employees or agents or groups of employees or agents of the Corporation with the same scope and effect as the provisions of this Section 4 with respect to the indemnification and advancement of expenses of directors and officers of the Corporation; provided, however, that an undertaking shall be made by an employee or agent only if required by the Board of Directors.
Indemnification of Employees and Agents of the Corporation
4.7 . The Board of Directors may establish reasonable procedures for the submission of claims for indemnification pursuant to this Section 4, determination of the entitlement of any person thereto, and review of any such determination. Such procedures shall be set forth in an appendix to these By-Laws and shall be deemed for all purposes to be a part hereof.
Procedures for the Submission of Claims
SECTION 1.    .
Amendment of the By-Laws: General
Except as herein otherwise expressly provided, the By-Laws of the Corporation may be altered or repealed in any particular and new By-Laws, not inconsistent with any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or any provision of law, may be adopted, either by
(A) the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority in number of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote at an annual meeting of stockholders or at a special meeting thereof, the notice of which special meeting shall include the form of the proposed alteration or repeal or of the proposed new By-Laws, or a summary thereof; or
(B) either by
(i) the affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors at any meeting thereof, or
(ii) the affirmative vote of all the directors present at any meeting at which a quorum, less than a majority, is present;
provided, in either of the latter cases, that the notice of such meeting shall include the form of the proposed alteration or repeal or of the proposed new By-Laws, or a summary thereof; and provided, further, that Article I Section 11.2 of these By-Laws may be amended only as set forth in Section 1.A of this By-Law, except that any amendment required by law or necessary or desirable to cure an administrative or technical deficiency may be made as provided in Section 1.B of this By-Law.
 
SECTION 2.    .
Amendments as to Compensation and Removal of Officers
Notwithstanding anything contained in these By-Laws to the contrary, the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the Voting Stock, as defined in Article FOURTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, at a meeting of the stockholders called for the purpose, shall be required to alter, amend, repeal, or adopt any provision inconsistent with Sections 3, 4 and 5 of Article IV hereof, notice of which meeting shall include the form of the proposed amendment, or a summary thereof.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20080723090002.txt.gz
TIME:20080723090002
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
 
(a) On July 23, 2008, The Boeing Company issued a press release reporting its financial results for the second quarter of 2008.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
(a) Not applicable
 
(b) Not applicable
 
(c) Not applicable
 
(d) Exhibits
 
99.1    Press Release issued by The Boeing Company dated July 23, 2008, reporting Boeing's financial results for the second quarter of 2008.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Boeing Reports Second-Quarter Financial Results, Reaffirms Guidance
 
 
 
 
 
Table 1. Summary Financial Results
 
 The Boeing Company's [NYSE: BA] second-quarter earnings per share decreased 14 percent to $1.16 per share, on revenue of $17.0 billion and an operating margin of 7.4 percent. Results were affected by the previously disclosed charge for the Airborne Early Warning & Control (AEW&C) program and lower profitability due to mix and timing in Commercial Airplanes, partially offset by lower centralized costs (Table 1).
CHICAGO, July 23, 2008
For the first half of 2008, revenue grew 2 percent to $33.0 billion, operating margin grew to 9.2 percent, net income rose 7 percent to $2.1 billion, and earnings per share increased 13 percent to $2.79 per share, despite the AEW&C charge. Results reflected good performance in the company's core businesses and lower unallocated costs.
Boeing reaffirmed its 2008 earnings per share guidance of between $5.70 and $5.85 as well as its 2009 earnings per share guidance of between $6.80 and $7.00.
 
"While we faced some challenges this quarter that affected our results, we remain confident in our outlook for the remainder of this year and 2009," said Chairman, President and CEO Jim McNerney. "Strong global demand for our products and services, a record backlog, and a sustained focus on productivity improvement and execution will continue to drive growth and profitability for this company."
Second-quarter operating cash flow was ($0.3) billion, reflecting a planned increase in working capital requirements, mostly inventory for 787 (Table 2). First-half operating cash flow was $1.7 billion, and free cash flow* was $0.9 billion. Total company backlog at quarter-end was $346 billion, up 6 percent year-to-date driven by commercial airplane orders.
Table 2. Cash Flow
 
 
Cash and investments in marketable securities totaled $10.2 billion at quarter-end, down from the end of the first quarter but essentially unchanged from the same period last year (Table 3). During the quarter, the company returned $1.2 billion to shareholders by repurchasing 11.0 million shares for $859 million and paying $300 million in dividends. Share repurchases in the first half totaled $2.1 billion for 26.6 million shares.
Table 3. Cash, Marketable Securities and Debt Balances
 
 
 
Segment Results
Commercial Airplanes
Boeing Commercial Airplanes (BCA) second-quarter revenues were $8.6 billion, 2 percent below the same period last year, driven by customer and model mix and lower aircraft trading revenues, partially offset by higher delivery unit volume (Table 4). Operating earnings were $777 million versus $960 million in the year ago period due to customer and model mix, as well as timing of period expenses and infrastructure costs absorbed by the production programs due to the 787 schedule push-out announced in April.
Table 4. Commercial Airplanes Operating Results
 
For the first half, BCA revenues rose 3 percent to $16.7 billion on higher deliveries partially offset by lower aircraft trading volume and customer mix. Operating earnings grew 6 percent to $1.8 billion while margins expanded to 10.5 percent driven by higher deliveries and lower R&D, partially offset by higher period expenses, and the infrastructure cost absorption noted above.
BCA booked 187 gross orders during the quarter and 476 during the first half. Contractual backlog rose to a record $275 billion, increasing 8 percent year-to-date to nearly eight times BCA's annual revenues.
Progress on the new 787 Dreamliner continues on the revised schedule announced in April. Having completed the power-on milestone, the program is in the final stages of assembly of the first airplane in preparation for flight test. While Boeing continues to address challenges associated with assembly of the initial airplanes, the program has achieved meaningful improvements in the completeness of structure and systems installation. The company completed its acquisition of a 50 percent equity interest in Global Aeronautica which will allow Boeing to exercise greater operational control of this key 787 integration facility. The risks that are always inherent in the latter stages of new airplane program production still remain. The company expects the first flight of the 787 to occur in the fourth quarter of 2008 with first delivery in the third quarter of 2009. To date, the program has won orders for 896 airplanes from 58 customers.
 
Integrated Defense Systems
Boeing Integrated Defense Systems (IDS) reported second-quarter revenue of $7.9 billion, virtually unchanged from last year. Operating earnings were $637 million and were affected by the previously disclosed $248 million charge on the AEW&C program. This charge reduced IDS operating margins by 3.2 points to 8.0 percent.
For the first half, IDS revenue declined slightly to $15.5 billion, operating earnings declined 9 percent to $1.5 billion and operating margins declined to 9.7 percent, reduced 1.6 points by the charge.
Table 5. Integrated Defense Systems Operating Results
 
Precision Engagement & Mobility Systems, which was just renamed Boeing Military Aircraft, reported second-quarter revenues slightly lower at $3.3 billion because of fewer aircraft deliveries. Although overall production program performance was strong, the operating margins were 4.9 percent for the quarter due to the charge noted above which reduced margins by 7.5 points.
For the quarter, revenues in Network & Space Systems declined slightly to $2.8 billion on lower Proprietary volume. Operating margins of 8.5 percent were due to solid performance across the segment's broad array of programs partially offset by lower Proprietary earnings. N&SS achieved significant milestones on several key programs in the quarter including Future Combat Systems' successful completion of the Joint Expeditionary Force Experiment.
Support Systems again generated strong growth and profitability on its broad portfolio of services and logistics programs. Revenues rose 11 percent to $1.8 billion on growth in integrated logistics and aircraft modifications. Operating earnings rose 24 percent to $240 million, and the operating margin grew to 13.1 percent on solid program execution, productivity improvements and contract mix.
 
The IDS backlog at quarter-end was $71.3 billion, down from the beginning of the quarter reflecting current-period revenues that exceeded new orders. Significant new awards in the quarter included a follow-on Republic of Korea contract for F-15Ks , KC-135 Programmed Depot Maintenance and a significant Proprietary contract.
Boeing Capital Corporation
Boeing Capital Corporation (BCC) reported second-quarter pre-tax earnings of $45 million down from $70 million in the same period last year which included a larger portfolio (Table 6). In the Other segment, the company also increased aircraft financing reserves by $82 million. BCC's portfolio balance at the end of the quarter was $6.2 billion, down from $6.5 billion at the beginning of the year primarily on normal portfolio run-off and depreciation. BCC contributed $39 million in cash dividends to Boeing during the quarter and $74 million in the first half. BCC's debt-to-equity ratio remained steady at 5.0-to-1.
Table 6. Boeing Capital Corporation Operating Results
 
Additional Information
The "Other" segment consists primarily of Boeing Engineering, Operations and Technology as well as certain results related to the consolidation of all business units. Other segment expense was $135 million in the second quarter, up from $66 million in the same period last year due to the increased aircraft financing reserves noted above.
Unallocated expense was $77 million, down from $313 million last year. Share-based plans expense was $118 million lower due to acceleration of expense in the year-ago quarter. Deferred compensation expense was $73 million lower due to changes in Boeing stock price and broad stock market conditions. Unallocated pension expense was lower by $65 million.
 
Total pension expense was $216 million, down from $251 million in the same quarter last year, of which $76 million was recorded in unallocated expense and the balance was recorded as expense in the business segments.
Outlook
The financial guidance issued in April is unchanged, other than an adjustment between IDS segment margins that is referenced below. The guidance reflects expectations for strong business performance in BCA and IDS, increasing commercial airplane deliveries, decreasing investment in new airplane development, and company-wide productivity gains.
Boeing's 2008 revenue guidance is $67 billion to $68 billion. For 2009, the company expects revenues between $72 billion and $73 billion. Earnings-per-share guidance for 2008 is reaffirmed at $5.70 to $5.85 per share while EPS guidance for 2009 remains at $6.80 to $7.00 per share. For 2008 operating cash flow is expected to be greater than $2.5 billion, increasing to more than $6 billion in 2009.
Commercial Airplanes' 2008 delivery guidance remains between 475 and 480 airplanes and is sold out. BCA revenue guidance for 2008 remains $34.5 billion to $35 billion, and operating margin guidance is approximately 11.5 percent, as the mix and expense timing issues experienced in the second quarter are addressed in the second half of the year. In 2009 BCA expects to deliver between 500 and 505 commercial airplanes  including approximately 25 Dreamliners  and is essentially sold out. BCA's 2009 revenue is expected to grow to between $37 billion and $38 billion, accompanied by margins of approximately 11.5 percent. Boeing also expects to deliver more airplanes in 2010 than in 2009.
IDS revenue guidance for 2008 is $32 billion to $33 billion. Expected operating margins for IDS remain unchanged at approximately 10.5 percent, although the segment margins within IDS have been adjusted for 2008. For 2009, IDS expects revenue to grow to between $33.5 billion and $34.5 billion, with operating margins exceeding 10.5 percent.
Boeing's 2008 R&D forecast is between $3.6 billion and $3.8 billion. R&D spending in 2009 is expected to decline to between $3.1 billion and $3.3 billion. Annual capital expenditures are expected to be approximately $1.8 billion in 2008 and approximately $1.7 billion in 2009.
 
The company's non-cash pension expense is expected to be approximately $0.8 billion for 2008, falling to approximately $0.5 billion in 2009, although it may vary due to discount rates and investment returns. Discretionary cash funding of Boeing's pension plans is expected to be approximately $0.5 billion in 2008 (contributed during the first quarter) and 2009, although the company will continue to evaluate making additional discretionary contributions to its pension plans.
Table 7. Financial Outlook
 
 
 
Non-GAAP Measure Disclosure
Management believes that the non-GAAP (Generally Accepted Accounting Principles) measures (indicated by an asterisk *) used in this report provide investors with important perspectives into the company's ongoing business performance. The company does not intend for the information to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the related GAAP measures. Other companies may define the measures differently. The following definitions are provided:
Free Cash Flow
Free cash flow is defined as GAAP less capital expenditures for . Management believes free cash flow provides investors with an important perspective on the cash available for shareholders, debt repayment, and acquisitions after making the capital investments required to support ongoing business operations and long term value creation. Free cash flow does not represent the residual cash flow available for discretionary expenditures as it excludes certain mandatory expenditures such as repayment of maturing debt. Management uses free cash flow internally to assess both business performance and overall liquidity. Table 2 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and free cash flow.
operating cash flow
property, plant and equipment additions
 
Certain statements in this report may constitute "forward-looking" statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Forward-looking statements in this press release include, among others, statements regarding future results as a result of our growth and productivity initiatives, our 2008 and 2009 financial outlook and the benefits of the IDS structure. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions as to future events that may not prove to be accurate. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak only as of the date they were made and we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise. Our actual results and future trends may differ materially depending on a variety of factors, including the continued operation, viability and growth of major airline customers and non-airline customers (such as the U.S. Government); adverse developments in the value of collateral securing customer and other financings; the occurrence of any significant collective bargaining labor dispute; our successful execution of internal performance plans including our company-wide growth and productivity initiatives, production rate increases and decreases (including any reduction in or termination of an aircraft product), availability of raw materials, acquisition and divestiture plans, and other cost-reduction and productivity efforts; charges from any future SFAS No. 142 review; ability to meet development, production and certification schedules for the 787 program and the ability to meet scheduled deliveries of the 787 airplane; technical or quality issues in development programs (affecting schedule and cost estimates) or in the satellite industry; an adverse development in rating agency credit ratings or assessments; the actual outcomes of certain pending sales campaigns and U.S. and foreign government procurement activities, including the uncertainty associated with the procurement of tankers by the U.S. Department of Defense (DoD) and funding of the C-17 program; the cyclical nature of some of our businesses; unanticipated financial market changes which may impact pension plan assumptions; domestic and international competition in the defense, space and commercial areas; continued integration of acquired businesses; performance issues with key suppliers, subcontractors and customers; significant disruption to air travel worldwide (including future terrorist attacks); global trade policies; worldwide political stability; domestic and international economic conditions; price escalation; the outcome of political and legal processes, changing priorities or reductions in the U.S. Government or foreign government defense and space budgets; termination of government or commercial contracts due to unilateral government or customer action or failure to perform; legal, financial and governmental risks related to international transactions; legal and investigatory proceedings; tax settlements with the IRS and various states; U.S. Air Force review of previously awarded contracts; costs associated with the exit of the Connexion by Boeing business; and other economic, political and technological risks and uncertainties. Additional information regarding these factors is contained in our SEC filings, including, without limitation, our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007 and our Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2008.
Contact:
Investor Relations: Diana Sands or Rob Young (312) 544-2140
Communications: Todd Blecher (312) 544-2002
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20081022100230.txt.gz
TIME:20081022100230
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
 
(a) On October 22, 2008, The Boeing Company issued a press release reporting its financial results for the third quarter of 2008.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
(a) Not applicable
 
(b) Not applicable
 
(c) Not applicable
 
(d) Exhibits
 
99.1    Press Release issued by The Boeing Company dated October 22, 2008, reporting Boeing's financial results for the third quarter of 2008.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Boeing Posts Lower Third-Quarter Results on Reduced Commercial Deliveries
 
 
 
 
Table 1. Summary Financial Results
 
 The Boeing Company's [NYSE: BA] third-quarter net income declined 38 percent, to $695 million, while earnings per share declined 33 percent to $0.96 per share, both reflecting an ongoing machinists' strike and supplier production challenges on customer-furnished galleys for certain wide-body airplanes. Those items reduced third-quarter commercial airplane deliveries by approximately 35 units and net earnings by an estimated $0.60 per share. Revenues for the quarter declined 7 percent, to $15.3 billion (Table 1).
CHICAGO, Oct. 22, 2008
"While the suspension of commercial airplane deliveries had a major impact on the quarter, we effectively executed the remainder of our business and kept our focus on the strong balance sheet we have built over the past few years," said Chairman, President and CEO Jim McNerney. "That balance sheet, along with our broad-based, record $349 billion backlog, gives us exceptional flexibility for weathering an extended work stoppage and for adapting to circumstances that may arise from the global financial crisis and softening global economy."
 
Boeing will provide updated financial guidance and an assessment of the schedule for its affected airplanes after the strike concludes.
For the nine months of 2008, net income fell 9 percent to $2.8 billion, earnings per share decreased 4 percent to $3.76 per share, and revenue fell 1 percent to $48.2 billion. The operating margin was slightly lower at 8.7 percent. Results were impacted by the lower commercial airplane deliveries and higher costs for AEW&C announced in the second quarter, partially offset by lower pension and deferred compensation expenses. There were no significant write-downs due to the global financial crisis.
Third-quarter operating cash outflow was $0.4 billion, reflecting the effects of the labor strike and a planned increase in working capital requirements, mostly inventory for 787 (Table 2). Operating cash flow for the first nine months was $1.2 billion, and free cash flow* was essentially zero. Total company backlog at quarter-end was $349 billion, up 7 percent year-to-date driven by commercial airplane orders and new contract awards at IDS.
Table 2. Cash Flow
 
 
Cash and investments in marketable securities totaled $7.2 billion at quarter-end, down from the end of the second quarter, reflecting 787 inventory growth, strike impacts and previously announced business acquisitions (Table 3). The company also completed $589 million in scheduled repayments of BCC debt during the quarter.
Table 3. Cash, Marketable Securities and Debt Balances
 
 
 
During the quarter, the company returned $0.8 billion to shareholders by repurchasing 7.9 million shares for $519 million and paying $295 million in dividends. Share repurchases in the first nine months totaled $2.6 billion for 34.5 million shares.
Segment Results
Commercial Airplanes
Boeing Commercial Airplanes (BCA) third-quarter revenues were $6.9 billion, 16 percent below the same period last year, driven by the fewer deliveries due to the strike and supplier production challenges on customer-furnished galleys for certain wide-body airplanes (Table 4). The labor strike has affected production of all airplane programs in Seattle, Portland and Wichita. Earnings from operations declined to $394 million from $945 million in the year-ago period due to the lower deliveries, the absence of supplier R&D cost sharing payments and additional 747 program costs.
Table 4. Commercial Airplanes Operating Results
 
For the first nine months, BCA revenues decreased 3 percent to $23.7 billion on lower deliveries due to the strike and galley shortage. Operating earnings decreased 18 percent to $2.2 billion while margins were 9.1 percent, driven by the lower deliveries, infrastructure cost absorption and additional 747 program costs that were partially offset by lower research and development spending.
BCA booked 149 gross orders during the quarter and 625 during the first nine months. Contractual backlog rose to a record $276 billion, increasing 8 percent year-to-date to approximately eight times BCA's annual revenues.
The 787 Dreamliner made progress during the quarter despite the labor strike. Key milestones included a successful hydraulic system test, landing gear test, and pressurization test of the static airframe  the last, a key step in validating the structural integrity of the airplane. The program also began testing the flight controls and began final assembly of the fourth flight-test airplane. To date, the program has won 895 net airplane orders from 58 customers.
 
Integrated Defense Systems
Boeing Integrated Defense Systems (IDS) third quarter revenues rose 6 percent to $8.5 billion on higher volumes across all segments. Operating earnings rose 4 percent to $854 million, yielding an operating margin of 10.1 percent. The strike reduced IDS operating margins by an estimated 0.4 points.
For the first nine months, IDS revenue increased to $24.0 billion, operating earnings declined 4 percent to $2.4 billion and operating margins declined to 9.8 percent, including a reduction of 1.0 point due to the second-quarter AEW&C charge.
Table 5. Integrated Defense Systems Operating Results
 
Boeing Military Aircraft reported third-quarter revenues of $3.8 billion, 12 percent higher than the prior year, on a favorable mix of aircraft deliveries. Operating margins were 9.9 percent for the quarter, reduced by an estimated 1.0 point due to the strike.
For the quarter, revenues in Network & Space Systems increased slightly to $3.0 billion. Operating margins of 10.1 percent were due to solid performance across the segment's broad array of programs.
Global Services & Support revenues rose 4 percent to $1.7 billion on growth in integrated logistics. The business's outstanding program performance was offset by contract mix and disposition of contract matters, causing operating earnings to fall 26 percent to $180 million and the operating margin to decrease to 10.4 percent.
The IDS backlog increased during the quarter to $73.0 billion. Significant new awards in the quarter included a Chinook multi-year contract, Qatar's C-17 order and an International Space Station contract extension.
 
Boeing Capital Corporation
Boeing Capital Corporation (BCC) reported third-quarter pre-tax earnings of $37 million, down from $61 million in the same period last year which included a significantly larger portfolio (Table 6). BCC's portfolio balance at the end of the quarter was $6.1 billion, down from $6.5 billion at the beginning of the year primarily on normal portfolio run-off and depreciation. BCC contributed $146 million in cash dividends to Boeing during the quarter and $220 million in the first nine months. BCC's debt-to-equity ratio remained steady at 5.0-to-1.
Table 6. Boeing Capital Corporation Operating Results
 
Additional Information
The "Other" segment consists primarily of Boeing Engineering, Operations and Technology as well as certain results related to the consolidation of all business units. Other segment expense was $48 million in the third quarter, up slightly from $44 million in the same period last year.
Unallocated expense was $90 million, down from $285 million last year. Deferred compensation expense was $109 million lower due to changes in Boeing stock price and broad stock market conditions. Unallocated pension expense was lower by $98 million.
Total pension expense was $176 million, down from $278 million in the same quarter last year, of which $51 million was recorded in unallocated expense and the balance was recorded as expense in the business segments.
Income tax expense was $470 million, including $57 million in adjustments that drove the effective income tax rate to 41 percent in the quarter. These adjustments reduced net income by $0.08 per share.
 
Outlook
Due to the uncertain length of the labor strike, Boeing will update its financial guidance after conclusion of the strike upon completing an assessment of future results.
The company continues to focus on maintaining its financial strength and improving business performance. Market demand for deliveries of new, fuel-efficient commercial airplanes remains strong, exceeding the available supply. Although it has not financed any new airplane deliveries since 2006, the company expects that it may need to finance some deliveries beginning in 2009, though it is not in a position to identify which specific deliveries will need manufacturer financing. Boeing has made backstop financing commitments for 3% of the commercial airplanes backlog  mostly for 787s  associated with delivery positions through the end of the next decade.
Boeing expects total US defense spending growth to moderate, but is focused on improving the outlook for individual programs by keeping them operationally healthy, relevant to the warfighter and supported by well-informed customers.
 
Non-GAAP Measure Disclosure
Management believes that the non-GAAP (Generally Accepted Accounting Principles) measures (indicated by an asterisk *) used in this report provide investors with important perspectives into the company's ongoing business performance. The company does not intend for the information to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the related GAAP measures. Other companies may define the measures differently. The following definitions are provided:
Free Cash Flow
Free cash flow is defined as GAAP less capital expenditures for . Management believes free cash flow provides investors with an important perspective on the cash available for shareholders, debt repayment, and acquisitions after making the capital investments required to support ongoing business operations and long term value creation. Free cash flow does not represent the residual cash flow available for discretionary expenditures as it excludes certain mandatory expenditures such as repayment of maturing debt. Management uses free cash flow internally to assess both business performance and overall liquidity. Table 2 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and free cash flow.
operating cash flow
property, plant and equipment additions
 
Certain statements in this report may constitute "forward-looking" statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Forward-looking statements in this press release include, among others, statements regarding future results as a result of our growth and productivity initiatives, our 2008 and 2009 financial outlook and the benefits of the IDS structure. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions as to future events that may not prove to be accurate. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak only as of the date they were made and we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise. Our actual results and future trends may differ materially depending on a variety of factors, including the continued operation, viability and growth of major airline customers and non-airline customers (such as the U.S. Government); adverse developments in the value of collateral securing customer and other financings; the occurrence of any significant collective bargaining labor dispute; our successful execution of internal performance plans including our company-wide growth and productivity initiatives, production rate increases and decreases (including any reduction in or termination of an aircraft product), availability of raw materials, acquisition and divestiture plans, and other cost-reduction and productivity efforts; charges from any future SFAS No. 142 review; ability to meet development, production and certification schedules for the 787 program and the ability to meet scheduled deliveries of the 787 airplane; technical or quality issues in development programs (affecting schedule and cost estimates) or in the satellite industry; an adverse development in rating agency credit ratings or assessments; the actual outcomes of certain pending sales campaigns and U.S. and foreign government procurement activities, including the uncertainty associated with the procurement of tankers by the U.S. Department of Defense (DoD) and funding of the C-17 program; the cyclical nature of some of our businesses; unanticipated financial market changes which may impact pension plan assumptions; domestic and international competition in the defense, space and commercial areas; continued integration of acquired businesses; performance issues with key suppliers, subcontractors and customers; significant disruption to air travel worldwide (including future terrorist attacks); global trade policies; worldwide political stability; domestic and international economic conditions; price escalation; the outcome of political and legal processes, changing priorities or reductions in the U.S. Government or foreign government defense and space budgets; termination of government or commercial contracts due to unilateral government or customer action or failure to perform; legal, financial and governmental risks related to international transactions; legal and investigatory proceedings; tax settlements with the IRS and various states; U.S. Air Force review of previously awarded contracts; costs associated with the exit of the Connexion by Boeing business; and other economic, political and technological risks and uncertainties. Additional information regarding these factors is contained in our SEC filings, including, without limitation, our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007 and our Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q for the quarters ended March 31, 2008 and June 30, 2008.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20081029123733.txt.gz
TIME:20081029123733
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On October 27, 2008, the Board of Directors (the "") of The Boeing Company (the "") accepted the resignation of Edward M. Liddy as a director of the Company. In accordance with the Company's Corporate Governance Principles, Mr. Liddy offered to resign from the Board after his change in occupation when he was elected Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of American International Group, Inc. A copy of the Company's press release announcing Mr. Liddy's resignation is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Board
Company
 
On October 27, 2008, the Board approved amendments to the By-Laws of the Company (the ""), as follows:
By-Laws
(1) Amended Article I, Section 4 to specify the acceptable methods for giving notice of annual or special meetings to stockholders, and the time when notice by each such method is effective.
(2) Amended Article I, Section 11.1 to clarify that the advance notice provisions set forth in Section 11.1 of the By-Laws are the exclusive means for a stockholder to make a director nomination or submit other business (other than matters properly brought under Rule 14a-8 of the federal proxy rules, which contain their own procedural requirements) before an annual meeting of stockholders and to update the information that must be included in the stockholder notice of nomination or other business.
(3) Amended Article II, Section 1 to decrease the number of directors from eleven to ten in connection with Edward M. Liddy's resignation from the Board, as set forth in Item 5.02 above.
(4) Amended Article VII, Section 4 to clarify that the right to indemnification and advancement of expenses shall not be eliminated or reduced by any amendment or repeal of the Company's By-Laws for any proceeding arising out of, or related to, any acts or omissions of the indemnitee occurring prior to such amendment or repeal.
The Board also made certain technical and conforming amendments to the By-Laws.
The foregoing summary of the amendments to the By-Laws is qualified in its entirety by reference to the amended and restated By-Laws filed as Exhibit 3.2 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: October 29, 2008
 

Exhibit 3.2
The Boeing Company By-Laws
(as amended and restated October 27, 2008)
ARTICLE I
Stockholders' Meetings
Section 1 Annual Meetings
Section 2 Special Meetings
Section 3 Place of Meeting
Section 4 Notice of Meetings
Section 5 Waivers of Notice
Section 6 Quorum
Section 7 Proxies
7.1 Appointment
7.2 Delivery to Corporation; Duration
Section 8 Inspectors of Election
8.1 Appointment
8.2 Duties
8.3 Determination of Proxy Validity
Section 9 Fixing the Record Date
9.1 Meetings
9.2 Consent to Corporate Action Without a Meeting
9.3 Dividends, Distributions, and Other Rights
9.4 Voting List
Section 10 Action by Stockholders Without a Meeting
Section 11 Notice of Nominations and Other Stockholder Business; Required Vote for Directors; Director Qualification
11.1 Notice of Nominations and Other Stockholder Business
11.1.A Annual Meetings of Stockholders
11.1.B Special Meetings of Stockholders
11.1.C General
11.2 Required Vote for Directors
11.3 Director Qualification: Submission of Questionnaire, Representation and Agreement
Section 12 Notice to Corporation
ARTICLE II
Board of Directors
Section 1 Number and Term of Office
Section 2 Nomination and Election
2.1 Nomination
2.2 Election
Section 3 Place of Meeting
Section 4 Annual Meeting
Section 5 Stated Meetings
Section 6 Special Meetings
6.1 Convenors and Notice
6.2 Waiver of Notice
Section 7 Quorum and Manner of Acting
Section 8 Chairman of the Board of Directors
Section 9 Resignations
 
Section 10 Removal of Directors
Section 11 Filling of Vacancies Not Caused by Removal
Section 12 Directors' Fees
Section 13 Action Without a Meeting
ARTICLE III
Board of Directors Committees
Section 1 Audit Committee
Section 2 Other Committees
2.1 Committee Powers
2.2 Committee Members
Section 3 Quorum and Manner of Acting
ARTICLE IV
Officers and Agents: Terms, Compensation, Removal, Vacancies
Section 1 Officers
Section 2 Term of Office
Section 3 Salaries of Elected Officers
Section 4 Bonuses
Section 5 Removal of Elected and Appointed Officers
Section 6 Vacancies
ARTICLE V
Officers' Duties and Powers
Section 1 Chairman of the Board of Directors
Section 2 President
Section 3 Chief Executive Officer
Section 4 Vice Presidents and Controller
Section 5 Secretary
Section 6 Treasurer
Section 7 Additional Powers and Duties
Section 8 Disaster Emergency Powers of Acting Officers
ARTICLE VI
Stock and Transfers of Stock
Section 1 Stock Certificates
Section 2 Transfer Agents and Registrars
Section 3 Transfers of Stock
Section 4 Lost Certificates
ARTICLE VII
Miscellaneous
Section 1 Fiscal Year
Section 2 (Repealed)
Section 3 Signing of Negotiable Instruments
Section 4 Indemnification of Directors and Officers
4.1 Right to Indemnification
4.2 Right of Indemnitee to Bring Suit
4.3 Nonexclusivity of Rights
4.4 Insurance, Contracts, and Funding
 
4.5 Persons Serving Other Entities
4.6 Indemnification of Employees and Agents of the Corporation
4.7 Procedures for the Submission of Claims
ARTICLE VIII
Amendments
Section 1 Amendment of the By-Laws: General
Section 2 Amendments as to Compensation and Removal of Officers
 
ARTICLE I
Stockholders' Meetings
SECTION 1. 
Annual Meetings.
The annual meeting of stockholders shall be held on such date and at such time as the Board of Directors shall determine, for the election of directors and the transaction of such other business as may come before the meeting.
SECTION 2. 
Special Meetings.
A special meeting of stockholders may be called at any time by the Board of Directors, or by stockholders holding together at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, except as otherwise provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto.
SECTION 3. 
Place of Meeting.
All meetings of the stockholders of the Corporation shall be held at such place or places, if any, within or without the State of Delaware as may from time to time be fixed by the Board of Directors or as shall be specified or fixed in the respective notices or waivers of notice thereof.
SECTION 4. 
Notice of Meetings.
Except as otherwise required by statute and as set forth below, notice of each annual or special meeting of stockholders shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date. If the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, notice of each special meeting of stockholders shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than fifty-five (55) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date, unless the calling of such meeting is ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, in which case notice of such special meeting shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date. Such notice shall be given by delivering to each stockholder a written or printed notice thereof either personally or by mailing such notice in a postage-prepaid envelope addressed to the stockholder's address as it appears on the stock books of the Corporation or by transmitting the notice to the stockholder in any other manner permitted by Delaware law. Except as otherwise required by statute, no publication of any notice of a meeting of stockholders shall be required. Every notice of a meeting of stockholders shall state the place, if any (or the means of remote communication, if any, by which stockholders and proxy holders may be deemed to be present in person), date, and hour of the meeting and, in the case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called. Notices are
 
deemed given (i) if by mail, when deposited in the United States mail, postage prepaid, directed to the stockholder at such stockholder's address as it appears on the records of the Corporation, or, if a stockholder shall have filed with the Secretary a written request that notices to such stockholder be mailed to some other address, then directed to such stockholder at such other address; (ii) if by facsimile, when directed to a number at which the stockholder has consented to receive notice; (iii) if by electronic mail, when directed to an electronic mail address at which the stockholder has consented to receive such notice; (iv) if by posting on an electronic network together with a separate notice to the stockholder of such specific posting, upon the later to occur of (A) such posting and (B) the giving of such separate notice of such posting; and (v) if by any other form of electronic transmission, when directed to the stockholder as required by law and, to the extent required by applicable law, in the manner consented to by the stockholder. An affidavit of the mailing or other means of giving any notice of any stockholders' meeting, executed by the Secretary, Assistant Corporate Secretary or any transfer agent of the Corporation giving the notice, shall be evidence of the giving of such notice. Notice shall be deemed to have been given to all stockholders of record who share an address if notice is given in accordance with the "householding" rules set forth in Rule 14a-3(e) under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") and Section 233 of the Delaware General Corporation Law.
prima facie
SECTION 5. 
Waivers of Notice.
Whenever any notice is required to be given to any stockholder under the provisions of these By-Laws, the Certificate of Incorporation, or the Delaware General Corporation Law, a waiver thereof in writing, signed by the person or persons entitled to such notice, whether before or after the time stated therein, shall be deemed equivalent to the giving of such notice. The attendance of a stockholder at a meeting, in person or by proxy, or waiver by electronic transmission, shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when a stockholder attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened.
SECTION 6. 
Quorum.
At all meetings of stockholders, except when otherwise provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by these By-Laws, the presence, in person or by proxy duly authorized, of the holders of one-third of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and except as otherwise provided by statute or rule of law, or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by these By-Laws, the vote, in person or by proxy, of the holders of a majority of the shares constituting such quorum shall be binding upon all stockholders of the Corporation. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote may adjourn any meeting, from time to time but not for a period of more than thirty (30)
 
days at any one time, until a quorum shall attend. At any such adjourned meeting at which a quorum shall be present, any business may be transacted which might have been transacted at the meeting as originally called. Unless otherwise provided by statute, no notice of an adjourned meeting need be given.
SECTION 7. 
Proxies.
7.1 
Appointment.
Each stockholder entitled to vote at a meeting of stockholders or to express consent or dissent to corporate action in writing without a meeting may authorize another person or persons to act for such stockholder by proxy. Such authorization may be accomplished (a) by the stockholder or such stockholder's authorized officer, director, employee, or agent executing a writing or causing his or her signature to be affixed to such writing by any reasonable means, including facsimile signature, or (b) by transmitting or authorizing the transmission of a telegram, cablegram, or other means of electronic transmission to the intended holder of the proxy or to a proxy solicitation firm, proxy support service, or similar agent duly authorized by the intended proxy holder to receive such transmission; provided, that any such telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission must either set forth or be accompanied by information from which it can be determined that the telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission was authorized by the stockholder. Any copy, facsimile telecommunication, or other reliable reproduction of the writing or transmission by which a stockholder has authorized another person to act as proxy for such stockholder may be substituted or used in lieu of the original writing or transmission for any and all purposes for which the original writing or transmission could be used, provided that such copy, facsimile telecommunication, or other reproduction shall be a complete reproduction of the entire original writing or transmission.
7.2 
Delivery to Corporation; Duration.
A proxy shall be filed with the Secretary of the Corporation before or at the time of the meeting or the delivery to the Corporation of the consent to corporate action in writing. A proxy shall become invalid three (3) years after the date of its execution, unless otherwise provided in the proxy. A proxy with respect to a specified meeting shall entitle the holder thereof to vote at any reconvened meeting following adjournment of such meeting but shall not be valid after the final adjournment thereof.
SECTION 8. 
Inspectors of Election.
8.1 
Appointment.
In advance of any meeting of stockholders, the Board of Directors of the Corporation shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspectors of election at such meeting and to make a written report thereof. The Board of Directors may designate one or more persons to serve as alternate inspectors to serve in place of any inspector who is unable or fails to act. If no inspector or alternate is able to act at a meeting of stockholders, the chairman of such meeting shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspector at such meeting.
 
8.2 
Duties.
The inspectors of election shall (a) ascertain the number of shares of the Corporation outstanding and the voting power of each such share; (b) determine the shares represented at the meeting and the validity of proxies and ballots; (c) count all votes and ballots; (d) determine and retain for a reasonable period of time a record of the disposition of any challenges made to any determination by them; and (e) certify their determination of the number of shares represented at the meeting and their count of the votes and ballots. Each inspector shall, before entering upon the discharge of his or her duties, take and sign an oath to faithfully execute the duties of inspector with strict impartiality and according to the best of his or her ability. The inspectors may appoint or retain other persons or entities to assist them in the performance of their duties.
8.3 
Determination of Proxy Validity.
The validity of any proxy or ballot executed for a meeting of stockholders shall be determined by the inspectors of election in accordance with the applicable provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law as then in effect. In determining the validity of any proxy transmitted by telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission, the inspectors shall record in writing the information upon which they relied in making such determination.
SECTION 9.
Fixing the Record Date.
9.1 
Meetings.
For the purpose of determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at any meeting of stockholders or any adjournment thereof, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which record date shall be not fewer than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the date of such meeting. If the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, the record date for each special meeting of stockholders shall be not fewer than fifty-five (55) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date, unless the calling of such meeting is ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation. If no record date is fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall be at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which notice is given, or, if notice is waived, at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which the meeting is held. A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting; provided, however, that the Board of Directors may fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
9.2 
Consent to Corporate Action Without a Meeting.
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action
 
in writing without a meeting, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which date shall not be more than ten (10) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days after the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, when no prior action by the Board of Directors is required by Chapter 1 of the Delaware General Corporation Law as now or hereafter amended, shall be the first date on which a signed written consent setting forth the action taken or proposed to be taken is delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the records of proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Delivery made to the Corporation's registered office shall be by hand or by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors and prior action by the Board of Directors is required by Chapter 1 of the Delaware General Corporation Law as now or hereafter amended, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution taking such prior action.
9.3 
Dividends, Distributions, and Other Rights.
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to receive payment of any dividend or other distribution or allotment of any rights or the stockholders entitled to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion, or exchange of stock, or for the purpose of any other lawful action, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted, and which record date shall be not more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days prior to such action. If no record date is fixed, the record date for determining stockholders for any such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution relating thereto.
9.4 
Voting List.
At least ten (10) days before each meeting of stockholders, a complete list of the stockholders entitled to vote at such meeting shall be made, arranged in alphabetical order, and showing the address of each stockholder and the number of shares registered in the name of each stockholder. This list shall be open to examination by any stockholder, for any purpose germane to the meeting, for a period of ten (10) days prior to the meeting, either (i) on a reasonably accessible electronic network, provided that the information required to gain access to such list is provided with the notice of meeting, or (ii) during ordinary business hours at the principal place of business of the Corporation. The list shall also be produced and kept at such meeting for inspection by any stockholder who is present.
 
SECTION 10. 
Action by Stockholders Without a Meeting.
Subject to the provisions of Article NINTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, any action which could be taken at any annual or special meeting of stockholders may be taken without a meeting, without prior notice, and without a vote, if a consent or consents in writing, setting forth the action so taken, are (a) signed by the holders of outstanding stock having not fewer than the minimum number of votes that would be necessary to authorize or take such action at a meeting at which all shares entitled to vote thereon were present and voted and (b) delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the records of proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Delivery made to the Corporation's registered office shall be by hand or by certified mail or registered mail, return receipt requested. Every written consent shall bear the date of signature of each stockholder who signs the consent, and no written consent shall be effective to take the corporate action referred to therein unless written consents signed by a sufficient number of stockholders to take such action are delivered to the Corporation, in the manner required by this Section, within sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days of the date of the earliest dated consent delivered to the Corporation in the manner required by this Section 10. The validity of any consent executed by a proxy for a stockholder pursuant to a telegram, cablegram, or other means of electronic transmission transmitted to such proxy holder by or upon the authorization of the stockholder shall be determined by or at the direction of the Secretary of the Corporation. A written record of the information upon which the person making such determination relied shall be made and kept in the records of the proceedings of the stockholders. Any such consent shall be inserted in the minute book as if it were the minutes of a meeting of stockholders. Prompt notice of the taking of the corporate action without a meeting by less than unanimous written consent shall be given to those stockholders who have not consented in writing.
SECTION 11. 
Notice of Nominations and Other Stockholder Business; Required Vote for Directors; Director Qualification.
11.1 
Notice of Nominations and Other Stockholder Business.
A. Annual Meetings of Stockholders.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
B. Special Meetings of Stockholders.
Only such business shall be conducted at a special meeting of stockholders as shall have been brought before the special meeting pursuant to the Corporation's notice of meeting. Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors may be made at a special meeting at which directors are to be elected pursuant to the Corporation's notice of special meeting (a) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof or stockholders pursuant to Article 1, Section 2 hereof, or (b) provided that the Board of Directors or stockholders pursuant to Article 1, Section 2 hereof has determined that directors shall be elected at such special meeting, by any stockholder of the Corporation who (i) is a stockholder of record at the time the notice provided for in this By-Law is delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation and at the time of the special meeting, (ii) is entitled to vote at the special meeting, and (iii) complies with the notice procedures set forth in this By-Law as to such nomination. In the event the Corporation calls a special meeting for the purpose of electing one or more directors to the Board of Directors, any such stockholder may nominate a person or persons (as the case may be) for election to such position(s) as specified in the Corporation's notice of meeting, if the stockholder's notice required by Section 11.1.A(2) (including the completed and signed questionnaire, representation and agreement required by Section 11.3) shall be delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not earlier than the close of business on the one hundred and twentieth (120th) day prior to such special meeting and not later than the close of business on the later of the ninetieth (90th) day prior to such special meeting and the tenth (10th) day following the day on which public announcement is first made of the date of the special meeting and of the nominees proposed by the Board of Directors to be elected at such special meeting. In no event shall the postponement of a special meeting as to which notice has been sent to stockholders commence a new time period (or extend any time period) for the giving of a stockholder's notice as described above.
C. General.
 
 
 
 
11.2
Required Vote for Directors.
A nominee for director shall be elected to the Board of Directors if the votes cast for such nominee's election exceed the votes cast against such nominee's election; provided, however, that the directors shall be elected by a plurality of the votes cast at
 
any meeting of stockholders for which (i) the Secretary of the Corporation receives a notice that a stockholder has nominated a person for election to the Board of Directors in compliance with the advance notice requirements for stockholder nominees for director set forth in Section 11.1 of this By-law and (ii) such nomination has not been withdrawn by such stockholder on or prior to the tenth day preceding the date the Corporation first mails its notice of meeting for such meeting to stockholders. If directors are to be elected by a plurality of the votes cast, stockholders shall not be permitted to vote against a nominee. Votes cast shall exclude abstentions with respect to that director's election.
11.3
Director Qualification: Submission of Questionnaire, Representation, and Agreement.
To be eligible to be a nominee for election or reelection as a director of the Corporation, a person must deliver (in accordance with the time periods prescribed for delivery of notice under Section 11.1) to the Secretary of the Corporation at the principal executive offices of the Corporation a written questionnaire with respect to the background and qualification of such person and the background of any other person or entity on whose behalf the nomination is being made (which questionnaire shall be provided by the Secretary upon written request) and a written representation and agreement (in the form provided by the Secretary of the Corporation upon written request), that such person (a) is not and will not become a party to (i) any agreement, arrangement, or understanding with, and has not given any commitment or assurance to, any person or entity as to how such person, if elected as a director of the Corporation, will act or vote on any issue or question (a "Voting Commitment") that has not been disclosed to the Corporation or (ii) any Voting Commitment that could limit or interfere with such person's ability to comply, if elected as a director of the Corporation, with such person's fiduciary duties under applicable law; (b) is not and will not become a party to any agreement, arrangement, or understanding with any person or entity other than the Corporation with respect to any direct or indirect compensation, reimbursement, or indemnification in connection with service or action as a director that has not been disclosed therein; and (c) in such person's individual capacity and on behalf of any person or entity on whose behalf the nomination is being made, would be in compliance, if elected as a director of the Corporation, and will comply with all applicable publicly disclosed corporate governance, conflict of interest, confidentiality and stock ownership and trading policies and guidelines of the Corporation.
SECTION 12.
Notice to Corporation.
Any written notice required to be delivered by a stockholder to the Corporation pursuant to Section 11.1 of this Article I or Section 2.1 of Article II of these By-Laws must be given, either by personal delivery or by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, to the Secretary of the Corporation at the Corporation's executive offices in the City of Chicago, State of Illinois.
 
ARTICLE II
Board of Directors
SECTION 1.
Number and Term of Office.
The number of directors shall be ten (10), but the number may be increased, or decreased to not less than three (3), from time to time, either by the directors by adoption of a resolution to such effect or by the stockholders by amendment of these By-Laws in accordance with Article VIII. At each annual meeting of stockholders, each director shall be elected to hold office until the next annual meeting or until his or her successor shall be elected and qualified or until his or her earlier resignation or removal.
SECTION 2.
Nomination and Election.
2.1
Nomination.
Only persons who are nominated in accordance with Article I, Section 11 of these By-Laws shall be eligible for election as directors.
2.2
Election.
At each election of directors by stockholders, the persons who are elected in accordance with Article I, Section 11 of these By-Laws shall be the directors.
SECTION 3.
Place of Meeting.
Meetings of the Board of Directors, or of any committee thereof, may be held either within or without the State of Delaware.
SECTION 4.
Annual Meeting.
Each year the Board of Directors shall meet in connection with the annual meeting of stockholders for the purpose of electing officers and for the transaction of other business. No notice of such annual meeting is required. Such annual meeting may be held at any other time or place which shall be specified in a notice given as hereinafter provided for special meetings of the Board of Directors, or in a consent and waiver of notice thereof, signed by all the directors.
SECTION 5.
Stated Meetings.
The Board of Directors may, by resolution adopted by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors, from time to time appoint the time and place for holding stated meetings of the Board of Directors, if by it deemed advisable; and such stated meetings shall thereupon be held at the time and place so appointed, without the giving of any special notice with regard thereto. In case the day appointed for a stated meeting shall fall upon a legal holiday, such meeting shall be held on the next following day, not a legal holiday, at the regularly appointed hour. Except as otherwise provided in these By-Laws, any and all business may be transacted at any stated meeting.
SECTION 6.
Special Meetings.
6.1
Convenors and Notice.
Special meetings of the Board of Directors may be called by or at the request of the Chairman of the Board of Directors or any two (2) directors. Notice of a special meeting of the Board of Directors, stating the place, day, and hour of the meeting, shall be given to each director in writing (by mail, wire, facsimile, or personal delivery) or orally (by telephone or in person).
 
6.2
Waiver of Notice.
With respect to a special meeting of the Board of Directors, a written waiver, signed by a director, or waiver by electronic transmission, shall be deemed equivalent to notice to that director. A director's attendance at a meeting shall constitute that director's waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the director attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting was not lawfully called or convened. Neither the business to be transacted at, nor the purpose of, any regular or special meeting of the Board of Directors need be specified in the waiver of notice of such meeting.
SECTION 7.
Quorum and Manner of Acting.
Except as herein otherwise provided, forty percent (40%) of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided in these By-Laws at the time of any stated or special meeting of the Board of Directors or, if vacancies exist on the Board of Directors, forty percent (40%) of such number of directors then in office; provided, however, that such number may not be less than one-third of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided in these By-Laws, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and, except as otherwise required by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by these By-Laws, the act of a majority of the directors present at any such meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of the Board of Directors. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the directors present may adjourn any meeting, from time to time, until a quorum is present. No notice of any adjourned meeting need be given.
SECTION 8. 
Chairman of the Board.
The Chairman of the Board shall preside, when present, at all meetings of the Board of Directors, except as otherwise provided by law.
SECTION 9. 
Resignations.
Any director of the Corporation may resign at any time by giving written notice or notice by electronic transmission thereof to the Secretary of the Corporation. Such resignation shall take effect at the time specified therefor or if the time is not specified, upon delivery thereof; and, unless otherwise specified with respect thereto, the acceptance of such resignation shall not be necessary to make it effective.
SECTION 10. 
Removal of Directors.
Any directors may be removed with or without cause by the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, at a meeting of stockholders called for that purpose; and the vacancy on the Board of Directors caused by any such removal may be filled by the stockholders at such meeting or at any subsequent meeting.
SECTION 11. 
Filling of Vacancies Not Caused by Removal.
In case of any increase in the number of directors, or of any vacancy created by death
 
or resignation, the additional director or directors may be elected or, as the case may be, the vacancy or vacancies may be filled, either (a) by the Board of Directors at any meeting, (i) if the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, or (ii) if the Corporation does not have an Interested Stockholder, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the remaining directors, though less than a quorum or (b) by the stockholders entitled to vote, either at an annual meeting or at a special meeting thereof called for that purpose, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the outstanding shares entitled to vote at such meeting.
SECTION 12. 
Directors' Fees.
The Board of Directors shall have authority to determine from time to time the amount of compensation that shall be paid to its members for attendance at meetings of the Board of Directors or of any committee of the Board of Directors.
SECTION 13. 
Action Without a Meeting.
Any action required or permitted to be taken at any meeting of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof may be taken without a meeting if all members of the Board of Directors or committee, as the case may be, consent thereto in writing, and the writing or writings are filed with the minutes of proceedings of the Board of Directors or committee.
ARTICLE III
Board of Directors Committees
SECTION 1. 
Audit Committee.
In addition to any committees appointed pursuant to Section 2 of this Article, there shall be an Audit Committee, appointed annually by the Board of Directors, consisting of at least three (3) directors who are not members of management. It shall be the responsibility of the Audit Committee to review the scope and results of the annual independent audit of books and records of the Corporation and its subsidiaries and to discharge such other responsibilities as may from time to time be assigned to it by the Board of Directors. The Audit Committee shall meet at such times and places as the members deem advisable, and shall make such recommendations to the Board of Directors as they consider appropriate.
SECTION 2. 
Other Committees.
2.1 The Board of Directors may appoint standing or temporary committees and invest such committees with such powers as it may see fit, with power to subdelegate such powers if deemed desirable by the Board of Directors; but no such committee shall have the power or authority of the Board of Directors to adopt, amend, or repeal these By-Laws or approve, adopt, or recommend to the stockholders of the Corporation any action or matter expressly required by the Certificate of Incorporation, these By-Laws or the Delaware General Corporation Law to be submitted to stockholders for approval.
Committee Powers.
 
2.2 The Board of Directors may designate one or more directors as alternate members of any committee, who may replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of the committee. In the absence or disqualification of a member of a committee, the member or members thereof present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, whether or not such member or members constitute a quorum, may unanimously appoint another member of the Board of Directors to act at the meeting in the place of any such absent or disqualified member.
Committee Members.
SECTION 3. 
Quorum and Manner of Acting.
A majority of the number of directors composing any committee of the Board of Directors, as established and fixed by resolution of the Board of Directors, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at any meeting of such committee but, if less than a majority are present at a meeting, a majority of such directors present may adjourn the meeting from time to time without further notice. The act of a majority of the members of a committee present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of such committee.
ARTICLE IV
Officers and Agents: Terms, Compensation, Removal, Vacancies
SECTION 1. 
Officers.
The elected officers of the Corporation shall be a Chairman of the Board of Directors (who shall be a director) and, at the discretion of the Board of Directors, a President (who shall be a director), and one or more Vice Presidents (each of whom may be assigned by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer an additional title descriptive of the functions assigned to such officer and one or more of whom may be designated Executive or Senior Vice President). The Board of Directors may also elect one or more Vice Chairmen. The Board of Directors shall also designate either the Chairman of the Board of Directors or the President as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation. The Board of Directors shall appoint a Controller, a Secretary, and a Treasurer. Any number of offices, whether elective or appointive, may be held by the same person. The Chief Executive Officer may, by a writing filed with the Secretary, designate titles as officers for employees and agents and appoint Assistant Secretaries and Assistant Treasurers as, from time to time, may appear to be necessary or advisable in the conduct of the affairs of the Corporation and may, in the same manner, terminate or change such titles.
SECTION 2. 
Term of Office.
So far as practicable, all elected officers shall be elected at the annual meeting of the Board of Directors in each year, and shall hold office until the annual meeting of the Board of Directors in the next subsequent year and until their respective successors are chosen. The Controller, Secretary, and Treasurer shall hold office at the pleasure of the Board of Directors.
 
SECTION 3. 
Salaries of Elected Officers.
The salaries paid to the elected officers of the Corporation shall be authorized or approved by the Board of Directors.
SECTION 4. 
Bonuses.
None of the officers, directors, or employees of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations shall at any time be paid any bonus or share in the earnings or profits of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations except pursuant to a plan approved by affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members of the Board of Directors.
SECTION 5. 
Removal of Elected and Appointed Officers.
Any elected or appointed officer may be removed at any time, either for or without cause, by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors, at any meeting called for the purpose.
SECTION 6. 
Vacancies.
If any vacancy occurs in any office, the Board of Directors may elect or appoint a successor to fill such vacancy for the remainder of the term.
ARTICLE V
Officers' Duties and Powers
SECTION 1. 
Chairman of the Board.
The Chairman of the Board of Directors shall preside, when present, at all meetings of the stockholders (except as otherwise provided by statute) and at all meetings of the Board of Directors. The Chairman shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation; to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the Chairman by the Board of Directors.
SECTION 2. 
President.
The President shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation and to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; during the absence or disability of the Chairman of the Board of Directors, to exercise the Chairman's powers and to perform the Chairman's duties; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the President by the Board of Directors; provided, that if the office of President is vacant, the Chairman shall exercise the duties ordinarily exercised by the President until such time as a President is elected or appointed.
SECTION 3. 
Chief Executive Officer.
The officer designated by the Board of Directors as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation shall have general and active control of its business and affairs. The Chief Executive Officer shall have general power to appoint or designate all employees and agents of the Corporation whose appointment or designation is not otherwise provided
 
for and to fix the compensation thereof, subject to the provisions of these By-Laws; to remove or suspend any employee or agent who shall not have been elected or appointed by the Board of Directors or other body; to suspend for cause any employee, agent, or officer, other than an elected officer, pending final action by the body which shall have appointed such employee, agent, or officer; and to exercise all the powers usually pertaining to the office held by the Chief Executive Officer of a corporation.
SECTION 4. 
Vice Presidents and Controller.
The several Vice Presidents and the Controller shall perform all such duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of them, from time to time, by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer, respectively.
SECTION 5. 
Secretary.
The Secretary shall attend to the giving of notice of all meetings of stockholders and of the Board of Directors and shall keep and attest true records of all such proceedings. The Secretary shall have charge of the corporate seal and have authority to attest any and all instruments or writings to which the same may be affixed and shall keep and account for all books, documents, papers, and records of the Corporation relating to its corporate organization. The Secretary shall have authority to sign stock certificates and shall generally perform all the duties usually appertaining to the office of secretary of a corporation. In the absence of the Secretary, an Assistant Secretary or Secretary pro tempore shall perform the duties of the Secretary.
SECTION 6. 
Treasurer.
The Treasurer shall have the care and custody of all moneys, funds, and securities of the Corporation, and shall deposit or cause to be deposited all funds of the Corporation in accordance with directions or authorizations of the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer. The Treasurer shall have power to sign stock certificates, to indorse for deposit or collection, or otherwise, all checks, drafts, notes, bills of exchange, or other commercial paper payable to the Corporation, and to give proper receipts or discharges therefor. In the absence of the Treasurer, an Assistant Treasurer shall perform the duties of the Treasurer.
SECTION 7.
Additional Powers and Duties.
In addition to the foregoing especially enumerated duties and powers, the several officers of the Corporation shall perform such other duties and exercise such further powers as may be provided in these By-Laws or as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine, or as may be assigned to them by any superior officer.
SECTION 8. 
Disaster Emergency Powers of Acting Officers.
If, as a result of a disaster or other state of emergency, the Chief Executive Officer is unable to perform the duties of that office, (a) the powers and duties of the Chief Executive Officer shall be performed by the employee with the highest base salary who shall be available and capable of performing such powers and duties and, if more than one such employee has the same base salary, by the employee whose surname begins with the earliest letter of the alphabet among the group of those employees with the
 
same base salary; (b) the officer performing such duties shall continue to perform such powers and duties until the Chief Executive Officer becomes capable of performing those duties or until the Board of Directors shall have elected a new Chief Executive Officer or designated another individual as Acting Chief Executive Officer; (c) such officer shall have the power in addition to all other powers granted to the Chief Executive Officer by these By-Laws and by the Board of Directors to appoint an acting President, acting Vice President  Finance, acting Controller, acting Secretary, and acting Treasurer, if any of the persons duly elected to any such office is not, by reason of such disaster or emergency, able to perform the duties of such office, each of such acting appointees to serve in such capacities until the officer for whom the appointee is acting becomes capable of performing the duties of such office or until the Board of Directors shall have designated another individual to perform such duties or have elected another person to fill such office; (d) any such acting officer so appointed shall be entitled to exercise all powers vested by these By-Laws or the Board of Directors in the duly elected officer for whom the acting officer is acting; and (e) anyone transacting business with the Corporation may rely upon a certification by any two (2) officers of the Corporation that a specified individual has succeeded to the powers of the Chief Executive Officer and that such person has appointed other acting officers as herein provided and any person, firm, corporation, or other entity to which such certification has been delivered by such officers may continue to rely upon it until notified of a change in writing signed by two (2) officers of the Corporation.
ARTICLE VI
Stock and Transfers of Stock
SECTION 1. 
Stock Certificates.
The shares of the stock of the Corporation shall be represented by certificates, provided that the Board of Directors may provide by resolution or resolutions that some or all of any or all classes or series of stock shall be uncertificated shares. Any such resolution shall not apply to shares represented by certificate until such certificate is surrendered to the Corporation. Every holder of stock of the Corporation represented by a certificate shall be entitled to a certificate, signed by the Chairman of the Board of Directors or the President or a Vice President and the Treasurer or an Assistant Treasurer or the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary, certifying the number of shares owned by the stockholder in the Corporation. Any and all of the signatures on a certificate may be a facsimile. If any officer, transfer agent, or registrar who has signed or whose facsimile signature has been placed upon a certificate shall have ceased to be such officer, transfer agent, or registrar before such certificate is issued, it may be issued by the Corporation with the same effect as if he or she were such officer, transfer agent, or registrar at the date of issue.
SECTION 2. 
Transfer Agents and Registrars.
The Board of Directors may, in its discretion, appoint responsible banks or trust
 
companies in the Borough of Manhattan, in the City of New York, State of New York, and in such other city or cities as the Board of Directors may deem advisable, from time to time, to act as transfer agents and registrars of the stock of the Corporation; and, when such appointments shall have been made, no stock certificate shall be valid until countersigned by one of such transfer agents and registered by one of such registrars.
SECTION 3. 
Transfers of Stock.
Shares of stock may be transferred by delivery of the certificates therefor, accompanied either by an assignment in writing on the back of the certificates or by written power of attorney to sell, assign, and transfer the same, signed by the record holder thereof (or, with respect to uncertificated shares, by delivery of duly executed instructions or in any other manner permitted by law), but no transfer shall affect the right of the Corporation to pay any dividend upon the stock to the holder of record thereof, or to treat the holder of record as the holder in fact thereof for all purposes, and no transfer shall be valid, except between the parties thereto, until such transfer shall have been made upon the books of the Corporation.
SECTION 4. 
Lost Certificates.
The Board of Directors may provide for the issuance of new certificates of stock or uncertificated shares to replace certificates of stock lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, or alleged to be lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, upon such terms and in accordance with such procedures as the Board of Directors shall deem proper and prescribe.
ARTICLE VII
Miscellaneous
SECTION 1. 
Fiscal Year.
The fiscal year of the Corporation shall be the calendar year.
SECTION 2. (Repealed in its entirety by vote of the stockholders, May 5, 1975.)
SECTION 3. 
Signing of Negotiable Instruments.
All bills, notes, checks, or other instruments for the payment of money shall be signed or countersigned by such officer or officers and in such manner as from time to time may be prescribed by resolution (whether general or special) of the Board of Directors.
SECTION 4. 
Indemnification of Directors and Officers.
4.1 
Right to Indemnification.
Each person who was or is made a party to or is threatened to be made a party to or is otherwise involved (including, without limitation, as a witness) in any actual or threatened action, suit, or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative, or investigative (hereinafter a "proceeding"), by reason of the fact that he or she is or was a director or officer of the Corporation or that, being or having been such a director or officer or an employee of the Corporation, he or she is or was serving at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation as a director, officer, employee, or agent of another corporation or of a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise, including service with respect to an employee benefit plan (hereinafter an
 
"indemnitee"), whether the basis of such proceeding is alleged action in an official capacity as such a director, officer, employee, or agent or in any other capacity while serving as such a director, officer, employee, or agent, shall be indemnified and held harmless by the Corporation to the full extent permitted by the Delaware General Corporation Law, as the same exists or may hereafter be amended (but, in the case of any such amendment, only to the extent that such amendment permits the Corporation to provide broader indemnification rights than permitted prior thereto), or by other applicable law as then in effect, against all expense, liability, and loss (including attorneys' fees, judgments, fines, ERISA excise taxes or penalties, and amounts paid in settlement) actually and reasonably incurred or suffered by such indemnitee in connection therewith, and such indemnification shall continue as to an indemnitee who has ceased to be a director, officer, employee, or agent and shall inure to the benefit of the indemnitee's heirs, executors, and administrators; provided, however, that except as provided in Section 4.2 with respect to proceedings seeking to enforce rights to indemnification, the Corporation shall indemnify any such indemnitee in connection with a proceeding (or part thereof) initiated by such indemnitee only if such proceeding (or part thereof) was authorized or ratified by the Board of Directors. The right to indemnification conferred in this Section 4.1 shall be a contract right and shall include the right to be paid by the Corporation the expenses incurred in defending any such proceeding in advance of its final disposition (hereinafter an "advancement of expenses"); provided, however, that an advancement of expenses incurred by an indemnitee in his or her capacity as a director or officer or former director or officer (and not in any other capacity in which service was or is rendered by such indemnitee, including, without limitation, service to an employee benefit plan) shall be made only upon delivery to the Corporation of an undertaking (hereinafter an "undertaking"), by or on behalf of such indemnitee, to repay all amounts so advanced if it shall ultimately be determined by final judicial decision from which there is no further right to appeal that such indemnitee is not entitled to be indemnified for such expenses under this Section 4.1 or otherwise; and provided, further, that an advancement of expenses shall not be made if the Board of Directors makes a good faith determination that such payment would violate law or public policy.
4.2 
Right of Indemnitee to Bring Suit.
If a claim under Section 4.1 is not paid in full by the Corporation within sixty (60) days after a written claim has been received by the Corporation, except in the case of a claim for an advancement of expenses, in which case the applicable period shall be twenty (20) days, the indemnitee may at any time thereafter bring suit against the Corporation to recover the unpaid amount of the claim. If successful in whole or in part in any such suit, or in a suit brought by the Corporation to recover an advancement of expenses pursuant to the terms of an undertaking, the indemnitee shall also be entitled to be paid the expenses of prosecuting or defending such suit. The indemnitee shall be presumed to be entitled to indemnification under this Section 4 upon submission of a
 
written claim (and, in an action brought to enforce a claim for an advancement of expenses, where the required undertaking has been tendered to the Corporation), and thereafter the Corporation shall have the burden of proof to overcome the presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled. Neither the failure of the Corporation (including the Board of Directors, independent legal counsel, or the stockholders) to have made a determination prior to the commencement of such suit that indemnification of the indemnitee is proper in the circumstances, nor an actual determination by the Corporation (including the Board of Directors, independent legal counsel, or the stockholders) that the indemnitee is not entitled to indemnification shall be a defense to the suit or create a presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled.
4.3 
Nonexclusivity of Rights.
The rights to indemnification and to the advancement of expenses conferred in this Section 4 shall not be exclusive of any other right that any person may have or hereafter acquire under any statute, provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation, these By-Laws, any agreement, vote of stockholders or disinterested directors, or otherwise. Neither any amendment to or repeal of this Section 4 or of any of the procedures established by the Board of Directors pursuant to Section 4.7, nor the adoption of any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, nor, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any modification of law, shall eliminate or reduce the effect of the right or protection of any indemnitee to indemnification and to the advancement of expenses in accordance with the provisions hereof and thereof with respect to any proceeding (regardless of when such proceeding is first threatened, commenced or completed) arising out of, or related to, any acts or omissions of such indemnitee occurring prior to such amendment or repeal.
4.4 
Insurance, Contracts, and Funding.
The Corporation may maintain insurance, at its expense, to protect itself and any director, officer, employee, or agent of the Corporation or another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise against any expense, liability, or loss, whether or not the Corporation would have the power to indemnify such person against such expense, liability, or loss under the Delaware General Corporation Law. The Corporation may, without further stockholder approval, enter into contracts with any indemnitee in furtherance of the provisions of this Section 4 and may create a trust fund, grant a security interest, or use other means (including, without limitation, a letter of credit) to ensure the payment of such amounts as may be necessary to effect indemnification as provided in this Section 4.
4.5 
Persons Serving Other Entities.
Any person who is or was a director, officer, or employee of the Corporation who is or was serving (i) as a director or officer of another corporation of which a majority of the shares entitled to vote in the election of its directors is held by the Corporation or (ii) in an executive or management capacity in a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise of which the Corporation or a wholly owned subsidiary of the Corporation is
 
a general partner or has a majority ownership shall be deemed to be so serving at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation and entitled to indemnification and advancement of expenses under Section 4.1.
4.6 
Indemnification of Employees and Agents of the Corporation.
The Corporation may, by action of the Board of Directors, authorize one or more executive officers to grant rights to advancement of expenses to employees or agents of the Corporation on such terms and conditions as such officer or officers deem appropriate under the circumstances. The Corporation may, by action of the Board of Directors, grant rights to indemnification and advancement of expenses to employees or agents or groups of employees or agents of the Corporation with the same scope and effect as the provisions of this Section 4 with respect to the indemnification and advancement of expenses of directors and officers of the Corporation; provided, however, that an undertaking shall be made by an employee or agent only if required by the Board of Directors.
4.7 
Procedures for the Submission of Claims.
The Board of Directors may establish reasonable procedures for the submission of claims for indemnification pursuant to this Section 4, determination of the entitlement of any person thereto, and review of any such determination. Such procedures shall be set forth in an appendix to these By-Laws and shall be deemed for all purposes to be a part hereof.
ARTICLE VIII
Amendments
SECTION 1. 
Amendment of the By-Laws: General.
Except as herein otherwise expressly provided, the By-Laws of the Corporation may be altered or repealed in any particular and new By-Laws, not inconsistent with any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or any provision of law, may be adopted, either by
A. the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority in number of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote at an annual meeting of stockholders or at a special meeting thereof, the notice of which special meeting shall include the form of the proposed alteration or repeal or of the proposed new By-Laws, or a summary thereof; or
B. either by
i. the affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors at any meeting thereof, or
ii. the affirmative vote of all the directors present at any meeting at which a quorum, less than a majority, is present;
provided, in either of the latter cases, that the notice of such meeting shall include the form of the proposed alteration or repeal or of the proposed new By-Laws, or a summary thereof; and provided, further, that Article I, Section 11.2 of these By-Laws
 
may be amended only as set forth in Section 1.A of this By-Law, except that any amendment required by law or necessary or desirable to cure an administrative or technical deficiency may be made as provided in Section 1.B of this By-Law.
SECTION 2. 
Amendments as to Compensation and Removal of Officers.
Notwithstanding anything contained in these By-Laws to the contrary, the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the Voting Stock, as defined in Article FOURTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, at a meeting of stockholders called for the purpose, shall be required to alter, amend, repeal, or adopt any provision inconsistent with Sections 3, 4 and 5 of Article IV of these By-Laws, notice of which meeting shall include the form of the proposed amendment, or a summary thereof.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Boeing Director Edward Liddy Resigns Board Seat
CHICAGO, Oct. 27, 2008  The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] board of directors today accepted with regret the resignation of Edward M. Liddy, who last month was named chairman and chief executive officer of American International Group (AIG).
Liddy offered his resignation based upon his concerns that he would no longer qualify as an independent director on the Boeing board under NYSE director independence standards. AIG's aircraft leasing subsidiary, ILFC, and Boeing have a significant business relationship. The board shared that view and accepted Liddy's resignation with regret.
Boeing Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer Jim McNerney called Liddy's service to the Boeing board "exemplary and deeply appreciated."
Liddy, 62, joined Boeing's board in August 2007. He served on the Compensation and Governance, Organization, and Nominating committees.
His resignation is effective immediately.
Contact: Todd Blecher, 312-544-2002


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20081120145454.txt.gz
TIME:20081120145454
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
1. 364-Day Revolving Credit Agreement.
On November 14, 2008, we entered into a $1.0 billion, 364-day revolving credit agreement (the "364-Day Credit Agreement"), with Citigroup Global Markets Inc. and J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. as joint lead arrangers and joint book managers, JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. as syndication agent and Citibank, N.A. as administrative agent, and a syndicate of lenders as defined in the 364-Day Credit Agreement. This facility replaces the $1.0 billion, 364 day credit agreement entered into on November 16, 2007.
Under the 364-Day Credit Agreement, we pay a commitment fee that varies between .060% and .125%, depending on our credit rating. Borrowings under the 364-Day Credit Agreement (that are not based on Eurodollar rates) bear interest at an annual rate based on the "base rate" of interest in effect plus the applicable margin. The "base rate" of interest is the higher of (1) the rate of interest announced publicly by Citibank, N.A., from time to time and (2) the Federal Funds Rate plus 0.50%. The "applicable margin" is the greater of (a) the market rate spread minus 1.00% and (b) 0% per annum. The "market rate spread" means at any date our credit default swap mid-rate spread for the one-year period beginning on the most recent reset date for the applicable advance provided that the market rate spread shall have a floor and a cap depending upon the rating of our long-term senior unsecured debt with a floor ranging from ..350% to .500% and a corresponding cap ranging from 1.500% to 2.000%. Borrowings under the 364-Day Credit Agreement that are based on Eurodollar rates are generally based on an applicable LIBOR rate plus the market rate spread, as defined above.
The 364-Day Credit Agreement contains customary terms and conditions, including certain financial covenants that are substantially similar to those contained in the previous facility, including, without limitation, covenants restricting our ability to incur liens, merge or consolidate with another entity. Further, the 364-Day Credit Agreement contains a covenant restricting our ability to permit consolidated debt (as defined in the 364-Day Credit Agreement) to exceed 60% of our total capital (as defined in the 364-Day Credit Agreement) until the Credit Agreement terminates and all amounts borrowed under the Credit Agreement are paid in full. The events of default under the 364-Day Credit Agreement include, but are not limited to, the following: (1) failure to pay outstanding principal or interest, (2) failure of representations or warranties to be correct, in any material respects, (3) failure to perform any other term, covenant or agreement and such failure is not remedied within 30 days of notice of such failure, (4) a cross-default with other debt in certain circumstances, (5) certain defaults upon obligations under the Employee Retirement Income Security Act or (6) bankruptcy. Such events of default would require the repayment of any outstanding borrowings and the termination of the right to borrow additional funds under the 364-Day Credit Agreement.
Some of the lenders under the 364-Day Credit Agreement and their affiliates have various relationships with us and our subsidiaries involving the provision of financial service, including cash management, investment banking, trust and leasing services. In addition, we and some of our subsidiaries have entered into foreign exchange and other derivative arrangements with certain of the lenders and their affiliates.
 
The information described above under "Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement" with respect to the 364-Day Credit Agreement is hereby incorporated by reference.
The description herein is qualified in its entirety by the 364-Day Credit Agreement filed as an exhibit hereto.
 
(d) Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Date: November 20, 2008
 

Exhibit 10.1
 
 
 
 
THE BOEING COMPANY, a Delaware corporation ("" or the ""), for itself and on behalf of the other BORROWERS (as defined below), the LENDERS (as defined below), CITIGROUP GLOBAL MARKETS INC. and J.P. MORGAN SECURITIES INC., as joint lead arrangers and joint book managers, JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., as syndication agent, and CITIBANK, N.A., in its capacity as administrative agent for the Lenders (in such capacity, the ""), agree as follows:
TBC
Company
Agent
 
"" means the 364-Day Credit Agreement, dated as of November 16, 2007, by and among TBC, Citibank, N.A., as administrative agent, and certain other banks as lenders.
2007 Credit Agreement
"" means a Committed Advance or a Bid Advance.
Advance
"" means Citibank, N.A. acting in its capacity as administrative agent for the Lenders, or any successor administrative agent appointed pursuant to Section 7.6.
Agent
"" means the account of the Agent maintained by the Agent with Citibank, N.A., at its office at 388 Greenwich Street, New York, New York 10013, Account 36852248, Attention: Agency/Medium Term Finance, Reference: Boeing.
Agent's Account
"" means, as to any Person, any other Person that, directly or indirectly, controls, is controlled by or is under common control with such Person or is a director or officer of such Person. (For purposes of this definition, the term "controls", "controlling", "controlled by" and "under common control with" mean, with respect to a Person, the possession, direct or indirect, of the power to vote 5% or more of the Voting Stock of such Person or to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of such Person, whether through the ownership of Voting Stock, by contract, or otherwise.)
Affiliate
"" means this agreement, as it may be amended or otherwise modified from time to time, and any written additions or supplements hereto.
Agreement
"" means, with respect to each Lender, such Lender's Domestic Lending Office, in the case of a Base Rate Advance, and such Lender's Eurodollar Lending Office, in the case of a Eurodollar Rate Advance, and, in the case of a Bid Advance, the office of such Lender specified by such Lender in a notice to the Agent as its Applicable Lending Office with respect to such Bid Advance.
Applicable Lending Office
"" means,
Applicable Margin
 
"" means, for any date, a fluctuating per annum rate equal to the then-applicable rate set forth in the pricing grid below, depending upon the rating of the long-term senior unsecured debt of TBC then in effect:
Applicable Percentage
 
, , that if the ratings from S&P, Moody's and Fitch fall within different levels, (i) two of the ratings are at the same level and the other rating is one level higher or one level lower than the two same ratings, the Applicable Percentage will be based on the two ratings at the same level, (ii) two of the ratings are at the same level and the other rating is two or more levels above the two same ratings, the Applicable Percentage will be based on the rating that is one level above the two same ratings, (iii) two of the ratings are at the same level and the other rating is two or more levels below the two same ratings, the Applicable Percentage will be based on the rating that is one level below the two same ratings and (iv) each of the three ratings fall within different levels, then the Applicable Percentage will be determined based on the rating level that is in between the highest and the lowest ratings, and
provided
however
that if, at any time, no rating is available from S&P, Moody's and Fitch or any other nationally recognized statistical rating organization designated by TBC and approved in writing by the Majority Lenders, the Applicable Percentage for each Interest Period or each other period commencing during the thirty days following such ratings becoming unavailable shall be the Applicable Percentage in effect immediately prior to such ratings becoming unavailable. Thereafter, the rating to be used until ratings from S&P, Moody's and Fitch become available shall be as agreed between TBC and the Majority Lenders, and TBC and the Majority Lenders shall use good faith efforts to reach such agreement within such thirty-day period, , , that if no such agreement is reached within such thirty-day period the Applicable Percentage thereafter, until such agreement is reached, shall be (a) if any such rating has become unavailable as a result of S&P, Moody's or Fitch ceasing its business as a rating agency, the Applicable Percentage in effect immediately prior to such cessation or (b) otherwise, the Applicable Percentage as set forth under Level III above.
provided
further
provided
however
"" means, as of any date of determination, (a) the aggregate Commitments of the Lenders, as such amount may be reduced, changed or terminated in accordance with the terms of this Agreement, reduced by (b) the aggregate Advances outstanding on such date of determination.
Available Commitments
"" means the higher of (a) the rate of interest announced publicly by Citibank, N.A., in New York City, from time to time, as Citibank's "base" rate and (b) the Federal Funds Rate plus 0.50% per annum.
Base Rate
"" means a Committed Advance which bears interest at the Base Rate.
Base Rate Advance
 
"" means an advance by a Lender to a Borrower as part of a Bid Borrowing resulting from the auction bidding procedure described in Section 2.5, and refers to a Fixed Rate Advance or a Eurodollar Rate Bid Advance, each of which shall be a "Type" of Bid Advance.
Bid Advance
"" means a borrowing consisting of simultaneous Bid Advances from each of the Lenders whose offers to make one or more Bid Advances as part of such borrowing has been accepted by a Borrower under the auction bidding procedure described in Section 2.5.
Bid Borrowing
"" means a promissory note of a Borrower payable to the order of a Lender, in substantially the form of Exhibit A-2, evidencing the indebtedness of that Borrower to such Lender resulting from a Bid Advance made by such Lender to such Borrower.
Bid Note
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.1(a).
Bid Reduction
"" means, individually and collectively, as the context requires, TBC and each Subsidiary Borrower (unless and until it becomes a "Terminated Subsidiary Borrower" pursuant to Section 2.22).
Borrower
"" means, with respect to any Subsidiary Borrower, a letter in the form of Exhibit D, signed by such Subsidiary Borrower and TBC.
Borrower Subsidiary Letter
"" means a Committed Borrowing or a Bid Borrowing.
Borrowing
"" means a day of the year on which banks are not required or authorized to close in New York City and, if the applicable Business Day relates to any Eurodollar Rate Advance, on which dealings are carried on in the London interbank market.
Business Day
"" means, for each Lender, the full amount set forth opposite the name of such Lender in Schedule I or, if such Lender is a Replacement Lender or a Lender that has entered into one or more assignments pursuant to Section 2.20 or Section 2.21, the amount set forth for such Lender in the Register maintained by the Agent pursuant to Section 2.20(d), as such amount may be reduced pursuant to Section 2.3, Section 2.8 or Section 2.19 or increased pursuant to Section 2.19.
Commitment
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.7.
Commitment Fee
"" means an advance made by a Lender to a Borrower as part of a Committed Borrowing and refers to a Base Rate Advance or a Eurodollar Rate Committed Advance, each of which is a "Type" of Committed Advance.
Committed Advance
"" means a borrowing consisting of simultaneous Committed Advances of the same Type made by each of the Lenders pursuant to Section 2.1.
Committed Borrowing
"" means a promissory note of a Borrower payable to the order of any Lender, in substantially the form of Exhibit A-1, evidencing the indebtedness of that Borrower to such Lender resulting from the Committed Advances made by such Lender to that Borrower.
Committed Note
"" means The Boeing Company, a Delaware corporation.
Company
"" means information that a Borrower furnishes to the Agent or any Lender in a writing designated as confidential, but does not include any such information that is or becomes generally available to the public or that is or becomes available to the Agent or such Lender from a source other than a Borrower.
Confidential Information
 
"" refers to the consolidation of accounts in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.
Consolidated
"" means the total amount of assets (less applicable reserves and other properly deductible items) after, deducting therefrom (i) all current liabilities (excluding any thereof which are by their terms extendible or renewable at the option of the obligor thereon to a time more than 12 months after the time as of which the amount thereof is being computed), and (ii) all good will, trade names, trademarks, patents, unamortized debt discount and expenses and other like intangibles, all as set forth on the most recent balance sheet of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries and computed in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.
Consolidated Net Tangible Assets
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.21(a).
Continuing Lender
"", "" and "" each means a conversion of Committed Advances of one Type into Committed Advances of another Type pursuant to Section 2.10, 2.11 or 2.15.
Convert
Conversion
Converted
"" of a Person means
Debt
 
 
 
 
"" means any Event of Default or any event that would constitute an Event of Default but for the requirement that notice be given or time elapse or both.
Default
"" means with respect to any Lender, the office of such Lender specified as its "Domestic Lending Office" opposite its name on Schedule I, or in the assignment or other agreement pursuant to which it became a Lender or such other office of such Lender as such Lender may from time to time specify to TBC and the Agent.
Domestic Lending Office
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.19(d).
Effective Date
"" means
Eligible Assignee
 
 
 
 
 
 
"" means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended from time to time and the regulations promulgated and rulings issued thereunder.
ERISA
"" has the meaning assigned to that term in Regulation D of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, as in effect from time to time.
Eurocurrency Liabilities
"" means, with respect to any Lender, (a) the office of such Lender specified as its "Eurodollar Lending Office" opposite its name on Schedule I (or, if no such office is specified, its Domestic Lending Office) or in the assignment or other agreement pursuant to which it became a Lender or (b) such other office of such Lender as such Lender may from time to time specify to TBC and the Agent.
Eurodollar Lending Office
"" means, for an Interest Period for a Eurodollar Rate Committed Advance constituting part of a Committed Borrowing, and for the relevant period specified in the applicable Notice of Bid Borrowing for a Eurodollar Rate Bid Advance, an interest rate per annum equal to either
Eurodollar Rate
 
 
 
 
 
The Eurodollar Rate for any Interest Period for each Eurodollar Rate Committed Advance constituting part of the same Borrowing and for the relevant period specified in a Notice of Bid Borrowing for each Eurodollar Rate Bid Advance shall be determined by the Agent on the basis of applicable rates furnished to and received by the Agent from the Reference Banks two Business Days before the first day of such Interest Period or period, as the case may be, , , to the provisions of Section 2.10.
subject
however
"" means a Committed Advance (a "") or a Bid Advance (a "") which bears interest at a rate of interest quoted as a margin (which shall be the Applicable Margin in the case of a Committed Advance or as offered by a Lender and accepted by a Borrower in the case of a Bid Advance) over the Eurodollar Rate.
Eurodollar Rate Advance
Eurodollar Rate Committed Advance
Eurodollar Rate Bid Advance
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.5(b).
Eurodollar Rate Bid Borrowing
"" means the reserve percentage applicable to a Lender for any Interest Period for a Eurodollar Rate Advance during such Interest Period (or if more than one such percentage shall be so applicable, the daily average of such percentages for those days in such Interest Period during which any such percentage shall be so applicable) under regulations issued from time to time by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (or any successor) for determining the maximum reserve requirement (including, without limitation, any emergency, supplemental or other marginal reserve requirement) for such Lender with respect to liabilities or assets consisting of or including Eurocurrency Liabilities (or with respect to any other category of liabilities that includes deposits by reference to which the interest rate on Eurodollar Rate Advances is determined) having a term equal to such Interest Period.
Eurodollar Rate Reserve Percentage
"" means any of the events described in Section 6.1.
Event of Default
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.21.
Extension Request
"" means, for each day during a period, an interest rate per annum equal to the weighted average of the fluctuating rates on overnight Federal funds transactions with members of the Federal Reserve System arranged by Federal funds brokers, as published for such day (or, if such day is not a Business Day, for the immediately preceding Business Day) by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, or, if such rate is not so published for any day which is a Business Day, the average of the quotations for such day on such transactions received by the Agent from three Federal funds brokers of recognized standing selected by it.
Federal Funds Rate
"" means Fitch, Inc.
Fitch
"" means an Advance made by a Lender to a Borrower as part of a Fixed Rate Borrowing.
Fixed Rate Advance
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.5(b).
Fixed Rate Borrowing
"" means each Guaranty Agreement executed by TBC in favor of the Agent and the Lenders, unconditionally guaranteeing the payment of all obligations of a Subsidiary Borrower hereunder and under any Notes executed or to be executed by it.
Guaranty
"" has the meaning specified in Section 7.5.
Indemnified Costs
"" has the meaning specified in Section 8.3(b).
Indemnified Party
 
"" means, for each Eurodollar Rate Committed Advance constituting part of the same Borrowing, the period commencing on the date of such Committed Advance or the date of the Conversion of a Base Rate Advance into such a Eurodollar Rate Committed Advance and ending on the last day of the period selected by the applicable Borrower pursuant to the provisions below and, thereafter, each subsequent period commencing on the last day of the immediately preceding Interest Period and ending on the last day of the period selected by such Borrower pursuant to the provisions below. The duration of each such Interest Period shall be one, two, three, or six months (or nine months, with the consent of all Lenders funding those particular Advances), as the applicable Borrower may, upon notice received by the Agent not later than 11:00 a.m. (New York City time) on the third Business Day prior to the first day of such Interest Period, select, , , that:
Interest Period
provided
however
 
 
 
"", subject to Section 2.20, means any of the institutions that is a signatory hereto or that, pursuant to Section 2.13, 2.19, 2.20 or 2.21, becomes a "Lender" hereunder.
Lender
"" means Lenders holding greater than 50% of the then aggregate unpaid principal amount of the Committed Advances or, if no Committed Advances are outstanding, Lenders having greater than 50% of the total Commitments.
Majority Lenders
"" means, at any date, TBC's credit default swap mid-rate spread for the one-year period beginning on the most recent Reset Date for the applicable Advance (as provided by Markit Group Limited), which will be obtained by the Agent from the Markit Group Limited website, and will be reset as on each Reset Date; , that the Market Rate Spread shall in no event be less than a Floor or greater than a Cap equal to the then-applicable rate set forth in the pricing grid below, depending upon the rating of the long-term senior unsecured debt of TBC then in effect:
Market Rate Spread
provided
 
, , that if the ratings from S&P, Moody's and Fitch fall within different levels, (i) two of the ratings are at the same level and the other rating is one level higher or one level lower
provided
however
 
than the two same ratings, the Market Rate Spread will be based on the two ratings at the same level, (ii) two of the ratings are at the same level and the other rating is two or more levels above the two same ratings, the Market Rate Spread will be based on the rating that is one level above the two same ratings, (iii) two of the ratings are at the same level and the other rating is two levels below the two same ratings, the Market Rate Spread will be based on the rating that is one level below the two same ratings and (iv) each of the three ratings fall within different levels, then the Market Rate Spread will be determined based on the rating level that is in between the highest and the lowest ratings,
that if, at any time, no rating is available from S&P, Moody's and Fitch or any other nationally recognized statistical rating organization designated by TBC and approved in writing by the Majority Lenders, the Market Rate Spread for each Interest Period or each other period commencing during the thirty days following such ratings becoming unavailable shall be the Market Rate Spread in effect immediately prior to such ratings becoming unavailable. Thereafter, the rating to be used until ratings from S&P, Moody's and Fitch become available shall be as agreed between TBC and the Majority Lenders, and TBC and the Majority Lenders shall use good faith efforts to reach such agreement within such thirty-day period, , , that if no such agreement is reached within such thirty-day period the Market Rate Spread thereafter, until such agreement is reached, shall be (a) if any such rating has become unavailable as a result of S&P, Moody's or Fitch ceasing its business as a rating agency, the Market Rate Spread in effect immediately prior to such cessation or (b) otherwise, the Market Rate Spread as set forth under Level III above, and
provided
further
provided
however
, that if, at any Reset Date, TBC's credit default swap mid-rate spread for the one-year period beginning on such Reset Date is not available from the Markit Group Limited website, the Market Rate Spread shall be determined by reference to the applicable Cap as set forth above.
provided
further
"" means the Termination Date or, if the Term Loan Conversion Option described in Section 2.3 has been exercised, the date that is the one-year anniversary of the Termination Date.
Maturity Date
"" means Moody's Investor Services, Inc.
Moody's
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.21(a).
Non-Extending Lender
"" means a Committed Note or a Bid Note.
Note
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.5(b).
Notice of Bid Borrowing
"" means a Notice of Committed Borrowing or a Notice of Bid Borrowing.
Notice of Borrowing
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.2(a).
Notice of Committed Borrowing
"" means the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development.
OECD
"" means an individual, partnership, corporation (including a business trust), limited liability company, joint stock company, trust, unincorporated association, joint venture or other entity, or a government or any political subdivision or agency thereof.
Person
"" means any item of real property, or any interest therein, buildings, improvements and machinery.
Property, Plant and Equipment
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.19(c).
Proposed Increased Commitment
 
"" means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., Citibank, N.A., Bank of America, N.A., and Deutsche Bank AG.
Reference Banks
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.20(d).
Register
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.21(c).
Replacement Lenders
"" means a document substantially in the form of Exhibit C, duly executed by TBC, pursuant to Section 2.19.
Request for Alteration
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.20(a).
Required Assignment
"" means (x) for each Eurodollar Rate Advance two business days prior to the first day of each Interest Period and (y) for each Base Rate Advance the last day of each calendar month.
Reset Date
"" means Standard & Poor's, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc.
S&P
"" means any Person in which more than 50% of the Voting Stock or the interest in the capital or profits is owned by TBC, by TBC and any one or more other Subsidiaries, or by any one or more other Subsidiaries.
Subsidiary
"" means, individually and collectively, as the context requires, each Subsidiary that is or becomes a "Borrower" in accordance with Section 2.22; in each case, unless and until it becomes a "Terminated Subsidiary Borrower".
Subsidiary Borrower
"" means The Boeing Company, a Delaware corporation.
TBC
"" means a term loan resulting from the conversion of Committed Advances on the Termination Date pursuant to Section 2.3.
Term Loan
"" means the option under Section 2.3 for TBC to convert, as of the Termination Date, all or a part of the Committed Advances then outstanding into Term Loans.
Term Loan Conversion Option
"" means, individually and collectively, as the context requires, a Subsidiary Borrower that has ceased to be a "Borrower" in accordance with Section 2.22.
Terminated Subsidiary Borrower
"" means the earlier to occur of (i) November 13, 2009, as such date may be extended from time to time pursuant to Section 2.21, and (ii) the date of termination in whole of the Commitments pursuant to Section 2.8 or Section 6.2.
Termination Date
"" has the meaning specified in Section 4.2(b).
Total Capital
"", as to Committed Borrowings, means either Base Rate Advances or Eurodollar Rate Committed Advances and, as to Bid Borrowings, means either Fixed Rate Advances or Eurodollar Rate Bid Advances.
Type
"" means, with respect to each Lender, such Lender's Commitment minus the aggregate principal amount of Committed Advances made by such Lender.
Unused Commitment
"" means, as to a corporation, all the issued and outstanding capital stock of such corporation having general voting power, under ordinary circumstances, to elect a majority of the Board of Directors of such corporation (irrespective of whether or not any capital stock of any other class or classes shall or might have voting power upon the occurrence of any contingency).
Voting Stock
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Every Notice of Committed Borrowing given by a Subsidiary Borrower must be countersigned by an authorized representative of TBC, in order to evidence the consent of TBC, in its sole discretion, to that proposed Committed Borrowing. Upon receipt of a Notice of Committed Borrowing, the Agent shall promptly give notice to each Lender thereof.
 
 
 
 
 
If such Lender shall repay to the Agent such corresponding amount, such amount so repaid shall constitute such Lender's Committed Advance as part of such Committed Borrowing for purposes of this Agreement.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
that in the event and during the continuance of an Event of Default (x) the Applicable Margin shall immediately increase by 1.0% above the Applicable Margin then in effect, and, in the case of a Eurodollar Rate Advance, such Advance shall automatically convert to a Base Rate Advance at the end of the Interest Period then in effect for such Eurodollar Rate Advance and (y) to the fullest extent permitted by law, the Borrower shall pay interest on the amount of any interest, fee or other amount payable hereunder that is not paid when due, from the date such amount shall be due until such amount shall be paid in full, payable in arrears on the date such amount shall be paid in full and on demand, at a rate per annum equal at all times to 1% above the Base Rate.
provided
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
A Borrower requesting a Bid Borrowing shall deliver a Notice of Bid Borrowing to the Agent not later than 11:00 a.m. (New York City time) (A) at least one Business Day prior to the date of the proposed Bid Borrowing if the proposed Bid Borrowing is to be a Fixed Rate Borrowing, and (B) at least four Business Days prior to the date of the proposed Bid Borrowing, if the proposed Bid Borrowing is to be a Eurodollar Rate Bid Borrowing. Every Notice of Bid Borrowing given by a Subsidiary Borrower must be countersigned by an authorized representative of TBC, in order to evidence the consent of TBC, in its sole discretion, to that proposed Bid Borrowing. The Agent shall in turn promptly notify each Lender of each request for a Bid Borrowing by sending such Lender a copy of the related Notice of Bid Borrowing.
 
 
 
 
that if the Agent in its capacity as a Lender, in its sole discretion, elects to make any such offer, it shall notify such Borrower and the Company of such offer before 9:30 a.m. (New York City time) on the date on which notice of such election is to be given to the Agent by the other Lenders. If, by 10:00 a.m. (New York City time) on the date on which notice of a Lender's election under this Section 2.5(c) is to be made, the Agent fails to receive, at its address specified in Section 8.2, a notice from a Lender provided for in this Section 2.5(c), the Agent may conclusively presume that such Lender has elected not to offer to make any Bid Advances to such Borrower with respect to the related Notice of Bid Borrowing.
provided
 
 
 
If the Borrower proposing the Bid Borrowing notifies the Agent that such Bid Borrowing is canceled pursuant to Section 2.5(d)(i), the Agent shall give prompt notice thereof to the Lenders and such Bid Borrowing shall not be made.
 
 
 
 
When each Lender that is to make a Bid Advance as part of such Bid Borrowing has received notice from the Agent pursuant to clause (iii) of the preceding sentence, such Lender shall, before 1:00 p.m. (New York City time) on the date of such Bid Borrowing specified in the notice received from the Agent pursuant to clause (i) of the preceding sentence, make available for the account of its Applicable Lending Office to the Agent at the Agent's Account such Lender's portion of such Bid Borrowing, in same day funds. Upon fulfillment of the applicable conditions set forth in Article 5 and after receipt by the Agent of such funds, the Agent will make such funds available to the relevant Borrower at an account specified by such Borrower. Promptly after each Bid Borrowing the Agent shall notify each Lender of the amount of the Bid Borrowing, the consequent Bid Reduction, and the dates upon which such Bid Reduction commenced and will terminate.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
there is an increase in the cost incurred by a Lender in agreeing to make or making, funding or maintaining any Eurodollar Rate Committed Advance or Eurodollar Rate Bid Advance then or at any time thereafter outstanding (excluding for purposes of this Section 2.13 any such increased costs resulting from (i) Taxes or Other Taxes (as to which Section 2.14 shall govern) and (ii) changes in the basis of taxation of overall net income or overall gross income by the United States or by the foreign jurisdiction or state under the laws of which such Lender is organized or has its Applicable Lending Office (or any political subdivision thereof), then TBC shall from time to time, upon demand of such Lender (with a copy of such demand to the Agent), pay to the Agent for the account of such Lender such amounts as are required to compensate such Lender for such increased cost, that such Lender shall exercise reasonable efforts (consistent with its internal policy and legal and regulatory restrictions) to minimize any such increased cost and that the Borrowers shall not be required to pay any such compensation with
provided
provided
further
 
respect to any period prior to the 90th day before the date of any such demand, unless such introduction, change, compliance or request shall have retroactive effect to a date prior to such 90
th
day. A certificate as to the amount of such increase in cost, submitted to the relevant Borrowers and the Agent by such Lender, shall be conclusive and binding for all purposes under this Section 2.13(a), absent manifest error.
 
 
 
 
and, in either case, subject to payment in full of all principal, accrued and unpaid interest, fees and other amounts payable under this Agreement and then owing to such Lender immediately prior to the assignment or termination of the Commitment of such Lender.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
for such Lender to continue to fund or maintain any Eurodollar Rate Advances or to perform its obligations hereunder with respect to Eurodollar Rate Advances hereunder, then, upon the issuance of such opinion of counsel or such assertion by a central bank or other governmental authority, the Agent shall give notice of such opinion or assertion to the Borrowers (accompanied by such opinion, if applicable). The Borrowers shall forthwith either
 
 
Upon such prepayment or Conversion, the obligation of such Lender to make Eurodollar Rate Committed Advances or Eurodollar Rate Bid Advances, or to Convert Committed Advances into Eurodollar Rate Committed Advances, shall be suspended until the Agent shall notify the Borrowers that the circumstances causing such suspension no longer exists.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
subject, in either case, to payment in full of all principal, accrued and unpaid interest, fees, commissions and other amounts payable under this Agreement and then owing to such Lender immediately prior to the assignment or termination of the Commitment of such Lender.
If the Company shall designate as a Subsidiary Borrower hereunder any Subsidiary not organized under the laws of the United States or any State thereof, any Lender may, with notice to the Agent and the Company, fulfill its Commitment by causing an Affiliate of such Lender to act as the Lender in respect of such Subsidiary Borrower (and such Lender shall, to the extent of Advances made to such Subsidiary Borrower, be deemed for all purposes hereof to have assigned such Advances to such Affiliate in compliance with the provisions of Section 2.20).
pro tanto
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
In lieu of furnishing the Lenders the items referred to in clauses (1), (3), (5) and (6) above, the Company may make available such items on the Company's website at , at or at such other website as notified to the Agent and the Lenders, which shall be deemed to have satisfied the requirement of delivery of such items in accordance with this Section.
www.boeing.com
www.sec.gov
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
and (b) a representation by TBC that the representations and warranties of TBC contained in subsections (a) through (g) of Section 3.1 are true and accurate on and as of each such date as though made on and as of each such date (except to the extent that such representations and warranties relate solely to an earlier date), and that, as of each such date, no event has occurred and is continuing, or would result from the proposed Committed Borrowing, which constitutes a Default.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
and that no amendment, waiver, or consent shall, unless in writing and signed by the Agent in addition to the Lenders required above to take such action, affect the rights or duties of the Agent under this Agreement or any Note.
provided
further
 
 
 
if to the Agent,
Citibank, N.A.
Two Penns Way, Suite 200
New Castle, Delaware 19720
Attention: Bank Loans Syndications Department
facsimile number (212) 994 0961;
if to any Borrower,
care of The Boeing Company
100 N. Riverside
Mail Code: 5003 3648
Chicago, Illinois 60606
Attention: Assistant Treasurer, Corporate Finance and Banking
facsimile number (312) 544-2399
if to any Lender, at its Domestic Lending Office; or,
as to each party, at such other address as designated by such party in a written notice to each other party referring specifically to this Agreement.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
to the fullest extent permitted by law, without notice to any Borrower (any such notice being expressly waived by each Borrower), to set off and apply any and all deposits (general or special, time or demand, provisional or final) at any time held and other indebtedness at any time owing by such Lender or such Affiliate to or for the credit or the account of any Borrower against any and all of the obligations to such Lender or such Affiliate of such Borrower now or hereafter existing under this Agreement and any Notes held by such Lender, whether or not such Lender has made a demand under this Agreement or such Notes and although such obligations may be unmatured. Each Lender shall promptly notify any Borrower after any such setoff and application made by such Lender, that the failure to give such notice shall not affect the validity of such setoff and application. The rights of each Lender under this Section are in addition to other rights and remedies (including, without limitation, other rights of setoff) which such Lender and its Affiliates may have.
provided
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The Agent, each Lender and their Affiliates (collectively, solely for purposes of this paragraph, the ""), may have economic interests that conflict with those of the Borrowers. Each Borrower agrees that nothing in this Agreement or otherwise will be deemed to create an advisory, fiduciary or agency relationship or fiduciary or other implied duty between the Lenders and any Borrower, its stockholders or its affiliates. The Borrowers acknowledge and agree that (i) the transactions contemplated by this Agreement are arm's-length commercial transactions between the Lenders, on the one hand, and the Borrowers, on the other, (ii) in connection therewith and with the process leading to such transaction each of the Lenders is acting solely as a principal and not the agent or fiduciary of any Borrower, its management, stockholders, creditors or any other person, (iii) no Lender has assumed an advisory or fiduciary responsibility in favor of any Borrower with respect to the transactions contemplated hereby or the process leading thereto (irrespective of whether any Lender or any of its affiliates has advised or is currently advising any Borrower on other matters) or any other obligation to any Borrower
Lenders
 
except the obligations expressly set forth in this Agreement and (iv) each Borrower has consulted its own legal and financial advisors to the extent it deemed appropriate. Each Borrower further acknowledges and agrees that it is responsible for making its own independent judgment with respect to such transactions and the process leading thereto. Each Borrower agrees that it will not claim that any Lender has rendered advisory services of any nature or respect, or owes a fiduciary or similar duty to such Borrower, in connection with such transaction or the process leading thereto.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be executed by their officers thereunto duly authorized as of the day and year first above written.
 
Syndication Agent
 
Documentation Agents
 
364-Day Credit Agreement
 
364-Day Credit Agreement
 
364-Day Credit Agreement
 
364-Day Credit Agreement
 
364-Day Credit Agreement
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20081216171338.txt.gz
TIME:20081216171338
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
On December 15, 2008, the Board of Directors (the "") of The Boeing Company (the "") accepted the offer to resign of retired Marine Corps Gen. James L. Jones, who earlier this month was named by U.S. President-elect Barack Obama to serve as his national security adviser. In accordance with the Company's Corporate Governance Principles, Gen. Jones offered to resign from the Board after this change in occupation. A copy of the Company's press release announcing Mr. Jones's resignation is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Board
Company
 
On December 15, 2008, the Board approved an amendment to the By-Laws of the Company (the "") that amended Article II, Section 1 to decrease the number of directors from ten to nine in connection with the Board's acceptance of James L. Jones's offer to resign from the Board, as set forth in Item 5.02 above.
By-Laws
The foregoing summary of the amendment to the By-Laws is qualified in its entirety by reference to the amended and restated By-Laws filed as Exhibit 3.2 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: December 16, 2008
 
 

Exhibit 3.2
The Boeing Company By-Laws
(as amended and restated December 15, 2008)
ARTICLE I
Stockholders' Meetings
Section 1 Annual Meetings
Section 2 Special Meetings
Section 3 Place of Meeting
Section 4 Notice of Meetings
Section 5 Waivers of Notice
Section 6 Quorum
Section 7 Proxies
7.1 Appointment
7.2 Delivery to Corporation; Duration
Section 8 Inspectors of Election
8.1 Appointment
8.2 Duties
8.3 Determination of Proxy Validity
Section 9 Fixing the Record Date
9.1 Meetings
9.2 Consent to Corporate Action Without a Meeting
9.3 Dividends, Distributions, and Other Rights
9.4 Voting List
Section 10 Action by Stockholders Without a Meeting
Section 11 Notice of Nominations and Other Stockholder Business; Required Vote for Directors; Director Qualification
11.1 Notice of Nominations and Other Stockholder Business
11.1.A Annual Meetings of Stockholders
11.1.B Special Meetings of Stockholders
11.1.C General
11.2 Required Vote for Directors
11.3 Director Qualification: Submission of Questionnaire, Representation and Agreement
Section 12 Notice to Corporation
ARTICLE II
Board of Directors
Section 1 Number and Term of Office
Section 2 Nomination and Election
2.1 Nomination
2.2 Election
Section 3 Place of Meeting
Section 4 Annual Meeting
Section 5 Stated Meetings
Section 6 Special Meetings
6.1 Convenors and Notice
6.2 Waiver of Notice
Section 7 Quorum and Manner of Acting
Section 8 Chairman of the Board of Directors
Section 9 Resignations
 
Section 10 Removal of Directors
Section 11 Filling of Vacancies Not Caused by Removal
Section 12 Directors' Fees
Section 13 Action Without a Meeting
ARTICLE III
Board of Directors Committees
Section 1 Audit Committee
Section 2 Other Committees
2.1 Committee Powers
2.2 Committee Members
Section 3 Quorum and Manner of Acting
ARTICLE IV
Officers and Agents: Terms, Compensation, Removal, Vacancies
Section 1 Officers
Section 2 Term of Office
Section 3 Salaries of Elected Officers
Section 4 Bonuses
Section 5 Removal of Elected and Appointed Officers
Section 6 Vacancies
ARTICLE V
Officers' Duties and Powers
Section 1 Chairman of the Board of Directors
Section 2 President
Section 3 Chief Executive Officer
Section 4 Vice Presidents and Controller
Section 5 Secretary
Section 6 Treasurer
Section 7 Additional Powers and Duties
Section 8 Disaster Emergency Powers of Acting Officers
ARTICLE VI
Stock and Transfers of Stock
Section 1 Stock Certificates
Section 2 Transfer Agents and Registrars
Section 3 Transfers of Stock
Section 4 Lost Certificates
ARTICLE VII
Miscellaneous
Section 1 Fiscal Year
Section 2 (Repealed)
Section 3 Signing of Negotiable Instruments
Section 4 Indemnification of Directors and Officers
4.1 Right to Indemnification
4.2 Right of Indemnitee to Bring Suit
4.3 Nonexclusivity of Rights
4.4 Insurance, Contracts, and Funding
 
4.5 Persons Serving Other Entities
4.6 Indemnification of Employees and Agents of the Corporation
4.7 Procedures for the Submission of Claims
ARTICLE VIII
Amendments
Section 1 Amendment of the By-Laws: General
Section 2 Amendments as to Compensation and Removal of Officers
 
ARTICLE I
Stockholders' Meetings
SECTION 1. 
Annual Meetings.
The annual meeting of stockholders shall be held on such date and at such time as the Board of Directors shall determine, for the election of directors and the transaction of such other business as may come before the meeting.
SECTION 2. 
Special Meetings.
A special meeting of stockholders may be called at any time by the Board of Directors, or by stockholders holding together at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, except as otherwise provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto.
SECTION 3. 
Place of Meeting.
All meetings of the stockholders of the Corporation shall be held at such place or places, if any, within or without the State of Delaware as may from time to time be fixed by the Board of Directors or as shall be specified or fixed in the respective notices or waivers of notice thereof.
SECTION 4. 
Notice of Meetings.
Except as otherwise required by statute and as set forth below, notice of each annual or special meeting of stockholders shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date. If the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, notice of each special meeting of stockholders shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than fifty-five (55) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date, unless the calling of such meeting is ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, in which case notice of such special meeting shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date. Such notice shall be given by delivering to each stockholder a written or printed notice thereof either personally or by mailing such notice in a postage-prepaid envelope addressed to the stockholder's address as it appears on the stock books of the Corporation or by transmitting the notice to the stockholder in any other manner permitted by Delaware law. Except as otherwise required by statute, no publication of any notice of a meeting of stockholders shall be required. Every notice of a meeting of stockholders shall state the place, if any (or the means of remote communication, if any, by which stockholders and proxy holders may be deemed to be present in person), date, and hour of the meeting and, in the case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called. Notices are
 
deemed given (i) if by mail, when deposited in the United States mail, postage prepaid, directed to the stockholder at such stockholder's address as it appears on the records of the Corporation, or, if a stockholder shall have filed with the Secretary a written request that notices to such stockholder be mailed to some other address, then directed to such stockholder at such other address; (ii) if by facsimile, when directed to a number at which the stockholder has consented to receive notice; (iii) if by electronic mail, when directed to an electronic mail address at which the stockholder has consented to receive such notice; (iv) if by posting on an electronic network together with a separate notice to the stockholder of such specific posting, upon the later to occur of (A) such posting and (B) the giving of such separate notice of such posting; and (v) if by any other form of electronic transmission, when directed to the stockholder as required by law and, to the extent required by applicable law, in the manner consented to by the stockholder. An affidavit of the mailing or other means of giving any notice of any stockholders' meeting, executed by the Secretary, Assistant Corporate Secretary or any transfer agent of the Corporation giving the notice, shall be evidence of the giving of such notice. Notice shall be deemed to have been given to all stockholders of record who share an address if notice is given in accordance with the "householding" rules set forth in Rule 14a-3(e) under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") and Section 233 of the Delaware General Corporation Law.
prima facie
SECTION 5. 
Waivers of Notice.
Whenever any notice is required to be given to any stockholder under the provisions of these By-Laws, the Certificate of Incorporation, or the Delaware General Corporation Law, a waiver thereof in writing, signed by the person or persons entitled to such notice, whether before or after the time stated therein, shall be deemed equivalent to the giving of such notice. The attendance of a stockholder at a meeting, in person or by proxy, or waiver by electronic transmission, shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when a stockholder attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened.
SECTION 6. 
Quorum.
At all meetings of stockholders, except when otherwise provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by these By-Laws, the presence, in person or by proxy duly authorized, of the holders of one-third of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and except as otherwise provided by statute or rule of law, or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by these By-Laws, the vote, in person or by proxy, of the holders of a majority of the shares constituting such quorum shall be binding upon all stockholders of the Corporation. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote may adjourn any meeting, from time to time but not for a period of more than thirty (30)
 
days at any one time, until a quorum shall attend. At any such adjourned meeting at which a quorum shall be present, any business may be transacted which might have been transacted at the meeting as originally called. Unless otherwise provided by statute, no notice of an adjourned meeting need be given.
SECTION 7. 
Proxies.
7.1 
Appointment.
Each stockholder entitled to vote at a meeting of stockholders or to express consent or dissent to corporate action in writing without a meeting may authorize another person or persons to act for such stockholder by proxy. Such authorization may be accomplished (a) by the stockholder or such stockholder's authorized officer, director, employee, or agent executing a writing or causing his or her signature to be affixed to such writing by any reasonable means, including facsimile signature, or (b) by transmitting or authorizing the transmission of a telegram, cablegram, or other means of electronic transmission to the intended holder of the proxy or to a proxy solicitation firm, proxy support service, or similar agent duly authorized by the intended proxy holder to receive such transmission; provided, that any such telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission must either set forth or be accompanied by information from which it can be determined that the telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission was authorized by the stockholder. Any copy, facsimile telecommunication, or other reliable reproduction of the writing or transmission by which a stockholder has authorized another person to act as proxy for such stockholder may be substituted or used in lieu of the original writing or transmission for any and all purposes for which the original writing or transmission could be used, provided that such copy, facsimile telecommunication, or other reproduction shall be a complete reproduction of the entire original writing or transmission.
7.2 
Delivery to Corporation; Duration.
A proxy shall be filed with the Secretary of the Corporation before or at the time of the meeting or the delivery to the Corporation of the consent to corporate action in writing. A proxy shall become invalid three (3) years after the date of its execution, unless otherwise provided in the proxy. A proxy with respect to a specified meeting shall entitle the holder thereof to vote at any reconvened meeting following adjournment of such meeting but shall not be valid after the final adjournment thereof.
SECTION 8. 
Inspectors of Election.
8.1 
Appointment.
In advance of any meeting of stockholders, the Board of Directors of the Corporation shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspectors of election at such meeting and to make a written report thereof. The Board of Directors may designate one or more persons to serve as alternate inspectors to serve in place of any inspector who is unable or fails to act. If no inspector or alternate is able to act at a meeting of stockholders, the chairman of such meeting shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspector at such meeting.
 
8.2 
Duties.
The inspectors of election shall (a) ascertain the number of shares of the Corporation outstanding and the voting power of each such share; (b) determine the shares represented at the meeting and the validity of proxies and ballots; (c) count all votes and ballots; (d) determine and retain for a reasonable period of time a record of the disposition of any challenges made to any determination by them; and (e) certify their determination of the number of shares represented at the meeting and their count of the votes and ballots. Each inspector shall, before entering upon the discharge of his or her duties, take and sign an oath to faithfully execute the duties of inspector with strict impartiality and according to the best of his or her ability. The inspectors may appoint or retain other persons or entities to assist them in the performance of their duties.
8.3 
Determination of Proxy Validity.
The validity of any proxy or ballot executed for a meeting of stockholders shall be determined by the inspectors of election in accordance with the applicable provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law as then in effect. In determining the validity of any proxy transmitted by telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission, the inspectors shall record in writing the information upon which they relied in making such determination.
SECTION 9.
Fixing the Record Date.
9.1 
Meetings.
For the purpose of determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at any meeting of stockholders or any adjournment thereof, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which record date shall be not fewer than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the date of such meeting. If the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, the record date for each special meeting of stockholders shall be not fewer than fifty-five (55) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date, unless the calling of such meeting is ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation. If no record date is fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall be at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which notice is given, or, if notice is waived, at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which the meeting is held. A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting; provided, however, that the Board of Directors may fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
9.2 
Consent to Corporate Action Without a Meeting.
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action
 
in writing without a meeting, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which date shall not be more than ten (10) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days after the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, when no prior action by the Board of Directors is required by Chapter 1 of the Delaware General Corporation Law as now or hereafter amended, shall be the first date on which a signed written consent setting forth the action taken or proposed to be taken is delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the records of proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Delivery made to the Corporation's registered office shall be by hand or by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors and prior action by the Board of Directors is required by Chapter 1 of the Delaware General Corporation Law as now or hereafter amended, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution taking such prior action.
9.3 
Dividends, Distributions, and Other Rights.
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to receive payment of any dividend or other distribution or allotment of any rights or the stockholders entitled to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion, or exchange of stock, or for the purpose of any other lawful action, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted, and which record date shall be not more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days prior to such action. If no record date is fixed, the record date for determining stockholders for any such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution relating thereto.
9.4 
Voting List.
At least ten (10) days before each meeting of stockholders, a complete list of the stockholders entitled to vote at such meeting shall be made, arranged in alphabetical order, and showing the address of each stockholder and the number of shares registered in the name of each stockholder. This list shall be open to examination by any stockholder, for any purpose germane to the meeting, for a period of ten (10) days prior to the meeting, either (i) on a reasonably accessible electronic network, provided that the information required to gain access to such list is provided with the notice of meeting, or (ii) during ordinary business hours at the principal place of business of the Corporation. The list shall also be produced and kept at such meeting for inspection by any stockholder who is present.
 
SECTION 10. 
Action by Stockholders Without a Meeting.
Subject to the provisions of Article NINTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, any action which could be taken at any annual or special meeting of stockholders may be taken without a meeting, without prior notice, and without a vote, if a consent or consents in writing, setting forth the action so taken, are (a) signed by the holders of outstanding stock having not fewer than the minimum number of votes that would be necessary to authorize or take such action at a meeting at which all shares entitled to vote thereon were present and voted and (b) delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the records of proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Delivery made to the Corporation's registered office shall be by hand or by certified mail or registered mail, return receipt requested. Every written consent shall bear the date of signature of each stockholder who signs the consent, and no written consent shall be effective to take the corporate action referred to therein unless written consents signed by a sufficient number of stockholders to take such action are delivered to the Corporation, in the manner required by this Section, within sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days of the date of the earliest dated consent delivered to the Corporation in the manner required by this Section 10. The validity of any consent executed by a proxy for a stockholder pursuant to a telegram, cablegram, or other means of electronic transmission transmitted to such proxy holder by or upon the authorization of the stockholder shall be determined by or at the direction of the Secretary of the Corporation. A written record of the information upon which the person making such determination relied shall be made and kept in the records of the proceedings of the stockholders. Any such consent shall be inserted in the minute book as if it were the minutes of a meeting of stockholders. Prompt notice of the taking of the corporate action without a meeting by less than unanimous written consent shall be given to those stockholders who have not consented in writing.
SECTION 11. 
Notice of Nominations and Other Stockholder Business; Required Vote for Directors; Director Qualification.
11.1 
Notice of Nominations and Other Stockholder Business.
A. Annual Meetings of Stockholders.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
B. Special Meetings of Stockholders.
Only such business shall be conducted at a special meeting of stockholders as shall have been brought before the special meeting pursuant to the Corporation's notice of meeting. Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors may be made at a special meeting at which directors are to be elected pursuant to the Corporation's notice of special meeting (a) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof or stockholders pursuant to Article 1, Section 2 hereof, or (b) provided that the Board of Directors or stockholders pursuant to Article 1, Section 2 hereof has determined that directors shall be elected at such special meeting, by any stockholder of the Corporation who (i) is a stockholder of record at the time the notice provided for in this By-Law is delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation and at the time of the special meeting, (ii) is entitled to vote at the special meeting, and (iii) complies with the notice procedures set forth in this By-Law as to such nomination. In the event the Corporation calls a special meeting for the purpose of electing one or more directors to the Board of Directors, any such stockholder may nominate a person or persons (as the case may be) for election to such position(s) as specified in the Corporation's notice of meeting, if the stockholder's notice required by Section 11.1.A(2) (including the completed and signed questionnaire, representation and agreement required by Section 11.3) shall be delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not earlier than the close of business on the one hundred and twentieth (120th) day prior to such special meeting and not later than the close of business on the later of the ninetieth (90th) day prior to such special meeting and the tenth (10th) day following the day on which public announcement is first made of the date of the special meeting and of the nominees proposed by the Board of Directors to be elected at such special meeting. In no event shall the postponement of a special meeting as to which notice has been sent to stockholders commence a new time period (or extend any time period) for the giving of a stockholder's notice as described above.
C. General.
 
 
 
 
11.2
Required Vote for Directors.
A nominee for director shall be elected to the Board of Directors if the votes cast for such nominee's election exceed the votes cast against such nominee's election; provided, however, that the directors shall be elected by a plurality of the votes cast at
 
any meeting of stockholders for which (i) the Secretary of the Corporation receives a notice that a stockholder has nominated a person for election to the Board of Directors in compliance with the advance notice requirements for stockholder nominees for director set forth in Section 11.1 of this By-law and (ii) such nomination has not been withdrawn by such stockholder on or prior to the tenth day preceding the date the Corporation first mails its notice of meeting for such meeting to stockholders. If directors are to be elected by a plurality of the votes cast, stockholders shall not be permitted to vote against a nominee. Votes cast shall exclude abstentions with respect to that director's election.
11.3
Director Qualification: Submission of Questionnaire, Representation, and Agreement.
To be eligible to be a nominee for election or reelection as a director of the Corporation, a person must deliver (in accordance with the time periods prescribed for delivery of notice under Section 11.1) to the Secretary of the Corporation at the principal executive offices of the Corporation a written questionnaire with respect to the background and qualification of such person and the background of any other person or entity on whose behalf the nomination is being made (which questionnaire shall be provided by the Secretary upon written request) and a written representation and agreement (in the form provided by the Secretary of the Corporation upon written request), that such person (a) is not and will not become a party to (i) any agreement, arrangement, or understanding with, and has not given any commitment or assurance to, any person or entity as to how such person, if elected as a director of the Corporation, will act or vote on any issue or question (a "Voting Commitment") that has not been disclosed to the Corporation or (ii) any Voting Commitment that could limit or interfere with such person's ability to comply, if elected as a director of the Corporation, with such person's fiduciary duties under applicable law; (b) is not and will not become a party to any agreement, arrangement, or understanding with any person or entity other than the Corporation with respect to any direct or indirect compensation, reimbursement, or indemnification in connection with service or action as a director that has not been disclosed therein; and (c) in such person's individual capacity and on behalf of any person or entity on whose behalf the nomination is being made, would be in compliance, if elected as a director of the Corporation, and will comply with all applicable publicly disclosed corporate governance, conflict of interest, confidentiality and stock ownership and trading policies and guidelines of the Corporation.
SECTION 12.
Notice to Corporation.
Any written notice required to be delivered by a stockholder to the Corporation pursuant to Section 11.1 of this Article I or Section 2.1 of Article II of these By-Laws must be given, either by personal delivery or by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, to the Secretary of the Corporation at the Corporation's executive offices in the City of Chicago, State of Illinois.
 
ARTICLE II
Board of Directors
SECTION 1.
Number and Term of Office.
The number of directors shall be nine (9), but the number may be increased, or decreased to not less than three (3), from time to time, either by the directors by adoption of a resolution to such effect or by the stockholders by amendment of these By-Laws in accordance with Article VIII. At each annual meeting of stockholders, each director shall be elected to hold office until the next annual meeting or until his or her successor shall be elected and qualified or until his or her earlier resignation or removal.
SECTION 2.
Nomination and Election.
2.1
Nomination.
Only persons who are nominated in accordance with Article I, Section 11 of these By-Laws shall be eligible for election as directors.
2.2
Election.
At each election of directors by stockholders, the persons who are elected in accordance with Article I, Section 11 of these By-Laws shall be the directors.
SECTION 3.
Place of Meeting.
Meetings of the Board of Directors, or of any committee thereof, may be held either within or without the State of Delaware.
SECTION 4.
Annual Meeting.
Each year the Board of Directors shall meet in connection with the annual meeting of stockholders for the purpose of electing officers and for the transaction of other business. No notice of such annual meeting is required. Such annual meeting may be held at any other time or place which shall be specified in a notice given as hereinafter provided for special meetings of the Board of Directors, or in a consent and waiver of notice thereof, signed by all the directors.
SECTION 5.
Stated Meetings.
The Board of Directors may, by resolution adopted by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors, from time to time appoint the time and place for holding stated meetings of the Board of Directors, if by it deemed advisable; and such stated meetings shall thereupon be held at the time and place so appointed, without the giving of any special notice with regard thereto. In case the day appointed for a stated meeting shall fall upon a legal holiday, such meeting shall be held on the next following day, not a legal holiday, at the regularly appointed hour. Except as otherwise provided in these By-Laws, any and all business may be transacted at any stated meeting.
SECTION 6.
Special Meetings.
6.1
Convenors and Notice.
Special meetings of the Board of Directors may be called by or at the request of the Chairman of the Board of Directors or any two (2) directors. Notice of a special meeting of the Board of Directors, stating the place, day, and hour of the meeting, shall be given to each director in writing (by mail, wire, facsimile, or personal delivery) or orally (by telephone or in person).
 
6.2
Waiver of Notice.
With respect to a special meeting of the Board of Directors, a written waiver, signed by a director, or waiver by electronic transmission, shall be deemed equivalent to notice to that director. A director's attendance at a meeting shall constitute that director's waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the director attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting was not lawfully called or convened. Neither the business to be transacted at, nor the purpose of, any regular or special meeting of the Board of Directors need be specified in the waiver of notice of such meeting.
SECTION 7.
Quorum and Manner of Acting.
Except as herein otherwise provided, forty percent (40%) of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided in these By-Laws at the time of any stated or special meeting of the Board of Directors or, if vacancies exist on the Board of Directors, forty percent (40%) of such number of directors then in office; provided, however, that such number may not be less than one-third of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided in these By-Laws, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and, except as otherwise required by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by these By-Laws, the act of a majority of the directors present at any such meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of the Board of Directors. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the directors present may adjourn any meeting, from time to time, until a quorum is present. No notice of any adjourned meeting need be given.
SECTION 8. 
Chairman of the Board.
The Chairman of the Board shall preside, when present, at all meetings of the Board of Directors, except as otherwise provided by law.
SECTION 9. 
Resignations.
Any director of the Corporation may resign at any time by giving written notice or notice by electronic transmission thereof to the Secretary of the Corporation. Such resignation shall take effect at the time specified therefor or if the time is not specified, upon delivery thereof; and, unless otherwise specified with respect thereto, the acceptance of such resignation shall not be necessary to make it effective.
SECTION 10. 
Removal of Directors.
Any directors may be removed with or without cause by the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, at a meeting of stockholders called for that purpose; and the vacancy on the Board of Directors caused by any such removal may be filled by the stockholders at such meeting or at any subsequent meeting.
SECTION 11. 
Filling of Vacancies Not Caused by Removal.
In case of any increase in the number of directors, or of any vacancy created by death
 
or resignation, the additional director or directors may be elected or, as the case may be, the vacancy or vacancies may be filled, either (a) by the Board of Directors at any meeting, (i) if the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, or (ii) if the Corporation does not have an Interested Stockholder, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the remaining directors, though less than a quorum or (b) by the stockholders entitled to vote, either at an annual meeting or at a special meeting thereof called for that purpose, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the outstanding shares entitled to vote at such meeting.
SECTION 12. 
Directors' Fees.
The Board of Directors shall have authority to determine from time to time the amount of compensation that shall be paid to its members for attendance at meetings of the Board of Directors or of any committee of the Board of Directors.
SECTION 13. 
Action Without a Meeting.
Any action required or permitted to be taken at any meeting of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof may be taken without a meeting if all members of the Board of Directors or committee, as the case may be, consent thereto in writing, and the writing or writings are filed with the minutes of proceedings of the Board of Directors or committee.
ARTICLE III
Board of Directors Committees
SECTION 1. 
Audit Committee.
In addition to any committees appointed pursuant to Section 2 of this Article, there shall be an Audit Committee, appointed annually by the Board of Directors, consisting of at least three (3) directors who are not members of management. It shall be the responsibility of the Audit Committee to review the scope and results of the annual independent audit of books and records of the Corporation and its subsidiaries and to discharge such other responsibilities as may from time to time be assigned to it by the Board of Directors. The Audit Committee shall meet at such times and places as the members deem advisable, and shall make such recommendations to the Board of Directors as they consider appropriate.
SECTION 2. 
Other Committees.
2.1 The Board of Directors may appoint standing or temporary committees and invest such committees with such powers as it may see fit, with power to subdelegate such powers if deemed desirable by the Board of Directors; but no such committee shall have the power or authority of the Board of Directors to adopt, amend, or repeal these By-Laws or approve, adopt, or recommend to the stockholders of the Corporation any action or matter expressly required by the Certificate of Incorporation, these By-Laws or the Delaware General Corporation Law to be submitted to stockholders for approval.
Committee Powers.
 
2.2 The Board of Directors may designate one or more directors as alternate members of any committee, who may replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of the committee. In the absence or disqualification of a member of a committee, the member or members thereof present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, whether or not such member or members constitute a quorum, may unanimously appoint another member of the Board of Directors to act at the meeting in the place of any such absent or disqualified member.
Committee Members.
SECTION 3. 
Quorum and Manner of Acting.
A majority of the number of directors composing any committee of the Board of Directors, as established and fixed by resolution of the Board of Directors, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at any meeting of such committee but, if less than a majority are present at a meeting, a majority of such directors present may adjourn the meeting from time to time without further notice. The act of a majority of the members of a committee present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of such committee.
ARTICLE IV
Officers and Agents: Terms, Compensation, Removal, Vacancies
SECTION 1. 
Officers.
The elected officers of the Corporation shall be a Chairman of the Board of Directors (who shall be a director) and, at the discretion of the Board of Directors, a President (who shall be a director), and one or more Vice Presidents (each of whom may be assigned by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer an additional title descriptive of the functions assigned to such officer and one or more of whom may be designated Executive or Senior Vice President). The Board of Directors may also elect one or more Vice Chairmen. The Board of Directors shall also designate either the Chairman of the Board of Directors or the President as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation. The Board of Directors shall appoint a Controller, a Secretary, and a Treasurer. Any number of offices, whether elective or appointive, may be held by the same person. The Chief Executive Officer may, by a writing filed with the Secretary, designate titles as officers for employees and agents and appoint Assistant Secretaries and Assistant Treasurers as, from time to time, may appear to be necessary or advisable in the conduct of the affairs of the Corporation and may, in the same manner, terminate or change such titles.
SECTION 2. 
Term of Office.
So far as practicable, all elected officers shall be elected at the annual meeting of the Board of Directors in each year, and shall hold office until the annual meeting of the Board of Directors in the next subsequent year and until their respective successors are chosen. The Controller, Secretary, and Treasurer shall hold office at the pleasure of the Board of Directors.
 
SECTION 3. 
Salaries of Elected Officers.
The salaries paid to the elected officers of the Corporation shall be authorized or approved by the Board of Directors.
SECTION 4. 
Bonuses.
None of the officers, directors, or employees of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations shall at any time be paid any bonus or share in the earnings or profits of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations except pursuant to a plan approved by affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members of the Board of Directors.
SECTION 5. 
Removal of Elected and Appointed Officers.
Any elected or appointed officer may be removed at any time, either for or without cause, by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors, at any meeting called for the purpose.
SECTION 6. 
Vacancies.
If any vacancy occurs in any office, the Board of Directors may elect or appoint a successor to fill such vacancy for the remainder of the term.
ARTICLE V
Officers' Duties and Powers
SECTION 1. 
Chairman of the Board.
The Chairman of the Board of Directors shall preside, when present, at all meetings of the stockholders (except as otherwise provided by statute) and at all meetings of the Board of Directors. The Chairman shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation; to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the Chairman by the Board of Directors.
SECTION 2. 
President.
The President shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation and to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; during the absence or disability of the Chairman of the Board of Directors, to exercise the Chairman's powers and to perform the Chairman's duties; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the President by the Board of Directors; provided, that if the office of President is vacant, the Chairman shall exercise the duties ordinarily exercised by the President until such time as a President is elected or appointed.
SECTION 3. 
Chief Executive Officer.
The officer designated by the Board of Directors as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation shall have general and active control of its business and affairs. The Chief Executive Officer shall have general power to appoint or designate all employees and agents of the Corporation whose appointment or designation is not otherwise provided
 
for and to fix the compensation thereof, subject to the provisions of these By-Laws; to remove or suspend any employee or agent who shall not have been elected or appointed by the Board of Directors or other body; to suspend for cause any employee, agent, or officer, other than an elected officer, pending final action by the body which shall have appointed such employee, agent, or officer; and to exercise all the powers usually pertaining to the office held by the Chief Executive Officer of a corporation.
SECTION 4. 
Vice Presidents and Controller.
The several Vice Presidents and the Controller shall perform all such duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of them, from time to time, by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer, respectively.
SECTION 5. 
Secretary.
The Secretary shall attend to the giving of notice of all meetings of stockholders and of the Board of Directors and shall keep and attest true records of all such proceedings. The Secretary shall have charge of the corporate seal and have authority to attest any and all instruments or writings to which the same may be affixed and shall keep and account for all books, documents, papers, and records of the Corporation relating to its corporate organization. The Secretary shall have authority to sign stock certificates and shall generally perform all the duties usually appertaining to the office of secretary of a corporation. In the absence of the Secretary, an Assistant Secretary or Secretary pro tempore shall perform the duties of the Secretary.
SECTION 6. 
Treasurer.
The Treasurer shall have the care and custody of all moneys, funds, and securities of the Corporation, and shall deposit or cause to be deposited all funds of the Corporation in accordance with directions or authorizations of the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer. The Treasurer shall have power to sign stock certificates, to indorse for deposit or collection, or otherwise, all checks, drafts, notes, bills of exchange, or other commercial paper payable to the Corporation, and to give proper receipts or discharges therefor. In the absence of the Treasurer, an Assistant Treasurer shall perform the duties of the Treasurer.
SECTION 7.
Additional Powers and Duties.
In addition to the foregoing especially enumerated duties and powers, the several officers of the Corporation shall perform such other duties and exercise such further powers as may be provided in these By-Laws or as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine, or as may be assigned to them by any superior officer.
SECTION 8. 
Disaster Emergency Powers of Acting Officers.
If, as a result of a disaster or other state of emergency, the Chief Executive Officer is unable to perform the duties of that office, (a) the powers and duties of the Chief Executive Officer shall be performed by the employee with the highest base salary who shall be available and capable of performing such powers and duties and, if more than one such employee has the same base salary, by the employee whose surname begins with the earliest letter of the alphabet among the group of those employees with the
 
same base salary; (b) the officer performing such duties shall continue to perform such powers and duties until the Chief Executive Officer becomes capable of performing those duties or until the Board of Directors shall have elected a new Chief Executive Officer or designated another individual as Acting Chief Executive Officer; (c) such officer shall have the power in addition to all other powers granted to the Chief Executive Officer by these By-Laws and by the Board of Directors to appoint an acting President, acting Vice President  Finance, acting Controller, acting Secretary, and acting Treasurer, if any of the persons duly elected to any such office is not, by reason of such disaster or emergency, able to perform the duties of such office, each of such acting appointees to serve in such capacities until the officer for whom the appointee is acting becomes capable of performing the duties of such office or until the Board of Directors shall have designated another individual to perform such duties or have elected another person to fill such office; (d) any such acting officer so appointed shall be entitled to exercise all powers vested by these By-Laws or the Board of Directors in the duly elected officer for whom the acting officer is acting; and (e) anyone transacting business with the Corporation may rely upon a certification by any two (2) officers of the Corporation that a specified individual has succeeded to the powers of the Chief Executive Officer and that such person has appointed other acting officers as herein provided and any person, firm, corporation, or other entity to which such certification has been delivered by such officers may continue to rely upon it until notified of a change in writing signed by two (2) officers of the Corporation.
ARTICLE VI
Stock and Transfers of Stock
SECTION 1. 
Stock Certificates.
The shares of the stock of the Corporation shall be represented by certificates, provided that the Board of Directors may provide by resolution or resolutions that some or all of any or all classes or series of stock shall be uncertificated shares. Any such resolution shall not apply to shares represented by certificate until such certificate is surrendered to the Corporation. Every holder of stock of the Corporation represented by a certificate shall be entitled to a certificate, signed by the Chairman of the Board of Directors or the President or a Vice President and the Treasurer or an Assistant Treasurer or the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary, certifying the number of shares owned by the stockholder in the Corporation. Any and all of the signatures on a certificate may be a facsimile. If any officer, transfer agent, or registrar who has signed or whose facsimile signature has been placed upon a certificate shall have ceased to be such officer, transfer agent, or registrar before such certificate is issued, it may be issued by the Corporation with the same effect as if he or she were such officer, transfer agent, or registrar at the date of issue.
SECTION 2. 
Transfer Agents and Registrars.
The Board of Directors may, in its discretion, appoint responsible banks or trust
 
companies in the Borough of Manhattan, in the City of New York, State of New York, and in such other city or cities as the Board of Directors may deem advisable, from time to time, to act as transfer agents and registrars of the stock of the Corporation; and, when such appointments shall have been made, no stock certificate shall be valid until countersigned by one of such transfer agents and registered by one of such registrars.
SECTION 3. 
Transfers of Stock.
Shares of stock may be transferred by delivery of the certificates therefor, accompanied either by an assignment in writing on the back of the certificates or by written power of attorney to sell, assign, and transfer the same, signed by the record holder thereof (or, with respect to uncertificated shares, by delivery of duly executed instructions or in any other manner permitted by law), but no transfer shall affect the right of the Corporation to pay any dividend upon the stock to the holder of record thereof, or to treat the holder of record as the holder in fact thereof for all purposes, and no transfer shall be valid, except between the parties thereto, until such transfer shall have been made upon the books of the Corporation.
SECTION 4. 
Lost Certificates.
The Board of Directors may provide for the issuance of new certificates of stock or uncertificated shares to replace certificates of stock lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, or alleged to be lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, upon such terms and in accordance with such procedures as the Board of Directors shall deem proper and prescribe.
ARTICLE VII
Miscellaneous
SECTION 1. 
Fiscal Year.
The fiscal year of the Corporation shall be the calendar year.
SECTION 2. (Repealed in its entirety by vote of the stockholders, May 5, 1975.)
SECTION 3. 
Signing of Negotiable Instruments.
All bills, notes, checks, or other instruments for the payment of money shall be signed or countersigned by such officer or officers and in such manner as from time to time may be prescribed by resolution (whether general or special) of the Board of Directors.
SECTION 4. 
Indemnification of Directors and Officers.
4.1 
Right to Indemnification.
Each person who was or is made a party to or is threatened to be made a party to or is otherwise involved (including, without limitation, as a witness) in any actual or threatened action, suit, or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative, or investigative (hereinafter a "proceeding"), by reason of the fact that he or she is or was a director or officer of the Corporation or that, being or having been such a director or officer or an employee of the Corporation, he or she is or was serving at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation as a director, officer, employee, or agent of another corporation or of a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise, including service with respect to an employee benefit plan (hereinafter an
 
"indemnitee"), whether the basis of such proceeding is alleged action in an official capacity as such a director, officer, employee, or agent or in any other capacity while serving as such a director, officer, employee, or agent, shall be indemnified and held harmless by the Corporation to the full extent permitted by the Delaware General Corporation Law, as the same exists or may hereafter be amended (but, in the case of any such amendment, only to the extent that such amendment permits the Corporation to provide broader indemnification rights than permitted prior thereto), or by other applicable law as then in effect, against all expense, liability, and loss (including attorneys' fees, judgments, fines, ERISA excise taxes or penalties, and amounts paid in settlement) actually and reasonably incurred or suffered by such indemnitee in connection therewith, and such indemnification shall continue as to an indemnitee who has ceased to be a director, officer, employee, or agent and shall inure to the benefit of the indemnitee's heirs, executors, and administrators; provided, however, that except as provided in Section 4.2 with respect to proceedings seeking to enforce rights to indemnification, the Corporation shall indemnify any such indemnitee in connection with a proceeding (or part thereof) initiated by such indemnitee only if such proceeding (or part thereof) was authorized or ratified by the Board of Directors. The right to indemnification conferred in this Section 4.1 shall be a contract right and shall include the right to be paid by the Corporation the expenses incurred in defending any such proceeding in advance of its final disposition (hereinafter an "advancement of expenses"); provided, however, that an advancement of expenses incurred by an indemnitee in his or her capacity as a director or officer or former director or officer (and not in any other capacity in which service was or is rendered by such indemnitee, including, without limitation, service to an employee benefit plan) shall be made only upon delivery to the Corporation of an undertaking (hereinafter an "undertaking"), by or on behalf of such indemnitee, to repay all amounts so advanced if it shall ultimately be determined by final judicial decision from which there is no further right to appeal that such indemnitee is not entitled to be indemnified for such expenses under this Section 4.1 or otherwise; and provided, further, that an advancement of expenses shall not be made if the Board of Directors makes a good faith determination that such payment would violate law or public policy.
4.2 
Right of Indemnitee to Bring Suit.
If a claim under Section 4.1 is not paid in full by the Corporation within sixty (60) days after a written claim has been received by the Corporation, except in the case of a claim for an advancement of expenses, in which case the applicable period shall be twenty (20) days, the indemnitee may at any time thereafter bring suit against the Corporation to recover the unpaid amount of the claim. If successful in whole or in part in any such suit, or in a suit brought by the Corporation to recover an advancement of expenses pursuant to the terms of an undertaking, the indemnitee shall also be entitled to be paid the expenses of prosecuting or defending such suit. The indemnitee shall be presumed to be entitled to indemnification under this Section 4 upon submission of a
 
written claim (and, in an action brought to enforce a claim for an advancement of expenses, where the required undertaking has been tendered to the Corporation), and thereafter the Corporation shall have the burden of proof to overcome the presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled. Neither the failure of the Corporation (including the Board of Directors, independent legal counsel, or the stockholders) to have made a determination prior to the commencement of such suit that indemnification of the indemnitee is proper in the circumstances, nor an actual determination by the Corporation (including the Board of Directors, independent legal counsel, or the stockholders) that the indemnitee is not entitled to indemnification shall be a defense to the suit or create a presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled.
4.3 
Nonexclusivity of Rights.
The rights to indemnification and to the advancement of expenses conferred in this Section 4 shall not be exclusive of any other right that any person may have or hereafter acquire under any statute, provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation, these By-Laws, any agreement, vote of stockholders or disinterested directors, or otherwise. Neither any amendment to or repeal of this Section 4 or of any of the procedures established by the Board of Directors pursuant to Section 4.7, nor the adoption of any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, nor, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any modification of law, shall eliminate or reduce the effect of the right or protection of any indemnitee to indemnification and to the advancement of expenses in accordance with the provisions hereof and thereof with respect to any proceeding (regardless of when such proceeding is first threatened, commenced or completed) arising out of, or related to, any acts or omissions of such indemnitee occurring prior to such amendment or repeal.
4.4 
Insurance, Contracts, and Funding.
The Corporation may maintain insurance, at its expense, to protect itself and any director, officer, employee, or agent of the Corporation or another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise against any expense, liability, or loss, whether or not the Corporation would have the power to indemnify such person against such expense, liability, or loss under the Delaware General Corporation Law. The Corporation may, without further stockholder approval, enter into contracts with any indemnitee in furtherance of the provisions of this Section 4 and may create a trust fund, grant a security interest, or use other means (including, without limitation, a letter of credit) to ensure the payment of such amounts as may be necessary to effect indemnification as provided in this Section 4.
4.5 
Persons Serving Other Entities.
Any person who is or was a director, officer, or employee of the Corporation who is or was serving (i) as a director or officer of another corporation of which a majority of the shares entitled to vote in the election of its directors is held by the Corporation or (ii) in an executive or management capacity in a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise of which the Corporation or a wholly owned subsidiary of the Corporation is
 
a general partner or has a majority ownership shall be deemed to be so serving at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation and entitled to indemnification and advancement of expenses under Section 4.1.
4.6 
Indemnification of Employees and Agents of the Corporation.
The Corporation may, by action of the Board of Directors, authorize one or more executive officers to grant rights to advancement of expenses to employees or agents of the Corporation on such terms and conditions as such officer or officers deem appropriate under the circumstances. The Corporation may, by action of the Board of Directors, grant rights to indemnification and advancement of expenses to employees or agents or groups of employees or agents of the Corporation with the same scope and effect as the provisions of this Section 4 with respect to the indemnification and advancement of expenses of directors and officers of the Corporation; provided, however, that an undertaking shall be made by an employee or agent only if required by the Board of Directors.
4.7 
Procedures for the Submission of Claims.
The Board of Directors may establish reasonable procedures for the submission of claims for indemnification pursuant to this Section 4, determination of the entitlement of any person thereto, and review of any such determination. Such procedures shall be set forth in an appendix to these By-Laws and shall be deemed for all purposes to be a part hereof.
ARTICLE VIII
Amendments
SECTION 1. 
Amendment of the By-Laws: General.
Except as herein otherwise expressly provided, the By-Laws of the Corporation may be altered or repealed in any particular and new By-Laws, not inconsistent with any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or any provision of law, may be adopted, either by
A. the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority in number of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote at an annual meeting of stockholders or at a special meeting thereof, the notice of which special meeting shall include the form of the proposed alteration or repeal or of the proposed new By-Laws, or a summary thereof; or
B. either by
i. the affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors at any meeting thereof, or
ii. the affirmative vote of all the directors present at any meeting at which a quorum, less than a majority, is present;
provided, in either of the latter cases, that the notice of such meeting shall include the form of the proposed alteration or repeal or of the proposed new By-Laws, or a summary thereof; and provided, further, that Article I, Section 11.2 of these By-Laws
 
may be amended only as set forth in Section 1.A of this By-Law, except that any amendment required by law or necessary or desirable to cure an administrative or technical deficiency may be made as provided in Section 1.B of this By-Law.
SECTION 2. 
Amendments as to Compensation and Removal of Officers.
Notwithstanding anything contained in these By-Laws to the contrary, the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the Voting Stock, as defined in Article FOURTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, at a meeting of stockholders called for the purpose, shall be required to alter, amend, repeal, or adopt any provision inconsistent with Sections 3, 4 and 5 of Article IV of these By-Laws, notice of which meeting shall include the form of the proposed amendment, or a summary thereof.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Boeing Director Gen. James Jones Resigns Board Seat
CHICAGO, Dec. 15, 2008  The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] board of directors today accepted the resignation of retired Marine Corps Gen. James L. Jones, who earlier this month was named by U.S. President-elect Barack Obama to serve as his national security adviser.
"Gen. Jones made valuable contributions to our company during his tenure," said Boeing Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Jim McNerney. "We wish him well as he rededicates himself to serving his country, something he has done honorably and with great distinction for more than 40 years."
Jones, 64, joined the board in June, 2007. His resignation is effective immediately.
Contact: Todd Blecher, 312-544-2002


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20090128074326.txt.gz
TIME:20090128074326
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
(a) On January 28, 2009, The Boeing Company issued a press release reporting its financial results for the fourth quarter of 2008.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
(a) Not applicable
(b) Not applicable
(c) Not applicable
(d) Exhibits
99.1    Press Release issued by The Boeing Company dated January 28, 2009, reporting Boeing's financial results for the fourth quarter of 2008.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
Boeing Posts Quarterly Loss on Strike Impact and Charges
 
 
 
 
Table 1. Summary Financial Results
 
 The Boeing Company's [NYSE: BA] fourth-quarter net income declined to a loss of $56 million, or $0.08 per share, reflecting the now-settled machinists' strike (EPS impact estimated at $1.09 per share), a charge related to the 747 ($0.61 per share) and a litigation-related reserve ($0.09 per share).
CHICAGO, Jan. 28, 2009
Revenues for the quarter declined 27 percent to $12.7 billion, due primarily to the effects of the strike which reduced commercial airplane deliveries by approximately 70 units and revenues by an estimated $4.3 billion (Table 1).
For the full year of 2008, net income fell 34 percent to $2.7 billion, EPS was $3.71 per share, and revenue fell 8 percent to $60.9 billion. Full-year results were impacted by the strike, the 747 charge, the litigation-related reserve, and higher costs for AEW&C announced in the second quarter, which together reduced full-year EPS by an estimated $2.56 per share. This was partially offset by lower pension and deferred compensation expenses.
 
"The progress we made in many areas of Boeing during 2008 was outweighed by the impact of the strike and our performance on some key development programs," said Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer Jim McNerney. "Our imperative going forward is improving execution where it needs to be improved, maintaining strong performance across all our production programs, and preserving our financial strength to grow in these challenging economic times."
Fourth-quarter operating cash outflow was $1.6 billion, primarily reflecting the effects of the strike (Table 2). Operating cash outflow for the year was $0.4 billion, and free cash flow* was negative $2.1 billion. Total company backlog at year-end was a record $352 billion, up 8 percent in 2008 driven by commercial airplane orders and new IDS contract awards.
Table 2. Cash Flow
 
 
Cash and investments in marketable securities totaled $3.6 billion at quarter end, down from the end of the third quarter, reflecting strike impacts, previously announced business acquisitions and scheduled debt repayments (Table 3). The company converted most of its marketable securities positions into cash during the quarter.
Table 3. Cash, Marketable Securities and Debt Balances
 
 
Share repurchase activity totaled 7.6 million shares for $335 million during the quarter and 42.1 million shares for $2.9 billion during the year.
 
Segment Results
Commercial Airplanes
Boeing Commercial Airplanes (BCA) fourth-quarter revenues were $4.6 billion, 48 percent below the same period last year, driven by reduced deliveries due to the strike that affected production of all commercial airplane programs (Table 4). Losses from operations totaled $968 million compared with earnings of $973 million in the year-ago period. The strike reduced fourth-quarter earnings by an estimated $1.2 billion, net of recovery of galley-delayed deliveries from the third quarter, while a charge for a reach-forward loss on the 747 program reduced earnings by $685 million.
Table 4. Commercial Airplanes Operating Results
 
For the year, BCA revenues decreased 15 percent to $28.3 billion on an estimated 105 fewer airplane deliveries due to the strike. Operating earnings decreased 67 percent to $1.2 billion while margins were 4.2 percent, driven by the strike, infrastructure cost absorption and additional 747 program costs. The strike reduced full-year earnings by an estimated $1.8 billion.
BCA booked 44 gross orders during the quarter and 669 during the year. Contractual backlog rose to a record $279 billion, increasing 9 percent for the year to approximately eight times BCA's annual revenues.
As announced on November 14, the company expects deliveries of the 747-8 freighter to begin in the third quarter of 2010 and deliveries of the 747-8 Intercontinental passenger model to begin in the second quarter of 2011. The schedule change was caused by design changes, limited availability of engineering resources inside the company and the machinists strike. Since November, a full assessment of the supply chain impacts of these and other additional design changes, coupled with increased pension costs, has resulted in the company recording a reach-forward loss of $685 million in the fourth quarter.
The 787 Dreamliner made progress during the quarter despite the labor strike. Key milestones included FAA approval of the scheduled maintenance program that defines the tasks and service intervals operators will use to maintain the 787, and a
 
successful wing-box destruction test, a key step toward validating the structural integrity of the airplane. Also during the quarter, the company discovered a requirement to replace certain fasteners, and has now largely finished replacing them on the first two flight test airplanes. As announced in December, the company expects first flight of the 787 to occur in the second quarter of 2009 and deliveries to begin in the first quarter of 2010. The 787 program has won 895 net orders from 58 customers to date, which includes the recent removal from the books of one customer's order for airplanes that were scheduled for delivery late in the next decade.
Integrated Defense Systems
Boeing Integrated Defense Systems (IDS) fourth-quarter revenues were $8.0 billion and operating margins were 11.0 percent, reflecting strong program performance across IDS's balanced portfolio of programs.
For the year, IDS revenue held steady at $32.0 billion with operating margins of 10.1 percent due to solid performance across IDS, including a reduction of 0.8 points due to the second-quarter AEW&C charge.
Table 5. Integrated Defense Systems Operating Results
 
Boeing Military Aircraft fourth-quarter operating margins expanded to 11.2 percent for the quarter due to strong execution across aircraft production programs. Revenue of $3.2 billion is down from the prior year due to delivery mix and volume.
For the quarter, revenues in Network & Space Systems increased slightly to $2.9 billion. Operating margins were 8.0 percent on solid performance across the segment's broad array of programs. Ground-based Midcourse Defense successfully completed its most complex flight test to date, and Airborne Laser successfully completed the first ground test of the entire weapon system integrated aboard the aircraft.
 
Global Services & Support again generated strong results from its broad portfolio of programs. Revenues for the quarter rose to $2.0 billion on growth in training systems and integrated logistics. Operating margins were 14.8 percent reflecting outstanding execution.
The IDS backlog of $73.0 billion remained stable during the quarter and increased for the full year. Significant new orders during the year included V-22 and CH-47 multi-year contracts, the F-22 sustainment contract, and key international orders.
Boeing Capital Corporation
Boeing Capital Corporation (BCC) reported fourth-quarter pre-tax earnings of $26 million, down from $30 million in the same period last year which included a significantly larger portfolio (Table 6). BCC's portfolio balance at the end of the year was $6.0 billion, down from $6.5 billion at the beginning of the year primarily on normal portfolio run-off and depreciation. BCC contributed $32 million in cash dividends to Boeing during the quarter and $252 million in the year. BCC's debt-to-equity ratio remained steady at 5.0-to-1.
Table 6. Boeing Capital Corporation Operating Results
 
Additional Information
The "Other" segment consists primarily of Boeing Engineering, Operations and Technology as well as certain results related to the consolidation of all business units. Other segment expense was $59 million in the fourth quarter, down from $166 million in the same period last year which included higher environmental expense.
Unallocated expense was $85 million, down from $300 million last year, driven by unallocated pension expense being lower by $127 million. Other unallocated includes a $101 million litigation-related reserve.
Fourth-quarter pension expense was $113 million, down from $301 million in the same quarter last year, of which $14 million was recorded in unallocated expense and
 
the balance was recorded as expense in the business segments. At year-end, Boeing's pension plans were funded at 83 percent of the projected benefit obligation resulting in a reduction of $8.2 billion to shareholders' equity.
Income tax benefit was $216 million in the quarter, including $170 million for the full-year R&D tax credit that was signed into law during the quarter.
Outlook
The 2009 financial guidance reflects expectations for continued growth in BCA and IDS, reduced discretionary and capital spending, and restructuring of various internal organizations to drive higher levels of productivity. The company expects to issue 2010 financial guidance later in the year.
Boeing's 2009 revenue guidance is $68 billion to $69 billion. Earnings-per-share guidance for 2009 is $5.05 to $5.35 per share. The financial guidance continues to assume stable delivery levels for in-production commercial airplanes over the next several years, but also considers operational and market risks. Operating cash flow is expected to be greater than $2.5 billion (Table 7), including discretionary pension contributions of approximately $0.5 billion and an assumption of $1 billion for new commercial airplane financings.
Commercial Airplanes' 2009 delivery guidance is between 480 and 485 airplanes and is sold out. BCA's 2009 revenue is expected to grow to between $34 billion and $35 billion, accompanied by margins of approximately 10 percent.
IDS revenue guidance for 2009 is between $33 billion and $34 billion, with operating margins of approximately 10 percent.
The company expects that it will finance some commercial airplane deliveries beginning in the first quarter of 2009. At this time, we expect that the amount of financing in 2009 will exceed normal portfolio runoff due to depreciation and prepayments, modestly increasing the portfolio size at BCC.
Boeing's 2009 R&D forecast is between $3.6 billion and $3.8 billion. Annual capital expenditures are expected to be approximately $1.4 billion in 2009.
The company's non-cash pension expense is expected to be approximately $1.0 billion in 2009, reflecting negative asset returns in 2008, a reduction in the assumed long-term rate of return from 8.25 percent to 8.0 percent and a decrease in the discount rate to 6.1 percent from 6.2 percent.
 
Table 7. Financial Outlook
 
 
 
Non-GAAP Measure Disclosure
Management believes that the non-GAAP (Generally Accepted Accounting Principles) measures (indicated by an asterisk *) used in this report provide investors with important perspectives into the company's ongoing business performance. The company does not intend for the information to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the related GAAP measures. Other companies may define the measures differently. The following definitions are provided:
Free Cash Flow
Free cash flow is defined as GAAP less capital expenditures for . Management believes free cash flow provides investors with an important perspective on the cash available for shareholders, debt repayment, and acquisitions after making the capital investments required to support ongoing business operations and long term value creation. Free cash flow does not represent the residual cash flow available for discretionary expenditures as it excludes certain mandatory expenditures such as repayment of maturing debt. Management uses free cash flow internally to assess both business performance and overall liquidity. Table 2 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and free cash flow.
operating cash flow
property, plant and equipment additions
 
Certain statements in this press release may be "forward-looking" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," "targets," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions about future events that may not prove to be accurate. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak to events only as of the date they are made and we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise, except as required by federal securities laws. Specific factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, those set forth below and other important factors disclosed previously and from time to time in our other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission: the effect of economic conditions in the United States and globally; the adequacy of coverage, by allowance for losses, of risks related to our non-U.S. accounts receivable being payable in U.S. dollars; the continued operation, viability and growth of Commercial Airplanes revenues and successful execution of our backlog in this segment; the effects of customers cancelling, modifying and/or rescheduling contractual orders; the timing and effects of decisions to complete or launch a Commercial Airplanes program; the ability to successfully develop and timely produce the 787 and 747-8 aircraft; the effect on our revenues of political and legal processes; changing defense priorities; and associated budget reductions by U.S. and international government customers affecting Boeing defense programs; our relationship with our union-represented workforce and the negotiation of collective bargaining agreements; the continuation of long-term trends in passenger traffic and revenue yields in the airline industry; the impact of volatile fuel prices and the airline industry's response; the effect of declines in aircraft valuation; the impact on our revenues or operating results of airline bankruptcies; the continuation of historical costs for fleet support services; the receipt of estimated award and incentive fees on U.S. government contracts; the future demand for commercial satellites and projections of future order flow; the potential for technical or quality issues on development programs, including the Airborne Early Warning and Control program, International Tanker, other fixed-price development programs, or commercial satellite programs, to affect schedule and cost estimates, or cause us to incur a material charge or experience a termination for default; the outcome of any litigation and/or government investigation in which we are a party, and other contingencies; returns on pension fund assets, impacts of future interest rate changes on pension obligations and rising healthcare costs; the amounts and effects of underinsured operations, including satellite launches; the scope, nature or impact of acquisition or disposition activity and investment in any joint ventures/strategic alliances, including Sea Launch and United Launch Alliance, and indemnifications related thereto; and the expected cash expenditures and charges associated with the exit of the Connexion by Boeing business.
Contact:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20090209172238.txt.gz
TIME:20090209172238
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: February 9, 2009
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Boeing Statement Regarding 2008 10-K Earnings per Share Data
Boeing [NYSE: BA] today issued the following statement about the 2008 earnings per share data in its Form 10-K filing with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, also dated today, differing from that contained in its Jan. 28 earnings news release.
CHICAGO, Feb. 9, 2009 
"As reflected in our 10-K, our fourth-quarter and full-year 2008 per-share results are now four cents lower than was reported on Jan. 28, primarily because of two subsequent events that have been incorporated into the fourth-quarter results. The first was a reduction in the collateral values of aircraft in our customer financing portfolio due to the receipt of new third-party aircraft value publications. The second was a liabilities increase resulting from an arbitration award.
With those adjustments, our fourth-quarter 2008 loss now stands at 12 cents per share while our full-year 2008 earnings per share is $3.67."
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20090210160028.txt.gz
TIME:20090210160028
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The Board of Directors (the "") of The Boeing Company (the "") appointed Mr. Robert J. Pasterick, 53, as the Company's Vice President of Finance and Corporate Controller effective February 10, 2009. In that position, Mr. Pasterick will also act as the Company's chief accounting officer.
Board
Company
Prior to this appointment, Mr. Pasterick served as the Vice President and Chief Financial Officer for Boeing Commercial Airplanes ("BCA") since February 2003. In this position, he was responsible for the overall financial management of BCA. In addition to the Finance organizations, Contracts and Business Operations also reported to Mr. Pasterick. From November 2000 until February 2003, he was Vice President and Controller for BCA. In this capacity, he was responsible for the group's accounting, financial planning and reporting, pricing, estimating and cost management activities. From November 1999 until November 2000, he held the office of Vice President of Financial Planning and Analysis for The Boeing Company. He joined Boeing through the Company's acquisition of the aerospace and defense units of Rockwell in December 1996.
Mr. Pasterick will receive salary, bonus and equity awards, and will participate in other benefit and compensation plans, at levels consistent with his seniority and scope of responsibility. No additional compensation or equity has been awarded to Mr. Pasterick in connection with this appointment.
Mr. Pasterick will replace Mr. Harry S. McGee III, who served as the Company's Vice President of Finance and Corporate Controller since January 2004. Effective upon Mr. Pasterick's appointment, Mr. McGee became the Company's Vice President of Strategy Integration for Internal Services.
A copy of the Company's press release announcing Mr. Pasterick's appointment and Mr. McGee's new position is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: February 10, 2009
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Boeing Announces Leadership Changes in Finance Groups
CHICAGO, Feb. 10, 2009  Boeing [NYSE: BA] today announced a series of personnel moves within its corporate and business unit Finance organizations that will leverage the capabilities and expand the experience of leaders in several key roles.
Commercial Airplanes Chief Financial Officer Rob Pasterick, 53, has been named vice president of Finance and corporate controller, reporting to Boeing Corporate President and Chief Financial Officer James Bell. Pasterick has held a variety of key Finance roles across the company in his 29 years of service. He succeeds Harry McGee, 59, who becomes vice president of strategy integration for internal services, a new position created to drive long-term efficiencies and greater productivity across the company's internal business support services. McGee, who has 27 years with the company, will continue to report to Bell, who oversees the company's Shared Services Group and other back-office support functions.
Ray Ferrari, 54, a 30-year Boeing veteran with broad experience across the company's defense and commercial businesses, succeeds Pasterick as Commercial Airplanes chief financial officer. Ferrari most recently served as vice president of Finance for Network & Space Systems at Boeing Integrated Defense Systems. Craig Saddler, 49, now president of Boeing Australia and the South Pacific, will replace Ferrari. Saddler, who has 27 years with the company, served in a variety of senior Finance roles before taking his Australian assignment.
Boeing also named Jon Emery, 51, vice president and controller of the Commercial Airplanes unit. Emery most recently led the company's program risk assessment group and internal services productivity initiatives. He has 28 years with Boeing.
"These rotations and reassignments will broaden the skills and experiences of our senior team, strengthen our core finance capabilities, and improve the support we provide to our business units," said Bell. "Each of these leaders' demonstrated experience with, and understanding of, our businesses will ensure our continued focus on execution, functional excellence and seamless integration across the Boeing enterprise."
The changes are effective immediately.
Contact: Todd Blecher, 312-544-2002


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20090226172620.txt.gz
TIME:20090226172620
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On February 22, 2009, the Compensation Committee (the "") of the Board of Directors (the "") of The Boeing Company (the "") approved cash-based performance awards (paid in cash or common stock at the Committee's discretion), stock option grants and restricted stock unit grants for executive officers under the Company's long-term incentive program (the ""). The 2009 Awards were effective on February 23, 2009. The Committee modified the components of these awards compared to prior grants, but maintained substantially the same total award value as in prior years. Since 2006, performance awards and options each comprised 50% of the total award value. For the 2009 Awards, a performance award will still represent 50% of the value and stock options and RSUs will each represent 25% of the total value. The terms and conditions of the performance awards and stock options are similar to those in prior years. The RSUs will vest and settle in common stock (on a one-for-one basis) on the third anniversary of the grant date. A copy of the Notice of Terms of Restricted Stock Units dated February 23, 2009 is attached as Exhibit 10.1 and is incorporated herein.
Committee
Board
Company
2009 Awards
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 10.1
 
As part of the Executive Compensation Program, The Boeing Company (the "Company" has awarded you a Restricted Stock Unit award. The terms and conditions of the award are as follows:
 
 
 
 
 
5.1 While RSUs are in your account, they will earn dividend equivalents in the form of additional RSUs. Specifically, as of each dividend payment date for Boeing stock, your RSU account will be credited with additional RSUs ("Earnings Credit RSUs") equal in number to the number of shares of Boeing stock that could be bought with the cash dividends that would be paid on the RSUs in your account if each RSU were a share of Boeing stock. The number of RSUs that results from the Earnings Credit calculation will be to two decimal places.
5.2 The number of shares of Boeing stock that could be bought with such cash dividends will be
calculated based on the "Fair Market Value" of Boeing stock on the applicable dividend payment date. "Fair Market Value" here means the average of the high and the low per share trading prices for Boeing stock as reported in for the specific dividend payment date, or in such other source as the Company deems reliable.
The Wall Street Journal
5.3 Earnings Credit RSUs will vest at the same time as the RSUs with which they are associated.
 
 
 
 
10.1 Distribution from your RSU account will be made as soon as reasonably possible after the vesting of your RSUs, but not later than 60 days after the applicable vesting date. Distribution will be in whole shares of Boeing stock. The number of shares distributed will be equal to the number of whole vested RSUs in your account, subject to deductions described in paragraph 10.2. Fractional share values will be applied to income tax withholding.
10.2 The Company will deduct from the distribution of your vested RSUs any withholding or other taxes required by law and may deduct any amounts due from you to the Company or to a subsidiary of the Company.
 
 
The Board shall, in all appropriate circumstances, require reimbursement of any annual incentive payment or long-term incentive payment to an executive officer where: (1) the payment was predicated upon achieving certain financial results that were subsequently the subject of a substantial restatement of Company financial statements filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission; (2) the Board determines the executive engaged in intentional misconduct that caused or substantially caused the need for the substantial restatement; and (3) a lower payment would have been made to the executive based upon the restated financial results. In each such instance, the Company will, to the extent practicable, seek to recover from the individual executive the amount by which the individual executive's incentive payments for the relevant period exceeded the lower payment that would have been made based on the restated financial results. For purposes of this policy, the term "executive officer" means any officer who has been designated an executive officer by the Board.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20090313165425.txt.gz
TIME:20090313165425
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On March 13, 2009, The Boeing Company (the "Company") issued $700,000,000 in aggregate principal amount of 5.000% Senior Notes due 2014 (the "2014 Notes"), $650,000,000 in aggregate principal amount of 6.000% Senior Notes due 2019 (the "2019 Notes") and $500,000,000 in aggregate principal amount of 6.875% Senior Notes due 2039 (the "2039 Notes" and, together with the 2014 Notes and the 2019 Notes, the "Notes"). The Notes were issued pursuant to an Indenture dated as of February 1, 2003, between the Company and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as successor trustee to JPMorgan Chase Bank.
On March 10, 2009, the Company entered into a Purchase Agreement (the "Purchase Agreement") with J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. and UBS Securities LLC, as representatives of the several purchasers named therein (the "Purchasers"), pursuant to which the Company agreed to issue and sell the Notes to the Purchasers.
The Notes are unsecured and have the same rank as all of The Boeing Company's other unsecured and unsubordinated debt. The 2014 Notes will mature on March 15, 2014, the 2019 Notes will mature on March 15, 2019 and the 2039 Notes will mature on March 15, 2039. The Company will pay interest on the Notes semiannually on March 15 and September 15 of each year starting on September 15, 2009. The Company will have the right to redeem the Notes in whole or in part at any time prior to maturity at the redemption price described in the Final Prospectus Supplement filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 11, 2009 (Registration No. 333-157790) (the "Final Prospectus Supplement").
The Company has filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission a Prospectus dated March 9, 2009 (Registration No. 333-157790), a Preliminary Prospectus Supplement dated March 10, 2009, a Free Writing Prospectus dated March 11, 2009 and the Final Prospectus Supplement in connection with the public offering of the Notes.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 1.1
March 10, 2009
The Boeing Company
100 North Riverside
Chicago, Illinois 60606
Ladies and Gentlemen:
Referring to the Unsecured Debt Securities of The Boeing Company (the "Company") covered by the registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration No. 333-157790) (such registration statement, including (i) the prospectus included therein (the "Base Prospectus"), and (ii) all documents filed as part thereof or incorporated by reference therein including the information, if any, deemed pursuant to Rule 430A, 430B or 430C under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Securities Act") to be part of the registration statement at the time of its effectiveness, and at each deemed effective date with respect to the Purchasers (as defined below) pursuant to Rule 430B(f)(2) of the Securities Act, are hereinafter collectively called the "Registration Statement"). The Base Prospectus (i) as supplemented by the prospectus supplement dated March 10, 2009 specifically relating to the Purchased Notes (as defined below) in the form first filed under Rule 424(b) under the Securities Act (or in the form first made available to the Purchasers (as defined below) by the Company to meet the requests of purchasers pursuant to Rule 173 under the Securities Act) and (ii) all documents filed as part thereof or incorporated or deemed to be incorporated by reference therein are hereinafter collectively called the "Prospectus," and the preliminary form of the Prospectus is hereinafter called the "Preliminary Prospectus". For purposes of this Agreement, "free writing prospectus" has the meaning set forth in Rule 405 under the Securities Act and "Time of Sale Prospectus" means the Preliminary Prospectus together with each free writing prospectus, if any, identified in Schedule B hereto. "Time of Sale" means 5:00 pm (Eastern time) on the date of this Agreement. Any reference to "amend", "amendment" or "supplement" with respect to the Registration Statement, any Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus shall be deemed to refer to and include any documents filed after such date under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder (collectively, the "Exchange Act") that are deemed to be incorporated by reference therein.
 
On the basis of the representations, warranties and agreements contained in this Agreement, but subject to the terms and conditions herein set forth, the purchaser or purchasers named in Schedule A hereto (the "Purchasers") agree to purchase, severally, and the Company agrees to sell to the Purchasers, severally, the respective principal amounts of the Company's 5.000% Senior Notes due 2014 (the "2014 Notes"), 6.000% Senior Notes due 2019 (the "2019 Notes") and 6.875% Senior Notes due 2039 (the "2039 Notes" and, together with the 2014 Notes and the 2019 Notes, the "Purchased Notes") set forth opposite the name of each Purchaser on Schedule A hereto. The Purchased Notes will have the terms as set forth in the Pricing Term Sheet on Schedule B.
The price at which the Purchased Notes shall be purchased from the Company by the Purchasers shall be 99.208% of the principal amount of the 2014 Notes, 98.016% of the principal amount of the 2019 Notes and 97.038% of the principal amount of the 2039 Notes, plus, in each case, accrued interest, if any, from March 13, 2009, to the date of delivery. The initial public offering price shall be 99.558% of the principal amount of the 2014 Notes, 98.466% of the principal amount of the 2019 Notes and 97.913% of the principal amount of the 2039 Notes, plus, in each case, accrued interest, if any, from March 13, 2009 to the date of delivery. The Purchased Notes will be offered by the Purchasers as set forth in the Prospectus Supplement relating to such Purchased Notes.
The Company understands that the Purchasers intend to make a public offering of the Purchased Notes as soon after the effectiveness of this Agreement as in the judgment of the Purchasers is advisable, and initially to offer the Purchased Notes on the terms set forth in the Time of Sale Prospectus. The Company acknowledges and agrees that the Purchasers may offer and sell Purchased Notes to or through any affiliate of a Purchaser and that any such affiliate may offer and sell Purchased Notes purchased by it to or through any Purchaser.
If we are acting as Representative(s) for the several Purchasers named in Schedule A hereto, we represent that we are authorized to act for such several Purchasers in connection with the transactions contemplated in this Agreement, and that, if there are more than one of us, any action under this Agreement taken by any of us will be binding upon all the Purchasers.
All of the provisions contained in the document entitled "The Boeing Company Standard Purchase Provisions", a copy of which is attached hereto, are hereby incorporated by reference in their entirety and shall be deemed to be a part of this Agreement to the same extent as if such provisions had been set forth in full herein.
In relation to each Member State of the European Economic Area which has implemented the Prospectus Directive (each, a "Relevant Member State"), each Purchaser hereby represents that it has not made and will not make an offer of the Notes to the public in that Relevant Member State, except that it may make an offer of the Notes to the public in that Relevant Member State at any time under the following exemptions under the Prospectus Directive (as defined below), if they have been implemented in that Relevant Member State: (a) to legal entities which are authorized or regulated to operate in the financial markets or, if not so
 
authorized or regulated, whose corporate purpose is solely to invest in securities; (b) to any legal entity which has two or more of (1) an average of at least 250 employees during the last financial year; (2) a total balance sheet of more than 43,000,000 and (3) an annual net turnover of more than 50,000,000, as shown in its last annual or consolidated accounts; (c) to fewer than 100 natural or legal persons (other than qualified investors as defined in the Prospectus Directive); or (d) in any other circumstances falling within Article 3(2) of the Prospectus Directive, provided that no such offer of Notes shall result in a requirement for the publication by the Company or any underwriter of a prospectus pursuant to Article 3 of the Prospectus Directive. For purposes of this section, the expression an "offer of the Notes to the public" in relation to any Notes in any Relevant Member State means the communication in any form and by any means of sufficient information on the terms of the offer and the Notes to be offered so as to enable an investor to decide to purchase or subscribe to purchase the Notes, as the same may be varied in the Relevant Member State by any measure implementing the Prospectus Directive in that Relevant Member State, and the expression Prospectus Directive means Directive 2003/71/EC and includes any relevant implementing measure in each Relevant Member State.
Each Purchaser hereby represents that, in connection with the distribution of the Notes, it has only communicated or caused to be communicated and will only communicate or cause to be communicated any invitation or inducement to engage in investment activity (within the meaning of Section 21 of the Financial Services and Markets Act 2000 ("FSMA") of the United Kingdom) received by it in connection with the issue or sale of the Notes or any investments representing the Notes in circumstances in which Section 21(1) of the FSMA does not apply to the Company and that it has complied and will comply with all applicable provisions of the FSMA with respect to anything done by it in relation to the Notes in, from or otherwise involving the United Kingdom.
Each Purchaser that is not a U.S. registered broker-dealer, represents that if it sells Notes in the United States it will do so through one or more U.S. registered broker-dealers as permitted by the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority regulations.
Each Purchaser hereby agrees that it will not offer, sell or deliver any of the Notes in any jurisdiction outside the United States except under circumstances that will result in compliance with the applicable laws thereof, and that it will take at its own expense whatever action is required to permit its resale of the Notes in such jurisdictions. Each Purchaser understands that no action has been taken to permit a public offering in any jurisdiction outside the United States where action would be required for such purpose. Each Purchaser agrees not to cause any advertisement of the Notes to be published in any newspaper or periodical or posted in any public place and not to issue any circular relating to the Notes, except in any such case with the prior express written consent of the Company and of the Representatives and then only at its own risk and expense.
 
The "Closing Date" shall be: March 13, 2009
 
Notices to the Purchasers shall be sent to the following address(es) or telecopier number(s):
J.P. Morgan Securities Inc.
270 Park Avenue
New York, NY 10017
Attention: High Grade Syndicate Desk - 8th Floor
Facsimile: (212) 834-6081
UBS Securities LLC
677 Washington Blvd.
Stamford CT 06901
Attention: Fixed Income Syndicate
Facsimile: (203) 719-0495
 
 
If the foregoing is in accordance with your understanding of our agreement, kindly sign and return to us the enclosed duplicate hereof, whereupon it will become a binding agreement between the Company and the several Purchasers in accordance with its terms.
 
The foregoing Purchase
Agreement is hereby confirmed
as of the date first above
written
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Filed Pursuant to Rule 433 under the Securities Act of 1933
Registration Statement No. 333-157790
Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, dated March 10, 2009
 
 
Notes:
The issuer has filed a registration statement (including a prospectus) with the SEC for the offering to which this communication relates. Before you invest, you should read the prospectus in that registration statement and other documents the issuer has filed with the SEC for more complete information about the issuer and this offering. You may get these documents for free by visiting EDGAR on the SEC Web site at www.sec.gov. Alternatively, the issuer, any underwriter or any dealer participating in the offering will arrange to send you the prospectus if you request it by calling J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. collect at 1-212-834-4533 or UBS Securities LLC toll-free at 877-827-6444 ext. 561-3844.
 
From time to time, The Boeing Company, a Delaware corporation ("Company"), may enter into purchase agreements that provide for the sale of designated securities to the purchaser or purchasers named therein. The standard provisions set forth herein may be incorporated by reference in any such purchase agreement ("Purchase Agreement"). The Purchase Agreement, including the provisions incorporated therein by reference, is herein sometimes referred to as "this Agreement." Unless otherwise defined herein, terms defined in the Purchase Agreement are used herein as therein defined.
1. . The Company proposes to issue and sell from time to time its Unsecured Debt Securities ("Notes") registered under the registration statement referred to in Section 2(a). The Notes will be issued under an Indenture, dated as of February 1, 2003, between the Company and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as successor to JPMorgan Chase Bank, as Trustee, as may be supplemented from time to time, (the "Indenture"). The Notes will be sold to the Purchasers (as defined below) for resale in accordance with the terms of the offering determined at the time of the sale. The Notes involved in any such offering are hereinafter referred to as the "Purchased Notes," and the firm or firms, as the case may be, which agree to purchase the same are hereinafter referred to as the "Purchasers" of such Purchased Notes. The terms "you" and "your" refer to those Purchasers who sign the Purchase Agreement either on behalf of themselves only or on behalf of themselves and as representatives of the several Purchasers named in Schedule A thereto, as the case may be.
Introductory
2. . The Company represents and warrants to and agrees with each Purchaser that:
Representations and Warranties of the Company
(a) A Registration Statement (as defined in the Purchase Agreement) covering an indeterminate amount of the securities of the Company (including the Purchased Notes), including a prospectus has been filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission ("Commission") and has become effective under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Securities Act"); no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement is in effect, and no proceedings for such purpose are pending before or threatened by the Commission. The Company is a well known seasoned issuer (as defined in Rule 405 under the Securities Act) eligible to use the Registration Statement as an automatic shelf registration statement and the Company has not received notice that the Commission objects to the use of the Registration Statement as an automatic shelf registration statement. The terms Registration Statement, Time of Sale Prospectus and Prospectus shall have the meanings ascribed to them in the Purchase Agreement.
(b) The Company is not an "ineligible issuer" in connection with the offering pursuant to Rules 164, 405 and 433 under the Securities Act. Any free writing prospectus that the Company is required to file pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Securities Act has been, or will be, filed with the Commission in accordance with the requirements of the Securities Act and the applicable rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder (the "Securities Act Rules and Regulations"). Each free writing prospectus that the Company has filed, or is required to file, pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Securities Act or that was prepared by or on behalf of or used or referred to by the Company complies or will comply in all material respects with the requirements of the Securities Act and the applicable rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder. Except for the free writing prospectuses, if any, identified in Schedule B to the Purchase Agreement, the Company has not prepared, used or referred to, and will not, without your prior consent, prepare, use or refer to, any free writing prospectus.
 
(c) The Registration Statement conforms in all respects to the requirements of the Securities Act and the Securities Act Rules and Regulations and does not include any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, except that the foregoing does not apply to statements or omissions in such document based upon written information furnished to the Company by any Purchaser specifically for use therein. At the Time of Sale, the Time of Sale Prospectus did not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, except that the foregoing does not apply to statements or omissions in such document based upon written information furnished to the Company by any Purchaser specifically for use therein. The Prospectus does not contain and, as amended or supplemented, if applicable, will not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, except that the foregoing does not apply to statements or omissions in such document based upon written information furnished to the Company by any Purchaser specifically for use therein. The documents incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus pursuant to Item 12 of Form S-3 of the Securities Act, at the time they were filed with the Commission, complied in all material respects with the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and the pertinent published rules and regulations thereunder (the "Exchange Act Rules and Regulations"). Any additional documents deemed to be incorporated by reference in the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus, will, when they are filed with the Commission, comply in all material respects with the requirements of the Exchange Act and the Exchange Act Rules and Regulations and will not contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
(d) The Company has been duly incorporated and is an existing corporation in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware, with power and corporate authority to own its properties and conduct its business as described in the Registration Statement, Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus; and the Company is duly qualified to do business as a foreign corporation in good standing in all other jurisdictions in which its ownership or lease of property or the conduct of its business requires such qualification except where failure to so qualify would not individually or in the aggregate have a material adverse effect on the financial condition, business, properties or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole or on the Company's ability to perform its obligations under the Offered Securities and the Indenture in any material respect (a "Material Adverse Effect").
(e) Each "significant subsidiary" (as such term is defined in Rule 1-02 of Regulation S-X) of the Company (each a "Material Subsidiary" and together the "Material Subsidiaries") has been duly incorporated and is an existing corporation or other entity in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its incorporation or organization, with power and authority to own its properties and conduct its business as described in the Registration Statement, Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus; and each Material Subsidiary of the Company is duly qualified to do business as a foreign corporation or other entity in good standing in all other jurisdictions in which its ownership or lease of property or the conduct of its business requires such qualification except where failure to so qualify would not have a Material Adverse Effect; all of the issued and outstanding capital stock or ownership interests of each Material Subsidiary of the Company has been duly authorized and validly issued and is fully paid and nonassessable; and the capital stock or ownership interests of each Material Subsidiary owned by the Company, directly or through subsidiaries, is owned free from liens and encumbrances except for such liens or encumbrances that would not have a Material Adverse Effect.
 
(f) This Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company.
(g) The Indenture has been duly authorized by the Company and duly qualified under the Trust Indenture Act 1939, as amended (the "Trust Indenture Act"), will have been duly executed and delivered by the Company and constitutes a valid and binding agreement of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with its terms, except as the enforcement thereof may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency (including, without limitation, all laws relating to fraudulent transfers), reorganization, moratorium or similar laws affecting enforcement of creditors' rights generally and except as enforcement thereof is subject to general principles of equity (regardless of whether enforcement is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law).
(h) The Purchased Notes have been duly authorized and, at on the Closing Date (as defined in the Purchase Agreement), will have been duly executed by the Company and, when authenticated, issued and delivered in the manner provided for in the Indenture and delivered against payment of the purchase price therefor as provided in this Agreement, will constitute valid and binding obligations of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with their terms, except as the enforcement thereof may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency (including, without limitation, all laws relating to fraudulent transfers), reorganization, moratorium or similar laws affecting enforcement of creditors' rights generally and except as enforcement thereof is subject to general principles of equity (regardless of whether enforcement is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law), and will be in the form contemplated by, and entitled to the benefits of, the Indenture.
(i) The Purchased Notes and the Indenture will conform in all material respects to the respective statements relating thereto contained in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus and will be in substantially the respective forms filed or incorporated by reference, as the case may be, as exhibits to the Registration Statement.
(j) No consent, approval, authorization, or order of, or filing with, any governmental agency or body or any court is required for the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement in connection with the issuance and sale of the Purchased Notes by the Company, except such as have been obtained and made under the Securities Act and the Trust Indenture Act and such as may be required under state securities laws.
(k) The execution, delivery and performance of the Indenture and this Agreement, and the issuance and sale of the Purchased Notes and compliance with the terms and provisions thereof have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate action and do not and will not result in a breach or violation of any of the terms and provisions of, or constitute a default under, or result in the creation or imposition of any lien, charge or encumbrance upon any property, or assets of the Company or any Material Subsidiary under (i) any statute, any rule, regulation or order of any governmental agency or body or any court, domestic or foreign, having jurisdiction over the Company or any Material Subsidiary of the Company (provided however that enforcement of rights to indemnity and contribution in this Agreement may be limited by federal or state securities laws or principles of public policy), or any of their properties, (ii) any material agreement or instrument to which the Company or any such Material Subsidiary is a party or by which
 
the Company or any such Material Subsidiary is bound or to which any of the properties of the Company or any such Material Subsidiary is subject, or (iii) the charter or by-laws of the Company or any such Material Subsidiary except in the case of (i) and (ii) where such breach or violation or default would not have a Material Adverse Effect.
(l) Except as disclosed in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus, the Company and its Material Subsidiaries have good and marketable title to all real properties and good title to all other properties and assets owned by them that are material to the business of the Company and its subsidiaries consolidated as a single enterprise, in each case free from liens, encumbrances and defects that would materially affect the value thereof or materially interfere with the use made or to be made thereof by them; and except as disclosed in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus, the Company and its Material Subsidiaries hold any leased real or personal property under valid and enforceable leases with such exceptions that are not material to the business of the Company and its subsidiaries consolidated as a single enterprise and that would not materially interfere with the use made or to be made thereof by them.
(m) Neither the Company nor any of its Material Subsidiaries is (i) in violation of its charter or bylaws or (ii) in default in the performance or observance of any obligation, agreement, covenant or condition contained in any contract, indenture, mortgage, loan agreement, note, lease or other instrument to which it is a party or by which it or any of them or their properties may be bound or to which any of their properties may be subject, except in the case of (ii) where such default would not have a Material Adverse Effect.
(n) Except as disclosed in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus, the Company and its Material Subsidiaries possess adequate certificates, authorities, licenses, permits, orders or approvals issued by appropriate governmental agencies or bodies necessary to conduct the business now operated by them, including, without limitation, from the Federal Aviation Administration, except where the failure to do so would not have a Material Adverse Effect, and have not received any notice of proceedings relating to the revocation or modification of any such certificate, authority or permit that, if determined adversely to the Company or any of its Material Subsidiaries, would have a Material Adverse Effect.
(o) Except as disclosed in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus, no strike, lockout, or work stoppage involving the employees of the Company or any Material Subsidiary exists or, to the knowledge of the Company, is imminent that might have a Material Adverse Effect.
(p) Except as disclosed in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus, neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries is in violation of any statute, any rule, regulation, decision or order of any governmental agency or body or any court, domestic or foreign, relating to the use, disposal or release of hazardous or toxic substances or relating to the protection or restoration of the environment or human exposure to hazardous or toxic substances (collectively, "environmental laws"), owns or operates any real property contaminated with any substance that is subject to any environmental laws, is liable for any off-site disposal or contamination pursuant to any environmental laws, or is subject to any claim relating to any environmental laws, which violation, contamination, liability or claim would individually or in the aggregate have a Material Adverse Effect; and the Company is not aware of any pending investigation which might lead to such a claim.
(q) Except as disclosed in the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus, there are no pending actions, suits or proceedings against or affecting the Company, any of its subsidiaries or any of their respective officers, in their capacity as such, or any of their
 
respective properties that, if determined adversely to the Company or any of its subsidiaries, would individually or in the aggregate have a Material Adverse Effect, or would materially and adversely affect the ability of the Company to perform its obligations under the Indenture, this Agreement, or the Purchased Notes or which are otherwise material in the context of the sale of the Purchased Notes; and no such actions, suits or proceedings are, to the Company's knowledge, threatened or, contemplated.
(r) The financial statements included in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus present fairly in all material respects the financial position of the Company and its consolidated subsidiaries as of the dates shown and their results of operations and cash flows for the periods shown (subject, in the case of unaudited statements, to normal year-end audit adjustments), and such financial statements have been prepared in conformity with the generally accepted accounting principles in the United States applied on a consistent basis (except as otherwise noted therein) and the schedules included in the Registration Statement present fairly in all material respects the information required to be stated therein.
(s) Except as disclosed in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus, since the date of the latest audited financial statements included in the Prospectus there has been no material adverse change, nor any development or event reasonably likely to involve a prospective material adverse change, in the financial condition, business, properties or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole.
(t) The Company is not and, after giving effect to the offering and sale of the Purchased Notes and the application of the proceeds thereof as described in the Prospectus, will not be required to register under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended.
(u) To the Company's knowledge, after due inquiry, the accountants who certified the financial statements and supporting schedules included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement and Prospectus are an independent registered public accounting firm as required by the Securities Act and the Exchange Act.
(v) The capitalization of the Company has not materially changed since the date of the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus.
(w) Neither the Company nor any subsidiary has taken or will take, directly or indirectly, any action designed to, or that might be reasonably expected to, cause or result in stabilization or manipulation of the price of the Purchased Notes.
(x) The Company maintains a system of "disclosure controls and procedures" (as defined in Rule 13a-15(e) of the Exchange Act) that is designed to ensure that information required to be disclosed by the Company in reports that it files or submits under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the time periods specified in the Commission's rules and forms, including controls and procedures designed to ensure that such information is accumulated and communicated to the Company's management as appropriate to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure. The Company has carried out evaluations of the effectiveness of their disclosure controls and procedures as of December 31, 2008 as required by Rule 13a-15 of the Exchange Act.
(y) The Company maintains a system of "internal control over financial reporting" (as defined in Rule 13a-15(f) of the Exchange Act) that complies with the requirements of the Exchange Act and has been designed by, or under the supervision of, its principal executive and principal financial officers, or persons performing similar functions, to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of
 
financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, including, but not limited to policies and procedures that: (i) pertain to the maintenance of records that in reasonable detail accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of the Company; (ii) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the Company are being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the Company; and (iii) provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use or disposition of the Company's assets that could have a material effect on the financial statements. Except as disclosed in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus, there are no material weaknesses in the Company's internal controls.
Any certificate signed by any officer of the Company or any subsidiary and delivered to the Purchasers or to counsel for the Purchasers shall be deemed a representation and warranty by the Company and not the officer in its individual capacity to the Purchasers as to the matters covered thereby.
3. . The Company will deliver the Purchased Notes to you for the accounts of the Purchasers at the offices of the Trustee (at the place specified in the Purchase Agreement) against payment of the purchase price by wire transfer to an account specified by the Company or by certified or official bank check or checks in same day or New York or Chicago Clearing House funds drawn to the order of the Company, at the office of the Company, 100 North Riverside, Chicago, Illinois, 60606, at the time set forth in this Agreement or at such other time not later than seven full business days thereafter as you and the Company determine, such time being herein referred to as the "Closing Date." The Purchased Notes to be delivered will be in definitive fully registered form registered in such denominations, of $1,000 or multiples thereof, and in such names as you request in writing not later than 3:00 p.m., New York Time, on the second full business day prior to the Closing Date, or, if no such request is received, in the names of the respective Purchasers in the amounts agreed to be purchased by them pursuant to this Agreement. The Company shall make the Purchased Notes available for checking and packaging at the offices of the Trustee (at the place specified in the Purchase Agreement) prior to the Closing Date and, unless prevented from doing so by circumstances beyond its control, not later than 2:00 p.m., New York Time, on the business day next preceding the Closing Date. If you request that any Purchased Notes be issued in a name or names other than that of the Purchaser agreeing to purchase such Purchased Notes hereunder, the Company shall not be obligated to pay any transfer taxes resulting therefrom. The Notes may also be represented by a permanent global Note or Notes, registered in the name of The Depository Trust Company, as depositary (the "Depositary"), or a nominee of the Depositary (each such Note represented by a permanent global Note being referred to herein as a "Book-Entry Note"). Beneficial interests in Book-Entry Notes will only be evidenced by, and transfers thereof will only be effected through, records maintained by the Depositary's participants.
Delivery and Payment
4. . The several Purchasers propose to offer the Purchased Notes for sale to the public as set forth in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus.
Offering by the Purchasers
5. . The Company covenants and agrees with the several Purchasers that:
Covenants of the Company
(a) It will promptly cause the Preliminary Prospectus and the Prospectus to be filed with the Commission as required by Rule 424.
 
(b) It will furnish to each Purchaser a copy of each proposed free writing prospectus to be prepared by or on behalf of, used by, or referred to by the Company and not to use or refer to any proposed free writing prospectus to which the Purchasers reasonably object.
(c) It will not take any action that would result in a Purchaser or the Company being required to file with the Commission pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Securities Act a free writing prospectus prepared by or on behalf of a Purchaser that otherwise would not have been required to be filed thereunder.
(d) For as long as a prospectus relating to the Purchased Notes is required to be delivered under the Securities Act, if any event relating to or affecting the Company or of which the Company shall be advised in writing by the Purchasers shall occur which, which in the opinion of the Company or your counsel, should be set forth in a supplement or amendment to the Time of Sale Prospectus in order either to make the Time of Sale Prospectus comply with the requirements of the Securities Act or which would require the making of any change in the Time of Sale Prospectus so that as thereafter delivered to purchasers such Time of Sale Prospectus will not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, the Company will promptly amend or supplement the Time of Sale Prospectus by either (i) preparing and filing with the Commission supplement(s) or amendment(s) to the Time of Sale Prospectus, or (ii) making an appropriate filing pursuant to the Exchange Act, which will supplement or amend the Time of Sale Prospectus so that, as supplemented or amended, the Time of Sale Prospectus when the Time of Sale Prospectus is delivered to a purchaser will comply with the Securities Act and will not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. Prior to the Closing Date, the Company will not file any amendment or supplement without first providing the Purchasers with such amendment or supplement and having obtained the Purchasers' consent to the filing, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld.
(e) The Company will make generally available to its security holders as soon as practicable, but in any event not later than eighteen months after the effective date of the Registration Statement (as defined in Rule 158(c) under the Securities Act), an earnings statement of the Company and its subsidiaries (which need not be audited) complying with Section 11(a) of the Securities Act and the Securities Act Rules and Regulations (including at the option of the Company Rule 158).
(f) The Company will furnish to you copies of the following documents, in each case as soon as available after filing and in such quantities as you reasonably request (i) the Registration Statement relating to the Notes as originally filed and all post-effective amendments thereto (at least one of which will be signed and will include all exhibits except those incorporated by reference to previous filings with the Commission); (ii) each prospectus relating to the Purchased Notes; and (iii) during the time when a prospectus relating to the Purchased Notes is required to be delivered under the Securities Act, all post-effective amendments and supplements to the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus, respectively (except supplements relating to securities that are not Purchased Notes).
(g) During the period of one year after the Closing Date, the Company will furnish to you, and upon request, to each of the other Purchasers (unless such reports are available electronically on the Commission's website or the Company's website): (i) as soon as practicable after the end of each fiscal year, a copy of its annual report to
 
shareholders for such year, and (ii) as soon as available, a copy of each report or definitive proxy statement of the Company filed with the Commission under the Exchange Act or mailed to shareholders.
(h) Whether or not any sale of the Purchased Notes is consummated, the Company will pay and bear all costs and expenses incident to the performance of its obligations under this Agreement, including (a) the preparation, printing and filing of the Registration Statement (including financial statements and exhibits) as originally filed and of each amendment thereto, (b) the preparation, and distribution of the Purchased Notes and the Indenture, (c) the delivery of the certificates for the Purchased Notes to the Purchasers, (d) the fees and disbursements of the Company's counsel and accountants, (e) the delivery to the Purchasers of copies of the Registration Statement as originally filed and the printing and delivery of each amendment thereto, of each preliminary prospectus and of the Prospectus and any amendments or supplements thereto, (f) any fees charged by rating agencies for rating the Purchased Notes, and (g) the fees and expenses of the Trustee and any paying agent (including reasonable fees and expenses of any counsel to such parties).
If this Agreement is terminated by the Purchasers in accordance with the provisions of Section 7, the Company shall reimburse the Purchasers for all of their reasonable out-of-pocket expenses, including the reasonable fees and disbursements of counsel for the Purchasers.
(i) The Company will not offer or sell any of its other debt securities which are substantially similar to the Purchased Notes prior to ten days after the Closing Date, without the consent of the Purchasers.
(j) The Company will prepare a final term sheet relating to the offering of the Purchased Notes, containing only information that describes the final terms of the Purchased Notes or the offering in a form consented to by the Purchasers, and to file such final term sheet within the period required by Rule 433(d)(5)(ii) under the Securities Act following the date the final terms have been established for the offering of the Purchased Notes.
(k) The Company will advise the Representative promptly, and confirm such advice in writing, (i) when any amendment to the Registration Statement has been filed or becomes effective prior to the Closing Date; (ii) when any supplement to the Prospectus or any amendment to the Prospectus or any free writing prospectus has been filed prior to the Closing Date; (iii) of any request by the Commission for any amendment to the Registration Statement or any amendment or supplement to the Prospectus or the receipt of any comments from the Commission relating to the Registration Statement or any other request by the Commission for any additional information prior to the Closing Date; (iv) of the issuance by the Commission of any order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or preventing or suspending the use of any Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus or the initiation or threatening of any proceeding for that purpose or pursuant to Section 8A of the Securities Act; (v) of the occurrence of any event during the period that a prospectus is required to be delivered as a result of which the Prospectus, the Time of Sale Prospectus or any free writing prospectus as then amended or supplemented would include any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances existing when the Prospectus, the Time of Sale Prospectus or any such free writing prospectus is delivered to a purchaser, not misleading; (vi) of the receipt by the Company of any notice of objection of the Commission to the use of the
 
Registration Statement or any post-effective amendment thereto pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) under the Securities Act; and (vii) of the receipt by the Company of any notice with respect to any suspension of the qualification of the Purchased Notes for offer and sale in any jurisdiction or the initiation or threatening of any proceeding for such purpose; and the Company will use its reasonable best efforts to prevent the issuance of any such order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement, preventing or suspending the use of any Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus or suspending any such qualification of the Purchased Notes and, if any such order is issued, will obtain as soon as possible the withdrawal thereof.
(l) The Company will qualify the Purchased Notes for offering and sale under the applicable securities laws of such states and other jurisdictions as you may reasonably designate in consultation with the Company and to maintain such qualifications in effect for a period of not less than a year from the date of the Prospectus; , , that the Company shall not be obligated to file any general consent to service of process or to qualify as a foreign corporation or as a dealer in securities in any jurisdiction in which it is not so qualified or to subject itself to taxation in respect of doing business in any jurisdiction in which it is not otherwise so subject. The Company will file such statements and reports as may be required by the laws of each jurisdiction in which the Securities have been qualified as above provided. The Company will also supply you with such information as is necessary for the determination of the legality of the Purchased Notes for investment under the laws of such jurisdictions as you may request.
provided
however
(m) The Company will use its reasonable best efforts in cooperation with you to permit the Purchased Notes offered and sold in transactions by you to be eligible for clearance and settlement through The Depository Trust Company.
(n) The Company will apply the net proceeds received by it from the sale of the Purchased Notes in the manner specified in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus under the heading "Use of Proceeds."
6. . Each Purchaser severally covenants with the Company not to take any action that would result in the Company being required to file with the Commission under Rule 433(d) a free writing prospectus prepared by or on behalf of such Purchaser that otherwise would not be required to be filed by the Company thereunder, but the for the action of the Purchaser.
Covenants of the Purchasers
7. . The obligations of the several Purchasers to purchase and pay for the Purchased Notes will be subject to the accuracy of the representations and warranties on the part of the Company herein, to the accuracy of the statements of Company officers made pursuant to the provisions hereof, to the performance by the Company of its obligations hereunder and to the following additional conditions precedent:
Conditions of the Obligations of the Purchasers
(a) On the date of execution of the Purchase Agreement and on the Closing Date, you shall have received from Deloitte & Touche LLP, independent registered public accounting firm with respect to the Company within the meaning of the Securities Act and the Securities Act Rules and Regulations, a letter, dated such a date, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to you containing statements and information of the type customarily included in accountants' "comfort letters" to underwriters with respect to the financial statements and certain financial information contained or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus; provided that the letter delivered on the Closing Date shall use a "cut-off" date no more than three business days prior to the Closing Date.
 
(b) The Registration Statement shall remain effective and at the Closing Date, no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement shall have been issued, no proceedings for such purpose shall have been instituted or, to the knowledge of the Company or you, shall be contemplated by the Commission and the Company has not received a notice of objection to the use of the Registration Statement as an automatic shelf registration statement. The Prospectus and each issuer "free writing prospectus" shall have been timely filed with the Commission under the Securities Act, as required; and all requests by the Commission for additional information shall have been complied with to the reasonable satisfaction of the Purchasers.
(c) Subsequent to the date of this Agreement, there shall not have occurred (A) any change or any development involving a prospective change not contemplated by the Time of Sale Prospectus as of the date of this Agreement in or affecting particularly the business or properties of the Company which, in the judgment of a majority in interest of the Purchasers including you, materially impairs the investment quality of the Purchased Notes, and (B) any downgrading in the rating of the Purchased Notes or any other debt securities or preferred stock of or guaranteed by the Company or any of its subsidiaries by any "nationally recognized statistical rating organization" (as defined for purposes of Rule 436(g) under the 1933 Act) or any public announcement that any such organization has under surveillance or review its rating of the Purchased Notes or any other debt securities or preferred stock of or guaranteed by the Company or any of its subsidiaries (other than an announcement with positive implications of a possible upgrading, and no implication of a possible downgrading, of such rating) or any announcement that the Company has been placed on negative outlook.
(d) You shall have received an opinion, dated the Closing Date, of a counsel for the Company, to the effect that:
(i) The Company has been duly incorporated or formed, and is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware;
(ii) The Indenture has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company and is a valid instrument, legally binding on the Company and enforceable in accordance with its terms, except as limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, or other laws affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights and by general principles of equity;
(iii) The issuance and sale of the Purchased Notes have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate action of the Company. The Purchased Notes (assuming that they have been duly authenticated by the Trustee or a duly designated Authentication Agent under the Indenture, which fact counsel need not verify by an inspection of the Purchased Notes) have been duly issued and constitute legal, valid, and binding obligations of the Company enforceable in accordance with their terms, and are entitled to the benefits provided by the Indenture except as such enforceability or entitlement may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, or other laws affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights and by general principles of equity;
(iv) The execution and delivery of the Purchase Agreement, the Indenture, and the Purchased Notes, the issuance and sale of the Notes to you in accordance with the Purchase Agreement do not (i) constitute a violation by the Company of any applicable provision of U.S federal laws or the laws of the State of New York (except that no opinion in this paragraph is being given as to compliance with any disclosure requirement or any prohibition against fraud or misrepresentation or as to whether performance of the indemnification or contribution provisions in the Purchase Agreement would be permitted);
 
(v) The Registration Statement is effective under the Securities Act and, (a) to the best of such counsel's knowledge, no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement has been issued, and no proceedings for such purpose have been instituted or are pending under the Securities Act; and (b) the Registration Statement (as of its effective date), the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus (as of the date of the Purchase Agreement and as of the Closing Date) and any amendments or supplements thereto, as of their respective dates, appeared to comply as to form in all material respects with the requirements of Form S-3 under the Securities Act and the Securities Act Rules and Regulations; provided that no opinion is expressed with respect to financial statements or other financial and statistical information contained in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus or incorporated therein or attached as an exhibit thereto or as to the Statement of Eligibility and Qualification on Form T-l of the Trustee under the Indenture.
(vi) The consummation of the transactions contemplated in this Agreement and the compliance by the Company with all the terms of the Indenture did not and will not result in a breach of any of the terms and provisions of, the Company's Charter or By-Laws or any indenture, mortgage or deed of trust or other agreement or instrument to which the Company is a party which is filed as an exhibit to the Company's most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K;
(vii) This Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company; and
(viii) The statements set forth in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus under the caption "Description of the Debt Securities," and on the cover page of the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus insofar as they purport to constitute a summary of the terms of the Indenture and the Purchased Notes, are accurate and fair summaries of the matters set forth therein. The statements in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus under the caption "Certain United States Federal Income Tax Considerations," insofar as such statements constitute summaries of legal matters referred to therein, correctly summarize in all material respects the legal matters referred to therein.
(ix) To such counsel's knowledge, there are no legal or governmental proceedings that are pending against the Company or any of its subsidiaries or to which any property of the Company or any of its subsidiaries is subject that has caused us to conclude that such proceeding is required by Item 103 of Regulation S-K to be described in the Registration Statement, Time of Sale Prospectus or Prospectus but is not so described.
(x) The Company is not and, after giving effect to the offering and sale of the Purchased Notes and the application of the proceeds thereof as described in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus, will not be an "investment company" or an entity "controlled" by an "investment company" within the meaning of the Investment Company Act.
(xi) The documents incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus or any further amendment or supplement thereto made by the Company prior to the Closing Date (other than the
 
financial statements and related schedules therein, as to which such counsel need express no opinion), when they were filed with the Commission, complied as to form in all material respects with the requirements of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder.
(xii) The Indenture has been duly qualified under the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended.
In addition, such counsel shall state that such counsel has participated in conferences with officers, counsel and other representatives of the Company, representatives of the independent registered public accounting firm for the Company and representatives of the Purchasers at which the contents of the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus and related matters were discussed; and, although such counsel is not passing upon and does not assume responsibility for the accuracy, completeness or fairness of the statements contained in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus (except as to the matters referred to in their opinion rendered pursuant to subheading (ix) above), on the basis of the foregoing (relying as to matters of fact to a large extent upon the opinions of officers, counsel and other representatives of the Company), no facts have come to the attention of such counsel which lead such counsel to believe that (a) the Registration Statement, when it became effective, contained any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, (b) the Time of Sale Information as of the Time of Sale and as of the date hereof, contained any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, or (c) the Prospectus as of its date and as of the date hereof, contained any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading (it being understood that such counsel need make no comment with respect to the financial statements and other financial and statistical data included in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus or Prospectus or incorporated therein or as to the Statement of Eligibility and Qualification on Form T-l of the Trustee under the Indenture).
(e) The Purchasers shall have received from counsel for the Purchasers, an opinion dated the Closing Date, with respect to the matters as the Purchasers shall reasonably request and the Company shall have furnished to such counsel such documents as they reasonably request for the purpose of enabling them to pass on such matters.
(f) You shall have received a certificate of the Chief Executive Officer, President or any Vice President of the Company and a principal financial or accounting officer of the Company, dated the Closing Date, in which such officers shall state, to the best of their knowledge after reasonable investigation, that the representations and warranties of the Company in this Agreement are true and correct in all material respects, that the Company has complied with all agreements and satisfied all conditions on its part to be performed or satisfied at or prior to the Closing Date, that no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement has been issued and no proceedings for such purpose have been instituted, are pending or, to the best knowledge of the Company, threatened by the Commission, and that, subsequent to the date of the most recent financial statements set forth or incorporated by reference in the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus, there has been no material adverse change, nor any development or event reasonably likely to involve a prospective material adverse change, in the financial condition, business, properties or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole, except as set forth or contemplated in the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus.
 
(g) The Company will furnish you with such conformed copies of such opinions, certificates, letters and documents as you reasonably request.
In case any such condition shall not have been satisfied, this Agreement may be terminated by you upon notice in writing or by telecopy to the Company without liability or obligation on the part of the Company or any Purchaser, except as set forth in Section 11 hereof.
8. . The obligations of the Company to sell and deliver the Purchased Notes are subject to the following condition precedent:
Conditions of the Obligations of the Company
Prior to the Closing Date, no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement shall have been issued and no proceedings for that purpose shall have been instituted or, to the knowledge of the Company or you, shall be contemplated by the Commission.
If any such condition shall not have been satisfied, then the Company shall be entitled, by notice in writing or by telecopy to you, to terminate this Agreement without any liability on the part of the Company or any Purchaser, except as set forth in Section 11 hereof.
9. .
Indemnification
(a) The Company will indemnify and hold harmless each Purchaser, its affiliates, as such term is defined in Rule 501(b) under the Securities Act (each, an "Affiliate"), each of its directors and officers and each person, if any, who controls any Purchaser within the meaning of the Securities Act or the Exchange Act against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities, joint or several, to which such Purchaser, Affiliate or such controlling person may become subject, under the Securities Act or otherwise, insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) arise out of or are based upon any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of any material fact contained in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus, the Prospectus or any issuer "free writing prospectus" (or any amendment or supplement thereto), or arise out of or are based upon the omission or alleged omission to state therein a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading; and will reimburse each Purchaser, Affiliate and each such controlling person for any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such Purchaser, Affiliate or such controlling person in connection with investigating or defending any such loss, claim, damage, liability or action; provided, however, that the Company will not be liable to such Purchaser, Affiliate or controlling person in any such case to the extent that any such loss, claim, damage or liability arises out of or is based upon an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission made in any such documents in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by such Purchaser specifically for use therein. This indemnity agreement will be in addition to any liability which the Company may otherwise have.
(b) Each Purchaser agrees, severally and not jointly, to indemnify and hold harmless the Company, each of its directors and officers and each person, if any, who controls the Company within the meaning of the Securities Act or the Exchange Act, against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities to which the Company or any such director, officer or controlling person may become subject, under the Securities Act, or otherwise, insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) arise out of or are based upon any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of any material fact contained in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus, the
 
Prospectus or any issuer "free writing prospectus" as defined in Rule 433(h) under the Act, any Company information that the Company has filed, or is required to file, pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Act or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto) or arise out of or are based upon the omission or the alleged omission to state therein a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, in each case to the extent, but only to the extent, that such untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission was made in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by such Purchaser specifically for use therein; and will reimburse any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by the Company or any such director, officer or controlling person in connection with investigating or defending any such loss, claim, damage, liability or action as such expenses are incurred. This indemnity agreement will be in addition to any liability which such Purchaser may otherwise have.
(c) Promptly after receipt by an indemnified party under this Section of notice of the commencement of any action, such indemnified party will, if a claim in respect thereof is to be made against the indemnifying party under (a) and (b) above, notify the indemnifying party of the commencement thereof; but the omission so to notify the indemnifying party will not relieve it from any liability which it may have to any indemnified party otherwise than under this Section, except to the extent the indemnifying party has been materially prejudiced by such omission. In case any such action is brought against any indemnified party, and it notifies the indemnifying party of the commencement thereof, the indemnifying party will be entitled to participate therein and, to the extent that it may wish, jointly with any other indemnifying party similarly notified, to assume the defense thereof, with counsel satisfactory to such indemnified party (who may, with the consent of the indemnified party, be counsel to the indemnifying party) and who shall not be counsel to any other indemnified party who may have interests conflicting with those of such indemnified party, and after notice from the indemnifying party to such indemnified party of its election so to assume the defense thereof, the indemnifying party will not be liable to such indemnified party under this Section for any legal or other expenses subsequently incurred by such indemnified party in connection with the defense thereof other than reasonable costs of investigation. The indemnifying party shall not be liable for any settlement of any proceeding effected without its written consent, but if settled with such consent or if there be a final judgment for the plaintiff, the indemnifying party agrees to indemnify each indemnified party from and against any loss or liability by reason of such settlement or judgment. Notwithstanding the foregoing sentence, if at any time an indemnified party shall have requested that an indemnifying party reimburse the indemnified party for fees and expenses of counsel as contemplated by this paragraph, the indemnifying party shall be liable for any settlement of any proceeding effected without its written consent if (i) such settlement is entered into more than 30 days after receipt by the indemnifying party of such request and (ii) the indemnifying party shall not have reimbursed the indemnified party in accordance with such request prior to the date of such settlement unless the request is being disputed in good faith. No indemnifying party shall, without the written consent of the indemnified party, effect any settlement of any pending or threatened proceeding in respect of which any indemnified party is or could have been a party and indemnification could have been sought hereunder by such indemnified party, unless such settlement (x) includes an unconditional release of such indemnified party, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to such indemnified party, from all liability on claims that are the subject matter of such proceeding and (y) does not include any statement as to or any admission of fault, culpability or a failure to act by or on behalf of any indemnified party.
(d) If recovery is not available under the foregoing indemnification provisions of this Section, for any reason other than as specified therein, the parties entitled to
 
indemnification by the terms thereof shall be entitled to contribution to liabilities and expenses, except to the extent that contribution is not permitted under Section 11(f) of the Act. In determining the amount of contribution to which the respective parties are entitled, there shall be considered the relative benefits received by each party from the offering of the Purchased Notes (taking into account the portion of the proceeds of the offering realized by each), the parties' relative knowledge and access to information concerning the matter with respect to which the claim was asserted, the opportunity to correct and prevent any statement or omission, and any other equitable considerations appropriate under the circumstances. The relative benefits received by the Company on the one hand and the Purchasers on the other shall be deemed to be in the same respective proportions as the net proceeds (before deducting expenses) received by the Company from the sale of the Purchased Notes and the total underwriting discounts and commissions received by the Purchasers in connection therewith, in each case as set forth in the table on the cover of the Prospectus, bear to the aggregate offering price of the Purchased Notes. The Company and the Purchasers and such controlling persons agree that it would not be equitable if the amount of such contribution were determined by pro rata or per capita allocation (even if the Purchasers and such controlling persons were treated as one entity for such purpose). Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection (d), no Purchaser or controlling person shall be required to make contribution hereunder which in the aggregate exceeds the total public offering price of the Purchased Notes, purchased by the Purchaser under this Agreement, less the aggregate amount of any damages which such Purchaser or such controlling person has otherwise been required to pay in respect of the same claim or any substantially similar claim. The Purchasers' obligations to contribute are several in proportion to their respective underwriting obligations and not joint.
10. . If any Purchaser or Purchasers default in their obligations to purchase Purchased Notes hereunder and the aggregate principal amount of Purchased Notes which such defaulting Purchaser or Purchasers agreed but failed to purchase is 10% of the principal amount of Purchased Notes or less, the non-defaulting Purchasers may make arrangements satisfactory to the Company for the purchase of such Purchased Notes by other persons, including any of the Purchasers, but if no such arrangements are made by the Closing Date the non-defaulting Purchasers shall be obligated severally, in proportion to their respective commitments hereunder, to purchase the Purchased Notes which such defaulting Purchasers agreed but failed to purchase. If any Purchaser or Purchasers so default and the aggregate principal amount of Purchased Notes with respect to which such default or defaults occur is more than the above percentage and arrangements reasonably satisfactory to you and the Company for the purchase of such Purchased Notes by other persons are not made within seventy-two hours after such default, this Agreement will terminate without liability on the part of any non-defaulting Purchaser or the Company, except as provided in Section 11. In the event that any Purchaser or Purchasers default in their obligation to purchase Purchased Notes hereunder, the Company may, by prompt written notice to the non-defaulting Purchasers, postpone the Closing Date for a period of not more than seven full business days in order to effect whatever changes may thereby be made necessary in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus or in any other documents, and the Company will promptly file any amendments to the Registration Statement or supplements to the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus which may thereby be made necessary. As used in this Agreement, the term "Purchaser" includes any person substituted for a Purchaser under this Section. Nothing herein will relieve a defaulting Purchaser from liability for its default.
Default of Purchasers
11. . This Agreement may be terminated, by notice to the Company, if after the execution and delivery of this Agreement and prior to the Closing Date (i) trading generally shall have been suspended or materially limited on the New York Stock Exchange; (ii) trading of any securities issued or guaranteed by the Company shall have been suspended on any exchange; (iii) a general moratorium on commercial banking activities shall have been declared
Termination
 
by federal or New York State authorities or a material disruption in commercial banking or securities settlement clearance services in the United States; or (iv) there shall have occurred any outbreak or escalation of hostilities or any change in financial markets or any calamity or crisis, either within or outside the United States, that, in each case in the reasonable judgment of the Purchasers, is material and adverse and makes it impracticable or inadvisable to proceed with the offering, sale or delivery of the Purchased Notes on the terms and in the manner contemplated by this Agreement, the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus.
12. . The respective indemnities, agreements, representations, warranties, and other statements of the Company or its officers and of the several Purchasers set forth in or made pursuant to this Agreement will remain in full force and effect, regardless of any investigation, or statement as to the results thereof, made by or on behalf of any Purchaser or the Company or any of its officers or directors or any controlling person, and will survive delivery of and payment for the Purchased Notes. If this Agreement is terminated pursuant to Section 7, 8, 10 or 11 or if for any reason the purchase of the Purchased Notes by the Purchasers is not consummated, the Company shall remain responsible for the expenses to be paid or reimbursed by it pursuant to Section 5(h). In addition, in such event the respective obligations of the Company and the Purchasers pursuant to Section 9 shall remain in effect; provided, however, that each Purchaser will use its best efforts to promptly notify each other Purchaser and each dealer and prospective customer to whom such Purchaser has delivered a Prospectus for the Purchased Notes by telephone or telegraph, confirmed by letter in either case, of such termination or failure to consummate, including in such notice instructions regarding the continued use of the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus, the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto.
Survival of Certain Representations and Obligations
13. . All communications hereunder will be in writing, and, if sent to the Purchasers will be delivered or telecopied and confirmed to the address furnished in writing for the purpose of such communications hereunder, or, if sent to the Company, will be delivered or telecopied and confirmed to it, attention of Treasurer at 100 North Riverside, Chicago, Illinois 60606, telecopier (312) 544-2399, with a copy to Corporate Secretary at the same address, telecopier (312) 544-2829.
Notices
14. . This Purchase Agreement will inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the parties hereto and their respective successors and the officers and directors and controlling persons referred to in Section 9, and no other person will have any right or obligation hereunder.
Successors
15. . (a) This Agreement, together with any contemporaneous written agreements and any prior written agreements (to the extent not superseded by this Agreement) that relate to the offering of the Purchased Notes, represents the entire agreement between the Company and the Purchasers with respect to the preparation of the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus, the conduct of the offering, and the purchase and sale of the Purchased Notes.
Entire Agreement
(b) The Company acknowledges that in connection with the offering of the Purchased Notes: (i) the Purchasers have acted at arm's-length, are not agents of, and owe no fiduciary duties to, the Company or any other person, (ii) the Purchasers owe the Company only those duties and obligations set forth in this Agreement and prior written agreements to the extent not superseded by this Agreement), if any, and (iii) the Purchasers may have interests that differ from those of the Company. The Company waives to the full extent permitted by applicable law any claims it may have against the Purchasers arising from an alleged breach of fiduciary duty in connection with the offering of the Purchased Notes.
 
16. . This Purchase Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of New York without giving effect to any conflicts of law provisions that would apply the laws of another jurisdiction.
Construction
17. . This Agreement may be executed in one or more counterparts and it is not necessary that the signatures of all parties appear on the same counterpart, but such counterparts together shall constitute but one and the same agreement.
Counterparts
18. . No amendment or waiver of any provision of this Agreement, nor any consent or approval to any departure therefrom, shall in any event be effective unless the same shall be in writing and signed by the parties hereto.
Amendments or Waivers
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20090409161958.txt.gz
TIME:20090409161958
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On April 9, 2009, The Boeing Company (the "Company") issued a press release regarding first quarter 2009 results. A copy of the Company's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
(d) Exhibits
99.1     Press Release dated April 9, 2009, furnished herewith.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: April 9, 2009
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Boeing to Adjust 2010 Twin-Aisle Airplane Production Plan; First-Quarter 2009 Results to Reflect Impacts of Production Decisions and Lower Price Escalation
SEATTLE, April 9, 2009  Boeing [NYSE: BA] today announced that it will adjust its twin-aisle airplane production plans for 2010 due to significant deterioration in the business environment for airlines and cargo operators driven by unprecedented global economic conditions.
Monthly production of the 777 will decline from seven to five airplanes per month beginning in June 2010. Boeing will also delay previous plans to modestly increase 747-8 and 767 production. No change is being made at this time to the 737 production rate.
In addition, the weak global economy has contributed to significant declines in the escalation indices that affect forecasted pricing for commercial airplanes already ordered.
The production decisions and unfavorable price escalation are expected to reduce Boeing's first-quarter 2009 net earnings by approximately $0.38 per share. Because the 747 program is currently in a loss position, the reduced earnings associated with the factors above will be recorded for most units in the 747 backlog. That impact, somewhat offset by a refinement in cost estimates, accounts for approximately $0.31 per share of the first-quarter charge. For the other commercial programs, the impact will be reflected in lower margins on deliveries as they occur, including an estimated $0.07 per share net earnings reduction in the quarter.
The company will update its 2009 guidance when it reports first-quarter results on April 22.
"These are extremely difficult economic times for our customers," said Boeing Commercial Airplanes President and CEO Scott Carson. "It's necessary to adjust our production plans to align supply with these tough market conditions. We are in close contact with our customers as we continue to monitor this dynamic business environment."
The production rate decisions announced today solely reflect delivery deferrals requested by customers in response to unprecedented declines in global passenger and air-cargo volumes. No 767, 747 or 777 orders have been cancelled this year. Boeing's commercial backlog of more than 3,500 airplanes remains strong and well-diversified in terms of airplane models, geography and customer business models.
Certain statements in this report may be "forward-looking" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," "targets," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions about future events that may not prove to be accurate. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak to events only as of the date they are made and we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise, except as required by federal securities laws. Specific factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, those set forth below and other important factors disclosed previously and from time to time in our other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission: The effect of economic conditions in the United States and globally; the adequacy of coverage, by allowance for losses, of risks related to our non-U.S accounts receivable being payable in U.S. dollars; the impact on our accounts receivable and customer financing portfolios due to customer defaults, changes in customer credit ratings and credit default rates, and/or changes in collateral values; the continued viability and growth of Commercial Airplanes revenues, as affected by indexed price escalation, changes in customer and supplier contracts, and successful execution of our backlog in this segment; the effects of customers cancelling, modifying and/or rescheduling contractual orders; the timing and effects of any decisions to increase or decrease the rate of commercial airplane production; the timing and effects of decisions to complete or launch a Commercial Airplanes program; the ability to successfully develop and timely produce the 787 and 747-8 aircraft; the ability of our suppliers and, as applicable, subcontractors to successfully and timely perform their obligations; the effect on our revenues of political and legal processes; changing defense priorities; and associated budget reductions by U.S. and international government customers affecting Boeing defense programs; our relationship with our union-represented workforce and the negotiation of collective bargaining agreements; the continuation of long-term trends in passenger and cargo traffic and revenue yields in the airline industry; the impact of volatile fuel prices and the airline industry's response; the effect of declines in aircraft valuation; the impact on our revenues or operating results of airline bankruptcies; the extent to which we are called upon to fund outstanding financing commitments or satisfy other financing requests, and our ability to satisfy those requirements; the continuation of historical costs for fleet support services; the receipt of estimated award and incentive fees on U.S. government contracts; the future demand for commercial satellites and projections of future order flow; the potential for technical or quality issues on development programs, including the Airborne Early Warning and Control program, International KC-767 Tanker,
other fixed-price development programs, or commercial satellite programs, to affect schedule and cost estimates, or cause us to incur a material charge or experience a termination for default; the outcome of any litigation and/or government investigation in which we are a party, and other contingencies; returns on pension fund assets, impacts of future interest rate changes on pension obligations and rising healthcare costs; our ability to access external capital resources to fund our operations; the amounts and effects of underinsured operations, including satellite launches; and the scope, nature or impact of acquisition or disposition activity and investment in any joint ventures/strategic alliances, including Sea Launch and United Launch Alliance, and indemnifications related thereto.
Contact:
Jim Proulx, Boeing Commercial Airplanes Communications (206) 766-1393
Russ Young, Boeing Commercial Airplanes Communications (206) 766-2926
Investor Relations (312) 544-2140


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20090422074347.txt.gz
TIME:20090422074347
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
(a) On April 22, 2009, The Boeing Company issued a press release reporting its financial results for the first quarter of 2009. A copy of the Company's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
(a) Not applicable
(b) Not applicable
(c) Not applicable
(d) Exhibits
99.1    Press Release issued by The Boeing Company dated April 22, 2009, reporting Boeing's financial results for the first quarter of 2009, furnished herewith.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
Boeing Reports First-Quarter Earnings
 
 
 
 
 
Table 1. Summary Financial Results
 
 The Boeing Company's [NYSE: BA] first-quarter 2009 earnings per share decreased 47 percent to $0.86 driven by the previously announced $0.38 per share impact from pending twin-aisle production rate changes and lower delivery price escalation forecasts in commercial airplanes (Table 1). The majority of this earnings impact was recorded as an increase in the reach-forward loss position of the 747 program.
CHICAGO, April 22, 2009
Excluding the effects of a weakened commercial airplane market, solid execution on programs across Integrated Defense Systems and Commercial Airplanes underpinned the quarter's results. Results were also impacted by a less favorable delivery mix in defense and higher expense for research and development.
 
"The expanded global economic downturn is presenting unprecedented challenges in our commercial airplane markets," said Boeing Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer Jim McNerney. "We believe we are better positioned than most companies to withstand the ongoing pressures of this economy, and we are not hesitating to take necessary actions to preserve our financial strength and maintain our ability to invest and grow for the long term. Performance across the overwhelming majority of our programs remains solid, and we are making progress toward our milestones on the 787 and other important programs."
Boeing's quarterly revenue rose 3 percent to $16.5 billion while its operating cash flow was $0.2 billion reflecting continued investment in development programs and lower advances from commercial airplane orders. Free cash flow* was ($0.2) billion (Table 2).
Boeing lowered its 2009 earnings per share guidance to between $4.70 and $5.00 primarily due to the lower price escalation forecasts.
Total company backlog at quarter-end was $339 billion, down 4 percent in the quarter, driven by run-off of backlog through revenues, the lower price escalation forecast, and previously announced 787 cancellations, partially offset by new orders in IDS for C-17 and integrated logistics.
Table 2. Cash Flow
 
 
Cash and investments in marketable securities totaled $4.7 billion at quarter-end, up during the first quarter as a result of new debt issuance (Table 3). The company spent $50 million to acquire 1.2 million of its shares in the quarter.
Table 3. Cash, Marketable Securities and Debt Balances
 
 
 
Segment Results
Commercial Airplanes
Boeing Commercial Airplanes (BCA) first-quarter revenues rose to $8.6 billion on a 5 percent increase in airplane deliveries partially offset by lower volume in services (Table 4). Operating earnings fell by 58 percent to $417 million while margins contracted to 4.9 percent, driven by the pending reduction in twin-aisle production rates and unfavorable delivery price escalation forecasts.
Table 4. Commercial Airplanes Operating Results
 
Margins on all programs were reduced by the lower price escalation forecasts, the decision to reduce 777 production rates for deliveries beginning in June 2010, and postponing planned increases in 747-8 and 767 production. Because the 747 program is currently in a loss position, the reduced earnings associated with the factors above were recorded for the 747s delivered in the quarter as well as most units in the 747 backlog. That impact, somewhat offset by a refinement in cost estimates, resulted in the charge of $347 million, or $0.31 per share, that reduced BCA margins by 4.0 points.
BCA booked 28 gross orders during the quarter, but removed 32 others from its order book as previously disclosed. Contractual backlog was $266 billion, more than seven times BCA's expected 2009 revenues.
Progress on the new 787 Dreamliner continues on the revised schedule announced in December. The company expects the first flight to occur in the second quarter of 2009 with deliveries to begin in the first quarter of 2010. Recent milestones include completion of build-verification tests on Airplane 1, clearance of all systems hardware and Rolls-Royce engines for first flight, completion of power-on for Airplane 2, and the beginning of final assembly for the sixth and final flight test airplane. The program saw orders for 32 airplanes cancelled by mutual agreement with customers during the quarter. Total firm orders are now 886 airplanes from 57 customers.
 
Integrated Defense Systems
Boeing Integrated Defense Systems (IDS) first-quarter revenues rose 2 percent to $7.7 billion. Operating margins of 9.2 percent reflect strong execution in all segments offset by a less favorable delivery mix (Table 5).
Table 5. Integrated Defense Systems Operating Results
 
Boeing Military Aircraft delivered first-quarter operating earnings of $282 million on $3.0 billion in revenue. Operating margin was 9.4 percent reflecting strong execution across aircraft production programs. Results were impacted by mix and volume. In this segment, the U.S. Air Force contracted for 15 previously funded C-17s, the United Arab Emirates announced their intent to purchase the C-17, Japan accepted delivery of its third KC-767, and the P-8A completed the loads calibration testing milestone.
Network & Space Systems achieved significant milestones on several key development programs, including Future Combat System and Ground-based Midcourse Defense. Operating margin was 7.7 percent driven by strong performance across the segment's array of programs partially offset by lower earnings on the United Launch Alliance joint venture. Last year's results included a favorable settlement on a satellite program.
Global Services & Support revenues increased 21 percent on higher volume in its broad portfolio of services and logistics programs. During the quarter, GS&S continued to generate double-digit operating margins of 10.8 percent. In this segment, the company captured contracts for V-22 performance-based logistics as well as maintenance and operations support for Ground-based Midcourse Defense.
 
IDS' backlog is $73.0 billion, more than two times expected 2009 revenues. New orders for the quarter include the additional C-17s and the contracts for integrated logistics and support.
Boeing Capital Corporation
Boeing Capital Corporation (BCC) reported first-quarter pre-tax earnings of $37 million compared to $61 million in the same period last year due to a smaller aircraft finance portfolio and higher reserves and impairments (Table 6). BCC's portfolio balance at the end of the quarter was $6.0 billion, down 5 percent from $6.3 billion in the year-ago period primarily on normal portfolio run-off, including customer payments and depreciation, partially offset by additions to its portfolio of $135 million in new financings. BCC contributed $35 million in cash dividends to the company during the quarter. BCC's debt-to-equity ratio was unchanged at 5.0-to-1.
Table 6. Boeing Capital Corporation Operating Results
 
Additional Information
The "Other" segment consists primarily of Boeing Engineering, Operations and Technology, as well as certain results related to the consolidation of all business units. Other segment expense was $23 million in the first quarter, reduced from $50 million of expense in the same period last year.
Unallocated expense was $115 million, up from $55 million in the same quarter last year driven by higher intersegment eliminations.
Total pension expense for the quarter increased to $219 million, up from $191 million in the same period last year. A total of $242 million was allocated to the operating segments in the quarter (up from $124 million in the same period last year), partially offset by a $23 million contribution to earnings in unallocated items.
 
Outlook
The 2009 financial guidance reflects challenging commercial and defense markets, as well as company plans to reduce discretionary spending and restructure various internal organizations to drive higher levels of productivity. The company expects to issue 2010 financial guidance later in the year.
Boeing's 2009 revenue guidance is reaffirmed at $68 billion to $69 billion. Earnings-per-share guidance for 2009 is reduced to $4.70 to $5.00 per share from $5.05 to $5.35 per share due to lower earnings at Commercial Airplanes (Table 7). Operating cash flow is still expected to be greater than $2.5 billion, including discretionary pension contributions of approximately $0.5 billion and an assumption of $1 billion for new commercial airplane financings.
Commercial Airplanes' 2009 delivery guidance remains at between 480 and 485 airplanes and is sold out. BCA's 2009 revenue is unchanged between $34 billion and $35 billion. BCA's operating margin is now expected to be between 8 percent and 8.5 percent, down from approximately 10 percent, due to the effect of lower twin-aisle deliveries in future periods and lower forecasted delivery price escalation in future periods.
Earlier this month, the U.S. Department of Defense outlined its 2010 budget priorities. Boeing will be evaluating the defense budget as it progresses through Congress to determine the potential future effects on our business outlook. The company has been anticipating changes in the U.S. defense budget for some time. The company continues to consider IDS well-positioned with a diverse portfolio of defense, space and security programs, and will increase its focus on international defense opportunities and pursuit of adjacent markets in the U.S. IDS guidance for 2009 remains unchanged with revenue between $33 billion and $34 billion and operating margins of approximately 10 percent.
Boeing Capital Corporation continues to expect that the aircraft finance portfolio will increase modestly as the amount of aircraft financing in 2009 will exceed normal portfolio runoff due to customer payments and depreciation.
Boeing's 2009 R&D forecast is between $3.6 billion and $3.8 billion. Annual capital expenditures are expected to be approximately $1.4 billion in 2009. The company's non-cash pension expense is now expected to be approximately $0.9 billion in 2009.
 
Table 7. Financial Outlook (Billions, except deliveries and per share data)
 
 
 
Non-GAAP Measure Disclosure
Management believes that the non-GAAP (Generally Accepted Accounting Principles) measures (indicated by an asterisk *) used in this report provide investors with important perspectives into the company's ongoing business performance. The company does not intend for the information to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the related GAAP measures. Other companies may define the measures differently. The following definitions are provided:
Free Cash Flow
Free cash flow is defined as GAAP less capital expenditures for . Management believes free cash flow provides investors with an important perspective on the cash available for shareholders, debt repayment, and acquisitions after making the capital investments required to support ongoing business operations and long term value creation. Free cash flow does not represent the residual cash flow available for discretionary expenditures as it excludes certain mandatory expenditures such as repayment of maturing debt. Management uses free cash flow internally to assess both business performance and overall liquidity. Table 2 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and free cash flow.
operating cash flow
property, plant and equipment additions
 
Certain statements in this report may be "forward-looking" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," "targets," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions about future events that may not prove to be accurate. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak to events only as of the date they are made and we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise, except as required by federal securities laws. Specific factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, those set forth below and other important factors disclosed previously and from time to time in our other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission: the effect of economic conditions in the United States and globally; the impact on our accounts receivable, customer financing portfolios and allowance for losses of customer defaults and changes in customer credit ratings, credit default rates and collateral values; the impact on our revenues and operating results of changes to indices included in indexed price escalation clauses included in our contracts with commercial airplane and defense customers; the successful execution of our Commercial Airplanes and Integrated Defense Systems backlog; the effects of customers cancelling, modifying and/or rescheduling contractual orders; the timing and effects of any decisions to increase or decrease the rate of commercial airplane production; the timing and effects of decisions to complete or launch a Commercial Airplanes program; the ability to successfully develop and timely produce the 787 and 747-8 aircraft; the ability of our suppliers and, as applicable, subcontractors to successfully and timely perform their obligations; the effect on our revenues of political and legal processes; changing defense priorities; and associated budget reductions by U.S. and international government customers affecting Boeing defense programs; our relationship with our union-represented workforce and the negotiation of collective bargaining agreements; the continuation of long-term trends in passenger and cargo traffic and revenue yields in the airline industry; the impact of volatile fuel prices and the airline industry's response; the effect of declines in aircraft valuation; the impact on our revenues or operating results of airline bankruptcies; the extent to which we are called upon to fund outstanding financing commitments or satisfy other financing requests, and our ability to satisfy those requirements; the continuation of historical costs for fleet support services; the receipt of estimated award and incentive fees on U.S. government contracts; the future demand for commercial satellites and projections of future order flow; the potential for technical or quality issues on development programs, including the Airborne Early Warning and Control program, International KC-767 Tanker, other fixed-price development programs, or commercial satellite programs, to affect schedule and cost estimates, or cause us to incur a material charge or experience a termination for default; the outcome of any litigation and/or government investigation in which we are a party, and other contingencies; returns on pension fund assets, impacts of future interest rate changes on pension obligations and rising healthcare costs; our ability to access external capital resources to fund our operations; the amounts and effects of underinsured operations, including satellite launches; and the scope, nature or impact of acquisition or disposition activity and investment in any joint ventures/strategic alliances, including Sea Launch and United Launch Alliance, and indemnifications related thereto.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20090430142806.txt.gz
TIME:20090430142806
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On April 27, 2009, at the 2009 Annual Meeting of Shareholders of The Boeing Company (the ""), the Company's shareholders approved the amendment of the Company's 2003 Incentive Stock Plan (the ""), increasing the number of shares available for issuance under the 2003 Plan by 20 million shares, to 80 million shares. The Company's shareholders also re-approved the performance measures for certain performance-based awards under the 2003 Plan. The Company's Board of Directors, on the recommendation of its Compensation Committee and subject to shareholder approval, initially adopted the amendment to the 2003 Plan effective as of February 23, 2009. The foregoing summary of the changes in the 2003 Plan is qualified by reference to the full text of the 2003 Plan, which is filed as Exhibit 10.1 hereto and incorporated herein.
Company
2003 Plan
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: April 30, 2009
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20090609141527.txt.gz
TIME:20090609141527
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Effective June 8, 2009, the Board of Directors of The Boeing Company (the ""), upon the recommendation of the Governance, Organization and Nominating Committee, elected David L. Calhoun, Chairman of the Management Board and Chief Executive Officer of The Nielsen Company B.V. (", as a new director. Mr. Calhoun has served as Nielsen's Chairman and CEO since August 2006. Mr. Calhoun also serves on the board of directors of Medtronic, Inc.
Company
Nielsen
")
Mr. Calhoun will be proposed to shareholders at the 2010 Annual Meeting of Shareholders for reelection as a director. Mr. Calhoun will serve on the Audit Committee and the Finance Committee. There was no arrangement or understanding between Mr. Calhoun and any other persons pursuant to which Mr. Calhoun was selected as a director, and there are no related person transactions between Mr. Calhoun and the Company.
Mr. Calhoun will receive the standard compensation provided to all Boeing nonemployee directors. This compensation consists of a cash retainer fee of $100,000 per year and a grant of retainer stock units equal in number to the number of shares of Boeing stock that could be purchased with an aggregate of $130,000 per year. The Company reimburses nonemployee directors for actual travel and out-of-pocket expenses incurred in connection with their services. The nonemployee director compensation program is described in further detail in the Company's proxy statement for its 2009 Annual Meeting filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 13, 2009. A copy of the Company's press release announcing the election of Mr. Calhoun is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
On June 8, 2009, the Board of Directors approved and adopted an amendment to Article II, Section 1 of the By-Laws of The Boeing Company to increase the number of directors from nine to ten. A copy of the text of the amendment to the By-Laws is attached hereto as Exhibit 3.2 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: June 9, 2009
 

Exhibit 3.2
 
 
 
 
 
 
SECTION 1. 
.
Annual Meetings
The Annual Meeting of the stockholders shall be held on such date and at such time as the Board of Directors shall determine, for the election of directors and the transaction of such other business as may come before the meeting.
SECTION 2.
Special Meetings.
A special meeting of stockholders may be called at any time by the Board of Directors, or by stockholders holding together at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, except as otherwise provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto.
SECTION 3.
Place of Meeting.
All meetings of the stockholders of the Corporation shall be held at such place or places, if any, within or without the State of Delaware as may from time to time be fixed by the Board of Directors or as shall be specified or fixed in the respective notices or waivers of notice thereof.
SECTION 4.
Notice of Meetings.
Except as otherwise required by statute and as set forth below, notice of each annual or special meeting of stockholders shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date. If the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, notice of each special meeting of stockholders shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than fifty-five (55) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date, unless the calling of such meeting is ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, in which case notice of such special meeting shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date. Such notice shall be given by delivering to each stockholder a written or printed notice thereof either personally or by mailing such notice in a postage-prepaid envelope addressed to the stockholder's address as it appears on the stock books of the Corporation or by transmitting the notice to the stockholder in any other manner permitted by Delaware law. Except as otherwise required by statute, no publication of any notice of a meeting of stockholders shall be required. Every notice of a meeting of stockholders shall state the place, if any (or the means of remote communication, if any, by which stockholders and proxy holders may be deemed to be present in person), date, and hour of the meeting and, in the case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called. Notices are deemed given (i) if by mail, when deposited in the United States mail, postage prepaid, directed to the stockholder at such stockholder's address as it appears on the records of the Corporation, or, if a stockholder shall have filed with the Secretary a written request that notices to such stockholder be mailed to some other address, then directed to such stockholder at such other address; (ii) if by facsimile, when directed to a number at which the stockholder has consented to receive notice; (iii) if by electronic mail, when directed to an electronic mail address at which the stockholder has consented to receive such notice; (iv) if by posting on an electronic network together with a separate notice to the stockholder of such specific posting, upon the later to occur of (A) such posting and (B) the giving of such separate notice of such posting; and (v) if by any other form of electronic transmission, when directed to the stockholder as required by law and, to the extent required by applicable law, in the manner consented to by the stockholder. An affidavit of the mailing or other means of giving any notice of any stockholders' meeting, executed by the Secretary, Assistant Corporate Secretary or any transfer agent of the Corporation giving the notice, shall be prima facie evidence of the giving of such notice. Notice shall be deemed to have been given to all stockholders of record who share an address if notice is given in accordance with the "householding" rules set forth in Rule 14a-3(e) under the Securities Exchange Act of 11134 (the "Exchange Act") and Section 233 of the Delaware General Corporation Law.
 
SECTION 5.
Waivers of Notice.
Whenever any notice is required to be given to any stockholder under the provisions of these By-Laws, the Certificate of Incorporation, or the Delaware General Corporation Law, a waiver thereof in writing, signed by the person or persons entitled to such notice, whether before or after the time stated therein, shall be deemed equivalent to the giving of such notice. The attendance of a stockholder at a meeting, in person or by proxy, or waiver by electronic transmission, shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when a stockholder attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened.
SECTION 6.
Quorum.
At all meetings of stockholders, except when otherwise provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by these By-Laws, the presence, in person or by proxy duly authorized, of the holders of one-third of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and except as otherwise provided by statute or rule of law, or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by these By-Laws, the vote, in person or by proxy, of the holders of a majority of the shares constituting such quorum shall be binding upon all stockholders of the Corporation. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote may adjourn any meeting, from time to time but not for a period of more than thirty (30) days at any one time, until a quorum shall attend. At any such adjourned meeting at which a quorum shall be present, any business may be transacted which might have been transacted at the meeting as originally called. Unless otherwise provided by statute, no notice of an adjourned meeting need be given.
SECTION 7.
Proxies.
7.1
Appointment.
Each stockholder entitled to vote at a meeting of stockholders or to express consent or dissent to corporate action in writing without a meeting may authorize another person or persons to act for such stockholder by proxy. Such authorization may be accomplished (a) by the stockholder or such stockholder's authorized officer, director, employee, or agent executing a writing or causing his or her signature to be affixed to such writing by any reasonable means, including facsimile signature, or (b) by transmitting or authorizing the transmission of a telegram, cablegram, or other means of electronic transmission to the intended holder of the proxy or to a proxy solicitation firm, proxy support service, or similar agent duly authorized by the intended proxy holder to receive such transmission; provided, that any such telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission must either set forth or be accompanied by information from which it can be determined that the telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission was authorized by the stockholder. Any copy, facsimile telecommunication, or other reliable reproduction of the writing or transmission by which a stockholder has authorized another person to act as proxy for such stockholder may be substituted or used in lieu of the original writing or transmission for any and all purposes for which the original writing or transmission could be used, provided that such copy, facsimile telecommunication, or other reproduction shall be a complete reproduction of the entire original writing or transmission.
7.2
Delivery to Corporation; Duration.
A proxy shall be filed with the Secretary of the Corporation before or at the time of the meeting or the delivery to the Corporation of the consent to corporate action in writing. A proxy shall become invalid three (3) years after the date of its execution, unless otherwise provided in the proxy. A proxy with respect to a specified meeting shall entitle the holder thereof to vote at any reconvened meeting following adjournment of such meeting but shall not be valid after the final adjournment thereof.
 
SECTION 8.
Inspectors of Election.
8.1
Appointment.
In advance of any meeting of stockholders, the Board of Directors of the Corporation shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspectors of election at such meeting and to make a written report thereof. The Board of Directors may designate one or more persons to serve as alternate inspectors to serve in place of any inspector who is unable or fails to act. If no inspector or alternate is able to act at a meeting of stockholders, the chairman of such meeting shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspector at such meeting.
8.2
Duties.
The inspectors of election shall (a) ascertain the number of shares of the Corporation outstanding and the voting power of each such share; (b) determine the shares represented at the meeting and the validity of proxies and ballots; (c) count all votes and ballots; (d) determine and retain for a reasonable period of time a record of the disposition of any challenges made to any determination by them; and (e) certify their determination of the number of shares represented at the meeting and their count of the votes and ballots. Each inspector shall, before entering upon the discharge of his or her duties, take and sign an oath to faithfully execute the duties of inspector with strict impartiality and according to the best of his or her ability. The inspectors may appoint or retain other persons or entities to assist them in the performance of their duties.
8.3
Determination of Proxy Validity.
The validity of any proxy or ballot executed for a meeting of stockholders shall be determined by the inspectors of election in accordance with the applicable provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law as then in effect. In determining the validity of any proxy transmitted by telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission, the inspectors shall record in writing the information upon which they relied in making such determination.
SECTION 9.
Fixing the Record Date.
9.1
Meetings.
For the purpose of determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at any meeting of stockholders or any adjournment thereof, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which record date shall be not fewer than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the date of such meeting. If the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, the record date for each special meeting of stockholders shall be not fewer than fifty-five (55) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date, unless the calling of such meeting is ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation. If no record date is fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall be at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which notice is given, or, if notice is waived, at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which the meeting is held. A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting; provided, however, that the Board of Directors may fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
9.2
Consent to Corporate Action Without a Meeting.
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which date shall not be more than ten (10) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days after the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, when no prior action by the Board of Directors is required by Chapter 1 of the Delaware General Corporation Law as now or hereafter amended, shall be the first date on which a signed written consent setting forth the action taken or proposed to be taken is delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the records of proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Delivery made to the Corporation's registered office shall be by hand or by certified or registered mail,
 
return receipt requested. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors and prior action by the Board of Directors is required by Chapter 1 of the Delaware General Corporation Law as now or hereafter amended, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution taking such prior action.
9.3
Dividends, Distributions, and Other Rights.
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to receive payment of any dividend or other distribution or allotment of any rights or the stockholders entitled to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion, or exchange of stock, or for the purpose of any other lawful action, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted, and which record date shall be not more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days prior to such action. If no record date is fixed, the record date for determining stockholders for any such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution relating thereto.
9.4
Voting List.
At least ten (10) days before each meeting of stockholders, a complete list of the stockholders entitled to vote at such meeting shall be made, arranged in alphabetical order, and showing the address of each stockholder and the number of shares registered in the name of each stockholder. This list shall be open to examination by any stockholder, for any purpose germane to the meeting, for a period of ten (10) days prior to the meeting, either (i) on a reasonably accessible electronic network, provided that the information required to gain access to such list is provided with the notice of meeting, or (ii) during ordinary business hours at the principal place of business of the Corporation. The list shall also be produced and kept at such meeting for inspection by any stockholder who is present.
SECTION 10.
Action by Stockholders Without a Meeting.
Subject to the provisions of Article NINTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, any action which could be taken at any annual or special meeting of stockholders may be taken without a meeting, without prior notice, and without a vote, if a consent or consents in writing, setting forth the action so taken, are (a) signed by the holders of outstanding stock having not fewer than the minimum number of votes that would be necessary to authorize or take such action at a meeting at which all shares entitled to vote thereon were present and voted and (b) delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the records of proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Delivery made to the Corporation's registered office shall be by hand or by certified mail or registered mail, return receipt requested. Every written consent shall bear the date of signature of each stockholder who signs the consent, and no written consent shall be effective to take the corporate action referred to therein unless written consents signed by a sufficient number of stockholders to take such action are delivered to the Corporation, in the manner required by this Section, within sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days of the date of the earliest dated consent delivered to the Corporation in the manner required by this Section 10. The validity of any consent executed by a proxy for a stockholder pursuant to a telegram, cablegram, or other means of electronic transmission transmitted to such proxy holder by or upon the authorization of the stockholder shall be determined by or at the direction of the Secretary of the Corporation. A written record of the information upon which the person making such determination relied shall be made and kept in the records of the proceedings of the stockholders. Any such consent shall be inserted in the minute book as if it were the minutes of a meeting of stockholders. Prompt notice of the taking of the corporate action without a meeting by less than unanimous written consent shall be given to those stockholders who have not consented in writing.
SECTION 11.
Notice of Nominations and Other Stockholder Business; Required Vote for Directors; Director Qualification.
11.1
Notice of Nominations and Other Stockholder Business.
A.
Annual Meetings of Stockholders.
1. Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors and the proposal of other business to be considered by the stockholders may be made at an annual meeting of stockholders (a) as specified in the Corporation's notice of meeting (or any supplement thereto); (b) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof; or (c) by any stockholder of the Corporation who (i) was a stockholder of record at the time the notice provided for
 
in this By-Law is delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation, (ii) is entitled to vote at the meeting, and (iii) complies with the notice procedures set forth in this By-Law as to such nomination or other business; clause (c) shall be the exclusive means for a stockholder to make nominations or submit proposals for other business (other than matters properly brought under Rule 14a-8 under the Exchange Act and included in the Corporation's notice of meeting) before an annual meeting of stockholders.
2. Without qualification, for any nominations or any other business to be properly brought before an annual meeting by a stockholder pursuant to Section 11.1.A(1)(c), the stockholder must have given timely notice thereof in writing to the Secretary of the Corporation and any such proposed business (other than the nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors) must constitute a proper matter for stockholder action. To be timely, a stockholder's notice shall be delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not earlier than the close of business on the one hundred and twentieth (120th) day and not later than the close of business on the ninetieth (110th) day prior to the first anniversary of the preceding year's annual meeting; provided, however, that in the event that the date of the annual meeting is more than thirty (30) days before or more than seventy (70) days after such anniversary date, notice by the stockholder to be timely must be so delivered not later than the close of business on the later of the ninetieth (110th) day prior to such annual meeting and the tenth (10th) day following the day on which public announcement of the date of such annual meeting is first made by the Corporation. In no event shall the postponement of a meeting as to which notice has been sent to stockholders commence a new time period (or extend any time period) for the giving of a stockholder's notice as described above. To be in proper form, such stockholder's notice (whether given pursuant to this Section 11.1.A(2) or Section 11.1.B) to the Secretary of the Corporation must: (a) set forth, as to the stockholder giving the notice and the beneficial owner, if any, on whose behalf the nomination or proposal for other business is made (i) the name and address of such stockholder, as they appear on the Corporation's books, and of such beneficial owner, if any, (ii) (A) the class or series and number of shares of the Corporation which are, directly or indirectly, owned beneficially and of record by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, (B) any option, warrant, convertible security, stock appreciation right, or similar right with an exercise or conversion privilege or a settlement payment or mechanism at a price related to any class or series of shares of the Corporation or with a value derived in whole or in part from the value of any class or series of shares of the Corporation, whether or not such instrument or right shall be subject to settlement in the underlying class or series of shares of the Corporation or otherwise (a "Derivative Instrument") directly or indirectly owned beneficially by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, and any other direct or indirect opportunity to profit or share in any profit derived from any increase or decrease in the value of shares of the Corporation, (C) any proxy, contract, arrangement, understanding, or relationship pursuant to which such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, has a right to vote any shares of any security of the Corporation, (D) any short interest in any security of the Corporation (for purposes of this By-Law a person shall be deemed to have a short interest in a security if such person directly or indirectly, through any contract, arrangement, understanding, relationship or otherwise, has the opportunity to profit or share in any profit derived from any decrease in the value of the subject security), (E) any rights to dividends on the shares of the Corporation owned beneficially by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, that are separated or separable from the underlying shares of the Corporation, (F) any proportionate interest in shares of the Corporation or Derivative Instruments held, directly or indirectly, by a general or limited partnership in which such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, is a general partner or, directly or indirectly, beneficially owns an interest in a general partner, and (G) any performance-related fees (other than an asset-based fee) that such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, is entitled to based on any increase or decrease in the value of shares of the Corporation or Derivative Instruments, if any, all such information to be provided as of the date of such notice, including, without limitation, any such interests held by members of such stockholder's and such beneficial owner's, if any, immediate family sharing the same household (which information shall be supplemented by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, not later than ten (10) days after the record date for the annual meeting to disclose such ownership as of the record date), (iii) any other information relating to such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, that would be required to be disclosed in a proxy statement or other filings required to be made in connection with solicitations of proxies for, as applicable, the proposal of other business and/or for the election of directors in a contested election pursuant to Section 14 of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, and (iv) a representation (A) that the stockholder is a holder of record of stock of the Corporation entitled to vote at such annual meeting and intends to appear in person or by proxy at the annual meeting to propose such business or nomination and (B) whether the stockholder or the beneficial owner, if any, intends or is part of a group which intends (x) to deliver a proxy statement and/or form of proxy to holders of at least the percentage of the Corporation's outstanding capital stock required to approve or adopt the proposal or elect the nominee and/or (y) otherwise to solicit proxies from stockholders in support of such proposal or nomination; (b) if the notice relates to any business other than the nomination of a director or directors that the stockholder proposes to bring before the annual meeting, set forth (i) a
 
brief description of the business desired to be brought before the annual meeting, the text of the proposal or business (including the text of any resolutions proposed for consideration and in the event that such business includes a proposal to amend these By-Laws, the language of the proposed amendment), the reasons for conducting such business at the annual meeting and any material interest of such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, in such business and (ii) a description of all agreements, arrangements, and understandings between such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, and their respective affiliates and associates, and any other person or persons (including their names) acting in concert therewith in connection with the proposal of such business by such stockholder; (c) set forth, as to each person, if any, whom the stockholder proposes to nominate for election or reelection to the Board of Directors (i) all information relating to such person that would be required to be disclosed in a proxy statement or other filings required to be made in connection with solicitations of proxies for election of directors in a contested election pursuant to Section 14 of the Exchange Act, (ii) such person's written consent to being named in the proxy statement as a nominee and to serving as a director if elected and a statement whether such person, if elected, intends to tender, promptly following such person's election or reelection, an irrevocable resignation effective upon such person's failure to receive the required vote for reelection at the next meeting at which such person would face reelection and upon acceptance of such resignation by the Board of Directors, and (iii) a description of all direct and indirect compensation and other material monetary agreements, arrangements and understandings during the past three (3) years, and any other material relationships, between or among such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, and their respective affiliates and associates, or any other person or persons (including their names) acting in concert therewith, on the one hand, and each proposed nominee, and his or her respective affiliates and associates, or any other person or persons (including their names) acting in concert therewith, on the other hand, including, without limitation, all information that would be required to be disclosed pursuant to Rule 404 promulgated under Regulation S-K if the stockholder making the nomination and any beneficial owner on whose behalf the nomination is made, if any, or any affiliate or associate thereof or person acting in concert therewith, were the "registrant" for purposes of such rule and the nominee were a director or executive officer of such registrant; and (d) with respect to each nominee for election or reelection to the Board of Directors, include the completed and signed questionnaire, representation and agreement required by Section 11.3. The Corporation may require any proposed nominee to furnish such other information as may reasonably be required by the Corporation to determine the eligibility of such proposed nominee to serve as an independent director of the Corporation or that could be material to a reasonable stockholder's understanding of the independence, or lack thereof, of such nominee.
3. Notwithstanding anything in the second sentence of Section 11.1.A(2) to the contrary, in the event that the number of directors to be elected to the Board of Directors of the Corporation is increased effective at the annual meeting and there is no public announcement by the Corporation naming all of the nominees for director or specifying the size of the increased Board of Directors at least one hundred (100) days prior to the first anniversary of the preceding year's annual meeting, a stockholder's notice required by this By-Law shall also be considered timely, but only with respect to nominees for any new positions created by such increase, if it shall be delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not later than the close of business on the tenth (10th) day following the day on which such public announcement is first made by the Corporation.
B.
Special Meetings of Stockholders.
Only such business shall be conducted at a special meeting of stockholders as shall have been brought before the special meeting pursuant to the Corporation's notice of meeting. Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors may be made at a special meeting at which directors are to be elected pursuant to the Corporation's notice of special meeting (a) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof or stockholders pursuant to Article 1, Section 2 hereof, or (b) provided that the Board of Directors or stockholders pursuant to Article 1, Section 2 hereof has determined that directors shall be elected at such special meeting, by any stockholder of the Corporation who (i) is a stockholder of record at the time the notice provided for in this By-Law is delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation and at the time of the special meeting, (ii) is entitled to vote at the special meeting, and (iii) complies with the notice procedures set forth in this By-Law as to such nomination. In the event the Corporation calls a special meeting for the purpose of electing one or more directors to the Board of Directors, any such stockholder may nominate a person or persons (as the case may be) for election to such position(s) as specified in the Corporation's notice of meeting, if the stockholder's notice required by Section 11.1.A(2) (including the completed and signed questionnaire, representation and agreement required by Section 11.3) shall be delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not earlier than the close of business on the one hundred and twentieth (120th) day prior to such special meeting and not later than the close of business on the later of the ninetieth (110th) day prior to such special meeting and the tenth (10th) day following the
 
day on which public announcement is first made of the date of the special meeting and of the nominees proposed by the Board of Directors to be elected at such special meeting. In no event shall the postponement of a special meeting as to which notice has been sent to stockholders commence a new time period (or extend any time period) for the giving of a stockholder's notice as described above.
C.
General.
1. Only such persons who are nominated in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law shall be eligible to serve as directors and only such business shall be conducted at a meeting of stockholders as shall have been brought before the meeting in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law. Except as otherwise provided by law, the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, the chairman of the meeting shall have the power and duty (a) to determine whether a nomination or any other business proposed to be brought before the meeting was made or proposed, as the case may be, in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law (including whether the stockholder or beneficial owner, if any, on whose behalf the nomination or proposal is made solicited (or is part of a group which solicited) or did not so solicit, as the case may be, proxies in support of such stockholder's nominee or proposal in compliance with such stockholder's representation as required by Section 11.1.A(2)(a)(iv)) and (b) if any proposed nomination or business was not made or proposed in compliance with this By-Law, to declare that such nomination shall be disregarded or that such proposed business shall not be transacted. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this By-Law, unless otherwise required by law, if the stockholder (or a qualified representative of the stockholder) does not appear at the annual or special meeting of stockholders of the Corporation to present a nomination or proposed business, such nomination shall be disregarded and such proposed business shall not be transacted, notwithstanding that proxies in respect of such vote may have been received by the Corporation. For purposes of this By-Law, to be considered a qualified representative of the stockholder, a person must be a duly authorized officer, manager, or partner of such stockholder or must be authorized by a writing executed by such stockholder or an electronic transmission delivered by such stockholder to act for such stockholder as proxy at the annual or special meeting and such person must produce such writing or electronic transmission, or a reliable reproduction of the writing or electronic transmission, at the annual or special meeting.
1. For purposes of this By-Law, "public announcement" shall mean disclosure in a press release reported by the Dow Jones News Service, Associated Press, or comparable national news service or in a document publicly filed by the Corporation with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to Section 13, 14 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.
2. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this By-Law, a stockholder shall also comply with all applicable requirements of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder with respect to the matters set forth in this By-Law; provided, however, that any references in these By-Laws to the Exchange Act are not intended to and shall not limit the requirements applicable to any nominations or proposals as to any other business to be considered pursuant to this By-Law (including Section 11.1A(1)(c) or Section 11.1B). Nothing in this By-Law shall be deemed to affect any rights (a) of stockholders to request inclusion of proposals in the Corporation's proxy statement pursuant to Rule 14a-8 under the Exchange Act or (b) of the holders of any series of Preferred Stock if and to the extent provided for under law, the Certificate of Incorporation, or these By-Laws.
11.2
Required Vote for Directors.
A nominee for director shall be elected to the Board of Directors if the votes cast for such nominee's election exceed the votes cast against such nominee's election; provided, however, that the directors shall be elected by a plurality of the votes cast at any meeting of stockholders for which (i) the Secretary of the Corporation receives a notice that a stockholder has nominated a person for election to the Board of Directors in compliance with the advance notice requirements for stockholder nominees for director set forth in Section 11.1 of this By-law and (ii) such nomination has not been withdrawn by such stockholder on or prior to the tenth day preceding the date the Corporation first mails its notice of meeting for such meeting to stockholders. If directors are to be elected by a plurality of the votes cast, stockholders shall not be permitted to vote against a nominee. Votes cast shall exclude abstentions with respect to that director's election.
11.3
Director Qualification: Submission of Questionnaire, Representation, and Agreement.
To be eligible to be a nominee for election or reelection as a director of the Corporation, a person must deliver (in accordance with the time periods prescribed for delivery of notice under Section 11.1) to the Secretary of the Corporation at the principal executive offices of the Corporation a written questionnaire with respect to the
 
background and qualification of such person and the background of any other person or entity on whose behalf the nomination is being made (which questionnaire shall be provided by the Secretary upon written request) and a written representation and agreement (in the form provided by the Secretary of the Corporation upon written request), that such person (a) is not and will not become a party to (i) any agreement, arrangement, or understanding with, and has not given any commitment or assurance to, any person or entity as to how such person, if elected as a director of the Corporation, will act or vote on any issue or question (a "Voting Commitment") that has not been disclosed to the Corporation or (ii) any Voting Commitment that could limit or interfere with such person's ability to comply, if elected as a director of the Corporation, with such person's fiduciary duties under applicable law; (b) is not and will not become a party to any agreement, arrangement, or understanding with any person or entity other than the Corporation with respect to any direct or indirect compensation, reimbursement, or indemnification in connection with service or action as a director that has not been disclosed therein; and (c) in such person's individual capacity and on behalf of any person or entity on whose behalf the nomination is being made, would be in compliance, if elected as a director of the Corporation, and will comply with all applicable publicly disclosed corporate governance, conflict of interest, confidentiality and stock ownership and trading policies and guidelines of the Corporation.
SECTION 12.
Notice to Corporation.
Any written notice required to be delivered by a stockholder to the Corporation pursuant to Section 11.1 of this Article I or Section 2.1 of Article II of these By-Laws must be given, either by personal delivery or by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, to the Secretary of the Corporation at the Corporation's executive offices in the City of Chicago, State of Illinois.
SECTION 1.
Number and Term of Office.
The number of directors shall be ten (10), but the number may be increased, or decreased to not less than three (3), from time to time, either by the directors by adoption of a resolution to such effect or by the stockholders by amendment of these By-Laws in accordance with Article VIII. At each annual meeting of stockholders, each director shall be elected to hold office until the next annual meeting or until his or her successor shall be elected and qualified or until his or her earlier resignation or removal.
SECTION 2.
Nomination and Election.
 
 
SECTION 3.
Place of Meeting.
Meetings of the Board of Directors, or of any committee thereof, may be held either within or without the State of Delaware.
SECTION 4.
Annual Meeting.
Each year the Board of Directors shall meet in connection with the annual meeting of stockholders for the purpose of electing officers and for the transaction of other business. No notice of such annual meeting is required. Such annual meeting may be held at any other time or place which shall be specified in a notice given as hereinafter provided for special meetings of the Board of Directors, or in a consent and waiver of notice thereof, signed by all the directors.
 
SECTION 5.
Stated Meetings.
The Board of Directors may, by resolution adopted by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors, from time to time appoint the time and place for holding stated meetings of the Board of Directors, if by it deemed advisable; and such stated meetings shall thereupon be held at the time and place so appointed, without the giving of any special notice with regard thereto. In case the day appointed for a stated meeting shall fall upon a legal holiday, such meeting shall be held on the next following day, not a legal holiday, at the regularly appointed hour. Except as otherwise provided in these By-Laws, any and all business may be transacted at any stated meeting.
SECTION 6.
Special Meetings.
6.1
Convenors and Notice.
Special meetings of the Board of Directors may be called by or at the request of the Chairman of the Board of Directors or any two (2) directors. Notice of a special meeting of the Board of Directors, stating the place, day, and hour of the meeting, shall be given to each director in writing (by mail, wire, facsimile, or personal delivery) or orally (by telephone or in person).
6.2
Waiver of Notice.
With respect to a special meeting of the Board of Directors, a written waiver, signed by a director, or waiver by electronic transmission, shall be deemed equivalent to notice to that director. A director's attendance at a meeting shall constitute that director's waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the director attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting was not lawfully called or convened. Neither the business to be transacted at, nor the purpose of, any regular or special meeting of the Board of Directors need be specified in the waiver of notice of such meeting.
SECTION 7.
Quorum and Manner of Acting.
Except as herein otherwise provided, forty percent (40%) of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided in these By-Laws at the time of any stated or special meeting of the Board of Directors or, if vacancies exist on the Board of Directors, forty percent (40%) of such number of directors then in office; provided, however, that such number may not be less than one-third of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided in these By-Laws, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and, except as otherwise required by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by these By-Laws, the act of a majority of the directors present at any such meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of the Board of Directors. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the directors present may adjourn any meeting, from time to time, until a quorum is present. No notice of any adjourned meeting need be given.
SECTION 8.
Chairman of the Board.
The Chairman of the Board shall preside, when present, at all meetings of the Board of Directors, except as otherwise provided by law.
SECTION 11.
Resignations.
Any director of the Corporation may resign at any time by giving written notice or notice by electronic transmission thereof to the Secretary of the Corporation. Such resignation shall take effect at the time specified therefor or if the time is not specified, upon delivery thereof; and, unless otherwise specified with respect thereto, the acceptance of such resignation shall not be necessary to make it effective.
SECTION 10.
Removal of Directors.
Any directors may be removed with or without cause by the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, at a meeting of stockholders called for that purpose; and the vacancy on the Board of Directors caused by any such removal may be filled by the stockholders at such meeting or at any subsequent meeting.
 
SECTION 11.
Filling of Vacancies Not Caused by Removal.
In case of any increase in the number of directors, or of any vacancy created by death or resignation, the additional director or directors may be elected or, as the case may be, the vacancy or vacancies may be filled, either (a) by the Board of Directors at any meeting, (i) if the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, or (ii) if the Corporation does not have an Interested Stockholder, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the remaining directors, though less than a quorum or (b) by the stockholders entitled to vote, either at an annual meeting or at a special meeting thereof called for that purpose, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the outstanding shares entitled to vote at such meeting.
SECTION 12.
Directors' Fees.
The Board of Directors shall have authority to determine from time to time the amount of compensation that shall be paid to its members for attendance at meetings of the Board of Directors or of any committee of the Board of Directors.
SECTION 13.
Action Without a Meeting.
Any action required or permitted to be taken at any meeting of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof may be taken without a meeting if all members of the Board of Directors or committee, as the case may be, consent thereto in writing, and the writing or writings are filed with the minutes of proceedings of the Board of Directors or committee.
SECTION 1.
Audit Committee.
In addition to any committees appointed pursuant to Section 2 of this Article, there shall be an Audit Committee, appointed annually by the Board of Directors, consisting of at least three (3) directors who are not members of management. It shall be the responsibility of the Audit Committee to review the scope and results of the annual independent audit of books and records of the Corporation and its subsidiaries and to discharge such other responsibilities as may from time to time be assigned to it by the Board of Directors. The Audit Committee shall meet at such times and places as the members deem advisable, and shall make such recommendations to the Board of Directors as they consider appropriate.
SECTION 2.
Other Committees.
2.1 The Board of Directors may appoint standing or temporary committees and invest such committees with such powers as it may see fit, with power to subdelegate such powers if deemed desirable by the Board of Directors; but no such committee shall have the power or authority of the Board of Directors to adopt, amend, or repeal these By-Laws or approve, adopt, or recommend to the stockholders of the Corporation any action or matter expressly required by the Certificate of Incorporation, these By-Laws or the Delaware General Corporation Law to be submitted to stockholders for approval.
Committee Powers.
2.2 The Board of Directors may designate one or more directors as alternate members of any committee, who may replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of the committee. In the absence or disqualification of a member of a committee, the member or members thereof present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, whether or not such member or members constitute a quorum, may unanimously appoint another member of the Board of Directors to act at the meeting in the place of any such absent or disqualified member.
Committee Members.
 
SECTION 3.
Quorum and Manner of Acting.
A majority of the number of directors composing any committee of the Board of Directors, as established and fixed by resolution of the Board of Directors, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at any meeting of such committee but, if less than a majority are present at a meeting, a majority of such directors present may adjourn the meeting from time to time without further notice. The act of a majority of the members of a committee present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of such committee.
SECTION 1.
Officers.
The elected officers of the Corporation shall be a Chairman of the Board of Directors (who shall be a director) and, at the discretion of the Board of Directors, a President (who shall be a director), and one or more Vice Presidents (each of whom may be assigned by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer an additional title descriptive of the functions assigned to such officer and one or more of whom may be designated Executive or Senior Vice President). The Board of Directors may also elect one or more Vice Chairmen. The Board of Directors shall also designate either the Chairman of the Board of Directors or the President as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation. The Board of Directors shall appoint a Controller, a Secretary, and a Treasurer. Any number of offices, whether elective or appointive, may be held by the same person. The Chief Executive Officer may, by a writing filed with the Secretary, designate titles as officers for employees and agents and appoint Assistant Secretaries and Assistant Treasurers as, from time to time, may appear to be necessary or advisable in the conduct of the affairs of the Corporation and may, in the same manner, terminate or change such titles.
SECTION 2.
Term of Office.
So far as practicable, all elected officers shall be elected at the annual meeting of the Board of Directors in each year, and shall hold office until the annual meeting of the Board of Directors in the next subsequent year and until their respective successors are chosen. The Controller, Secretary, and Treasurer shall hold office at the pleasure of the Board of Directors.
SECTION 3.
Salaries of Elected Officers.
The salaries paid to the elected officers of the Corporation shall be authorized or approved by the Board of Directors.
SECTION 4.
Bonuses.
None of the officers, directors, or employees of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations shall at any time be paid any bonus or share in the earnings or profits of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations except pursuant to a plan approved by affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members of the Board of Directors.
SECTION 5.
Removal of Elected and Appointed Officers.
Any elected or appointed officer may be removed at any time, either for or without cause, by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors, at any meeting called for the purpose.
SECTION 6.
Vacancies.
If any vacancy occurs in any office, the Board of Directors may elect or appoint a successor to fill such vacancy for the remainder of the term.
 
SECTION 1.
Chairman of the Board.
The Chairman of the Board of Directors shall preside, when present, at all meetings of the stockholders (except as otherwise provided by statute) and at all meetings of the Board of Directors. The Chairman shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation; to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the Chairman by the Board of Directors.
SECTION 2.
President.
The President shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation and to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; during the absence or disability of the Chairman of the Board of Directors, to exercise the Chairman's powers and to perform the Chairman's duties; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the President by the Board of Directors; provided, that if the office of President is vacant, the Chairman shall exercise the duties ordinarily exercised by the President until such time as a President is elected or appointed.
SECTION 3.
Chief Executive Officer.
The officer designated by the Board of Directors as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation shall have general and active control of its business and affairs. The Chief Executive Officer shall have general power to appoint or designate all employees and agents of the Corporation whose appointment or designation is not otherwise provided for and to fix the compensation thereof, subject to the provisions of these By-Laws; to remove or suspend any employee or agent who shall not have been elected or appointed by the Board of Directors or other body; to suspend for cause any employee, agent, or officer, other than an elected officer, pending final action by the body which shall have appointed such employee, agent, or officer; and to exercise all the powers usually pertaining to the office held by the Chief Executive Officer of a corporation.
SECTION 4.
Vice Presidents and Controller.
The several Vice Presidents and the Controller shall perform all such duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of them, from time to time, by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer, respectively.
SECTION 5.
Secretary.
The Secretary shall attend to the giving of notice of all meetings of stockholders and of the Board of Directors and shall keep and attest true records of all such proceedings. The Secretary shall have charge of the corporate seal and have authority to attest any and all instruments or writings to which the same may be affixed and shall keep and account for all books, documents, papers, and records of the Corporation relating to its corporate organization. The Secretary shall have authority to sign stock certificates and shall generally perform all the duties usually appertaining to the office of secretary of a corporation. In the absence of the Secretary, an Assistant Secretary or Secretary pro tempore shall perform the duties of the Secretary.
SECTION 6.
Treasurer.
The Treasurer shall have the care and custody of all moneys, funds, and securities of the Corporation, and shall deposit or cause to be deposited all funds of the Corporation in accordance with directions or authorizations of the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer. The Treasurer shall have power to sign stock certificates, to indorse for deposit or collection, or otherwise, all checks, drafts, notes, bills of exchange, or other commercial paper payable to the Corporation, and to give proper receipts or discharges therefor. In the absence of the Treasurer, an Assistant Treasurer shall perform the duties of the Treasurer.
 
SECTION 7.
Additional Powers and Duties.
In addition to the foregoing especially enumerated duties and powers, the several officers of the Corporation shall perform such other duties and exercise such further powers as may be provided in these By-Laws or as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine, or as may be assigned to them by any superior officer.
SECTION 8.
Disaster Emergency Powers of Acting Officers.
If, as a result of a disaster or other state of emergency, the Chief Executive Officer is unable to perform the duties of that office, (a) the powers and duties of the Chief Executive Officer shall be performed by the employee with the highest base salary who shall be available and capable of performing such powers and duties and, if more than one such employee has the same base salary, by the employee whose surname begins with the earliest letter of the alphabet among the group of those employees with the same base salary; (b) the officer performing such duties shall continue to perform such powers and duties until the Chief Executive Officer becomes capable of performing those duties or until the Board of Directors shall have elected a new Chief Executive Officer or designated another individual as Acting Chief Executive Officer; (c) such officer shall have the power in addition to all other powers granted to the Chief Executive Officer by these By-Laws and by the Board of Directors to appoint an acting President, acting Vice President - Finance, acting Controller, acting Secretary, and acting Treasurer, if any of the persons duly elected to any such office is not, by reason of such disaster or emergency, able to perform the duties of such office, each of such acting appointees to serve in such capacities until the officer for whom the appointee is acting becomes capable of performing the duties of such office or until the Board of Directors shall have designated another individual to perform such duties or have elected another person to fill such office; (d) any such acting officer so appointed shall be entitled to exercise all powers vested by these By-Laws or the Board of Directors in the duly elected officer for whom the acting officer is acting; and (e) anyone transacting business with the Corporation may rely upon a certification by any two (2) officers of the Corporation that a specified individual has succeeded to the powers of the Chief Executive Officer and that such person has appointed other acting officers as herein provided and any person, firm, corporation, or other entity to which such certification has been delivered by such officers may continue to rely upon it until notified of a change in writing signed by two (2) officers of the Corporation.
SECTION 1.
Stock Certificates.
The shares of the stock of the Corporation shall be represented by certificates, provided that the Board of Directors may provide by resolution or resolutions that some or all of any or all classes or series of stock shall be uncertificated shares. Any such resolution shall not apply to shares represented by certificate until such certificate is surrendered to the Corporation. Every holder of stock of the Corporation represented by a certificate shall be entitled to a certificate, signed by the Chairman of the Board of Directors or the President or a Vice President and the Treasurer or an Assistant Treasurer or the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary, certifying the number of shares owned by the stockholder in the Corporation. Any and all of the signatures on a certificate may be a facsimile. If any officer, transfer agent, or registrar who has signed or whose facsimile signature has been placed upon a certificate shall have ceased to be such officer, transfer agent, or registrar before such certificate is issued, it may be issued by the Corporation with the same effect as if he or she were such officer, transfer agent, or registrar at the date of issue.
SECTION 2.
Transfer Agents and Registrars.
The Board of Directors may, in its discretion, appoint responsible banks or trust companies in the Borough of Manhattan, in the City of New York, State of New York, and in such other city or cities as the Board of Directors may deem advisable, from time to time, to act as transfer agents and registrars of the stock of the Corporation; and, when such appointments shall have been made, no stock certificate shall be valid until countersigned by one of such transfer agents and registered by one of such registrars.
 
SECTION 3.
Transfers of Stock.
Shares of stock may be transferred by delivery of the certificates therefor, accompanied either by an assignment in writing on the back of the certificates or by written power of attorney to sell, assign, and transfer the same, signed by the record holder thereof (or, with respect to uncertificated shares, by delivery of duly executed instructions or in any other manner permitted by law), but no transfer shall affect the right of the Corporation to pay any dividend upon the stock to the holder of record thereof, or to treat the holder of record as the holder in fact thereof for all purposes, and no transfer shall be valid, except between the parties thereto, until such transfer shall have been made upon the books of the Corporation.
SECTION 4.
Lost Certificates.
The Board of Directors may provide for the issuance of new certificates of stock or uncertificated shares to replace certificates of stock lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, or alleged to be lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, upon such terms and in accordance with such procedures as the Board of Directors shall deem proper and prescribe.
SECTION 1.
Fiscal Year.
The fiscal year of the Corporation shall be the calendar year.
SECTION 2. (Repealed in its entirety by vote of the stockholders, May 5, 1975.)
SECTION 3.
Signing of Negotiable Instruments.
All bills, notes, checks, or other instruments for the payment of money shall be signed or countersigned by such officer or officers and in such manner as from time to time may be prescribed by resolution (whether general or special) of the Board of Directors.
SECTION 4.
Indemnification of Directors and Officers.
4.1
Right to Indemnification.
Each person who was or is made a party to or is threatened to be made a party to or is otherwise involved (including, without limitation, as a witness) in any actual or threatened action, suit, or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative, or investigative (hereinafter a "proceeding"), by reason of the fact that he or she is or was a director or officer of the Corporation or that, being or having been such a director or officer or an employee of the Corporation, he or she is or was serving at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation as a director, officer, employee, or agent of another corporation or of a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise, including service with respect to an employee benefit plan (hereinafter an "indemnitee"), whether the basis of such proceeding is alleged action in an official capacity as such a director, officer, employee, or agent or in any other capacity while serving as such a director, officer, employee, or agent, shall be indemnified and held harmless by the Corporation to the full extent permitted by the Delaware General Corporation Law, as the same exists or may hereafter be amended (but, in the case of any such amendment, only to the extent that such amendment permits the Corporation to provide broader indemnification rights than permitted prior thereto), or by other applicable law as then in effect, against all expense, liability, and loss (including attorneys' fees, judgments, fines, ERISA excise taxes or penalties, and amounts paid in settlement) actually and reasonably incurred or suffered by such indemnitee in connection therewith, and such indemnification shall continue as to an indemnitee who has ceased to be a director, officer, employee, or agent and shall inure to the benefit of the indemnitee's heirs, executors, and administrators; provided, however, that except as provided in Section 4.2 with respect to proceedings seeking to enforce rights to indemnification, the Corporation shall indemnify any such indemnitee in connection with a proceeding (or part thereof) initiated by such indemnitee only if such proceeding (or part
 
thereof) was authorized or ratified by the Board of Directors. The right to indemnification conferred in this Section 4.1 shall be a contract right and shall include the right to be paid by the Corporation the expenses incurred in defending any such proceeding in advance of its final disposition (hereinafter an "advancement of expenses"); provided, however, that an advancement of expenses incurred by an indemnitee in his or her capacity as a director or officer or former director or officer (and not in any other capacity in which service was or is rendered by such indemnitee, including, without limitation, service to an employee benefit plan) shall be made only upon delivery to the Corporation of an undertaking (hereinafter an "undertaking"), by or on behalf of such indemnitee, to repay all amounts so advanced if it shall ultimately be determined by final judicial decision from which there is no further right to appeal that such indemnitee is not entitled to be indemnified for such expenses under this Section 4.1 or otherwise; and provided, further, that an advancement of expenses shall not be made if the Board of Directors makes a good faith determination that such payment would violate law or public policy.
4.2
Right of Indemnitee to Bring Suit.
If a claim under Section 4.1 is not paid in full by the Corporation within sixty (60) days after a written claim has been received by the Corporation, except in the case of a claim for an advancement of expenses, in which case the applicable period shall be twenty (20) days, the indemnitee may at any time thereafter bring suit against the Corporation to recover the unpaid amount of the claim. If successful in whole or in part in any such suit, or in a suit brought by the Corporation to recover an advancement of expenses pursuant to the terms of an undertaking, the indemnitee shall also be entitled to be paid the expenses of prosecuting or defending such suit. The indemnitee shall be presumed to be entitled to indemnification under this Section 4 upon submission of a written claim (and, in an action brought to enforce a claim for an advancement of expenses, where the required undertaking has been tendered to the Corporation), and thereafter the Corporation shall have the burden of proof to overcome the presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled. Neither the failure of the Corporation (including the Board of Directors, independent legal counsel, or the stockholders) to have made a determination prior to the commencement of such suit that indemnification of the indemnitee is proper in the circumstances, nor an actual determination by the Corporation (including the Board of Directors, independent legal counsel, or the stockholders) that the indemnitee is not entitled to indemnification shall be a defense to the suit or create a presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled.
4.3
Nonexclusivity of Rights.
The rights to indemnification and to the advancement of expenses conferred in this Section 4 shall not be exclusive of any other right that any person may have or hereafter acquire under any statute, provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation, these By-Laws, any agreement, vote of stockholders or disinterested directors, or otherwise. Neither any amendment to or repeal of this Section 4 or of any of the procedures established by the Board of Directors pursuant to Section 4.7, nor the adoption of any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, nor, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any modification of law, shall eliminate or reduce the effect of the right or protection of any indemnitee to indemnification and to the advancement of expenses in accordance with the provisions hereof and thereof with respect to any proceeding (regardless of when such proceeding is first threatened, commenced or completed) arising out of, or related to, any acts or omissions of such indemnitee occurring prior to such amendment or repeal.
4.4
Insurance, Contracts, and Funding.
The Corporation may maintain insurance, at its expense, to protect itself and any director, officer, employee, or agent of the Corporation or another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise against any expense, liability, or loss, whether or not the Corporation would have the power to indemnify such person against such expense, liability, or loss under the Delaware General Corporation Law. The Corporation may, without further stockholder approval, enter into contracts with any indemnitee in furtherance of the provisions of this Section 4 and may create a trust fund, grant a security interest, or use other means (including, without limitation, a letter of credit) to ensure the payment of such amounts as may be necessary to effect indemnification as provided in this Section 4.
4.5
Persons Serving Other Entities.
Any person who is or was a director, officer, or employee of the Corporation who is or was serving (i) as a director or officer of another corporation of which a majority of the shares entitled to vote in the election of its directors is held by the Corporation or (ii) in an executive or management capacity in a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise of which the Corporation or a wholly owned subsidiary of the Corporation is a general partner or has a majority ownership shall be deemed to be so serving at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation and entitled to indemnification and advancement of expenses under Section 4.1.
 
4.6
Indemnification of Employees and Agents of the Corporation.
The Corporation may, by action of the Board of Directors, authorize one or more executive officers to grant rights to advancement of expenses to employees or agents of the Corporation on such terms and conditions as such officer or officers deem appropriate under the circumstances. The Corporation may, by action of the Board of Directors, grant rights to indemnification and advancement of expenses to employees or agents or groups of employees or agents of the Corporation with the same scope and effect as the provisions of this Section 4 with respect to the indemnification and advancement of expenses of directors and officers of the Corporation; provided, however, that an undertaking shall be made by an employee or agent only if required by the Board of Directors.
4.7
Procedures for the Submission of Claims.
The Board of Directors may establish reasonable procedures for the submission of claims for indemnification pursuant to this Section 4, determination of the entitlement of any person thereto, and review of any such determination. Such procedures shall be set forth in an appendix to these By-Laws and shall be deemed for all purposes to be a part hereof.
SECTION 1.
Amendment of the By-Laws: General.
Except as herein otherwise expressly provided, the By-Laws of the Corporation may be altered or repealed in any particular and new By-Laws, not inconsistent with any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or any provision of law, may be adopted, either by
A. the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority in number of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote at an annual meeting of stockholders or at a special meeting thereof, the notice of which special meeting shall include the form of the proposed alteration or repeal or of the proposed new By-Laws, or a summary thereof; or
B. either by
i. the affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors at any meeting thereof, or
ii. the affirmative vote of all the directors present at any meeting at which a quorum, less than a majority, is present;
provided, in either of the latter cases, that the notice of such meeting shall include the form of the proposed alteration or repeal or of the proposed new By-Laws, or a summary thereof; and provided, further, that Article I, Section 11.2 of these By-Laws may be amended only as set forth in Section 1.A of this By-Law, except that any amendment required by law or necessary or desirable to cure an administrative or technical deficiency may be made as provided in Section 1.B of this By-Law.
SECTION 2.
Amendments as to Compensation and Removal of Officers.
Notwithstanding anything contained in these By-Laws to the contrary, the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the Voting Stock, as defined in Article FOURTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, at a meeting of stockholders called for the purpose, shall be required to alter, amend, repeal, or adopt any provision inconsistent with Sections 3, 4 and 5 of Article IV of these By-Laws, notice of which meeting shall include the form of the proposed amendment, or a summary thereof.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Boeing Elects Nielsen Chairman and CEO David Calhoun to Board of Directors
 The Boeing [NYSE: BA] board of directors has elected David L. Calhoun as its newest member. Calhoun, 52, is chairman of the management board and chief executive officer of The Nielsen Company B.V.
CHICAGO, June 9, 2009
Calhoun's election is effective immediately. He is expected to serve on the Boeing board's audit and finance committees.
"Dave is an exceptional executive with a deep understanding of our business and what it takes to succeed in global markets," said Boeing Chairman, President and Chief Executive Jim McNerney. "I'm grateful he agreed to join our board and I look forward to his contributions to our company."
Prior to his 2006 move to Nielsen, a global information and media company, Calhoun spent more than 25 years at GE, where he held several senior positions including vice chairman of the company and president and CEO of the GE Infrastructure, GE Transportation, and GE Aircraft Engines businesses.
Contact:
Todd Blecher
312-544-2002


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20090623145644.txt.gz
TIME:20090623145644
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On June 23, 2009, The Boeing Company (the "Company") issued a press release in which it announced that the first flight of the 787 Dreamliner will be postponed. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: June 23, 2009
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
Boeing Postpones 787 First Flight
EVERETT, Wash., June 23, 2009  Boeing [NYSE: BA] today announced that first flight of the 787 Dreamliner will be postponed due to a need to reinforce an area within the side-of-body section of the aircraft.
The need was identified during the recent regularly scheduled tests on the full-scale static test airplane. Preliminary analysis indicated that flight test could proceed this month as planned. However, after further testing and consideration of possible modified flight test plans, the decision was made late last week that first flight should instead be postponed until productive flight testing could occur.
First flight and first delivery will be rescheduled following the final determination of the required modification and testing plan. It will be several weeks before the new schedule is available. The 787 team will continue with other aspects of testing on Airplane #1, including final gauntlet testing and low-speed taxiing. Work will also continue on the other five flight test aircraft and the subsequent aircraft in the production system.
Scott Carson, president and CEO of Boeing Commercial Airplanes said a team of experts has already identified several potential solutions.
"Consideration was given to a temporary solution that would allow us to fly as scheduled, but we ultimately concluded that the right thing was to develop, design, test and incorporate a permanent modification to the localized area requiring reinforcement. Structural modifications like these are not uncommon in the development of new airplanes, and this is not an issue related to our choice of materials or the assembly and installation work of our team," Carson said.
Boeing's financial guidance will be updated to reflect any impact of these changes when the company issues its second quarter 2009 earnings report in July.
Boeing will hold a conference call with Carson, Pat Shanahan, vice president and general manager of Airplane Programs, and Scott Fancher, vice president and general manager of the 787 program, to discuss the 787 program today at 10:00 a.m. EDT, 7:00 a.m., PDT. A webcast of that call will be accessible at www.boeing.com.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20090625093035.txt.gz
TIME:20090625093035
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On June 22, 2009, each of Sea Launch Company, L.L.C., Sea Launch ACS Limited, Platform Company L.D.C., Sea Launch Limited Partnership, Sea Launch ACS Limited Partnership and Platform Limited Partnership (collectively "Sea Launch") filed a voluntary petition for relief under Chapter 11 of Title 11 of the United States Code in the United States Bankruptcy Court for the District of Delaware (the "Chapter 11 Filing").
As previously disclosed, The Boeing Company ("Boeing") and one other Sea Launch partner are obligated under certain credit guarantees to make payments to certain creditors of Sea Launch in the event that Sea Launch does not make its loan payments.
The Chapter 11 Filing constituted an event of default or otherwise accelerated approximately $448 million of outstanding indebtedness of Sea Launch for which Boeing and the other Sea Launch partner issued guarantees. As a result, these guarantees to certain creditors of Sea Launch became due and payable. It is Boeing's intention to perform its obligations under its guarantees.
Among other options, Boeing has a right to reimbursement from Sea Launch as well as rights to reimbursement from all of the other Sea Launch partners, who are each obligated to reimburse Boeing so that Boeing contributes no more than its proportional ownership percentage (40%) in Sea Launch of the aggregate guarantee payment obligations. Boeing intends to pursue vigorously all of its rights and remedies against Sea Launch and the other Sea Launch partners.
Boeing's expected pre-tax charge to earnings in the second quarter of 2009 related to Sea Launch's Chapter 11 Filing is approximately $35 million. In the event Boeing is unable to secure reimbursement from Sea Launch or the other Sea Launch partners related to Boeing's payment under the credit guarantees or previously made loans to Sea Launch, Boeing could incur additional pre-tax charges of up to $478 million.
Forward-Looking Information is Subject to Risk and Uncertainty
Certain statements in this report may be "forward-looking" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "could," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," "targets," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions about future events that may not prove to be accurate. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak to events only as of the date they are made and we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise, except as required by federal securities laws. Specific factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, those set forth below and other important factors disclosed previously and from time to time in our other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission: Sea Launch's ability to restructure and meet its other obligations to us; Boeing's ability to recover estimated proceeds from recourse to the other Sea Launch partners; and the scope, nature or impact of the Chapter 11 Filing.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Date: June 24, 2009


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20090626161259.txt.gz
TIME:20090626161259
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
At its scheduled meeting on June 22, 2009, the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of The Boeing Company (the "") approved a restricted stock unit grant for 50,000 units of Boeing common stock (the "") to James A. Bell, Executive Vice President, Corporate President and Chief Financial Officer. The Award was effective on June 22, 2009.
Company
Award
The Award was granted in recognition of Mr. Bell's performance and as a retention vehicle. The Award was made under the Company's 2003 Incentive Stock Plan (the "") and is subject to the terms and conditions of the 2003 Plan. The Award will vest 100% and settle in common stock (on a one-for-one basis) on the third anniversary of the grant date and is subject to other terms contained in the Form of Notice of Terms of Restricted Stock Units listed as Exhibit 10.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
2003 Plan
 
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 10.1
 
As part of the Executive Compensation Program, The Boeing Company (the "Company" has awarded you a Restricted Stock Unit award. The terms and conditions of the award are as follows:
 
 
 
"Disability" here means a disability entitling a participant to benefits under a long-term disability policy sponsored by the Company or one of its subsidiaries.
 
 
5.1 While RSUs are in your account, they will earn dividend equivalents in the form of additional RSUs. Specifically, as of each dividend payment date for Boeing stock, your RSU account will be credited with additional RSUs ("Earnings Credit RSUs") equal in number to the number of shares of Boeing stock that could be bought with the cash dividends that would be paid on the RSUs in your account if each RSU were a share of Boeing stock. The number of RSUs that results from the Earnings Credit calculation will be to two decimal places.
5.2 The number of shares of Boeing stock that could be bought with such cash dividends will be calculated based on the "Fair Market Value" of Boeing stock on the applicable dividend payment date. "Fair Market Value" here means the average of the high and the low per share trading prices for Boeing stock as reported in for the specific dividend payment date, or in such other source as the Company deems reliable.
The Wall Street Journal
5.3 Earnings Credit RSUs will vest at the same time as the RSUs with which they are associated.
 
 
 
9.1 Distribution from your RSU account will be made as soon as reasonably possible after the vesting of your RSUs, but not later than 60 days after the applicable vesting date. Distribution will be in whole shares of Boeing stock. The number of shares distributed will be equal to the number of whole vested RSUs in your account, subject to deductions described in paragraph 9.2. Fractional share values will be applied to income tax withholding.
9.2 The Company will deduct from the distribution of your vested RSUs any withholding or other taxes required by law and may deduct any amounts due from you to the Company or to a subsidiary of the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20090707083556.txt.gz
TIME:20090707083556
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On July 6, 2009, BCACSC, Inc. ("Buyer"), a wholly owned subsidiary of The Boeing Company ("Boeing"), entered into an Asset Purchase Agreement (the "Purchase Agreement") with Vought Aircraft Industries, Inc. ("Vought"). Under the Purchase Agreement, Vought has agreed to sell, and Buyer has agreed to purchase, the business, assets and operations of Vought's 787 business conducted at North Charleston, South Carolina (collectively, the "Business"). Buyer will assume all of the liabilities of the Business other than the liabilities that Vought has agreed to retain, which include (1) pre-closing environmental and certain tax liabilities, (2) certain liabilities for Vought employee benefit plans and other pre-closing employee-related liabilities and (3) unknown pre-closing violations of law causing losses in excess of $10 million.
The cash consideration to be paid at closing to Vought in connection with the sale of the Business and the entry into the other agreements described below is expected to be approximately $580 million, which represents the agreed-upon aggregate cash consideration less pre-closing adjustments. The final aggregate cash consideration will be subject to further adjustments post-closing related to Vought's net investment in the Business. In addition, Boeing will release Vought from its obligations to repay amounts previously advanced by Boeing and will guarantee the pre-closing obligations of Buyer and provide a limited guaranty of Buyer's post-closing indemnity of Vought.
The Purchase Agreement contains representations and warranties, covenants and indemnification customary for a transaction of this nature.
Closing of the transaction is subject to several customary closing conditions, including the requirement that the lenders under Vought's senior credit facility provide the waiver required to permit the transaction to close.
The Purchase Agreement contemplates that the parties or their affiliates will enter into the following additional agreements at closing: (1) a transition services agreement, pursuant to which Vought will provide certain transition services to Boeing; (2) an engineering services agreement, pursuant to which Vought will provide certain engineering services to Boeing; (3) an intellectual property license agreement, pursuant to which the parties will license to each other certain intellectual property; (4) a termination and mutual release agreement, pursuant to which Vought and Boeing will terminate their existing 787 supply agreement and release claims and resolve rights and obligations owed to each other under the existing 787 supply agreement, including obligations incurred or created as a result of ordinary course performance of the 787 supply agreement; and (5) a long-term supply agreement, pursuant to which Vought will act as a supplier for Boeing's 737, 777 and 787 aircraft programs.
A copy of the press release announcing the transaction is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated herein by reference.
 
(d) Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Date: July 7, 2009
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
Boeing Announces Agreement to Acquire Vought Operations in South Carolina
 Accelerates productivity and efficiency within 787 supply chain
 Bolsters Boeing capability to develop and produce large composite structures
 Vought continues relationship with Boeing on range of programs
SEATTLE, July 7, 2009  The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] announced today that it has agreed to acquire the business and operations conducted by Vought Aircraft Industries at its South Carolina facility, where Vought builds a key structure for Boeing's 787 Dreamliner airplane.
The Vought facility, located in North Charleston, performs fabrication, and assembly of structures and systems installation of 787 aft-fuselage sections, which are made primarily of composite materials. After the transaction, Vought will continue its work on many Boeing programs including other components of the 787, as well as structures and components on the 737, 747, 767, 777, C-17, and V-22 through operations located elsewhere.
"Integrating this facility and its talented employees into Boeing will strengthen the 787 program by enabling us to accelerate productivity and efficiency improvements as we move toward production ramp-up," said Scott Carson, president and CEO of Boeing Commercial Airplanes. "In addition, it will bolster our capability to develop and produce large composite structures that will contribute to the advancement of this critical technology."
"We take great pride knowing that we have been able to satisfy the technological and physical demands of the 787 program alongside much larger companies, " said Elmer Doty, president and CEO of Vought Aircraft Industries. "However, the financial demands of this program are clearly growing beyond what a company our size can support. We are pleased that we will continue our 787 involvement at a component manufacturing level, as well as provide on-going technical capabilities that have helped make Charleston a world-class composite facility."
Through the agreement, Boeing will acquire, among other things, the facility, assets and inventory as well as assume operation of the site, and the parties will resolve all matters related to Vought's prior work on the 787 program. The cash consideration to be paid to Vought at closing is approximately $580M. In addition, Boeing will release Vought from its obligations to repay amounts previously advanced by Boeing. Separately, Boeing entered into new agreements with Vought for work packages on the 737, 777 and 787.
This transaction is anticipated to close in the third quarter following satisfaction of customary closing conditions, including consent from Vought's lenders.
Once acquired, the North Charleston facility will be managed by the 787 Program. "We look forward to welcoming the South Carolina team to Boeing and continuing our relationship with Vought to bring the most value to the 787 and our other programs," said Carson.
More Information
Vought Aircraft Industries, Inc. (www.voughtaircraft.com) is one of the world's largest independent suppliers of aerostructures. Headquartered in Dallas, the company designs and manufactures major airframe structures such as wings, fuselage subassemblies, empennages, nacelles and other components for prime manufacturers of aircraft. Vought has annual sales of approximately $1.8 billion and about 6,600 employees.
Boeing is the world's leading aerospace company and the largest manufacturer of commercial jetliners and military aircraft combined. Additionally, Boeing designs and manufactures rotorcraft, electronic and defense systems, missiles, satellites, launch vehicles and advanced information and communication systems. As a major service provider to NASA, Boeing operates the Space Shuttle and International Space Station. The company also provides numerous military and commercial airline support services. Boeing has customers in more than 90 countries around the world and is one of the largest U.S. exporters in terms of sales.
Forward-Looking Information Is Subject to Risk and Uncertainty
Certain statements in this report may be "forward-looking" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," "targets," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions about future events that may not prove to be accurate. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak to events only as of the date they are made and neither Boeing nor Vought undertake any obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise, except as required by federal securities laws. Specific factors that could cause Boeing's and/or Vought's actual results to differ materially from forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, those set forth below and other important factors disclosed previously and from time to time in each company's respective filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission: the failure of conditions precedent to the closing of the transaction or the failure of the transaction to close for any other reason; the failure of the parties to experience the expected benefits of the transaction; the effect of economic conditions in the United States and globally; the impact on accounts receivable, customer financing portfolios and allowance for losses of customer defaults
and changes in customer credit ratings, credit default rates and collateral values; the impact on revenues and operating results of changes to indices included in indexed price escalation clauses included in contracts with commercial airplane and defense customers; the successful execution of Boeing Commercial Airplanes and Integrated Defense Systems backlog; the effects of customers cancelling, modifying and/or rescheduling contractual orders; the timing and effects of any decisions to increase or decrease the rate of commercial airplane production; the timing and effects of decisions to complete or launch a Commercial Airplanes program at Boeing; Boeing's ability to successfully develop and timely produce the 787 and 747-8 aircraft; the ability of suppliers and, as applicable, subcontractors to successfully and timely perform their obligations; the effect of political and legal processes; changing defense priorities; and associated budget reductions by U.S. and international government customers affecting defense programs; relationship with union-represented workforce and the negotiation of collective bargaining agreements; the continuation of long-term trends in passenger and cargo traffic and revenue yields in the airline industry; the impact of volatile fuel prices and the airline industry's response; the effect of declines in aircraft valuation; the impact of airline bankruptcies; the extent to which Boeing and/or Vought are called upon to fund outstanding financing commitments or satisfy other financing requests, and the ability to satisfy those requirements; the continuation of historical costs for fleet support services; the receipt of estimated award and incentive fees on U.S. government contracts; the future demand for commercial satellites and projections of future order flow; the potential for technical or quality issues on development programs, including the Airborne Early Warning and Control program, International KC-767 Tanker, other fixed-price development programs, or commercial satellite programs, to affect schedule and cost estimates, or cause Boeing and/or Vought to incur a material charge or experience a termination for default; the outcome of any litigation and/or government investigation in which either company is a party, and other contingencies; returns on pension fund assets, impacts of future interest rate changes on pension obligations and rising healthcare costs; ability to access external capital resources to fund operations; the amounts and effects of underinsured operations, including satellite launches; and the scope, nature or impact of acquisition or disposition activity and investment in any joint ventures/strategic alliances, including Boeing's Sea Launch and United Launch Alliance, and indemnifications and guarantees related thereto.
Contacts:
Jim Proulx, BCA Communications, 206-850-2102
Russ Young, BCA Communications, 425-246-6661
Lisa Quirindongo, Vought Communications, 203-430-3550
Lynne Warne, Vought Communications, 615-974-6003
More information:
http://www.boeing.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20090722073812.txt.gz
TIME:20090722073812
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
(a) On July 22, 2009, The Boeing Company issued a press release reporting its financial results for the second quarter of 2009. A copy of the Company's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
(a) Not applicable
(b) Not applicable
(c) Not applicable
(d) Exhibits
99.1    Press Release issued by The Boeing Company dated July 22, 2009, reporting Boeing's financial results for the second quarter of 2009, furnished herewith.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
Boeing Reports Second-Quarter Financial Results
 
 
 
 
 
Table 1. Summary Financial Results
 
 The Boeing Company's [NYSE: BA] second-quarter earnings per share increased 22 percent to $1.41 per share, as revenues rose 1 percent to $17.2 billion, driven by growth in defense programs and strong performance in defense and commercial airplanes (Table 1). Year-ago results included a $0.22 per share charge on the Airborne Early Warning & Control (AEW&C) program.
CHICAGO, July 22, 2009
Revenues for the first six months of 2009 rose 2 percent to $33.7 billion. Earnings for the first half declined to $2.27 per share, including a $0.38 first-quarter impact from reductions to future twin-aisle production rates and delivery price escalation forecasts.
Earnings guidance for 2009 remains unchanged between $4.70 and $5.00 per share. The 787 program is currently assessing schedule and financial implications from the previously announced requirement to reinforce an area within the side-of-body joint. The company expects to issue a new 787 schedule during the third quarter, at which time earnings guidance will be reevaluated.
 
"Our continued focus on productivity improvements and disciplined cash management drove solid overall results for the quarter," said Boeing Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer Jim McNerney. "While market and development program execution challenges remain with us, we are doing what's necessary to emerge from the current economic environment as a stronger company that's better positioned to grow and improve its financial performance over time."
Boeing's quarterly operating cash flow was $1.0 billion, which includes continued investment in development programs and lower advances from commercial airplane orders (Table 2). For the first half of 2009, operating cash flow was $1.2 billion. Free cash flow* was $0.7 billion in the quarter and $0.5 billion in the first half.
Table 2. Cash Flow
 
 
 
Total company backlog at quarter-end was $328 billion, down 3 percent in the quarter, as the value of deliveries exceeded net orders during the period.
Cash and investments in marketable securities totaled $5.0 billion at quarter-end, up 6 percent from the end of the first quarter (Table 3). Debt declined modestly due to maturities of Boeing Capital Corporation debt. The company did not acquire any of its shares in the second quarter.
Table 3. Cash, Marketable Securities and Debt Balances
 
 
 
Segment Results
Commercial Airplanes
Boeing Commercial Airplanes (BCA) second-quarter revenues decreased 2 percent to $8.4 billion on slightly lower airplane deliveries and lower volume in services. Operating earnings increased 5 percent and margins rose to 9.7 percent due to lower research and development expense partially offset by the lower services volume (Table 4).
For the first half of 2009, revenues rose to $17.0 billion on increased airplane deliveries, partially offset by lower volume in services. Operating earnings fell by 30 percent to $1.2 billion while margins contracted to 7.3 percent, driven by the first-quarter charge on the 747 program related to pending reduction in twin-aisle production rates and unfavorable delivery price escalation forecasts.
Table 4. Commercial Airplanes Operating Results
 
BCA booked 57 gross orders during the quarter while 52 others were removed from its order book. Contractual backlog was $257 billion, more than seven times BCA's expected 2009 revenues.
The 787 program has identified a technical solution to the previously announced requirement to reinforce an area within the side-of-body joint, and is currently evaluating alternative ways to implement that solution. The company expects to complete its assessment of the schedule and financial implications during the third quarter. Recent milestones include completion of gauntlet and low-speed taxi tests on the first flight test aircraft. The company also recently announced its agreement to acquire Vought's South Carolina facility which supports the 787 program. Included in gross inventory for the company is approximately $7.9 billion of 787 work-in-process inventory, cash advances made to suppliers and tooling costs. The program had new orders for 13 airplanes during the quarter and cancelled orders for 41 others. Total firm orders are now 850 airplanes from 56 customers.
 
Integrated Defense Systems
Boeing Integrated Defense Systems (IDS) second-quarter revenues rose 9 percent to $8.7 billion. Operating margins of 10.1 percent reflect strong performance across all defense segments (Table 5).
For the first half of 2009, IDS revenues increased by 6 percent to $16.4 billion and earnings increased 6 percent, bringing operating margins to 9.7 percent.
Table 5. Integrated Defense Systems Operating Results
 
Boeing Military Aircraft second-quarter revenue rose 3 percent to $3.4 billion and operating margin was 11.7 percent, reflecting higher rotorcraft volume and strong execution across its programs. The year-ago quarter included a charge on the AEW&C program. During the quarter the P-8A had its first flight, the KC-767 tanker achieved initial operational capability in Japan, and the Apache Block III manned aircraft demonstrated control of an unmanned aircraft system. On June 24, the Fiscal Year 2009 Supplemental Defense Spending bill was signed, authorizing funding for an additional eight C-17s for the U.S. Air Force.
Network & Space Systems second-quarter revenues increased 11 percent primarily driven by growth in the Space and Intelligence Systems business. Operating margin was 7.7 percent reflecting strong performance across the segment's array of programs, partially offset by a previously announced $35 million charge related to the Sea Launch bankruptcy filing. During the quarter, key flight milestones were achieved on Directed Energy programs as the Airborne Laser tracking system engaged an accelerating target and the Advanced Tactical Laser fired a high power laser successfully hitting a ground target. Also, the Joint Tactical Radio Station Ground Mobile Radio network demonstrated its scalability in a fielded environment.
 
Global Services & Support (GS&S) revenues increased 17 percent on higher volume across its broad portfolio of services and logistics products. During the quarter, GS&S continued to generate double-digit operating margins of 11.2 percent. In this segment, the company was awarded contracts for unmanned Intelligence Surveillance Reconnaissance services, an armored-vehicle recovery system, and B-52 sustainment, modernization and upgrades.
IDS' backlog is $70.0 billion, more than two times expected 2009 revenues. New orders during the quarter included Chinooks for an international customer, A-10 sustainment and modernization, and multiple support and proprietary contracts.
Boeing Capital Corporation
Boeing Capital Corporation (BCC) reported second-quarter pre-tax earnings of $36 million compared to $45 million in the same period last year due to higher reserves and impairments (Table 6). During the quarter, BCC's portfolio balance rose to $6.3 billion (up from $6.0 billion at the end of the first quarter) on $429 million in new aircraft financings and other volume, partially offset by normal portfolio run-off through customer payments and depreciation. BCC contributed $10 million in cash dividends to the company during the quarter. BCC's debt-to-equity ratio was unchanged at 5.0-to-1.
Table 6. Boeing Capital Corporation Operating Results
 
Additional Information
The "Other" segment consists primarily of Boeing Engineering, Operations and Technology, as well as certain results related to the consolidation of all business units. Other segment expense was $46 million in the second quarter, reduced from $135 million of expense in the same period last year which included $82 million for increased aircraft financing reserves that were recorded at the consolidated level.
Unallocated expense was $154 million, up from $77 million in the same quarter last year driven by higher deferred compensation and share-based plans expenses, partially offset by lower unallocated pension expense.
 
Total pension expense for the quarter was $207 million, as compared to $216 million in the same period last year. A total of $229 million was recognized in the operating segments in the quarter (up from $140 million in the same period last year), partially offset by a $22 million contribution to earnings in unallocated items.
Outlook
The 2009 financial guidance continues to reflect a challenging market environment as well as company plans to reduce discretionary spending and restructure various internal organizations to improve productivity. The company will reevaluate financial guidance upon completion of the 787 schedule assessment, and expects to issue 2010 financial guidance later in the year.
Boeing's 2009 revenue guidance is reaffirmed at $68 billion to $69 billion (Table 7). Earnings-per-share guidance for 2009 remains at $4.70 to $5.00 per share. Operating cash flow is still expected to be greater than $2.5 billion, including discretionary pension contributions of approximately $0.5 billion and an assumption of $1 billion for new commercial airplane financings.
Commercial Airplanes' 2009 delivery guidance remains at between 480 and 485 airplanes and is sold out. BCA's 2009 revenue is unchanged at between $34 billion and $35 billion, and operating margin remains at between 8 percent and 8.5 percent.
IDS guidance for 2009 remains unchanged with revenue between $33 billion and $34 billion and operating margins of approximately 10 percent.
Boeing Capital Corporation continues to expect that the aircraft finance portfolio will increase modestly as the amount of new aircraft financing in 2009 will exceed normal portfolio runoff due to customer payments and depreciation.
Boeing's 2009 R&D forecast is between $3.6 billion and $3.8 billion. 2009 capital expenditures are expected to be approximately $1.4 billion. The company's non-cash pension expense is expected to be approximately $0.9 billion in 2009.
 
Table 7. Financial Outlook
1
(Billions, except per share data)
 
 
 
Non-GAAP Measure Disclosure
Management believes that the non-GAAP (Generally Accepted Accounting Principles) measures (indicated by an asterisk *) used in this report provide investors with important perspectives into the company's ongoing business performance. The company does not intend for the information to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the related GAAP measures. Other companies may define the measures differently. The following definitions are provided:
Free Cash Flow
Free cash flow is defined as GAAP less capital expenditures for . Management believes free cash flow provides investors with an important perspective on the cash available for shareholders, debt repayment, and acquisitions after making the capital investments required to support ongoing business operations and long term value creation. Free cash flow does not represent the residual cash flow available for discretionary expenditures as it excludes certain mandatory expenditures such as repayment of maturing debt. Management uses free cash flow internally to assess both business performance and overall liquidity. Table 2 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and free cash flow.
operating cash flow
property, plant and equipment additions
 
Certain statements in this report may be "forward-looking" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," "targets," "anticipates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions about future events that may not prove to be accurate. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak to events only as of the date they are made and we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise, except as required by federal securities laws. Specific factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, those set forth below and other important factors disclosed previously and from time to time in our other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission: the effect of economic conditions in the United States and globally; the impact on our accounts receivable, customer financing portfolios and allowance for losses of customer defaults and changes in customer credit ratings, credit default rates and collateral values; the impact on our revenues and operating results of changes to indices included in indexed price escalation clauses included in our contracts with commercial airplane and defense customers; the successful execution of our Commercial Airplanes and Integrated Defense Systems backlog; the effects of customers canceling, modifying and/or rescheduling contractual orders; the timing and effects of any decisions to increase or decrease the rate of commercial airplane production; the timing and effects of decisions to complete or launch a Commercial Airplanes program; the ability to successfully develop and timely produce the 787 and 747-8 aircraft; the ability of our suppliers and, as applicable, subcontractors to successfully and timely perform their obligations; the effect on our revenues of political and legal processes; changing defense priorities; and associated budget reductions by U.S. and international government customers affecting Boeing defense programs; our relationship with our union-represented workforce and the negotiation of collective bargaining agreements; the continuation of long-term trends in passenger and cargo traffic and revenue yields in the airline industry; the impact of volatile fuel prices and the airline industry's response; the effect of declines in aircraft valuations; the impact on our revenues or operating results of airline bankruptcies; the availability of commercial and government financing and the extent to which we are called upon to fund outstanding financing commitments or satisfy other financing requests, and our ability to satisfy those requirements; the continuation of historical costs for fleet support services; the receipt of estimated award and incentive fees on U.S. government contracts; the future demand for commercial satellites and projections of future order flow; the potential for technical or quality issues on development programs, including the Airborne Early Warning and Control program, International KC-767 Tanker, other fixed-price development programs, or commercial satellite programs, to affect schedule and cost estimates, or cause us to incur a material charge or experience a termination for default; the outcome of any litigation and/or government investigation in which we are a party, and other contingencies; returns on pension fund assets, impacts of future interest rate changes on pension obligations and rising healthcare costs; our ability to access external capital resources to fund our operations; the amounts and effects of underinsured operations, including satellite launches; our ability to recover the proportionate amounts owed to us from the other Sea Launch partners; and the scope, nature or impact of acquisition or disposition activity and investment in any joint ventures/strategic alliances, including Sea Launch and United Launch Alliance, and indemnifications and guarantees related thereto.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20090728114028.txt.gz
TIME:20090728114028
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On July 28, 2009, The Boeing Company (the "Company") issued $750,000,000 in aggregate principal amount of 3.500% Senior Notes due 2015 (the "2015 Notes"), $750,000,000 in aggregate principal amount of 4.875% Senior Notes due 2020 (the "2020 Notes") and $450,000,000 in aggregate principal amount of 5.875% Senior Notes due 2040 (the "2040 Notes" and, together with the 2015 Notes and the 2020 Notes, the "Notes"). The Notes were issued pursuant to an Indenture dated as of February 1, 2003, between the Company and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as successor trustee to JPMorgan Chase Bank.
On July 23, 2009, the Company entered into a Purchase Agreement (the "Purchase Agreement") with Banc of America Securities LLC, Deutsche Bank Securities Inc. and Morgan Stanley & Co. Incorporated, as representatives of the several purchasers named therein (the "Purchasers"), pursuant to which the Company agreed to issue and sell the Notes to the Purchasers.
The Notes are unsecured and have the same rank as all of The Boeing Company's other unsecured and unsubordinated debt. The 2015 Notes will mature on February 15, 2015, the 2020 Notes will mature on February 15, 2020 and the 2040 Notes will mature on February 15, 2040. The Company will pay interest on the Notes semiannually on February 15 and August 15 of each year starting on February 15, 2010. The Company will have the right to redeem the Notes in whole or in part at any time prior to maturity at the redemption price described in the Final Prospectus Supplement filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on July 24, 2009 (Registration No. 333-157790) (the "Final Prospectus Supplement").
The Company has filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission a Prospectus dated March 9, 2009 (Registration No. 333-157790), a Preliminary Prospectus Supplement dated July 23, 2009, a Free Writing Prospectus dated July 23, 2009 and the Final Prospectus Supplement in connection with the public offering of the Notes.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 1.1
July 23, 2009
The Boeing Company
100 North Riverside
Chicago, Illinois 60606
Ladies and Gentlemen:
Referring to the Unsecured Debt Securities of The Boeing Company (the "Company") covered by the registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration No. 333-157790) (such registration statement, including (i) the prospectus included therein (the "Base Prospectus"), and (ii) all documents filed as part thereof or incorporated by reference therein including the information, if any, deemed pursuant to Rule 430A, 430B or 430C under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Securities Act") to be part of the registration statement at the time of its effectiveness, and at each deemed effective date with respect to the Purchasers (as defined below) pursuant to Rule 430B(f)(2) of the Securities Act, are hereinafter collectively called the "Registration Statement"). The Base Prospectus (i) as supplemented by the prospectus supplement dated July 23, 2009 specifically relating to the Purchased Notes (as defined below) in the form first filed under Rule 424(b) under the Securities Act (or in the form first made available to the Purchasers (as defined below) by the Company to meet the requests of purchasers pursuant to Rule 173 under the Securities Act) and (ii) all documents filed as part thereof or incorporated or deemed to be incorporated by reference therein are hereinafter collectively called the "Prospectus," and the preliminary form of the Prospectus is hereinafter called the "Preliminary Prospectus". For purposes of this Agreement, "free writing prospectus" has the meaning set forth in Rule 405 under the Securities Act and "Time of Sale Prospectus" means the Preliminary Prospectus together with each free writing prospectus, if any, identified in Schedule B hereto. "Time of Sale" means 4:15 pm (Eastern time) on the date of this Agreement. Any reference to "amend", "amendment" or "supplement" with respect to the Registration Statement, any Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus shall be deemed to refer to and include any documents filed after such date under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder (collectively, the "Exchange Act") that are deemed to be incorporated by reference therein.
 
On the basis of the representations, warranties and agreements contained in this Agreement, but subject to the terms and conditions herein set forth, the purchaser or purchasers named in Schedule A hereto (the "Purchasers") agree to purchase, severally, and the Company agrees to sell to the Purchasers, severally, the respective principal amounts of the Company's 3.500% Senior Notes due 2015 (the "2015 Notes"), 4.875% Senior Notes due 2020 (the "2020 Notes") and 5.875% Senior Notes due 2040 (the "2040 Notes" and, together with the 2015 Notes and the 2020 Notes, the "Purchased Notes") set forth opposite the name of each Purchaser on Schedule A hereto. The Purchased Notes will have the terms as set forth in the Pricing Term Sheet on Schedule B.
The price at which the Purchased Notes shall be purchased from the Company by the Purchasers shall be 98.807% of the principal amount of the 2015 Notes, 98.508% of the principal amount of the 2020 Notes and 96.805% of the principal amount of the 2040 Notes, plus, in each case, accrued interest, if any, from July 28, 2009, to the date of delivery. The initial public offering price shall be 99.157% of the principal amount of the 2015 Notes, 98.958% of the principal amount of the 2020 Notes and 97.680% of the principal amount of the 2040 Notes, plus, in each case, accrued interest, if any, from July 28, 2009 to the date of delivery. The Purchased Notes will be offered by the Purchasers as set forth in the Prospectus Supplement relating to such Purchased Notes.
The Company understands that the Purchasers intend to make a public offering of the Purchased Notes as soon after the effectiveness of this Agreement as in the judgment of the Purchasers is advisable, and initially to offer the Purchased Notes on the terms set forth in the Time of Sale Prospectus. The Company acknowledges and agrees that the Purchasers may offer and sell Purchased Notes to or through any affiliate of a Purchaser and that any such affiliate may offer and sell Purchased Notes purchased by it to or through any Purchaser.
If we are acting as Representative(s) for the several Purchasers named in Schedule A hereto, we represent that we are authorized to act for such several Purchasers in connection with the transactions contemplated in this Agreement, and that, if there are more than one of us, any action under this Agreement taken by any of us will be binding upon all the Purchasers.
All of the provisions contained in the document entitled "The Boeing Company Standard Purchase Provisions", a copy of which is attached hereto, are hereby incorporated by reference in their entirety and shall be deemed to be a part of this Agreement to the same extent as if such provisions had been set forth in full herein, except that references in Section 10 of "The Boeing Company Standard Purchase Provisions" with respect to this Agreement only, are references to the 2015 Notes, the 2020 Notes, and 2040 Notes separately and Section 10 shall apply to each such series separately and not to all such series together.
In relation to each Member State of the European Economic Area which has implemented the Prospectus Directive (each, a "Relevant Member State"), each Purchaser hereby represents that it has not made and will not make an offer of the Notes to the public in that Relevant Member State, except that it may make an offer of the Notes to the public in that Relevant
 
Member State at any time under the following exemptions under the Prospectus Directive (as defined below), if they have been implemented in that Relevant Member State: (a) to legal entities which are authorized or regulated to operate in the financial markets or, if not so authorized or regulated, whose corporate purpose is solely to invest in securities; (b) to any legal entity which has two or more of (1) an average of at least 250 employees during the last financial year; (2) a total balance sheet of more than 43,000,000 and (3) an annual net turnover of more than 50,000,000, as shown in its last annual or consolidated accounts; (c) to fewer than 100 natural or legal persons (other than qualified investors as defined in the Prospectus Directive); or (d) in any other circumstances falling within Article 3(2) of the Prospectus Directive, provided that no such offer of Notes shall result in a requirement for the publication by the Company or any underwriter of a prospectus pursuant to Article 3 of the Prospectus Directive. For purposes of this section, the expression an "offer of the Notes to the public" in relation to any Notes in any Relevant Member State means the communication in any form and by any means of sufficient information on the terms of the offer and the Notes to be offered so as to enable an investor to decide to purchase or subscribe to purchase the Notes, as the same may be varied in the Relevant Member State by any measure implementing the Prospectus Directive in that Relevant Member State, and the expression Prospectus Directive means Directive 2003/71/EC and includes any relevant implementing measure in each Relevant Member State.
Each Purchaser hereby represents that, in connection with the distribution of the Notes, it has only communicated or caused to be communicated and will only communicate or cause to be communicated any invitation or inducement to engage in investment activity (within the meaning of Section 21 of the Financial Services and Markets Act 2000 ("FSMA") of the United Kingdom) received by it in connection with the issue or sale of the Notes or any investments representing the Notes in circumstances in which Section 21(1) of the FSMA does not apply to the Company and that it has complied and will comply with all applicable provisions of the FSMA with respect to anything done by it in relation to the Notes in, from or otherwise involving the United Kingdom.
Each Purchaser that is not a U.S. registered broker-dealer, represents that if it sells Notes in the United States it will do so through one or more U.S. registered broker-dealers as permitted by the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority regulations.
Each Purchaser hereby agrees that it will not offer, sell or deliver any of the Notes in any jurisdiction outside the United States except under circumstances that will result in compliance with the applicable laws thereof, and that it will take at its own expense whatever action is required to permit its resale of the Notes in such jurisdictions. Each Purchaser understands that no action has been taken to permit a public offering in any jurisdiction outside the United States where action would be required for such purpose. Each Purchaser agrees not to cause any advertisement of the Notes to be published in any newspaper or periodical or posted in any public place and not to issue any circular relating to the Notes, except in any such case with the prior express written consent of the Company and of the Representatives and then only at its own risk and expense.
 
The "Closing Date" shall be:    July 28, 2009
 
Notices to the Purchasers shall be sent to the following address(es) or telecopier number(s):
Banc of America Securities LLC
One Bryant Park
NY1-100-18-03
New York, New York 10036
Attention: High Grade Transaction Management/Legal
Facsimile: 646-855-5958
Deutsche Bank Securities Inc.
60 Wall Street
New York, New York 10005
Attention: Debt Capital Markets - Syndicate Desk
Facsimile: 212-797-2202
Morgan Stanley & Co. Incorporated
1585 Broadway, 29th Floor
New York, New York 10036
Attention: Investment Banking Division
Facsimile: 212-507-8999
 
 
If the foregoing is in accordance with your understanding of our agreement, kindly sign and return to us the enclosed duplicate hereof, whereupon it will become a binding agreement between the Company and the several Purchasers in accordance with its terms.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Filed Pursuant to Rule 433 under the Securities Act of 1933
Registration Statement No. 333-157790
Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, dated July 23, 2009
 
 
Notes:
The issuer has filed a registration statement (including a prospectus) with the SEC for the offering to which this communication relates. Before you invest, you should read the prospectus in that registration statement and other documents the issuer has filed with the SEC for more complete information about the issuer and this offering. You may get these documents for free by visiting EDGAR on the SEC Web site at www.sec.gov. Alternatively, the issuer, any underwriter or any dealer participating in the offering will arrange to send you the prospectus if you request it by calling Banc of America Securities LLC toll-free at 1-800-294-1322, Deutsche Bank Securities Inc. toll-free at 1-800-503-4611 or Morgan Stanley & Co. Incorporated toll-free at 1-866-718-1649.
 
From time to time, The Boeing Company, a Delaware corporation ("Company"), may enter into purchase agreements that provide for the sale of designated securities to the purchaser or purchasers named therein. The standard provisions set forth herein may be incorporated by reference in any such purchase agreement ("Purchase Agreement"). The Purchase Agreement, including the provisions incorporated therein by reference, is herein sometimes referred to as "this Agreement." Unless otherwise defined herein, terms defined in the Purchase Agreement are used herein as therein defined.
1. . The Company proposes to issue and sell from time to time its Unsecured Debt Securities ("Notes") registered under the registration statement referred to in Section 2(a). The Notes will be issued under an Indenture, dated as of February 1, 2003, between the Company and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as successor to JPMorgan Chase Bank, as Trustee, as may be supplemented from time to time, (the "Indenture"). The Notes will be sold to the Purchasers (as defined below) for resale in accordance with the terms of the offering determined at the time of the sale. The Notes involved in any such offering are hereinafter referred to as the "Purchased Notes," and the firm or firms, as the case may be, which agree to purchase the same are hereinafter referred to as the "Purchasers" of such Purchased Notes. The terms "you" and "your" refer to those Purchasers who sign the Purchase Agreement either on behalf of themselves only or on behalf of themselves and as representatives of the several Purchasers named in Schedule A thereto, as the case may be.
Introductory
2. . The Company represents and warrants to and agrees with each Purchaser that:
Representations and Warranties of the Company
(a) A Registration Statement (as defined in the Purchase Agreement) covering an indeterminate amount of the securities of the Company (including the Purchased Notes), including a prospectus has been filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission ("Commission") and has become effective under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Securities Act"); no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement is in effect, and no proceedings for such purpose are pending before or threatened by the Commission. The Company is a well known seasoned issuer (as defined in Rule 405 under the Securities Act) eligible to use the Registration Statement as an automatic shelf registration statement and the Company has not received notice that the Commission objects to the use of the Registration Statement as an automatic shelf registration statement. The terms Registration Statement, Time of Sale Prospectus and Prospectus shall have the meanings ascribed to them in the Purchase Agreement.
(b) The Company is not an "ineligible issuer" in connection with the offering pursuant to Rules 164, 405 and 433 under the Securities Act. Any free writing prospectus that the Company is required to file pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Securities Act has been, or will be, filed with the Commission in accordance with the requirements of the Securities Act and the applicable rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder (the "Securities Act Rules and Regulations"). Each free writing prospectus that the Company has filed, or is required to file, pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Securities Act or that was prepared by or on behalf of or used or referred to by the Company complies or will comply in all material respects with the requirements of the Securities Act and the applicable rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder. Except for the free writing prospectuses, if any, identified in Schedule B to the Purchase Agreement, the Company has not prepared, used or referred to, and will not, without your prior consent, prepare, use or refer to, any free writing prospectus.
 
(c) The Registration Statement conforms in all respects to the requirements of the Securities Act and the Securities Act Rules and Regulations and does not include any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, except that the foregoing does not apply to statements or omissions in such document based upon written information furnished to the Company by any Purchaser specifically for use therein. At the Time of Sale, the Time of Sale Prospectus did not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, except that the foregoing does not apply to statements or omissions in such document based upon written information furnished to the Company by any Purchaser specifically for use therein. The Prospectus does not contain and, as amended or supplemented, if applicable, will not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, except that the foregoing does not apply to statements or omissions in such document based upon written information furnished to the Company by any Purchaser specifically for use therein. The documents incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus pursuant to Item 12 of Form S-3 of the Securities Act, at the time they were filed with the Commission, complied in all material respects with the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and the pertinent published rules and regulations thereunder (the "Exchange Act Rules and Regulations"). Any additional documents deemed to be incorporated by reference in the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus, will, when they are filed with the Commission, comply in all material respects with the requirements of the Exchange Act and the Exchange Act Rules and Regulations and will not contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
(d) The Company has been duly incorporated and is an existing corporation in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware, with power and corporate authority to own its properties and conduct its business as described in the Registration Statement, Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus; and the Company is duly qualified to do business as a foreign corporation in good standing in all other jurisdictions in which its ownership or lease of property or the conduct of its business requires such qualification except where failure to so qualify would not individually or in the aggregate have a material adverse effect on the financial condition, business, properties or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole or on the Company's ability to perform its obligations under the Offered Securities and the Indenture in any material respect (a "Material Adverse Effect").
(e) Each "significant subsidiary" (as such term is defined in Rule 1-02 of Regulation S-X) of the Company (each a "Material Subsidiary" and together the "Material Subsidiaries") has been duly incorporated and is an existing corporation or other entity in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its incorporation or organization, with power and authority to own its properties and conduct its business as described in the Registration Statement, Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus; and each Material Subsidiary of the Company is duly qualified to do business as a foreign corporation or other entity in good standing in all other jurisdictions in which its ownership or lease of property or the conduct of its business requires such qualification except where failure to so qualify would not have a Material Adverse Effect; all of the issued and outstanding capital stock or ownership interests of each Material Subsidiary of the Company has been duly authorized and validly issued and is fully paid and nonassessable; and the capital stock or ownership interests of each Material Subsidiary owned by the Company, directly or through subsidiaries, is owned free from liens and encumbrances except for such liens or encumbrances that would not have a Material Adverse Effect.
 
(f) This Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company.
(g) The Indenture has been duly authorized by the Company and duly qualified under the Trust Indenture Act 1939, as amended (the "Trust Indenture Act"), will have been duly executed and delivered by the Company and constitutes a valid and binding agreement of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with its terms, except as the enforcement thereof may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency (including, without limitation, all laws relating to fraudulent transfers), reorganization, moratorium or similar laws affecting enforcement of creditors' rights generally and except as enforcement thereof is subject to general principles of equity (regardless of whether enforcement is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law).
(h) The Purchased Notes have been duly authorized and, at on the Closing Date (as defined in the Purchase Agreement), will have been duly executed by the Company and, when authenticated, issued and delivered in the manner provided for in the Indenture and delivered against payment of the purchase price therefor as provided in this Agreement, will constitute valid and binding obligations of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with their terms, except as the enforcement thereof may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency (including, without limitation, all laws relating to fraudulent transfers), reorganization, moratorium or similar laws affecting enforcement of creditors' rights generally and except as enforcement thereof is subject to general principles of equity (regardless of whether enforcement is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law), and will be in the form contemplated by, and entitled to the benefits of, the Indenture.
(i) The Purchased Notes and the Indenture will conform in all material respects to the respective statements relating thereto contained in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus and will be in substantially the respective forms filed or incorporated by reference, as the case may be, as exhibits to the Registration Statement.
(j) No consent, approval, authorization, or order of, or filing with, any governmental agency or body or any court is required for the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement in connection with the issuance and sale of the Purchased Notes by the Company, except such as have been obtained and made under the Securities Act and the Trust Indenture Act and such as may be required under state securities laws.
(k) The execution, delivery and performance of the Indenture and this Agreement, and the issuance and sale of the Purchased Notes and compliance with the terms and provisions thereof have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate action and do not and will not result in a breach or violation of any of the terms and provisions of, or constitute a default under, or result in the creation or imposition of any lien, charge or encumbrance upon any property, or assets of the Company or any Material Subsidiary under (i) any statute, any rule, regulation or order of any governmental agency or body or any court, domestic or foreign, having jurisdiction over the Company or any Material Subsidiary of the Company (provided however that enforcement of rights to indemnity and contribution in this Agreement may be limited by federal or state securities laws or principles of public policy), or any of their properties, (ii) any material agreement or instrument to which the Company or any such Material Subsidiary is a party or by which
 
the Company or any such Material Subsidiary is bound or to which any of the properties of the Company or any such Material Subsidiary is subject, or (iii) the charter or by-laws of the Company or any such Material Subsidiary except in the case of (i) and (ii) where such breach or violation or default would not have a Material Adverse Effect.
(l) Except as disclosed in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus, the Company and its Material Subsidiaries have good and marketable title to all real properties and good title to all other properties and assets owned by them that are material to the business of the Company and its subsidiaries consolidated as a single enterprise, in each case free from liens, encumbrances and defects that would materially affect the value thereof or materially interfere with the use made or to be made thereof by them; and except as disclosed in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus, the Company and its Material Subsidiaries hold any leased real or personal property under valid and enforceable leases with such exceptions that are not material to the business of the Company and its subsidiaries consolidated as a single enterprise and that would not materially interfere with the use made or to be made thereof by them.
(m) Neither the Company nor any of its Material Subsidiaries is (i) in violation of its charter or bylaws or (ii) in default in the performance or observance of any obligation, agreement, covenant or condition contained in any contract, indenture, mortgage, loan agreement, note, lease or other instrument to which it is a party or by which it or any of them or their properties may be bound or to which any of their properties may be subject, except in the case of (ii) where such default would not have a Material Adverse Effect.
(n) Except as disclosed in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus, the Company and its Material Subsidiaries possess adequate certificates, authorities, licenses, permits, orders or approvals issued by appropriate governmental agencies or bodies necessary to conduct the business now operated by them, including, without limitation, from the Federal Aviation Administration, except where the failure to do so would not have a Material Adverse Effect, and have not received any notice of proceedings relating to the revocation or modification of any such certificate, authority or permit that, if determined adversely to the Company or any of its Material Subsidiaries, would have a Material Adverse Effect.
(o) Except as disclosed in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus, no strike, lockout, or work stoppage involving the employees of the Company or any Material Subsidiary exists or, to the knowledge of the Company, is imminent that might have a Material Adverse Effect.
(p) Except as disclosed in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus, neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries is in violation of any statute, any rule, regulation, decision or order of any governmental agency or body or any court, domestic or foreign, relating to the use, disposal or release of hazardous or toxic substances or relating to the protection or restoration of the environment or human exposure to hazardous or toxic substances (collectively, "environmental laws"), owns or operates any real property contaminated with any substance that is subject to any environmental laws, is liable for any off-site disposal or contamination pursuant to any environmental laws, or is subject to any claim relating to any environmental laws, which violation, contamination, liability or claim would individually or in the aggregate have a Material Adverse Effect; and the Company is not aware of any pending investigation which might lead to such a claim.
(q) Except as disclosed in the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus, there are no pending actions, suits or proceedings against or affecting the Company, any of its subsidiaries or any of their respective officers, in their capacity as such, or any of their
 
respective properties that, if determined adversely to the Company or any of its subsidiaries, would individually or in the aggregate have a Material Adverse Effect, or would materially and adversely affect the ability of the Company to perform its obligations under the Indenture, this Agreement, or the Purchased Notes or which are otherwise material in the context of the sale of the Purchased Notes; and no such actions, suits or proceedings are, to the Company's knowledge, threatened or, contemplated.
(r) The financial statements included in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus present fairly in all material respects the financial position of the Company and its consolidated subsidiaries as of the dates shown and their results of operations and cash flows for the periods shown (subject, in the case of unaudited statements, to normal year-end audit adjustments), and such financial statements have been prepared in conformity with the generally accepted accounting principles in the United States applied on a consistent basis (except as otherwise noted therein) and the schedules included in the Registration Statement present fairly in all material respects the information required to be stated therein.
(s) Except as disclosed in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus, since the date of the latest audited financial statements included in the Prospectus there has been no material adverse change, nor any development or event reasonably likely to involve a prospective material adverse change, in the financial condition, business, properties or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole.
(t) The Company is not and, after giving effect to the offering and sale of the Purchased Notes and the application of the proceeds thereof as described in the Prospectus, will not be required to register under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended.
(u) To the Company's knowledge, after due inquiry, the accountants who certified the financial statements and supporting schedules included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement and Prospectus are an independent registered public accounting firm as required by the Securities Act and the Exchange Act.
(v) The capitalization of the Company has not materially changed since the date of the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus.
(w) Neither the Company nor any subsidiary has taken or will take, directly or indirectly, any action designed to, or that might be reasonably expected to, cause or result in stabilization or manipulation of the price of the Purchased Notes.
(x) The Company maintains a system of "disclosure controls and procedures" (as defined in Rule 13a-15(e) of the Exchange Act) that is designed to ensure that information required to be disclosed by the Company in reports that it files or submits under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the time periods specified in the Commission's rules and forms, including controls and procedures designed to ensure that such information is accumulated and communicated to the Company's management as appropriate to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure. The Company has carried out evaluations of the effectiveness of their disclosure controls and procedures as of December 31, 2008 as required by Rule 13a-15 of the Exchange Act.
(y) The Company maintains a system of "internal control over financial reporting" (as defined in Rule 13a-15(f) of the Exchange Act) that complies with the requirements of the Exchange Act and has been designed by, or under the supervision of, its principal executive and principal financial officers, or persons performing similar functions, to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of
 
financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, including, but not limited to policies and procedures that: (i) pertain to the maintenance of records that in reasonable detail accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of the Company; (ii) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the Company are being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the Company; and (iii) provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use or disposition of the Company's assets that could have a material effect on the financial statements. Except as disclosed in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus, there are no material weaknesses in the Company's internal controls.
Any certificate signed by any officer of the Company or any subsidiary and delivered to the Purchasers or to counsel for the Purchasers shall be deemed a representation and warranty by the Company and not the officer in its individual capacity to the Purchasers as to the matters covered thereby.
3. . The Company will deliver the Purchased Notes to you for the accounts of the Purchasers at the offices of the Trustee (at the place specified in the Purchase Agreement) against payment of the purchase price by wire transfer to an account specified by the Company or by certified or official bank check or checks in same day or New York or Chicago Clearing House funds drawn to the order of the Company, at the office of the Company, 100 North Riverside, Chicago, Illinois, 60606, at the time set forth in this Agreement or at such other time not later than seven full business days thereafter as you and the Company determine, such time being herein referred to as the "Closing Date." The Purchased Notes to be delivered will be in definitive fully registered form registered in such denominations, of $1,000 or multiples thereof, and in such names as you request in writing not later than 3:00 p.m., New York Time, on the second full business day prior to the Closing Date, or, if no such request is received, in the names of the respective Purchasers in the amounts agreed to be purchased by them pursuant to this Agreement. The Company shall make the Purchased Notes available for checking and packaging at the offices of the Trustee (at the place specified in the Purchase Agreement) prior to the Closing Date and, unless prevented from doing so by circumstances beyond its control, not later than 2:00 p.m., New York Time, on the business day next preceding the Closing Date. If you request that any Purchased Notes be issued in a name or names other than that of the Purchaser agreeing to purchase such Purchased Notes hereunder, the Company shall not be obligated to pay any transfer taxes resulting therefrom. The Notes may also be represented by a permanent global Note or Notes, registered in the name of The Depository Trust Company, as depositary (the "Depositary"), or a nominee of the Depositary (each such Note represented by a permanent global Note being referred to herein as a "Book-Entry Note"). Beneficial interests in Book-Entry Notes will only be evidenced by, and transfers thereof will only be effected through, records maintained by the Depositary's participants.
Delivery and Payment
4. . The several Purchasers propose to offer the Purchased Notes for sale to the public as set forth in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus.
Offering by the Purchasers
5. . The Company covenants and agrees with the several Purchasers that:
Covenants of the Company
(a) It will promptly cause the Preliminary Prospectus and the Prospectus to be filed with the Commission as required by Rule 424.
 
(b) It will furnish to each Purchaser a copy of each proposed free writing prospectus to be prepared by or on behalf of, used by, or referred to by the Company and not to use or refer to any proposed free writing prospectus to which the Purchasers reasonably object.
(c) It will not take any action that would result in a Purchaser or the Company being required to file with the Commission pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Securities Act a free writing prospectus prepared by or on behalf of a Purchaser that otherwise would not have been required to be filed thereunder.
(d) For as long as a prospectus relating to the Purchased Notes is required to be delivered under the Securities Act, if any event relating to or affecting the Company or of which the Company shall be advised in writing by the Purchasers shall occur which, which in the opinion of the Company or your counsel, should be set forth in a supplement or amendment to the Time of Sale Prospectus in order either to make the Time of Sale Prospectus comply with the requirements of the Securities Act or which would require the making of any change in the Time of Sale Prospectus so that as thereafter delivered to purchasers such Time of Sale Prospectus will not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, the Company will promptly amend or supplement the Time of Sale Prospectus by either (i) preparing and filing with the Commission supplement(s) or amendment(s) to the Time of Sale Prospectus, or (ii) making an appropriate filing pursuant to the Exchange Act, which will supplement or amend the Time of Sale Prospectus so that, as supplemented or amended, the Time of Sale Prospectus when the Time of Sale Prospectus is delivered to a purchaser will comply with the Securities Act and will not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. Prior to the Closing Date, the Company will not file any amendment or supplement without first providing the Purchasers with such amendment or supplement and having obtained the Purchasers' consent to the filing, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld.
(e) The Company will make generally available to its security holders as soon as practicable, but in any event not later than eighteen months after the effective date of the Registration Statement (as defined in Rule 158(c) under the Securities Act), an earnings statement of the Company and its subsidiaries (which need not be audited) complying with Section 11(a) of the Securities Act and the Securities Act Rules and Regulations (including at the option of the Company Rule 158).
(f) The Company will furnish to you copies of the following documents, in each case as soon as available after filing and in such quantities as you reasonably request (i) the Registration Statement relating to the Notes as originally filed and all post-effective amendments thereto (at least one of which will be signed and will include all exhibits except those incorporated by reference to previous filings with the Commission); (ii) each prospectus relating to the Purchased Notes; and (iii) during the time when a prospectus relating to the Purchased Notes is required to be delivered under the Securities Act, all post-effective amendments and supplements to the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus, respectively (except supplements relating to securities that are not Purchased Notes).
(g) During the period of one year after the Closing Date, the Company will furnish to you, and upon request, to each of the other Purchasers (unless such reports are available electronically on the Commission's website or the Company's website): (i) as soon as practicable after the end of each fiscal year, a copy of its annual report to
 
shareholders for such year, and (ii) as soon as available, a copy of each report or definitive proxy statement of the Company filed with the Commission under the Exchange Act or mailed to shareholders.
(h) Whether or not any sale of the Purchased Notes is consummated, the Company will pay and bear all costs and expenses incident to the performance of its obligations under this Agreement, including (a) the preparation, printing and filing of the Registration Statement (including financial statements and exhibits) as originally filed and of each amendment thereto, (b) the preparation, and distribution of the Purchased Notes and the Indenture, (c) the delivery of the certificates for the Purchased Notes to the Purchasers, (d) the fees and disbursements of the Company's counsel and accountants, (e) the delivery to the Purchasers of copies of the Registration Statement as originally filed and the printing and delivery of each amendment thereto, of each preliminary prospectus and of the Prospectus and any amendments or supplements thereto, (f) any fees charged by rating agencies for rating the Purchased Notes, and (g) the fees and expenses of the Trustee and any paying agent (including reasonable fees and expenses of any counsel to such parties).
If this Agreement is terminated by the Purchasers in accordance with the provisions of Section 7, the Company shall reimburse the Purchasers for all of their reasonable out-of-pocket expenses, including the reasonable fees and disbursements of counsel for the Purchasers.
(i) The Company will not offer or sell any of its other debt securities which are substantially similar to the Purchased Notes prior to ten days after the Closing Date, without the consent of the Purchasers.
(j) The Company will prepare a final term sheet relating to the offering of the Purchased Notes, containing only information that describes the final terms of the Purchased Notes or the offering in a form consented to by the Purchasers, and to file such final term sheet within the period required by Rule 433(d)(5)(ii) under the Securities Act following the date the final terms have been established for the offering of the Purchased Notes.
(k) The Company will advise the Representative promptly, and confirm such advice in writing, (i) when any amendment to the Registration Statement has been filed or becomes effective prior to the Closing Date; (ii) when any supplement to the Prospectus or any amendment to the Prospectus or any free writing prospectus has been filed prior to the Closing Date; (iii) of any request by the Commission for any amendment to the Registration Statement or any amendment or supplement to the Prospectus or the receipt of any comments from the Commission relating to the Registration Statement or any other request by the Commission for any additional information prior to the Closing Date; (iv) of the issuance by the Commission of any order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or preventing or suspending the use of any Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus or the initiation or threatening of any proceeding for that purpose or pursuant to Section 8A of the Securities Act; (v) of the occurrence of any event during the period that a prospectus is required to be delivered as a result of which the Prospectus, the Time of Sale Prospectus or any free writing prospectus as then amended or supplemented would include any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances existing when the Prospectus, the Time of Sale Prospectus or any such free writing prospectus is delivered to a purchaser, not misleading; (vi) of the receipt by the Company of any notice of objection of the Commission to the use of the
 
Registration Statement or any post-effective amendment thereto pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) under the Securities Act; and (vii) of the receipt by the Company of any notice with respect to any suspension of the qualification of the Purchased Notes for offer and sale in any jurisdiction or the initiation or threatening of any proceeding for such purpose; and the Company will use its reasonable best efforts to prevent the issuance of any such order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement, preventing or suspending the use of any Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus or suspending any such qualification of the Purchased Notes and, if any such order is issued, will obtain as soon as possible the withdrawal thereof.
(l) The Company will qualify the Purchased Notes for offering and sale under the applicable securities laws of such states and other jurisdictions as you may reasonably designate in consultation with the Company and to maintain such qualifications in effect for a period of not less than a year from the date of the Prospectus; , , that the Company shall not be obligated to file any general consent to service of process or to qualify as a foreign corporation or as a dealer in securities in any jurisdiction in which it is not so qualified or to subject itself to taxation in respect of doing business in any jurisdiction in which it is not otherwise so subject. The Company will file such statements and reports as may be required by the laws of each jurisdiction in which the Securities have been qualified as above provided. The Company will also supply you with such information as is necessary for the determination of the legality of the Purchased Notes for investment under the laws of such jurisdictions as you may request.
provided
however
(m) The Company will use its reasonable best efforts in cooperation with you to permit the Purchased Notes offered and sold in transactions by you to be eligible for clearance and settlement through The Depository Trust Company.
(n) The Company will apply the net proceeds received by it from the sale of the Purchased Notes in the manner specified in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus under the heading "Use of Proceeds."
6. . Each Purchaser severally covenants with the Company not to take any action that would result in the Company being required to file with the Commission under Rule 433(d) a free writing prospectus prepared by or on behalf of such Purchaser that otherwise would not be required to be filed by the Company thereunder, but the for the action of the Purchaser.
Covenants of the Purchasers
7. . The obligations of the several Purchasers to purchase and pay for the Purchased Notes will be subject to the accuracy of the representations and warranties on the part of the Company herein, to the accuracy of the statements of Company officers made pursuant to the provisions hereof, to the performance by the Company of its obligations hereunder and to the following additional conditions precedent:
Conditions of the Obligations of the Purchasers
(a) On the date of execution of the Purchase Agreement and on the Closing Date, you shall have received from Deloitte & Touche LLP, independent registered public accounting firm with respect to the Company within the meaning of the Securities Act and the Securities Act Rules and Regulations, a letter, dated such a date, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to you containing statements and information of the type customarily included in accountants' "comfort letters" to underwriters with respect to the financial statements and certain financial information contained or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus; provided that the letter delivered on the Closing Date shall use a "cut-off" date no more than three business days prior to the Closing Date.
 
(b) The Registration Statement shall remain effective and at the Closing Date, no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement shall have been issued, no proceedings for such purpose shall have been instituted or, to the knowledge of the Company or you, shall be contemplated by the Commission and the Company has not received a notice of objection to the use of the Registration Statement as an automatic shelf registration statement. The Prospectus and each issuer "free writing prospectus" shall have been timely filed with the Commission under the Securities Act, as required; and all requests by the Commission for additional information shall have been complied with to the reasonable satisfaction of the Purchasers.
(c) Subsequent to the date of this Agreement, there shall not have occurred (A) any change or any development involving a prospective change not contemplated by the Time of Sale Prospectus as of the date of this Agreement in or affecting particularly the business or properties of the Company which, in the judgment of a majority in interest of the Purchasers including you, materially impairs the investment quality of the Purchased Notes, and (B) any downgrading in the rating of the Purchased Notes or any other debt securities or preferred stock of or guaranteed by the Company or any of its subsidiaries by any "nationally recognized statistical rating organization" (as defined for purposes of Rule 436(g) under the 1933 Act) or any public announcement that any such organization has under surveillance or review its rating of the Purchased Notes or any other debt securities or preferred stock of or guaranteed by the Company or any of its subsidiaries (other than an announcement with positive implications of a possible upgrading, and no implication of a possible downgrading, of such rating) or any announcement that the Company has been placed on negative outlook.
(d) You shall have received an opinion, dated the Closing Date, of a counsel for the Company, to the effect that:
(i) The Company has been duly incorporated or formed, and is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware;
(ii) The Indenture has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company and is a valid instrument, legally binding on the Company and enforceable in accordance with its terms, except as limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, or other laws affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights and by general principles of equity;
(iii) The issuance and sale of the Purchased Notes have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate action of the Company. The Purchased Notes (assuming that they have been duly authenticated by the Trustee or a duly designated Authentication Agent under the Indenture, which fact counsel need not verify by an inspection of the Purchased Notes) have been duly issued and constitute legal, valid, and binding obligations of the Company enforceable in accordance with their terms, and are entitled to the benefits provided by the Indenture except as such enforceability or entitlement may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, or other laws affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights and by general principles of equity;
(iv) The execution and delivery of the Purchase Agreement, the Indenture, and the Purchased Notes, the issuance and sale of the Notes to you in accordance with the Purchase Agreement do not (i) constitute a violation by the Company of any applicable provision of U.S federal laws or the laws of the State of New York (except that no opinion in this paragraph is being given as to compliance with any disclosure requirement or any prohibition against fraud or misrepresentation or as to whether performance of the indemnification or contribution provisions in the Purchase Agreement would be permitted);
 
(v) The Registration Statement is effective under the Securities Act and, (a) to the best of such counsel's knowledge, no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement has been issued, and no proceedings for such purpose have been instituted or are pending under the Securities Act; and (b) the Registration Statement (as of its effective date), the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus (as of the date of the Purchase Agreement and as of the Closing Date) and any amendments or supplements thereto, as of their respective dates, appeared to comply as to form in all material respects with the requirements of Form S-3 under the Securities Act and the Securities Act Rules and Regulations; provided that no opinion is expressed with respect to financial statements or other financial and statistical information contained in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus or incorporated therein or attached as an exhibit thereto or as to the Statement of Eligibility and Qualification on Form T-l of the Trustee under the Indenture.
(vi) The consummation of the transactions contemplated in this Agreement and the compliance by the Company with all the terms of the Indenture did not and will not result in a breach of any of the terms and provisions of, the Company's Charter or By-Laws or any indenture, mortgage or deed of trust or other agreement or instrument to which the Company is a party which is filed as an exhibit to the Company's most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K;
(vii) This Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company; and
(viii) The statements set forth in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus under the caption "Description of the Debt Securities," and on the cover page of the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus insofar as they purport to constitute a summary of the terms of the Indenture and the Purchased Notes, are accurate and fair summaries of the matters set forth therein. The statements in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus under the caption "Certain United States Federal Income Tax Considerations," insofar as such statements constitute summaries of legal matters referred to therein, correctly summarize in all material respects the legal matters referred to therein.
(ix) To such counsel's knowledge, there are no legal or governmental proceedings that are pending against the Company or any of its subsidiaries or to which any property of the Company or any of its subsidiaries is subject that has caused us to conclude that such proceeding is required by Item 103 of Regulation S-K to be described in the Registration Statement, Time of Sale Prospectus or Prospectus but is not so described.
(x) The Company is not and, after giving effect to the offering and sale of the Purchased Notes and the application of the proceeds thereof as described in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus, will not be an "investment company" or an entity "controlled" by an "investment company" within the meaning of the Investment Company Act.
(xi) The documents incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus or any further amendment or supplement thereto made by the Company prior to the Closing Date (other than the
 
financial statements and related schedules therein, as to which such counsel need express no opinion), when they were filed with the Commission, complied as to form in all material respects with the requirements of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder.
(xii) The Indenture has been duly qualified under the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended.
In addition, such counsel shall state that such counsel has participated in conferences with officers, counsel and other representatives of the Company, representatives of the independent registered public accounting firm for the Company and representatives of the Purchasers at which the contents of the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus and related matters were discussed; and, although such counsel is not passing upon and does not assume responsibility for the accuracy, completeness or fairness of the statements contained in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus (except as to the matters referred to in their opinion rendered pursuant to subheading (ix) above), on the basis of the foregoing (relying as to matters of fact to a large extent upon the opinions of officers, counsel and other representatives of the Company), no facts have come to the attention of such counsel which lead such counsel to believe that (a) the Registration Statement, when it became effective, contained any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, (b) the Time of Sale Information as of the Time of Sale and as of the date hereof, contained any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, or (c) the Prospectus as of its date and as of the date hereof, contained any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading (it being understood that such counsel need make no comment with respect to the financial statements and other financial and statistical data included in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus or Prospectus or incorporated therein or as to the Statement of Eligibility and Qualification on Form T-l of the Trustee under the Indenture).
(e) The Purchasers shall have received from counsel for the Purchasers, an opinion dated the Closing Date, with respect to the matters as the Purchasers shall reasonably request and the Company shall have furnished to such counsel such documents as they reasonably request for the purpose of enabling them to pass on such matters.
(f) You shall have received a certificate of the Chief Executive Officer, President or any Vice President of the Company and a principal financial or accounting officer of the Company, dated the Closing Date, in which such officers shall state, to the best of their knowledge after reasonable investigation, that the representations and warranties of the Company in this Agreement are true and correct in all material respects, that the Company has complied with all agreements and satisfied all conditions on its part to be performed or satisfied at or prior to the Closing Date, that no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement has been issued and no proceedings for such purpose have been instituted, are pending or, to the best knowledge of the Company, threatened by the Commission, and that, subsequent to the date of the most recent financial statements set forth or incorporated by reference in the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus, there has been no material adverse change, nor any development or event reasonably likely to involve a prospective material adverse change, in the financial condition, business, properties or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole, except as set forth or contemplated in the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus.
 
(g) The Company will furnish you with such conformed copies of such opinions, certificates, letters and documents as you reasonably request.
In case any such condition shall not have been satisfied, this Agreement may be terminated by you upon notice in writing or by telecopy to the Company without liability or obligation on the part of the Company or any Purchaser, except as set forth in Section 12 hereof.
8. . The obligations of the Company to sell and deliver the Purchased Notes are subject to the following condition precedent:
Conditions of the Obligations of the Company
Prior to the Closing Date, no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement shall have been issued and no proceedings for that purpose shall have been instituted or, to the knowledge of the Company or you, shall be contemplated by the Commission.
If any such condition shall not have been satisfied, then the Company shall be entitled, by notice in writing or by telecopy to you, to terminate this Agreement without any liability on the part of the Company or any Purchaser, except as set forth in Section 12 hereof.
9. .
Indemnification
(a) The Company will indemnify and hold harmless each Purchaser, its affiliates, as such term is defined in Rule 501(b) under the Securities Act (each, an "Affiliate"), each of its directors and officers and each person, if any, who controls any Purchaser within the meaning of the Securities Act or the Exchange Act against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities, joint or several, to which such Purchaser, Affiliate or such controlling person may become subject, under the Securities Act or otherwise, insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) arise out of or are based upon any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of any material fact contained in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus, the Prospectus or any issuer "free writing prospectus" (or any amendment or supplement thereto), or arise out of or are based upon the omission or alleged omission to state therein a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading; and will reimburse each Purchaser, Affiliate and each such controlling person for any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such Purchaser, Affiliate or such controlling person in connection with investigating or defending any such loss, claim, damage, liability or action; provided, however, that the Company will not be liable to such Purchaser, Affiliate or controlling person in any such case to the extent that any such loss, claim, damage or liability arises out of or is based upon an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission made in any such documents in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by such Purchaser specifically for use therein. This indemnity agreement will be in addition to any liability which the Company may otherwise have.
(b) Each Purchaser agrees, severally and not jointly, to indemnify and hold harmless the Company, each of its directors and officers and each person, if any, who controls the Company within the meaning of the Securities Act or the Exchange Act, against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities to which the Company or any such director, officer or controlling person may become subject, under the Securities Act, or otherwise, insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) arise out of or are based upon any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of any material fact contained in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus, the
 
Prospectus or any issuer "free writing prospectus" as defined in Rule 433(h) under the Act, any Company information that the Company has filed, or is required to file, pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Act or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto) or arise out of or are based upon the omission or the alleged omission to state therein a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, in each case to the extent, but only to the extent, that such untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission was made in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by such Purchaser specifically for use therein; and will reimburse any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by the Company or any such director, officer or controlling person in connection with investigating or defending any such loss, claim, damage, liability or action as such expenses are incurred. This indemnity agreement will be in addition to any liability which such Purchaser may otherwise have.
(c) Promptly after receipt by an indemnified party under this Section of notice of the commencement of any action, such indemnified party will, if a claim in respect thereof is to be made against the indemnifying party under (a) and (b) above, notify the indemnifying party of the commencement thereof; but the omission so to notify the indemnifying party will not relieve it from any liability which it may have to any indemnified party otherwise than under this Section, except to the extent the indemnifying party has been materially prejudiced by such omission. In case any such action is brought against any indemnified party, and it notifies the indemnifying party of the commencement thereof, the indemnifying party will be entitled to participate therein and, to the extent that it may wish, jointly with any other indemnifying party similarly notified, to assume the defense thereof, with counsel satisfactory to such indemnified party (who may, with the consent of the indemnified party, be counsel to the indemnifying party) and who shall not be counsel to any other indemnified party who may have interests conflicting with those of such indemnified party, and after notice from the indemnifying party to such indemnified party of its election so to assume the defense thereof, the indemnifying party will not be liable to such indemnified party under this Section for any legal or other expenses subsequently incurred by such indemnified party in connection with the defense thereof other than reasonable costs of investigation. The indemnifying party shall not be liable for any settlement of any proceeding effected without its written consent, but if settled with such consent or if there be a final judgment for the plaintiff, the indemnifying party agrees to indemnify each indemnified party from and against any loss or liability by reason of such settlement or judgment. Notwithstanding the foregoing sentence, if at any time an indemnified party shall have requested that an indemnifying party reimburse the indemnified party for fees and expenses of counsel as contemplated by this paragraph, the indemnifying party shall be liable for any settlement of any proceeding effected without its written consent if (i) such settlement is entered into more than 30 days after receipt by the indemnifying party of such request and (ii) the indemnifying party shall not have reimbursed the indemnified party in accordance with such request prior to the date of such settlement unless the request is being disputed in good faith. No indemnifying party shall, without the written consent of the indemnified party, effect any settlement of any pending or threatened proceeding in respect of which any indemnified party is or could have been a party and indemnification could have been sought hereunder by such indemnified party, unless such settlement (x) includes an unconditional release of such indemnified party, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to such indemnified party, from all liability on claims that are the subject matter of such proceeding and (y) does not include any statement as to or any admission of fault, culpability or a failure to act by or on behalf of any indemnified party.
(d) If recovery is not available under the foregoing indemnification provisions of this Section, for any reason other than as specified therein, the parties entitled to
 
indemnification by the terms thereof shall be entitled to contribution to liabilities and expenses, except to the extent that contribution is not permitted under Section 11(f) of the Act. In determining the amount of contribution to which the respective parties are entitled, there shall be considered the relative benefits received by each party from the offering of the Purchased Notes (taking into account the portion of the proceeds of the offering realized by each), the parties' relative knowledge and access to information concerning the matter with respect to which the claim was asserted, the opportunity to correct and prevent any statement or omission, and any other equitable considerations appropriate under the circumstances. The relative benefits received by the Company on the one hand and the Purchasers on the other shall be deemed to be in the same respective proportions as the net proceeds (before deducting expenses) received by the Company from the sale of the Purchased Notes and the total underwriting discounts and commissions received by the Purchasers in connection therewith, in each case as set forth in the table on the cover of the Prospectus, bear to the aggregate offering price of the Purchased Notes. The Company and the Purchasers and such controlling persons agree that it would not be equitable if the amount of such contribution were determined by pro rata or per capita allocation (even if the Purchasers and such controlling persons were treated as one entity for such purpose). Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection (d), no Purchaser or controlling person shall be required to make contribution hereunder which in the aggregate exceeds the total public offering price of the Purchased Notes, purchased by the Purchaser under this Agreement, less the aggregate amount of any damages which such Purchaser or such controlling person has otherwise been required to pay in respect of the same claim or any substantially similar claim. The Purchasers' obligations to contribute are several in proportion to their respective underwriting obligations and not joint.
10. . If any Purchaser or Purchasers default in their obligations to purchase Purchased Notes hereunder and the aggregate principal amount of Purchased Notes which such defaulting Purchaser or Purchasers agreed but failed to purchase is 10% of the principal amount of Purchased Notes or less, the non-defaulting Purchasers may make arrangements satisfactory to the Company for the purchase of such Purchased Notes by other persons, including any of the Purchasers, but if no such arrangements are made by the Closing Date the non-defaulting Purchasers shall be obligated severally, in proportion to their respective commitments hereunder, to purchase the Purchased Notes which such defaulting Purchasers agreed but failed to purchase. If any Purchaser or Purchasers so default and the aggregate principal amount of Purchased Notes with respect to which such default or defaults occur is more than the above percentage and arrangements reasonably satisfactory to you and the Company for the purchase of such Purchased Notes by other persons are not made within seventy-two hours after such default, this Agreement will terminate without liability on the part of any non-defaulting Purchaser or the Company, except as provided in Section 11. In the event that any Purchaser or Purchasers default in their obligation to purchase Purchased Notes hereunder, the Company may, by prompt written notice to the non-defaulting Purchasers, postpone the Closing Date for a period of not more than seven full business days in order to effect whatever changes may thereby be made necessary in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus or in any other documents, and the Company will promptly file any amendments to the Registration Statement or supplements to the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus which may thereby be made necessary. As used in this Agreement, the term "Purchaser" includes any person substituted for a Purchaser under this Section. Nothing herein will relieve a defaulting Purchaser from liability for its default.
Default of Purchasers
11. . This Agreement may be terminated, by notice to the Company, if after the execution and delivery of this Agreement and prior to the Closing Date (i) trading generally shall have been suspended or materially limited on the New York Stock Exchange; (ii) trading of any securities issued or guaranteed by the Company shall have been suspended on any exchange; (iii) a general moratorium on commercial banking activities shall have been declared
Termination
 
by federal or New York State authorities or a material disruption in commercial banking or securities settlement clearance services in the United States; or (iv) there shall have occurred any outbreak or escalation of hostilities or any change in financial markets or any calamity or crisis, either within or outside the United States, that, in each case in the reasonable judgment of the Purchasers, is material and adverse and makes it impracticable or inadvisable to proceed with the offering, sale or delivery of the Purchased Notes on the terms and in the manner contemplated by this Agreement, the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus.
12. . The respective indemnities, agreements, representations, warranties, and other statements of the Company or its officers and of the several Purchasers set forth in or made pursuant to this Agreement will remain in full force and effect, regardless of any investigation, or statement as to the results thereof, made by or on behalf of any Purchaser or the Company or any of its officers or directors or any controlling person, and will survive delivery of and payment for the Purchased Notes. If this Agreement is terminated pursuant to Section 7, 8, 10 or 11 or if for any reason the purchase of the Purchased Notes by the Purchasers is not consummated, the Company shall remain responsible for the expenses to be paid or reimbursed by it pursuant to Section 5(h). In addition, in such event the respective obligations of the Company and the Purchasers pursuant to Section 9 shall remain in effect; provided, however, that each Purchaser will use its best efforts to promptly notify each other Purchaser and each dealer and prospective customer to whom such Purchaser has delivered a Prospectus for the Purchased Notes by telephone or telegraph, confirmed by letter in either case, of such termination or failure to consummate, including in such notice instructions regarding the continued use of the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus, the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto.
Survival of Certain Representations and Obligations
13. . All communications hereunder will be in writing, and, if sent to the Purchasers will be delivered or telecopied and confirmed to the address furnished in writing for the purpose of such communications hereunder, or, if sent to the Company, will be delivered or telecopied and confirmed to it, attention of Treasurer at 100 North Riverside, Chicago, Illinois 60606, telecopier (312) 544-2399, with a copy to Corporate Secretary at the same address, telecopier (312) 544-2829.
Notices
14. . This Purchase Agreement will inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the parties hereto and their respective successors and the officers and directors and controlling persons referred to in Section 9, and no other person will have any right or obligation hereunder.
Successors
15. . (a) This Agreement, together with any contemporaneous written agreements and any prior written agreements (to the extent not superseded by this Agreement) that relate to the offering of the Purchased Notes, represents the entire agreement between the Company and the Purchasers with respect to the preparation of the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus, the conduct of the offering, and the purchase and sale of the Purchased Notes.
Entire Agreement
(b) The Company acknowledges that in connection with the offering of the Purchased Notes: (i) the Purchasers have acted at arm's-length, are not agents of, and owe no fiduciary duties to, the Company or any other person, (ii) the Purchasers owe the Company only those duties and obligations set forth in this Agreement and prior written agreements to the extent not superseded by this Agreement), if any, and (iii) the Purchasers may have interests that differ from those of the Company. The Company waives to the full extent permitted by applicable law any claims it may have against the Purchasers arising from an alleged breach of fiduciary duty in connection with the offering of the Purchased Notes.
 
16. . This Purchase Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of New York without giving effect to any conflicts of law provisions that would apply the laws of another jurisdiction.
Construction
17. . This Agreement may be executed in one or more counterparts and it is not necessary that the signatures of all parties appear on the same counterpart, but such counterparts together shall constitute but one and the same agreement.
Counterparts
18. . No amendment or waiver of any provision of this Agreement, nor any consent or approval to any departure therefrom, shall in any event be effective unless the same shall be in writing and signed by the parties hereto.
Amendments or Waivers
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20090827094138.txt.gz
TIME:20090827094138
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On August 27, 2009, The Boeing Company (the "Company") issued a press release in which it announced a revised schedule for the 787 Dreamliner. The Company also announced a charge to third quarter earnings related to flight test aircraft. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Boeing Corporate Offices
100 North Riverside Plaza
Chicago, IL 60606-1596
www.boeing.com
Boeing Announces New 787 Schedule and Third-Quarter Charge
 The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] today announced that the first flight of the 787 Dreamliner is expected by the end of 2009 and first delivery is expected to occur in the fourth quarter of 2010.
CHICAGO, Aug. 27, 2009
The new schedule reflects the previously announced need to reinforce an area within the side-of-body section of the aircraft, along with the addition of several weeks of schedule margin to reduce flight test and certification risk. The company projects achieving a production rate of 10 airplanes per month in late 2013.
"This new schedule provides us the time needed to complete the remaining work necessary to put the 787's game-changing capability in the hands of our customers," said Boeing Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer Jim McNerney. "The design details and implementation plan are nearly complete, and the team is preparing airplanes for modification and testing."
Based on the revised schedule and other assumption updates, the company has determined that the 787 program is not in a forward-loss position.
However, separate from the updated program profitability assessment, the company has concluded that the initial flight-test airplanes have no commercial market value beyond the development effort due to the inordinate amount of rework and unique and extensive modifications made to those aircraft. Therefore, costs previously recorded for the first three flight-test airplanes will be reclassified from program inventory to research and development expense, resulting in an estimated non-cash charge of $2.5 billion pre-tax, or $2.21 per share, against third-quarter results. This charge will have no impact on the company's cash outlook going forward.
The 787 team working the side-of-body reinforcement has completed initial testing and is finalizing design details of new fittings that are expected to ensure full structural
 
integrity of the joint. The static test procedure that uncovered the issue will be repeated and the results fully analyzed before first flight is conducted. Fatigue testing also will be performed on stringer components to validate the long-term durability of the modification.
The first 787 test airplane and static test unit have been prepared for the new fittings. Installation is expected to begin within the next few weeks.
Boeing will discuss this announcement during a starting at 10:00 a.m. EDT today. That webcast is accessible through . The company will update its 2009 financial guidance in October when it reports third-quarter results.
webcast
www.boeing.com
 
Certain statements in this report may be "forward-looking" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," "targets," "anticipates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions about future events that may not prove to be accurate. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak to events only as of the date they are made and we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise, except as required by federal securities laws. Specific factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, those set forth below and other important factors disclosed previously and from time to time in our other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission: the effect of economic conditions in the United States and globally; the impact on our accounts receivable, customer financing portfolios and allowance for losses of customer defaults and changes in customer credit ratings, credit default rates and collateral values; the impact on our revenues and operating results of changes to indices included in indexed price escalation clauses included in our contracts with commercial airplane and defense customers; the successful execution of our Commercial Airplanes and Integrated Defense Systems backlog; the effects of customers canceling, modifying and/or rescheduling contractual orders; the timing and effects of any decisions to increase or decrease the rate of commercial airplane production; the timing and effects of decisions to complete or launch a Commercial Airplanes program; the ability to successfully develop and timely produce the 787 and 747-8 aircraft; the ability of our suppliers and, as applicable, subcontractors to successfully and timely perform their obligations; the effect on our revenues of political and legal processes; changing defense priorities; and associated budget reductions by U.S. and international government customers affecting Boeing defense programs; our relationship with our union-represented workforce and the negotiation of collective bargaining agreements; the continuation of long-term trends in passenger and cargo traffic and revenue yields in the airline industry; the impact of volatile fuel prices and the airline industry's response; the effect of declines in aircraft valuations; the impact on our revenues or operating results of airline bankruptcies; the availability of commercial and government financing and the extent to which we are called upon to fund outstanding financing commitments or satisfy other financing requests, and our ability to satisfy those requirements; the continuation of historical costs for fleet support services; the receipt of estimated award and incentive fees on U.S. government contracts; the future demand for commercial satellites and projections of future order flow; the potential for technical or quality issues on development programs, including the Airborne Early Warning and Control program, International KC-767 Tanker, other fixed-price development programs, or commercial satellite programs, to affect schedule and cost estimates, or cause us to incur a material charge or experience a termination for default; the outcome of any litigation and/or government investigation in which we are a party, and other contingencies; returns on pension fund assets, impacts of future interest rate changes on pension obligations and rising healthcare costs; our ability to access external capital resources to fund our operations; the amounts and effects of underinsured operations, including satellite launches; our ability to recover the proportionate amounts owed to us from the other Sea Launch partners; and the scope, nature or impact of acquisition or disposition activity and investment in any joint ventures/strategic alliances, including Sea Launch and United Launch Alliance, and indemnifications and guarantees related thereto.
Contact:
787 Program Communications:    Yvonne Leach (206) 854-5027
Communications:    Todd Blecher (312) 544-2002
Investor Relations:    Diana Sands or Rob Young (312) 544-2140
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20090831171924.txt.gz
TIME:20090831171924
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(b) On August 31, 2009, Scott E. Carson, Executive Vice President, President and Chief Executive Officer, Boeing Commercial Airplanes, announced his intention to retire from The Boeing Company (the ) effective January 1, 2010. Effective September 1, 2009, Mr. Carson will leave his current position and assume the role of Executive Vice President. In addition, effective September 1, 2009, James F. Albaugh, Executive Vice President, President and Chief Executive Officer, Integrated Defense Systems, will leave his current position and assume the role of Executive Vice President, President and Chief Executive Officer, Boeing Commercial Airplanes.
"Company"
 
On August 31, 2009, the Company issued a press release announcing management changes with respect to Mr. Carson, Mr. Albaugh and Dennis A. Muilenburg. Effective as of September 1, 2009, in addition to the changes set forth above, Mr. Muilenburg will succeed Mr. Albaugh as Executive Vice President, President and Chief Executive Officer, Integrated Defense Systems. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: August 31, 2009
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Boeing Executive Scott Carson Announces Retirement; Albaugh named Commercial Airplanes leader, Muilenburg to head Integrated Defense Systems
CHICAGO, Aug. 31, 2009  Boeing Commercial Airplanes President and CEO Scott Carson announced today that he will retire from the company at the end of the year.
Boeing Chairman, President and CEO Jim McNerney has named Jim Albaugh, 59, to Carson's leadership role at Boeing Commercial Airplanes (BCA), and Dennis Muilenburg, 45, to succeed Albaugh as president and CEO of Boeing Integrated Defense Systems (IDS). Both appointments are effective Sept. 1.
Carson, 63, has led BCA since 2006 after two years heading up the unit's sales organization, where he was credited with reinvigorating sales of Boeing commercial airplanes and related services to airline customers and leasing companies around the world. He previously served as BCA's executive vice president and chief financial officer, where he led the finance and business strategy organizations, as well as information systems and services. He also held leadership positions in the company's defense business and was the first president of Connexion by Boeing.
"The Boeing board of directors and I appreciate Scott's long record of accomplishment across many disciplines, functions and businesses, and the enduring contributions he has made to Boeing through 38 years of service," said McNerney. "Thanks to his leadership and operational experience, Boeing Commercial Airplanes has performed extremely well in a tough business environment and remains positioned solidly for continued market success."
McNerney said that Carson and Albaugh will work together to ensure a smooth transition of customer and other business relationships, and that Carson will also assist on special projects for the company through year end. He will continue to lead the United Way of King County's 2009-2010 fund-raising campaign, even after his retirement.
Albaugh, a 34-year company veteran with extensive experience in development programs and manufacturing, has led Boeing's defense, space and associated services businesses since 2002. Under his leadership IDS revenue has grown from $25 billion to an expected $34 billion in 2009, and now accounts for roughly half of Boeing's annual sales. Prior to his most recent assignment, he led Boeing's growth in space and communications, including network-centric operations, global missile defense, combat systems, and system-of-systems technologies. He began his career with Rockwell's aerospace and defense businesses, which Boeing acquired in 1996.
"Jim is a seasoned and effective aerospace executive with substantial experience leading and integrating technically complex businesses and programs from initial development through full production and delivery. His program management and engineering focus will help ensure the success of BCA's key development and production programs," McNerney said. "On top of that, as a Washington state native and the leader of more than 9,000 IDS employees working in the Puget Sound region, he is familiar with the people, issues and programs in the area. He is the ideal leader for BCA at this time," he added.
Muilenburg moves to his new position from Integrated Defense System's Global Services & Support unit, where he served as president of the $8 billion business that provides global after-delivery support for military platforms and systems, as well as a broad array of defense and government services. Prior assignments include leadership of the Combat Systems Division and Future Combat Systems, the company's development program for the U.S. Army. He also led the overall engineering development of Boeing's program to modernize global air traffic management systems.
"Dennis is ready to step up and lead the IDS team," said McNerney. "His experience in technology integration; track record delivering large-scale programs on time and budget; and work with customers in new, developing markets will help us generate new momentum and long-term growth," he added.
Albaugh holds bachelor's degrees in mathematics and physics from Willamette University, and a master's degree in civil engineering from Columbia University. He will relocate soon to the Seattle area.
Born in Iowa, Muilenburg earned a bachelor's degree in aerospace engineering from Iowa State University and a master's degree in aeronautics and astronautics from the University of Washington. He will continue to be based in St. Louis and spend substantial time in the Washington, D.C. area.
A replacement for Muilenburg will be named at a later date.
 
Certain statements in this report may be "forward-looking" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," "targets," "anticipates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions about future events that may not prove to be accurate. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak to events only as of the date they are made and we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise, except as required by federal securities laws. Specific factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, those set forth below and other important factors disclosed previously and from time to time in our other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission: the effect of economic conditions in the United States and globally; the impact on our accounts receivable, customer financing portfolios and allowance for losses of customer defaults and changes in customer credit ratings, credit default rates and collateral values; the impact on our revenues and operating results of changes to indices included in indexed price escalation clauses included in our contracts with commercial airplane and defense customers; the successful execution of our Commercial Airplanes and Integrated Defense Systems backlog; the effects of customers canceling, modifying and/or rescheduling contractual orders; the timing and effects of any decisions to increase or decrease the rate of commercial airplane production; the timing and effects of decisions to complete or launch a Commercial Airplanes program; the ability to successfully develop and timely produce the 787 and 747-8 aircraft; the ability of our suppliers and, as applicable, subcontractors to successfully and timely perform their obligations; the effect on our revenues of political and legal processes; changing defense priorities; and associated budget reductions by U.S. and international government customers affecting Boeing defense programs; our relationship with our union-represented workforce and the negotiation of collective bargaining agreements; the continuation of long-term trends in passenger and cargo traffic and revenue yields in the airline industry; the impact of volatile fuel prices and the airline industry's response; the effect of declines in aircraft valuations; the impact on our revenues or operating results of airline bankruptcies; the availability of commercial and government financing and the extent to which we are called upon to fund outstanding financing commitments or satisfy other financing requests, and our ability to satisfy those requirements; the continuation of historical costs for fleet support services; the receipt of estimated award and incentive fees on U.S. government contracts; the future demand for commercial satellites and projections of future order flow; the potential for technical or quality issues on development programs, including the Airborne Early Warning and Control program, International KC-767 Tanker, other fixed-price development programs, or commercial satellite programs, to affect schedule and cost estimates, or cause us to incur a material charge or experience a termination for default; the outcome of any litigation and/or government investigation in which we are a party, and other contingencies; returns on pension fund assets, impacts of future interest rate changes on pension obligations and rising healthcare costs; our ability to access external capital resources to fund our operations; the amounts and effects of underinsured operations, including satellite launches; our ability to recover the proportionate amounts owed to us from the other Sea Launch partners; and the scope, nature or impact of acquisition or disposition activity and investment in any joint ventures/strategic alliances, including Sea Launch and United Launch Alliance, and indemnifications and guarantees related thereto.
Editor's note: Biographies and photos of these Boeing executives can be found <here>
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20090915102310.txt.gz
TIME:20090915102310
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the Consent and Undertaking dated July 26, 1978 of The Boeing Company (the "Company"), the Company has agreed to file a statement with the Commission reflecting changes to certain policies and procedures governing the appointment of foreign consultants. In particular, Company Policy POL-14, "Consultant Services" ("POL-14"), establishes guidelines for the selection, use and approval of consultant services generally. As relates to the appointment of foreign sales consultants, POL-14 is implemented through Company Procedure PRO-1557, "International Service Contractors" ("PRO-1557").
POL-14 was revised on June 9, 2009 to transfer the responsibility for matters related to the administration and review of, as well as the approval authority for amendments to, the policy from the Senior Vice President and General Counsel to the Corporate President and Chief Financial Officer. This change was made in order to place the responsibility for the content of the policy with the corporate function having greatest operational responsibility with respect to its implementation.
POL-14 and PRO-1557 are attached hereto as Exhibits 99.1 and 99.2, respectively.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
Consultant Services
 
The company prefers to use its own employees in the conduct of business. The company may, however, engage consultants (including professional services and international service contractors) to acquire specialized knowledge or abilities that are not reasonably available within the company.
 
The company will engage consultants by written agreement only in accordance with this Policy and applicable Boeing procedures.
The company, its employees and consultants will observe all applicable laws and act only and always on a legitimate and ethical business basis. No employee, representative, or consultant will offer or use company funds, property or credits, directly or indirectly, for a payment or gift under circumstances where such payment or gift would constitute a bribe, kickback, or illegal payment or create the appearance of such.
When management determines it is advisable to use an international service contractor, such contractor must be retained in accordance with applicable Boeing procedures, subject (to the extent required by such procedures) to prior approval of each appointment by the Chief Executive Officer of The Boeing Company or delegate. Any amendment that changes the requirement for such approval by the Chief Executive Officer or delegate must have prior approval from the Board of Directors of The Boeing Company.
 
Business Units and other organizations of The Boeing Company will maintain records which properly reflect all financial transactions with respect to consultants and international service contractors and will not use or establish any fund or account, with respect to such consultants or international service contractors, outside normal accounting channels. With respect to international service contractors, an annual review of compliance with this policy will be presented to the Board of Directors.
 
Subsidiaries, subject to , "Legal Entities," will adopt this Policy and associated compliance procedures by Subsidiary Board Resolution as follows:
PRO-6470
Those subsidiaries for which employee services, processes, and financial accounting are the same as for the Boeing Business Units identified in , to which the subsidiary reports, shall adopt all applicable Procedures authorized by this Policy. All other subsidiaries (domestic and international) shall assure that there are processes in place for compliance with the following laws and regulations:
POL-1
 
 

Exhibit 99.2
 
 
 
International Service Contractors
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
An increase in total potential compensation due to the addition of new product lines (for a sales agent contract) or a new task (for a task based contract) is not a Significant Change unless:
 
 
Administrative changes to update personnel or temporarily extend an agreement to meet operational requirements do not require CEO or Executive Committee review.
 
 
ISCs must be Persons conducting bona fide activities. No Person will be engaged as an ISC if (a) Boeing believes that such Person is likely to offer or make (or has offered or made) a payment or gift, directly or indirectly, to any Owner, Affiliate, officer, director, employee, or representative of any Non-U.S. Customer, or a Foreign Official, under circumstances in which such payment or gift would constitute a bribe, a kickback, or other illegal payment under either U.S. or applicable foreign law or (b) the use of an ISC is prohibited by any applicable law, regulation, or decree. The ISC may not provide any ISC services for a Boeing Group Company unless an approved, fully executed written agreement is in effect with the ISC. Specifically, the ISC may not perform ISC services during any period following expiration of an ISC agreement prior to a written renewal thereof.
 
Payments to the ISC will be made pursuant to and consistent with the terms of the applicable written agreement. All payments will be made by check or bank transfer, payable to the ISC, in accordance with , "Company Payment Methods". No assignment of funds by an ISC to any other person or entity (other than a financial institution) will be permitted without the prior written approval of the Business Unit Law Department. Under no circumstances will any payment be made to any account unless the owner(s) of record of the account are identified. Payment will, unless otherwise authorized by the Business Unit Law Department, be made to the ISC's principal place of business as specified in the ISC Agreement.
PRO-6501
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Provide training to the ISC relating to acquisition and use of third party proprietary information. is required for all ISCs. Training for is required if the ISC is supporting a Foreign Military Sales program, or otherwise required by Contracts & Pricing.
PRO-6375
PRO-70
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
After approval by the Business Unit Executive Committee, the Senior Vice President and General Counsel ("SRVP- GC") shall review all agreements requiring SRVP-GC review and approval under Figure 4.2. The SRVP- GC may at his discretion exempt in writing certain ISCs or categories of ISCs from President and CEO approval. In the event that the SRVP- GC is unavailable, he may delegate in writing his approval authority to one of his direct reports.
 
If approved by the SRVP-GC and not exempted from President and CEO approval by the SRVP-GC, such agreements shall then be sent to the President and CEO for review and approval. In the event the President and CEO is unavailable, the President and CEO may delegate in writing his approval authority to another Boeing Executive Council member.
 
 
 
Only those ISC agreements, renewals and amendments that have been approved by the appropriate authorities may be executed.
Figure 4.2
 
 
Each ISC agreement will include the following representations and covenants. Prior approval of the Law Department is required for the deletion or material amendment of any of these terms.
 
 
 
 
(i) a Foreign Official,
(ii) an Owner, Affiliate, officer, director, employee, or representative of a Foreign Customer of the Boeing Group Company whose products are promoted under the agreement or, to the ISC's knowledge, any other Boeing Group Company products.
The ISC shall inform Boeing promptly of any change in such representation. Boeing has the right to terminate the ISC agreement if, in the judgment of Boeing, such change may constitute a conflict of interest or a violation of any applicable law.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20091006110031.txt.gz
TIME:20091006110031
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On October 6, 2009, The Boeing Company (the "Company") issued a press release in which it announced a charge to third-quarter earnings in connection with the 747-8 program. The Company also announced a revised first flight and delivery schedule for the program. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: October 6, 2009
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
Boeing to Recognize Third-Quarter Charge for the 747 Program
 The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] today said it expects a pre-tax charge against third-quarter results of approximately $1.0 billion due to increased production costs and the difficult market conditions affecting its 747-8 program.
CHICAGO, Oct. 6, 2009
Approximately $640 million of the charge reflects higher estimated costs to produce 747-8 airplanes at both Boeing and supplier facilities. As the program assembled major components of initial 747-8 Freighters during the third quarter, it became clear that late maturity of engineering designs has caused greater than expected re-work and disruption in manufacturing. This is resulting in additional resources being applied on the program and higher supplier expenses, which are the primary cost drivers.
The remaining $360 million of the charge relates to challenging market conditions and the company's decision to maintain the 747-8 production rate at 1.5 airplanes per month nearly two years longer than previously planned, deferring an increase to 2 per month. Higher allocation of fixed expenses and volume-based penalties to suppliers are the main drivers of the additional costs.
Because the 747 program is in a loss position, costs associated with the factors above will be immediately recorded in the third quarter for future 747-8 deliveries.
The company now expects first flight of the 747-8 Freighter to occur by early next year with the flight test program taking place in 2010. First delivery of the 747-8 Freighter is now expected in the fourth quarter of 2010. First delivery of the Intercontinental passenger variant remains scheduled for the fourth quarter of 2011.
The third-quarter tax benefit related to the 747 charge and the previously announced 787 charge is expected to be approximately 31 percent. The full-year tax benefit for both charges is expected to be approximately 37 percent. Boeing will update its 2009 financial guidance on October 21 when it reports third-quarter results.
 
Contact:
Investor Relations: Diana Sands or Rob Young (312) 544-2140
Communications: 312-544-2002
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20091009091211.txt.gz
TIME:20091009091211
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On October 7, 2009, the Board of Directors of The Boeing Company (the "") elected retired Admiral Edmund P. Giambastiani, Jr., former Vice Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff from 2005 until 2007, to the Board of Directors. Admiral Giambastiani also serves on the board of directors of Monster Worldwide, Inc., SRA International, Inc. and QinetiQ Group plc.
Company
The Board of Directors has appointed Admiral Giambastiani to the Audit Committee and the Finance Committee.
Admiral Giambastiani will participate in the Company's nonemployee director compensation program, which is described on pages 23-25 of the Company's proxy statement for its 2009 Annual Meeting filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 13, 2009, and which includes an annual cash retainer fee of $100,000 and an annual grant of retainer stock units valued at $130,000.
A copy of the Company's press release announcing the election of Admiral Giambastiani is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
On October 7, 2009, the Board of Directors approved and adopted an amendment to Article II, Section 1 of the By-Laws of The Boeing Company to increase the number of directors from ten to eleven. A copy of the text of the amendment to the By-Laws is attached hereto as Exhibit 3.2 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 3.2
 
 
 
 
 
SECTION 1. 
.
Annual Meetings
The Annual Meeting of the stockholders shall be held on such date and at such time as the Board of Directors shall determine, for the election of directors and the transaction of such other business as may come before the meeting.
SECTION 2.
Special Meetings.
A special meeting of stockholders may be called at any time by the Board of Directors, or by stockholders holding together at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, except as otherwise provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto.
SECTION 3.
Place of Meeting.
All meetings of the stockholders of the Corporation shall be held at such place or places, if any, within or without the State of Delaware as may from time to time be fixed by the Board of Directors or as shall be specified or fixed in the respective notices or waivers of notice thereof.
SECTION 4.
Notice of Meetings.
Except as otherwise required by statute and as set forth below, notice of each annual or special meeting of stockholders shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date. If the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, notice of each special meeting of stockholders shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than fifty-five (55) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date, unless the calling of such meeting is ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, in which case notice of such special meeting shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date. Such notice shall be given by delivering to each stockholder a written or printed notice thereof either personally or by mailing such notice in a postage-prepaid envelope addressed to the stockholder's address as it appears on the stock books of the Corporation or by transmitting the notice to the stockholder in any other manner permitted by Delaware law. Except as otherwise required by statute, no publication of any notice of a meeting of stockholders shall be required. Every notice of a meeting of stockholders shall state the place, if any (or the means of remote communication, if any, by which stockholders and proxy holders may be deemed to be present in person), date, and hour of the meeting and, in the case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called. Notices are deemed given (i) if by mail, when deposited in the United States mail, postage prepaid, directed to the stockholder at such stockholder's address as it appears on the records of the Corporation, or, if a stockholder shall have filed with the Secretary a written request that notices to such stockholder be mailed to some other address, then directed to such stockholder at such other address; (ii) if by facsimile, when directed to a number at which the stockholder has consented to receive notice; (iii) if by electronic mail, when directed to an electronic mail address at which the stockholder has consented to receive such notice; (iv) if by posting on an electronic network together with a separate notice to the stockholder of such specific posting, upon the later to occur of (A) such posting and (B) the giving of such separate notice of such posting; and (v) if by any other form of electronic transmission, when directed to the stockholder as required by law and, to the extent required by applicable law, in the manner consented to by the stockholder. An affidavit of the mailing or other means of giving any notice of any stockholders' meeting, executed by the Secretary, Assistant Corporate Secretary or any transfer agent of the Corporation giving the notice, shall be prima facie evidence of the giving of such notice. Notice shall be deemed to have been given to all stockholders of record who share an address if notice is given in accordance with the "householding" rules set forth in Rule 14a-3(e) under the Securities Exchange Act of 11134 (the "Exchange Act") and Section 233 of the Delaware General Corporation Law.
 
SECTION 5.
Waivers of Notice.
Whenever any notice is required to be given to any stockholder under the provisions of these By-Laws, the Certificate of Incorporation, or the Delaware General Corporation Law, a waiver thereof in writing, signed by the person or persons entitled to such notice, whether before or after the time stated therein, shall be deemed equivalent to the giving of such notice. The attendance of a stockholder at a meeting, in person or by proxy, or waiver by electronic transmission, shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when a stockholder attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened.
SECTION 6.
Quorum.
At all meetings of stockholders, except when otherwise provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by these By-Laws, the presence, in person or by proxy duly authorized, of the holders of one-third of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and except as otherwise provided by statute or rule of law, or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by these By-Laws, the vote, in person or by proxy, of the holders of a majority of the shares constituting such quorum shall be binding upon all stockholders of the Corporation. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote may adjourn any meeting, from time to time but not for a period of more than thirty (30) days at any one time, until a quorum shall attend. At any such adjourned meeting at which a quorum shall be present, any business may be transacted which might have been transacted at the meeting as originally called. Unless otherwise provided by statute, no notice of an adjourned meeting need be given.
SECTION 7.
Proxies.
7.1
Appointment.
Each stockholder entitled to vote at a meeting of stockholders or to express consent or dissent to corporate action in writing without a meeting may authorize another person or persons to act for such stockholder by proxy. Such authorization may be accomplished (a) by the stockholder or such stockholder's authorized officer, director, employee, or agent executing a writing or causing his or her signature to be affixed to such writing by any reasonable means, including facsimile signature, or (b) by transmitting or authorizing the transmission of a telegram, cablegram, or other means of electronic transmission to the intended holder of the proxy or to a proxy solicitation firm, proxy support service, or similar agent duly authorized by the intended proxy holder to receive such transmission; provided, that any such telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission must either set forth or be accompanied by information from which it can be determined that the telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission was authorized by the stockholder. Any copy, facsimile telecommunication, or other reliable reproduction of the writing or transmission by which a stockholder has authorized another person to act as proxy for such stockholder may be substituted or used in lieu of the original writing or transmission for any and all purposes for which the original writing or transmission could be used, provided that such copy, facsimile telecommunication, or other reproduction shall be a complete reproduction of the entire original writing or transmission.
7.2
Delivery to Corporation; Duration.
A proxy shall be filed with the Secretary of the Corporation before or at the time of the meeting or the delivery to the Corporation of the consent to corporate action in writing. A proxy shall become invalid three (3) years after the date of its execution, unless otherwise provided in the proxy. A proxy with respect to a specified meeting shall entitle the holder thereof to vote at any reconvened meeting following adjournment of such meeting but shall not be valid after the final adjournment thereof.
 
SECTION 8.
Inspectors of Election.
8.1
Appointment.
In advance of any meeting of stockholders, the Board of Directors of the Corporation shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspectors of election at such meeting and to make a written report thereof. The Board of Directors may designate one or more persons to serve as alternate inspectors to serve in place of any inspector who is unable or fails to act. If no inspector or alternate is able to act at a meeting of stockholders, the chairman of such meeting shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspector at such meeting.
8.2
Duties.
The inspectors of election shall (a) ascertain the number of shares of the Corporation outstanding and the voting power of each such share; (b) determine the shares represented at the meeting and the validity of proxies and ballots; (c) count all votes and ballots; (d) determine and retain for a reasonable period of time a record of the disposition of any challenges made to any determination by them; and (e) certify their determination of the number of shares represented at the meeting and their count of the votes and ballots. Each inspector shall, before entering upon the discharge of his or her duties, take and sign an oath to faithfully execute the duties of inspector with strict impartiality and according to the best of his or her ability. The inspectors may appoint or retain other persons or entities to assist them in the performance of their duties.
8.3
Determination of Proxy Validity.
The validity of any proxy or ballot executed for a meeting of stockholders shall be determined by the inspectors of election in accordance with the applicable provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law as then in effect. In determining the validity of any proxy transmitted by telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission, the inspectors shall record in writing the information upon which they relied in making such determination.
SECTION 11.
Fixing the Record Date.
11.1
Meetings.
For the purpose of determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at any meeting of stockholders or any adjournment thereof, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which record date shall be not fewer than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the date of such meeting. If the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, the record date for each special meeting of stockholders shall be not fewer than fifty-five (55) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date, unless the calling of such meeting is ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation. If no record date is fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall be at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which notice is given, or, if notice is waived, at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which the meeting is held. A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting; provided, however, that the Board of Directors may fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
9.2
Consent to Corporate Action Without a Meeting.
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which date shall not be more than ten (10) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days after the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, when no prior action by the Board of Directors is required by Chapter 1 of the Delaware General Corporation Law as now or hereafter amended, shall be the first date on which a signed written consent setting forth the action taken or proposed to be taken is delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the records of proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Delivery made to the Corporation's registered office shall be by hand or by certified or registered mail,
 
return receipt requested. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors and prior action by the Board of Directors is required by Chapter 1 of the Delaware General Corporation Law as now or hereafter amended, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution taking such prior action.
11.3
Dividends, Distributions, and Other Rights.
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to receive payment of any dividend or other distribution or allotment of any rights or the stockholders entitled to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion, or exchange of stock, or for the purpose of any other lawful action, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted, and which record date shall be not more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days prior to such action. If no record date is fixed, the record date for determining stockholders for any such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution relating thereto.
9.4
Voting List.
At least ten (10) days before each meeting of stockholders, a complete list of the stockholders entitled to vote at such meeting shall be made, arranged in alphabetical order, and showing the address of each stockholder and the number of shares registered in the name of each stockholder. This list shall be open to examination by any stockholder, for any purpose germane to the meeting, for a period of ten (10) days prior to the meeting, either (i) on a reasonably accessible electronic network, provided that the information required to gain access to such list is provided with the notice of meeting, or (ii) during ordinary business hours at the principal place of business of the Corporation. The list shall also be produced and kept at such meeting for inspection by any stockholder who is present.
SECTION 10.
Action by Stockholders Without a Meeting.
Subject to the provisions of Article NINTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, any action which could be taken at any annual or special meeting of stockholders may be taken without a meeting, without prior notice, and without a vote, if a consent or consents in writing, setting forth the action so taken, are (a) signed by the holders of outstanding stock having not fewer than the minimum number of votes that would be necessary to authorize or take such action at a meeting at which all shares entitled to vote thereon were present and voted and (b) delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the records of proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Delivery made to the Corporation's registered office shall be by hand or by certified mail or registered mail, return receipt requested. Every written consent shall bear the date of signature of each stockholder who signs the consent, and no written consent shall be effective to take the corporate action referred to therein unless written consents signed by a sufficient number of stockholders to take such action are delivered to the Corporation, in the manner required by this Section, within sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days of the date of the earliest dated consent delivered to the Corporation in the manner required by this Section 10. The validity of any consent executed by a proxy for a stockholder pursuant to a telegram, cablegram, or other means of electronic transmission transmitted to such proxy holder by or upon the authorization of the stockholder shall be determined by or at the direction of the Secretary of the Corporation. A written record of the information upon which the person making such determination relied shall be made and kept in the records of the proceedings of the stockholders. Any such consent shall be inserted in the minute book as if it were the minutes of a meeting of stockholders. Prompt notice of the taking of the corporate action without a meeting by less than unanimous written consent shall be given to those stockholders who have not consented in writing.
SECTION 11.
Notice of Nominations and Other Stockholder Business; Required Vote for Directors; Director Qualification.
11.1
Notice of Nominations and Other Stockholder Business.
A.
Annual Meetings of Stockholders.
1. Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors and the proposal of other business to be considered by the stockholders may be made at an annual meeting of stockholders (a) as specified in the Corporation's notice of meeting (or any supplement thereto); (b) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof; or (c) by any stockholder of the Corporation who (i) was a stockholder of record at the time the notice provided for
 
in this By-Law is delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation, (ii) is entitled to vote at the meeting, and (iii) complies with the notice procedures set forth in this By-Law as to such nomination or other business; clause (c) shall be the exclusive means for a stockholder to make nominations or submit proposals for other business (other than matters properly brought under Rule 14a-8 under the Exchange Act and included in the Corporation's notice of meeting) before an annual meeting of stockholders.
2. Without qualification, for any nominations or any other business to be properly brought before an annual meeting by a stockholder pursuant to Section 11.1.A(1)(c), the stockholder must have given timely notice thereof in writing to the Secretary of the Corporation and any such proposed business (other than the nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors) must constitute a proper matter for stockholder action. To be timely, a stockholder's notice shall be delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not earlier than the close of business on the one hundred and twentieth (120th) day and not later than the close of business on the ninetieth (110th) day prior to the first anniversary of the preceding year's annual meeting; provided, however, that in the event that the date of the annual meeting is more than thirty (30) days before or more than seventy (70) days after such anniversary date, notice by the stockholder to be timely must be so delivered not later than the close of business on the later of the ninetieth (110th) day prior to such annual meeting and the tenth (10th) day following the day on which public announcement of the date of such annual meeting is first made by the Corporation. In no event shall the postponement of a meeting as to which notice has been sent to stockholders commence a new time period (or extend any time period) for the giving of a stockholder's notice as described above. To be in proper form, such stockholder's notice (whether given pursuant to this Section 11.1.A(2) or Section 11.1.B) to the Secretary of the Corporation must: (a) set forth, as to the stockholder giving the notice and the beneficial owner, if any, on whose behalf the nomination or proposal for other business is made (i) the name and address of such stockholder, as they appear on the Corporation's books, and of such beneficial owner, if any, (ii) (A) the class or series and number of shares of the Corporation which are, directly or indirectly, owned beneficially and of record by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, (B) any option, warrant, convertible security, stock appreciation right, or similar right with an exercise or conversion privilege or a settlement payment or mechanism at a price related to any class or series of shares of the Corporation or with a value derived in whole or in part from the value of any class or series of shares of the Corporation, whether or not such instrument or right shall be subject to settlement in the underlying class or series of shares of the Corporation or otherwise (a "Derivative Instrument") directly or indirectly owned beneficially by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, and any other direct or indirect opportunity to profit or share in any profit derived from any increase or decrease in the value of shares of the Corporation, (C) any proxy, contract, arrangement, understanding, or relationship pursuant to which such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, has a right to vote any shares of any security of the Corporation, (D) any short interest in any security of the Corporation (for purposes of this By-Law a person shall be deemed to have a short interest in a security if such person directly or indirectly, through any contract, arrangement, understanding, relationship or otherwise, has the opportunity to profit or share in any profit derived from any decrease in the value of the subject security), (E) any rights to dividends on the shares of the Corporation owned beneficially by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, that are separated or separable from the underlying shares of the Corporation, (F) any proportionate interest in shares of the Corporation or Derivative Instruments held, directly or indirectly, by a general or limited partnership in which such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, is a general partner or, directly or indirectly, beneficially owns an interest in a general partner, and (G) any performance-related fees (other than an asset-based fee) that such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, is entitled to based on any increase or decrease in the value of shares of the Corporation or Derivative Instruments, if any, all such information to be provided as of the date of such notice, including, without limitation, any such interests held by members of such stockholder's and such beneficial owner's, if any, immediate family sharing the same household (which information shall be supplemented by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, not later than ten (10) days after the record date for the annual meeting to disclose such ownership as of the record date), (iii) any other information relating to such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, that would be required to be disclosed in a proxy statement or other filings required to be made in connection with solicitations of proxies for, as applicable, the proposal of other business and/or for the election of directors in a contested election pursuant to Section 14 of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, and (iv) a representation (A) that the stockholder is a holder of record of stock of the Corporation entitled to vote at such annual meeting and intends to appear in person or by proxy at the annual meeting to propose such business or nomination and (B) whether the stockholder or the beneficial owner, if any, intends or is part of a group which intends (x) to deliver a proxy statement and/or form of proxy to holders of at least the percentage of the Corporation's outstanding capital stock required to approve or adopt the proposal or elect the nominee and/or (y) otherwise to solicit proxies from stockholders in support of such proposal or nomination; (b) if the notice relates to any business other than the nomination of a director or directors that the stockholder proposes to bring before the annual meeting, set forth (i) a
 
brief description of the business desired to be brought before the annual meeting, the text of the proposal or business (including the text of any resolutions proposed for consideration and in the event that such business includes a proposal to amend these By-Laws, the language of the proposed amendment), the reasons for conducting such business at the annual meeting and any material interest of such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, in such business and (ii) a description of all agreements, arrangements, and understandings between such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, and their respective affiliates and associates, and any other person or persons (including their names) acting in concert therewith in connection with the proposal of such business by such stockholder; (c) set forth, as to each person, if any, whom the stockholder proposes to nominate for election or reelection to the Board of Directors (i) all information relating to such person that would be required to be disclosed in a proxy statement or other filings required to be made in connection with solicitations of proxies for election of directors in a contested election pursuant to Section 14 of the Exchange Act, (ii) such person's written consent to being named in the proxy statement as a nominee and to serving as a director if elected and a statement whether such person, if elected, intends to tender, promptly following such person's election or reelection, an irrevocable resignation effective upon such person's failure to receive the required vote for reelection at the next meeting at which such person would face reelection and upon acceptance of such resignation by the Board of Directors, and (iii) a description of all direct and indirect compensation and other material monetary agreements, arrangements and understandings during the past three (3) years, and any other material relationships, between or among such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, and their respective affiliates and associates, or any other person or persons (including their names) acting in concert therewith, on the one hand, and each proposed nominee, and his or her respective affiliates and associates, or any other person or persons (including their names) acting in concert therewith, on the other hand, including, without limitation, all information that would be required to be disclosed pursuant to Rule 404 promulgated under Regulation S-K if the stockholder making the nomination and any beneficial owner on whose behalf the nomination is made, if any, or any affiliate or associate thereof or person acting in concert therewith, were the "registrant" for purposes of such rule and the nominee were a director or executive officer of such registrant; and (d) with respect to each nominee for election or reelection to the Board of Directors, include the completed and signed questionnaire, representation and agreement required by Section 11.3. The Corporation may require any proposed nominee to furnish such other information as may reasonably be required by the Corporation to determine the eligibility of such proposed nominee to serve as an independent director of the Corporation or that could be material to a reasonable stockholder's understanding of the independence, or lack thereof, of such nominee.
3. Notwithstanding anything in the second sentence of Section 11.1.A(2) to the contrary, in the event that the number of directors to be elected to the Board of Directors of the Corporation is increased effective at the annual meeting and there is no public announcement by the Corporation naming all of the nominees for director or specifying the size of the increased Board of Directors at least one hundred (100) days prior to the first anniversary of the preceding year's annual meeting, a stockholder's notice required by this By-Law shall also be considered timely, but only with respect to nominees for any new positions created by such increase, if it shall be delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not later than the close of business on the tenth (10th) day following the day on which such public announcement is first made by the Corporation.
B.
Special Meetings of Stockholders.
Only such business shall be conducted at a special meeting of stockholders as shall have been brought before the special meeting pursuant to the Corporation's notice of meeting. Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors may be made at a special meeting at which directors are to be elected pursuant to the Corporation's notice of special meeting (a) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof or stockholders pursuant to Article 1, Section 2 hereof, or (b) provided that the Board of Directors or stockholders pursuant to Article 1, Section 2 hereof has determined that directors shall be elected at such special meeting, by any stockholder of the Corporation who (i) is a stockholder of record at the time the notice provided for in this By-Law is delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation and at the time of the special meeting, (ii) is entitled to vote at the special meeting, and (iii) complies with the notice procedures set forth in this By-Law as to such nomination. In the event the Corporation calls a special meeting for the purpose of electing one or more directors to the Board of Directors, any such stockholder may nominate a person or persons (as the case may be) for election to such position(s) as specified in the Corporation's notice of meeting, if the stockholder's notice required by Section 11.1.A(2) (including the completed and signed questionnaire, representation and agreement required by Section 11.3) shall be delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not earlier than the close of business on the one hundred and twentieth (120th) day prior to such special meeting and not later than the close of business on the later of the ninetieth (110th) day prior to such special meeting and the tenth (10th) day following the
 
day on which public announcement is first made of the date of the special meeting and of the nominees proposed by the Board of Directors to be elected at such special meeting. In no event shall the postponement of a special meeting as to which notice has been sent to stockholders commence a new time period (or extend any time period) for the giving of a stockholder's notice as described above.
C.
General.
1. Only such persons who are nominated in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law shall be eligible to serve as directors and only such business shall be conducted at a meeting of stockholders as shall have been brought before the meeting in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law. Except as otherwise provided by law, the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, the chairman of the meeting shall have the power and duty (a) to determine whether a nomination or any other business proposed to be brought before the meeting was made or proposed, as the case may be, in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law (including whether the stockholder or beneficial owner, if any, on whose behalf the nomination or proposal is made solicited (or is part of a group which solicited) or did not so solicit, as the case may be, proxies in support of such stockholder's nominee or proposal in compliance with such stockholder's representation as required by Section 11.1.A(2)(a)(iv)) and (b) if any proposed nomination or business was not made or proposed in compliance with this By-Law, to declare that such nomination shall be disregarded or that such proposed business shall not be transacted. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this By-Law, unless otherwise required by law, if the stockholder (or a qualified representative of the stockholder) does not appear at the annual or special meeting of stockholders of the Corporation to present a nomination or proposed business, such nomination shall be disregarded and such proposed business shall not be transacted, notwithstanding that proxies in respect of such vote may have been received by the Corporation. For purposes of this By-Law, to be considered a qualified representative of the stockholder, a person must be a duly authorized officer, manager, or partner of such stockholder or must be authorized by a writing executed by such stockholder or an electronic transmission delivered by such stockholder to act for such stockholder as proxy at the annual or special meeting and such person must produce such writing or electronic transmission, or a reliable reproduction of the writing or electronic transmission, at the annual or special meeting.
1. For purposes of this By-Law, "public announcement" shall mean disclosure in a press release reported by the Dow Jones News Service, Associated Press, or comparable national news service or in a document publicly filed by the Corporation with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to Section 13, 14 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.
2. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this By-Law, a stockholder shall also comply with all applicable requirements of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder with respect to the matters set forth in this By-Law; provided, however, that any references in these By-Laws to the Exchange Act are not intended to and shall not limit the requirements applicable to any nominations or proposals as to any other business to be considered pursuant to this By-Law (including Section 11.1A(1)(c) or Section 11.1B). Nothing in this By-Law shall be deemed to affect any rights (a) of stockholders to request inclusion of proposals in the Corporation's proxy statement pursuant to Rule 14a-8 under the Exchange Act or (b) of the holders of any series of Preferred Stock if and to the extent provided for under law, the Certificate of Incorporation, or these By-Laws.
11.2
Required Vote for Directors.
A nominee for director shall be elected to the Board of Directors if the votes cast for such nominee's election exceed the votes cast against such nominee's election; provided, however, that the directors shall be elected by a plurality of the votes cast at any meeting of stockholders for which (i) the Secretary of the Corporation receives a notice that a stockholder has nominated a person for election to the Board of Directors in compliance with the advance notice requirements for stockholder nominees for director set forth in Section 11.1 of this By-law and (ii) such nomination has not been withdrawn by such stockholder on or prior to the tenth day preceding the date the Corporation first mails its notice of meeting for such meeting to stockholders. If directors are to be elected by a plurality of the votes cast, stockholders shall not be permitted to vote against a nominee. Votes cast shall exclude abstentions with respect to that director's election.
11.3
Director Qualification: Submission of Questionnaire, Representation, and Agreement.
To be eligible to be a nominee for election or reelection as a director of the Corporation, a person must deliver (in accordance with the time periods prescribed for delivery of notice under Section 11.1) to the Secretary of the Corporation at the principal executive offices of the Corporation a written questionnaire with respect to the
 
background and qualification of such person and the background of any other person or entity on whose behalf the nomination is being made (which questionnaire shall be provided by the Secretary upon written request) and a written representation and agreement (in the form provided by the Secretary of the Corporation upon written request), that such person (a) is not and will not become a party to (i) any agreement, arrangement, or understanding with, and has not given any commitment or assurance to, any person or entity as to how such person, if elected as a director of the Corporation, will act or vote on any issue or question (a "Voting Commitment") that has not been disclosed to the Corporation or (ii) any Voting Commitment that could limit or interfere with such person's ability to comply, if elected as a director of the Corporation, with such person's fiduciary duties under applicable law; (b) is not and will not become a party to any agreement, arrangement, or understanding with any person or entity other than the Corporation with respect to any direct or indirect compensation, reimbursement, or indemnification in connection with service or action as a director that has not been disclosed therein; and (c) in such person's individual capacity and on behalf of any person or entity on whose behalf the nomination is being made, would be in compliance, if elected as a director of the Corporation, and will comply with all applicable publicly disclosed corporate governance, conflict of interest, confidentiality and stock ownership and trading policies and guidelines of the Corporation.
SECTION 12.
Notice to Corporation.
Any written notice required to be delivered by a stockholder to the Corporation pursuant to Section 11.1 of this Article I or Section 2.1 of Article II of these By-Laws must be given, either by personal delivery or by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, to the Secretary of the Corporation at the Corporation's executive offices in the City of Chicago, State of Illinois.
SECTION 1.
Number and Term of Office.
The number of directors shall be eleven (11), but the number may be increased, or decreased to not less than three (3), from time to time, either by the directors by adoption of a resolution to such effect or by the stockholders by amendment of these By-Laws in accordance with Article VIII. At each annual meeting of stockholders, each director shall be elected to hold office until the next annual meeting or until his or her successor shall be elected and qualified or until his or her earlier resignation or removal.
SECTION 2.
Nomination and Election.
 
 
SECTION 3.
Place of Meeting.
Meetings of the Board of Directors, or of any committee thereof, may be held either within or without the State of Delaware.
SECTION 4.
Annual Meeting.
Each year the Board of Directors shall meet in connection with the annual meeting of stockholders for the purpose of electing officers and for the transaction of other business. No notice of such annual meeting is required. Such annual meeting may be held at any other time or place which shall be specified in a notice given as hereinafter provided for special meetings of the Board of Directors, or in a consent and waiver of notice thereof, signed by all the directors.
 
SECTION 5.
Stated Meetings.
The Board of Directors may, by resolution adopted by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors, from time to time appoint the time and place for holding stated meetings of the Board of Directors, if by it deemed advisable; and such stated meetings shall thereupon be held at the time and place so appointed, without the giving of any special notice with regard thereto. In case the day appointed for a stated meeting shall fall upon a legal holiday, such meeting shall be held on the next following day, not a legal holiday, at the regularly appointed hour. Except as otherwise provided in these By-Laws, any and all business may be transacted at any stated meeting.
SECTION 6.
Special Meetings.
6.1
Convenors and Notice.
Special meetings of the Board of Directors may be called by or at the request of the Chairman of the Board of Directors or any two (2) directors. Notice of a special meeting of the Board of Directors, stating the place, day, and hour of the meeting, shall be given to each director in writing (by mail, wire, facsimile, or personal delivery) or orally (by telephone or in person).
6.2
Waiver of Notice.
With respect to a special meeting of the Board of Directors, a written waiver, signed by a director, or waiver by electronic transmission, shall be deemed equivalent to notice to that director. A director's attendance at a meeting shall constitute that director's waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the director attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting was not lawfully called or convened. Neither the business to be transacted at, nor the purpose of, any regular or special meeting of the Board of Directors need be specified in the waiver of notice of such meeting.
SECTION 7.
Quorum and Manner of Acting.
Except as herein otherwise provided, forty percent (40%) of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided in these By-Laws at the time of any stated or special meeting of the Board of Directors or, if vacancies exist on the Board of Directors, forty percent (40%) of such number of directors then in office; provided, however, that such number may not be less than one-third of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided in these By-Laws, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and, except as otherwise required by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by these By-Laws, the act of a majority of the directors present at any such meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of the Board of Directors. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the directors present may adjourn any meeting, from time to time, until a quorum is present. No notice of any adjourned meeting need be given.
SECTION 8.
Chairman of the Board.
The Chairman of the Board shall preside, when present, at all meetings of the Board of Directors, except as otherwise provided by law.
SECTION 11.
Resignations.
Any director of the Corporation may resign at any time by giving written notice or notice by electronic transmission thereof to the Secretary of the Corporation. Such resignation shall take effect at the time specified therefor or if the time is not specified, upon delivery thereof; and, unless otherwise specified with respect thereto, the acceptance of such resignation shall not be necessary to make it effective.
SECTION 10.
Removal of Directors.
Any directors may be removed with or without cause by the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, at a meeting of stockholders called for that purpose; and the vacancy on the Board of Directors caused by any such removal may be filled by the stockholders at such meeting or at any subsequent meeting.
 
SECTION 11.
Filling of Vacancies Not Caused by Removal.
In case of any increase in the number of directors, or of any vacancy created by death or resignation, the additional director or directors may be elected or, as the case may be, the vacancy or vacancies may be filled, either (a) by the Board of Directors at any meeting, (i) if the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, or (ii) if the Corporation does not have an Interested Stockholder, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the remaining directors, though less than a quorum or (b) by the stockholders entitled to vote, either at an annual meeting or at a special meeting thereof called for that purpose, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the outstanding shares entitled to vote at such meeting.
SECTION 12.
Directors' Fees.
The Board of Directors shall have authority to determine from time to time the amount of compensation that shall be paid to its members for attendance at meetings of the Board of Directors or of any committee of the Board of Directors.
SECTION 13.
Action Without a Meeting.
Any action required or permitted to be taken at any meeting of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof may be taken without a meeting if all members of the Board of Directors or committee, as the case may be, consent thereto in writing, and the writing or writings are filed with the minutes of proceedings of the Board of Directors or committee.
SECTION 1.
Audit Committee.
In addition to any committees appointed pursuant to Section 2 of this Article, there shall be an Audit Committee, appointed annually by the Board of Directors, consisting of at least three (3) directors who are not members of management. It shall be the responsibility of the Audit Committee to review the scope and results of the annual independent audit of books and records of the Corporation and its subsidiaries and to discharge such other responsibilities as may from time to time be assigned to it by the Board of Directors. The Audit Committee shall meet at such times and places as the members deem advisable, and shall make such recommendations to the Board of Directors as they consider appropriate.
SECTION 2.
Other Committees.
2.1 The Board of Directors may appoint standing or temporary committees and invest such committees with such powers as it may see fit, with power to subdelegate such powers if deemed desirable by the Board of Directors; but no such committee shall have the power or authority of the Board of Directors to adopt, amend, or repeal these By-Laws or approve, adopt, or recommend to the stockholders of the Corporation any action or matter expressly required by the Certificate of Incorporation, these By-Laws or the Delaware General Corporation Law to be submitted to stockholders for approval.
Committee Powers.
2.2 The Board of Directors may designate one or more directors as alternate members of any committee, who may replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of the committee. In the absence or disqualification of a member of a committee, the member or members thereof present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, whether or not such member or members constitute a quorum, may unanimously appoint another member of the Board of Directors to act at the meeting in the place of any such absent or disqualified member.
Committee Members.
 
SECTION 3.
Quorum and Manner of Acting.
A majority of the number of directors composing any committee of the Board of Directors, as established and fixed by resolution of the Board of Directors, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at any meeting of such committee but, if less than a majority are present at a meeting, a majority of such directors present may adjourn the meeting from time to time without further notice. The act of a majority of the members of a committee present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of such committee.
SECTION 1.
Officers.
The elected officers of the Corporation shall be a Chairman of the Board of Directors (who shall be a director) and, at the discretion of the Board of Directors, a President (who shall be a director), and one or more Vice Presidents (each of whom may be assigned by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer an additional title descriptive of the functions assigned to such officer and one or more of whom may be designated Executive or Senior Vice President). The Board of Directors may also elect one or more Vice Chairmen. The Board of Directors shall also designate either the Chairman of the Board of Directors or the President as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation. The Board of Directors shall appoint a Controller, a Secretary, and a Treasurer. Any number of offices, whether elective or appointive, may be held by the same person. The Chief Executive Officer may, by a writing filed with the Secretary, designate titles as officers for employees and agents and appoint Assistant Secretaries and Assistant Treasurers as, from time to time, may appear to be necessary or advisable in the conduct of the affairs of the Corporation and may, in the same manner, terminate or change such titles.
SECTION 2.
Term of Office.
So far as practicable, all elected officers shall be elected at the annual meeting of the Board of Directors in each year, and shall hold office until the annual meeting of the Board of Directors in the next subsequent year and until their respective successors are chosen. The Controller, Secretary, and Treasurer shall hold office at the pleasure of the Board of Directors.
SECTION 3.
Salaries of Elected Officers.
The salaries paid to the elected officers of the Corporation shall be authorized or approved by the Board of Directors.
SECTION 4.
Bonuses.
None of the officers, directors, or employees of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations shall at any time be paid any bonus or share in the earnings or profits of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations except pursuant to a plan approved by affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members of the Board of Directors.
SECTION 5.
Removal of Elected and Appointed Officers.
Any elected or appointed officer may be removed at any time, either for or without cause, by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors, at any meeting called for the purpose.
SECTION 6.
Vacancies.
If any vacancy occurs in any office, the Board of Directors may elect or appoint a successor to fill such vacancy for the remainder of the term.
 
SECTION 1.
Chairman of the Board.
The Chairman of the Board of Directors shall preside, when present, at all meetings of the stockholders (except as otherwise provided by statute) and at all meetings of the Board of Directors. The Chairman shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation; to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the Chairman by the Board of Directors.
SECTION 2.
President.
The President shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation and to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; during the absence or disability of the Chairman of the Board of Directors, to exercise the Chairman's powers and to perform the Chairman's duties; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the President by the Board of Directors; provided, that if the office of President is vacant, the Chairman shall exercise the duties ordinarily exercised by the President until such time as a President is elected or appointed.
SECTION 3.
Chief Executive Officer.
The officer designated by the Board of Directors as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation shall have general and active control of its business and affairs. The Chief Executive Officer shall have general power to appoint or designate all employees and agents of the Corporation whose appointment or designation is not otherwise provided for and to fix the compensation thereof, subject to the provisions of these By-Laws; to remove or suspend any employee or agent who shall not have been elected or appointed by the Board of Directors or other body; to suspend for cause any employee, agent, or officer, other than an elected officer, pending final action by the body which shall have appointed such employee, agent, or officer; and to exercise all the powers usually pertaining to the office held by the Chief Executive Officer of a corporation.
SECTION 4.
Vice Presidents and Controller.
The several Vice Presidents and the Controller shall perform all such duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of them, from time to time, by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer, respectively.
SECTION 5.
Secretary.
The Secretary shall attend to the giving of notice of all meetings of stockholders and of the Board of Directors and shall keep and attest true records of all such proceedings. The Secretary shall have charge of the corporate seal and have authority to attest any and all instruments or writings to which the same may be affixed and shall keep and account for all books, documents, papers, and records of the Corporation relating to its corporate organization. The Secretary shall have authority to sign stock certificates and shall generally perform all the duties usually appertaining to the office of secretary of a corporation. In the absence of the Secretary, an Assistant Secretary or Secretary pro tempore shall perform the duties of the Secretary.
SECTION 6.
Treasurer.
The Treasurer shall have the care and custody of all moneys, funds, and securities of the Corporation, and shall deposit or cause to be deposited all funds of the Corporation in accordance with directions or authorizations of the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer. The Treasurer shall have power to sign stock certificates, to indorse for deposit or collection, or otherwise, all checks, drafts, notes, bills of exchange, or other commercial paper payable to the Corporation, and to give proper receipts or discharges therefor. In the absence of the Treasurer, an Assistant Treasurer shall perform the duties of the Treasurer.
 
SECTION 7.
Additional Powers and Duties.
In addition to the foregoing especially enumerated duties and powers, the several officers of the Corporation shall perform such other duties and exercise such further powers as may be provided in these By-Laws or as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine, or as may be assigned to them by any superior officer.
SECTION 8.
Disaster Emergency Powers of Acting Officers.
If, as a result of a disaster or other state of emergency, the Chief Executive Officer is unable to perform the duties of that office, (a) the powers and duties of the Chief Executive Officer shall be performed by the employee with the highest base salary who shall be available and capable of performing such powers and duties and, if more than one such employee has the same base salary, by the employee whose surname begins with the earliest letter of the alphabet among the group of those employees with the same base salary; (b) the officer performing such duties shall continue to perform such powers and duties until the Chief Executive Officer becomes capable of performing those duties or until the Board of Directors shall have elected a new Chief Executive Officer or designated another individual as Acting Chief Executive Officer; (c) such officer shall have the power in addition to all other powers granted to the Chief Executive Officer by these By-Laws and by the Board of Directors to appoint an acting President, acting Vice President - Finance, acting Controller, acting Secretary, and acting Treasurer, if any of the persons duly elected to any such office is not, by reason of such disaster or emergency, able to perform the duties of such office, each of such acting appointees to serve in such capacities until the officer for whom the appointee is acting becomes capable of performing the duties of such office or until the Board of Directors shall have designated another individual to perform such duties or have elected another person to fill such office; (d) any such acting officer so appointed shall be entitled to exercise all powers vested by these By-Laws or the Board of Directors in the duly elected officer for whom the acting officer is acting; and (e) anyone transacting business with the Corporation may rely upon a certification by any two (2) officers of the Corporation that a specified individual has succeeded to the powers of the Chief Executive Officer and that such person has appointed other acting officers as herein provided and any person, firm, corporation, or other entity to which such certification has been delivered by such officers may continue to rely upon it until notified of a change in writing signed by two (2) officers of the Corporation.
SECTION 1.
Stock Certificates.
The shares of the stock of the Corporation shall be represented by certificates, provided that the Board of Directors may provide by resolution or resolutions that some or all of any or all classes or series of stock shall be uncertificated shares. Any such resolution shall not apply to shares represented by certificate until such certificate is surrendered to the Corporation. Every holder of stock of the Corporation represented by a certificate shall be entitled to a certificate, signed by the Chairman of the Board of Directors or the President or a Vice President and the Treasurer or an Assistant Treasurer or the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary, certifying the number of shares owned by the stockholder in the Corporation. Any and all of the signatures on a certificate may be a facsimile. If any officer, transfer agent, or registrar who has signed or whose facsimile signature has been placed upon a certificate shall have ceased to be such officer, transfer agent, or registrar before such certificate is issued, it may be issued by the Corporation with the same effect as if he or she were such officer, transfer agent, or registrar at the date of issue.
SECTION 2.
Transfer Agents and Registrars.
The Board of Directors may, in its discretion, appoint responsible banks or trust companies in the Borough of Manhattan, in the City of New York, State of New York, and in such other city or cities as the Board of Directors may deem advisable, from time to time, to act as transfer agents and registrars of the stock of the Corporation; and, when such appointments shall have been made, no stock certificate shall be valid until countersigned by one of such transfer agents and registered by one of such registrars.
 
SECTION 3.
Transfers of Stock.
Shares of stock may be transferred by delivery of the certificates therefor, accompanied either by an assignment in writing on the back of the certificates or by written power of attorney to sell, assign, and transfer the same, signed by the record holder thereof (or, with respect to uncertificated shares, by delivery of duly executed instructions or in any other manner permitted by law), but no transfer shall affect the right of the Corporation to pay any dividend upon the stock to the holder of record thereof, or to treat the holder of record as the holder in fact thereof for all purposes, and no transfer shall be valid, except between the parties thereto, until such transfer shall have been made upon the books of the Corporation.
SECTION 4.
Lost Certificates.
The Board of Directors may provide for the issuance of new certificates of stock or uncertificated shares to replace certificates of stock lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, or alleged to be lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, upon such terms and in accordance with such procedures as the Board of Directors shall deem proper and prescribe.
SECTION 1.
Fiscal Year.
The fiscal year of the Corporation shall be the calendar year.
SECTION 2. (Repealed in its entirety by vote of the stockholders, May 5, 1975.)
SECTION 3.
Signing of Negotiable Instruments.
All bills, notes, checks, or other instruments for the payment of money shall be signed or countersigned by such officer or officers and in such manner as from time to time may be prescribed by resolution (whether general or special) of the Board of Directors.
SECTION 4.
Indemnification of Directors and Officers.
4.1
Right to Indemnification.
Each person who was or is made a party to or is threatened to be made a party to or is otherwise involved (including, without limitation, as a witness) in any actual or threatened action, suit, or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative, or investigative (hereinafter a "proceeding"), by reason of the fact that he or she is or was a director or officer of the Corporation or that, being or having been such a director or officer or an employee of the Corporation, he or she is or was serving at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation as a director, officer, employee, or agent of another corporation or of a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise, including service with respect to an employee benefit plan (hereinafter an "indemnitee"), whether the basis of such proceeding is alleged action in an official capacity as such a director, officer, employee, or agent or in any other capacity while serving as such a director, officer, employee, or agent, shall be indemnified and held harmless by the Corporation to the full extent permitted by the Delaware General Corporation Law, as the same exists or may hereafter be amended (but, in the case of any such amendment, only to the extent that such amendment permits the Corporation to provide broader indemnification rights than permitted prior thereto), or by other applicable law as then in effect, against all expense, liability, and loss (including attorneys' fees, judgments, fines, ERISA excise taxes or penalties, and amounts paid in settlement) actually and reasonably incurred or suffered by such indemnitee in connection therewith, and such indemnification shall continue as to an indemnitee who has ceased to be a director, officer, employee, or agent and shall inure to the benefit of the indemnitee's heirs, executors, and administrators; provided, however, that except as provided in Section 4.2 with respect to proceedings seeking to enforce rights to indemnification, the Corporation shall indemnify any such indemnitee in connection with a proceeding (or part thereof) initiated by such indemnitee only if such proceeding (or part
 
thereof) was authorized or ratified by the Board of Directors. The right to indemnification conferred in this Section 4.1 shall be a contract right and shall include the right to be paid by the Corporation the expenses incurred in defending any such proceeding in advance of its final disposition (hereinafter an "advancement of expenses"); provided, however, that an advancement of expenses incurred by an indemnitee in his or her capacity as a director or officer or former director or officer (and not in any other capacity in which service was or is rendered by such indemnitee, including, without limitation, service to an employee benefit plan) shall be made only upon delivery to the Corporation of an undertaking (hereinafter an "undertaking"), by or on behalf of such indemnitee, to repay all amounts so advanced if it shall ultimately be determined by final judicial decision from which there is no further right to appeal that such indemnitee is not entitled to be indemnified for such expenses under this Section 4.1 or otherwise; and provided, further, that an advancement of expenses shall not be made if the Board of Directors makes a good faith determination that such payment would violate law or public policy.
4.2
Right of Indemnitee to Bring Suit.
If a claim under Section 4.1 is not paid in full by the Corporation within sixty (60) days after a written claim has been received by the Corporation, except in the case of a claim for an advancement of expenses, in which case the applicable period shall be twenty (20) days, the indemnitee may at any time thereafter bring suit against the Corporation to recover the unpaid amount of the claim. If successful in whole or in part in any such suit, or in a suit brought by the Corporation to recover an advancement of expenses pursuant to the terms of an undertaking, the indemnitee shall also be entitled to be paid the expenses of prosecuting or defending such suit. The indemnitee shall be presumed to be entitled to indemnification under this Section 4 upon submission of a written claim (and, in an action brought to enforce a claim for an advancement of expenses, where the required undertaking has been tendered to the Corporation), and thereafter the Corporation shall have the burden of proof to overcome the presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled. Neither the failure of the Corporation (including the Board of Directors, independent legal counsel, or the stockholders) to have made a determination prior to the commencement of such suit that indemnification of the indemnitee is proper in the circumstances, nor an actual determination by the Corporation (including the Board of Directors, independent legal counsel, or the stockholders) that the indemnitee is not entitled to indemnification shall be a defense to the suit or create a presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled.
4.3
Nonexclusivity of Rights.
The rights to indemnification and to the advancement of expenses conferred in this Section 4 shall not be exclusive of any other right that any person may have or hereafter acquire under any statute, provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation, these By-Laws, any agreement, vote of stockholders or disinterested directors, or otherwise. Neither any amendment to or repeal of this Section 4 or of any of the procedures established by the Board of Directors pursuant to Section 4.7, nor the adoption of any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, nor, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any modification of law, shall eliminate or reduce the effect of the right or protection of any indemnitee to indemnification and to the advancement of expenses in accordance with the provisions hereof and thereof with respect to any proceeding (regardless of when such proceeding is first threatened, commenced or completed) arising out of, or related to, any acts or omissions of such indemnitee occurring prior to such amendment or repeal.
4.4
Insurance, Contracts, and Funding.
The Corporation may maintain insurance, at its expense, to protect itself and any director, officer, employee, or agent of the Corporation or another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise against any expense, liability, or loss, whether or not the Corporation would have the power to indemnify such person against such expense, liability, or loss under the Delaware General Corporation Law. The Corporation may, without further stockholder approval, enter into contracts with any indemnitee in furtherance of the provisions of this Section 4 and may create a trust fund, grant a security interest, or use other means (including, without limitation, a letter of credit) to ensure the payment of such amounts as may be necessary to effect indemnification as provided in this Section 4.
4.5
Persons Serving Other Entities.
Any person who is or was a director, officer, or employee of the Corporation who is or was serving (i) as a director or officer of another corporation of which a majority of the shares entitled to vote in the election of its directors is held by the Corporation or (ii) in an executive or management capacity in a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise of which the Corporation or a wholly owned subsidiary of the Corporation is a general partner or has a majority ownership shall be deemed to be so serving at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation and entitled to indemnification and advancement of expenses under Section 4.1.
 
4.6
Indemnification of Employees and Agents of the Corporation.
The Corporation may, by action of the Board of Directors, authorize one or more executive officers to grant rights to advancement of expenses to employees or agents of the Corporation on such terms and conditions as such officer or officers deem appropriate under the circumstances. The Corporation may, by action of the Board of Directors, grant rights to indemnification and advancement of expenses to employees or agents or groups of employees or agents of the Corporation with the same scope and effect as the provisions of this Section 4 with respect to the indemnification and advancement of expenses of directors and officers of the Corporation; provided, however, that an undertaking shall be made by an employee or agent only if required by the Board of Directors.
4.7
Procedures for the Submission of Claims.
The Board of Directors may establish reasonable procedures for the submission of claims for indemnification pursuant to this Section 4, determination of the entitlement of any person thereto, and review of any such determination. Such procedures shall be set forth in an appendix to these By-Laws and shall be deemed for all purposes to be a part hereof.
SECTION 1.
Amendment of the By-Laws: General.
Except as herein otherwise expressly provided, the By-Laws of the Corporation may be altered or repealed in any particular and new By-Laws, not inconsistent with any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or any provision of law, may be adopted, either by
A. the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority in number of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote at an annual meeting of stockholders or at a special meeting thereof, the notice of which special meeting shall include the form of the proposed alteration or repeal or of the proposed new By-Laws, or a summary thereof; or
B. either by
i. the affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors at any meeting thereof, or
ii. the affirmative vote of all the directors present at any meeting at which a quorum, less than a majority, is present;
provided, in either of the latter cases, that the notice of such meeting shall include the form of the proposed alteration or repeal or of the proposed new By-Laws, or a summary thereof; and provided, further, that Article I, Section 11.2 of these By-Laws may be amended only as set forth in Section 1.A of this By-Law, except that any amendment required by law or necessary or desirable to cure an administrative or technical deficiency may be made as provided in Section 1.B of this By-Law.
SECTION 2.
Amendments as to Compensation and Removal of Officers.
Notwithstanding anything contained in these By-Laws to the contrary, the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the Voting Stock, as defined in Article FOURTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, at a meeting of stockholders called for the purpose, shall be required to alter, amend, repeal, or adopt any provision inconsistent with Sections 3, 4 and 5 of Article IV of these By-Laws, notice of which meeting shall include the form of the proposed amendment, or a summary thereof.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
Boeing Elects Adm. Edmund Giambastiani, Jr. (Ret) to Board of Directors
 The Boeing [NYSE: BA] board of directors has elected retired U.S. Navy Adm. Edmund Giambastiani, Jr. as its newest member.
CHICAGO, Oct. 8, 2009
Giambastiani, 61, served in the Navy for 41 years, concluding his career as vice chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, from 2005 to 2007. In that role he was the second-highest ranking officer in the U.S. military.
His election to the Boeing board is effective immediately. He will serve on the audit and finance committees.
"We're honored to have Admiral Giambastiani join our board," said Boeing Chairman, President and Chief Executive Jim McNerney. "His substantial experience on both the acquisition and operational sides of the U.S. military will significantly support the ongoing strategic evolution of our company."
During his military career Giambastiani chaired the U.S. Defense Department's Joint Requirements Oversight Council, co-chaired the Defense Acquisition Board, was NATO's first commander for transformation, and led U.S. Joint Forces Command and the Atlantic Fleet Submarine Force, among other assignments.
Giambastiani graduated from the U.S. Naval Academy in 1970 with leadership distinction.
Contact:
Todd Blecher
312-544-2002


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20091021084706.txt.gz
TIME:20091021084706
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
(a) On October 21, 2009, The Boeing Company issued a press release reporting its financial results for the third quarter of 2009. A copy of the Company's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
(a) Not applicable
(b) Not applicable
(c) Not applicable
(d) Exhibits
99.1    Press Release issued by The Boeing Company dated October 21, 2009, reporting Boeing's financial results for the third quarter of 2009, furnished herewith.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Boeing Reports Third-Quarter Financial Results
 
 
 
 
 
Table 1. Summary Financial Results
 
 The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] reported a third-quarter net loss of $1.6 billion, or $2.23 per share, as revenues rose 9 percent to $16.7 billion. Current period results reflect the previously announced reclassification to research and development (R&D) of costs incurred through July for the first three 787 flight-test airplanes ($2.46 per share), spending on those planes for August and September ($0.14 per share), and the 747 charge ($0.99 per share), partially offset by solid performance in other commercial airplane programs and the company's defense business (Table 1). Last year's strike and supplier production problems reduced year-ago revenue by an estimated $2.1 billion and earnings by an estimated $0.60 per share.
CHICAGO, October 21, 2009
Revenues for the first nine months of 2009 rose 4 percent to $50.3 billion due to higher commercial deliveries and growth in the defense segment. Earnings for the first nine months declined to $0.06 per share, including the third-quarter impacts described above and a first-quarter $0.38 per share impact from reductions to future twin-aisle production rates and lower delivery price escalation forecasts in Commercial Airplanes.
 
Earnings guidance for 2009 has been adjusted to between $1.35 and $1.55 per share, from $4.70 to $5.00, to reflect the 787 and 747 impacts.
"The 787 cost reclassification and the 747 charge for increased costs and difficult market conditions clearly overshadowed what continues to be otherwise solid performance across our commercial production programs and defense business," said Boeing Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer Jim McNerney. "We look forward to getting the 787 and 747-8 in the air soon and moving forward with flight test and certification for these two important programs."
Boeing's quarterly operating cash flow was $1.2 billion, which includes higher cash receipts than the year-ago period partially offset by continued investment in development programs (Table 2). For the first nine months of 2009, operating cash flow was $2.4 billion. Free cash flow* was $1.0 billion in the quarter and $1.4 billion year-to-date.
Table 2. Cash Flow
 
 
Cash and investments in marketable securities totaled $6.6 billion at September 30, up 31 percent from the end of the second quarter. The cash position was improved by the issuance of $1.95 billion in debt partially offset by investing cash flows of $1.0 billion for the purchase of 787 facilities in South Carolina and payment of Sea Launch guarantees (Table 3). The company did not acquire any of its shares in the quarter.
Table 3. Cash, Marketable Securities and Debt Balances
 
 
 
Total company backlog at quarter-end was $320 billion, down 2 percent in the quarter, as backlog for both Commercial Airplanes and Integrated Defense Systems declined during the period.
Segment Results
Commercial Airplanes
Boeing Commercial Airplanes (BCA) third-quarter revenues increased 13 percent to $7.9 billion on higher deliveries partially offset by lower services volume, while last year's revenues were affected by a labor strike and supplier production problems. The current period operating loss of $2.8 billion reflects the previous 787 and 747 announcements mentioned above. R&D expense includes the $2.5 billion reclassification of costs incurred through July on the first three 787 flight test airplanes and $138 million of spending on those airplanes in August and September. The 747 forward-loss of $1.0 billion is due to increased production costs and difficult market conditions (Table 4).
For the first nine months of 2009, revenues rose to $24.9 billion on increased airplane deliveries, partially offset by lower volume in services. Operating earnings fell to a loss of $1.6 billion driven by the 787 and 747 impacts.
Table 4. Commercial Airplanes Operating Results
 
BCA booked 96 gross orders during the quarter while 17 others were removed from its order book. Contractual backlog was $254 billion, more than seven times BCA's expected 2009 revenues.
The 787 program has begun the previously announced reinforcement to an area within the side-of-body joint. First flight of the airplane remains on track to occur by the end of 2009, with first delivery scheduled for the fourth quarter of 2010. The company also recently completed its acquisition of the 787 production facility in South Carolina from Vought. Total firm orders are now 840 airplanes from 55 customers, including the previously disclosed ten-unit cancellation that occurred after quarter-end.
 
Integrated Defense Systems
Boeing Integrated Defense Systems (IDS) third-quarter revenues rose 3 percent to $8.7 billion on increased military aircraft deliveries and higher volume in services. Operating margins were 10.1 percent reflecting strong performance in Boeing Military Aircraft and Network & Space Systems (Table 5).
For the first nine months of 2009, IDS revenues increased by 5 percent to $25.1 billion on growth in Military Aircraft and Global Services segments as operating margins were 9.8 percent, increasing earnings 5 percent to $2.5 billion.
Table 5. Integrated Defense Systems Operating Results
 
Boeing Military Aircraft (BMA) third-quarter revenue rose 7 percent to $4.0 billion and operating margin expanded to 12.3 percent, reflecting improved delivery mix and strong execution across its programs. During the quarter, BMA delivered 34 aircraft, the third P-8A achieved its first flight, the P-8 India contract was finalized, and the Chinook program received a 15-aircraft contract from Canada.
Network & Space Systems third-quarter revenues were $2.7 billion primarily driven by lower volume on intelligence and security systems, missile defense, and combat systems. Operating margin was 9.3 percent reflecting strong performance across the segment's array of programs partially offset by a less favorable contract mix. During the quarter, key flight milestones were achieved on Directed Energy programs, and the company was awarded contracts to provide four of its new 702B satellite to Intelsat.
Global Services & Support (GS&S) revenues increased 15 percent on higher volume across its broad portfolio of services and logistics products. During the quarter, GS&S operating margins were 7.1 percent driven by a contract adjustment and less favorable contract mix. In this segment, the company was awarded contracts for A-10 modernization as part of a $1.6 billion lifecycle program support contract and a UK Chinook modernization contract.
 
IDS' backlog is $65.8 billion, nearly two times expected 2009 revenues. The reduction in backlog was primarily due to termination of the manned ground vehicle portion of the Future Combat Systems contract due to changing US defense priorities.
Boeing Capital Corporation
Boeing Capital Corporation (BCC) reported third-quarter pre-tax earnings of $39 million compared to $37 million in the same period last year (Table 6). During the quarter, BCC's portfolio balance declined slightly to $6.1 billion, down from $6.3 billion at the end of the second quarter, on normal portfolio run-off through customer payments and depreciation, partially offset by $153 million in new aircraft financings and other volume. BCC contributed $48 million in cash dividends to the company during the quarter. BCC's debt-to-equity ratio was unchanged at 5.0-to-1.
Table 6. Boeing Capital Corporation Operating Results
 
Additional Information
The "Other" segment consists primarily of Boeing Engineering, Operations and Technology, as well as certain results related to the financial consolidation of all business units. Other segment expense was $36 million in the third quarter.
Total pension expense for the quarter was $230 million, as compared to $176 million in the same period last year. A total of $254 million was recognized in the operating segments in the quarter (up from $125 million in the same period last year), partially offset by a $24 million contribution to earnings in unallocated items.
Unallocated expense was $202 million driven by higher deferred compensation expense partially offset by lower unallocated pension expense, up from $90 million in the same quarter last year which included a more favorable insurance adjustment.
 
Interest expense for the quarter was $92 million, up from $49 million in the same period last year due to additional debt issued in 2009. Other income (expense) decreased $59 million driven by lower interest earned on cash balances.
Outlook
The 2009 financial guidance is updated to include the previously disclosed 787 cost reclassification and 747 charge (Table 7).
Boeing's 2009 revenue guidance is reaffirmed at $68 billion to $69 billion. Earnings-per-share guidance for 2009 has been reduced to between $1.35 and $1.55 per share from $4.70 to $5.00 per share for the 787 cost reclassification and 747 charge. Operating cash flow guidance is reaffirmed at greater than $2.5 billion, including discretionary pension contributions of approximately $0.5 billion and an assumption of $0.8 billion for new commercial airplane financings. The company will issue financial guidance for 2010 with its fourth-quarter 2009 results.
Commercial Airplanes' 2009 delivery guidance remains at between 480 and 485 airplanes and is sold out. BCA's 2009 revenue is unchanged at between $34 billion and $35 billion, and operating margin is expected to be between (3) percent and (2.5) percent due to the previously discussed 787 and 747 impacts.
IDS guidance for 2009 remains unchanged with revenue between $33 billion and $34 billion and operating margins of approximately 10 percent.
Boeing Capital Corporation now expects that the aircraft finance portfolio will be stable as the amount of new aircraft financing in 2009 will approximate normal portfolio runoff due to customer payments and depreciation.
Boeing's 2009 R&D forecast is between $6.6 billion and $6.8 billion, up from $3.6 billion to $3.8 billion, driven by the 787 cost reclassification, an operating model adjustment to better balance BCA R&D efforts going forward, and higher IDS R&D. Capital expenditures for 2009 are expected to be approximately $1.3 billion, down from approximately $1.4 billion. The company's non-cash pension expense is expected to be approximately $0.9 billion in 2009. The third-quarter tax benefit related to the 787 cost reclassification and 747 charge was 30.6 percent, and the full-year tax benefit for both impacts is expected to be approximately 37 percent.
 
 
 
Non-GAAP Measure Disclosure
Management believes that the non-GAAP (Generally Accepted Accounting Principles) measures (indicated by an asterisk *) used in this report provide investors with important perspectives into the company's ongoing business performance. The company does not intend for the information to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the related GAAP measures. Other companies may define the measures differently. The following definitions are provided:
Free Cash Flow
Free cash flow is defined as GAAP less capital expenditures for . Management believes free cash flow provides investors with an important perspective on the cash available for shareholders, debt repayment, and acquisitions after making the capital investments required to support ongoing business operations and long term value creation. Free cash flow does not represent the residual cash flow available for discretionary expenditures as it excludes certain mandatory expenditures such as repayment of maturing debt. Management uses free cash flow internally to assess both business performance and overall liquidity. Table 2 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and free cash flow.
operating cash flow
property, plant and equipment additions
 
Certain statements in this report may be "forward-looking" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," "targets," "anticipates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions about future events that may not prove to be accurate. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak to events only as of the date they are made and we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise, except as required by federal securities laws. Specific factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, those set forth below and other important factors disclosed previously and from time to time in our other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission: the effect of economic conditions in the United States and globally; the impact on our accounts receivable, customer financing portfolios and allowance for losses of customer defaults and changes in customer credit ratings, credit default rates and collateral values; the impact on our revenues and operating results of changes to indices included in indexed price escalation clauses included in our contracts with commercial airplane and defense customers; the successful execution of our Commercial Airplanes and Integrated Defense Systems backlog; the effects of customers canceling, modifying and/or rescheduling contractual orders and advance payments; the timing and effects of any decisions to increase or decrease the rate of commercial airplane production; the timing and effects of decisions to complete or launch a Commercial Airplanes program; the ability to successfully develop and timely produce the 787 and 747-8 aircraft; the ability of our suppliers and, as applicable, subcontractors to successfully and timely perform their obligations; the effect on our revenues of political and legal processes, changing defense priorities, and associated budget reductions by U.S. and international government customers affecting Boeing defense programs; our relationship with our union-represented workforce and the negotiation of collective bargaining agreements; the impact of volatile fuel prices and the airline industry's response; the effect of trade and globalization on long-term growth in passenger and cargo traffic; the effect of world trade and credit availability on air cargo traffic; the effect of declines in aircraft valuations; the impact of airline traffic volumes and revenue yields on near-term global airline profitability; the impact on our revenues or operating results of airline bankruptcies; the availability of commercial and government financing and the extent to which we are called upon to fund outstanding financing commitments or satisfy other financing requests, and our ability to satisfy those requirements; the continuation of historical costs for fleet support services; the receipt of estimated award and incentive fees on U.S. government contracts; the future demand for commercial satellites and projections of future order flow; the potential for technical or quality issues on development programs, including the Airborne Early Warning and Control program, International KC-767 Tanker, other fixed-price development programs, or commercial satellite programs, to affect schedule and cost estimates, or cause us to incur a material charge or experience a termination for default; the outcome of any litigation and/or government investigation in which we are a party, and other contingencies; returns on pension fund assets, impacts of future interest rate changes on pension obligations and rising healthcare costs; our ability to access external capital resources to fund our operations; the amounts and effects of underinsured operations, including satellite launches; our ability to recover the proportionate amounts owed to us from the other Sea Launch partners; and the scope, nature or impact of acquisition or disposition activity and investment in any joint ventures/strategic alliances, including Sea Launch and United Launch Alliance, and indemnifications and guarantees related thereto.
Contact:
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20091029163518.txt.gz
TIME:20091029163518
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
At its scheduled meeting on October 25, 2009, the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of The Boeing Company (the "") approved an amendment to the restricted stock unit grant effective June 22, 2009 (the ") to James A. Bell, Executive Vice President, Corporate President and Chief Financial Officer. The amendment reduces the restricted stock units to 42,000 and changes the vesting date of the original award. The Amended Award is effective October 26, 2009.
Company
"Amended Award
The Amended Award was made under the Company's 2003 Incentive Stock Plan (the ) and is subject to the terms and conditions of the 2003 Plan. The Amended Award will vest 100% and settle in common stock (on a one-for-one basis) on December 31, 2011 and is subject to other terms contained in the Amended Form of Notice of Terms of Restricted Stock Units listed as Exhibit 10.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
"2003 Plan"
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: October 29, 2009
 

Exhibit 10.1
 
The Boeing Company (the "Company") awarded you a Restricted Stock Unit award effective [Date], and, in connection therewith, issued you a Notice of Terms of Restricted Stock Units dated [Date] (the "Original Notice"). The terms and conditions of that award have been amended, and the amended terms and conditions are reflected in this Amended Notice of Terms of Restricted Stock Units (the "Amended"). The Original Notice is hereby revoked and of no further force and effect.
 
 
 
 
 
5.1 While RSUs are in your account, they will earn dividend equivalents in the form of additional RSUs. Specifically, as of each dividend payment date for Boeing stock, your RSU account will be credited with additional RSUs ("Earnings Credit RSUs") equal in number to the number of shares of Boeing stock that could be bought with the cash dividends that would be paid on the RSUs in your account if each RSU were a share of Boeing stock. The number of RSUs that results from the Earnings Credit calculation will be to two decimal places.
5.2 The number of shares of Boeing stock that could be bought with such cash dividends will be
calculated based on the "Fair Market Value" of Boeing stock on the applicable dividend payment date. "Fair Market Value" here means the average of the high and the low per share trading prices for Boeing stock as reported in for the specific dividend payment date, or in such other source as the Company deems reliable.
The Wall Street Journal
5.3 Earnings Credit RSUs will vest at the same time as the RSUs with which they are associated.
 
 
 
 
10.1 Distribution from your RSU account will be made as soon as reasonably possible after the vesting of your RSUs, but not later than 60 days after the applicable vesting date. Distribution will be in whole shares of Boeing stock. The number of shares distributed will be equal to the number of whole vested RSUs in your account, subject to deductions described in paragraph 10.2. Fractional share values will be applied to income tax withholding.
10.2 The Company will deduct from the distribution of your vested RSUs any withholding or other taxes required by law and may deduct any amounts due from you to the Company or to a subsidiary of the Company.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20091105130508.txt.gz
TIME:20091105130508
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
This Current Report on Form 8-K is being filed to reflect certain adjustments that have been made to prior year consolidated financial statements of The Boeing Company (the "Company") that were previously filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission by the Company on February 9, 2009 in its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008. These adjustments are being filed for purposes of incorporation by reference into any future registration statements, including a Registration Statement on Form S-3 that we currently expect to file in respect of shares expected to be contributed to the Company's U.S. pension plans. The financial statements and summary of business segment data reflecting adjustments for the following items, previously disclosed in the Company's Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2009, are attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1:
A. Effective January 1, 2009, the Company adopted a newly issued accounting standard which requires the noncontrolling interest to be separately presented as a component of shareholders' equity. The accompanying Consolidated Statement of Financial Position as of December 31, 2007, Consolidated Statements of Shareholders' Equity for the years ended December 31, 2007 and 2006 and applicable business segment data for 2008, 2007 and 2006 have been adjusted to conform to the new standard.
B. Effective January 1, 2009, certain programs were realigned between the Company's Integrated Defense Systems segments. Business segment data for 2008, 2007 and 2006 have been adjusted to reflect the realignment.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized
 

Exhibit 99.1
Consolidated Statement of Financial Position
 
 
Consolidated Statements of Shareholders' Equity
 
 
Summary of Business Segment Data
 
 
Summary of Business Segment Data (continued)
Research and Development Expense
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20091110084628.txt.gz
TIME:20091110084628
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On November 9, 2009, The Boeing Company contributed 29,211,295 shares of its common stock to The Boeing Company Employee Retirement Plans Master Trust. The contributed shares have an estimated value of $1.5 billion. Evercore Trust Company, N.A. has been appointed as an independent investment manager to make investment decisions with respect to the contributed shares.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: November 10, 2009


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20091113170355.txt.gz
TIME:20091113170355
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On November 13, 2009, we entered into a $1.525 billion, 364-day revolving credit agreement (the "364-Day Credit Agreement"), with Citigroup Global Markets Inc. and J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. as joint lead arrangers and joint book managers, JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. as syndication agent and Citibank, N.A. as administrative agent, and a syndicate of lenders as defined in the 364-Day Credit Agreement. This facility replaces the $1.0 billion, 364-day credit agreement entered into on November 14, 2008.
Under the 364-Day Credit Agreement, we pay a commitment fee of 0.10% per annum on the unused commitments. Borrowings under the 364-Day Credit Agreement that are not based on Eurodollar rates bear interest at an annual rate based on the "base rate" of interest in effect plus the applicable margin. The "base rate" of interest is the highest of (1) the rate announced publicly by Citibank, N.A., from time to time, as Citibank's "base" rate, (2) the Federal Funds Rate plus 0.50% and (3) the British Bankers Association one month LIBOR plus 1.00%. The "applicable margin" is the greater of (a) the market rate spread minus 1.00% and (b) 0% per annum. The "market rate spread" means at any date our credit default swap mid-rate spread for the one-year period beginning on the most recent reset date for the applicable advance, provided that the market rate spread shall have a floor and a cap depending upon the rating of our long-term senior unsecured debt with a floor of 0.75% and a cap of 2.00%. Borrowings under the 364-Day Credit Agreement that are based on Eurodollar rates are generally based on an applicable LIBOR rate plus the market rate spread, as defined above.
The 364-Day Credit Agreement contains customary terms and conditions, including covenants that are substantially similar to those contained in the previous facility, including, without limitation, covenants restricting our ability to incur liens, or merge or consolidate with another entity. Further, the 364-Day Credit Agreement contains a covenant restricting our ability to permit consolidated debt (as defined in the 364-Day Credit Agreement) to exceed 60% of Boeing's total capital (as defined in the 364-Day Credit Agreement) until the Credit Agreement terminates and all amounts borrowed under the Credit Agreement are paid in full. The events of default under the 364-Day Credit Agreement include, but are not limited to, the following: (1) failure to pay outstanding principal or interest, (2) failure of representations or warranties to be correct in any material respect, (3) failure to perform any other term, covenant or agreement and such failure is not remedied within 30 days of notice of such failure, (4) a cross-default with other debt in certain circumstances, (5) certain defaults upon obligations under the Employee Retirement Income Security Act and (6) bankruptcy. Such events of default would require the repayment of any outstanding borrowings and the termination of the right to borrow additional funds under the 364-Day Credit Agreement.
Some of the lenders under the 364-Day Credit Agreement and their affiliates have various relationships with us and our subsidiaries involving the provision of financial services, including cash management, investment banking, trust and leasing services. In addition, we and some of our subsidiaries have entered into foreign exchange and other derivative arrangements with certain of the lenders and their affiliates.
The description herein is qualified in its entirety by the 364-Day Credit Agreement which is filed as an exhibit hereto.
 
The information described above under "Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement" is hereby incorporated by reference.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: November 13, 2009
 

Exhibit 10.1
EXECUTION COPY
 
 
 
 
THE BOEING COMPANY, a Delaware corporation ("" or the ""), for itself and on behalf of the other BORROWERS (as defined below), the LENDERS (as defined below), CITIGROUP GLOBAL MARKETS INC. and J.P. MORGAN SECURITIES INC., as joint lead arrangers and joint book managers, JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., as syndication agent, and CITIBANK, N.A., in its capacity as administrative agent for the Lenders (in such capacity, the ""), agree as follows:
TBC
Company
Agent
 
"" means the 364-Day Credit Agreement, dated as of November 14, 2008, by and among TBC, Citibank, N.A., as administrative agent, and certain other banks as lenders.
2008 Credit Agreement
"" means a Committed Advance or a Bid Advance.
Advance
"" means Citibank, N.A. acting in its capacity as administrative agent for the Lenders, or any successor administrative agent appointed pursuant to Section 7.6.
Agent
"" means the account of the Agent maintained by the Agent with Citibank, N.A., at its office at 388 Greenwich Street, New York, New York 10013, Account 36852248, Attention: Agency/Medium Term Finance, Reference: Boeing.
Agent's Account
"" means, as to any Person, any other Person that, directly or indirectly, controls, is controlled by or is under common control with such Person or is a director or officer of such Person. (For purposes of this definition, the term "controls", "controlling", "controlled by" and "under common control with" mean, with respect to a Person, the possession, direct or indirect, of the power to vote 5% or more of the Voting Stock of such Person or to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of such Person, whether through the ownership of Voting Stock, by contract, or otherwise.)
Affiliate
"" means this agreement, as it may be amended or otherwise modified from time to time, and any written additions or supplements hereto.
Agreement
"" means, with respect to each Lender, such Lender's Domestic Lending Office, in the case of a Base Rate Advance, and such Lender's Eurodollar Lending Office, in the case of a Eurodollar Rate Advance, and, in the case of a Bid Advance, the office of such Lender specified by such Lender in a notice to the Agent as its Applicable Lending Office with respect to such Bid Advance.
Applicable Lending Office
"" means,
Applicable Margin
 
"" means 0.10% per annum:
Applicable Percentage
"" means, as of any date of determination, (a) the aggregate Commitments of the Lenders, as such amount may be reduced, changed or terminated in accordance with the terms of this Agreement, reduced by (b) the aggregate Advances outstanding on such date of determination.
Available Commitments
"" means the highest of (a) the rate of interest announced publicly by Citibank, N.A., in New York City, from time to time, as Citibank's "base" rate, (b) the Federal Funds Rate plus 0.50% per annum and (c) the British Bankers Association Interest Settlement Rate applicable to US dollars for a period of one month ("") plus 1.00% (for the avoidance of doubt, the One Month LIBOR for any day shall be based on the rate appearing on Reuters LIBOR01 Page (or other commercially available source providing such quotations as designated by the Agent from time to time) at approximately 11:00 a.m. London time on such day.
Base Rate
One Month LIBOR
"" means a Committed Advance which bears interest at the Base Rate.
Base Rate Advance
"" means an advance by a Lender to a Borrower as part of a Bid Borrowing resulting from the auction bidding procedure described in Section 2.5, and refers to a Fixed Rate Advance or a Eurodollar Rate Bid Advance, each of which shall be a "Type" of Bid Advance.
Bid Advance
"" means a borrowing consisting of simultaneous Bid Advances from each of the Lenders whose offers to make one or more Bid Advances as part of such borrowing has been accepted by a Borrower under the auction bidding procedure described in Section 2.5.
Bid Borrowing
"" means a promissory note of a Borrower payable to the order of a Lender, in substantially the form of Exhibit A-2, evidencing the indebtedness of that Borrower to such Lender resulting from a Bid Advance made by such Lender to such Borrower.
Bid Note
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.1(a).
Bid Reduction
"" means, individually and collectively, as the context requires, TBC and each Subsidiary Borrower (unless and until it becomes a "Terminated Subsidiary Borrower" pursuant to Section 2.22).
Borrower
"" means, with respect to any Subsidiary Borrower, a letter in the form of Exhibit D, signed by such Subsidiary Borrower and TBC.
Borrower Subsidiary Letter
"" means a Committed Borrowing or a Bid Borrowing.
Borrowing
"" means a day of the year on which banks are not required or authorized to close in New York City and, if the applicable Business Day relates to any Eurodollar Rate Advance, on which dealings are carried on in the London interbank market.
Business Day
"" means, for each Lender, the full amount set forth opposite the name of such Lender in Schedule I or, if such Lender is a Replacement Lender or a Lender that has entered into one or more assignments pursuant to Section 2.20 or Section 2.21, the amount set forth for such Lender in the Register maintained by the Agent pursuant to Section 2.20(d), as such amount may be
Commitment
 
reduced pursuant to Section 2.3, Section 2.8 or Section 2.19 or increased pursuant to Section 2.19.
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.7.
Commitment Fee
"" means an advance made by a Lender to a Borrower as part of a Committed Borrowing and refers to a Base Rate Advance or a Eurodollar Rate Committed Advance, each of which is a "Type" of Committed Advance.
Committed Advance
"" means a borrowing consisting of simultaneous Committed Advances of the same Type made by each of the Lenders pursuant to Section 2.1.
Committed Borrowing
"" means a promissory note of a Borrower payable to the order of any Lender, in substantially the form of Exhibit A-1, evidencing the indebtedness of that Borrower to such Lender resulting from the Committed Advances made by such Lender to that Borrower.
Committed Note
"" means The Boeing Company, a Delaware corporation.
Company
"" means information that a Borrower furnishes to the Agent or any Lender in a writing designated as confidential, but does not include any such information that is or becomes generally available to the public or that is or becomes available to the Agent or such Lender from a source other than a Borrower.
Confidential Information
"" refers to the consolidation of accounts in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.
Consolidated
"" means the total amount of assets (less applicable reserves and other properly deductible items) after, deducting therefrom (i) all current liabilities (excluding any thereof which are by their terms extendible or renewable at the option of the obligor thereon to a time more than 12 months after the time as of which the amount thereof is being computed), and (ii) all good will, trade names, trademarks, patents, unamortized debt discount and expenses and other like intangibles, all as set forth on the most recent balance sheet of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries and computed in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.
Consolidated Net Tangible Assets
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.21(a).
Continuing Lender
"", "" and "" each means a conversion of Committed Advances of one Type into Committed Advances of another Type pursuant to Section 2.10, 2.11 or 2.15.
Convert
Conversion
Converted
"" of a Person means
Debt
 
 
 
 
 
"" means any Event of Default or any event that would constitute an Event of Default but for the requirement that notice be given or time elapse or both.
Default
"" means with respect to any Lender, the office of such Lender specified as its "Domestic Lending Office" opposite its name on Schedule I, or in the assignment or other agreement pursuant to which it became a Lender or such other office of such Lender as such Lender may from time to time specify to TBC and the Agent.
Domestic Lending Office
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.19(d).
Effective Date
"" means
Eligible Assignee
 
 
 
 
 
 
"" means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended from time to time and the regulations promulgated and rulings issued thereunder.
ERISA
"" has the meaning assigned to that term in Regulation D of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, as in effect from time to time.
Eurocurrency Liabilities
"" means, with respect to any Lender, (a) the office of such Lender specified as its "Eurodollar Lending Office" opposite its name on Schedule I (or, if no such office is specified, its Domestic Lending Office) or in the assignment or other agreement pursuant to which it became a Lender or (b) such other office of such Lender as such Lender may from time to time specify to TBC and the Agent.
Eurodollar Lending Office
"" means, for an Interest Period for a Eurodollar Rate Committed Advance constituting part of a Committed Borrowing, and for the relevant period specified in the applicable Notice of Bid Borrowing for a Eurodollar Rate Bid Advance, an interest rate per annum equal to either
Eurodollar Rate
 
 
 
 
 
The Eurodollar Rate for any Interest Period for each Eurodollar Rate Committed Advance constituting part of the same Borrowing and for the relevant period specified in a Notice of Bid Borrowing for each Eurodollar Rate Bid Advance shall be determined by the Agent on the basis of applicable rates furnished to and received by the Agent from the Reference Banks two Business Days before the first day of such Interest Period or period, as the case may be, , , to the provisions of Section 2.10.
subject
however
"" means a Committed Advance (a "") or a Bid Advance (a "") which bears interest at a rate of interest quoted as a margin (which shall be the Applicable Margin in the case of a Committed Advance or as offered by a Lender and accepted by a Borrower in the case of a Bid Advance) over the Eurodollar Rate.
Eurodollar Rate Advance
Eurodollar Rate Committed Advance
Eurodollar Rate Bid Advance
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.5(b).
Eurodollar Rate Bid Borrowing
"" means the reserve percentage applicable to a Lender for any Interest Period for a Eurodollar Rate Advance during such Interest Period (or if more than one such percentage shall be so applicable, the daily average of such percentages for those days in such Interest Period during which any such percentage shall be so applicable) under regulations issued from time to time by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (or any successor) for determining the maximum reserve requirement (including, without limitation, any emergency, supplemental or other marginal reserve requirement) for such Lender with respect to liabilities or assets consisting of or including Eurocurrency Liabilities (or with respect to any other category of liabilities that includes deposits by reference to which the interest rate on Eurodollar Rate Advances is determined) having a term equal to such Interest Period.
Eurodollar Rate Reserve Percentage
"" means any of the events described in Section 6.1.
Event of Default
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.21.
Extension Request
 
"" means, for each day during a period, an interest rate per annum equal to the weighted average of the fluctuating rates on overnight Federal funds transactions with members of the Federal Reserve System arranged by Federal funds brokers, as published for such day (or, if such day is not a Business Day, for the immediately preceding Business Day) by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, or, if such rate is not so published for any day which is a Business Day, the average of the quotations for such day on such transactions received by the Agent from three Federal funds brokers of recognized standing selected by it.
Federal Funds Rate
"" means Fitch, Inc.
Fitch
"" means an Advance made by a Lender to a Borrower as part of a Fixed Rate Borrowing.
Fixed Rate Advance
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.5(b).
Fixed Rate Borrowing
"" means each Guaranty Agreement executed by TBC in favor of the Agent and the Lenders, unconditionally guaranteeing the payment of all obligations of a Subsidiary Borrower hereunder and under any Notes executed or to be executed by it.
Guaranty
"" has the meaning specified in Section 7.5.
Indemnified Costs
"" has the meaning specified in Section 8.3(b).
Indemnified Party
"" means, for each Eurodollar Rate Committed Advance constituting part of the same Borrowing, the period commencing on the date of such Committed Advance or the date of the Conversion of a Base Rate Advance into such a Eurodollar Rate Committed Advance and ending on the last day of the period selected by the applicable Borrower pursuant to the provisions below and, thereafter, each subsequent period commencing on the last day of the immediately preceding Interest Period and ending on the last day of the period selected by such Borrower pursuant to the provisions below. The duration of each such Interest Period shall be one, two, three, or six months (or nine months, with the consent of all Lenders funding those particular Advances), as the applicable Borrower may, upon notice received by the Agent not later than 11:00 a.m. (New York City time) on the third Business Day prior to the first day of such Interest Period, select, , , that:
Interest Period
provided
however
 
 
 
"", subject to Section 2.20, means any of the institutions that is a signatory hereto or that, pursuant to Section 2.13, 2.19, 2.20 or 2.21, becomes a "Lender" hereunder.
Lender
 
"" means Lenders holding greater than 50% of the then aggregate unpaid principal amount of the Committed Advances or, if no Committed Advances are outstanding, Lenders having greater than 50% of the total Commitments.
Majority Lenders
"" means, at any date, TBC's credit default swap mid-rate spread for the one-year period beginning on the most recent Reset Date for the applicable Advance (as provided by Markit), which will be obtained by the Agent from the Markit website, and will be reset as on each Reset Date; , that the Market Rate Spread shall in no event be less than 0.75% or greater than 2.00%.
Market Rate Spread
provided
"" means Markit Group Limited.
Markit
"" means the Termination Date or, if the Term Loan Conversion Option described in Section 2.3 has been exercised, the date that is the one-year anniversary of the Termination Date.
Maturity Date
"" means Moody's Investor Services, Inc.
Moody's
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.21(a).
Non-Extending Lender
"" means a Committed Note or a Bid Note.
Note
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.5(b).
Notice of Bid Borrowing
"" means a Notice of Committed Borrowing or a Notice of Bid Borrowing.
Notice of Borrowing
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.2(a).
Notice of Committed Borrowing
"" means the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development.
OECD
"" means an individual, partnership, corporation (including a business trust), limited liability company, joint stock company, trust, unincorporated association, joint venture or other entity, or a government or any political subdivision or agency thereof.
Person
"" means any item of real property, or any interest therein, buildings, improvements and machinery.
Property, Plant and Equipment
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.19(c).
Proposed Increased Commitment
"" means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., Citibank, N.A., Bank of America, N.A., and Deutsche Bank AG.
Reference Banks
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.20(d).
Register
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.21(c).
Replacement Lenders
"" means a document substantially in the form of Exhibit C, duly executed by TBC, pursuant to Section 2.19.
Request for Alteration
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.20(a).
Required Assignment
"" means (x) for each Eurodollar Rate Advance two business days prior to the first day of each Interest Period and (y) for each Base Rate Advance the last day of each calendar month.
Reset Date
 
"" means Standard & Poor's, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc.
S&P
"" means any Person in which more than 50% of the Voting Stock or the interest in the capital or profits is owned by TBC, by TBC and any one or more other Subsidiaries, or by any one or more other Subsidiaries.
Subsidiary
"" means, individually and collectively, as the context requires, each Subsidiary that is or becomes a "Borrower" in accordance with Section 2.22; in each case, unless and until it becomes a "Terminated Subsidiary Borrower".
Subsidiary Borrower
"" means The Boeing Company, a Delaware corporation.
TBC
"" means a term loan resulting from the conversion of Committed Advances on the Termination Date pursuant to Section 2.3.
Term Loan
"" means the option under Section 2.3 for TBC to convert, as of the Termination Date, all or a part of the Committed Advances then outstanding into Term Loans.
Term Loan Conversion Option
"" means, individually and collectively, as the context requires, a Subsidiary Borrower that has ceased to be a "Borrower" in accordance with Section 2.22.
Terminated Subsidiary Borrower
"" means the earlier to occur of (i) November 12, 2010, as such date may be extended from time to time pursuant to Section 2.21, and (ii) the date of termination in whole of the Commitments pursuant to Section 2.8 or Section 6.2.
Termination Date
"" has the meaning specified in Section 4.2(b).
Total Capital
"", as to Committed Borrowings, means either Base Rate Advances or Eurodollar Rate Committed Advances and, as to Bid Borrowings, means either Fixed Rate Advances or Eurodollar Rate Bid Advances.
Type
"" means, with respect to each Lender, such Lender's Commitment minus the aggregate principal amount of Committed Advances made by such Lender.
Unused Commitment
"" means, as to a corporation, all the issued and outstanding capital stock of such corporation having general voting power, under ordinary circumstances, to elect a majority of the Board of Directors of such corporation (irrespective of whether or not any capital stock of any other class or classes shall or might have voting power upon the occurrence of any contingency).
Voting Stock
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Every Notice of Committed Borrowing given by a Subsidiary Borrower must be countersigned by an authorized representative of TBC, in order to evidence the consent of TBC, in its sole discretion, to that proposed Committed Borrowing. Upon receipt of a Notice of Committed Borrowing, the Agent shall promptly give notice to each Lender thereof.
 
 
 
 
 
 
If such Lender shall repay to the Agent such corresponding amount, such amount so repaid shall constitute such Lender's Committed Advance as part of such Committed Borrowing for purposes of this Agreement.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
that in the event and during the continuance of an Event of Default (x) the Applicable Margin shall immediately increase by 1.0% above the Applicable Margin then in effect, and, in the case of a Eurodollar Rate Advance, such Advance shall automatically convert to a Base Rate Advance at the end of the Interest Period then in effect for such Eurodollar Rate Advance and (y) to the fullest extent permitted by law, the Borrowers shall pay interest on the amount of any interest, fee or other amount payable hereunder that is not paid when due, from the date such amount shall be due until such amount shall be paid in full, payable in arrears on the date such amount shall be paid in full and on demand, at a rate per annum equal at all times to 1% above the Base Rate.
provided
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
A Borrower requesting a Bid Borrowing shall deliver a Notice of Bid Borrowing to the Agent not later than 11:00 a.m. (New York City time) (A) at least one Business Day prior to the date of the proposed Bid Borrowing if the proposed Bid Borrowing is to be a Fixed Rate Borrowing, and (B) at least four Business Days prior to the date of the proposed Bid Borrowing, if the proposed Bid Borrowing is to be a Eurodollar Rate Bid Borrowing. Every Notice of Bid Borrowing given by a Subsidiary Borrower must be countersigned by an authorized representative of TBC, in order to evidence the consent of TBC, in its sole discretion, to that proposed Bid Borrowing. The Agent shall in turn promptly notify each Lender of each request for a Bid Borrowing by sending such Lender a copy of the related Notice of Bid Borrowing.
 
 
 
 
that if the Agent in its capacity as a Lender, in its sole discretion, elects to make any such offer, it shall notify such Borrower and the Company of such offer before 9:30 a.m. (New York City time) on the date on which notice of such election is to be given to the Agent by the other Lenders. If, by 10:00 a.m. (New York City time) on the date on which notice of a Lender's election under this Section 2.5(c) is to be made, the Agent fails to receive, at its address specified in Section 8.2, a notice from a Lender provided for in this Section 2.5(c), the Agent may conclusively presume that such Lender has elected not to offer to make any Bid Advances to such Borrower with respect to the related Notice of Bid Borrowing.
provided
 
 
 
If the Borrower proposing the Bid Borrowing notifies the Agent that such Bid Borrowing is canceled pursuant to Section 2.5(d)(i), the Agent shall give prompt notice thereof to the Lenders and such Bid Borrowing shall not be made.
 
 
 
 
When each Lender that is to make a Bid Advance as part of such Bid Borrowing has received notice from the Agent pursuant to clause (iii) of the preceding sentence, such Lender shall, before
 
1:00 p.m. (New York City time) on the date of such Bid Borrowing specified in the notice received from the Agent pursuant to clause (i) of the preceding sentence, make available for the account of its Applicable Lending Office to the Agent at the Agent's Account such Lender's portion of such Bid Borrowing, in same day funds. Upon fulfillment of the applicable conditions set forth in Article 5 and after receipt by the Agent of such funds, the Agent will make such funds available to the relevant Borrower at an account specified by such Borrower. Promptly after each Bid Borrowing the Agent shall notify each Lender of the amount of the Bid Borrowing, the consequent Bid Reduction, and the dates upon which such Bid Reduction commenced and will terminate.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
there is an increase in the cost incurred by a Lender in agreeing to make or making, funding or maintaining any Eurodollar Rate Committed Advance or Eurodollar Rate Bid Advance then or at any time thereafter outstanding (excluding for purposes of this Section 2.13 any such increased costs resulting from (i) Taxes or Other Taxes (as to which Section 2.14 shall govern) and (ii) changes in the basis of taxation of overall net income or overall gross income by the United States or by the foreign jurisdiction or state under the laws of which such Lender is organized or has its Applicable Lending Office (or any political subdivision thereof), then TBC shall from time to time, upon demand of such Lender (with a copy of such demand to the Agent), pay to the Agent for the account of such Lender such amounts as are required to compensate such Lender for such increased cost, that such Lender shall exercise reasonable efforts (consistent with its internal policy and legal and regulatory restrictions) to minimize any such increased cost and that the Borrowers shall not be required to pay any such compensation with respect to any period prior to the 90th day before the date of any such demand, unless such introduction, change, compliance or request shall have retroactive effect to a date prior to such 90
provided
provided
further
th
day. A certificate as to the amount of such increase in cost, submitted to the relevant Borrowers and the Agent by such Lender, shall be conclusive and binding for all purposes under this Section 2.13(a), absent manifest error.
 
 
 
 
and, in either case, subject to payment in full of all principal, accrued and unpaid interest, fees and other amounts payable under this Agreement and then owing to such Lender immediately prior to the assignment or termination of the Commitment of such Lender.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
for such Lender to continue to fund or maintain any Eurodollar Rate Advances or to perform its obligations hereunder with respect to Eurodollar Rate Advances hereunder, then, upon the issuance of such opinion of counsel or such assertion by a central bank or other governmental authority, the Agent shall give notice of such opinion or assertion to the Borrowers (accompanied by such opinion, if applicable). The Borrowers shall forthwith either
 
 
Upon such prepayment or Conversion, the obligation of such Lender to make Eurodollar Rate Committed Advances or Eurodollar Rate Bid Advances, or to Convert Committed Advances into Eurodollar Rate Committed Advances, shall be suspended until the Agent shall notify the Borrowers that the circumstances causing such suspension no longer exists.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
subject, in either case, to payment in full of all principal, accrued and unpaid interest, fees, commissions and other amounts payable under this Agreement and then owing to such Lender immediately prior to the assignment or termination of the Commitment of such Lender.
If the Company shall designate as a Subsidiary Borrower hereunder any Subsidiary not organized under the laws of the United States or any State thereof, any Lender may, with notice to the Agent and the Company, fulfill its Commitment by causing an Affiliate of such Lender to act as the Lender in respect of such Subsidiary Borrower (and such Lender shall, to the extent of Advances made to such Subsidiary Borrower, be deemed for all purposes hereof to have assigned such Advances to such Affiliate in compliance with the provisions of Section 2.20).
pro tanto
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
In lieu of furnishing the Lenders the items referred to in clauses (1), (3), (5) and (6) above, the Company may make available such items on the Company's website at , at or at such other website as notified to the Agent and the Lenders, which shall be deemed to have satisfied the requirement of delivery of such items in accordance with this Section.
www.boeing.com
www.sec.gov
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
and (b) a representation by TBC that the representations and warranties of TBC contained in subsections (a) through (g) of Section 3.1 are true and accurate on and as of each such date as though made on and as of each such date (except to the extent that such representations and warranties relate solely to an earlier date), and that, as of each such date, no event has occurred and is continuing, or would result from the proposed Committed Borrowing, which constitutes a Default.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
and that no amendment, waiver, or consent shall, unless in writing and signed by the Agent in addition to the Lenders required above to take such action, affect the rights or duties of the Agent under this Agreement or any Note.
provided
further
 
 
 
if to the Agent, as set forth on the attached Schedule II;
if to any Borrower,
care of The Boeing Company
100 N. Riverside
Mail Code: 5003 3648
Chicago, Illinois 60606
 
Attention: Assistant Treasurer, Corporate Finance and Banking
facsimile number (312) 544-2399
if to any Lender, at its Domestic Lending Office; or,
as to each party, at such other address as designated by such party in a written notice to each other party referring specifically to this Agreement.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
to the fullest extent permitted by law, without notice to any Borrower (any such notice being expressly waived by each Borrower), to set off and apply any and all deposits (general or special, time or demand, provisional or final) at any time held and other indebtedness at any time owing by such Lender or such Affiliate to or for the credit or the account of any Borrower against any and all of the obligations to such Lender or such Affiliate of such Borrower now or hereafter existing under this Agreement and any Notes held by such Lender, whether or not such Lender has made a demand under this Agreement or such Notes and although such obligations may be unmatured. Each Lender shall promptly notify any Borrower after any such setoff and application made by such Lender, that the failure to give such notice shall not affect the validity of such setoff and application. The rights of each Lender under this Section are in addition to other rights and remedies (including, without limitation, other rights of setoff) which such Lender and its Affiliates may have.
provided
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The Agent, each Lender and their Affiliates (collectively, solely for purposes of this paragraph, the ""), may have economic interests that conflict with those of the Borrowers. Each Borrower agrees that nothing in this Agreement or otherwise will be deemed to create an advisory, fiduciary or agency relationship or fiduciary or other implied duty between the Lenders and any Borrower, its stockholders or its affiliates. The Borrowers acknowledge and agree that (i) the transactions contemplated by this Agreement are arm's-length commercial transactions between the Lenders, on the one hand, and the Borrowers, on the other, (ii) in connection therewith and with the process leading to such transaction each of the Lenders is acting solely as a principal and not the agent or fiduciary of any Borrower, its management, stockholders, creditors or any other person, (iii) no Lender has assumed an advisory or fiduciary responsibility in favor of any Borrower with respect to the transactions contemplated hereby or the process leading thereto (irrespective of whether any Lender or any of its affiliates has advised or is currently advising any Borrower on other matters) or any other obligation to any Borrower except the obligations expressly set forth in this Agreement and (iv) each Borrower has consulted its own legal and financial advisors to the extent it deemed appropriate. Each Borrower further acknowledges and agrees that it is responsible for making its own independent judgment with respect to such transactions and the process leading thereto. Each Borrower agrees that it will not claim that any Lender has rendered advisory services of any nature or respect, or owes a fiduciary or similar duty to such Borrower, in connection with such transaction or the process leading thereto.
Lenders
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be executed by their officers thereunto duly authorized as of the day and year first above written.
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20091117103407.txt.gz
TIME:20091117103407
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Two purported class actions have recently been filed in the United States District Courts in the Northern and Southern Districts of Illinois alleging, among other things, that The Boeing Company (the "") and certain officers made misleading statements regarding the status of the Company's 787 program. The Company believes that the lawsuits are without merit and will vigorously defend them.
Company
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
THE BOEING COMPANY
 
Dated: November 17, 2009


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20091120103458.txt.gz
TIME:20091120103458
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On November 20, 2009, The Boeing Company (the "Company") issued $700,000,000 in aggregate principal amount of 1.875% Senior Notes due 2012 (the "2012 Notes") and $500,000,000 in aggregate principal amount of 3.750% Senior Notes due 2016 (the "2016 Notes" and, together with the 2012 Notes, the "Notes"). The Notes were issued pursuant to an Indenture dated as of February 1, 2003, between the Company and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as successor trustee to JPMorgan Chase Bank.
On November 17, 2009, the Company entered into a Purchase Agreement (the "Purchase Agreement") with Barclays Capital Inc., Citigroup Global Markets Inc. and RBS Securities Inc., as representatives of the several purchasers named therein (the "Purchasers"), pursuant to which the Company agreed to issue and sell the Notes to the Purchasers.
The Notes are unsecured and have the same rank as all of The Boeing Company's other unsecured and unsubordinated debt. The 2012 Notes will mature on November 20, 2012 and the 2016 Notes will mature on November 20, 2016. The Company will pay interest on the Notes semi-annually in arrears on May 20 and November 20 of each year, beginning May 20, 2010. The Company will have the right to redeem the Notes in whole or in part, upon at least 30 days notice, at any time prior to maturity at the redemption price described in the Final Prospectus Supplement filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on November 18, 2009 (Registration No. 333-157790) (the "Final Prospectus Supplement").
The Company has filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission a Prospectus dated March 9, 2009 (Registration No. 333-157790), a Preliminary Prospectus Supplement dated November 17, 2009, a Free Writing Prospectus dated November 17, 2009 and the Final Prospectus Supplement in connection with the public offering of the Notes.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: November 20, 2009
 

Exhibit 1.1
November 17, 2009
The Boeing Company
100 North Riverside
Chicago, Illinois 60606
Ladies and Gentlemen:
Referring to the Unsecured Debt Securities of The Boeing Company (the "Company") covered by the registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration No. 333-157790) (such registration statement, including (i) the prospectus included therein (the "Base Prospectus"), and (ii) all documents filed as part thereof or incorporated by reference therein including the information, if any, deemed pursuant to Rule 430A, 430B or 430C under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Securities Act") to be part of the registration statement at the time of its effectiveness, and at each deemed effective date with respect to the Purchasers (as defined below) pursuant to Rule 430B(f)(2) of the Securities Act, are hereinafter collectively called the "Registration Statement"). The Base Prospectus (i) as supplemented by the prospectus supplement dated November 17, 2009 specifically relating to the Purchased Notes (as defined below) in the form first filed under Rule 424(b) under the Securities Act (or in the form first made available to the Purchasers (as defined below) by the Company to meet the requests of purchasers pursuant to Rule 173 under the Securities Act) and (ii) all documents filed as part thereof or incorporated or deemed to be incorporated by reference therein are hereinafter collectively called the "Prospectus," and the preliminary form of the Prospectus is hereinafter called the "Preliminary Prospectus". For purposes of this Agreement, "free writing prospectus" has the meaning set forth in Rule 405 under the Securities Act and "Time of Sale Prospectus" means the Preliminary Prospectus together with each free writing prospectus, if any, identified in Schedule B hereto. "Time of Sale" means 2:22 pm (Eastern time) on the date of this Agreement. Any reference to "amend", "amendment" or "supplement" with respect to the Registration Statement, any Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus shall be deemed to refer to and include any documents filed after such date under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and the rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "Commission") thereunder (collectively, the "Exchange Act") that are deemed to be incorporated by reference therein.
 
On the basis of the representations, warranties and agreements contained in this Agreement, but subject to the terms and conditions herein set forth, the purchaser or purchasers named in Schedule A hereto (the "Purchasers") agree to purchase, severally and not jointly, and the Company agrees to sell to the Purchasers, severally and not jointly, the respective principal amounts of the Company's 1.875% Senior Notes due 2012 (the "2012 Notes") and 3.750% Senior Notes due 2016 (the "2016 Notes" and, together with the 2012 Notes, the "Purchased Notes") set forth opposite the name of each Purchaser on Schedule A hereto. The Purchased Notes will have the terms as set forth in the Pricing Term Sheet on Schedule B hereto.
The price at which the Purchased Notes shall be purchased from the Company by the Purchasers shall be 99.151% of the principal amount of the 2012 Notes and 97.997% of the principal amount of the 2016 Notes, plus, in each case, accrued interest, if any, from November 20, 2009, to the date of delivery. The initial public offering price shall be 99.401% of the principal amount of the 2012 Notes and 98.397% of the principal amount of the 2016 Notes, plus, in each case, accrued interest, if any, from November 20, 2009 to the date of delivery. The Purchased Notes will be offered by the Purchasers as set forth in the Time of Sale Prospectus relating to the Purchased Notes.
The Company understands that the Purchasers intend to make a public offering of the Purchased Notes as soon after the effectiveness of this Agreement as in the judgment of the Purchasers is advisable, and initially to offer the Purchased Notes on the terms set forth in the Time of Sale Prospectus. The Company acknowledges and agrees that the Purchasers may offer and sell Purchased Notes to or through any affiliate of a Purchaser and that any such affiliate may offer and sell Purchased Notes purchased by it to or through any Purchaser.
If we are acting as Representative(s) for the several Purchasers named in Schedule A hereto, we represent that we are authorized to act for such several Purchasers in connection with the transactions contemplated in this Agreement, and that, if there are more than one of us, any action under this Agreement taken by any of us will be binding upon all the Purchasers.
All of the provisions contained in the document entitled "The Boeing Company Standard Purchase Provisions", a copy of which is attached hereto, are hereby incorporated by reference in their entirety and shall be deemed to be a part of this Agreement to the same extent as if such provisions had been set forth in full herein, except that references in Section 10 of "The Boeing Company Standard Purchase Provisions" with respect to this Agreement only, are references to the 2012 Notes and 2016 Notes separately and Section 10 shall apply to each such series separately and not to all such series together.
In relation to each Member State of the European Economic Area which has implemented the Prospectus Directive (each, a "Relevant Member State"), each Purchaser hereby represents that it has not made and will not make an offer of the Purchased Notes to the public in that Relevant Member State, except that it may make an offer of the Purchased Notes to the public in that Relevant Member State at any time under the following exemptions under the Prospectus Directive (as defined below), if they have been implemented in that Relevant Member State: (a) to legal entities which are authorized or regulated to operate in the financial markets or, if not so authorized or regulated, whose corporate purpose is solely to invest in securities; (b) to any legal
 
entity which has two or more of (1) an average of at least 250 employees during the last financial year; (2) a total balance sheet of more than 43,000,000 and (3) an annual net turnover of more than 50,000,000, as shown in its last annual or consolidated accounts; (c) to fewer than 100 natural or legal persons (other than qualified investors as defined in the Prospectus Directive); or (d) in any other circumstances falling within Article 3(2) of the Prospectus Directive, provided that no such offer of Purchased Notes shall result in a requirement for the publication by the Company or any underwriter of a prospectus pursuant to Article 3 of the Prospectus Directive. For purposes of this section, the expression an "offer of the Purchased Notes to the public" in relation to any Purchased Notes in any Relevant Member State means the communication in any form and by any means of sufficient information on the terms of the offer and the Purchased Notes to be offered so as to enable an investor to decide to purchase or subscribe to purchase the Purchased Notes, as the same may be varied in the Relevant Member State by any measure implementing the Prospectus Directive in that Relevant Member State, and the expression Prospectus Directive means Directive 2003/71/EC and includes any relevant implementing measure in each Relevant Member State.
Each Purchaser hereby represents that, in connection with the distribution of the Purchased Notes, it has only communicated or caused to be communicated and will only communicate or cause to be communicated any invitation or inducement to engage in investment activity (within the meaning of Section 21 of the Financial Services and Markets Act 2000 ("FSMA") of the United Kingdom) received by it in connection with the issue or sale of the Purchased Notes or any investments representing the Purchased Notes in circumstances in which Section 21(1) of the FSMA does not apply to the Company and that it has complied and will comply with all applicable provisions of the FSMA with respect to anything done by it in relation to the Purchased Notes in, from or otherwise involving the United Kingdom.
Each Purchaser that is not a U.S. registered broker-dealer, represents that if it sells Purchased Notes in the United States it will do so through one or more U.S. registered broker-dealers as permitted by the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority regulations.
Each Purchaser hereby agrees that it will not offer, sell or deliver any of the Purchased Notes in any jurisdiction outside the United States except under circumstances that will result in compliance with the applicable laws thereof, and that it will take at its own expense whatever action is required to permit its resale of the Purchased Notes in such jurisdictions. Each Purchaser understands that no action has been taken to permit a public offering in any jurisdiction outside the United States where action would be required for such purpose. Each Purchaser agrees not to cause any advertisement of the Purchased Notes to be published in any newspaper or periodical or posted in any public place and not to issue any circular relating to the Purchased Notes, except in any such case with the prior express written consent of the Company and of the Representatives and then only at its own risk and expense.
 
The "Closing Date" shall be: November 20, 2009
The place to which the
Purchased Notes may be
checked, packaged and
delivered shall be:
Kirkland & Ellis LLP
601 Lexington Avenue
New York, New York 10022
Attention: Christian O. Nagler
Notices to the Purchasers shall be sent to the following address(es) or telecopier number(s):
Barclays Capital Inc.
745 Seventh Avenue, 2
nd
Floor
New York, New York 10019
Attention: Lauren Lanni
Facsimile: (212) 412-7305
Citigroup Global Markets Inc.
388 Greenwich Street
New York, New York 10013
Attention: General Counsel
Facsimile: (212) 816-7912
RBS Securities Inc.
600 Washington Blvd.
Stamford, Connecticut 06901
Attention: Emma Cusato
Facsimile: (203) 422-4095
With a copy to:
Shearman & Sterling LLP
599 Lexington Avenue
New York, New York 10022
Attention: Lisa L. Jacobs
 
If the foregoing is in accordance with your understanding of our agreement, kindly sign and return to us the enclosed duplicate hereof, whereupon it will become a binding agreement between the Company and the several Purchasers in accordance with its terms.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Filed Pursuant to Rule 433 under the Securities Act of 1933
Registration Statement No. 333-157790
Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, dated November 17, 2009
 
Notes:
The issuer has filed a registration statement (including a prospectus) with the SEC for the offering to which this communication relates. Before you invest, you should read the prospectus in that registration statement and other documents the issuer has filed with the SEC for more complete information about the issuer and this offering. You may get these documents for free by visiting EDGAR on the SEC Web site at www.sec.gov. Alternatively, the issuer, any underwriter or any dealer participating in the offering will arrange to send you the prospectus if you request it by calling Barclays Capital Inc. toll-free at 1-888-603-5847, Citigroup Global Markets Inc. toll-free at 1-877-858-5407 or RBS Securities Inc. toll-free at 1-866-884-2071.
 
From time to time, The Boeing Company, a Delaware corporation ("Company"), may enter into purchase agreements that provide for the sale of designated securities to the purchaser or purchasers named therein. The standard provisions set forth herein may be incorporated by reference in any such purchase agreement ("Purchase Agreement"). The Purchase Agreement, including the provisions incorporated therein by reference, is herein sometimes referred to as "this Agreement." Unless otherwise defined herein, terms defined in the Purchase Agreement are used herein as therein defined.
1. . The Company proposes to issue and sell from time to time its Unsecured Debt Securities ("Notes") registered under the registration statement referred to in Section 2(a). The Notes will be issued under an Indenture, dated as of February 1, 2003, between the Company and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as successor to JPMorgan Chase Bank, as Trustee, as may be supplemented from time to time, (the "Indenture"). The Notes will be sold to the Purchasers (as defined below) for resale in accordance with the terms of the offering determined at the time of the sale. The Notes involved in any such offering are hereinafter referred to as the "Purchased Notes," and the firm or firms, as the case may be, which agree to purchase the same are hereinafter referred to as the "Purchasers" of such Purchased Notes. The terms "you" and "your" refer to those Purchasers who sign the Purchase Agreement either on behalf of themselves only or on behalf of themselves and as representatives of the several Purchasers named in Schedule A thereto, as the case may be.
Introductory
2. . The Company represents and warrants to and agrees with each Purchaser that:
Representations and Warranties of the Company
(a) A Registration Statement (as defined in the Purchase Agreement) covering an indeterminate amount of the securities of the Company (including the Purchased Notes), including a prospectus has been filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission ("Commission") and has become effective under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Securities Act"); no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement is in effect, and no proceedings for such purpose are pending before or threatened by the Commission. The Company is a well known seasoned issuer (as defined in Rule 405 under the Securities Act) eligible to use the Registration Statement as an automatic shelf registration statement and the Company has not received notice that the Commission objects to the use of the Registration Statement as an automatic shelf registration statement. The terms Registration Statement, Time of Sale Prospectus and Prospectus shall have the meanings ascribed to them in the Purchase Agreement.
(b) The Company is not an "ineligible issuer" in connection with the offering pursuant to Rules 164, 405 and 433 under the Securities Act. Any free writing prospectus that the Company is required to file pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Securities Act has been, or will be, filed with the Commission in accordance with the requirements of the Securities Act and the applicable rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder (the "Securities Act Rules and Regulations"). Each free writing prospectus that the Company has filed, or is required to file, pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Securities Act or that was prepared by or on behalf of or used or referred to by the Company complies or will comply in all material respects with the requirements of the Securities Act and the applicable rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder. Except for the free writing prospectuses, if any, identified in Schedule B to the Purchase Agreement, the Company has not prepared, used or referred to, and will not, without your prior consent, prepare, use or refer to, any free writing prospectus. Each free writing prospectus that the Company has filed, as of its issue date and at all subsequent times through the completion of the public offer and sale
 
of the Purchased Notes or until any earlier date that the Company notifies the Purchasers as described in the next sentence, will not contain any information that conflicts with the information contained in the Registration Statement, including any document incorporated by reference therein, the Time of Sale Prospectus, the Prospectus and any prospectus supplement deemed to be a part thereof that has not been superseded or modified. If at any time following issuance of a free writing prospectus that the Company has filed there occurs an event or development as a result of which such free writing prospectus contained an untrue statement of a material fact or omits to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, the Company will promptly notify the Purchasers so that any use of such free writing prospectus may cease until it is amended or supplemented. The foregoing two sentences do not apply to statements or omissions in such document based upon written information furnished to the Company by any Purchaser specifically for use therein.
(c) The Registration Statement conforms in all respects to the requirements of the Securities Act and the Securities Act Rules and Regulations and does not include any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, except that the foregoing does not apply to statements or omissions in such document based upon written information furnished to the Company by any Purchaser specifically for use therein. At the Time of Sale, the Time of Sale Prospectus did not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, except that the foregoing does not apply to statements or omissions in such document based upon written information furnished to the Company by any Purchaser specifically for use therein. The Prospectus, as of its date, does not contain and, as amended or supplemented, if applicable, and as of the Closing Date, will not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, except that the foregoing does not apply to statements or omissions in such document based upon written information furnished to the Company by any Purchaser specifically for use therein. The documents incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus pursuant to Item 12 of Form S-3 of the Securities Act, at the time they were filed with the Commission, complied in all material respects with the requirements of the Exchange Act and the pertinent published rules and regulations thereunder (the "Exchange Act Rules and Regulations"). Any additional documents deemed to be incorporated by reference in the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus, will, when they are filed with the Commission, comply in all material respects with the requirements of the Exchange Act and the Exchange Act Rules and Regulations and will not contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
(d) The Company has been duly incorporated and is an existing corporation in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware, with power and corporate authority to own its properties and conduct its business as described in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus; and the Company is duly qualified to do business as a foreign corporation in good standing in all other jurisdictions in which its ownership or lease of property or the conduct of its business requires such qualification except where failure to so qualify would not individually or in the aggregate have a material adverse effect on the financial condition, business, properties or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole or on the Company's
 
ability to perform its obligations under the Purchased Notes and the Indenture in any material respect (a "Material Adverse Effect").
(e) Each "significant subsidiary" (as such term is defined in Rule 1-02 of Regulation S-X) of the Company (each a "Material Subsidiary" and together the "Material Subsidiaries") has been duly incorporated and is an existing corporation or other entity in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its incorporation or organization, with power and authority to own its properties and conduct its business as described in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus; and each Material Subsidiary of the Company is duly qualified to do business as a foreign corporation or other entity in good standing in all other jurisdictions in which its ownership or lease of property or the conduct of its business requires such qualification except where failure to so qualify would not have a Material Adverse Effect; all of the issued and outstanding capital stock or ownership interests of each Material Subsidiary of the Company has been duly authorized and validly issued and is fully paid and nonassessable; and the capital stock or ownership interests of each Material Subsidiary owned by the Company, directly or through subsidiaries, is owned free from liens and encumbrances except for such liens or encumbrances that would not have a Material Adverse Effect.
(f) This Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company.
(g) The Indenture has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company and the Trustee and duly qualified under the Trust Indenture Act 1939, as amended (the "Trust Indenture Act"), and constitutes a valid and binding agreement of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with its terms, except as the enforcement thereof may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency (including, without limitation, all laws relating to fraudulent transfers), reorganization, moratorium or similar laws affecting enforcement of creditors' rights generally and except as enforcement thereof is subject to general principles of equity (regardless of whether enforcement is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law).
(h) The Purchased Notes have been duly authorized and, at the Closing Date (as defined in the Purchase Agreement), will have been duly executed by the Company and, when authenticated, issued and delivered in the manner provided for in the Indenture and delivered against payment of the purchase price therefor as provided in this Agreement, will constitute valid and binding obligations of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with their terms, except as the enforcement thereof may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency (including, without limitation, all laws relating to fraudulent transfers), reorganization, moratorium or similar laws affecting enforcement of creditors' rights generally and except as enforcement thereof is subject to general principles of equity (regardless of whether enforcement is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law), and will be in the form contemplated by, and entitled to the benefits of, the Indenture.
(i) The Purchased Notes and the Indenture will conform in all material respects to the respective statements relating thereto contained in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus and will be in substantially the respective forms filed or incorporated by reference, as the case may be, as exhibits to the Registration Statement.
(j) No consent, approval, authorization, or order of, or filing with, any governmental agency or body or any court is required for the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement in connection with the issuance and sale of the Purchased Notes by the Company, except such as have been obtained and made under
 
the Securities Act and the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended, and such as may be required under state securities laws.
(k) The execution, delivery and performance of the Indenture and this Agreement, and the issuance and sale of the Purchased Notes and compliance with the terms and provisions thereof have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate action and do not and will not result in a breach or violation of any of the terms and provisions of, or constitute a default under, or result in the creation or imposition of any lien, charge or encumbrance upon any property, or assets of the Company or any Material Subsidiary under (i) any statute, any rule, regulation or order of any governmental agency or body or any court, domestic or foreign, having jurisdiction over the Company or any Material Subsidiary of the Company (provided however that enforcement of rights to indemnity and contribution in this Agreement may be limited by federal or state securities laws or principles of public policy), or any of their properties, (ii) any material agreement or instrument to which the Company or any such Material Subsidiary is a party or by which the Company or any such Material Subsidiary is bound or to which any of the properties of the Company or any such Material Subsidiary is subject, or (iii) the charter or by-laws of the Company or any such Material Subsidiary except in the case of (i) and (ii) where such breach or violation or default would not have a Material Adverse Effect.
(l) Except as disclosed in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus, the Company and its Material Subsidiaries have good and marketable title to all real properties and good title to all other properties and assets owned by them that are material to the business of the Company and its subsidiaries consolidated as a single enterprise, in each case free from liens, encumbrances and defects that would materially affect the value thereof or materially interfere with the use made or to be made thereof by them; and except as disclosed in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus, the Company and its Material Subsidiaries hold any leased real or personal property under valid and enforceable leases with such exceptions that are not material to the business of the Company and its subsidiaries consolidated as a single enterprise and that would not materially interfere with the use made or to be made thereof by them.
(m) Neither the Company nor any of its Material Subsidiaries is (i) in violation of its charter or bylaws or (ii) in default in the performance or observance of any obligation, agreement, covenant or condition contained in any contract, indenture, mortgage, loan agreement, note, lease or other instrument to which it is a party or by which it or any of them or their properties may be bound or to which any of their properties may be subject, except in the case of (ii) where such default would not have a Material Adverse Effect.
(n) Except as disclosed in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus, the Company and its Material Subsidiaries possess adequate certificates, authorities, licenses, permits, orders or approvals issued by appropriate governmental agencies or bodies necessary to conduct the business now operated by them, including, without limitation, from the Federal Aviation Administration, except where the failure to do so would not have a Material Adverse Effect, and have not received any notice of proceedings relating to the revocation or modification of any such certificate, authority or permit that, if determined adversely to the Company or any of its Material Subsidiaries, would have a Material Adverse Effect.
(o) Except as disclosed in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus, no strike, lockout, or work stoppage involving the employees of the Company or any Material Subsidiary exists or, to the knowledge of the Company, is imminent that might have a Material Adverse Effect.
 
(p) Except as disclosed in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus, neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries is in violation of any statute, any rule, regulation, decision or order of any governmental agency or body or any court, domestic or foreign, relating to the use, disposal or release of hazardous or toxic substances or relating to the protection or restoration of the environment or human exposure to hazardous or toxic substances (collectively, "environmental laws"), owns or operates any real property contaminated with any substance that is subject to any environmental laws, is liable for any off-site disposal or contamination pursuant to any environmental laws, or is subject to any claim relating to any environmental laws, which violation, contamination, liability or claim would individually or in the aggregate have a Material Adverse Effect; and the Company is not aware of any pending investigation which might lead to such a claim.
(q) Except as disclosed in the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus, there are no pending actions, suits or proceedings against or affecting the Company, any of its subsidiaries or any of their respective officers, in their capacity as such, or any of their respective properties that would, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, or would materially and adversely affect the ability of the Company to perform its obligations under the Indenture, this Agreement, or the Purchased Notes or which are otherwise material in the context of the sale of the Purchased Notes; and no such actions, suits or proceedings are, to the Company's knowledge, threatened or, contemplated.
(r) The financial statements included in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus present fairly in all material respects the financial position of the Company and its consolidated subsidiaries as of the dates shown and their results of operations and cash flows for the periods shown (subject, in the case of unaudited statements, to normal year-end audit adjustments), and such financial statements have been prepared in conformity with the generally accepted accounting principles in the United States applied on a consistent basis (except as otherwise noted therein) and the schedules included in the Registration Statement present fairly in all material respects the information required to be stated therein.
(s) Except as disclosed in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus, since the date of the latest audited financial statements included in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus there has been no material adverse change, nor any development or event reasonably likely to involve a prospective material adverse change, in the financial condition, business, properties or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole.
(t) The Company is not and, after giving effect to the offering and sale of the Purchased Notes and the application of the proceeds thereof as described in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus, will not be required to register under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended.
(u) To the Company's knowledge, after due inquiry, the accountants who certified the financial statements and supporting schedules included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus are an independent registered public accounting firm as required by the Securities Act and the Exchange Act.
(v) The capitalization of the Company has not materially changed since the date of the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus.
 
(w) Neither the Company nor any subsidiary has taken or will take, directly or indirectly, any action designed to, or that might be reasonably expected to, cause or result in stabilization or manipulation of the price of the Purchased Notes.
(x) The Company maintains a system of "disclosure controls and procedures" (as defined in Rule 13a-15(e) of the Exchange Act) that is designed to ensure that information required to be disclosed by the Company in reports that it files or submits under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the time periods specified in the Commission's rules and forms, including controls and procedures designed to ensure that such information is accumulated and communicated to the Company's management as appropriate to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure. The Company has carried out evaluations of the effectiveness of their disclosure controls and procedures as of December 31, 2008 as required by Rule 13a-15 of the Exchange Act.
(y) The Company maintains a system of "internal control over financial reporting" (as defined in Rule 13a-15(f) of the Exchange Act) that complies with the requirements of the Exchange Act and has been designed by, or under the supervision of, its principal executive and principal financial officers, or persons performing similar functions, to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, including, but not limited to policies and procedures that: (i) pertain to the maintenance of records that in reasonable detail accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of the Company; (ii) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the Company are being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the Company; and (iii) provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use or disposition of the Company's assets that could have a material effect on the financial statements. Except as disclosed in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus, there are no material weaknesses in the Company's internal controls.
Any certificate signed by any officer of the Company or any subsidiary and delivered to the Purchasers or to counsel for the Purchasers shall be deemed a representation and warranty by the Company and not the officer in its individual capacity to the Purchasers as to the matters covered thereby.
3. . The Company will deliver the Purchased Notes to you for the accounts of the Purchasers at the offices of the Trustee (at the place specified in the Purchase Agreement) against payment of the purchase price by wire transfer to an account specified by the Company or by certified or official bank check or checks in same day or New York or Chicago Clearing House funds drawn to the order of the Company, at the office of the Company, 100 North Riverside, Chicago, Illinois, 60606, at the time set forth in this Agreement or at such other time not later than seven full business days thereafter as you and the Company determine, such time being herein referred to as the "Closing Date." The Purchased Notes to be delivered will be in definitive fully registered form registered in such minimum denominations, of $2,000 and integral multiples of $1,000 thereof, and in such names as you request in writing not later than 3:00 p.m., New York Time, on the second full business day prior to the Closing Date, or, if no such request is received, in the names of the respective Purchasers in the amounts agreed to be purchased by them pursuant to this Agreement. The Company shall make the Purchased Notes available for checking and packaging at the offices of the Trustee (at the place specified in the Purchase Agreement) prior to the Closing Date and, unless prevented from doing so by circumstances beyond its control, not later than 2:00 p.m., New York Time, on the business day next preceding the Closing Date. If you request that any Purchased Notes be issued
Delivery and Payment
 
in a name or names other than that of the Purchaser agreeing to purchase such Purchased Notes hereunder, the Company shall not be obligated to pay any transfer taxes resulting therefrom. The Notes may also be represented by a permanent global Note or Notes, registered in the name of The Depository Trust Company, as depositary (the "Depositary"), or a nominee of the Depositary (each such Note represented by a permanent global Note being referred to herein as a "Book-Entry Note"). Beneficial interests in Book-Entry Notes will only be evidenced by, and transfers thereof will only be effected through, records maintained by the Depositary's participants.
4. . The several Purchasers propose to offer the Purchased Notes for sale to the public as set forth in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus.
Offering by the Purchasers
5. . The Company covenants and agrees with the several Purchasers that:
Covenants of the Company
(a) It will promptly cause the Preliminary Prospectus and the Prospectus to be filed with the Commission as required by Rule 424.
(b) It will furnish to each Purchaser a copy of each proposed free writing prospectus to be prepared by or on behalf of, used by, or referred to by the Company and not to use or refer to any proposed free writing prospectus to which the Purchasers reasonably object.
(c) It will not take any action that would result in a Purchaser or the Company being required to file with the Commission pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Securities Act a free writing prospectus prepared by or on behalf of a Purchaser that otherwise would not have been required to be filed thereunder.
(d) For as long as a prospectus relating to the Purchased Notes is required to be delivered under the Securities Act, if any event relating to or affecting the Company or of which the Company shall be advised in writing by the Purchasers shall occur which, which in the opinion of the Company or your counsel, should be set forth in a supplement or amendment to the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus in order either to make the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus comply with the requirements of the Securities Act or which would require the making of any change in the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus so that as thereafter delivered to purchasers such Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus will not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, the Company will promptly amend or supplement the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus by either (i) preparing and filing with the Commission supplement(s) or amendment(s) to the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus, or (ii) making an appropriate filing pursuant to the Exchange Act, which will supplement or amend the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus so that, as supplemented or amended, the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus when the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus is delivered to a purchaser will comply with the Securities Act and will not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. Prior to the Closing Date, the Company will not file any amendment or supplement without first providing the Purchasers with such amendment or supplement and having obtained the Purchasers' consent to the filing, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld.
 
(e) The Company will make generally available to its security holders as soon as practicable, but in any event not later than eighteen months after the effective date of the Registration Statement (as defined in Rule 158(c) under the Securities Act), an earnings statement of the Company and its subsidiaries (which need not be audited) complying with Section 11(a) of the Securities Act and the Securities Act Rules and Regulations (including at the option of the Company Rule 158).
(f) The Company will furnish to you copies of the following documents, in each case as soon as available after filing and in such quantities as you reasonably request (i) the Registration Statement relating to the Notes as originally filed and all post-effective amendments thereto (at least one of which will be signed and will include all exhibits except those incorporated by reference to previous filings with the Commission); (ii) each prospectus relating to the Purchased Notes; and (iii) during the time when a prospectus relating to the Purchased Notes is required to be delivered under the Securities Act, all post-effective amendments and supplements to the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus, respectively (except supplements relating to securities that are not Purchased Notes).
(g) During the period of one year after the Closing Date, the Company will furnish to you, and upon request, to each of the other Purchasers (unless such reports are available electronically on the Commission's website or the Company's website): (i) as soon as practicable after the end of each fiscal year, a copy of its annual report to shareholders for such year, and (ii) as soon as available, a copy of each report or definitive proxy statement of the Company filed with the Commission under the Exchange Act or mailed to shareholders.
(h) Whether or not any sale of the Purchased Notes is consummated, the Company will pay and bear all costs and expenses incident to the performance of its obligations under this Agreement, including (a) the preparation, printing and filing of the Registration Statement (including financial statements and exhibits) as originally filed and of each amendment thereto, (b) the preparation, and distribution of the Purchased Notes and the Indenture, (c) the delivery of the certificates for the Purchased Notes to the Purchasers, (d) the fees and disbursements of the Company's counsel and accountants, (e) the delivery to the Purchasers of copies of the Registration Statement as originally filed and the printing and delivery of each amendment thereto, of each preliminary prospectus and of the Prospectus and any amendments or supplements thereto, (f) any fees charged by rating agencies for rating the Purchased Notes, and (g) the fees and expenses of the Trustee and any paying agent (including reasonable fees and expenses of any counsel to such parties).
If this Agreement is terminated by the Purchasers in accordance with the provisions of Section 7, the Company shall reimburse the Purchasers for all of their reasonable out-of-pocket expenses, including the reasonable fees and disbursements of counsel for the Purchasers.
(i) The Company will not offer or sell any of its other debt securities which are substantially similar to the Purchased Notes prior to ten days after the Closing Date, without the consent of the Purchasers.
(j) The Company will prepare a final term sheet relating to the offering of the Purchased Notes, containing only information that describes the final terms of the Purchased Notes or the offering in a form consented to by the Purchasers, and to file such
 
final term sheet within the period required by Rule 433(d)(5)(ii) under the Securities Act following the date the final terms have been established for the offering of the Purchased Notes.
(k) The Company will advise the Representative promptly, and confirm such advice in writing, (i) when any amendment to the Registration Statement has been filed or becomes effective prior to the Closing Date; (ii) when any supplement to the Prospectus or any amendment to the Prospectus or any free writing prospectus has been filed prior to the Closing Date; (iii) of any request by the Commission for any amendment to the Registration Statement or any amendment or supplement to the Prospectus or the receipt of any comments from the Commission relating to the Registration Statement or any other request by the Commission for any additional information prior to the Closing Date; (iv) of the issuance by the Commission of any order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or preventing or suspending the use of any Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus or the initiation or threatening of any proceeding for that purpose or pursuant to Section 8A of the Securities Act; (v) of the occurrence of any event during the period that a prospectus is required to be delivered as a result of which the Prospectus, the Time of Sale Prospectus or any free writing prospectus as then amended or supplemented would include any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances existing when the Prospectus, the Time of Sale Prospectus or any such free writing prospectus is delivered to a purchaser, not misleading; (vi) of the receipt by the Company of any notice of objection of the Commission to the use of the Registration Statement or any post-effective amendment thereto pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) under the Securities Act; and (vii) of the receipt by the Company of any notice with respect to any suspension of the qualification of the Purchased Notes for offer and sale in any jurisdiction or the initiation or threatening of any proceeding for such purpose; and the Company will use its reasonable best efforts to prevent the issuance of any such order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement, preventing or suspending the use of any Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus or suspending any such qualification of the Purchased Notes and, if any such order is issued, will obtain as soon as possible the withdrawal thereof.
(l) The Company will qualify the Purchased Notes for offering and sale under the applicable securities laws of such states and other jurisdictions as you may reasonably designate in consultation with the Company and to maintain such qualifications in effect for a period of not less than a year from the date of the Prospectus; , , that the Company shall not be obligated to file any general consent to service of process or to qualify as a foreign corporation or as a dealer in securities in any jurisdiction in which it is not so qualified or to subject itself to taxation in respect of doing business in any jurisdiction in which it is not otherwise so subject. The Company will file such statements and reports as may be required by the laws of each jurisdiction in which the Securities have been qualified as above provided. The Company will also supply you with such information as is necessary for the determination of the legality of the Purchased Notes for investment under the laws of such jurisdictions as you may request.
provided
however
(m) The Company will use its reasonable best efforts in cooperation with you to permit the Purchased Notes offered and sold in transactions by you to be eligible for clearance and settlement through The Depository Trust Company.
(n) The Company will apply the net proceeds received by it from the sale of the Purchased Notes in the manner specified in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus under the heading "Use of Proceeds."
 
6. . Each Purchaser severally covenants with the Company not to take any action that would result in the Company being required to file with the Commission under Rule 433(d) a free writing prospectus prepared by or on behalf of such Purchaser that otherwise would not be required to be filed by the Company thereunder, but the for the action of the Purchaser.
Covenants of the Purchasers
7. . The obligations of the several Purchasers to purchase and pay for the Purchased Notes will be subject to the accuracy of the representations and warranties on the part of the Company herein, to the accuracy of the statements of Company officers made pursuant to the provisions hereof, to the performance by the Company of its obligations hereunder and to the following additional conditions precedent:
Conditions of the Obligations of the Purchasers
(a) On the date of execution of the Purchase Agreement and on the Closing Date, you shall have received from Deloitte & Touche LLP, independent registered public accounting firm with respect to the Company within the meaning of the Securities Act and the Securities Act Rules and Regulations, a letter, dated such a date, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to you containing statements and information of the type customarily included in accountants' "comfort letters" to underwriters with respect to the financial statements and certain financial information contained or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus; provided that the letter delivered on the Closing Date shall use a "cut-off" date no more than three business days prior to the Closing Date.
(b) The Registration Statement shall remain effective and at the Closing Date, no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement shall have been issued, no proceedings for such purpose shall have been instituted or, to the knowledge of the Company or you, shall be contemplated by the Commission and the Company has not received a notice of objection to the use of the Registration Statement as an automatic shelf registration statement. The Prospectus and each issuer "free writing prospectus" shall have been timely filed with the Commission under the Securities Act, as required; and all requests by the Commission for additional information shall have been complied with to the reasonable satisfaction of the Purchasers.
(c) Subsequent to the date of this Agreement, there shall not have occurred (A) any change or any development involving a prospective change not contemplated by the Time of Sale Prospectus as of the date of this Agreement in or affecting particularly the business or properties of the Company which, in the judgment of a majority in interest of the Purchasers including you, materially impairs the investment quality of the Purchased Notes, and (B) (i) any downgrading in the rating of the Purchased Notes or any other debt securities or preferred stock of or guaranteed by the Company or any of its subsidiaries by any "nationally recognized statistical rating organization" (as defined for purposes of Rule 436(g) under the 1933 Act) or (ii) any public announcement that any such organization has under surveillance or review its rating of the Purchased Notes or any other debt securities or preferred stock of or guaranteed by the Company or any of its subsidiaries (other than an announcement with positive implications of a possible upgrading, and no implication of a possible downgrading, of such rating) or any announcement that the Company has been placed on negative outlook, other than any downgrade by Fitch Ratings from "A+" to "A" or public announcement by Fitch Ratings that it has the ratings of the Purchased Notes or other debt of the Company under review.
(d) You shall have received an opinion, dated the Closing Date, of a counsel for the Company, to the effect that:
 
(i) The Company has been duly incorporated or formed, and is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware;
(ii) The Indenture has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company and is a valid instrument, legally binding on the Company and enforceable in accordance with its terms, except as limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, or other laws affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights and by general principles of equity;
(iii) The issuance and sale of the Purchased Notes have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate action of the Company. The Purchased Notes (assuming that they have been duly authenticated by the Trustee or a duly designated Authentication Agent under the Indenture, which fact counsel need not verify by an inspection of the Purchased Notes) have been duly issued and constitute legal, valid, and binding obligations of the Company enforceable in accordance with their terms, and are entitled to the benefits provided by the Indenture except as such enforceability or entitlement may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, or other laws affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights and by general principles of equity;
(iv) The execution and delivery of the Purchase Agreement, the Indenture, and the Purchased Notes, the issuance and sale of the Purchased Notes to you in accordance with the Purchase Agreement do not (i) constitute a violation by the Company of any applicable provision of U.S federal laws or the laws of the State of New York (except that no opinion in this paragraph is being given as to compliance with any disclosure requirement or any prohibition against fraud or misrepresentation or as to whether performance of the indemnification or contribution provisions in the Purchase Agreement would be permitted);
(v) The Registration Statement is effective under the Securities Act and, (a) to the best of such counsel's knowledge, no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement has been issued, and no proceedings for such purpose have been instituted or are pending under the Securities Act; and (b) the Registration Statement (as of its effective date), the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus (as of the date of the Purchase Agreement and as of the Closing Date) and any amendments or supplements thereto, as of their respective dates, appeared to comply as to form in all material respects with the requirements of Form S-3 under the Securities Act and the Securities Act Rules and Regulations; provided that no opinion is expressed with respect to financial statements or other financial information contained in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus or incorporated therein or attached as an exhibit thereto or as to the Statement of Eligibility and Qualification on Form T-1 of the Trustee under the Indenture.
(vi) The consummation of the transactions contemplated in this Agreement and the compliance by the Company with all the terms of the Indenture did not and will not result in a breach of any of the terms and provisions of, the Company's Charter or By-Laws or any indenture, mortgage or deed of trust or other agreement or instrument to which the Company is a party which is filed as an exhibit to the Company's most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K or any other periodic report filed by the Company subsequent to that date;
(vii) This Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company; and
 
(viii) The statements set forth in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus under the caption "Description of the Debt Securities," and on the cover page of the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus insofar as they purport to constitute a summary of the terms of the Indenture and the Purchased Notes, are accurate and fair summaries of the matters set forth therein. The statements in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus under the caption "Certain United States Federal Income Tax Considerations," insofar as such statements constitute summaries of legal matters referred to therein, correctly summarize in all material respects the legal matters referred to therein.
(ix) To such counsel's knowledge, there are no legal or governmental proceedings that are pending against the Company or any of its subsidiaries or to which any property of the Company or any of its subsidiaries is subject that has caused us to conclude that such proceeding is required by Item 103 of Regulation S-K to be described in the Registration Statement, Time of Sale Prospectus or Prospectus but is not so described.
(x) The Company is not and, after giving effect to the offering and sale of the Purchased Notes and the application of the proceeds thereof as described in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus, will not be an "investment company" or an entity "controlled" by an "investment company" within the meaning of the Investment Company Act.
(xi) The documents incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus or any further amendment or supplement thereto made by the Company prior to the Closing Date (other than the financial statements and related schedules therein, as to which such counsel need express no opinion), when they were filed with the Commission, complied as to form in all material respects with the requirements of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder.
(xii) The Indenture has been duly qualified under the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended.
In addition, such counsel shall state that such counsel has participated in conferences with officers, counsel and other representatives of the Company, representatives of the independent registered public accounting firm for the Company and representatives of the Purchasers at which the contents of the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus and related matters were discussed; and, although such counsel is not passing upon and does not assume responsibility for the accuracy, completeness or fairness of the statements contained in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus (except as to the matters referred to in their opinion rendered pursuant to subheading (viii) above), on the basis of the foregoing (relying as to matters of fact to a large extent upon the opinions of officers, counsel and other representatives of the Company), no facts have come to the attention of such counsel which lead such counsel to believe that (a) the Registration Statement, when it became effective and as of the date of this Agreement, contained any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, (b) the Time of Sale Information as of the Time of Sale and as of the date hereof, contained any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, or (c) the Prospectus as of its date and as of the date hereof, contained any untrue statement of a
 
material fact or omitted to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading (it being understood that such counsel need make no comment with respect to the financial statements and other financial data included in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus or Prospectus or incorporated therein or as to the Statement of Eligibility and Qualification on Form T-1 of the Trustee under the Indenture).
(e) The Purchasers shall have received from counsel for the Purchasers, an opinion dated the Closing Date, with respect to the matters as the Purchasers shall reasonably request and the Company shall have furnished to such counsel such documents as they reasonably request for the purpose of enabling them to pass on such matters.
(f) You shall have received a certificate of the Chief Executive Officer, President or any Vice President of the Company and a principal financial or accounting officer of the Company, dated the Closing Date, in which such officers shall state, to the best of their knowledge after reasonable investigation, (i) the representations and warranties of the Company in this Agreement are true and correct in all material respects, (ii) the Company has complied with all agreements and satisfied all conditions on its part to be performed or satisfied at or prior to the Closing Date, (iii) no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement has been issued and no proceedings for such purpose have been instituted, are pending or, to the best knowledge of the Company, threatened by the Commission, and (iv) that, subsequent to the date of the most recent financial statements set forth or incorporated by reference in the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus, there has been no material adverse change, nor any development or event reasonably likely to involve a prospective material adverse change, in the financial condition, business, properties or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole, except as set forth or contemplated in the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus.
(g) The Company will furnish you with such conformed copies of such opinions, certificates, letters and documents as you reasonably request.
In case any such condition shall not have been satisfied, this Agreement may be terminated by you upon notice in writing or by telecopy to the Company without liability or obligation on the part of the Company or any Purchaser, except as set forth in Section 12 hereof.
8. . The obligations of the Company to sell and deliver the Purchased Notes are subject to the following condition precedent:
Conditions of the Obligations of the Company
Prior to the Closing Date, no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement shall have been issued and no proceedings for that purpose shall have been instituted or, to the knowledge of the Company or you, shall be contemplated by the Commission.
If any such condition shall not have been satisfied, then the Company shall be entitled, by notice in writing or by telecopy to you, to terminate this Agreement without any liability on the part of the Company or any Purchaser, except as set forth in Section 12 hereof.
9. .
Indemnification
(a) The Company will indemnify and hold harmless each Purchaser, its affiliates, as such term is defined in Rule 501(b) under the Securities Act (each, an "Affiliate"), each of its directors and officers and each person, if any, who controls any Purchaser within the
 
meaning of the Securities Act or the Exchange Act against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities, joint or several, to which such Purchaser, Affiliate or such controlling person may become subject, under the Securities Act or otherwise, insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) arise out of or are based upon any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of any material fact contained in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus, the Prospectus or any issuer "free writing prospectus" (or any amendment or supplement thereto), or arise out of or are based upon the omission or alleged omission to state therein a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading; and will reimburse each Purchaser, Affiliate and each such controlling person for any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such Purchaser, Affiliate or such controlling person in connection with investigating or defending any such loss, claim, damage, liability or action; provided, however, that the Company will not be liable to such Purchaser, Affiliate or controlling person in any such case to the extent that any such loss, claim, damage or liability arises out of or is based upon an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission made in any such documents in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by such Purchaser specifically for use therein. This indemnity agreement will be in addition to any liability which the Company may otherwise have.
(b) Each Purchaser agrees, severally and not jointly, to indemnify and hold harmless the Company, each of its directors and officers and each person, if any, who controls the Company within the meaning of the Securities Act or the Exchange Act, against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities to which the Company or any such director, officer or controlling person may become subject, under the Securities Act, or otherwise, insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) arise out of or are based upon any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of any material fact contained in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus, the Prospectus or any issuer "free writing prospectus" as defined in Rule 433(h) under the Act, any Company information that the Company has filed, or is required to file, pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Act or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto) or arise out of or are based upon the omission or the alleged omission to state therein a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, in each case to the extent, but only to the extent, that such untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission was made in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by such Purchaser specifically for use therein; and will reimburse any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by the Company or any such director, officer or controlling person in connection with investigating or defending any such loss, claim, damage, liability or action as such expenses are incurred. This indemnity agreement will be in addition to any liability which such Purchaser may otherwise have.
(c) Promptly after receipt by an indemnified party under this Section of notice of the commencement of any action, such indemnified party will, if a claim in respect thereof is to be made against the indemnifying party under (a) and (b) above, notify the indemnifying party of the commencement thereof; but the omission so to notify the indemnifying party will not relieve it from any liability which it may have to any indemnified party otherwise than under this Section, except to the extent the indemnifying party has been materially prejudiced by such omission. In case any such action is brought against any indemnified party, and it notifies the indemnifying party of the commencement thereof, the indemnifying party will be entitled to participate therein and, to the extent that it may wish, jointly with any other indemnifying party similarly notified, to assume the defense thereof, with counsel satisfactory to such indemnified party (who may, with the consent of the indemnified party, be counsel to the indemnifying party) and who shall not
 
be counsel to any other indemnified party who may have interests conflicting with those of such indemnified party, and after notice from the indemnifying party to such indemnified party of its election so to assume the defense thereof, the indemnifying party will not be liable to such indemnified party under this Section for any legal or other expenses subsequently incurred by such indemnified party in connection with the defense thereof other than reasonable costs of investigation. The indemnifying party shall not be liable for any settlement of any proceeding effected without its written consent, but if settled with such consent or if there be a final judgment for the plaintiff, the indemnifying party agrees to indemnify each indemnified party from and against any loss or liability by reason of such settlement or judgment. Notwithstanding the foregoing sentence, if at any time an indemnified party shall have requested that an indemnifying party reimburse the indemnified party for fees and expenses of counsel as contemplated by this paragraph, the indemnifying party shall be liable for any settlement of any proceeding effected without its written consent if (i) such settlement is entered into more than 30 days after receipt by the indemnifying party of such request and (ii) the indemnifying party shall not have reimbursed the indemnified party in accordance with such request prior to the date of such settlement unless the request is being disputed in good faith. No indemnifying party shall, without the written consent of the indemnified party, effect any settlement of any pending or threatened proceeding in respect of which any indemnified party is or could have been a party and indemnification could have been sought hereunder by such indemnified party, unless such settlement (x) includes an unconditional release of such indemnified party, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to such indemnified party, from all liability on claims that are the subject matter of such proceeding and (y) does not include any statement as to or any admission of fault, culpability or a failure to act by or on behalf of any indemnified party.
(d) If recovery is not available under the foregoing indemnification provisions of this Section, for any reason other than as specified therein, the parties entitled to indemnification by the terms thereof shall be entitled to contribution to liabilities and expenses, except to the extent that contribution is not permitted under Section 11(f) of the Act. In determining the amount of contribution to which the respective parties are entitled, there shall be considered the relative benefits received by each party from the offering of the Purchased Notes (taking into account the portion of the proceeds of the offering realized by each), the parties' relative knowledge and access to information concerning the matter with respect to which the claim was asserted, the opportunity to correct and prevent any statement or omission, and any other equitable considerations appropriate under the circumstances. The relative benefits received by the Company on the one hand and the Purchasers on the other shall be deemed to be in the same respective proportions as the net proceeds (before deducting expenses) received by the Company from the sale of the Purchased Notes and the total underwriting discounts and commissions received by the Purchasers in connection therewith, in each case as set forth in the table on the cover of the Prospectus, bear to the aggregate offering price of the Purchased Notes. The Company and the Purchasers and such controlling persons agree that it would not be equitable if the amount of such contribution were determined by pro rata or per capita allocation (even if the Purchasers and such controlling persons were treated as one entity for such purpose). Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection (d), no Purchaser or controlling person shall be required to make contribution hereunder which in the aggregate exceeds the total public offering price of the Purchased Notes, purchased by the Purchaser under this Agreement, less the aggregate amount of any damages which such Purchaser or such controlling person has otherwise been required to pay in respect of the same claim or any substantially similar claim. The Purchasers' obligations to contribute are several in proportion to their respective underwriting obligations and not joint.
 
10. . If any Purchaser or Purchasers default in their obligations to purchase Purchased Notes hereunder and the aggregate principal amount of Purchased Notes which such defaulting Purchaser or Purchasers agreed but failed to purchase is 10% of the principal amount of Purchased Notes or less, the non-defaulting Purchasers may make arrangements satisfactory to the Company for the purchase of such Purchased Notes by other persons, including any of the Purchasers, but if no such arrangements are made by the Closing Date the non-defaulting Purchasers shall be obligated severally, in proportion to their respective commitments hereunder, to purchase the Purchased Notes which such defaulting Purchasers agreed but failed to purchase. If any Purchaser or Purchasers so default and the aggregate principal amount of Purchased Notes with respect to which such default or defaults occur is more than the above percentage and arrangements reasonably satisfactory to you and the Company for the purchase of such Purchased Notes by other persons are not made within seventy-two hours after such default, this Agreement will terminate without liability on the part of any non-defaulting Purchaser or the Company, except as provided in Section 11. In the event that any Purchaser or Purchasers default in their obligation to purchase Purchased Notes hereunder, the Company may, by prompt written notice to the non-defaulting Purchasers, postpone the Closing Date for a period of not more than seven full business days in order to effect whatever changes may thereby be made necessary in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus or in any other documents, and the Company will promptly file any amendments to the Registration Statement or supplements to the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus which may thereby be made necessary. As used in this Agreement, the term "Purchaser" includes any person substituted for a Purchaser under this Section. Nothing herein will relieve a defaulting Purchaser from liability for its default.
Default of Purchasers
11. . This Agreement may be terminated, by notice to the Company, if after the execution and delivery of this Agreement and prior to the Closing Date (i) trading generally shall have been suspended or materially limited on the New York Stock Exchange; (ii) trading of any securities issued or guaranteed by the Company shall have been suspended on any exchange; (iii) a general moratorium on commercial banking activities shall have been declared by federal or New York State authorities or a material disruption in commercial banking or securities settlement clearance services in the United States; or (iv) there shall have occurred any outbreak or escalation of hostilities or any change in financial markets or any calamity or crisis, either within or outside the United States, that, in each case in the reasonable judgment of the Purchasers, is material and adverse and makes it impracticable or inadvisable to proceed with the offering, sale or delivery of the Purchased Notes on the terms and in the manner contemplated by this Agreement, the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus.
Termination
12. . The respective indemnities, agreements, representations, warranties, and other statements of the Company or its officers and of the several Purchasers set forth in or made pursuant to this Agreement will remain in full force and effect, regardless of any investigation, or statement as to the results thereof, made by or on behalf of any Purchaser or the Company or any of its officers or directors or any controlling person, and will survive delivery of and payment for the Purchased Notes. If this Agreement is terminated pursuant to Section 7, 8, 10 or 11 or if for any reason the purchase of the Purchased Notes by the Purchasers is not consummated, the Company shall remain responsible for the expenses to be paid or reimbursed by it pursuant to Section 5(h). In addition, in such event the respective obligations of the Company and the Purchasers pursuant to Section 9 shall remain in effect; provided, however, that each Purchaser will use its best efforts to promptly notify each other Purchaser and each dealer and prospective customer to whom such Purchaser has delivered a Prospectus for the Purchased Notes by telephone or telegraph, confirmed by letter in either case, of such termination or failure to consummate, including in such notice instructions regarding the continued use of the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus, the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto.
Survival of Certain Representations and Obligations
 
13. . All communications hereunder will be in writing, and, if sent to the Purchasers will be delivered or telecopied and confirmed to the address furnished in writing for the purpose of such communications hereunder, or, if sent to the Company, will be delivered or telecopied and confirmed to it, attention of Treasurer at 100 North Riverside, Chicago, Illinois 60606, telecopier (312) 544-2399, with a copy to Corporate Secretary at the same address, telecopier (312) 544-2829.
Notices
14. . This Purchase Agreement will inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the parties hereto and their respective successors and the officers and directors and controlling persons referred to in Section 9, and no other person will have any right or obligation hereunder.
Successors
15. . This Agreement, together with any contemporaneous written agreements and any prior written agreements (to the extent not superseded by this Agreement) that relate to the offering of the Purchased Notes, represents the entire agreement between the Company and the Purchasers with respect to the preparation of the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus, the conduct of the offering, and the purchase and sale of the Purchased Notes.
Entire Agreement
(b) The Company acknowledges that in connection with the offering of the Purchased Notes: (i) the Purchasers have acted at arm's-length, are not agents of, and owe no fiduciary duties to, the Company or any other person, (ii) the Purchasers owe the Company only those duties and obligations set forth in this Agreement and prior written agreements to the extent not superseded by this Agreement), if any, and (iii) the Purchasers may have interests that differ from those of the Company. The Company waives to the full extent permitted by applicable law any claims it may have against the Purchasers arising from an alleged breach of fiduciary duty in connection with the offering of the Purchased Notes.
16. . This Purchase Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of New York without giving effect to any conflicts of law provisions that would apply the laws of another jurisdiction.
Construction
17. . This Agreement may be executed in one or more counterparts and it is not necessary that the signatures of all parties appear on the same counterpart, but such counterparts together shall constitute but one and the same agreement.
Counterparts
18. . No amendment or waiver of any provision of this Agreement, nor any consent or approval to any departure therefrom, shall in any event be effective unless the same shall be in writing and signed by the parties hereto.
Amendments or Waivers
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20100127074736.txt.gz
TIME:20100127074736
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
(a) On January 27, 2010, The Boeing Company issued a press release reporting its financial results for the fourth quarter of 2009. A copy of the Company's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
(a) Not applicable
(b) Not applicable
(c) Not applicable
(d) Exhibits
99.1    Press Release issued by The Boeing Company dated January 27, 2010, reporting Boeing's financial results for the fourth quarter of 2009.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Boeing Reports Strong 2009 Revenue & Cash Flow on Solid Core Performance
Fourth-Quarter 2009
 
Full-Year 2009
 
 
 
Outlook
Table 1. Summary Financial Results
 
 The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] reported fourth-quarter net income of $1.3 billion, or $1.75 per share, as revenue rose 42 percent to $17.9 billion. Current period results reflect solid performance across core businesses and represent a significant improvement over the year-ago quarter, which included a labor strike and a charge on the 747 program (Table 1).
CHICAGO, January 27, 2010
Revenue for the full year reached a record $68.3 billion on higher commercial deliveries and growth in Defense, Space & Security. Earnings for the year declined to $1.84 per share due to a combined $3.58 per share impact from previously announced 787 and 747 events in Commercial Airplanes. Earnings for 2008 of $3.67 per share included a combined $2.56 per share impact primarily due to a labor strike and charges on the 747 program.
 
Earnings guidance for 2010 has been established at $3.70 to $4.00 per share, reflecting the previously announced 777 production rate reduction, reduced scope on Army modernization and missile defense programs, and some consideration for development program and market risks.
"We put a strong finish on 2009 by getting the 787 in the air and generating solid core operating performance across the company," said Jim McNerney, Boeing chairman, president and chief executive officer. "Focus areas for 2010 are to continue our strong operational performance, certify and deliver the 787 and 747-8, and further reposition our defense, space and security business. While the challenges ahead are significant, I believe we have the people and the resources we need to be successful and to begin consistently delivering on this company's great potential."
Boeing's quarterly operating cash flow was $3.2 billion, which includes higher cash receipts than the strike-affected period a year ago partially offset by continued investment in development programs (Table 2). For the full year, operating cash flow was $5.6 billion. Free cash flow* was $3.0 billion in the quarter and $4.4 billion for the year.
Table 2. Cash Flow
 
 
Cash and investments in marketable securities totaled $11.2 billion at year-end, up 70 percent in the quarter. The cash position was improved by the issuance of $2.2 billion in debt during the quarter and disciplined operational management (Table 3).
Table 3. Cash, Marketable Securities and Debt Balances
 
 
 
Total company backlog at quarter-end was $316 billion, down 1 percent in the quarter, as backlog for both Commercial Airplanes and Defense, Space & Security declined during the period.
Segment Results
Commercial Airplanes
Boeing Commercial Airplane's fourth-quarter revenue doubled to $9.2 billion. A labor strike reduced revenue in the year-ago period by an estimated $4.3 billion. The current period operating margins of 11.1 percent reflect strong operating performance and model mix, while earnings for the year-ago quarter were reduced by the labor strike and a 747 charge (Table 4).
For the full year, revenue rose to $34.1 billion on higher airplane deliveries partially offset by lower services volume. Commercial Airplanes posted a loss for the year of $0.6 billion driven by previously announced 787 and 747 impacts. The 787 impact, which reduced 2009 operating earnings by $2.7 billion, resulted from the reclassification of costs for the first three flight-test airplanes from program inventory to research and development expense. On the 747, higher costs and difficult market conditions resulted in previously announced charges totaling $1.4 billion. Combined, these events reduced the unit's reported operating margin by 11.9 points.
Table 4. Commercial Airplanes Operating Results
 
 
Commercial Airplanes booked 82 gross orders during the quarter while 20 others were removed from its order book. Contractual backlog remains strong with 3,375 airplanes valued at $250 billion, more than seven times the unit's 2009 revenue.
The 787 program entered flight testing during the quarter with the first two airplanes completing first flights. The remaining four flight-test airplanes are expected to be flying by the end of the second quarter. First delivery is scheduled for the fourth quarter of 2010. During the quarter, the company completed its acquisition of Global
 
Aeronautica and broke ground in South Carolina for the second 787 assembly line. Total firm orders for the 787 at quarter-end were 851 airplanes from 56 customers.
The 747-8 program expects its first flight in the near future which will begin the flight-test phase of the program. Initial delivery is expected in the fourth quarter of 2010.
Boeing Defense, Space & Security
Boeing Defense, Space & Security's fourth-quarter revenue rose 6 percent to $8.5 billion on increased military aircraft deliveries and higher volume in services. Operating margins were 9.7 percent reflecting strong performance in Boeing Military Aircraft and Global Services & Support partially offset by additional costs on the Airborne Early Warning and Control (AEW&C) program which reduced margins by 1.6 points (Table 5).
For the full year, revenue increased by 5 percent to $33.7 billion on growth in Global Services & Support and Boeing Military Aircraft segments. Operating earnings grew 2 percent to $3.3 billion, producing operating margins of 9.8 percent.
Table 5. Boeing Defense, Space & Security Operating Results
 
Boeing Military Aircraft (BMA) fourth-quarter revenue rose 19 percent to $3.7 billion and operating margin was 9.5 percent, reflecting higher aircraft deliveries, improved delivery mix and strong execution across its programs, partially offset by higher costs on the AEW&C program which reduced BMA margins by 3.5 points. During the quarter, BMA delivered 32 aircraft, the EA-18G was approved for full-rate production, and the C-17 won new international orders.
Network & Space Systems fourth-quarter revenue was $2.4 billion, reduced primarily by lower volume on combat systems and missile defense. Operating margin
 
was 5.9 percent reflecting solid performance across the segment's array of programs partially offset by a write-down of Delta II inventory and a contract settlement in satellites. During the quarter, the Brigade Combat Team Modernization Increment 1 was approved to enter low rate initial production.
Global Services & Support (GS&S) revenue increased 19 percent on higher volume across its broad portfolio of services and logistics products. During the quarter, GS&S operating margins were 13.8 percent driven by strong operating performance. In this segment, the KC-135 Programmed Depot Maintenance contract award was reinstated, and the company was awarded several Department of Energy Smart Grid grants.
Backlog at Defense, Space & Security is $64.8 billion, approximately two times expected 2010 revenue. The reduction in backlog was driven by run-off of multi-year contracts that exceeded additions to backlog and by termination of a portion of the Brigade Combat Team Modernization contract due to changing US defense priorities.
Boeing Capital Corporation
Boeing Capital Corporation (BCC) reported fourth-quarter pre-tax earnings of $14 million compared to $19 million in the same period last year (Table 6). During the quarter, BCC's portfolio balance declined slightly to $5.7 billion, down from $6.0 billion at the beginning of the year and from $6.1 billion at the end of the third quarter, on customer payments and depreciation. BCC contributed $93 million in cash dividends to the company during the full year. BCC's debt-to-equity ratio increased to 5.8-to-1.
Table 6. Boeing Capital Corporation Operating Results
 
Additional Information
The "Other" segment consists primarily of Boeing Engineering, Operations and Technology, as well as certain results related to the financial consolidation of all
 
business units. Other segment expense was $47 million in the fourth quarter, down from $74 million in the same period last year.
Total pension expense for the fourth quarter was $223 million, as compared to $113 million in the same period last year. A total of $264 million was recognized in the operating segments in the quarter (up from $99 million in the same period last year), partially offset by a $41 million contribution to earnings in unallocated items. The company made a discretionary contribution of 29.2 million shares of Boeing common stock, valued at $1.5 billion, to its pension plans during the quarter.
Unallocated expense was $123 million, up from $101 million in the same quarter last year, driven by higher deferred compensation expense partially offset by lower unallocated pension expense and intersegment eliminations.
Interest expense for the quarter was $110 million, up from $57 million in the same period last year due to additional debt issued in 2009. Other income/(expense) decreased $23 million driven by lower interest earned on cash balances.
Outlook
The company's 2010 financial guidance reflects solid operating performance amid lower volumes, higher pension expense and continued investment in development programs (Table 7).
Boeing's 2010 revenue guidance is $64 billion to $66 billion and reflects previously announced production rate reductions on 777 and reduced scope on Army modernization and missile defense. Earnings guidance for 2010 of $3.70 to $4.00 per share reflects the lower revenue and includes some consideration for development program and market risks. Operating cash flow is expected to be approximately zero in 2010, including less than $100 million of pension contributions, as the company continues to build inventory on key development programs.
The company expects that 2011 revenue will be higher than 2010, primarily driven by higher estimates of 787 and 747-8 deliveries. Combining higher estimated deliveries with plans for R&D and other factors, operating cash flow in 2011 is expected to be greater than $5 billion.
Commercial Airplanes' 2010 delivery guidance is established at between 460 and 465 airplanes (reflecting fewer twin-aisle deliveries) and is sold out. It includes the first few 787 and 747-8 deliveries, which are expected to begin in the fourth quarter.
 
The unit's 2010 revenue is expected to be $31 billion to $32 billion with operating margins between 6.5 percent and 7.5 percent.
Defense, Space & Security's revenue for 2010 is expected to be $32 billion to $33 billion with operating margins of approximately 10 percent.
Boeing Capital Corporation expects that its aircraft finance portfolio will continue to reduce as its expected new aircraft financing for 2010 is less than $0.5 billion, below normal portfolio runoff through customer payments and depreciation. BCC's debt-to-equity ratio is expected to return to the 5.0-to-1 level in the second half of 2010.
 
 
Boeing's 2010 R&D forecast is $3.9 billion to $4.1 billion on continued investment in development programs, including an operating model adjustment to better balance future R&D efforts at Commercial Airplanes. R&D is expected to
 
decrease significantly in 2011. Capital expenditures for 2010 are expected to be approximately $1.9 billion reflecting the bulk of capital investments required for the second 787 assembly line in South Carolina. Capital expenditures in 2011 are expected to be lower than in 2010.
The company's non-cash pension expense is expected to be approximately $1.2 billion in 2010.
Non-GAAP Measure Disclosure
Management believes that the non-GAAP (Generally Accepted Accounting Principles) measures (indicated by an asterisk *) used in this report provide investors with important perspectives into the company's ongoing business performance. The company does not intend for the information to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the related GAAP measures. Other companies may define the measures differently. The following definitions are provided:
Free Cash Flow
Free cash flow is defined as GAAP less capital expenditures for . Management believes free cash flow provides investors with an important perspective on the cash available for shareholders, debt repayment, and acquisitions after making the capital investments required to support ongoing business operations and long term value creation. Free cash flow does not represent the residual cash flow available for discretionary expenditures as it excludes certain mandatory expenditures such as repayment of maturing debt. Management uses free cash flow internally to assess both business performance and overall liquidity. Table 2 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and free cash flow.
operating cash flow
property, plant and equipment additions
 
This document contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "may," "will," "should," "expects," "intends," "projects," "believes," "estimates," "targets," "anticipates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. Examples of forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements we make regarding our guidance relating to 2010 and 2011 financial and operating performance, as well as any other statement that does not directly relate to any historical or current fact. Forward-looking statements are based on our current expectations and assumptions, which may not prove to be accurate. These statements are not guarantees and are subject to risks, uncertainties, and changes in circumstances that are difficult to predict. Many factors could cause actual results to differ materially and adversely from these forward-looking statements. Among these factors are: (1) general conditions in the economy and our industry, including those due to regulatory changes; (2) risks attributable to our reliance on our commercial customers, our suppliers and the worldwide market; (3) risks related to our dependence on U.S. government contracts; (4) our reliance on fixed-price contracts, which could subject us to losses in the event of cost overruns; (5) risks related to cost-type contracts; (6) uncertainties concerning contracts that include in-orbit incentive payments; (7) changes in accounting estimates; (8) significant changes in discount rates and actual investment return on pension assets; (9) work stoppages or other labor disruptions; (10) changes in the competitive landscape in the markets in which we operate; (11) risks related to our doing business in other countries, including sales to non-U.S. customers; (12) potential adverse developments in new or pending litigation and/or government investigations; (13) changes in the financial condition or regulatory landscape of the commercial airline industry as they relate to Boeing Capital Corporation; (14) changes in our ability to obtain debt on commercially reasonable terms and at competitive rates in order to fund our operations and contractual commitments; (15) risks related to realizing the anticipated benefits of merger, acquisitions, joint ventures/strategic alliance or divestitures; (16) adequacy of our insurance coverage to cover significant risk exposures; and (17) potential business disruptions related to physical security threats, IT attacks or natural disasters.
Additional information concerning these and other factors can be found in our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including our most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q and Current Reports on Form 8-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which it is made, and we assume no obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statement, except as required by law.
Contact:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20100209143733.txt.gz
TIME:20100209143733
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The Board of Directors (the ) of The Boeing Company (the ") appointed Mr. Greg Smith, 43, as the Company's Vice President of Finance and Corporate Controller effective February 9, 2010. In that position, Mr. Smith will also act as the Company's chief accounting officer.
"
Board
"
Company
"
Prior to this appointment, Mr. Smith served as the Company's Vice President of Financial Planning and Analysis since June 2008. From August 2004 until June 2008, Mr. Smith served as Vice President of Global Investor Relations at Raytheon Company. Prior to that, Mr. Smith served as the controller of The Boeing Company's Shared Services Group.
Mr. Smith will receive salary, bonus and equity awards, and will participate in other benefit and compensation plans, at levels consistent with his seniority and scope of responsibility. No additional compensation or equity has been awarded to Mr. Smith in connection with this appointment.
Mr. Smith replaces Mr. Robert J. Pasterick, who served as the Company's Vice President of Finance and Corporate Controller since February 2009. Effective February 9, 2010, Mr. Pasterick became the Company's President, Shared Services Group.
A copy of the Company's press release announcing Mr. Smith's appointment and Mr. Pasterick's new position is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: February 9, 2010
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
CHICAGO, Feb. 9, 2010  Boeing [NYSE: BA] today announced a series of strategic leadership moves within its corporate Finance and Shared Services organizations.
Corporate Controller and vice president, Finance, Rob Pasterick, 54, is named president, Shared Services Group, reporting to Corporate President and Chief Financial Officer James Bell. Pasterick, who has held a variety of key Finance roles across the company in his 30 years of service, will lead the 8,000-person Shared Services team that provides internal services and property management across Boeing's global enterprise. He succeeds Tim Copes, who recently assumed the role of vice president, Quality and Manufacturing at Boeing Commercial Airplanes.
Greg Smith, 43, replaces Pasterick as Corporate Controller and vice president, Finance, reporting to Bell. Smith, formerly vice president of Financial Planning and Analysis has held key leadership roles in defense and commercial units of Boeing in supply chain, factory operations, finance, program management, investor relations and internal audit. As a corporate officer and the company's principal interface with the board of directors' audit committee, Smith is charged with ensuring Boeing's financial disclosures and regulatory compliance remains timely, transparent and efficient.
Diana Sands, 44, adds the responsibility of Financial Planning and Analysis to her current role, becoming vice president, Investor Relations, Financial Planning and Analysis, reporting to Bell. Sands continues to lead investor relations operations and financial community relationships, working with institutional investors and securities analysts to promote understanding of Boeing's programs, financial performance and outlook. Sands has held positions at Boeing in Corporate Treasury and as vice
president, Financial Planning and Analysis. In her new planning and analysis role, Sands will also direct development of integrated long-range business plans and monthly financial forecasts and ensure Boeing's leadership has the financial information necessary for sound business decisions.
"These strategic appointments broaden the skills and experiences of our team, strengthen our core finance capabilities, and improve the support we provide to our senior leadership and investors," said Bell. "The demonstrated performance and experience of these leaders ensure our continued focus on enhancing competitiveness and seamless integration across Boeing," Bell said.
All of the positions are effective immediately.
Web site:
http://www.boeing.com/
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20100210203934.txt.gz
TIME:20100210203934
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On February 10, 2010, the Board of Directors of The Boeing Company (the "") elected Susan C. Schwab, Professor, University of Maryland School of Public Policy, as a new director. Ambassador Schwab served as U. S. Trade Representative from June 2006 to January 2009 and as Deputy U.S. Trade Representative from October 2005 to June 2006. Ambassador Schwab also serves on the boards of directors of Caterpillar Inc. and FedEx Corporation.
Company
The Board of Directors of the Company has appointed Ambassador Schwab to the Audit Committee and the Finance Committee.
Ambassador Schwab will participate in the Company's nonemployee director compensation program, which is described on pages 23-25 of the Company's proxy statement for its 2009 Annual Meeting of Shareholders filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 13, 2009, and which includes an annual cash retainer fee of $100,000 and an annual grant of retainer stock units valued at $130,000.
A copy of the Company's press release announcing the election of Ambassador Schwab is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
On February 10, 2010, the Board of Directors approved and adopted an amendment to Article II, Section 1 of the By-Laws of The Boeing Company to increase the number of directors from eleven to twelve. A copy of the amended and restated By-Laws is attached hereto as Exhibit 3.2 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: February 10, 2010
 
 

Exhibit 3.2
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
SECTION 1. 
.
Annual Meetings
The Annual Meeting of the stockholders shall be held on such date and at such time as the Board of Directors shall determine, for the election of directors and the transaction of such other business as may come before the meeting.
SECTION 2.
Special Meetings.
A special meeting of stockholders may be called at any time by the Board of Directors, or by stockholders holding together at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, except as otherwise provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto.
SECTION 3.
Place of Meeting.
All meetings of the stockholders of the Corporation shall be held at such place or places, if any, within or without the State of Delaware as may from time to time be fixed by the Board of Directors or as shall be specified or fixed in the respective notices or waivers of notice thereof.
SECTION 4.
Notice of Meetings.
Except as otherwise required by statute and as set forth below, notice of each annual or special meeting of stockholders shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date. If the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, notice of each special meeting of stockholders shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than fifty-five (55) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date, unless the calling of such meeting is ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, in which case notice of such special meeting shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date. Such notice shall be given by delivering to each stockholder a written or printed notice thereof either personally or by mailing such notice in a postage-prepaid envelope addressed to the stockholder's address as it appears on the stock books of the Corporation or by transmitting the notice to the stockholder in any other manner permitted by Delaware law. Except as otherwise required by statute, no publication of any notice of a meeting of stockholders shall be required. Every notice of a meeting of stockholders shall state the place, if any (or the means of remote communication, if any, by which stockholders and proxy holders may be deemed to be present in person), date, and hour of the meeting and, in the case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called. Notices are deemed given (i) if by mail, when deposited in the United States mail, postage prepaid, directed to the stockholder at such stockholder's address as it appears on the records of the Corporation, or, if a stockholder shall have filed with the Secretary a written request that notices to such stockholder be mailed to some other address, then directed to such stockholder at such other address; (ii) if by facsimile, when directed to a number at which the stockholder has consented to receive notice; (iii) if by electronic mail, when directed to an electronic mail address at which the stockholder has consented to receive such notice; (iv) if by posting on an electronic network together with a separate notice to the stockholder of such specific posting, upon the later to occur of (A) such posting and (B) the giving of such separate notice of such posting; and (v) if by any other form of electronic transmission, when directed to the stockholder as required by law and, to the extent required by applicable law, in the manner consented to by the stockholder. An affidavit of the mailing or other means of giving any notice of any stockholders' meeting, executed by the Secretary, Assistant Corporate Secretary or any transfer agent of the Corporation giving the notice, shall be prima facie evidence of the giving of such notice. Notice shall be deemed to have been given to all stockholders of record who share an address if notice is given in accordance with the "householding" rules set forth in Rule 14a-3(e) under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") and Section 233 of the Delaware General Corporation Law.
 
SECTION 5.
Waivers of Notice.
Whenever any notice is required to be given to any stockholder under the provisions of these By-Laws, the Certificate of Incorporation, or the Delaware General Corporation Law, a waiver thereof in writing, signed by the person or persons entitled to such notice, whether before or after the time stated therein, shall be deemed equivalent to the giving of such notice. The attendance of a stockholder at a meeting, in person or by proxy, or waiver by electronic transmission, shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when a stockholder attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened.
SECTION 6.
Quorum.
At all meetings of stockholders, except when otherwise provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by these By-Laws, the presence, in person or by proxy duly authorized, of the holders of one-third of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and except as otherwise provided by statute or rule of law, or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by these By-Laws, the vote, in person or by proxy, of the holders of a majority of the shares constituting such quorum shall be binding upon all stockholders of the Corporation. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote may adjourn any meeting, from time to time but not for a period of more than thirty (30) days at any one time, until a quorum shall attend. At any such adjourned meeting at which a quorum shall be present, any business may be transacted which might have been transacted at the meeting as originally called. Unless otherwise provided by statute, no notice of an adjourned meeting need be given.
SECTION 7.
Proxies.
7.1
Appointment.
Each stockholder entitled to vote at a meeting of stockholders or to express consent or dissent to corporate action in writing without a meeting may authorize another person or persons to act for such stockholder by proxy. Such authorization may be accomplished (a) by the stockholder or such stockholder's authorized officer, director, employee, or agent executing a writing or causing his or her signature to be affixed to such writing by any reasonable means, including facsimile signature, or (b) by transmitting or authorizing the transmission of a telegram, cablegram, or other means of electronic transmission to the intended holder of the proxy or to a proxy solicitation firm, proxy support service, or similar agent duly authorized by the intended proxy holder to receive such transmission; provided, that any such telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission must either set forth or be accompanied by information from which it can be determined that the telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission was authorized by the stockholder. Any copy, facsimile telecommunication, or other reliable reproduction of the writing or transmission by which a stockholder has authorized another person to act as proxy for such stockholder may be substituted or used in lieu of the original writing or transmission for any and all purposes for which the original writing or transmission could be used, provided that such copy, facsimile telecommunication, or other reproduction shall be a complete reproduction of the entire original writing or transmission.
7.2
Delivery to Corporation; Duration.
A proxy shall be filed with the Secretary of the Corporation before or at the time of the meeting or the delivery to the Corporation of the consent to corporate action in writing. A proxy shall become invalid three (3) years after the date of its execution, unless otherwise provided in the proxy. A proxy with respect to a specified meeting shall entitle the holder thereof to vote at any reconvened meeting following adjournment of such meeting but shall not be valid after the final adjournment thereof.
 
SECTION 8.
Inspectors of Election.
8.1
Appointment.
In advance of any meeting of stockholders, the Board of Directors of the Corporation shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspectors of election at such meeting and to make a written report thereof. The Board of Directors may designate one or more persons to serve as alternate inspectors to serve in place of any inspector who is unable or fails to act. If no inspector or alternate is able to act at a meeting of stockholders, the chairman of such meeting shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspector at such meeting.
8.2
Duties.
The inspectors of election shall (a) ascertain the number of shares of the Corporation outstanding and the voting power of each such share; (b) determine the shares represented at the meeting and the validity of proxies and ballots; (c) count all votes and ballots; (d) determine and retain for a reasonable period of time a record of the disposition of any challenges made to any determination by them; and (e) certify their determination of the number of shares represented at the meeting and their count of the votes and ballots. Each inspector shall, before entering upon the discharge of his or her duties, take and sign an oath to faithfully execute the duties of inspector with strict impartiality and according to the best of his or her ability. The inspectors may appoint or retain other persons or entities to assist them in the performance of their duties.
8.3
Determination of Proxy Validity.
The validity of any proxy or ballot executed for a meeting of stockholders shall be determined by the inspectors of election in accordance with the applicable provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law as then in effect. In determining the validity of any proxy transmitted by telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission, the inspectors shall record in writing the information upon which they relied in making such determination.
SECTION 9.
Fixing the Record Date.
9.1
Meetings.
For the purpose of determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at any meeting of stockholders or any adjournment thereof, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which record date shall be not fewer than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the date of such meeting. If the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, the record date for each special meeting of stockholders shall be not fewer than fifty-five (55) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date, unless the calling of such meeting is ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation. If no record date is fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall be at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which notice is given, or, if notice is waived, at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which the meeting is held. A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting; provided, however, that the Board of Directors may fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
9.2
Consent to Corporate Action Without a Meeting.
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which date shall not be more than ten (10) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days after the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, when no prior action by the Board of Directors is required by Chapter 1 of the Delaware General Corporation Law as now or hereafter amended, shall be the first date on which a signed written consent setting forth the action taken or proposed to be taken is delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the records of proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Delivery made to the Corporation's registered office shall be by hand or by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors and prior action by the Board of Directors is required by Chapter 1 of the Delaware General Corporation Law as now or hereafter amended, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution taking such prior action.
 
9.3
Dividends, Distributions, and Other Rights.
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to receive payment of any dividend or other distribution or allotment of any rights or the stockholders entitled to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion, or exchange of stock, or for the purpose of any other lawful action, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted, and which record date shall be not more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days prior to such action. If no record date is fixed, the record date for determining stockholders for any such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution relating thereto.
9.4
Voting List.
At least ten (10) days before each meeting of stockholders, a complete list of the stockholders entitled to vote at such meeting shall be made, arranged in alphabetical order, and showing the address of each stockholder and the number of shares registered in the name of each stockholder. This list shall be open to examination by any stockholder, for any purpose germane to the meeting, for a period of ten (10) days prior to the meeting, either (i) on a reasonably accessible electronic network, provided that the information required to gain access to such list is provided with the notice of meeting, or (ii) during ordinary business hours at the principal place of business of the Corporation. The list shall also be produced and kept at such meeting for inspection by any stockholder who is present.
SECTION 10.
Action by Stockholders Without a Meeting.
Subject to the provisions of Article NINTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, any action which could be taken at any annual or special meeting of stockholders may be taken without a meeting, without prior notice, and without a vote, if a consent or consents in writing, setting forth the action so taken, are (a) signed by the holders of outstanding stock having not fewer than the minimum number of votes that would be necessary to authorize or take such action at a meeting at which all shares entitled to vote thereon were present and voted and (b) delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the records of proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Delivery made to the Corporation's registered office shall be by hand or by certified mail or registered mail, return receipt requested. Every written consent shall bear the date of signature of each stockholder who signs the consent, and no written consent shall be effective to take the corporate action referred to therein unless written consents signed by a sufficient number of stockholders to take such action are delivered to the Corporation, in the manner required by this Section, within sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days of the date of the earliest dated consent delivered to the Corporation in the manner required by this Section 10. The validity of any consent executed by a proxy for a stockholder pursuant to a telegram, cablegram, or other means of electronic transmission transmitted to such proxy holder by or upon the authorization of the stockholder shall be determined by or at the direction of the Secretary of the Corporation. A written record of the information upon which the person making such determination relied shall be made and kept in the records of the proceedings of the stockholders. Any such consent shall be inserted in the minute book as if it were the minutes of a meeting of stockholders. Prompt notice of the taking of the corporate action without a meeting by less than unanimous written consent shall be given to those stockholders who have not consented in writing.
SECTION 11. Notice of Nominations and Other Stockholder Business; Required Vote for Directors; Director Qualification.
11.1
Notice of Nominations and Other Stockholder Business.
A.
Annual Meetings of Stockholders.
1. Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors and the proposal of other business to be considered by the stockholders may be made at an annual meeting of stockholders (a) as specified in the Corporation's notice of meeting (or any supplement thereto); (b) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof; or (c) by any stockholder of the Corporation who (i) was a stockholder of record at the time the notice provided for in this By-Law is delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation, (ii) is entitled to vote at the meeting, and (iii) complies with the notice procedures set forth in this By-Law as to such nomination or other business; clause (c) shall be the exclusive means for a stockholder to make nominations or submit proposals for other business (other than matters properly brought under Rule 14a-8 under the Exchange Act and included in the Corporation's notice of meeting) before an annual meeting of stockholders.
 
2. Without qualification, for any nominations or any other business to be properly brought before an annual meeting by a stockholder pursuant to Section 11.1.A(1)(c), the stockholder must have given timely notice thereof in writing to the Secretary of the Corporation and any such proposed business (other than the nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors) must constitute a proper matter for stockholder action. To be timely, a stockholder's notice shall be delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not earlier than the close of business on the one hundred and twentieth (120th) day and not later than the close of business on the ninetieth (90th) day prior to the first anniversary of the preceding year's annual meeting; provided, however, that in the event that the date of the annual meeting is more than thirty (30) days before or more than seventy (70) days after such anniversary date, notice by the stockholder to be timely must be so delivered not later than the close of business on the later of the ninetieth (90th) day prior to such annual meeting and the tenth (10th) day following the day on which public announcement of the date of such annual meeting is first made by the Corporation. In no event shall the postponement of a meeting as to which notice has been sent to stockholders commence a new time period (or extend any time period) for the giving of a stockholder's notice as described above. To be in proper form, such stockholder's notice (whether given pursuant to this Section 11.1.A(2) or Section 11.1.B) to the Secretary of the Corporation must: (a) set forth, as to the stockholder giving the notice and the beneficial owner, if any, on whose behalf the nomination or proposal for other business is made (i) the name and address of such stockholder, as they appear on the Corporation's books, and of such beneficial owner, if any, (ii) (A) the class or series and number of shares of the Corporation which are, directly or indirectly, owned beneficially and of record by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, (B) any option, warrant, convertible security, stock appreciation right, or similar right with an exercise or conversion privilege or a settlement payment or mechanism at a price related to any class or series of shares of the Corporation or with a value derived in whole or in part from the value of any class or series of shares of the Corporation, whether or not such instrument or right shall be subject to settlement in the underlying class or series of shares of the Corporation or otherwise (a "Derivative Instrument") directly or indirectly owned beneficially by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, and any other direct or indirect opportunity to profit or share in any profit derived from any increase or decrease in the value of shares of the Corporation, (C) any proxy, contract, arrangement, understanding, or relationship pursuant to which such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, has a right to vote any shares of any security of the Corporation, (D) any short interest in any security of the Corporation (for purposes of this By-Law a person shall be deemed to have a short interest in a security if such person directly or indirectly, through any contract, arrangement, understanding, relationship or otherwise, has the opportunity to profit or share in any profit derived from any decrease in the value of the subject security), (E) any rights to dividends on the shares of the Corporation owned beneficially by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, that are separated or separable from the underlying shares of the Corporation, (F) any proportionate interest in shares of the Corporation or Derivative Instruments held, directly or indirectly, by a general or limited partnership in which such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, is a general partner or, directly or indirectly, beneficially owns an interest in a general partner, and (G) any performance-related fees (other than an asset-based fee) that such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, is entitled to based on any increase or decrease in the value of shares of the Corporation or Derivative Instruments, if any, all such information to be provided as of the date of such notice, including, without limitation, any such interests held by members of such stockholder's and such beneficial owner's, if any, immediate family sharing the same household (which information shall be supplemented by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, not later than ten (10) days after the record date for the annual meeting to disclose such ownership as of the record date), (iii) any other information relating to such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, that would be required to be disclosed in a proxy statement or other filings required to be made in connection with solicitations of proxies for, as applicable, the proposal of other business and/or for the election of directors in a contested election pursuant to Section 14 of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, and (iv) a representation (A) that the stockholder is a holder of record of stock of the Corporation entitled to vote at such annual meeting and intends to appear in person or by proxy at the annual meeting to propose such business or nomination and (B) whether the stockholder or the beneficial owner, if any, intends or is part of a group which intends (x) to deliver a proxy statement and/or form of proxy to holders of at least the percentage of the Corporation's outstanding capital stock required to approve or adopt the proposal or elect the nominee and/or (y) otherwise to solicit proxies from stockholders in support of such proposal or nomination; (b) if the notice relates to any business other than the nomination of a director or directors that the stockholder proposes to bring before the annual meeting, set forth (i) a brief description of the business desired to be brought before the annual meeting, the text of the proposal or business (including the text of any resolutions proposed for consideration and in the event that such business includes a proposal to amend these By-Laws, the language of the proposed amendment), the reasons for conducting such business at the annual meeting and any material interest of such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, in such business and (ii) a description of all agreements, arrangements, and understandings between such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, and their respective affiliates and associates, and any other person or persons (including their names) acting in concert therewith in connection with the proposal of such business by such stockholder; (c) set forth, as to each person, if any, whom the stockholder proposes to nominate for election or reelection to the Board of Directors (i) all information relating to such person that would be required to be disclosed in a proxy statement or other filings required to be made in connection with solicitations of proxies for election of directors in a contested election pursuant to Section 14 of the Exchange Act, (ii) such person's written consent to being named in the proxy statement as a nominee and to serving as a director if elected and a statement whether such person, if elected, intends to tender, promptly following such person's election or reelection, an irrevocable resignation effective upon such person's failure to receive the required vote for reelection at the next meeting at which such person would face reelection and upon acceptance of such resignation by the Board of Directors, and (iii) a description of all direct and indirect compensation and other material monetary agreements, arrangements and understandings during the past three (3) years, and any other material relationships, between or among such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, and their respective affiliates and associates, or any other person or persons (including their names) acting in concert therewith, on the one hand, and each proposed nominee, and his or her respective affiliates and associates, or any other person or persons (including their names) acting in concert therewith, on the other hand, including, without limitation, all information that would be required to be disclosed pursuant to Rule 404 promulgated under Regulation S-K if the stockholder making the nomination and any beneficial owner on whose behalf the nomination is made, if any, or any affiliate or associate thereof or person acting in concert therewith, were the "registrant" for purposes of such rule and the nominee were a director or executive officer of such registrant; and (d) with respect to each nominee for election or reelection to the Board of Directors, include the completed and signed questionnaire, representation and agreement required by Section 11.3. The Corporation may require any proposed nominee to furnish such other information as may reasonably be required by the Corporation to determine the eligibility of such proposed nominee to serve as an independent director of the Corporation or that could be material to a reasonable stockholder's understanding of the independence, or lack thereof, of such nominee.
 
3. Notwithstanding anything in the second sentence of Section 11.1.A(2) to the contrary, in the event that the number of directors to be elected to the Board of Directors of the Corporation is increased effective at the annual meeting and there is no public announcement by the Corporation naming all of the nominees for director or specifying the size of the increased Board of Directors at least one hundred (100) days prior to the first anniversary of the preceding year's annual meeting, a stockholder's notice required by this By-Law shall also be considered timely, but only with respect to nominees for any new positions created by such increase, if it shall be delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not later than the close of business on the tenth (10th) day following the day on which such public announcement is first made by the Corporation.
B.
Special Meetings of Stockholders.
Only such business shall be conducted at a special meeting of stockholders as shall have been brought before the special meeting pursuant to the Corporation's notice of meeting. Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors may be made at a special meeting at which directors are to be elected pursuant to the Corporation's notice of special meeting (a) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof or stockholders pursuant to Article 1, Section 2 hereof, or (b) provided that the Board of Directors or stockholders pursuant to Article 1, Section 2 hereof has determined that directors shall be elected at such special meeting, by any stockholder of the Corporation who (i) is a stockholder of record at the time the notice provided for in this By-Law is delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation and at the time of the special meeting, (ii) is entitled to vote at the special meeting, and (iii) complies with the notice procedures set forth in this By-Law as to such nomination. In the event the Corporation calls a special meeting for the purpose of electing one or more directors to the Board of Directors, any such stockholder may nominate a person or persons (as the case may be) for election to such position(s) as specified in the Corporation's notice of meeting, if the stockholder's notice required by Section 11.1.A(2) (including the completed and signed questionnaire, representation and agreement required by Section 11.3) shall be delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not earlier than the close of business on the one hundred and twentieth (120th) day prior to such special meeting and not later than the close of business on the later of the ninetieth (90th) day prior to such special meeting and the tenth (10th) day following the day on which public announcement is first made of the date of the special meeting and of the nominees proposed by the Board of Directors to be elected at such special meeting. In no event shall the postponement of a special meeting as to which notice has been sent to stockholders commence a new time period (or extend any time period) for the giving of a stockholder's notice as described above.
 
C.
General.
1. Only such persons who are nominated in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law shall be eligible to serve as directors and only such business shall be conducted at a meeting of stockholders as shall have been brought before the meeting in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law. Except as otherwise provided by law, the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, the chairman of the meeting shall have the power and duty (a) to determine whether a nomination or any other business proposed to be brought before the meeting was made or proposed, as the case may be, in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law (including whether the stockholder or beneficial owner, if any, on whose behalf the nomination or proposal is made solicited (or is part of a group which solicited) or did not so solicit, as the case may be, proxies in support of such stockholder's nominee or proposal in compliance with such stockholder's representation as required by Section 11.1.A(2)(a)(iv)) and (b) if any proposed nomination or business was not made or proposed in compliance with this By-Law, to declare that such nomination shall be disregarded or that such proposed business shall not be transacted. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this By-Law, unless otherwise required by law, if the stockholder (or a qualified representative of the stockholder) does not appear at the annual or special meeting of stockholders of the Corporation to present a nomination or proposed business, such nomination shall be disregarded and such proposed business shall not be transacted, notwithstanding that proxies in respect of such vote may have been received by the Corporation. For purposes of this By-Law, to be considered a qualified representative of the stockholder, a person must be a duly authorized officer, manager, or partner of such stockholder or must be authorized by a writing executed by such stockholder or an electronic transmission delivered by such stockholder to act for such stockholder as proxy at the annual or special meeting and such person must produce such writing or electronic transmission, or a reliable reproduction of the writing or electronic transmission, at the annual or special meeting.
1. For purposes of this By-Law, "public announcement" shall mean disclosure in a press release reported by the Dow Jones News Service, Associated Press, or comparable national news service or in a document publicly filed by the Corporation with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to Section 13, 14 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.
2. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this By-Law, a stockholder shall also comply with all applicable requirements of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder with respect to the matters set forth in this By-Law; provided, however, that any references in these By-Laws to the Exchange Act are not intended to and shall not limit the requirements applicable to any nominations or proposals as to any other business to be considered pursuant to this By-Law (including Section 11.1A(1)(c) or Section 11.1B). Nothing in this By-Law shall be deemed to affect any rights (a) of stockholders to request inclusion of proposals in the Corporation's proxy statement pursuant to Rule 14a-8 under the Exchange Act or (b) of the holders of any series of Preferred Stock if and to the extent provided for under law, the Certificate of Incorporation, or these By-Laws.
11.2
Required Vote for Directors.
A nominee for director shall be elected to the Board of Directors if the votes cast for such nominee's election exceed the votes cast against such nominee's election; provided, however, that the directors shall be elected by a plurality of the votes cast at any meeting of stockholders for which (i) the Secretary of the Corporation receives a notice that a stockholder has nominated a person for election to the Board of Directors in compliance with the advance notice requirements for stockholder nominees for director set forth in Section 11.1 of this By-law and (ii) such nomination has not been withdrawn by such stockholder on or prior to the tenth day preceding the date the Corporation first mails its notice of meeting for such meeting to stockholders. If directors are to be elected by a plurality of the votes cast, stockholders shall not be permitted to vote against a nominee. Votes cast shall exclude abstentions with respect to that director's election.
11.3
Director Qualification: Submission of Questionnaire, Representation, and Agreement.
To be eligible to be a nominee for election or reelection as a director of the Corporation, a person must deliver (in accordance with the time periods prescribed for delivery of notice under Section 11.1) to the Secretary of the Corporation at the principal executive offices of the Corporation a written questionnaire with respect to the background and qualification of such person and the background of any other person or entity on whose behalf the nomination is being made (which questionnaire shall be provided by the Secretary upon written request) and a written representation and agreement (in the form provided by the Secretary of the Corporation upon written request), that such person (a) is not and will not become a party to (i) any agreement, arrangement, or understanding with, and has not given any commitment or assurance to, any person or entity as to how such person, if elected as a director of the Corporation, will act or vote on any issue or question (a "Voting Commitment") that has not been disclosed to the Corporation or (ii) any Voting Commitment that could limit or interfere with such person's ability to comply, if elected as a director of the Corporation, with such person's fiduciary duties under applicable law; (b) is not and will not become a party to any agreement, arrangement, or understanding with any person or entity other than the Corporation with respect to any direct or indirect compensation, reimbursement, or indemnification in connection with service or action as a director that has not been disclosed therein; and (c) in such person's individual capacity and on behalf of any person or entity on whose behalf the nomination is being made, would be in compliance, if elected as a director of the Corporation, and will comply with all applicable publicly disclosed corporate governance, conflict of interest, confidentiality and stock ownership and trading policies and guidelines of the Corporation.
 
SECTION 12.
Notice to Corporation.
Any written notice required to be delivered by a stockholder to the Corporation pursuant to Section 11.1 of this Article I or Section 2.1 of Article II of these By-Laws must be given, either by personal delivery or by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, to the Secretary of the Corporation at the Corporation's executive offices in the City of Chicago, State of Illinois.
SECTION 1.
Number and Term of Office.
The number of directors shall be twelve (12), but the number may be increased, or decreased to not less than three (3), from time to time, either by the directors by adoption of a resolution to such effect or by the stockholders by amendment of these By-Laws in accordance with Article VIII. At each annual meeting of stockholders, each director shall be elected to hold office until the next annual meeting or until his or her successor shall be elected and qualified or until his or her earlier resignation or removal.
SECTION 2.
Nomination and Election.
2.1 Only persons who are nominated in accordance with Article I, Section 11 of these By-Laws shall be eligible for election as directors.
Nomination.
2.2 At each election of directors by stockholders, the persons who are elected in accordance with Article I, Section 11 of these By-Laws shall be the directors.
Election.
SECTION 3.
Place of Meeting.
Meetings of the Board of Directors, or of any committee thereof, may be held either within or without the State of Delaware.
SECTION 4.
Annual Meeting.
Each year the Board of Directors shall meet in connection with the annual meeting of stockholders for the purpose of electing officers and for the transaction of other business. No notice of such annual meeting is required. Such annual meeting may be held at any other time or place which shall be specified in a notice given as hereinafter provided for special meetings of the Board of Directors, or in a consent and waiver of notice thereof, signed by all the directors.
 
SECTION 5.
Stated Meetings.
The Board of Directors may, by resolution adopted by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors, from time to time appoint the time and place for holding stated meetings of the Board of Directors, if by it deemed advisable; and such stated meetings shall thereupon be held at the time and place so appointed, without the giving of any special notice with regard thereto. In case the day appointed for a stated meeting shall fall upon a legal holiday, such meeting shall be held on the next following day, not a legal holiday, at the regularly appointed hour. Except as otherwise provided in these By-Laws, any and all business may be transacted at any stated meeting.
SECTION 6.
Special Meetings.
6.1
Convenors and Notice.
Special meetings of the Board of Directors may be called by or at the request of the Chairman of the Board of Directors or any two (2) directors. Notice of a special meeting of the Board of Directors, stating the place, day, and hour of the meeting, shall be given to each director in writing (by mail, wire, facsimile, or personal delivery) or orally (by telephone or in person).
6.2
Waiver of Notice.
With respect to a special meeting of the Board of Directors, a written waiver, signed by a director, or waiver by electronic transmission, shall be deemed equivalent to notice to that director. A director's attendance at a meeting shall constitute that director's waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the director attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting was not lawfully called or convened. Neither the business to be transacted at, nor the purpose of, any regular or special meeting of the Board of Directors need be specified in the waiver of notice of such meeting.
SECTION 7.
Quorum and Manner of Acting.
Except as herein otherwise provided, forty percent (40%) of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided in these By-Laws at the time of any stated or special meeting of the Board of Directors or, if vacancies exist on the Board of Directors, forty percent (40%) of such number of directors then in office; provided, however, that such number may not be less than one-third of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided in these By-Laws, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and, except as otherwise required by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by these By-Laws, the act of a majority of the directors present at any such meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of the Board of Directors. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the directors present may adjourn any meeting, from time to time, until a quorum is present. No notice of any adjourned meeting need be given.
SECTION 8.
Chairman of the Board.
The Chairman of the Board shall preside, when present, at all meetings of the Board of Directors, except as otherwise provided by law.
SECTION 9.
Resignations.
Any director of the Corporation may resign at any time by giving written notice or notice by electronic transmission thereof to the Secretary of the Corporation. Such resignation shall take effect at the time specified therefor or if the time is not specified, upon delivery thereof; and, unless otherwise specified with respect thereto, the acceptance of such resignation shall not be necessary to make it effective.
SECTION 10.
Removal of Directors.
Any directors may be removed with or without cause by the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, at a meeting of stockholders called for that purpose; and the vacancy on the Board of Directors caused by any such removal may be filled by the stockholders at such meeting or at any subsequent meeting.
 
SECTION 11.
Filling of Vacancies Not Caused by Removal.
In case of any increase in the number of directors, or of any vacancy created by death or resignation, the additional director or directors may be elected or, as the case may be, the vacancy or vacancies may be filled, either (a) by the Board of Directors at any meeting, (i) if the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, or (ii) if the Corporation does not have an Interested Stockholder, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the remaining directors, though less than a quorum or (b) by the stockholders entitled to vote, either at an annual meeting or at a special meeting thereof called for that purpose, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the outstanding shares entitled to vote at such meeting.
SECTION 12.
Directors' Fees.
The Board of Directors shall have authority to determine from time to time the amount of compensation that shall be paid to its members for attendance at meetings of the Board of Directors or of any committee of the Board of Directors.
SECTION 13.
Action Without a Meeting.
Any action required or permitted to be taken at any meeting of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof may be taken without a meeting if all members of the Board of Directors or committee, as the case may be, consent thereto in writing, and the writing or writings are filed with the minutes of proceedings of the Board of Directors or committee.
SECTION 1.
Audit Committee.
In addition to any committees appointed pursuant to Section 2 of this Article, there shall be an Audit Committee, appointed annually by the Board of Directors, consisting of at least three (3) directors who are not members of management. It shall be the responsibility of the Audit Committee to review the scope and results of the annual independent audit of books and records of the Corporation and its subsidiaries and to discharge such other responsibilities as may from time to time be assigned to it by the Board of Directors. The Audit Committee shall meet at such times and places as the members deem advisable, and shall make such recommendations to the Board of Directors as they consider appropriate.
SECTION 2.
Other Committees.
2.1 The Board of Directors may appoint standing or temporary committees and invest such committees with such powers as it may see fit, with power to subdelegate such powers if deemed desirable by the Board of Directors; but no such committee shall have the power or authority of the Board of Directors to adopt, amend, or repeal these By-Laws or approve, adopt, or recommend to the stockholders of the Corporation any action or matter expressly required by the Certificate of Incorporation, these By-Laws or the Delaware General Corporation Law to be submitted to stockholders for approval.
Committee Powers.
2.2 The Board of Directors may designate one or more directors as alternate members of any committee, who may replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of the committee. In the absence or disqualification of a member of a committee, the member or members thereof present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, whether or not such member or members constitute a quorum, may unanimously appoint another member of the Board of Directors to act at the meeting in the place of any such absent or disqualified member.
Committee Members.
 
SECTION 3.
Quorum and Manner of Acting.
A majority of the number of directors composing any committee of the Board of Directors, as established and fixed by resolution of the Board of Directors, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at any meeting of such committee but, if less than a majority are present at a meeting, a majority of such directors present may adjourn the meeting from time to time without further notice. The act of a majority of the members of a committee present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of such committee.
SECTION 1.
Officers.
The elected officers of the Corporation shall be a Chairman of the Board of Directors (who shall be a director) and, at the discretion of the Board of Directors, a President (who shall be a director), and one or more Vice Presidents (each of whom may be assigned by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer an additional title descriptive of the functions assigned to such officer and one or more of whom may be designated Executive or Senior Vice President). The Board of Directors may also elect one or more Vice Chairmen. The Board of Directors shall also designate either the Chairman of the Board of Directors or the President as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation. The Board of Directors shall appoint a Controller, a Secretary, and a Treasurer. Any number of offices, whether elective or appointive, may be held by the same person. The Chief Executive Officer may, by a writing filed with the Secretary, designate titles as officers for employees and agents and appoint Assistant Secretaries and Assistant Treasurers as, from time to time, may appear to be necessary or advisable in the conduct of the affairs of the Corporation and may, in the same manner, terminate or change such titles.
SECTION 2.
Term of Office.
So far as practicable, all elected officers shall be elected at the annual meeting of the Board of Directors in each year, and shall hold office until the annual meeting of the Board of Directors in the next subsequent year and until their respective successors are chosen. The Controller, Secretary, and Treasurer shall hold office at the pleasure of the Board of Directors.
SECTION 3.
Salaries of Elected Officers.
The salaries paid to the elected officers of the Corporation shall be authorized or approved by the Board of Directors.
SECTION 4.
Bonuses.
None of the officers, directors, or employees of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations shall at any time be paid any bonus or share in the earnings or profits of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations except pursuant to a plan approved by affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members of the Board of Directors.
SECTION 5.
Removal of Elected and Appointed Officers.
Any elected or appointed officer may be removed at any time, either for or without cause, by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors, at any meeting called for the purpose.
SECTION 6.
Vacancies.
If any vacancy occurs in any office, the Board of Directors may elect or appoint a successor to fill such vacancy for the remainder of the term.
 
SECTION 1.
Chairman of the Board.
The Chairman of the Board of Directors shall preside, when present, at all meetings of the stockholders (except as otherwise provided by statute) and at all meetings of the Board of Directors. The Chairman shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation; to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the Chairman by the Board of Directors.
SECTION 2.
President.
The President shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation and to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; during the absence or disability of the Chairman of the Board of Directors, to exercise the Chairman's powers and to perform the Chairman's duties; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the President by the Board of Directors; provided, that if the office of President is vacant, the Chairman shall exercise the duties ordinarily exercised by the President until such time as a President is elected or appointed.
SECTION 3.
Chief Executive Officer.
The officer designated by the Board of Directors as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation shall have general and active control of its business and affairs. The Chief Executive Officer shall have general power to appoint or designate all employees and agents of the Corporation whose appointment or designation is not otherwise provided for and to fix the compensation thereof, subject to the provisions of these By-Laws; to remove or suspend any employee or agent who shall not have been elected or appointed by the Board of Directors or other body; to suspend for cause any employee, agent, or officer, other than an elected officer, pending final action by the body which shall have appointed such employee, agent, or officer; and to exercise all the powers usually pertaining to the office held by the Chief Executive Officer of a corporation.
SECTION 4.
Vice Presidents and Controller.
The several Vice Presidents and the Controller shall perform all such duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of them, from time to time, by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer, respectively.
SECTION 5.
Secretary.
The Secretary shall attend to the giving of notice of all meetings of stockholders and of the Board of Directors and shall keep and attest true records of all such proceedings. The Secretary shall have charge of the corporate seal and have authority to attest any and all instruments or writings to which the same may be affixed and shall keep and account for all books, documents, papers, and records of the Corporation relating to its corporate organization. The Secretary shall have authority to sign stock certificates and shall generally perform all the duties usually appertaining to the office of secretary of a corporation. In the absence of the Secretary, an Assistant Secretary or Secretary pro tempore shall perform the duties of the Secretary.
SECTION 6.
Treasurer.
The Treasurer shall have the care and custody of all moneys, funds, and securities of the Corporation, and shall deposit or cause to be deposited all funds of the Corporation in accordance with directions or authorizations of the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer. The Treasurer shall have power to sign stock certificates, to indorse for deposit or collection, or otherwise, all checks, drafts, notes, bills of exchange, or other commercial paper payable to the Corporation, and to give proper receipts or discharges therefor. In the absence of the Treasurer, an Assistant Treasurer shall perform the duties of the Treasurer.
 
SECTION 7.
Additional Powers and Duties.
In addition to the foregoing especially enumerated duties and powers, the several officers of the Corporation shall perform such other duties and exercise such further powers as may be provided in these By-Laws or as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine, or as may be assigned to them by any superior officer.
SECTION 8.
Disaster Emergency Powers of Acting Officers.
If, as a result of a disaster or other state of emergency, the Chief Executive Officer is unable to perform the duties of that office, (a) the powers and duties of the Chief Executive Officer shall be performed by the employee with the highest base salary who shall be available and capable of performing such powers and duties and, if more than one such employee has the same base salary, by the employee whose surname begins with the earliest letter of the alphabet among the group of those employees with the same base salary; (b) the officer performing such duties shall continue to perform such powers and duties until the Chief Executive Officer becomes capable of performing those duties or until the Board of Directors shall have elected a new Chief Executive Officer or designated another individual as Acting Chief Executive Officer; (c) such officer shall have the power in addition to all other powers granted to the Chief Executive Officer by these By-Laws and by the Board of Directors to appoint an acting President, acting Vice PresidentFinance, acting Controller, acting Secretary, and acting Treasurer, if any of the persons duly elected to any such office is not, by reason of such disaster or emergency, able to perform the duties of such office, each of such acting appointees to serve in such capacities until the officer for whom the appointee is acting becomes capable of performing the duties of such office or until the Board of Directors shall have designated another individual to perform such duties or have elected another person to fill such office; (d) any such acting officer so appointed shall be entitled to exercise all powers vested by these By-Laws or the Board of Directors in the duly elected officer for whom the acting officer is acting; and (e) anyone transacting business with the Corporation may rely upon a certification by any two (2) officers of the Corporation that a specified individual has succeeded to the powers of the Chief Executive Officer and that such person has appointed other acting officers as herein provided and any person, firm, corporation, or other entity to which such certification has been delivered by such officers may continue to rely upon it until notified of a change in writing signed by two (2) officers of the Corporation.
SECTION 1.
Stock Certificates.
The shares of the stock of the Corporation shall be represented by certificates, provided that the Board of Directors may provide by resolution or resolutions that some or all of any or all classes or series of stock shall be uncertificated shares. Any such resolution shall not apply to shares represented by certificate until such certificate is surrendered to the Corporation. Every holder of stock of the Corporation represented by a certificate shall be entitled to a certificate, signed by the Chairman of the Board of Directors or the President or a Vice President and the Treasurer or an Assistant Treasurer or the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary, certifying the number of shares owned by the stockholder in the Corporation. Any and all of the signatures on a certificate may be a facsimile. If any officer, transfer agent, or registrar who has signed or whose facsimile signature has been placed upon a certificate shall have ceased to be such officer, transfer agent, or registrar before such certificate is issued, it may be issued by the Corporation with the same effect as if he or she were such officer, transfer agent, or registrar at the date of issue.
SECTION 2.
Transfer Agents and Registrars.
The Board of Directors may, in its discretion, appoint responsible banks or trust companies in the Borough of Manhattan, in the City of New York, State of New York, and in such other city or cities as the Board of Directors may deem advisable, from time to time, to act as transfer agents and registrars of the stock of the Corporation; and, when such appointments shall have been made, no stock certificate shall be valid until countersigned by one of such transfer agents and registered by one of such registrars.
 
SECTION 3.
Transfers of Stock.
Shares of stock may be transferred by delivery of the certificates therefor, accompanied either by an assignment in writing on the back of the certificates or by written power of attorney to sell, assign, and transfer the same, signed by the record holder thereof (or, with respect to uncertificated shares, by delivery of duly executed instructions or in any other manner permitted by law), but no transfer shall affect the right of the Corporation to pay any dividend upon the stock to the holder of record thereof, or to treat the holder of record as the holder in fact thereof for all purposes, and no transfer shall be valid, except between the parties thereto, until such transfer shall have been made upon the books of the Corporation.
SECTION 4.
Lost Certificates.
The Board of Directors may provide for the issuance of new certificates of stock or uncertificated shares to replace certificates of stock lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, or alleged to be lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, upon such terms and in accordance with such procedures as the Board of Directors shall deem proper and prescribe.
SECTION 1.
Fiscal Year.
The fiscal year of the Corporation shall be the calendar year.
SECTION 2. (Repealed in its entirety by vote of the stockholders, May 5, 1975.)
SECTION 3.
Signing of Negotiable Instruments.
All bills, notes, checks, or other instruments for the payment of money shall be signed or countersigned by such officer or officers and in such manner as from time to time may be prescribed by resolution (whether general or special) of the Board of Directors.
SECTION 4.
Indemnification of Directors and Officers.
4.1
Right to Indemnification.
Each person who was or is made a party to or is threatened to be made a party to or is otherwise involved (including, without limitation, as a witness) in any actual or threatened action, suit, or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative, or investigative (hereinafter a "proceeding"), by reason of the fact that he or she is or was a director or officer of the Corporation or that, being or having been such a director or officer or an employee of the Corporation, he or she is or was serving at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation as a director, officer, employee, or agent of another corporation or of a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise, including service with respect to an employee benefit plan (hereinafter an "indemnitee"), whether the basis of such proceeding is alleged action in an official capacity as such a director, officer, employee, or agent or in any other capacity while serving as such a director, officer, employee, or agent, shall be indemnified and held harmless by the Corporation to the full extent permitted by the Delaware General Corporation Law, as the same exists or may hereafter be amended (but, in the case of any such amendment, only to the extent that such amendment permits the Corporation to provide broader indemnification rights than permitted prior thereto), or by other applicable law as then in effect, against all expense, liability, and loss (including attorneys' fees, judgments, fines, ERISA excise taxes or penalties, and amounts paid in settlement) actually and reasonably incurred or suffered by such indemnitee in connection therewith, and such indemnification shall continue as to an indemnitee who has ceased to be a director, officer, employee, or agent and shall inure to the benefit of the indemnitee's heirs, executors, and administrators; provided, however, that except as provided in Section 4.2 with respect to proceedings seeking to enforce rights to indemnification, the Corporation shall indemnify any such indemnitee in connection with a proceeding (or part thereof) initiated by such indemnitee only if such proceeding (or part thereof) was authorized or ratified by the Board of Directors. The right to indemnification conferred in this Section 4.1 shall be a contract right and shall include the right to be paid by the Corporation the expenses incurred in defending any such proceeding in advance of its final disposition (hereinafter an "advancement of expenses"); provided, however, that an advancement of expenses incurred by an indemnitee in his or her capacity as a director or officer or former director or officer (and not in any other capacity in which service was or is rendered by such indemnitee, including, without limitation, service to an employee benefit plan) shall be made only upon delivery to the Corporation of an undertaking (hereinafter an "undertaking"), by or on behalf of such indemnitee, to repay all amounts so advanced if it shall ultimately be determined by final judicial decision from which there is no further right to appeal that such indemnitee is not entitled to be indemnified for such expenses under this Section 4.1 or otherwise; and provided, further, that an advancement of expenses shall not be made if the Board of Directors makes a good faith determination that such payment would violate law or public policy.
 
4.2
Right of Indemnitee to Bring Suit.
If a claim under Section 4.1 is not paid in full by the Corporation within sixty (60) days after a written claim has been received by the Corporation, except in the case of a claim for an advancement of expenses, in which case the applicable period shall be twenty (20) days, the indemnitee may at any time thereafter bring suit against the Corporation to recover the unpaid amount of the claim. If successful in whole or in part in any such suit, or in a suit brought by the Corporation to recover an advancement of expenses pursuant to the terms of an undertaking, the indemnitee shall also be entitled to be paid the expenses of prosecuting or defending such suit. The indemnitee shall be presumed to be entitled to indemnification under this Section 4 upon submission of a written claim (and, in an action brought to enforce a claim for an advancement of expenses, where the required undertaking has been tendered to the Corporation), and thereafter the Corporation shall have the burden of proof to overcome the presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled. Neither the failure of the Corporation (including the Board of Directors, independent legal counsel, or the stockholders) to have made a determination prior to the commencement of such suit that indemnification of the indemnitee is proper in the circumstances, nor an actual determination by the Corporation (including the Board of Directors, independent legal counsel, or the stockholders) that the indemnitee is not entitled to indemnification shall be a defense to the suit or create a presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled.
4.3
Nonexclusivity of Rights.
The rights to indemnification and to the advancement of expenses conferred in this Section 4 shall not be exclusive of any other right that any person may have or hereafter acquire under any statute, provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation, these By-Laws, any agreement, vote of stockholders or disinterested directors, or otherwise. Neither any amendment to or repeal of this Section 4 or of any of the procedures established by the Board of Directors pursuant to Section 4.7, nor the adoption of any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, nor, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any modification of law, shall eliminate or reduce the effect of the right or protection of any indemnitee to indemnification and to the advancement of expenses in accordance with the provisions hereof and thereof with respect to any proceeding (regardless of when such proceeding is first threatened, commenced or completed) arising out of, or related to, any acts or omissions of such indemnitee occurring prior to such amendment or repeal.
4.4
Insurance, Contracts, and Funding.
The Corporation may maintain insurance, at its expense, to protect itself and any director, officer, employee, or agent of the Corporation or another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise against any expense, liability, or loss, whether or not the Corporation would have the power to indemnify such person against such expense, liability, or loss under the Delaware General Corporation Law. The Corporation may, without further stockholder approval, enter into contracts with any indemnitee in furtherance of the provisions of this Section 4 and may create a trust fund, grant a security interest, or use other means (including, without limitation, a letter of credit) to ensure the payment of such amounts as may be necessary to effect indemnification as provided in this Section 4.
4.5
Persons Serving Other Entities.
Any person who is or was a director, officer, or employee of the Corporation who is or was serving (i) as a director or officer of another corporation of which a majority of the shares entitled to vote in the election of its directors is held by the Corporation or (ii) in an executive or management capacity in a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise of which the Corporation or a wholly owned subsidiary of the Corporation is a general partner or has a majority ownership shall be deemed to be so serving at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation and entitled to indemnification and advancement of expenses under Section 4.1.
 
4.6
Indemnification of Employees and Agents of the Corporation.
The Corporation may, by action of the Board of Directors, authorize one or more executive officers to grant rights to advancement of expenses to employees or agents of the Corporation on such terms and conditions as such officer or officers deem appropriate under the circumstances. The Corporation may, by action of the Board of Directors, grant rights to indemnification and advancement of expenses to employees or agents or groups of employees or agents of the Corporation with the same scope and effect as the provisions of this Section 4 with respect to the indemnification and advancement of expenses of directors and officers of the Corporation; provided, however, that an undertaking shall be made by an employee or agent only if required by the Board of Directors.
4.7
Procedures for the Submission of Claims.
The Board of Directors may establish reasonable procedures for the submission of claims for indemnification pursuant to this Section 4, determination of the entitlement of any person thereto, and review of any such determination. Such procedures shall be set forth in an appendix to these By-Laws and shall be deemed for all purposes to be a part hereof.
SECTION 1.
Amendment of the By-Laws: General.
Except as herein otherwise expressly provided, the By-Laws of the Corporation may be altered or repealed in any particular and new By-Laws, not inconsistent with any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or any provision of law, may be adopted, either by
A. the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority in number of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote at an annual meeting of stockholders or at a special meeting thereof, the notice of which special meeting shall include the form of the proposed alteration or repeal or of the proposed new By-Laws, or a summary thereof; or
B. either by
i. the affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors at any meeting thereof, or
ii. the affirmative vote of all the directors present at any meeting at which a quorum, less than a majority, is present;
provided, in either of the latter cases, that the notice of such meeting shall include the form of the proposed alteration or repeal or of the proposed new By-Laws, or a summary thereof; and provided, further, that Article I, Section 11.2 of these By-Laws may be amended only as set forth in Section 1.A of this By-Law, except that any amendment required by law or necessary or desirable to cure an administrative or technical deficiency may be made as provided in Section 1.B of this By-Law.
SECTION 2.
Amendments as to Compensation and Removal of Officers.
Notwithstanding anything contained in these By-Laws to the contrary, the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the Voting Stock, as defined in Article FOURTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, at a meeting of stockholders called for the purpose, shall be required to alter, amend, repeal, or adopt any provision inconsistent with Sections 3, 4 and 5 of Article IV of these By-Laws, notice of which meeting shall include the form of the proposed amendment, or a summary thereof.
 

EXHIBIT 99.1
Boeing Elects Former US Trade Representative Schwab to Board of Directors
 The Boeing [NYSE: BA] board of directors has elected former U.S. Trade Representative Susan Schwab as its newest member.
CHICAGO, Feb. 10, 2010
Schwab, 54, was President George W. Bush's principal trade advisor and negotiator from mid-2006 through the end of the Bush administration in January, 2009. Since then she has taught at the University of Maryland's School of Public Policy.
"We're privileged to have Ambassador Schwab join our board," said Boeing Chairman, President and Chief Executive Jim McNerney. "Her expertise will help shape our strategies toward the global market and the many international opportunities that are ahead of us."
Her election to the board is effective immediately. She will serve on the audit and finance committees.
During her government career Schwab was also a deputy U.S. trade representative, an assistant secretary of commerce, director general of the U.S. & Foreign Commercial Service, and a trade policy specialist and legislative director for former U.S. Sen. John Danforth of Missouri.
Contact:
Todd Blecher
312-544-2002
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20100226144034.txt.gz
TIME:20100226144034
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of The Boeing Company (the "") approved a restricted stock unit grant for 50,000 units of Boeing common stock (the ") to James F. Albaugh, Executive Vice President, President and Chief Executive Officer, Boeing Commercial Airplanes. The Award was effective on February 22, 2010.
Company
"Award
The Award was granted in recognition of Mr. Albaugh's performance and as a retention vehicle. The Award was made under the Company's 2003 Incentive Stock Plan (the "") and is subject to the terms and conditions of the 2003 Plan. The Award will vest 100% and settle in common stock (on a one-for-one basis) on the third anniversary of the grant date and is subject to other terms contained in the Form of Notice of Terms of Restricted Stock Units listed as Exhibit 10.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
2003 Plan
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: February 26, 2010
 

EXHIBIT 10.1
 
As part of the Executive Compensation Program, The Boeing Company (the "Company" has awarded you a Restricted Stock Unit award. The terms and conditions of the award are as follows:
 
 
 
"Disability" here means a disability entitling a participant to benefits under a long-term disability policy sponsored by the Company or one of its subsidiaries.
 
 
5.1 While RSUs are in your account, they will earn dividend equivalents in the form of additional RSUs. Specifically, as of each dividend payment date for Boeing stock, your RSU account will be credited with additional RSUs ("Earnings Credit RSUs") equal in number to the number of shares of Boeing stock that could be bought with the cash dividends that would be paid on the RSUs in your account if each RSU were a share of Boeing stock. The number of RSUs that results from the Earnings Credit calculation will be to two decimal places.
5.2 The number of shares of Boeing stock that could be bought with such cash dividends will be calculated based on the "Fair Market Value" of Boeing stock on the applicable dividend payment date. "Fair Market Value" here means the average of the high and the low per share trading prices for Boeing stock as reported in for the specific dividend payment date, or in such other source as the Company deems reliable.
The Wall Street Journal
5.3 Earnings Credit RSUs will vest at the same time as the RSUs with which they are associated.
 
 
 
 
10.1 Distribution from your RSU account will be made as soon as reasonably possible after the vesting of your RSUs, but not later than 60 days after the applicable vesting date. Distribution will be in whole shares of Boeing stock. The number of shares distributed will be equal to the number of whole vested RSUs in your account, subject to deductions described in paragraph 10.2. Fractional share values will be applied to income tax withholding.
10.2 The Company will deduct from the distribution of your vested RSUs any withholding or other taxes required by law and may deduct any amounts due from you to the Company or to a subsidiary of the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20100310143235.txt.gz
TIME:20100310143235
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On March 5, 2010, The Boeing Company ("the Company" or "we") entered into a Consultant Agreement (the "Agreement") with Scott E. Carson. Mr. Carson retired from the Company effective January 1, 2010, and had previously served as our Executive Vice President, President and Chief Executive Officer, Commercial Airplanes. The Agreement provides that Mr. Carson serve as a commercial airplane products and services consultant for the Company until March 12, 2012. Mr. Carson is entitled to a retainer fee of $1,533,100 (an amount equal to his 2009 targeted cash compensation) pursuant to the Agreement, and we will reimburse Mr. Carson for reasonable expenses necessarily incurred in connection with services provided under the Agreement. Mr. Carson will not be eligible for any additional benefits from us pursuant to this Agreement, although he will continue to receive those previously disclosed retirement benefits to which he remains entitled in connection with his former employment with us.
A copy of the Agreement is filed as an exhibit to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated herein by reference. The summary of the material terms of the Agreement set forth above is qualified in its entirety by reference to such exhibit.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
March 5, 2010
Mr. Scott E. Carson
Subject: Consultant Agreement between Scott E. Carson and The Boeing Company
Dear Scott:
Upon acceptance by you, this letter will constitute a Consultant Agreement between you and The Boeing Company ("Boeing"). The terms of this Agreement are described below:
 
 
 
 
Invoices shall be submitted on a monthly basis, shall include a description expenses incurred, shall reference this Agreement and shall bear the following certificate signed by you:
"I certify that the foregoing is a true and correct statement of accrued amounts payable in accordance with the provisions of the Consultant Agreement between Scott E. Carson and The Boeing Company, effective March 12, 2010, during the period covered by this invoice."
 
Mr. Scott E. Carson
Consultant Agreement
 
Expenses will be reimbursed to you to you promptly following receipt of invoices submitted to the Boeing Representative, or their delegate. You agree to follow applicable Boeing expense reimbursement, reporting and documentation policies and practices in claiming expenses and to maintain records in support of all expenses claimed. Such records shall be made available to Boeing for audit during reasonable times upon request, but not beyond one year after final payment. A sample invoice format is included as Exhibit 1.
 
 
 
 
 
Mr. Scott E. Carson
Consultant Agreement
 
 
 
 
Please acknowledge your acceptance of this Agreement by signing and returning one original of this document in the envelope provided.
 
 
Mr. Scott E. Carson
Consultant Agreement
 
Exhibit 1
The Boeing Company
 
 
Expenses                                                                                                    $.USD
            
    
(Please attach supporting documents, such as receipts for hotel, airfare, meals, transportation, etc.)
Charge line(s):
                                                                                 
 
 
 
DOMESTIC CONSULTANT CERTIFICATE
Under the Consultant Agreement, effective on March 12, 2010, by and between The Boeing Company and (the "Agreement"), I, Scott E. Carson ("Consultant"), do hereby certify that the foregoing is a true and correct statement of accrued amounts payable in accordance with the provisions of the Agreement during the period covered by this invoice
Scott E. Carson
I agree to notify Boeing immediately of any subsequent events or circumstances that may make any of the foregoing certifications inaccurate or false.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20100331103834.txt.gz
TIME:20100331103834
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On March 31, 2010, The Boeing Company (the "Company") issued a press release in which it announced that the Company expects to recognize an income tax charge of approximately $150 million as a result of the recently enacted Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, as modified by the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: March 31, 2010
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
Boeing to Recognize Charge Associated with Health Care Law
 Boeing [NYSE: BA] today announced that it expects to recognize an income tax charge of approximately $150 million as a result of the recently enacted Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, as modified by the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act. Beginning in 2013, Boeing will no longer be able to claim an income tax deduction related to prescription drug benefits provided to retirees and reimbursed under the Medicare Part D retiree drug subsidy. Although this tax increase does not take effect until 2013, accounting standards require that a deferred income tax asset be written down in the period legislation changing the tax law is enacted.
CHICAGO, March 31, 2010
The charge is expected to reduce net earnings by approximately $150 million, or $0.20 per share, in the first quarter of 2010 as an increase to income tax expense and a reduction to the deferred income tax asset. Cash impacts of this charge will be realized over many years beginning in 2013.
This impact was not contemplated in the guidance issued by the company on January 27, 2010. Guidance will be updated when results for the first quarter are released.
This document contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "may," "will," "should," "expects," "intends," "projects," "believes," "estimates," "targets," "anticipates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. Examples of forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements we make regarding our guidance relating to 2010 and 2011 financial and operating performance, as well as any other statement that does not directly relate to any historical or current fact. Forward-looking statements are based on our current expectations and assumptions, which may not prove to be accurate. These statements are not guarantees and are subject to risks, uncertainties, and changes in circumstances that are difficult to predict. Many factors could cause actual results to differ materially and adversely from these forward-looking statements. Among these factors are: (1) general conditions in the economy and our industry, including those due to regulatory changes; (2) risks attributable to our reliance on our commercial customers, our suppliers and the worldwide market; (3) risks related to our dependence on U.S. government contracts; (4) our reliance on fixed-price contracts, which could subject us to losses in the event of cost overruns; (5) risks related to cost-type contracts; (6) uncertainties concerning contracts that include in-orbit incentive payments; (7) changes in accounting estimates; (8) significant changes in discount rates and actual investment return on pension assets; (9) work stoppages or other labor disruptions; (10) changes in the competitive landscape in the markets in which we operate; (11) risks related to our doing business in other countries, including sales to non-U.S. customers; (12) potential adverse developments in new or pending litigation and/or government investigations; (13) changes in the financial condition or regulatory landscape of the commercial airline industry as they relate to Boeing Capital Corporation; (14) changes in our ability to obtain debt on commercially reasonable terms and at competitive rates in order to fund our operations and contractual commitments; (15) risks related to realizing the anticipated benefits of merger, acquisitions, joint ventures/strategic alliance or divestitures; (16) adequacy of our insurance coverage to cover significant risk exposures; and (17) potential business disruptions related to physical security threats, IT attacks or natural disasters.
Additional information concerning these and other factors can be found in our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including our most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q and Current Reports on Form 8-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which it is made, and we assume no obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statement, except as required by law.
Contact:
Investor Relations: Scott Fitterer (312) 544-2140
Communications:   John Dern (312) 544-2002


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20100421084734.txt.gz
TIME:20100421084734
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
(a) On April 21, 2010, The Boeing Company issued a press release reporting its financial results for the first quarter of 2010. A copy of the Company's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
(a) Not applicable
(b) Not applicable
(c) Not applicable
(d) Exhibits
99.1    Press Release issued by The Boeing Company dated April 21, 2010, reporting Boeing's financial results for the first quarter of 2010, furnished herewith.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
Boeing Reports First-Quarter Results
 
 
 
 
 
Table 1. Summary Financial Results
 
 The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] reported first-quarter net income of $0.5 billion, or $0.70 per share, and revenue of $15.2 billion. Current period results reflect solid performance across core businesses and a previously disclosed $0.20 charge on health care legislation, while the year-ago quarter was reduced by $0.31 per share on a charge due to poor market conditions in commercial airplanes (Table 1).
CHICAGO, April 21, 2010
"With clear progress on the 787 and 747-8, solid financial performance and marked improvement in our customer outlook, we continue to draw on the positive momentum we saw at the end of 2009," said Jim McNerney, Boeing chairman, president and chief executive officer. "Our outlook remains attractive, and we are focused on executing well and delivering on our commitments to customers."
 
Earnings guidance for 2010 has been revised to $3.50 to $3.80 per share, incorporating the previously announced charge of $0.20 per share.
Boeing's quarterly operating cash flow was ($0.3) billion, which reflects continued investment in development programs. Free cash flow* was ($0.5) billion in the quarter. (Table 2)
Table 2. Cash Flow
 
 
Cash and investments in marketable securities totaled $10.4 billion at quarter-end (Table 3), down $0.8 billion on investments in development programs.
Table 3. Cash, Marketable Securities and Debt Balances
 
 
Total company backlog at quarter-end was $315 billion, with backlogs at Commercial Airplanes and Defense, Space & Security largely unchanged.
 
Segment Results
Commercial Airplanes
Boeing Commercial Airplane's first-quarter revenue was $7.5 billion, as fewer planned 747 deliveries and seat supplier challenges resulted in 11 percent fewer airplane deliveries. Operating margin expanded to 9.1 percent on strong operating performance partially offsetting the impact of lower new airplane deliveries. Operating margins for the year-ago quarter were reduced by 4.0 points primarily due to the charge on the 747 program related to a reduction in twin-aisle production rates and unfavorable delivery price escalation forecasts (Table 4).
Commercial Airplanes booked 100 gross orders during the quarter while 17 others were removed from its order book. This contrasts with the year-ago period when cancellations exceeded the 28 gross orders. Contractual backlog remains strong with 3,350 airplanes valued at $250 billion, over seven times the unit's projected 2010 revenue.
Table 4. Commercial Airplanes Operating Results
 
The 787 program continued flight testing during the quarter, as an additional two airplanes joined the two airplanes already in the flight test program. The Dreamliner completed key flight test milestones such as flutter, stall and ground-effect tests. On March 28, the static test unit successfully completed the ultimate load test with a fully pressurized cabin. First delivery is expected in the fourth quarter of 2010. Total firm orders for the 787 at quarter-end were 866 airplanes from 57 customers.
The 747-8 program began its flight test program during the quarter, completed initial airworthiness testing, and ended the quarter with three airplanes in the flight test program. Initial delivery is expected in the fourth quarter of 2010.
 
Boeing Defense, Space & Security
Boeing Defense, Space & Security's first-quarter revenue was $7.6 billion on lower volume in Network & Space Systems, partially offset by favorable aircraft delivery mix and higher volume in services. Operating margins were 8.7 percent on lower margins in military aircraft (Table 5).
Table 5. Defense, Space & Security Operating Results
 
Boeing Military Aircraft (BMA) first-quarter revenue rose 6 percent to $3.2 billion on improved delivery mix and volume on F-18 programs. Operating margin was 8.2 percent, as strong execution across its programs was offset by lower earnings on C-17 and higher R&D. During the quarter, BMA delivered 25 aircraft, P-8A successfully completed ground vibration testing, and the F/A-18 completed India field trials.
Network & Space Systems first-quarter revenue was $2.3 billion, reduced by expected lower volume in Networked & Tactical Systems and Strategic Missile & Defense Systems. Operating margin was 7.5 percent reflecting solid performance across the segment's array of programs. A less favorable contract mix was partially offset by higher earnings from United Launch Alliance. During the quarter, the Airborne Laser successfully shot down a representative missile target, the Tracking and Data Relay Satellite (TDRS) K-L program successfully completed key reviews, and the company was awarded the core completion contract for Ground-based Midcourse Defense.
Global Services & Support (GS&S) revenue increased slightly to $2.0 billion on higher volume across its broad portfolio of services and logistics products. During the quarter, GS&S operating margin was 10.9 percent driven by strong operating performance. In this segment, the company was awarded contracts for the AEW&C Australia support contract, and Phase 1 of the US Air Force QF-16 drone contract.
 
Backlog at Defense, Space & Security is $64.2 billion, approximately two times expected 2010 revenue. The backlog declined by $0.6 billion as run-off of multi-year contracts slightly exceeded additions to backlog in the quarter.
Boeing Capital Corporation
Boeing Capital Corporation (BCC) reported first-quarter pre-tax earnings of $46 million compared to $37 million in the same period last year (Table 6). Earnings improvement was primarily driven by gains on sale of portfolio assets. During the quarter, BCC's portfolio balance declined to $5.4 billion, down from $5.7 billion at year end, on normal run-off, asset pre-payments and depreciation. BCC's debt-to-equity ratio decreased to 5.6-to-1.
Table 6. Boeing Capital Corporation Operating Results
 
Additional Information
The "Other" segment consists primarily of Boeing Engineering, Operations and Technology, as well as certain results related to the financial consolidation of all business units. Other segment expense was $50 million in the first quarter, up from $23 million in the same period last year due to environmental expense.
Total pension expense for the first quarter was $284 million, as compared to $219 million in the same period last year. A total of $305 million was recognized in the operating segments in the quarter (up from $242 million in the same period last year), partially offset by a $21 million contribution to earnings in unallocated items.
Unallocated expense was $165 million, up from $115 million in the same quarter last year, driven by higher deferred compensation expense.
Interest expense for the quarter was $122 million, up from $57 million in the same period last year due to debt issued in 2009.
 
Income tax expense was $531 million in the quarter, up from $317 million last year, driven by the charge announced on March 31 associated with the new health care law that reduced earnings by $0.20 per share.
Outlook
The company's 2010 financial guidance reflects solid operating performance amid lower volumes, higher pension expense and continued investment in development programs (Table 7). Guidance is unchanged other than adjusting for the $0.20 charge on health care legislation.
Boeing's 2010 revenue guidance is $64 billion to $66 billion and reflects previously announced production rate reduction on 777 beginning in mid-2010 and reduced scope on Army modernization and missile defense. Earnings guidance for 2010 of $3.50 to $3.80 per share, reduced from $3.70 to $4.00 per share due to the charge on health care legislation, reflects the lower revenue and includes some consideration for development program and market risks. Operating cash flow is expected to be approximately zero in 2010, including less than $100 million of pension contributions, as the company continues to build inventory on key development programs.
The company continues to expect that 2011 revenue will be higher than 2010, primarily driven by projected 787 and 747-8 deliveries. Combining higher projected deliveries with spending plans for R&D investments and other factors, operating cash flow in 2011 is expected to be greater than $5 billion.
Commercial Airplanes' 2010 delivery guidance is unchanged at between 460 and 465 airplanes and is sold out. It includes the first few 787 and 747-8 deliveries, which are expected to begin in the fourth quarter. The unit's 2010 revenue is expected to be $31 billion to $32 billion with operating margins between 6.5 percent and 7.5 percent.
Defense, Space & Security's revenue for 2010 is expected to be $32 billion to $33 billion with operating margins of approximately 10 percent.
Boeing Capital Corporation expects that its aircraft finance portfolio will continue to reduce as its expected new aircraft financing for 2010 is less than $0.5 billion, below normal portfolio runoff through customer payments and depreciation. BCC's debt-to-equity ratio is expected to return to the 5.0-to-1 level in the second half of 2010.
 
Boeing's 2010 R&D forecast is $3.9 billion to $4.1 billion on continued investment in development programs. R&D is expected to decrease significantly in 2011. Capital expenditures for 2010 are expected to be approximately $1.9 billion reflecting the bulk of capital investments required for the second 787 assembly line in South Carolina. Capital expenditures in 2011 are expected to be lower than in 2010.
The company's non-cash pension expense is expected to be approximately $1.2 billion in 2010.
Table 7. Financial Outlook
 
 
 
Non-GAAP Measure Disclosure
Management believes that the non-GAAP (Generally Accepted Accounting Principles) measures (indicated by an asterisk *) used in this report provide investors with important perspectives into the company's ongoing business performance. The company does not intend for the information to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the related GAAP measures. Other companies may define the measures differently. The following definitions are provided:
Free Cash Flow
Free cash flow is defined as GAAP less capital expenditures for . Management believes free cash flow provides investors with an important perspective on the cash available for shareholders, debt repayment, and acquisitions after making the capital investments required to support ongoing business operations and long term value creation. Free cash flow does not represent the residual cash flow available for discretionary expenditures as it excludes certain mandatory expenditures such as repayment of maturing debt. Management uses free cash flow internally to assess both business performance and overall liquidity. Table 2 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and free cash flow.
operating cash flow
property, plant and equipment additions
 
 
Contact:
Investor Relations:     Scott Fitterer or Rob Young (312) 544-2140
Communications:        Chaz Bickers (312) 544-2002
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20100428162035.txt.gz
TIME:20100428162035
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The Boeing Company (the "Company") held its Annual Meeting of Shareholders on April 26, 2010. Set forth below are the final voting results for each of the proposals submitted to a vote of the shareholders.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20100610123647.txt.gz
TIME:20100610123647
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On June 7, 2010, the Board of Directors of The Boeing Company (the "") elected Edward M. Liddy, a partner in the private equity investment firm of Clayton, Dubilier & Rice, LLC since January 2010, as a new director. At the request of the Secretary of the U.S. Department of the Treasury, Mr. Liddy served as interim Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of American International Group, Inc. () from September 2008 until August 2009. Mr. Liddy served as Chairman of The Allstate Corporation from 1999 until his retirement in 2008, Chief Executive Officer from 1999 until 2006 and President and Chief Operating Officer from 1994 until 1998. Mr. Liddy also serves on the board of directors of 3M Company and served on the Board of Directors of the Company from 2007 until 2008.
Company
"
AIG
"
The Board of Directors of the Company has appointed Mr. Liddy to the Audit Committee and the Finance Committee.
Mr. Liddy will participate in the Company's nonemployee director compensation program, which is described on pages 14 to 16 of the Company's proxy statement for its 2010 Annual Meeting of Shareholders filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 15, 2010, and which includes an annual cash retainer fee of $100,000 and an annual grant of retainer stock units valued at $130,000.
A copy of the Company's press release announcing the election of Mr. Liddy is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
On June 7, 2010, the Board of Directors approved and adopted an amendment to Article II, Section 1 of the By-Laws of The Boeing Company to increase the number of directors from twelve to thirteen. A copy of the amended and restated By-Laws is attached hereto as Exhibit 3.2 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: June 10, 2010
 

Exhibit 3.2
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
SECTION 1. 
.
Annual Meetings
The Annual Meeting of the stockholders shall be held on such date and at such time as the Board of Directors shall determine, for the election of directors and the transaction of such other business as may come before the meeting.
SECTION 2.
Special Meetings.
A special meeting of stockholders may be called at any time by the Board of Directors, or by stockholders holding together at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, except as otherwise provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto.
SECTION 3.
Place of Meeting.
All meetings of the stockholders of the Corporation shall be held at such place or places, if any, within or without the State of Delaware as may from time to time be fixed by the Board of Directors or as shall be specified or fixed in the respective notices or waivers of notice thereof.
SECTION 4.
Notice of Meetings.
Except as otherwise required by statute and as set forth below, notice of each annual or special meeting of stockholders shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date. If the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, notice of each special meeting of stockholders shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than fifty-five (55) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date, unless the calling of such meeting is ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, in which case notice of such special meeting shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date. Such notice shall be given by delivering to each stockholder a written or printed notice thereof either personally or by mailing such notice in a postage-prepaid envelope addressed to the stockholder's address as it appears on the stock books of the Corporation or by transmitting the notice to the stockholder in any other manner permitted by Delaware law. Except as otherwise required by statute, no publication of any notice of a meeting of stockholders shall be required. Every notice of a meeting of stockholders shall state the place, if any (or the means of remote communication, if any, by which stockholders and proxy holders may be deemed to be present in person), date, and hour of the meeting and, in the case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called. Notices are deemed given (i) if by mail, when deposited in the United States mail, postage prepaid, directed to the stockholder at such stockholder's address as it appears on the records of the Corporation, or, if a stockholder shall have filed with the Secretary a written request that notices to such stockholder be mailed to some other address, then directed to such stockholder at such other address; (ii) if by facsimile, when directed to a number at which the stockholder has consented to receive notice; (iii) if by electronic mail, when directed to an electronic mail address at which the stockholder has consented to receive such notice; (iv) if by posting on an electronic network together with a separate notice to the stockholder of such specific posting, upon the later to occur of (A) such posting and (B) the giving of such separate notice of such posting; and (v) if by any other form of electronic transmission, when directed to the stockholder as required by law and, to the extent required by applicable law, in the manner consented to by the stockholder. An affidavit of the mailing or other means of giving any notice of any stockholders' meeting, executed by the Secretary, Assistant Corporate Secretary or any transfer agent of the Corporation giving the notice, shall be prima facie evidence of the giving of such notice. Notice shall be deemed to have been given to all stockholders of record who share an address if notice is given in accordance with the "householding" rules set forth in Rule 14a-3(e) under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") and Section 233 of the Delaware General Corporation Law.
 
SECTION 5.
Waivers of Notice.
Whenever any notice is required to be given to any stockholder under the provisions of these By-Laws, the Certificate of Incorporation, or the Delaware General Corporation Law, a waiver thereof in writing, signed by the person or persons entitled to such notice, whether before or after the time stated therein, shall be deemed equivalent to the giving of such notice. The attendance of a stockholder at a meeting, in person or by proxy, or waiver by electronic transmission, shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when a stockholder attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened.
SECTION 6.
Quorum.
At all meetings of stockholders, except when otherwise provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by these By-Laws, the presence, in person or by proxy duly authorized, of the holders of one-third of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and except as otherwise provided by statute or rule of law, or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by these By-Laws, the vote, in person or by proxy, of the holders of a majority of the shares constituting such quorum shall be binding upon all stockholders of the Corporation. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote may adjourn any meeting, from time to time but not for a period of more than thirty (30) days at any one time, until a quorum shall attend. At any such adjourned meeting at which a quorum shall be present, any business may be transacted which might have been transacted at the meeting as originally called. Unless otherwise provided by statute, no notice of an adjourned meeting need be given.
SECTION 7.
Proxies.
7.1
Appointment.
Each stockholder entitled to vote at a meeting of stockholders or to express consent or dissent to corporate action in writing without a meeting may authorize another person or persons to act for such stockholder by proxy. Such authorization may be accomplished (a) by the stockholder or such stockholder's authorized officer, director, employee, or agent executing a writing or causing his or her signature to be affixed to such writing by any reasonable means, including facsimile signature, or (b) by transmitting or authorizing the transmission of a telegram, cablegram, or other means of electronic transmission to the intended holder of the proxy or to a proxy solicitation firm, proxy support service, or similar agent duly authorized by the intended proxy holder to receive such transmission; provided, that any such telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission must either set forth or be accompanied by information from which it can be determined that the telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission was authorized by the stockholder. Any copy, facsimile telecommunication, or other reliable reproduction of the writing or transmission by which a stockholder has authorized another person to act as proxy for such stockholder may be substituted or used in lieu of the original writing or transmission for any and all purposes for which the original writing or transmission could be used, provided that such copy, facsimile telecommunication, or other reproduction shall be a complete reproduction of the entire original writing or transmission.
7.2
Delivery to Corporation; Duration.
A proxy shall be filed with the Secretary of the Corporation before or at the time of the meeting or the delivery to the Corporation of the consent to corporate action in writing. A proxy shall become invalid three (3) years after the date of its execution, unless otherwise provided in the proxy. A proxy with respect to a specified meeting shall entitle the holder thereof to vote at any reconvened meeting following adjournment of such meeting but shall not be valid after the final adjournment thereof.
 
SECTION 8.
Inspectors of Election.
8.1
Appointment.
In advance of any meeting of stockholders, the Board of Directors of the Corporation shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspectors of election at such meeting and to make a written report thereof. The Board of Directors may designate one or more persons to serve as alternate inspectors to serve in place of any inspector who is unable or fails to act. If no inspector or alternate is able to act at a meeting of stockholders, the chairman of such meeting shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspector at such meeting.
8.2
Duties.
The inspectors of election shall (a) ascertain the number of shares of the Corporation outstanding and the voting power of each such share; (b) determine the shares represented at the meeting and the validity of proxies and ballots; (c) count all votes and ballots; (d) determine and retain for a reasonable period of time a record of the disposition of any challenges made to any determination by them; and (e) certify their determination of the number of shares represented at the meeting and their count of the votes and ballots. Each inspector shall, before entering upon the discharge of his or her duties, take and sign an oath to faithfully execute the duties of inspector with strict impartiality and according to the best of his or her ability. The inspectors may appoint or retain other persons or entities to assist them in the performance of their duties.
8.3
Determination of Proxy Validity.
The validity of any proxy or ballot executed for a meeting of stockholders shall be determined by the inspectors of election in accordance with the applicable provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law as then in effect. In determining the validity of any proxy transmitted by telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission, the inspectors shall record in writing the information upon which they relied in making such determination.
SECTION 9.
Fixing the Record Date.
9.1
Meetings.
For the purpose of determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at any meeting of stockholders or any adjournment thereof, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which record date shall be not fewer than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the date of such meeting. If the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, the record date for each special meeting of stockholders shall be not fewer than fifty-five (55) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date, unless the calling of such meeting is ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation. If no record date is fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall be at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which notice is given, or, if notice is waived, at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which the meeting is held. A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting; provided, however, that the Board of Directors may fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
9.2
Consent to Corporate Action Without a Meeting.
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which date shall not be more than ten (10) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days after the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, when no prior action by the Board of Directors is required by Chapter 1 of the Delaware General Corporation Law as now or hereafter amended, shall be the first date on which a signed written consent setting forth the action taken or proposed to be taken is delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the records of proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Delivery made to the Corporation's registered office shall be by hand or by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors and prior action by the Board of Directors is required by Chapter 1 of the Delaware General Corporation Law as now or hereafter amended, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution taking such prior action.
 
9.3
Dividends, Distributions, and Other Rights.
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to receive payment of any dividend or other distribution or allotment of any rights or the stockholders entitled to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion, or exchange of stock, or for the purpose of any other lawful action, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted, and which record date shall be not more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days prior to such action. If no record date is fixed, the record date for determining stockholders for any such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution relating thereto.
9.4
Voting List.
At least ten (10) days before each meeting of stockholders, a complete list of the stockholders entitled to vote at such meeting shall be made, arranged in alphabetical order, and showing the address of each stockholder and the number of shares registered in the name of each stockholder. This list shall be open to examination by any stockholder, for any purpose germane to the meeting, for a period of ten (10) days prior to the meeting, either (i) on a reasonably accessible electronic network, provided that the information required to gain access to such list is provided with the notice of meeting, or (ii) during ordinary business hours at the principal place of business of the Corporation. The list shall also be produced and kept at such meeting for inspection by any stockholder who is present.
SECTION 10.
Action by Stockholders Without a Meeting.
Subject to the provisions of Article NINTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, any action which could be taken at any annual or special meeting of stockholders may be taken without a meeting, without prior notice, and without a vote, if a consent or consents in writing, setting forth the action so taken, are (a) signed by the holders of outstanding stock having not fewer than the minimum number of votes that would be necessary to authorize or take such action at a meeting at which all shares entitled to vote thereon were present and voted and (b) delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the records of proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Delivery made to the Corporation's registered office shall be by hand or by certified mail or registered mail, return receipt requested. Every written consent shall bear the date of signature of each stockholder who signs the consent, and no written consent shall be effective to take the corporate action referred to therein unless written consents signed by a sufficient number of stockholders to take such action are delivered to the Corporation, in the manner required by this Section, within sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days of the date of the earliest dated consent delivered to the Corporation in the manner required by this Section 10. The validity of any consent executed by a proxy for a stockholder pursuant to a telegram, cablegram, or other means of electronic transmission transmitted to such proxy holder by or upon the authorization of the stockholder shall be determined by or at the direction of the Secretary of the Corporation. A written record of the information upon which the person making such determination relied shall be made and kept in the records of the proceedings of the stockholders. Any such consent shall be inserted in the minute book as if it were the minutes of a meeting of stockholders. Prompt notice of the taking of the corporate action without a meeting by less than unanimous written consent shall be given to those stockholders who have not consented in writing.
SECTION 11. Notice of Nominations and Other Stockholder Business; Required Vote for Directors; Director Qualification.
11.1
Notice of Nominations and Other Stockholder Business.
A.
Annual Meetings of Stockholders.
1. Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors and the proposal of other business to be considered by the stockholders may be made at an annual meeting of stockholders (a) as specified in the Corporation's notice of meeting (or any supplement thereto); (b) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof; or (c) by any stockholder of the Corporation who (i) was a stockholder of record at the time the notice provided for in this By-Law is delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation, (ii) is entitled to vote at the meeting, and (iii) complies with the notice procedures set forth in this By-Law as to such nomination or other business; clause (c) shall be the exclusive means for a stockholder to make nominations or submit proposals for other business (other than matters properly brought under Rule 14a-8 under the Exchange Act and included in the Corporation's notice of meeting) before an annual meeting of stockholders.
 
2. Without qualification, for any nominations or any other business to be properly brought before an annual meeting by a stockholder pursuant to Section 11.1.A(1)(c), the stockholder must have given timely notice thereof in writing to the Secretary of the Corporation and any such proposed business (other than the nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors) must constitute a proper matter for stockholder action. To be timely, a stockholder's notice shall be delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not earlier than the close of business on the one hundred and twentieth (120th) day and not later than the close of business on the ninetieth (90th) day prior to the first anniversary of the preceding year's annual meeting; provided, however, that in the event that the date of the annual meeting is more than thirty (30) days before or more than seventy (70) days after such anniversary date, notice by the stockholder to be timely must be so delivered not later than the close of business on the later of the ninetieth (90th) day prior to such annual meeting and the tenth (10th) day following the day on which public announcement of the date of such annual meeting is first made by the Corporation. In no event shall the postponement of a meeting as to which notice has been sent to stockholders commence a new time period (or extend any time period) for the giving of a stockholder's notice as described above. To be in proper form, such stockholder's notice (whether given pursuant to this Section 11.1.A(2) or Section 11.1.B) to the Secretary of the Corporation must: (a) set forth, as to the stockholder giving the notice and the beneficial owner, if any, on whose behalf the nomination or proposal for other business is made (i) the name and address of such stockholder, as they appear on the Corporation's books, and of such beneficial owner, if any, (ii) (A) the class or series and number of shares of the Corporation which are, directly or indirectly, owned beneficially and of record by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, (B) any option, warrant, convertible security, stock appreciation right, or similar right with an exercise or conversion privilege or a settlement payment or mechanism at a price related to any class or series of shares of the Corporation or with a value derived in whole or in part from the value of any class or series of shares of the Corporation, whether or not such instrument or right shall be subject to settlement in the underlying class or series of shares of the Corporation or otherwise (a "Derivative Instrument") directly or indirectly owned beneficially by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, and any other direct or indirect opportunity to profit or share in any profit derived from any increase or decrease in the value of shares of the Corporation, (C) any proxy, contract, arrangement, understanding, or relationship pursuant to which such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, has a right to vote any shares of any security of the Corporation, (D) any short interest in any security of the Corporation (for purposes of this By-Law a person shall be deemed to have a short interest in a security if such person directly or indirectly, through any contract, arrangement, understanding, relationship or otherwise, has the opportunity to profit or share in any profit derived from any decrease in the value of the subject security), (E) any rights to dividends on the shares of the Corporation owned beneficially by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, that are separated or separable from the underlying shares of the Corporation, (F) any proportionate interest in shares of the Corporation or Derivative Instruments held, directly or indirectly, by a general or limited partnership in which such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, is a general partner or, directly or indirectly, beneficially owns an interest in a general partner, and (G) any performance-related fees (other than an asset-based fee) that such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, is entitled to based on any increase or decrease in the value of shares of the Corporation or Derivative Instruments, if any, all such information to be provided as of the date of such notice, including, without limitation, any such interests held by members of such stockholder's and such beneficial owner's, if any, immediate family sharing the same household (which information shall be supplemented by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, not later than ten (10) days after the record date for the annual meeting to disclose such ownership as of the record date), (iii) any other information relating to such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, that would be required to be disclosed in a proxy statement or other filings required to be made in connection with solicitations of proxies for, as applicable, the proposal of other business and/or for the election of directors in a contested election pursuant to Section 14 of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, and (iv) a representation (A) that the stockholder is a holder of record of stock of the Corporation entitled to vote at such annual meeting and intends to appear in person or by proxy at the annual meeting to propose such business or nomination and (B) whether the stockholder or the beneficial owner, if any, intends or is part of a group which intends (x) to deliver a proxy statement and/or form of proxy to holders of at least the percentage of the Corporation's outstanding capital stock required to approve or adopt the proposal or elect the nominee and/or (y) otherwise to solicit proxies from stockholders in support of such proposal or nomination; (b) if the notice relates to any business other than the nomination of a director or directors that the stockholder proposes to bring before the annual meeting, set forth (i) a brief description of the business desired to be brought before the annual meeting, the text of the proposal or business (including the text of any resolutions proposed for consideration and in the event that such business includes a proposal to amend these By-Laws, the language of the proposed amendment), the reasons for conducting such business at the annual meeting and any material interest of such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, in such business and (ii) a description of all agreements, arrangements, and understandings between such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, and their respective affiliates and associates, and any other person or persons (including their names) acting in concert therewith in connection with the proposal of such business by such stockholder; (c) set forth, as to each person, if any, whom the stockholder proposes to nominate for election or reelection to the Board of Directors (i) all information relating to such person that would be required to be disclosed in a proxy statement or other filings required to be made in connection with solicitations of proxies for election of directors in a contested election pursuant to Section 14 of the Exchange Act, (ii) such person's written consent to being named in the proxy statement as a nominee and to serving as a director if elected and a statement whether such person, if elected, intends to tender, promptly following such person's election or reelection, an irrevocable resignation effective upon such person's failure to receive the required vote for reelection at the next meeting at which such person would face reelection and upon acceptance of such resignation by the Board of Directors, and (iii) a description of all direct and indirect compensation and other material monetary agreements, arrangements and understandings during the past three (3) years, and any other material relationships, between or among such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, and their respective affiliates and associates, or any other person or persons (including their names) acting in concert therewith, on the one hand, and each proposed nominee, and his or her respective affiliates and associates, or any other person or persons (including their names) acting in concert therewith, on the other hand, including, without limitation, all information that would be required to be disclosed pursuant to Rule 404 promulgated under Regulation S-K if the stockholder making the nomination and any beneficial owner on whose behalf the nomination is made, if any, or any affiliate or associate thereof or person acting in concert therewith, were the "registrant" for purposes of such rule and the nominee were a director or executive officer of such registrant; and (d) with respect to each nominee for election or reelection to the Board of Directors, include the completed and signed questionnaire, representation and agreement required by Section 11.3. The Corporation may require any proposed nominee to furnish such other information as may reasonably be required by the Corporation to determine the eligibility of such proposed nominee to serve as an independent director of the Corporation or that could be material to a reasonable stockholder's understanding of the independence, or lack thereof, of such nominee.
 
3. Notwithstanding anything in the second sentence of Section 11.1.A(2) to the contrary, in the event that the number of directors to be elected to the Board of Directors of the Corporation is increased effective at the annual meeting and there is no public announcement by the Corporation naming all of the nominees for director or specifying the size of the increased Board of Directors at least one hundred (100) days prior to the first anniversary of the preceding year's annual meeting, a stockholder's notice required by this By-Law shall also be considered timely, but only with respect to nominees for any new positions created by such increase, if it shall be delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not later than the close of business on the tenth (10th) day following the day on which such public announcement is first made by the Corporation.
B.
Special Meetings of Stockholders.
Only such business shall be conducted at a special meeting of stockholders as shall have been brought before the special meeting pursuant to the Corporation's notice of meeting. Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors may be made at a special meeting at which directors are to be elected pursuant to the Corporation's notice of special meeting (a) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof or stockholders pursuant to Article 1, Section 2 hereof, or (b) provided that the Board of Directors or stockholders pursuant to Article 1, Section 2 hereof has determined that directors shall be elected at such special meeting, by any stockholder of the Corporation who (i) is a stockholder of record at the time the notice provided for in this By-Law is delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation and at the time of the special meeting, (ii) is entitled to vote at the special meeting, and (iii) complies with the notice procedures set forth in this By-Law as to such nomination. In the event the Corporation calls a special meeting for the purpose of electing one or more directors to the Board of Directors, any such stockholder may nominate a person or persons (as the case may be) for election to such position(s) as specified in the Corporation's notice of meeting, if the stockholder's notice required by Section 11.1.A(2) (including the completed and signed questionnaire, representation and agreement required by Section 11.3) shall be delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not earlier than the close of business on the one hundred and twentieth (120th) day prior to such special meeting and not later than the close of business on the later of the ninetieth (90th) day prior to such special meeting and the tenth (10th) day following the day on which public announcement is first made of the date of the special meeting and of the nominees proposed by the Board of Directors to be elected at such special meeting. In no event shall the postponement of a special meeting as to which notice has been sent to stockholders commence a new time period (or extend any time period) for the giving of a stockholder's notice as described above.
 
C.
General.
1. Only such persons who are nominated in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law shall be eligible to serve as directors and only such business shall be conducted at a meeting of stockholders as shall have been brought before the meeting in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law. Except as otherwise provided by law, the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, the chairman of the meeting shall have the power and duty (a) to determine whether a nomination or any other business proposed to be brought before the meeting was made or proposed, as the case may be, in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law (including whether the stockholder or beneficial owner, if any, on whose behalf the nomination or proposal is made solicited (or is part of a group which solicited) or did not so solicit, as the case may be, proxies in support of such stockholder's nominee or proposal in compliance with such stockholder's representation as required by Section 11.1.A(2)(a)(iv)) and (b) if any proposed nomination or business was not made or proposed in compliance with this By-Law, to declare that such nomination shall be disregarded or that such proposed business shall not be transacted. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this By-Law, unless otherwise required by law, if the stockholder (or a qualified representative of the stockholder) does not appear at the annual or special meeting of stockholders of the Corporation to present a nomination or proposed business, such nomination shall be disregarded and such proposed business shall not be transacted, notwithstanding that proxies in respect of such vote may have been received by the Corporation. For purposes of this By-Law, to be considered a qualified representative of the stockholder, a person must be a duly authorized officer, manager, or partner of such stockholder or must be authorized by a writing executed by such stockholder or an electronic transmission delivered by such stockholder to act for such stockholder as proxy at the annual or special meeting and such person must produce such writing or electronic transmission, or a reliable reproduction of the writing or electronic transmission, at the annual or special meeting.
1. For purposes of this By-Law, "public announcement" shall mean disclosure in a press release reported by the Dow Jones News Service, Associated Press, or comparable national news service or in a document publicly filed by the Corporation with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to Section 13, 14 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.
2. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this By-Law, a stockholder shall also comply with all applicable requirements of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder with respect to the matters set forth in this By-Law; provided, however, that any references in these By-Laws to the Exchange Act are not intended to and shall not limit the requirements applicable to any nominations or proposals as to any other business to be considered pursuant to this By-Law (including Section 11.1A(1)(c) or Section 11.1B). Nothing in this By-Law shall be deemed to affect any rights (a) of stockholders to request inclusion of proposals in the Corporation's proxy statement pursuant to Rule 14a-8 under the Exchange Act or (b) of the holders of any series of Preferred Stock if and to the extent provided for under law, the Certificate of Incorporation, or these By-Laws.
11.2
Required Vote for Directors.
A nominee for director shall be elected to the Board of Directors if the votes cast for such nominee's election exceed the votes cast against such nominee's election; provided, however, that the directors shall be elected by a plurality of the votes cast at any meeting of stockholders for which (i) the Secretary of the Corporation receives a notice that a stockholder has nominated a person for election to the Board of Directors in compliance with the advance notice requirements for stockholder nominees for director set forth in Section 11.1 of this By-law and (ii) such nomination has not been withdrawn by such stockholder on or prior to the tenth day preceding the date the Corporation first mails its notice of meeting for such meeting to stockholders. If directors are to be elected by a plurality of the votes cast, stockholders shall not be permitted to vote against a nominee. Votes cast shall exclude abstentions with respect to that director's election.
11.3
Director Qualification: Submission of Questionnaire, Representation, and Agreement.
To be eligible to be a nominee for election or reelection as a director of the Corporation, a person must deliver (in accordance with the time periods prescribed for delivery of notice under Section 11.1) to the Secretary of the Corporation at the principal executive offices of the Corporation a written questionnaire with respect to the background and qualification of such person and the background of any other person or entity on whose behalf the nomination is being made (which questionnaire shall be provided by the Secretary upon written request) and a written representation and agreement (in the form provided by the Secretary of the Corporation upon written request), that such person (a) is not and will not become a party to (i) any agreement, arrangement, or understanding with, and has not given any commitment or assurance to, any person or entity as to how such person, if elected as a director of the Corporation, will act or vote on any issue or question (a "Voting Commitment") that has not been disclosed to the Corporation or (ii) any Voting Commitment that could limit or interfere with such person's ability to comply, if elected as a director of the Corporation, with such person's fiduciary duties under applicable law; (b) is not and will not become a party to any agreement, arrangement, or understanding with any person or entity other than the Corporation with respect to any direct or indirect compensation, reimbursement, or indemnification in connection with service or action as a director that has not been disclosed therein; and (c) in such person's individual capacity and on behalf of any person or entity on whose behalf the nomination is being made, would be in compliance, if elected as a director of the Corporation, and will comply with all applicable publicly disclosed corporate governance, conflict of interest, confidentiality and stock ownership and trading policies and guidelines of the Corporation.
 
SECTION 12.
Notice to Corporation.
Any written notice required to be delivered by a stockholder to the Corporation pursuant to Section 11.1 of this Article I or Section 2.1 of Article II of these By-Laws must be given, either by personal delivery or by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, to the Secretary of the Corporation at the Corporation's executive offices in the City of Chicago, State of Illinois.
SECTION 1.
Number and Term of Office.
The number of directors shall be thirteen (13), but the number may be increased, or decreased to not less than three (3), from time to time, either by the directors by adoption of a resolution to such effect or by the stockholders by amendment of these By-Laws in accordance with Article VIII. At each annual meeting of stockholders, each director shall be elected to hold office until the next annual meeting or until his or her successor shall be elected and qualified or until his or her earlier resignation or removal.
SECTION 2.
Nomination and Election.
2.1 Only persons who are nominated in accordance with Article I, Section 11 of these By-Laws shall be eligible for election as directors.
Nomination.
2.2 At each election of directors by stockholders, the persons who are elected in accordance with Article I, Section 11 of these By-Laws shall be the directors.
Election.
SECTION 3.
Place of Meeting.
Meetings of the Board of Directors, or of any committee thereof, may be held either within or without the State of Delaware.
SECTION 4.
Annual Meeting.
Each year the Board of Directors shall meet in connection with the annual meeting of stockholders for the purpose of electing officers and for the transaction of other business. No notice of such annual meeting is required. Such annual meeting may be held at any other time or place which shall be specified in a notice given as hereinafter provided for special meetings of the Board of Directors, or in a consent and waiver of notice thereof, signed by all the directors.
 
SECTION 5.
Stated Meetings.
The Board of Directors may, by resolution adopted by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors, from time to time appoint the time and place for holding stated meetings of the Board of Directors, if by it deemed advisable; and such stated meetings shall thereupon be held at the time and place so appointed, without the giving of any special notice with regard thereto. In case the day appointed for a stated meeting shall fall upon a legal holiday, such meeting shall be held on the next following day, not a legal holiday, at the regularly appointed hour. Except as otherwise provided in these By-Laws, any and all business may be transacted at any stated meeting.
SECTION 6.
Special Meetings.
6.1
Convenors and Notice.
Special meetings of the Board of Directors may be called by or at the request of the Chairman of the Board of Directors or any two (2) directors. Notice of a special meeting of the Board of Directors, stating the place, day, and hour of the meeting, shall be given to each director in writing (by mail, wire, facsimile, or personal delivery) or orally (by telephone or in person).
6.2
Waiver of Notice.
With respect to a special meeting of the Board of Directors, a written waiver, signed by a director, or waiver by electronic transmission, shall be deemed equivalent to notice to that director. A director's attendance at a meeting shall constitute that director's waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the director attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting was not lawfully called or convened. Neither the business to be transacted at, nor the purpose of, any regular or special meeting of the Board of Directors need be specified in the waiver of notice of such meeting.
SECTION 7.
Quorum and Manner of Acting.
Except as herein otherwise provided, forty percent (40%) of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided in these By-Laws at the time of any stated or special meeting of the Board of Directors or, if vacancies exist on the Board of Directors, forty percent (40%) of such number of directors then in office; provided, however, that such number may not be less than one-third of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided in these By-Laws, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and, except as otherwise required by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by these By-Laws, the act of a majority of the directors present at any such meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of the Board of Directors. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the directors present may adjourn any meeting, from time to time, until a quorum is present. No notice of any adjourned meeting need be given.
SECTION 8.
Chairman of the Board.
The Chairman of the Board shall preside, when present, at all meetings of the Board of Directors, except as otherwise provided by law.
SECTION 9.
Resignations.
Any director of the Corporation may resign at any time by giving written notice or notice by electronic transmission thereof to the Secretary of the Corporation. Such resignation shall take effect at the time specified therefor or if the time is not specified, upon delivery thereof; and, unless otherwise specified with respect thereto, the acceptance of such resignation shall not be necessary to make it effective.
SECTION 10.
Removal of Directors.
Any directors may be removed with or without cause by the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, at a meeting of stockholders called for that purpose; and the vacancy on the Board of Directors caused by any such removal may be filled by the stockholders at such meeting or at any subsequent meeting.
 
SECTION 11.
Filling of Vacancies Not Caused by Removal.
In case of any increase in the number of directors, or of any vacancy created by death or resignation, the additional director or directors may be elected or, as the case may be, the vacancy or vacancies may be filled, either (a) by the Board of Directors at any meeting, (i) if the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, or (ii) if the Corporation does not have an Interested Stockholder, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the remaining directors, though less than a quorum or (b) by the stockholders entitled to vote, either at an annual meeting or at a special meeting thereof called for that purpose, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the outstanding shares entitled to vote at such meeting.
SECTION 12.
Directors' Fees.
The Board of Directors shall have authority to determine from time to time the amount of compensation that shall be paid to its members for attendance at meetings of the Board of Directors or of any committee of the Board of Directors.
SECTION 13.
Action Without a Meeting.
Any action required or permitted to be taken at any meeting of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof may be taken without a meeting if all members of the Board of Directors or committee, as the case may be, consent thereto in writing, and the writing or writings are filed with the minutes of proceedings of the Board of Directors or committee.
SECTION 1.
Audit Committee.
In addition to any committees appointed pursuant to Section 2 of this Article, there shall be an Audit Committee, appointed annually by the Board of Directors, consisting of at least three (3) directors who are not members of management. It shall be the responsibility of the Audit Committee to review the scope and results of the annual independent audit of books and records of the Corporation and its subsidiaries and to discharge such other responsibilities as may from time to time be assigned to it by the Board of Directors. The Audit Committee shall meet at such times and places as the members deem advisable, and shall make such recommendations to the Board of Directors as they consider appropriate.
SECTION 2.
Other Committees.
2.1 The Board of Directors may appoint standing or temporary committees and invest such committees with such powers as it may see fit, with power to subdelegate such powers if deemed desirable by the Board of Directors; but no such committee shall have the power or authority of the Board of Directors to adopt, amend, or repeal these By-Laws or approve, adopt, or recommend to the stockholders of the Corporation any action or matter expressly required by the Certificate of Incorporation, these By-Laws or the Delaware General Corporation Law to be submitted to stockholders for approval.
Committee Powers.
2.2 The Board of Directors may designate one or more directors as alternate members of any committee, who may replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of the committee. In the absence or disqualification of a member of a committee, the member or members thereof present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, whether or not such member or members constitute a quorum, may unanimously appoint another member of the Board of Directors to act at the meeting in the place of any such absent or disqualified member.
Committee Members.
 
SECTION 3.
Quorum and Manner of Acting.
A majority of the number of directors composing any committee of the Board of Directors, as established and fixed by resolution of the Board of Directors, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at any meeting of such committee but, if less than a majority are present at a meeting, a majority of such directors present may adjourn the meeting from time to time without further notice. The act of a majority of the members of a committee present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of such committee.
SECTION 1.
Officers.
The elected officers of the Corporation shall be a Chairman of the Board of Directors (who shall be a director) and, at the discretion of the Board of Directors, a President (who shall be a director), and one or more Vice Presidents (each of whom may be assigned by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer an additional title descriptive of the functions assigned to such officer and one or more of whom may be designated Executive or Senior Vice President). The Board of Directors may also elect one or more Vice Chairmen. The Board of Directors shall also designate either the Chairman of the Board of Directors or the President as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation. The Board of Directors shall appoint a Controller, a Secretary, and a Treasurer. Any number of offices, whether elective or appointive, may be held by the same person. The Chief Executive Officer may, by a writing filed with the Secretary, designate titles as officers for employees and agents and appoint Assistant Secretaries and Assistant Treasurers as, from time to time, may appear to be necessary or advisable in the conduct of the affairs of the Corporation and may, in the same manner, terminate or change such titles.
SECTION 2.
Term of Office.
So far as practicable, all elected officers shall be elected at the annual meeting of the Board of Directors in each year, and shall hold office until the annual meeting of the Board of Directors in the next subsequent year and until their respective successors are chosen. The Controller, Secretary, and Treasurer shall hold office at the pleasure of the Board of Directors.
SECTION 3.
Salaries of Elected Officers.
The salaries paid to the elected officers of the Corporation shall be authorized or approved by the Board of Directors.
SECTION 4.
Bonuses.
None of the officers, directors, or employees of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations shall at any time be paid any bonus or share in the earnings or profits of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations except pursuant to a plan approved by affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members of the Board of Directors.
SECTION 5.
Removal of Elected and Appointed Officers.
Any elected or appointed officer may be removed at any time, either for or without cause, by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors, at any meeting called for the purpose.
SECTION 6.
Vacancies.
If any vacancy occurs in any office, the Board of Directors may elect or appoint a successor to fill such vacancy for the remainder of the term.
 
SECTION 1.
Chairman of the Board.
The Chairman of the Board of Directors shall preside, when present, at all meetings of the stockholders (except as otherwise provided by statute) and at all meetings of the Board of Directors. The Chairman shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation; to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the Chairman by the Board of Directors.
SECTION 2.
President.
The President shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation and to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; during the absence or disability of the Chairman of the Board of Directors, to exercise the Chairman's powers and to perform the Chairman's duties; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the President by the Board of Directors; provided, that if the office of President is vacant, the Chairman shall exercise the duties ordinarily exercised by the President until such time as a President is elected or appointed.
SECTION 3.
Chief Executive Officer.
The officer designated by the Board of Directors as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation shall have general and active control of its business and affairs. The Chief Executive Officer shall have general power to appoint or designate all employees and agents of the Corporation whose appointment or designation is not otherwise provided for and to fix the compensation thereof, subject to the provisions of these By-Laws; to remove or suspend any employee or agent who shall not have been elected or appointed by the Board of Directors or other body; to suspend for cause any employee, agent, or officer, other than an elected officer, pending final action by the body which shall have appointed such employee, agent, or officer; and to exercise all the powers usually pertaining to the office held by the Chief Executive Officer of a corporation.
SECTION 4.
Vice Presidents and Controller.
The several Vice Presidents and the Controller shall perform all such duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of them, from time to time, by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer, respectively.
SECTION 5.
Secretary.
The Secretary shall attend to the giving of notice of all meetings of stockholders and of the Board of Directors and shall keep and attest true records of all such proceedings. The Secretary shall have charge of the corporate seal and have authority to attest any and all instruments or writings to which the same may be affixed and shall keep and account for all books, documents, papers, and records of the Corporation relating to its corporate organization. The Secretary shall have authority to sign stock certificates and shall generally perform all the duties usually appertaining to the office of secretary of a corporation. In the absence of the Secretary, an Assistant Secretary or Secretary pro tempore shall perform the duties of the Secretary.
SECTION 6.
Treasurer.
The Treasurer shall have the care and custody of all moneys, funds, and securities of the Corporation, and shall deposit or cause to be deposited all funds of the Corporation in accordance with directions or authorizations of the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer. The Treasurer shall have power to sign stock certificates, to indorse for deposit or collection, or otherwise, all checks, drafts, notes, bills of exchange, or other commercial paper payable to the Corporation, and to give proper receipts or discharges therefor. In the absence of the Treasurer, an Assistant Treasurer shall perform the duties of the Treasurer.
 
SECTION 7.
Additional Powers and Duties.
In addition to the foregoing especially enumerated duties and powers, the several officers of the Corporation shall perform such other duties and exercise such further powers as may be provided in these By-Laws or as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine, or as may be assigned to them by any superior officer.
SECTION 8.
Disaster Emergency Powers of Acting Officers.
If, as a result of a disaster or other state of emergency, the Chief Executive Officer is unable to perform the duties of that office, (a) the powers and duties of the Chief Executive Officer shall be performed by the employee with the highest base salary who shall be available and capable of performing such powers and duties and, if more than one such employee has the same base salary, by the employee whose surname begins with the earliest letter of the alphabet among the group of those employees with the same base salary; (b) the officer performing such duties shall continue to perform such powers and duties until the Chief Executive Officer becomes capable of performing those duties or until the Board of Directors shall have elected a new Chief Executive Officer or designated another individual as Acting Chief Executive Officer; (c) such officer shall have the power in addition to all other powers granted to the Chief Executive Officer by these By-Laws and by the Board of Directors to appoint an acting President, acting Vice PresidentFinance, acting Controller, acting Secretary, and acting Treasurer, if any of the persons duly elected to any such office is not, by reason of such disaster or emergency, able to perform the duties of such office, each of such acting appointees to serve in such capacities until the officer for whom the appointee is acting becomes capable of performing the duties of such office or until the Board of Directors shall have designated another individual to perform such duties or have elected another person to fill such office; (d) any such acting officer so appointed shall be entitled to exercise all powers vested by these By-Laws or the Board of Directors in the duly elected officer for whom the acting officer is acting; and (e) anyone transacting business with the Corporation may rely upon a certification by any two (2) officers of the Corporation that a specified individual has succeeded to the powers of the Chief Executive Officer and that such person has appointed other acting officers as herein provided and any person, firm, corporation, or other entity to which such certification has been delivered by such officers may continue to rely upon it until notified of a change in writing signed by two (2) officers of the Corporation.
SECTION 1.
Stock Certificates.
The shares of the stock of the Corporation shall be represented by certificates, provided that the Board of Directors may provide by resolution or resolutions that some or all of any or all classes or series of stock shall be uncertificated shares. Any such resolution shall not apply to shares represented by certificate until such certificate is surrendered to the Corporation. Every holder of stock of the Corporation represented by a certificate shall be entitled to a certificate, signed by the Chairman of the Board of Directors or the President or a Vice President and the Treasurer or an Assistant Treasurer or the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary, certifying the number of shares owned by the stockholder in the Corporation. Any and all of the signatures on a certificate may be a facsimile. If any officer, transfer agent, or registrar who has signed or whose facsimile signature has been placed upon a certificate shall have ceased to be such officer, transfer agent, or registrar before such certificate is issued, it may be issued by the Corporation with the same effect as if he or she were such officer, transfer agent, or registrar at the date of issue.
SECTION 2.
Transfer Agents and Registrars.
The Board of Directors may, in its discretion, appoint responsible banks or trust companies in the Borough of Manhattan, in the City of New York, State of New York, and in such other city or cities as the Board of Directors may deem advisable, from time to time, to act as transfer agents and registrars of the stock of the Corporation; and, when such appointments shall have been made, no stock certificate shall be valid until countersigned by one of such transfer agents and registered by one of such registrars.
 
SECTION 3.
Transfers of Stock.
Shares of stock may be transferred by delivery of the certificates therefor, accompanied either by an assignment in writing on the back of the certificates or by written power of attorney to sell, assign, and transfer the same, signed by the record holder thereof (or, with respect to uncertificated shares, by delivery of duly executed instructions or in any other manner permitted by law), but no transfer shall affect the right of the Corporation to pay any dividend upon the stock to the holder of record thereof, or to treat the holder of record as the holder in fact thereof for all purposes, and no transfer shall be valid, except between the parties thereto, until such transfer shall have been made upon the books of the Corporation.
SECTION 4.
Lost Certificates.
The Board of Directors may provide for the issuance of new certificates of stock or uncertificated shares to replace certificates of stock lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, or alleged to be lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, upon such terms and in accordance with such procedures as the Board of Directors shall deem proper and prescribe.
SECTION 1.
Fiscal Year.
The fiscal year of the Corporation shall be the calendar year.
SECTION 2. (Repealed in its entirety by vote of the stockholders, May 5, 1975.)
SECTION 3.
Signing of Negotiable Instruments.
All bills, notes, checks, or other instruments for the payment of money shall be signed or countersigned by such officer or officers and in such manner as from time to time may be prescribed by resolution (whether general or special) of the Board of Directors.
SECTION 4.
Indemnification of Directors and Officers.
4.1
Right to Indemnification.
Each person who was or is made a party to or is threatened to be made a party to or is otherwise involved (including, without limitation, as a witness) in any actual or threatened action, suit, or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative, or investigative (hereinafter a "proceeding"), by reason of the fact that he or she is or was a director or officer of the Corporation or that, being or having been such a director or officer or an employee of the Corporation, he or she is or was serving at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation as a director, officer, employee, or agent of another corporation or of a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise, including service with respect to an employee benefit plan (hereinafter an "indemnitee"), whether the basis of such proceeding is alleged action in an official capacity as such a director, officer, employee, or agent or in any other capacity while serving as such a director, officer, employee, or agent, shall be indemnified and held harmless by the Corporation to the full extent permitted by the Delaware General Corporation Law, as the same exists or may hereafter be amended (but, in the case of any such amendment, only to the extent that such amendment permits the Corporation to provide broader indemnification rights than permitted prior thereto), or by other applicable law as then in effect, against all expense, liability, and loss (including attorneys' fees, judgments, fines, ERISA excise taxes or penalties, and amounts paid in settlement) actually and reasonably incurred or suffered by such indemnitee in connection therewith, and such indemnification shall continue as to an indemnitee who has ceased to be a director, officer, employee, or agent and shall inure to the benefit of the indemnitee's heirs, executors, and administrators; provided, however, that except as provided in Section 4.2 with respect to proceedings seeking to enforce rights to indemnification, the Corporation shall indemnify any such indemnitee in connection with a proceeding (or part thereof) initiated by such indemnitee only if such proceeding (or part thereof) was authorized or ratified by the Board of Directors. The right to indemnification conferred in this Section 4.1 shall be a contract right and shall include the right to be paid by the Corporation the expenses incurred in defending any such proceeding in advance of its final disposition (hereinafter an "advancement of expenses"); provided, however, that an advancement of expenses incurred by an indemnitee in his or her capacity as a director or officer or former director or officer (and not in any other capacity in which service was or is rendered by such indemnitee, including, without limitation, service to an employee benefit plan) shall be made only upon delivery to the Corporation of an undertaking (hereinafter an "undertaking"), by or on behalf of such indemnitee, to repay all amounts so advanced if it shall ultimately be determined by final judicial decision from which there is no further right to appeal that such indemnitee is not entitled to be indemnified for such expenses under this Section 4.1 or otherwise; and provided, further, that an advancement of expenses shall not be made if the Board of Directors makes a good faith determination that such payment would violate law or public policy.
 
4.2
Right of Indemnitee to Bring Suit.
If a claim under Section 4.1 is not paid in full by the Corporation within sixty (60) days after a written claim has been received by the Corporation, except in the case of a claim for an advancement of expenses, in which case the applicable period shall be twenty (20) days, the indemnitee may at any time thereafter bring suit against the Corporation to recover the unpaid amount of the claim. If successful in whole or in part in any such suit, or in a suit brought by the Corporation to recover an advancement of expenses pursuant to the terms of an undertaking, the indemnitee shall also be entitled to be paid the expenses of prosecuting or defending such suit. The indemnitee shall be presumed to be entitled to indemnification under this Section 4 upon submission of a written claim (and, in an action brought to enforce a claim for an advancement of expenses, where the required undertaking has been tendered to the Corporation), and thereafter the Corporation shall have the burden of proof to overcome the presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled. Neither the failure of the Corporation (including the Board of Directors, independent legal counsel, or the stockholders) to have made a determination prior to the commencement of such suit that indemnification of the indemnitee is proper in the circumstances, nor an actual determination by the Corporation (including the Board of Directors, independent legal counsel, or the stockholders) that the indemnitee is not entitled to indemnification shall be a defense to the suit or create a presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled.
4.3
Nonexclusivity of Rights.
The rights to indemnification and to the advancement of expenses conferred in this Section 4 shall not be exclusive of any other right that any person may have or hereafter acquire under any statute, provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation, these By-Laws, any agreement, vote of stockholders or disinterested directors, or otherwise. Neither any amendment to or repeal of this Section 4 or of any of the procedures established by the Board of Directors pursuant to Section 4.7, nor the adoption of any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, nor, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any modification of law, shall eliminate or reduce the effect of the right or protection of any indemnitee to indemnification and to the advancement of expenses in accordance with the provisions hereof and thereof with respect to any proceeding (regardless of when such proceeding is first threatened, commenced or completed) arising out of, or related to, any acts or omissions of such indemnitee occurring prior to such amendment or repeal.
4.4
Insurance, Contracts, and Funding.
The Corporation may maintain insurance, at its expense, to protect itself and any director, officer, employee, or agent of the Corporation or another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise against any expense, liability, or loss, whether or not the Corporation would have the power to indemnify such person against such expense, liability, or loss under the Delaware General Corporation Law. The Corporation may, without further stockholder approval, enter into contracts with any indemnitee in furtherance of the provisions of this Section 4 and may create a trust fund, grant a security interest, or use other means (including, without limitation, a letter of credit) to ensure the payment of such amounts as may be necessary to effect indemnification as provided in this Section 4.
4.5
Persons Serving Other Entities.
Any person who is or was a director, officer, or employee of the Corporation who is or was serving (i) as a director or officer of another corporation of which a majority of the shares entitled to vote in the election of its directors is held by the Corporation or (ii) in an executive or management capacity in a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise of which the Corporation or a wholly owned subsidiary of the Corporation is a general partner or has a majority ownership shall be deemed to be so serving at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation and entitled to indemnification and advancement of expenses under Section 4.1.
 
4.6
Indemnification of Employees and Agents of the Corporation.
The Corporation may, by action of the Board of Directors, authorize one or more executive officers to grant rights to advancement of expenses to employees or agents of the Corporation on such terms and conditions as such officer or officers deem appropriate under the circumstances. The Corporation may, by action of the Board of Directors, grant rights to indemnification and advancement of expenses to employees or agents or groups of employees or agents of the Corporation with the same scope and effect as the provisions of this Section 4 with respect to the indemnification and advancement of expenses of directors and officers of the Corporation; provided, however, that an undertaking shall be made by an employee or agent only if required by the Board of Directors.
4.7
Procedures for the Submission of Claims.
The Board of Directors may establish reasonable procedures for the submission of claims for indemnification pursuant to this Section 4, determination of the entitlement of any person thereto, and review of any such determination. Such procedures shall be set forth in an appendix to these By-Laws and shall be deemed for all purposes to be a part hereof.
SECTION 1.
Amendment of the By-Laws: General.
Except as herein otherwise expressly provided, the By-Laws of the Corporation may be altered or repealed in any particular and new By-Laws, not inconsistent with any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or any provision of law, may be adopted, either by
A. the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority in number of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote at an annual meeting of stockholders or at a special meeting thereof, the notice of which special meeting shall include the form of the proposed alteration or repeal or of the proposed new By-Laws, or a summary thereof; or
B. either by
i. the affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors at any meeting thereof, or
ii. the affirmative vote of all the directors present at any meeting at which a quorum, less than a majority, is present;
provided, in either of the latter cases, that the notice of such meeting shall include the form of the proposed alteration or repeal or of the proposed new By-Laws, or a summary thereof; and provided, further, that Article I, Section 11.2 of these By-Laws may be amended only as set forth in Section 1.A of this By-Law, except that any amendment required by law or necessary or desirable to cure an administrative or technical deficiency may be made as provided in Section 1.B of this By-Law.
SECTION 2.
Amendments as to Compensation and Removal of Officers.
Notwithstanding anything contained in these By-Laws to the contrary, the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the Voting Stock, as defined in Article FOURTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, at a meeting of stockholders called for the purpose, shall be required to alter, amend, repeal, or adopt any provision inconsistent with Sections 3, 4 and 5 of Article IV of these By-Laws, notice of which meeting shall include the form of the proposed amendment, or a summary thereof.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Boeing Announces Election of Liddy to Rejoin Board of Directors
CHICAGO, June 10, 2010  Edward M. Liddy has been elected to the Boeing board of directors, effective immediately.
Liddy, 64, former chairman and CEO of The Allstate Corporation, rejoins the Boeing board where he served from August 2007 to October 2008. He left the board when the secretary of the U.S. Department of the Treasury asked him to serve as interim chairman and CEO of American International Group in conjunction with the U.S. government's actions to provide stability to the firm.
Liddy completed his term with AIG in August 2009 and rejoined private-equity investment firm Clayton, Dubillier & Rice in January 2010.
"Ed served the board and our company with tremendous distinction, and we're excited to regain his experience and leadership," said Boeing Chairman, President and CEO Jim McNerney.
Liddy will serve on the board's finance and audit committees.
Contact:        Communications, John Dern 312-544-2002


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20100728074649.txt.gz
TIME:20100728074649
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
(a) On July 28, 2010, The Boeing Company issued a press release reporting its financial results for the second quarter of 2010. A copy of the Company's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
(a) Not applicable
(b) Not applicable
(c) Not applicable
(d) Exhibits
99.1    Press Release issued by The Boeing Company dated July 28, 2010, reporting Boeing's financial results for the second quarter of 2010, furnished herewith.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

 
 
 
Boeing Reports Second-Quarter Results
 
 
 
 
 
Table 1. Summary Financial Results
 
 The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] reported second-quarter net income of $0.8 billion, or $1.06 per share, on revenue of $15.6 billion. The results reflect solid performance across the company's core businesses on lower volumes (Table 1). The company also reaffirmed its 2010 revenue, earnings per share and operating cash flow outlook.
CHICAGO, July 28, 2010
"Continued strong results from our major businesses drove another solid quarter of operational performance for the company," said Jim McNerney, Boeing chairman, president and chief executive officer. "We are making progress on key commercial and military development programs, our production programs and services businesses are running well, and our enterprise focus on productivity improvement is funding investment in growth while maintaining our financial strength."
 
"With our commercial markets recovering, and the priorities of our government customers gaining clarity, we remain well positioned for growth in 2011 and beyond."
Boeing's quarterly operating cash flow was $0.3 billion, reflecting continued investment in development programs. For the first half of 2010, operating cash flow was ($19) million. Free cash flow* was $9 million in the quarter and ($0.5) billion in the first half (Table 2).
Table 2. Cash Flow
 
 
Cash and investments in marketable securities totaled $10.0 billion at quarter-end (Table 3), down $0.4 billion on planned investments in development programs. Debt was unchanged in the quarter, and the company did not acquire any of its shares.
Table 3. Cash, Marketable Securities and Debt Balances
 
 
Total company backlog at quarter-end was $312 billion, down 1 percent in the quarter, as backlog for Defense, Space & Security declined during the period and was somewhat offset by an increase in Commercial Airplanes backlog.
 
Segment Results
Commercial Airplanes
Boeing Commercial Airplanes second-quarter revenue was $7.4 billion, on 9 percent fewer airplane deliveries driven by anticipated seat supplier challenges and lower planned wide-body deliveries. Operating margin was 9.2 percent as strong performance partially offset the impact of lower deliveries (Table 4).
Commercial Airplanes booked 88 gross orders during the quarter while 20 orders were removed from its order book. This contrasts with the year-ago period when net orders were five airplanes. Contractual backlog remains strong with 3,304 airplanes valued at $252 billion, more than seven times the unit's projected 2010 revenue.
Table 4. Commercial Airplanes Operating Results
 
The 787 program continued flight test during the quarter, as a fifth airplane joined the four airplanes already in the flight test program. The Dreamliner completed key flight test milestones, including extreme weather, icing and cruise performance testing. On July 1, the program completed another key milestone with the completion of 787-9 firm configuration. First delivery continues to be planned for the end of this year, although there is added pressure to the schedule and risk that initial delivery may move a few weeks as the company completes flight test and certification requirements. Total firm orders for the 787 program at quarter-end were 863 airplanes from 56 customers.
The 747-8 program continued flight test during the quarter achieving expanded Type Inspection Authorization on June 11. On July 22, the 747-8 added a fourth flight test airplane to its flight test fleet. The company continues to work toward first delivery in the fourth quarter of 2010, although there is increasing pressure on that schedule and risk that it may move into early 2011.
 
Boeing Defense, Space & Security
Boeing Defense, Space & Security's second-quarter revenue declined 8 percent to $8.0 billion primarily on lower Network & Space Systems volume. Operating margins were 8.9 percent on lower margins in military aircraft and services (Table 5).
Table 5. Defense, Space & Security Operating Results
 
Boeing Military Aircraft (BMA) second-quarter revenue rose 4 percent to $3.6 billion driven by higher Chinook deliveries and volume. Operating margin was 9.9 percent, as strong execution across its programs was offset by the impact of labor disruptions and a charge on the Airborne Early Warning & Control program. During the quarter, the DoD announced its intent to pursue a new F/A-18 and EA-18G multi-year contract, the US Air Force signed a contract for eight C-17's and three Wedgetail aircraft were delivered to Australia.
Network & Space Systems second-quarter revenue was $2.4 billion, reduced by expected lower volume on Brigade Combat Team Modernization and Ground-based Midcourse Defense (GMD). Operating margin was 7.1 percent reflecting solid performance across the segment's array of programs. During the quarter, GMD successfully completed a two stage flight test and the first Global Positioning System IIF-1 satellite was launched.
Global Services & Support (GS&S) revenue decreased by 3 percent to $2.0 billion on lower maintenance modifications and upgrades volume. Operating margin was 9.2 percent, impacted by lower margins on integrated logistics and maintenance modifications and upgrades. In this segment, the C-130 Avionics Modernization Program entered production and the company was awarded contracts for the FAA Next-Generation Air Transportation System, and the US Air Force KC-10 cockpit upgrade.
 
Backlog at Defense, Space & Security is $60.6 billion, approximately two times the unit's projected 2010 revenue. The backlog declined by $3.6 billion as run-off of multi-year contracts exceeded additions to backlog in the quarter.
Boeing Capital Corporation
Boeing Capital Corporation (BCC) reported second-quarter pre-tax earnings of $55 million compared to $36 million in the same period last year (Table 6). Earnings improvement was primarily driven by lower asset impairments and provision for loss requirements. During the quarter, BCC's portfolio balance declined to $5.3 billion, down from $5.7 billion at year end, on normal run-off, asset pre-payments and depreciation. BCC's debt-to-equity ratio decreased to 5.3-to-1.
Table 6. Boeing Capital Corporation Operating Results
 
Additional Information
The "Other" segment consists primarily of Boeing Engineering, Operations and Technology, as well as certain results related to the financial consolidation of all business units. Other segment expense was $72 million in the second quarter, up from $46 million in the same period last year driven by higher environmental remediation expense.
Total pension expense for the second quarter was $283 million, as compared to $207 million in the same period last year. A total of $305 million was recognized in the operating segments in the quarter (up from $229 million in the same period last year), partially offset by a $22 million contribution to earnings in unallocated items.
Unallocated expense was $70 million, down from $154 million in the same quarter last year, driven by lower deferred compensation expense.
 
Interest expense for the quarter was $132 million, up from $80 million in the same period last year due to debt issued in 2009.
Outlook
2010 financial guidance (Table 7) is reaffirmed for revenue, earnings per share, and operating cash flow, although the business segment margin guidance has been adjusted. Capital expenditures guidance has been decreased.
Boeing's 2010 revenue guidance is reaffirmed at $64 billion to $66 billion. Earnings guidance for 2010 remains at $3.50 to $3.80 per share and continues to include some provision for risks. Operating cash flow guidance is reaffirmed at approximately zero in 2010, as the company continues to build inventory on key commercial development programs.
The company continues to expect that 2011 revenue will be higher than 2010, primarily driven by projected 787 and 747-8 deliveries. Combining higher projected deliveries with spending plans for R&D investments and other factors, operating cash flow in 2011 is still expected to be greater than $5 billion.
Commercial Airplanes' 2010 delivery guidance remains unchanged at between 460 and 465 airplanes and is sold out. It includes the first few 787 and 747-8 deliveries. The unit's 2010 revenue guidance is reaffirmed at $31 billion to $32 billion and operating margin guidance is increased to between 7.5 percent and 8.5 percent, up from 6.5 percent to 7.5 percent on strong core operating performance.
Defense, Space & Security's revenue guidance for 2010 is reaffirmed at between $32 billion and $33 billion with operating margins reduced to approximately 9.5 percent, from approximately 10 percent, reflecting performance to date and the current contracting environment.
Boeing Capital Corporation has reaffirmed its expectation that its aircraft finance portfolio will continue to reduce as its expected new aircraft financing for 2010 remains at less than $0.5 billion, below normal portfolio runoff through customer payments and depreciation. BCC continues to expect its debt-to-equity ratio to return to the 5.0-to-1 level in the second half of 2010.
 
Boeing's 2010 R&D forecast is unchanged at $3.9 billion to $4.1 billion on continued investment in development programs. The company continues to expect R&D to decrease at an amount greater than $0.5 billion in 2011. Capital expenditures for 2010 have been reduced to approximately $1.7 billion, down from $1.9 billion. The company's 2010 non-cash pension expense is expected to be approximately $1.2 billion.
Table 7. Financial Outlook
 
 
 
Non-GAAP Measure Disclosure
Management believes that the non-GAAP (Generally Accepted Accounting Principles) measures (indicated by an asterisk *) used in this report provide investors with important perspectives into the company's ongoing business performance. The company does not intend for the information to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the related GAAP measures. Other companies may define the measures differently. The following definitions are provided:
Free Cash Flow
Free cash flow is defined as GAAP less capital expenditures for . Management believes free cash flow provides investors with an important perspective on the cash available for shareholders, debt repayment, and acquisitions after making the capital investments required to support ongoing business operations and long term value creation. Free cash flow does not represent the residual cash flow available for discretionary expenditures as it excludes certain mandatory expenditures such as repayment of maturing debt. Management uses free cash flow internally to assess both business performance and overall liquidity. Table 2 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and free cash flow.
operating cash flow
property, plant and equipment additions
 
 
This document contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "may," "will," "should," "expects," "intends," "projects," "plans," "believes," "estimates," "targets," "anticipates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. Examples of forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements we make regarding our guidance relating to 2010 and 2011 financial and operating performance, as well as any other statement that does not directly relate to any historical or current fact. Forward-looking statements are based on our current expectations and assumptions, which may not prove to be accurate. These statements are not guarantees and are subject to risks, uncertainties, and changes in circumstances that are difficult to predict. Many factors could cause actual results to differ materially and adversely from these forward-looking statements. Among these factors are: (1) general conditions in the economy and our industry, including those due to regulatory changes; (2) risks attributable to our reliance on our commercial customers, our suppliers and the worldwide market; (3) risks related to our development programs, including the 787 and 747-8 commercial aircraft programs; (4) risks related to our dependence on U.S. government contracts; (5) our reliance on fixed-price contracts, which could subject us to losses in the event of cost overruns; (6) risks related to cost-type contracts; (7) uncertainties concerning contracts that include in-orbit incentive payments; (8) changes in accounting estimates; (9) significant changes in discount rates and actual investment return on pension assets; (10) work stoppages or other labor disruptions; (11) changes in the competitive landscape in the markets in which we operate; (12) risks related to our doing business in other countries, including sales to non-U.S. customers; (13) potential adverse developments in new or pending litigation and/or government investigations; (14) changes in the financial condition or regulatory landscape of the commercial airline industry as they relate to Boeing Capital Corporation; (15) changes in our ability to obtain debt on commercially reasonable terms and at competitive rates in order to fund our operations and contractual commitments; (16) risks related to realizing the anticipated benefits of merger, acquisitions, joint ventures/strategic alliance or divestitures; (17) adequacy of our insurance coverage to cover significant risk exposures; and (18) potential business disruptions related to physical security threats, IT attacks or natural disasters.
Additional information concerning these and other factors can be found in our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including our most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q and Current Reports on Form 8-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which it is made, and we assume no obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statement, except as required by law.
Contact:
Investor Relations:     Scott Fitterer or Jennifer Mack (312) 544-2140
Communications:         Chaz Bickers (312) 544-2002
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20100827070837.txt.gz
TIME:20100827070837
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On August 27, 2010, The Boeing Company issued a press release in which it announced a revised schedule for the 787 Dreamliner. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: August 27, 2010
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
Boeing Sets 787 First Delivery Date for Mid-First Quarter 2011
EVERETT, Wash., Aug. 27, 2010  The Boeing [NYSE:BA] Company said today that it now expects delivery of the first 787 in the middle of the first quarter 2011.
The delivery date revision follows an assessment of the availability of an engine needed for the final phases of flight test this fall.
While Boeing works closely with Rolls-Royce to expedite engine availability, flight testing across the test fleet continues as planned.
Boeing said last month that the cumulative impact of a series of issues, including supplier workmanship issues related to the horizontal stabilizer and instrumentation delays, could push first delivery of the 787 a few weeks into 2011. The delay in engine availability has extended that estimate to mid-first quarter 2011.
The schedule revision will not affect the company's financial guidance.
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements in this report may be "forward-looking" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "believes," "estimates," "targets," "anticipates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are based upon assumptions about future events that may not prove to be accurate. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in these forward-looking statements. As a result, these statements speak to events only as of the date they are made and we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise, except as required by federal securities laws. Specific factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements we make regarding our guidance relating to future financial and operating performance, the effect of economic conditions in the United States and globally, and general industry conditions as they may impact us or our customers, as well as the other important factors disclosed previously and from time to time in our other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Contacts:
Yvonne Leach
787 Communications
+1 206-854-5027
yvonne.l.leach@boeing.com
Jim Proulx
Boeing Commercial Airplanes Media Relations
+1 206-850-2102
jim.proulx@boeing.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20101020080039.txt.gz
TIME:20101020080039
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
(a) On October 20, 2010, The Boeing Company issued a press release reporting its financial results for the third quarter of 2010. A copy of the Company's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
(a) Not applicable
(b) Not applicable
(c) Not applicable
(d) Exhibits
99.1    Press Release issued by The Boeing Company dated October 20, 2010, reporting Boeing's financial results for the third quarter of 2010, furnished herewith.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
Boeing Reports Strong Third-Quarter Results and Improves 2010 Outlook
 
 
 
 
 
Table 1. Summary Financial Results
 The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] reported third-quarter net income of $0.8 billion, or $1.12 per share, on revenue of $17.0 billion. The results reflect higher Commercial Airplanes volume and strong performance across the company's core businesses (Table 1). Results in 2009 were impacted by a 787 R&D reclassification ($2.60 per share) and a 747 charge ($0.99 per share).
CHICAGO, October 20, 2010
The company increased its 2010 earnings per share guidance to between $3.80 and $4.00 per share and operating cash flow guidance to greater than $1.5 billion reflecting the continued strong performance in its Commercial Airplanes business. Revenue guidance was narrowed to between $64.5 billion and $65.5 billion.
 
 
"Our results and revised outlook reflect the continued strong performance of our commercial production and services programs and the ability of our defense businesses to produce solid results in a challenging environment," said Jim McNerney, Boeing chairman, president and chief executive officer. "Orders were particularly encouraging, with a multi-year production contract for 124 F/A-18 aircraft and more than 200 net commercial airplane orders booked in the quarter, increasing our backlog and demonstrating improved overall market confidence."
Boeing's quarterly operating cash flow was $1.9 billion, reflecting strong operating performance and timing of certain receipts and expenditures. For the first nine months of 2010, operating cash flow was $1.8 billion. Free cash flow* was $1.6 billion in the quarter and $1.1 billion year-to-date (Table 2).
Table 2. Cash Flow
 
 
Cash and investments in marketable securities totaled $10.0 billion at quarter-end (Table 3), unchanged from the prior quarter. Debt decreased by $0.5 billion in the quarter due to Boeing Capital Corporation maturities. Also during the quarter, the company paid $0.8 billion for the previously announced Argon ST and Narus acquisitions.
Table 3. Cash, Marketable Securities and Debt Balances
 
 
 
 
Total company backlog at quarter-end was $321 billion, up 3 percent in the quarter, as backlog for both Commercial Airplanes and Defense, Space & Security increased during the period.
Segment Results
Commercial Airplanes
Boeing Commercial Airplanes third-quarter revenue was $8.7 billion, on higher airplane deliveries and services volume. Operating margin was 11.6 percent, reflecting the higher deliveries and continued strong operating performance (Table 4). The prior year quarterly results were impacted by a $2.6 billion 787 R&D reclassification and a $1.0 billion 747 charge.
Commercial Airplanes booked 257 gross orders during the quarter while 36 orders were removed from its order book. This contrasts with the year-ago period when net orders were 79 airplanes. Contractual backlog remains strong with 3,401 airplanes valued at $255 billion, more than seven times the unit's projected 2010 revenue.
Table 4. Commercial Airplanes Operating Results
 
The 787 program achieved a series of flight test milestones during the quarter, and the sixth  and final  dedicated test aircraft joined the flight test fleet on October 4. Total firm orders for the 787 at quarter-end were 847 airplanes from 55 customers. First delivery is expected in mid-first quarter 2011.
Flight testing of the 747-8 Freighter also continued during the quarter as engineers worked to resolve previously identified technical discoveries. Delivery of the first 747-8 is planned for mid-2011, and a fifth flight test aircraft is being added to support the test schedule.
 
 
Boeing Defense, Space & Security
Boeing Defense, Space & Security's third-quarter revenue declined 6 percent to $8.2 billion and operating margin was 8.4 percent on lower volume and margins in Network & Space Systems (N&SS) and Boeing Military Aircraft (BMA) (Table 5).
Table 5. Defense, Space & Security Operating Results
 
BMA third-quarter revenue decreased by 5 percent to $3.8 billion driven by fewer deliveries and a less favorable mix on the C-17 program. Operating margin was 8.2 percent, impacted by lower pricing and mix on the C-17. During the quarter, the U.S. Navy awarded a new multi-year contract for 124 F/A-18 and EA-18G aircraft, and the P-8A and Apache Block III were both approved for Low Rate Initial Production.
N&SS third-quarter revenue was $2.3 billion, reduced by expected lower volume on Brigade Combat Team Modernization (BCTM) and Ground-based Midcourse Defense (GMD). Operating margin was 6.5 percent on lower BCTM and GMD earnings. During the quarter, NASA awarded an extension to the International Space Station contract, Inmarsat ordered three 702HP satellites and BCTM completed its Increment 1 technical tests, a key milestone in its 2010 testing cycle.
Global Services & Support (GS&S) revenue was $2.0 billion in the quarter, essentially unchanged from the same period last year. Operating margin increased to 10.7 percent, driven by strong performance in integrated logistics and maintenance, modifications and upgrades. During the quarter, the U.S. Air Force awarded a contract to modernize its B-52 fleet.
 
 
Backlog at Defense, Space & Security is $65.6 billion, approximately two times the unit's projected 2010 revenue. The backlog increased by $5.0 billion during the quarter driven by the F/A-18 multi-year contract award.
Boeing Capital Corporation
Boeing Capital Corporation (BCC) reported third-quarter pre-tax earnings of $45 million compared to $39 million in the same period last year (Table 6). During the quarter, BCC's portfolio balance declined to $5.0 billion, down from $5.7 billion at year end, on normal run-off, asset pre-payments and depreciation. BCC's debt-to-equity ratio decreased to 5.0-to-1.
Table 6. Boeing Capital Corporation Operating Results
 
Additional Information
The "Other" segment consists primarily of Boeing Engineering, Operations and Technology, as well as certain results related to the financial consolidation of all business units. Other segment expense was $132 million in the third quarter, up from $36 million in the same period last year driven by an $81 million impairment of the Mexicana 717 financing portfolio.
Total pension expense for the third quarter was $280 million, as compared to $230 million in the same period last year. A total of $301 million was recognized in the operating segments in the quarter (up from $254 million in the same period last year), partially offset by a $21 million contribution to earnings in unallocated items.
Unallocated expense was $227 million up from the $202 million reported in the same period last year.
Interest expense for the quarter was $130 million, up from $92 million in the same period last year due to debt issued in 2009.
 
 
Outlook
Financial guidance for 2010 (Table 7) has been updated to reflect the improved Commercial Airplanes outlook resulting from its continued strong core operating performance. The guidance also reflects the recently announced rescheduling of the initial 787 and 747-8 deliveries.
Boeing's 2010 revenue guidance is now between $64.5 billion and $65.5 billion, narrowed from between $64 billion and $66 billion. Earnings guidance for 2010 is increased to between $3.80 and $4.00 per share, from between $3.50 and $3.80 per share. Operating cash flow guidance is now expected to be greater than $1.5 billion, up from approximately zero. The increase to earnings per share and operating cash flow guidance are both driven by the improved outlook at Commercial Airplanes.
The company continues to expect that 2011 revenue will be higher than 2010, although 2011 revenue estimates will be impacted by the revised 787 and 747-8 delivery schedules. After taking into account the impact of these revised schedules and anticipated pension contributions of approximately $0.5 billion, operating cash flow in 2011 is now expected to be greater than $4 billion, down from greater than $5 billion. The total two year (2010  2011) expected cash flow outlook is up slightly from prior guidance.
Commercial Airplanes' 2010 delivery guidance is now at approximately 460 airplanes, while revenue is expected to be approximately $31.5 billion. Operating margin guidance has been increased to approximately 9.5 percent, up from between 7.5 percent and 8.5 percent on continued strong core operating performance.
Defense, Space & Security's revenue guidance for 2010 is reaffirmed at between $32 billion and $33 billion with operating margins reduced to approximately 9 percent, from approximately 9.5 percent, reflecting performance to date and the current contracting environment.
Boeing Capital Corporation has reaffirmed its expectation that its aircraft finance portfolio will continue to reduce as its expected new aircraft financing for 2010 remains at less than $0.5 billion, below normal portfolio runoff through customer payments and depreciation. BCC expects its debt-to-equity ratio to remain at 5.0-to-1 at the end of 2010.
 
 
Boeing's 2010 R&D forecast is unchanged at between $3.9 billion and $4.1 billion. The company now expects 2011 R&D to decrease by approximately $0.5 billion. Capital expenditures for 2010 have been reduced to approximately $1.6 billion, down from $1.7 billion. Capital expenditures are expected to increase in 2011 as the company invests in commercial production rate increases and completes the 787 final assembly line in North Charleston, S.C. The company's 2010 non-cash pension expense is expected to be approximately $1.2 billion. Non-cash pension expense in 2011 is estimated to increase by approximately $0.7 billion driven by the low discount rates currently being experienced in the marketplace. Actual 2011 pension expense will be determined at year end based on market conditions at that time.
Table 7. Financial Outlook
 
 
 
 
Non-GAAP Measure Disclosure
Management believes that the non-GAAP (Generally Accepted Accounting Principles) measures (indicated by an asterisk *) used in this report provide investors with important perspectives into the company's ongoing business performance. The company does not intend for the information to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the related GAAP measures. Other companies may define the measures differently. The following definitions are provided:
Free Cash Flow
Free cash flow is defined as GAAP less capital expenditures for . Management believes free cash flow provides investors with an important perspective on the cash available for shareholders, debt repayment, and acquisitions after making the capital investments required to support ongoing business operations and long term value creation. Free cash flow does not represent the residual cash flow available for discretionary expenditures as it excludes certain mandatory expenditures such as repayment of maturing debt. Management uses free cash flow internally to assess both business performance and overall liquidity. Table 2 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and free cash flow.
operating cash flow
property, plant and equipment additions
 
 
This document contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "may," "will," "should," "expects," "intends," "projects," "plans," "believes," "estimates," "targets," "anticipates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. Examples of forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements we make regarding our guidance relating to 2010 and 2011 financial and operating performance, as well as any other statement that does not directly relate to any historical or current fact. Forward-looking statements are based on our current expectations and assumptions, which may not prove to be accurate. These statements are not guarantees and are subject to risks, uncertainties, and changes in circumstances that are difficult to predict. Many factors could cause actual results to differ materially and adversely from these forward-looking statements. Among these factors are: (1) general conditions in the economy and our industry, including those due to regulatory changes; (2) risks attributable to our reliance on our commercial customers, our suppliers and the worldwide market; (3) risks related to our development programs, including the 787 and 747-8 commercial aircraft programs; (4) risks related to our dependence on U.S. government contracts; (5) our reliance on fixed-price contracts, which could subject us to losses in the event of cost overruns; (6) risks related to cost-type contracts; (7) uncertainties concerning contracts that include in-orbit incentive payments; (8) changes in accounting estimates; (9) significant changes in discount rates and actual investment return on pension assets; (10) work stoppages or other labor disruptions; (11) changes in the competitive landscape in the markets in which we operate; (12) risks related to our doing business in other countries, including sales to non-U.S. customers; (13) potential adverse developments in new or pending litigation and/or government investigations; (14) changes in the financial condition or regulatory landscape of the commercial airline industry as they relate to Boeing Capital Corporation; (15) changes in our ability to obtain debt on commercially reasonable terms and at competitive rates in order to fund our operations and contractual commitments; (16) risks related to realizing the anticipated benefits of mergers, acquisitions, joint ventures/strategic alliances or divestitures; (17) adequacy of our insurance coverage to cover significant risk exposures; and (18) potential business disruptions related to physical security threats, information technology attacks or natural disasters.
Additional information concerning these and other factors can be found in our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including our most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q and Current Reports on Form 8-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which it is made, and we assume no obligation to update any forward-looking statement, except as required by law.
Contact:
Investor Relations:    Scott Fitterer or Jennifer Mack (312) 544-2140
Communications:      Chaz Bickers (312) 544-2002
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
*Note: Workforce data vary from those reported in 2009 and earlier. The new totals include all subsidiaries, some of which were excluded in prior years.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20101116172438.txt.gz
TIME:20101116172438
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On November 12, 2010, The Boeing Company ("Boeing") entered into a $2.376 billion, 364-day revolving credit agreement (the "Credit Agreement"), with Citigroup Global Markets Inc. and J.P. Morgan Securities LLC as joint lead arrangers and joint book managers, JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. as syndication agent and Citibank, N.A. as administrative agent, and a syndicate of lenders as defined in the Credit Agreement. This facility replaces the $1.525 billion, 364-day credit agreement entered into on November 13, 2009.
Under the Credit Agreement, Boeing will pay a commitment fee of 0.10% per annum on the unused commitments. Borrowings under the Credit Agreement that are not based on Eurodollar rates bear interest at an annual rate based on the base rate of interest in effect plus the applicable margin. The "base rate" of interest is the highest of (1) the rate announced publicly by Citibank, N.A., from time to time, as its "base" rate, (2) the federal funds rate plus 0.50% and (3) the British Bankers Association one month LIBOR plus 1.00%. The "applicable margin" is the greater of (1) the market rate spread minus 1.00% and (2) 0% per annum. The "market rate spread" means at any date Boeing's credit default swap mid-rate spread for the one-year period beginning on the most recent reset date for the applicable advance, provided that the market rate spread shall have a floor of 0.50% and a cap of 1.50%. Borrowings under the Credit Agreement that are based on Eurodollar rates are generally based on an applicable LIBOR rate plus the market rate spread.
The Credit Agreement contains customary terms and conditions, including covenants restricting Boeing's ability to incur liens, merge or consolidate with another entity, and permit consolidated debt (as defined in the Credit Agreement) to exceed 60% of Boeing's total capital (as defined in the Credit Agreement). Events of default under the Credit Agreement include: (1) failure to pay outstanding principal or interest within five business days of when due, (2) failure of representations or warranties to be correct in any material respect, (3) failure to perform any other term, covenant or agreement, which failure is not remedied within 30 days of notice, (4) a cross-default with other debt in certain circumstances, (5) the incurrence of certain liabilities under the Employee Retirement Income Security Act and (6) bankruptcy and other insolvency events. If an event of default occurs and is continuing, the lenders would have the right to accelerate and require the repayment of all amounts outstanding under the Credit Agreement and would not be required to advance any additional funds under the Credit Agreement.
Some of the lenders under the Credit Agreement and their affiliates have various relationships with Boeing and its subsidiaries involving the provision of financial services, including cash management, investment banking, and trust and leasing services. In addition, Boeing and certain of its subsidiaries have entered into foreign exchange and other derivative arrangements with certain of the lenders and their affiliates.
The foregoing description is qualified in its entirety by the Credit Agreement, which is filed as an exhibit hereto.
 
The information set forth above under "Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement" is incorporated herein by reference.
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

 
Exhibit 10.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE BOEING COMPANY, a Delaware corporation ("" or the ""), for itself and on behalf of the other BORROWERS (as defined below), the LENDERS (as defined below), CITIGROUP GLOBAL MARKETS INC. and J.P. MORGAN SECURITIES LLC, as joint lead arrangers and joint book managers, JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., as syndication agent, and CITIBANK, N.A., in its capacity as administrative agent for the Lenders (in such capacity, the ""), agree as follows:
TBC
Company
Agent
 
"" means the 364-Day Credit Agreement, dated as of November 13, 2009, by and among TBC, Citibank, N.A., as administrative agent, and certain other banks as lenders.
2009 Credit Agreement
"" means a Committed Advance or a Bid Advance.
Advance
"" means Citibank, N.A. acting in its capacity as administrative agent for the Lenders, or any successor administrative agent appointed pursuant to Section 7.6.
Agent
"" means the account of the Agent maintained by the Agent with Citibank, N.A., at its office at 388 Greenwich Street, New York, New York 10013, Account 36852248, Attention: Agency/Medium Term Finance, Reference: Boeing.
Agent's Account
"" means, as to any Person, any other Person that, directly or indirectly, controls, is controlled by or is under common control with such Person or is a director or officer of such Person. (For purposes of this definition, the term "controls", "controlling", "controlled by" and "under common control with" mean, with respect to a Person, the possession, direct or indirect, of the power to vote 5% or more of the Voting Stock of such Person or to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of such Person, whether through the ownership of Voting Stock, by contract, or otherwise.)
Affiliate
"" means this agreement, as it may be amended or otherwise modified from time to time, and any written additions or supplements hereto.
Agreement
"" means, with respect to each Lender, such Lender's Domestic Lending Office, in the case of a Base Rate Advance, and such Lender's Eurodollar Lending Office, in the case of a Eurodollar Rate Advance, and, in the case of a Bid Advance, the office of such Lender specified by such Lender in a notice to the Agent as its Applicable Lending Office with respect to such Bid Advance.
Applicable Lending Office
"" means,
Applicable Margin
 
 
"" means 0.10% per annum:
Applicable Percentage
"" means, as of any date of determination, (a) the aggregate Commitments of the Lenders, as such amount may be reduced, changed or terminated in accordance with the terms of this Agreement, reduced by (b) the aggregate Advances outstanding on such date of determination.
Available Commitments
"" means the highest of (a) the rate of interest announced publicly by Citibank, N.A., in New York City, from time to time, as Citibank's "base" rate, (b) the Federal Funds Rate plus 0.50% per annum and (c) the British Bankers Association Interest Settlement Rate applicable to US dollars for a period of one month ("") plus 1.00% (for the avoidance of doubt, the One Month LIBOR for any day shall be based on the rate appearing on Reuters LIBOR01 Page (or other commercially available source providing such quotations as designated by the Agent from time to time) at approximately 11:00 a.m. London time on such day.
Base Rate
One Month LIBOR
"" means a Committed Advance which bears interest at the Base Rate.
Base Rate Advance
"" means an advance by a Lender to a Borrower as part of a Bid Borrowing resulting from the auction bidding procedure described in Section 2.5, and refers to a Fixed Rate Advance or a Eurodollar Rate Bid Advance, each of which shall be a "Type" of Bid Advance.
Bid Advance
"" means a borrowing consisting of simultaneous Bid Advances from each of the Lenders whose offers to make one or more Bid Advances as part of such borrowing has been accepted by a Borrower under the auction bidding procedure described in Section 2.5.
Bid Borrowing
"" means a promissory note of a Borrower payable to the order of a Lender, in substantially the form of Exhibit A-2, evidencing the indebtedness of that Borrower to such Lender resulting from a Bid Advance made by such Lender to such Borrower.
Bid Note
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.1(a).
Bid Reduction
"" means, individually and collectively, as the context requires, TBC and each Subsidiary Borrower (unless and until it becomes a "Terminated Subsidiary Borrower" pursuant to Section 2.22).
Borrower
"" means, with respect to any Subsidiary Borrower, a letter in the form of Exhibit D, signed by such Subsidiary Borrower and TBC.
Borrower Subsidiary Letter
"" means a Committed Borrowing or a Bid Borrowing.
Borrowing
"" means a day of the year on which banks are not required or authorized to close in New York City and, if the applicable Business Day relates to any Eurodollar Rate Advance, on which dealings are carried on in the London interbank market.
Business Day
"" means, for each Lender, the full amount set forth opposite the name of such Lender in Schedule I or, if such Lender is a Replacement Lender or a Lender that has entered into one or more assignments pursuant to Section 2.20 or Section 2.21, the amount set forth for such Lender in the Register maintained by the Agent pursuant to Section 2.20(d), as such amount may be
Commitment
 
reduced pursuant to Section 2.3, Section 2.8 or Section 2.19 or increased pursuant to Section 2.19.
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.7.
Commitment Fee
"" means an advance made by a Lender to a Borrower as part of a Committed Borrowing and refers to a Base Rate Advance or a Eurodollar Rate Committed Advance, each of which is a "Type" of Committed Advance.
Committed Advance
"" means a borrowing consisting of simultaneous Committed Advances of the same Type made by each of the Lenders pursuant to Section 2.1.
Committed Borrowing
"" means a promissory note of a Borrower payable to the order of any Lender, in substantially the form of Exhibit A-1, evidencing the indebtedness of that Borrower to such Lender resulting from the Committed Advances made by such Lender to that Borrower.
Committed Note
"" means The Boeing Company, a Delaware corporation.
Company
"" means information that a Borrower furnishes to the Agent or any Lender in a writing designated as confidential, but does not include any such information that is or becomes generally available to the public or that is or becomes available to the Agent or such Lender from a source other than a Borrower.
Confidential Information
"" refers to the consolidation of accounts in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.
Consolidated
"" means the total amount of assets (less applicable reserves and other properly deductible items) after, deducting therefrom (i) all current liabilities (excluding any thereof which are by their terms extendible or renewable at the option of the obligor thereon to a time more than 12 months after the time as of which the amount thereof is being computed), and (ii) all good will, trade names, trademarks, patents, unamortized debt discount and expenses and other like intangibles, all as set forth on the most recent balance sheet of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries and computed in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.
Consolidated Net Tangible Assets
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.21(a).
Continuing Lender
"", "" and "" each means a conversion of Committed Advances of one Type into Committed Advances of another Type pursuant to Section 2.10, 2.11 or 2.15.
Convert
Conversion
Converted
"" of a Person means
Debt
 
 
 
 
 
"" means any Event of Default or any event that would constitute an Event of Default but for the requirement that notice be given or time elapse or both.
Default
"" means with respect to any Lender, the office of such Lender specified as its "Domestic Lending Office" opposite its name on Schedule I, or in the assignment or other agreement pursuant to which it became a Lender or such other office of such Lender as such Lender may from time to time specify to TBC and the Agent.
Domestic Lending Office
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.19(d).
Effective Date
"" means
Eligible Assignee
 
 
 
 
 
 
"" means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended from time to time and the regulations promulgated and rulings issued thereunder.
ERISA
"" means any Person that for purposes of Title IV of ERISA is a member of the controlled group of any Borrower, or under common control with any Borrower, within the meaning of Section 414 of the Internal Revenue Code.
ERISA Affiliate
"" has the meaning assigned to that term in Regulation D of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, as in effect from time to time.
Eurocurrency Liabilities
"" means, with respect to any Lender, (a) the office of such Lender specified as its "Eurodollar Lending Office" opposite its name on Schedule I (or, if no such office is specified, its Domestic Lending Office) or in the assignment or other agreement pursuant to which it became a Lender or (b) such other office of such Lender as such Lender may from time to time specify to TBC and the Agent.
Eurodollar Lending Office
"" means, for an Interest Period for a Eurodollar Rate Committed Advance constituting part of a Committed Borrowing, and for the relevant period specified in the applicable Notice of Bid Borrowing for a Eurodollar Rate Bid Advance, an interest rate per annum equal to either
Eurodollar Rate
 
 
 
 
 
The Eurodollar Rate for any Interest Period for each Eurodollar Rate Committed Advance constituting part of the same Borrowing and for the relevant period specified in a Notice of Bid Borrowing for each Eurodollar Rate Bid Advance shall be determined by the Agent on the basis of applicable rates furnished to and received by the Agent from the Reference Banks two Business Days before the first day of such Interest Period or period, as the case may be, , , to the provisions of Section 2.10.
subject
however
"" means a Committed Advance (a "") or a Bid Advance (a "") which bears interest at a rate of interest quoted as a margin (which shall be the Applicable Margin in the case of a Committed Advance or as offered by a Lender and accepted by a Borrower in the case of a Bid Advance) over the Eurodollar Rate.
Eurodollar Rate Advance
Eurodollar Rate Committed Advance
Eurodollar Rate Bid Advance
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.5(b).
Eurodollar Rate Bid Borrowing
"" means the reserve percentage applicable to a Lender for any Interest Period for a Eurodollar Rate Advance during such Interest Period (or if more than one such percentage shall be so applicable, the daily average of such percentages for those days in such Interest Period during which any such percentage shall be so applicable) under regulations issued from time to time by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (or any successor) for determining the maximum reserve requirement (including, without limitation, any emergency, supplemental or other marginal reserve requirement) for such Lender with respect to liabilities or assets consisting of or including Eurocurrency Liabilities (or with respect to any other category of liabilities that includes deposits by reference to which the interest rate on Eurodollar Rate Advances is determined) having a term equal to such Interest Period.
Eurodollar Rate Reserve Percentage
 
 
"" means any of the events described in Section 6.1.
Event of Default
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.21.
Extension Request
"" means, for each day during a period, an interest rate per annum equal to the weighted average of the fluctuating rates on overnight Federal funds transactions with members of the Federal Reserve System arranged by Federal funds brokers, as published for such day (or, if such day is not a Business Day, for the immediately preceding Business Day) by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, or, if such rate is not so published for any day which is a Business Day, the average of the quotations for such day on such transactions received by the Agent from three Federal funds brokers of recognized standing selected by it.
Federal Funds Rate
"" means Fitch, Inc.
Fitch
"" means an Advance made by a Lender to a Borrower as part of a Fixed Rate Borrowing.
Fixed Rate Advance
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.5(b).
Fixed Rate Borrowing
"" means each Guaranty Agreement executed by TBC in favor of the Agent and the Lenders, unconditionally guaranteeing the payment of all obligations of a Subsidiary Borrower hereunder and under any Notes executed or to be executed by it.
Guaranty
"" has the meaning specified in Section 7.5.
Indemnified Costs
"" has the meaning specified in Section 8.3(b).
Indemnified Party
"" means, for each Eurodollar Rate Committed Advance constituting part of the same Borrowing, the period commencing on the date of such Committed Advance or the date of the Conversion of a Base Rate Advance into such a Eurodollar Rate Committed Advance and ending on the last day of the period selected by the applicable Borrower pursuant to the provisions below and, thereafter, each subsequent period commencing on the last day of the immediately preceding Interest Period and ending on the last day of the period selected by such Borrower pursuant to the provisions below. The duration of each such Interest Period shall be one, two, three, or six months (or nine months, with the consent of all Lenders funding those particular Advances), as the applicable Borrower may, upon notice received by the Agent not later than 11:00 a.m. (New York City time) on the third Business Day prior to the first day of such Interest Period, select, , , that:
Interest Period
provided
however
 
 
 
 
 
"", subject to Section 2.20, means any of the institutions that is a signatory hereto or that, pursuant to Section 2.13, 2.19, 2.20 or 2.21, becomes a "Lender" hereunder.
Lender
"" means Lenders holding greater than 50% of the then aggregate unpaid principal amount of the Committed Advances or, if no Committed Advances are outstanding, Lenders having greater than 50% of the total Commitments.
Majority Lenders
"" means, at any date, TBC's credit default swap mid-rate spread for the one-year period beginning on the most recent Reset Date for the applicable Advance (as provided by Markit), which will be obtained by the Agent from the Markit website, and will be reset as on each Reset Date; , that the Market Rate Spread shall in no event be less than 0.50% or greater than 1.50%. If for any reason Markit Group Limited does not provide the applicable information, the Market Rate Spread shall be fixed at the Market Rate Spread most recently provided by Markit Group Limited for a period of up to 30 days during which the parties shall negotiate to agree on an alternative method for establishing the Market Rate Spread. If after such negotiation period the parties have not agreed on an alterative method, the Market Rate Spread shall be deemed to be 1.125%.
Market Rate Spread
provided
"" means Markit Group Limited.
Markit
"" means the Termination Date or, if the Term Loan Conversion Option described in Section 2.3 has been exercised, the date that is the one-year anniversary of the Termination Date.
Maturity Date
"" means Moody's Investor Services, Inc.
Moody's
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.21(a).
Non-Extending Lender
"" means a Committed Note or a Bid Note.
Note
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.5(b).
Notice of Bid Borrowing
"" means a Notice of Committed Borrowing or a Notice of Bid Borrowing.
Notice of Borrowing
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.2(a).
Notice of Committed Borrowing
"" means the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development.
OECD
"" means an individual, partnership, corporation (including a business trust), limited liability company, joint stock company, trust, unincorporated association, joint venture or other entity, or a government or any political subdivision or agency thereof.
Person
"" means any item of real property, or any interest therein, buildings, improvements and machinery.
Property, Plant and Equipment
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.19(c).
Proposed Increased Commitment
"" means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., Citibank, N.A., Bank of America, N.A., and Deutsche Bank AG.
Reference Banks
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.20(d).
Register
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.21(c).
Replacement Lenders
 
 
"" means a document substantially in the form of Exhibit C, duly executed by TBC, pursuant to Section 2.19.
Request for Alteration
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.20(a).
Required Assignment
"" means (x) for each Eurodollar Rate Advance two business days prior to the first day of each Interest Period and (y) for each Base Rate Advance the last day of each calendar month.
Reset Date
"" means Standard & Poor's, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc.
S&P
"" means any Person in which more than 50% of the Voting Stock or the interest in the capital or profits is owned by TBC, by TBC and any one or more other Subsidiaries, or by any one or more other Subsidiaries.
Subsidiary
"" means, individually and collectively, as the context requires, each Subsidiary that is or becomes a "Borrower" in accordance with Section 2.22; in each case, unless and until it becomes a "Terminated Subsidiary Borrower".
Subsidiary Borrower
"" means The Boeing Company, a Delaware corporation.
TBC
"" means a term loan resulting from the conversion of Committed Advances on the Termination Date pursuant to Section 2.3.
Term Loan
"" means the option under Section 2.3 for TBC to convert, as of the Termination Date, all or a part of the Committed Advances then outstanding into Term Loans.
Term Loan Conversion Option
"" means, individually and collectively, as the context requires, a Subsidiary Borrower that has ceased to be a "Borrower" in accordance with Section 2.22.
Terminated Subsidiary Borrower
"" means the earlier to occur of (i) November 11, 2011, as such date may be extended from time to time pursuant to Section 2.21, and (ii) the date of termination in whole of the Commitments pursuant to Section 2.8 or Section 6.2.
Termination Date
"" has the meaning specified in Section 4.2(b).
Total Capital
"", as to Committed Borrowings, means either Base Rate Advances or Eurodollar Rate Committed Advances and, as to Bid Borrowings, means either Fixed Rate Advances or Eurodollar Rate Bid Advances.
Type
"" means, with respect to each Lender, such Lender's Commitment minus the aggregate principal amount of Committed Advances made by such Lender.
Unused Commitment
"" means, as to a corporation, all the issued and outstanding capital stock of such corporation having general voting power, under ordinary circumstances, to elect a majority of the Board of Directors of such corporation (irrespective of whether or not any capital stock of any other class or classes shall or might have voting power upon the occurrence of any contingency).
Voting Stock
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Every Notice of Committed Borrowing given by a Subsidiary Borrower must be countersigned by an authorized representative of TBC, in order to evidence the consent of TBC, in its sole discretion, to that proposed Committed Borrowing. Upon receipt of a Notice of Committed Borrowing, the Agent shall promptly give notice to each Lender thereof.
 
 
 
 
 
 
If such Lender shall repay to the Agent such corresponding amount, such amount so repaid shall constitute such Lender's Committed Advance as part of such Committed Borrowing for purposes of this Agreement.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
that in the event and during the continuance of an Event of Default (x) the Applicable Margin shall immediately increase by 1.0% above the Applicable Margin then in effect, and, in the case of a Eurodollar Rate Advance, such Advance shall automatically convert to a Base Rate Advance at the end of the Interest Period then in effect for such Eurodollar Rate Advance and (y) to the fullest extent permitted by law, the Borrowers shall pay interest on the amount of any interest, fee or other amount payable hereunder that is not paid when due, from the date such amount shall be due until such amount shall be paid in full, payable in arrears on the date such amount shall be paid in full and on demand, at a rate per annum equal at all times to 1% above the Base Rate.
provided
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
A Borrower requesting a Bid Borrowing shall deliver a Notice of Bid Borrowing to the Agent not later than 11:00 a.m. (New York City time) (A) at least one Business Day prior to the date of the proposed Bid Borrowing if the proposed Bid Borrowing is to be a Fixed Rate Borrowing, and (B) at least four Business Days prior to the date of the proposed Bid Borrowing, if the proposed Bid Borrowing is to be a Eurodollar Rate Bid Borrowing. Every Notice of Bid Borrowing given by a Subsidiary Borrower must be countersigned by an authorized representative of TBC, in order to evidence the consent of TBC, in its sole discretion, to that proposed Bid Borrowing. The Agent shall in turn promptly notify each Lender of each request for a Bid Borrowing by sending such Lender a copy of the related Notice of Bid Borrowing.
 
 
 
 
 
that if the Agent in its capacity as a Lender, in its sole discretion, elects to make any such offer, it shall notify such Borrower and the Company of such offer before 9:30 a.m. (New York City time) on the date on which notice of such election is to be given to the Agent by the other Lenders. If, by 10:00 a.m. (New York City time) on the date on which notice of a Lender's election under this Section 2.5(c) is to be made, the Agent fails to receive, at its address specified in Section 8.2, a notice from a Lender provided for in this Section 2.5(c), the Agent may conclusively presume that such Lender has elected not to offer to make any Bid Advances to such Borrower with respect to the related Notice of Bid Borrowing.
provided
 
 
 
If the Borrower proposing the Bid Borrowing notifies the Agent that such Bid Borrowing is canceled pursuant to Section 2.5(d)(i), the Agent shall give prompt notice thereof to the Lenders and such Bid Borrowing shall not be made.
 
 
 
 
 
When each Lender that is to make a Bid Advance as part of such Bid Borrowing has received notice from the Agent pursuant to clause (iii) of the preceding sentence, such Lender shall, before 1:00 p.m. (New York City time) on the date of such Bid Borrowing specified in the notice received from the Agent pursuant to clause (i) of the preceding sentence, make available for the account of its Applicable Lending Office to the Agent at the Agent's Account such Lender's portion of such Bid Borrowing, in same day funds. Upon fulfillment of the applicable conditions set forth in Article 5 and after receipt by the Agent of such funds, the Agent will make such funds available to the relevant Borrower at an account specified by such Borrower. Promptly after each Bid Borrowing the Agent shall notify each Lender of the amount of the Bid Borrowing, the consequent Bid Reduction, and the dates upon which such Bid Reduction commenced and will terminate.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
there is an increase in the cost incurred by a Lender in agreeing to make or making, funding or maintaining any Eurodollar Rate Committed Advance or Eurodollar Rate Bid Advance then or at any time thereafter outstanding (excluding for purposes of this Section 2.13 any such increased costs resulting from (i) Taxes or Other Taxes (as to which Section 2.14 shall govern) and (ii) changes in the basis of taxation of overall net income or overall gross income by the United States or by the foreign jurisdiction or state under the laws of which such Lender is organized or has its Applicable Lending Office (or any political subdivision thereof), then TBC shall from time to time, upon demand of such Lender (with a copy of such demand to the Agent), pay to the Agent for the account of such Lender such amounts as are required to compensate such Lender for such increased cost, that such Lender shall exercise reasonable efforts (consistent with its internal policy and legal and regulatory restrictions) to minimize any such increased cost and that the Borrowers shall not be required to pay any such compensation with
provided
provided
further
 
respect to any period prior to the 90th day before the date of any such demand, unless such introduction, change, compliance or request shall have retroactive effect to a date prior to such 90
th
day. A certificate as to the amount of such increase in cost, submitted to the relevant Borrowers and the Agent by such Lender, shall be conclusive and binding for all purposes under this Section 2.13(a), absent manifest error.
 
 
 
 
and, in either case, subject to payment in full of all principal, accrued and unpaid interest, fees and other amounts payable under this Agreement and then owing to such Lender immediately prior to the assignment or termination of the Commitment of such Lender.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
for such Lender to continue to fund or maintain any Eurodollar Rate Advances or to perform its obligations hereunder with respect to Eurodollar Rate Advances hereunder, then, upon the issuance of such opinion of counsel or such assertion by a central bank or other governmental authority, the Agent shall give notice of such opinion or assertion to the Borrowers (accompanied by such opinion, if applicable). The Borrowers shall forthwith either
 
 
Upon such prepayment or Conversion, the obligation of such Lender to make Eurodollar Rate Committed Advances or Eurodollar Rate Bid Advances, or to Convert Committed Advances into Eurodollar Rate Committed Advances, shall be suspended until the Agent shall notify the Borrowers that the circumstances causing such suspension no longer exists.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
subject, in either case, to payment in full of all principal, accrued and unpaid interest, fees, commissions and other amounts payable under this Agreement and then owing to such Lender immediately prior to the assignment or termination of the Commitment of such Lender.
If the Company shall designate as a Subsidiary Borrower hereunder any Subsidiary not organized under the laws of the United States or any State thereof, any Lender may, with notice to the Agent and the Company, fulfill its Commitment by causing an Affiliate of such Lender to act as the Lender in respect of such Subsidiary Borrower (and such Lender shall, to the extent of Advances made to such Subsidiary Borrower, be deemed for all purposes hereof to have assigned such Advances to such Affiliate in compliance with the provisions of Section 2.20).
pro tanto
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
In lieu of furnishing the Lenders the items referred to in clauses (1), (3), (5) and (6) above, the Company may make available such items on the Company's website at , at or at such other website as notified to the Agent and the Lenders, which shall be deemed to have satisfied the requirement of delivery of such items in accordance with this Section.
www.boeing.com
www.sec.gov
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
and (b) a representation by TBC that the representations and warranties of TBC contained in subsections (a) through (g) of Section 3.1 are true and accurate on and as of each such date as though made on and as of each such date (except to the extent that such representations and warranties relate solely to an earlier date), and that, as of each such date, no event has occurred and is continuing, or would result from the proposed Committed Borrowing, which constitutes a Default.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
and that no amendment, waiver, or consent shall, unless in writing and signed by the Agent in addition to the Lenders required above to take such action, affect the rights or duties of the Agent under this Agreement or any Note.
provided
further
 
 
 
 
if to the Agent, as set forth on the attached Schedule II;
if to any Borrower,
care of The Boeing Company
100 N. Riverside
Mail Code: 5003 3648
Chicago, Illinois 60606
Attention: Assistant Treasurer, Corporate Finance and Banking
facsimile number (312) 544-2399
if to any Lender, at its Domestic Lending Office; or,
as to each party, at such other address as designated by such party in a written notice to each other party referring specifically to this Agreement.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
to the fullest extent permitted by law, without notice to any Borrower (any such notice being expressly waived by each Borrower), to set off and apply any and all deposits (general or special, time or demand, provisional or final) at any time held and other indebtedness at any time owing by such Lender or such Affiliate to or for the credit or the account of any Borrower against any and all of the obligations to such Lender or such Affiliate of such Borrower now or hereafter existing under this Agreement and any Notes held by such Lender, whether or not such Lender has made a demand under this Agreement or such Notes and although such obligations may be unmatured. Each Lender shall promptly notify any Borrower after any such setoff and application made by such Lender, that the failure to give such notice shall not affect the validity of such setoff and application. The rights of each Lender under this Section are in addition to other rights and remedies (including, without limitation, other rights of setoff) which such Lender and its Affiliates may have.
provided
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The Agent, each Lender and their Affiliates (collectively, solely for purposes of this paragraph, the ""), may have economic interests that conflict with those of the Borrowers. Each Borrower agrees that nothing in this Agreement or otherwise will be deemed to create an advisory, fiduciary or agency relationship or fiduciary or other implied duty between the Lenders and any Borrower, its stockholders or its affiliates. The Borrowers acknowledge and agree that (i) the transactions contemplated by this Agreement are arm's-length commercial transactions between the Lenders, on the one hand, and the Borrowers, on the other, (ii) in connection therewith and with the process leading to such transaction each of the Lenders is acting solely as a principal and not the agent or fiduciary of any Borrower, its management, stockholders, creditors or any other person, (iii) no Lender has assumed an advisory or fiduciary responsibility in favor of any Borrower with respect to the transactions contemplated hereby or the process leading thereto (irrespective of whether any Lender or any of its affiliates has advised or is currently advising any Borrower on other matters) or any other obligation to any Borrower except the obligations expressly set forth in this Agreement and (iv) each Borrower has consulted its own legal and financial advisors to the extent it deemed appropriate. Each Borrower further acknowledges and agrees that it is responsible for making its own independent judgment with respect to such transactions and the process leading thereto. Each Borrower agrees that it will not claim that any Lender has rendered advisory services of any nature or respect, or owes a fiduciary or similar duty to such Borrower, in connection with such transaction or the process leading thereto.
Lenders
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be executed by their officers thereunto duly authorized as of the day and year first above written.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20101203110332.txt.gz
TIME:20101203110332
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On December 2, 2010, the Board of Directors (the "Board") of The Boeing Company (the "Company") elected Ronald A. Williams, Chairman of Aetna Inc., as a new director. The Board has appointed Mr. Williams to the Audit Committee and the Finance Committee.
Mr. Williams will participate in the Company's nonemployee director compensation program, which is described on pages 14 to 16 of the Company's proxy statement for its 2010 Annual Meeting of Shareholders filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 15, 2010, and which as of January 1, 2011 will include an annual cash retainer fee of $110,000 and an annual retainer in deferred stock units valued at $140,000.
A copy of the Company's press release announcing the election of Mr. Williams is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
On December 2, 2010, the Board approved and adopted an amendment to Article II, Section 1 of the Company's By-Laws to increase the number of directors from thirteen to fourteen. A copy of the amended and restated By-Laws is attached hereto as Exhibit 3.2 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: December 3, 2010
 

Exhibit 3.2
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
SECTION 1. 
.
Annual Meetings
The Annual Meeting of the stockholders shall be held on such date and at such time as the Board of Directors shall determine, for the election of directors and the transaction of such other business as may come before the meeting.
SECTION 2.
Special Meetings.
A special meeting of stockholders may be called at any time by the Board of Directors, or by stockholders holding together at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, except as otherwise provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto.
SECTION 3.
Place of Meeting.
All meetings of the stockholders of the Corporation shall be held at such place or places, if any, within or without the State of Delaware as may from time to time be fixed by the Board of Directors or as shall be specified or fixed in the respective notices or waivers of notice thereof.
SECTION 4.
Notice of Meetings.
Except as otherwise required by statute and as set forth below, notice of each annual or special meeting of stockholders shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date. If the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, notice of each special meeting of stockholders shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than fifty-five (55) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date, unless the calling of such meeting is ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, in which case notice of such special meeting shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date. Such notice shall be given by delivering to each stockholder a written or printed notice thereof either personally or by mailing such notice in a postage-prepaid envelope addressed to the stockholder's address as it appears on the stock books of the Corporation or by transmitting the notice to the stockholder in any other manner permitted by Delaware law. Except as otherwise required by statute, no publication of any notice of a meeting of stockholders shall be required. Every notice of a meeting of stockholders shall state the place, if any (or the means of remote communication, if any, by which stockholders and proxy holders may be deemed to be present in person), date, and hour of the meeting and, in the case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called. Notices are deemed given (i) if by mail, when deposited in the United States mail, postage prepaid, directed to the stockholder at such stockholder's address as it appears on the records of the Corporation, or, if a stockholder shall have filed with the Secretary a written request that notices to such stockholder be mailed to some other address, then directed to such stockholder at such other address; (ii) if by facsimile, when directed to a number at which the stockholder has consented to receive notice; (iii) if by electronic mail, when directed to an electronic mail address at which the stockholder has consented to receive such notice; (iv) if by posting on an electronic network together with a separate notice to the stockholder of such specific posting, upon the later to occur of (A) such posting and (B) the giving of such separate notice of such posting; and (v) if by any other form of electronic transmission, when directed to the stockholder as required by law and, to the extent required by applicable law, in the manner consented to by the stockholder. An affidavit of the mailing or other means of giving any notice of any stockholders' meeting, executed by the Secretary, Assistant Corporate Secretary or any transfer agent of the Corporation giving the notice, shall be prima facie evidence of the giving of such notice. Notice shall be deemed to have been given to all stockholders of record who share an address if notice is given in accordance with the "householding" rules set forth in Rule 14a-3(e) under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") and Section 233 of the Delaware General Corporation Law.
 
SECTION 5.
Waivers of Notice.
Whenever any notice is required to be given to any stockholder under the provisions of these By-Laws, the Certificate of Incorporation, or the Delaware General Corporation Law, a waiver thereof in writing, signed by the person or persons entitled to such notice, whether before or after the time stated therein, shall be deemed equivalent to the giving of such notice. The attendance of a stockholder at a meeting, in person or by proxy, or waiver by electronic transmission, shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when a stockholder attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened.
SECTION 6.
Quorum.
At all meetings of stockholders, except when otherwise provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by these By-Laws, the presence, in person or by proxy duly authorized, of the holders of one-third of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and except as otherwise provided by statute or rule of law, or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by these By-Laws, the vote, in person or by proxy, of the holders of a majority of the shares constituting such quorum shall be binding upon all stockholders of the Corporation. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote may adjourn any meeting, from time to time but not for a period of more than thirty (30) days at any one time, until a quorum shall attend. At any such adjourned meeting at which a quorum shall be present, any business may be transacted which might have been transacted at the meeting as originally called. Unless otherwise provided by statute, no notice of an adjourned meeting need be given.
SECTION 7.
Proxies.
7.1
Appointment.
Each stockholder entitled to vote at a meeting of stockholders or to express consent or dissent to corporate action in writing without a meeting may authorize another person or persons to act for such stockholder by proxy. Such authorization may be accomplished (a) by the stockholder or such stockholder's authorized officer, director, employee, or agent executing a writing or causing his or her signature to be affixed to such writing by any reasonable means, including facsimile signature, or (b) by transmitting or authorizing the transmission of a telegram, cablegram, or other means of electronic transmission to the intended holder of the proxy or to a proxy solicitation firm, proxy support service, or similar agent duly authorized by the intended proxy holder to receive such transmission; provided, that any such telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission must either set forth or be accompanied by information from which it can be determined that the telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission was authorized by the stockholder. Any copy, facsimile telecommunication, or other reliable reproduction of the writing or transmission by which a stockholder has authorized another person to act as proxy for such stockholder may be substituted or used in lieu of the original writing or transmission for any and all purposes for which the original writing or transmission could be used, provided that such copy, facsimile telecommunication, or other reproduction shall be a complete reproduction of the entire original writing or transmission.
7.2
Delivery to Corporation; Duration.
A proxy shall be filed with the Secretary of the Corporation before or at the time of the meeting or the delivery to the Corporation of the consent to corporate action in writing. A proxy shall become invalid three (3) years after the date of its execution, unless otherwise provided in the proxy. A proxy with respect to a specified meeting shall entitle the holder thereof to vote at any reconvened meeting following adjournment of such meeting but shall not be valid after the final adjournment thereof.
 
SECTION 8.
Inspectors of Election.
8.1
Appointment.
In advance of any meeting of stockholders, the Board of Directors of the Corporation shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspectors of election at such meeting and to make a written report thereof. The Board of Directors may designate one or more persons to serve as alternate inspectors to serve in place of any inspector who is unable or fails to act. If no inspector or alternate is able to act at a meeting of stockholders, the chairman of such meeting shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspector at such meeting.
8.2
Duties.
The inspectors of election shall (a) ascertain the number of shares of the Corporation outstanding and the voting power of each such share; (b) determine the shares represented at the meeting and the validity of proxies and ballots; (c) count all votes and ballots; (d) determine and retain for a reasonable period of time a record of the disposition of any challenges made to any determination by them; and (e) certify their determination of the number of shares represented at the meeting and their count of the votes and ballots. Each inspector shall, before entering upon the discharge of his or her duties, take and sign an oath to faithfully execute the duties of inspector with strict impartiality and according to the best of his or her ability. The inspectors may appoint or retain other persons or entities to assist them in the performance of their duties.
8.3
Determination of Proxy Validity.
The validity of any proxy or ballot executed for a meeting of stockholders shall be determined by the inspectors of election in accordance with the applicable provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law as then in effect. In determining the validity of any proxy transmitted by telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission, the inspectors shall record in writing the information upon which they relied in making such determination.
SECTION 9.
Fixing the Record Date.
9.1
Meetings.
For the purpose of determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at any meeting of stockholders or any adjournment thereof, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which record date shall be not fewer than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the date of such meeting. If the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, the record date for each special meeting of stockholders shall be not fewer than fifty-five (55) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date, unless the calling of such meeting is ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation. If no record date is fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall be at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which notice is given, or, if notice is waived, at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which the meeting is held. A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting; provided, however, that the Board of Directors may fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
9.2
Consent to Corporate Action Without a Meeting.
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which date shall not be more than ten (10) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days after the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, when no prior action by the Board of Directors is required by Chapter 1 of the Delaware General Corporation Law as now or hereafter amended, shall be the first date on which a signed written consent setting forth the action taken or proposed to be taken is delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the records of proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Delivery made to the Corporation's registered office shall be by hand or by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors and prior action by the Board of Directors is required by Chapter 1 of the Delaware General Corporation Law as now or hereafter amended, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution taking such prior action.
 
9.3
Dividends, Distributions, and Other Rights.
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to receive payment of any dividend or other distribution or allotment of any rights or the stockholders entitled to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion, or exchange of stock, or for the purpose of any other lawful action, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted, and which record date shall be not more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days prior to such action. If no record date is fixed, the record date for determining stockholders for any such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution relating thereto.
9.4
Voting List.
At least ten (10) days before each meeting of stockholders, a complete list of the stockholders entitled to vote at such meeting shall be made, arranged in alphabetical order, and showing the address of each stockholder and the number of shares registered in the name of each stockholder. This list shall be open to examination by any stockholder, for any purpose germane to the meeting, for a period of ten (10) days prior to the meeting, either (i) on a reasonably accessible electronic network, provided that the information required to gain access to such list is provided with the notice of meeting, or (ii) during ordinary business hours at the principal place of business of the Corporation. The list shall also be produced and kept at such meeting for inspection by any stockholder who is present.
SECTION 10.
Action by Stockholders Without a Meeting.
Subject to the provisions of Article NINTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, any action which could be taken at any annual or special meeting of stockholders may be taken without a meeting, without prior notice, and without a vote, if a consent or consents in writing, setting forth the action so taken, are (a) signed by the holders of outstanding stock having not fewer than the minimum number of votes that would be necessary to authorize or take such action at a meeting at which all shares entitled to vote thereon were present and voted and (b) delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the records of proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Delivery made to the Corporation's registered office shall be by hand or by certified mail or registered mail, return receipt requested. Every written consent shall bear the date of signature of each stockholder who signs the consent, and no written consent shall be effective to take the corporate action referred to therein unless written consents signed by a sufficient number of stockholders to take such action are delivered to the Corporation, in the manner required by this Section, within sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days of the date of the earliest dated consent delivered to the Corporation in the manner required by this Section 10. The validity of any consent executed by a proxy for a stockholder pursuant to a telegram, cablegram, or other means of electronic transmission transmitted to such proxy holder by or upon the authorization of the stockholder shall be determined by or at the direction of the Secretary of the Corporation. A written record of the information upon which the person making such determination relied shall be made and kept in the records of the proceedings of the stockholders. Any such consent shall be inserted in the minute book as if it were the minutes of a meeting of stockholders. Prompt notice of the taking of the corporate action without a meeting by less than unanimous written consent shall be given to those stockholders who have not consented in writing.
SECTION 11. Notice of Nominations and Other Stockholder Business; Required Vote for Directors; Director Qualification.
11.1
Notice of Nominations and Other Stockholder Business.
A.
Annual Meetings of Stockholders.
1. Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors and the proposal of other business to be considered by the stockholders may be made at an annual meeting of stockholders (a) as specified in the Corporation's notice of meeting (or any supplement thereto); (b) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof; or (c) by any stockholder of the Corporation who (i) was a stockholder of record at the time the notice provided for in this By-Law is delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation, (ii) is entitled to vote at the meeting, and (iii) complies with the notice procedures set forth in this By-Law as to such nomination or other business; clause (c) shall be the exclusive means for a stockholder to make nominations or submit proposals for other business (other than matters properly brought under Rule 14a-8 under the Exchange Act and included in the Corporation's notice of meeting) before an annual meeting of stockholders.
 
2. Without qualification, for any nominations or any other business to be properly brought before an annual meeting by a stockholder pursuant to Section 11.1.A(1)(c), the stockholder must have given timely notice thereof in writing to the Secretary of the Corporation and any such proposed business (other than the nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors) must constitute a proper matter for stockholder action. To be timely, a stockholder's notice shall be delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not earlier than the close of business on the one hundred and twentieth (120th) day and not later than the close of business on the ninetieth (90th) day prior to the first anniversary of the preceding year's annual meeting; provided, however, that in the event that the date of the annual meeting is more than thirty (30) days before or more than seventy (70) days after such anniversary date, notice by the stockholder to be timely must be so delivered not later than the close of business on the later of the ninetieth (90th) day prior to such annual meeting and the tenth (10th) day following the day on which public announcement of the date of such annual meeting is first made by the Corporation. In no event shall the postponement of a meeting as to which notice has been sent to stockholders commence a new time period (or extend any time period) for the giving of a stockholder's notice as described above. To be in proper form, such stockholder's notice (whether given pursuant to this Section 11.1.A(2) or Section 11.1.B) to the Secretary of the Corporation must: (a) set forth, as to the stockholder giving the notice and the beneficial owner, if any, on whose behalf the nomination or proposal for other business is made (i) the name and address of such stockholder, as they appear on the Corporation's books, and of such beneficial owner, if any, (ii) (A) the class or series and number of shares of the Corporation which are, directly or indirectly, owned beneficially and of record by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, (B) any option, warrant, convertible security, stock appreciation right, or similar right with an exercise or conversion privilege or a settlement payment or mechanism at a price related to any class or series of shares of the Corporation or with a value derived in whole or in part from the value of any class or series of shares of the Corporation, whether or not such instrument or right shall be subject to settlement in the underlying class or series of shares of the Corporation or otherwise (a "Derivative Instrument") directly or indirectly owned beneficially by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, and any other direct or indirect opportunity to profit or share in any profit derived from any increase or decrease in the value of shares of the Corporation, (C) any proxy, contract, arrangement, understanding, or relationship pursuant to which such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, has a right to vote any shares of any security of the Corporation, (D) any short interest in any security of the Corporation (for purposes of this By-Law a person shall be deemed to have a short interest in a security if such person directly or indirectly, through any contract, arrangement, understanding, relationship or otherwise, has the opportunity to profit or share in any profit derived from any decrease in the value of the subject security), (E) any rights to dividends on the shares of the Corporation owned beneficially by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, that are separated or separable from the underlying shares of the Corporation, (F) any proportionate interest in shares of the Corporation or Derivative Instruments held, directly or indirectly, by a general or limited partnership in which such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, is a general partner or, directly or indirectly, beneficially owns an interest in a general partner, and (G) any performance-related fees (other than an asset-based fee) that such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, is entitled to based on any increase or decrease in the value of shares of the Corporation or Derivative Instruments, if any, all such information to be provided as of the date of such notice, including, without limitation, any such interests held by members of such stockholder's and such beneficial owner's, if any, immediate family sharing the same household (which information shall be supplemented by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, not later than ten (10) days after the record date for the annual meeting to disclose such ownership as of the record date), (iii) any other information relating to such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, that would be required to be disclosed in a proxy statement or other filings required to be made in connection with solicitations of proxies for, as applicable, the proposal of other business and/or for the election of directors in a contested election pursuant to Section 14 of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, and (iv) a representation (A) that the stockholder is a holder of record of stock of the Corporation entitled to vote at such annual meeting and intends to appear in person or by proxy at the annual meeting to propose such business or nomination and (B) whether the stockholder or the beneficial owner, if any, intends or is part of a group which intends (x) to deliver a proxy statement and/or form of proxy to holders of at least the percentage of the Corporation's outstanding capital stock required to approve or adopt the proposal or elect the nominee and/or (y) otherwise to solicit proxies from stockholders in support of such proposal or nomination; (b) if the notice relates to any business other than the nomination of a director or directors that the stockholder proposes to bring before the annual meeting, set forth (i) a brief description of the business desired to be brought before the annual meeting, the text of the proposal or business (including the text of any resolutions proposed for consideration and in the event that such business includes a proposal to amend these By-Laws, the language of the proposed amendment), the reasons for conducting such business at the annual meeting and any material interest of such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, in such business and (ii) a description of all agreements, arrangements, and understandings between such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, and their respective affiliates and associates, and any other person or persons (including their names) acting in concert therewith in connection with the proposal of such business by such stockholder; (c) set forth, as to each person, if any, whom the stockholder proposes to nominate for election or reelection to the Board of Directors (i) all information relating to such person that would be required to be disclosed in a proxy statement or other filings required to be made in connection with solicitations of proxies for election of directors in a contested election pursuant to Section 14 of the Exchange Act, (ii) such person's written consent to being named in the proxy statement as a nominee and to serving as a director if elected and a statement whether such person, if elected, intends to tender, promptly following such person's election or reelection, an irrevocable resignation effective upon such person's failure to receive the required vote for reelection at the next meeting at which such person would face reelection and upon acceptance of such resignation by the Board of Directors, and (iii) a description of all direct and indirect compensation and other material monetary agreements, arrangements and understandings during the past three (3) years, and any other material relationships, between or among such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, and their respective affiliates and associates, or any other person or persons (including their names) acting in concert therewith, on the one hand, and each proposed nominee, and his or her respective affiliates and associates, or any other person or persons (including their names) acting in concert therewith, on the other hand, including, without limitation, all information that would be required to be disclosed pursuant to Rule 404 promulgated under Regulation S-K if the stockholder making the nomination and any beneficial owner on whose behalf the nomination is made, if any, or any affiliate or associate thereof or person acting in concert therewith, were the "registrant" for purposes of such rule and the nominee were a director or executive officer of such registrant; and (d) with respect to each nominee for election or reelection to the Board of Directors, include the completed and signed questionnaire, representation and agreement required by Section 11.3. The Corporation may require any proposed nominee to furnish such other information as may reasonably be required by the Corporation to determine the eligibility of such proposed nominee to serve as an independent director of the Corporation or that could be material to a reasonable stockholder's understanding of the independence, or lack thereof, of such nominee.
 
3. Notwithstanding anything in the second sentence of Section 11.1.A(2) to the contrary, in the event that the number of directors to be elected to the Board of Directors of the Corporation is increased effective at the annual meeting and there is no public announcement by the Corporation naming all of the nominees for director or specifying the size of the increased Board of Directors at least one hundred (100) days prior to the first anniversary of the preceding year's annual meeting, a stockholder's notice required by this By-Law shall also be considered timely, but only with respect to nominees for any new positions created by such increase, if it shall be delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not later than the close of business on the tenth (10th) day following the day on which such public announcement is first made by the Corporation.
B.
Special Meetings of Stockholders.
Only such business shall be conducted at a special meeting of stockholders as shall have been brought before the special meeting pursuant to the Corporation's notice of meeting. Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors may be made at a special meeting at which directors are to be elected pursuant to the Corporation's notice of special meeting (a) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof or stockholders pursuant to Article 1, Section 2 hereof, or (b) provided that the Board of Directors or stockholders pursuant to Article 1, Section 2 hereof has determined that directors shall be elected at such special meeting, by any stockholder of the Corporation who (i) is a stockholder of record at the time the notice provided for in this By-Law is delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation and at the time of the special meeting, (ii) is entitled to vote at the special meeting, and (iii) complies with the notice procedures set forth in this By-Law as to such nomination. In the event the Corporation calls a special meeting for the purpose of electing one or more directors to the Board of Directors, any such stockholder may nominate a person or persons (as the case may be) for election to such position(s) as specified in the Corporation's notice of meeting, if the stockholder's notice required by Section 11.1.A(2) (including the completed and signed questionnaire, representation and agreement required by Section 11.3) shall be delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not earlier than the close of business on the one hundred and twentieth (120th) day prior to such special meeting and not later than the close of business on the later of the ninetieth (90th) day prior to such special meeting and the tenth (10th) day following the day on which public announcement is first made of the date of the special meeting and of the nominees proposed by the Board of Directors to be elected at such special meeting. In no event shall the postponement of a special meeting as to which notice has been sent to stockholders commence a new time period (or extend any time period) for the giving of a stockholder's notice as described above.
 
C.
General.
1. Only such persons who are nominated in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law shall be eligible to serve as directors and only such business shall be conducted at a meeting of stockholders as shall have been brought before the meeting in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law. Except as otherwise provided by law, the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, the chairman of the meeting shall have the power and duty (a) to determine whether a nomination or any other business proposed to be brought before the meeting was made or proposed, as the case may be, in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law (including whether the stockholder or beneficial owner, if any, on whose behalf the nomination or proposal is made solicited (or is part of a group which solicited) or did not so solicit, as the case may be, proxies in support of such stockholder's nominee or proposal in compliance with such stockholder's representation as required by Section 11.1.A(2)(a)(iv)) and (b) if any proposed nomination or business was not made or proposed in compliance with this By-Law, to declare that such nomination shall be disregarded or that such proposed business shall not be transacted. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this By-Law, unless otherwise required by law, if the stockholder (or a qualified representative of the stockholder) does not appear at the annual or special meeting of stockholders of the Corporation to present a nomination or proposed business, such nomination shall be disregarded and such proposed business shall not be transacted, notwithstanding that proxies in respect of such vote may have been received by the Corporation. For purposes of this By-Law, to be considered a qualified representative of the stockholder, a person must be a duly authorized officer, manager, or partner of such stockholder or must be authorized by a writing executed by such stockholder or an electronic transmission delivered by such stockholder to act for such stockholder as proxy at the annual or special meeting and such person must produce such writing or electronic transmission, or a reliable reproduction of the writing or electronic transmission, at the annual or special meeting.
1. For purposes of this By-Law, "public announcement" shall mean disclosure in a press release reported by the Dow Jones News Service, Associated Press, or comparable national news service or in a document publicly filed by the Corporation with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to Section 13, 14 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.
2. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this By-Law, a stockholder shall also comply with all applicable requirements of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder with respect to the matters set forth in this By-Law; provided, however, that any references in these By-Laws to the Exchange Act are not intended to and shall not limit the requirements applicable to any nominations or proposals as to any other business to be considered pursuant to this By-Law (including Section 11.1A(1)(c) or Section 11.1B). Nothing in this By-Law shall be deemed to affect any rights (a) of stockholders to request inclusion of proposals in the Corporation's proxy statement pursuant to Rule 14a-8 under the Exchange Act or (b) of the holders of any series of Preferred Stock if and to the extent provided for under law, the Certificate of Incorporation, or these By-Laws.
11.2
Required Vote for Directors.
A nominee for director shall be elected to the Board of Directors if the votes cast for such nominee's election exceed the votes cast against such nominee's election; provided, however, that the directors shall be elected by a plurality of the votes cast at any meeting of stockholders for which (i) the Secretary of the Corporation receives a notice that a stockholder has nominated a person for election to the Board of Directors in compliance with the advance notice requirements for stockholder nominees for director set forth in Section 11.1 of this By-law and (ii) such nomination has not been withdrawn by such stockholder on or prior to the tenth day preceding the date the Corporation first mails its notice of meeting for such meeting to stockholders. If directors are to be elected by a plurality of the votes cast, stockholders shall not be permitted to vote against a nominee. Votes cast shall exclude abstentions with respect to that director's election.
11.3
Director Qualification: Submission of Questionnaire, Representation, and Agreement.
To be eligible to be a nominee for election or reelection as a director of the Corporation, a person must deliver (in accordance with the time periods prescribed for delivery of notice under Section 11.1) to the Secretary of the Corporation at the principal executive offices of the Corporation a written questionnaire with respect to the background and qualification of such person and the background of any other person or entity on whose behalf the nomination is being made (which questionnaire shall be provided by the Secretary upon written request) and a written representation and agreement (in the form provided by the Secretary of the Corporation upon written request), that such person (a) is not and will not become a party to (i) any agreement, arrangement, or understanding with, and has not given any commitment or assurance to, any person or entity as to how such person, if elected as a director of the Corporation, will act or vote on any issue or question (a "Voting Commitment") that has not been disclosed to the Corporation or (ii) any Voting Commitment that could limit or interfere with such person's ability to comply, if elected as a director of the Corporation, with such person's fiduciary duties under applicable law; (b) is not and will not become a party to any agreement, arrangement, or understanding with any person or entity other than the Corporation with respect to any direct or indirect compensation, reimbursement, or indemnification in connection with service or action as a director that has not been disclosed therein; and (c) in such person's individual capacity and on behalf of any person or entity on whose behalf the nomination is being made, would be in compliance, if elected as a director of the Corporation, and will comply with all applicable publicly disclosed corporate governance, conflict of interest, confidentiality and stock ownership and trading policies and guidelines of the Corporation.
 
SECTION 12.
Notice to Corporation.
Any written notice required to be delivered by a stockholder to the Corporation pursuant to Section 11.1 of this Article I or Section 2.1 of Article II of these By-Laws must be given, either by personal delivery or by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, to the Secretary of the Corporation at the Corporation's executive offices in the City of Chicago, State of Illinois.
SECTION 1.
Number and Term of Office.
The number of directors shall be fourteen (14), but the number may be increased, or decreased to not less than three (3), from time to time, either by the directors by adoption of a resolution to such effect or by the stockholders by amendment of these By-Laws in accordance with Article VIII. At each annual meeting of stockholders, each director shall be elected to hold office until the next annual meeting or until his or her successor shall be elected and qualified or until his or her earlier resignation or removal.
SECTION 2.
Nomination and Election.
2.1 Only persons who are nominated in accordance with Article I, Section 11 of these By-Laws shall be eligible for election as directors.
Nomination.
2.2 At each election of directors by stockholders, the persons who are elected in accordance with Article I, Section 11 of these By-Laws shall be the directors.
Election.
SECTION 3.
Place of Meeting.
Meetings of the Board of Directors, or of any committee thereof, may be held either within or without the State of Delaware.
SECTION 4.
Annual Meeting.
Each year the Board of Directors shall meet in connection with the annual meeting of stockholders for the purpose of electing officers and for the transaction of other business. No notice of such annual meeting is required. Such annual meeting may be held at any other time or place which shall be specified in a notice given as hereinafter provided for special meetings of the Board of Directors, or in a consent and waiver of notice thereof, signed by all the directors.
 
SECTION 5.
Stated Meetings.
The Board of Directors may, by resolution adopted by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors, from time to time appoint the time and place for holding stated meetings of the Board of Directors, if by it deemed advisable; and such stated meetings shall thereupon be held at the time and place so appointed, without the giving of any special notice with regard thereto. In case the day appointed for a stated meeting shall fall upon a legal holiday, such meeting shall be held on the next following day, not a legal holiday, at the regularly appointed hour. Except as otherwise provided in these By-Laws, any and all business may be transacted at any stated meeting.
SECTION 6.
Special Meetings.
6.1
Convenors and Notice.
Special meetings of the Board of Directors may be called by or at the request of the Chairman of the Board of Directors or any two (2) directors. Notice of a special meeting of the Board of Directors, stating the place, day, and hour of the meeting, shall be given to each director in writing (by mail, wire, facsimile, or personal delivery) or orally (by telephone or in person).
6.2
Waiver of Notice.
With respect to a special meeting of the Board of Directors, a written waiver, signed by a director, or waiver by electronic transmission, shall be deemed equivalent to notice to that director. A director's attendance at a meeting shall constitute that director's waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the director attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting was not lawfully called or convened. Neither the business to be transacted at, nor the purpose of, any regular or special meeting of the Board of Directors need be specified in the waiver of notice of such meeting.
SECTION 7.
Quorum and Manner of Acting.
Except as herein otherwise provided, forty percent (40%) of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided in these By-Laws at the time of any stated or special meeting of the Board of Directors or, if vacancies exist on the Board of Directors, forty percent (40%) of such number of directors then in office; provided, however, that such number may not be less than one-third of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided in these By-Laws, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and, except as otherwise required by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by these By-Laws, the act of a majority of the directors present at any such meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of the Board of Directors. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the directors present may adjourn any meeting, from time to time, until a quorum is present. No notice of any adjourned meeting need be given.
SECTION 8.
Chairman of the Board.
The Chairman of the Board shall preside, when present, at all meetings of the Board of Directors, except as otherwise provided by law.
SECTION 9.
Resignations.
Any director of the Corporation may resign at any time by giving written notice or notice by electronic transmission thereof to the Secretary of the Corporation. Such resignation shall take effect at the time specified therefor or if the time is not specified, upon delivery thereof; and, unless otherwise specified with respect thereto, the acceptance of such resignation shall not be necessary to make it effective.
SECTION 10.
Removal of Directors.
Any directors may be removed with or without cause by the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, at a meeting of stockholders called for that purpose; and the vacancy on the Board of Directors caused by any such removal may be filled by the stockholders at such meeting or at any subsequent meeting.
 
SECTION 11.
Filling of Vacancies Not Caused by Removal.
In case of any increase in the number of directors, or of any vacancy created by death or resignation, the additional director or directors may be elected or, as the case may be, the vacancy or vacancies may be filled, either (a) by the Board of Directors at any meeting, (i) if the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, or (ii) if the Corporation does not have an Interested Stockholder, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the remaining directors, though less than a quorum or (b) by the stockholders entitled to vote, either at an annual meeting or at a special meeting thereof called for that purpose, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the outstanding shares entitled to vote at such meeting.
SECTION 12.
Directors' Fees.
The Board of Directors shall have authority to determine from time to time the amount of compensation that shall be paid to its members for attendance at meetings of the Board of Directors or of any committee of the Board of Directors.
SECTION 13.
Action Without a Meeting.
Any action required or permitted to be taken at any meeting of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof may be taken without a meeting if all members of the Board of Directors or committee, as the case may be, consent thereto in writing, and the writing or writings are filed with the minutes of proceedings of the Board of Directors or committee.
SECTION 1.
Audit Committee.
In addition to any committees appointed pursuant to Section 2 of this Article, there shall be an Audit Committee, appointed annually by the Board of Directors, consisting of at least three (3) directors who are not members of management. It shall be the responsibility of the Audit Committee to review the scope and results of the annual independent audit of books and records of the Corporation and its subsidiaries and to discharge such other responsibilities as may from time to time be assigned to it by the Board of Directors. The Audit Committee shall meet at such times and places as the members deem advisable, and shall make such recommendations to the Board of Directors as they consider appropriate.
SECTION 2.
Other Committees.
2.1 The Board of Directors may appoint standing or temporary committees and invest such committees with such powers as it may see fit, with power to subdelegate such powers if deemed desirable by the Board of Directors; but no such committee shall have the power or authority of the Board of Directors to adopt, amend, or repeal these By-Laws or approve, adopt, or recommend to the stockholders of the Corporation any action or matter expressly required by the Certificate of Incorporation, these By-Laws or the Delaware General Corporation Law to be submitted to stockholders for approval.
Committee Powers.
2.2 The Board of Directors may designate one or more directors as alternate members of any committee, who may replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of the committee. In the absence or disqualification of a member of a committee, the member or members thereof present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, whether or not such member or members constitute a quorum, may unanimously appoint another member of the Board of Directors to act at the meeting in the place of any such absent or disqualified member.
Committee Members.
 
SECTION 3.
Quorum and Manner of Acting.
A majority of the number of directors composing any committee of the Board of Directors, as established and fixed by resolution of the Board of Directors, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at any meeting of such committee but, if less than a majority are present at a meeting, a majority of such directors present may adjourn the meeting from time to time without further notice. The act of a majority of the members of a committee present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of such committee.
SECTION 1.
Officers.
The elected officers of the Corporation shall be a Chairman of the Board of Directors (who shall be a director) and, at the discretion of the Board of Directors, a President (who shall be a director), and one or more Vice Presidents (each of whom may be assigned by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer an additional title descriptive of the functions assigned to such officer and one or more of whom may be designated Executive or Senior Vice President). The Board of Directors may also elect one or more Vice Chairmen. The Board of Directors shall also designate either the Chairman of the Board of Directors or the President as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation. The Board of Directors shall appoint a Controller, a Secretary, and a Treasurer. Any number of offices, whether elective or appointive, may be held by the same person. The Chief Executive Officer may, by a writing filed with the Secretary, designate titles as officers for employees and agents and appoint Assistant Secretaries and Assistant Treasurers as, from time to time, may appear to be necessary or advisable in the conduct of the affairs of the Corporation and may, in the same manner, terminate or change such titles.
SECTION 2.
Term of Office.
So far as practicable, all elected officers shall be elected at the annual meeting of the Board of Directors in each year, and shall hold office until the annual meeting of the Board of Directors in the next subsequent year and until their respective successors are chosen. The Controller, Secretary, and Treasurer shall hold office at the pleasure of the Board of Directors.
SECTION 3.
Salaries of Elected Officers.
The salaries paid to the elected officers of the Corporation shall be authorized or approved by the Board of Directors.
SECTION 4.
Bonuses.
None of the officers, directors, or employees of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations shall at any time be paid any bonus or share in the earnings or profits of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations except pursuant to a plan approved by affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members of the Board of Directors.
SECTION 5.
Removal of Elected and Appointed Officers.
Any elected or appointed officer may be removed at any time, either for or without cause, by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors, at any meeting called for the purpose.
SECTION 6.
Vacancies.
If any vacancy occurs in any office, the Board of Directors may elect or appoint a successor to fill such vacancy for the remainder of the term.
 
SECTION 1.
Chairman of the Board.
The Chairman of the Board of Directors shall preside, when present, at all meetings of the stockholders (except as otherwise provided by statute) and at all meetings of the Board of Directors. The Chairman shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation; to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the Chairman by the Board of Directors.
SECTION 2.
President.
The President shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation and to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; during the absence or disability of the Chairman of the Board of Directors, to exercise the Chairman's powers and to perform the Chairman's duties; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the President by the Board of Directors; provided, that if the office of President is vacant, the Chairman shall exercise the duties ordinarily exercised by the President until such time as a President is elected or appointed.
SECTION 3.
Chief Executive Officer.
The officer designated by the Board of Directors as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation shall have general and active control of its business and affairs. The Chief Executive Officer shall have general power to appoint or designate all employees and agents of the Corporation whose appointment or designation is not otherwise provided for and to fix the compensation thereof, subject to the provisions of these By-Laws; to remove or suspend any employee or agent who shall not have been elected or appointed by the Board of Directors or other body; to suspend for cause any employee, agent, or officer, other than an elected officer, pending final action by the body which shall have appointed such employee, agent, or officer; and to exercise all the powers usually pertaining to the office held by the Chief Executive Officer of a corporation.
SECTION 4.
Vice Presidents and Controller.
The several Vice Presidents and the Controller shall perform all such duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of them, from time to time, by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer, respectively.
SECTION 5.
Secretary.
The Secretary shall attend to the giving of notice of all meetings of stockholders and of the Board of Directors and shall keep and attest true records of all such proceedings. The Secretary shall have charge of the corporate seal and have authority to attest any and all instruments or writings to which the same may be affixed and shall keep and account for all books, documents, papers, and records of the Corporation relating to its corporate organization. The Secretary shall have authority to sign stock certificates and shall generally perform all the duties usually appertaining to the office of secretary of a corporation. In the absence of the Secretary, an Assistant Secretary or Secretary pro tempore shall perform the duties of the Secretary.
SECTION 6.
Treasurer.
The Treasurer shall have the care and custody of all moneys, funds, and securities of the Corporation, and shall deposit or cause to be deposited all funds of the Corporation in accordance with directions or authorizations of the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer. The Treasurer shall have power to sign stock certificates, to indorse for deposit or collection, or otherwise, all checks, drafts, notes, bills of exchange, or other commercial paper payable to the Corporation, and to give proper receipts or discharges therefor. In the absence of the Treasurer, an Assistant Treasurer shall perform the duties of the Treasurer.
 
SECTION 7.
Additional Powers and Duties.
In addition to the foregoing especially enumerated duties and powers, the several officers of the Corporation shall perform such other duties and exercise such further powers as may be provided in these By-Laws or as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine, or as may be assigned to them by any superior officer.
SECTION 8.
Disaster Emergency Powers of Acting Officers.
If, as a result of a disaster or other state of emergency, the Chief Executive Officer is unable to perform the duties of that office, (a) the powers and duties of the Chief Executive Officer shall be performed by the employee with the highest base salary who shall be available and capable of performing such powers and duties and, if more than one such employee has the same base salary, by the employee whose surname begins with the earliest letter of the alphabet among the group of those employees with the same base salary; (b) the officer performing such duties shall continue to perform such powers and duties until the Chief Executive Officer becomes capable of performing those duties or until the Board of Directors shall have elected a new Chief Executive Officer or designated another individual as Acting Chief Executive Officer; (c) such officer shall have the power in addition to all other powers granted to the Chief Executive Officer by these By-Laws and by the Board of Directors to appoint an acting President, acting Vice PresidentFinance, acting Controller, acting Secretary, and acting Treasurer, if any of the persons duly elected to any such office is not, by reason of such disaster or emergency, able to perform the duties of such office, each of such acting appointees to serve in such capacities until the officer for whom the appointee is acting becomes capable of performing the duties of such office or until the Board of Directors shall have designated another individual to perform such duties or have elected another person to fill such office; (d) any such acting officer so appointed shall be entitled to exercise all powers vested by these By-Laws or the Board of Directors in the duly elected officer for whom the acting officer is acting; and (e) anyone transacting business with the Corporation may rely upon a certification by any two (2) officers of the Corporation that a specified individual has succeeded to the powers of the Chief Executive Officer and that such person has appointed other acting officers as herein provided and any person, firm, corporation, or other entity to which such certification has been delivered by such officers may continue to rely upon it until notified of a change in writing signed by two (2) officers of the Corporation.
SECTION 1.
Stock Certificates.
The shares of the stock of the Corporation shall be represented by certificates, provided that the Board of Directors may provide by resolution or resolutions that some or all of any or all classes or series of stock shall be uncertificated shares. Any such resolution shall not apply to shares represented by certificate until such certificate is surrendered to the Corporation. Every holder of stock of the Corporation represented by a certificate shall be entitled to a certificate, signed by the Chairman of the Board of Directors or the President or a Vice President and the Treasurer or an Assistant Treasurer or the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary, certifying the number of shares owned by the stockholder in the Corporation. Any and all of the signatures on a certificate may be a facsimile. If any officer, transfer agent, or registrar who has signed or whose facsimile signature has been placed upon a certificate shall have ceased to be such officer, transfer agent, or registrar before such certificate is issued, it may be issued by the Corporation with the same effect as if he or she were such officer, transfer agent, or registrar at the date of issue.
SECTION 2.
Transfer Agents and Registrars.
The Board of Directors may, in its discretion, appoint responsible banks or trust companies in the Borough of Manhattan, in the City of New York, State of New York, and in such other city or cities as the Board of Directors may deem advisable, from time to time, to act as transfer agents and registrars of the stock of the Corporation; and, when such appointments shall have been made, no stock certificate shall be valid until countersigned by one of such transfer agents and registered by one of such registrars.
 
SECTION 3.
Transfers of Stock.
Shares of stock may be transferred by delivery of the certificates therefor, accompanied either by an assignment in writing on the back of the certificates or by written power of attorney to sell, assign, and transfer the same, signed by the record holder thereof (or, with respect to uncertificated shares, by delivery of duly executed instructions or in any other manner permitted by law), but no transfer shall affect the right of the Corporation to pay any dividend upon the stock to the holder of record thereof, or to treat the holder of record as the holder in fact thereof for all purposes, and no transfer shall be valid, except between the parties thereto, until such transfer shall have been made upon the books of the Corporation.
SECTION 4.
Lost Certificates.
The Board of Directors may provide for the issuance of new certificates of stock or uncertificated shares to replace certificates of stock lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, or alleged to be lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, upon such terms and in accordance with such procedures as the Board of Directors shall deem proper and prescribe.
SECTION 1.
Fiscal Year.
The fiscal year of the Corporation shall be the calendar year.
SECTION 2. (Repealed in its entirety by vote of the stockholders, May 5, 1975.)
SECTION 3.
Signing of Negotiable Instruments.
All bills, notes, checks, or other instruments for the payment of money shall be signed or countersigned by such officer or officers and in such manner as from time to time may be prescribed by resolution (whether general or special) of the Board of Directors.
SECTION 4.
Indemnification of Directors and Officers.
4.1
Right to Indemnification.
Each person who was or is made a party to or is threatened to be made a party to or is otherwise involved (including, without limitation, as a witness) in any actual or threatened action, suit, or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative, or investigative (hereinafter a "proceeding"), by reason of the fact that he or she is or was a director or officer of the Corporation or that, being or having been such a director or officer or an employee of the Corporation, he or she is or was serving at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation as a director, officer, employee, or agent of another corporation or of a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise, including service with respect to an employee benefit plan (hereinafter an "indemnitee"), whether the basis of such proceeding is alleged action in an official capacity as such a director, officer, employee, or agent or in any other capacity while serving as such a director, officer, employee, or agent, shall be indemnified and held harmless by the Corporation to the full extent permitted by the Delaware General Corporation Law, as the same exists or may hereafter be amended (but, in the case of any such amendment, only to the extent that such amendment permits the Corporation to provide broader indemnification rights than permitted prior thereto), or by other applicable law as then in effect, against all expense, liability, and loss (including attorneys' fees, judgments, fines, ERISA excise taxes or penalties, and amounts paid in settlement) actually and reasonably incurred or suffered by such indemnitee in connection therewith, and such indemnification shall continue as to an indemnitee who has ceased to be a director, officer, employee, or agent and shall inure to the benefit of the indemnitee's heirs, executors, and administrators; provided, however, that except as provided in Section 4.2 with respect to proceedings seeking to enforce rights to indemnification, the Corporation shall indemnify any such indemnitee in connection with a proceeding (or part thereof) initiated by such indemnitee only if such proceeding (or part thereof) was authorized or ratified by the Board of Directors. The right to indemnification conferred in this Section 4.1 shall be a contract right and shall include the right to be paid by the Corporation the expenses incurred in defending any such proceeding in advance of its final disposition (hereinafter an "advancement of expenses"); provided, however, that an advancement of expenses incurred by an indemnitee in his or her capacity as a director or officer or former director or officer (and not in any other capacity in which service was or is rendered by such indemnitee, including, without limitation, service to an employee benefit plan) shall be made only upon delivery to the Corporation of an undertaking (hereinafter an "undertaking"), by or on behalf of such indemnitee, to repay all amounts so advanced if it shall ultimately be determined by final judicial decision from which there is no further right to appeal that such indemnitee is not entitled to be indemnified for such expenses under this Section 4.1 or otherwise; and provided, further, that an advancement of expenses shall not be made if the Board of Directors makes a good faith determination that such payment would violate law or public policy.
 
4.2
Right of Indemnitee to Bring Suit.
If a claim under Section 4.1 is not paid in full by the Corporation within sixty (60) days after a written claim has been received by the Corporation, except in the case of a claim for an advancement of expenses, in which case the applicable period shall be twenty (20) days, the indemnitee may at any time thereafter bring suit against the Corporation to recover the unpaid amount of the claim. If successful in whole or in part in any such suit, or in a suit brought by the Corporation to recover an advancement of expenses pursuant to the terms of an undertaking, the indemnitee shall also be entitled to be paid the expenses of prosecuting or defending such suit. The indemnitee shall be presumed to be entitled to indemnification under this Section 4 upon submission of a written claim (and, in an action brought to enforce a claim for an advancement of expenses, where the required undertaking has been tendered to the Corporation), and thereafter the Corporation shall have the burden of proof to overcome the presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled. Neither the failure of the Corporation (including the Board of Directors, independent legal counsel, or the stockholders) to have made a determination prior to the commencement of such suit that indemnification of the indemnitee is proper in the circumstances, nor an actual determination by the Corporation (including the Board of Directors, independent legal counsel, or the stockholders) that the indemnitee is not entitled to indemnification shall be a defense to the suit or create a presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled.
4.3
Nonexclusivity of Rights.
The rights to indemnification and to the advancement of expenses conferred in this Section 4 shall not be exclusive of any other right that any person may have or hereafter acquire under any statute, provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation, these By-Laws, any agreement, vote of stockholders or disinterested directors, or otherwise. Neither any amendment to or repeal of this Section 4 or of any of the procedures established by the Board of Directors pursuant to Section 4.7, nor the adoption of any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, nor, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any modification of law, shall eliminate or reduce the effect of the right or protection of any indemnitee to indemnification and to the advancement of expenses in accordance with the provisions hereof and thereof with respect to any proceeding (regardless of when such proceeding is first threatened, commenced or completed) arising out of, or related to, any acts or omissions of such indemnitee occurring prior to such amendment or repeal.
4.4
Insurance, Contracts, and Funding.
The Corporation may maintain insurance, at its expense, to protect itself and any director, officer, employee, or agent of the Corporation or another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise against any expense, liability, or loss, whether or not the Corporation would have the power to indemnify such person against such expense, liability, or loss under the Delaware General Corporation Law. The Corporation may, without further stockholder approval, enter into contracts with any indemnitee in furtherance of the provisions of this Section 4 and may create a trust fund, grant a security interest, or use other means (including, without limitation, a letter of credit) to ensure the payment of such amounts as may be necessary to effect indemnification as provided in this Section 4.
4.5
Persons Serving Other Entities.
Any person who is or was a director, officer, or employee of the Corporation who is or was serving (i) as a director or officer of another corporation of which a majority of the shares entitled to vote in the election of its directors is held by the Corporation or (ii) in an executive or management capacity in a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise of which the Corporation or a wholly owned subsidiary of the Corporation is a general partner or has a majority ownership shall be deemed to be so serving at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation and entitled to indemnification and advancement of expenses under Section 4.1.
 
4.6
Indemnification of Employees and Agents of the Corporation.
The Corporation may, by action of the Board of Directors, authorize one or more executive officers to grant rights to advancement of expenses to employees or agents of the Corporation on such terms and conditions as such officer or officers deem appropriate under the circumstances. The Corporation may, by action of the Board of Directors, grant rights to indemnification and advancement of expenses to employees or agents or groups of employees or agents of the Corporation with the same scope and effect as the provisions of this Section 4 with respect to the indemnification and advancement of expenses of directors and officers of the Corporation; provided, however, that an undertaking shall be made by an employee or agent only if required by the Board of Directors.
4.7
Procedures for the Submission of Claims.
The Board of Directors may establish reasonable procedures for the submission of claims for indemnification pursuant to this Section 4, determination of the entitlement of any person thereto, and review of any such determination. Such procedures shall be set forth in an appendix to these By-Laws and shall be deemed for all purposes to be a part hereof.
SECTION 1.
Amendment of the By-Laws: General.
Except as herein otherwise expressly provided, the By-Laws of the Corporation may be altered or repealed in any particular and new By-Laws, not inconsistent with any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or any provision of law, may be adopted, either by
A. the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority in number of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote at an annual meeting of stockholders or at a special meeting thereof, the notice of which special meeting shall include the form of the proposed alteration or repeal or of the proposed new By-Laws, or a summary thereof; or
B. either by
i. the affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors at any meeting thereof, or
ii. the affirmative vote of all the directors present at any meeting at which a quorum, less than a majority, is present;
provided, in either of the latter cases, that the notice of such meeting shall include the form of the proposed alteration or repeal or of the proposed new By-Laws, or a summary thereof; and provided, further, that Article I, Section 11.2 of these By-Laws may be amended only as set forth in Section 1.A of this By-Law, except that any amendment required by law or necessary or desirable to cure an administrative or technical deficiency may be made as provided in Section 1.B of this By-Law.
SECTION 2.
Amendments as to Compensation and Removal of Officers.
Notwithstanding anything contained in these By-Laws to the contrary, the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the Voting Stock, as defined in Article FOURTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, at a meeting of stockholders called for the purpose, shall be required to alter, amend, repeal, or adopt any provision inconsistent with Sections 3, 4 and 5 of Article IV of these By-Laws, notice of which meeting shall include the form of the proposed amendment, or a summary thereof.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Boeing Board Elects Aetna Chairman Williams as New Director
, Dec. 2, 2010  Boeing Chairman, President & CEO Jim McNerney announced today that the Boeing board of directors has elected Ronald A. Williams as a new director, effective immediately.
CHICAGO
Williams, 61, is the chairman of Aetna, a diversified health care benefits company. He stepped down as CEO of Aetna last month.
"Ron brings to our board a valuable set of skills and experiences," said McNerney. "He understands the issues faced by large organizations in dynamic markets and has positioned Aetna as a leader in part by bringing innovative approaches to some of the challenges his company and the entire healthcare industry face," he added.
Williams joined Aetna as Executive Vice President and Chief of Health Operations in 2001 and served as president from 2002 until 2007. He was named CEO in February 2006 and chairman in October 2006.
He is a graduate of Roosevelt University in Chicago and holds an M.S. in Management from the Sloan School of Management at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology.
He will serve on the board's Audit and Finance committees.
Contact: John Dern, Communications, 312-544-2002


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20110111161136.txt.gz
TIME:20110111161136
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On January 10, 2011, the Board of Directors (the "Board") of The Boeing Company (the "Company") accepted William M. Daley's offer to resign from the Board effective as of January 7, 2011. In accordance with the Company's Corporate Governance Principles, on January 7, 2011 Mr. Daley offered to resign from the Board due to a change of employment after being selected by U.S. President Obama to serve as White House Chief of Staff. A copy of the Company's press release announcing Mr. Daley's resignation is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
On January 10, 2011, the Board approved and adopted an amendment to Article II, Section 1 of the Company's By-Laws (the "By-Laws") to decrease the number of directors from fourteen to thirteen in connection with the Board's acceptance of Mr. Daley's offer to resign from the Board, as set forth in Item 5.02 above. A copy of the amended and restated By-Laws is attached hereto as Exhibit 3.2 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 3.2
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
SECTION 1. 
.
Annual Meetings
The Annual Meeting of the stockholders shall be held on such date and at such time as the Board of Directors shall determine, for the election of directors and the transaction of such other business as may come before the meeting.
SECTION 2.
Special Meetings.
A special meeting of stockholders may be called at any time by the Board of Directors, or by stockholders holding together at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, except as otherwise provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto.
SECTION 3.
Place of Meeting.
All meetings of the stockholders of the Corporation shall be held at such place or places, if any, within or without the State of Delaware as may from time to time be fixed by the Board of Directors or as shall be specified or fixed in the respective notices or waivers of notice thereof.
SECTION 4.
Notice of Meetings.
Except as otherwise required by statute and as set forth below, notice of each annual or special meeting of stockholders shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date. If the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, notice of each special meeting of stockholders shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than fifty-five (55) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date, unless the calling of such meeting is ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, in which case notice of such special meeting shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date. Such notice shall be given by delivering to each stockholder a written or printed notice thereof either personally or by mailing such notice in a postage-prepaid envelope addressed to the stockholder's address as it appears on the stock books of the Corporation or by transmitting the notice to the stockholder in any other manner permitted by Delaware law. Except as otherwise required by statute, no publication of any notice of a meeting of stockholders shall be required. Every notice of a meeting of stockholders shall state the place, if any (or the means of remote communication, if any, by which stockholders and proxy holders may be deemed to be present in person), date, and hour of the meeting and, in the case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called. Notices are deemed given (i) if by mail, when deposited in the United States mail, postage prepaid, directed to the stockholder at such stockholder's address as it appears on the records of the Corporation, or, if a stockholder shall have filed with the Secretary a written request that notices to such stockholder be mailed to some other address, then directed to such stockholder at such other address; (ii) if by facsimile, when directed to a number at which the stockholder has consented to receive notice; (iii) if by electronic mail, when directed to an electronic mail address at which the stockholder has consented to receive such notice; (iv) if by posting on an electronic network together with a separate notice to the stockholder of such specific posting, upon the later to occur of (A) such posting and (B) the giving of such separate notice of such posting; and (v) if by any other form of electronic transmission, when directed to the stockholder as required by law and, to the extent required by applicable law, in the manner consented to by the stockholder. An affidavit of the mailing or other means of giving any notice of any stockholders' meeting, executed by the Secretary, Assistant Corporate Secretary or any transfer agent of the Corporation giving the notice, shall be
 
prima facie evidence of the giving of such notice. Notice shall be deemed to have been given to all stockholders of record who share an address if notice is given in accordance with the "householding" rules set forth in Rule 14a-3(e) under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") and Section 233 of the Delaware General Corporation Law.
SECTION 5.
Waivers of Notice.
Whenever any notice is required to be given to any stockholder under the provisions of these By-Laws, the Certificate of Incorporation, or the Delaware General Corporation Law, a waiver thereof in writing, signed by the person or persons entitled to such notice, whether before or after the time stated therein, shall be deemed equivalent to the giving of such notice. The attendance of a stockholder at a meeting, in person or by proxy, or waiver by electronic transmission, shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when a stockholder attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened.
SECTION 6.
Quorum.
At all meetings of stockholders, except when otherwise provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by these By-Laws, the presence, in person or by proxy duly authorized, of the holders of one-third of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and except as otherwise provided by statute or rule of law, or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by these By-Laws, the vote, in person or by proxy, of the holders of a majority of the shares constituting such quorum shall be binding upon all stockholders of the Corporation. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote may adjourn any meeting, from time to time but not for a period of more than thirty (30) days at any one time, until a quorum shall attend. At any such adjourned meeting at which a quorum shall be present, any business may be transacted which might have been transacted at the meeting as originally called. Unless otherwise provided by statute, no notice of an adjourned meeting need be given.
SECTION 7.
Proxies.
7.1
Appointment.
Each stockholder entitled to vote at a meeting of stockholders or to express consent or dissent to corporate action in writing without a meeting may authorize another person or persons to act for such stockholder by proxy. Such authorization may be accomplished (a) by the stockholder or such stockholder's authorized officer, director, employee, or agent executing a writing or causing his or her signature to be affixed to such writing by any reasonable means, including facsimile signature, or (b) by transmitting or authorizing the transmission of a telegram, cablegram, or other means of electronic transmission to the intended holder of the proxy or to a proxy solicitation firm, proxy support service, or similar agent duly authorized by the intended proxy holder to receive such transmission; provided, that any such telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission must either set forth or be accompanied by information from which it can be determined that the telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission was authorized by the stockholder. Any copy, facsimile telecommunication, or other reliable reproduction of the writing or transmission by which a stockholder has authorized another person to act as proxy for such stockholder may be substituted or used in lieu of the original writing or transmission for any and all purposes for which the original writing or transmission could be used, provided that such copy, facsimile telecommunication, or other reproduction shall be a complete reproduction of the entire original writing or transmission.
7.2
Delivery to Corporation; Duration.
A proxy shall be filed with the Secretary of the Corporation before or at the time of the meeting or the delivery to the Corporation of the consent to corporate action in writing. A proxy shall become invalid three (3) years after the date of its execution, unless otherwise provided in the proxy. A proxy with respect to a specified meeting shall entitle the holder thereof to vote at any reconvened meeting following adjournment of such meeting but shall not be valid after the final adjournment thereof.
 
SECTION 8.
Inspectors of Election.
8.1
Appointment.
In advance of any meeting of stockholders, the Board of Directors of the Corporation shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspectors of election at such meeting and to make a written report thereof. The Board of Directors may designate one or more persons to serve as alternate inspectors to serve in place of any inspector who is unable or fails to act. If no inspector or alternate is able to act at a meeting of stockholders, the chairman of such meeting shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspector at such meeting.
8.2
Duties.
The inspectors of election shall (a) ascertain the number of shares of the Corporation outstanding and the voting power of each such share; (b) determine the shares represented at the meeting and the validity of proxies and ballots; (c) count all votes and ballots; (d) determine and retain for a reasonable period of time a record of the disposition of any challenges made to any determination by them; and (e) certify their determination of the number of shares represented at the meeting and their count of the votes and ballots. Each inspector shall, before entering upon the discharge of his or her duties, take and sign an oath to faithfully execute the duties of inspector with strict impartiality and according to the best of his or her ability. The inspectors may appoint or retain other persons or entities to assist them in the performance of their duties.
8.3
Determination of Proxy Validity.
The validity of any proxy or ballot executed for a meeting of stockholders shall be determined by the inspectors of election in accordance with the applicable provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law as then in effect. In determining the validity of any proxy transmitted by telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission, the inspectors shall record in writing the information upon which they relied in making such determination.
SECTION 9.
Fixing the Record Date.
9.1
Meetings.
For the purpose of determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at any meeting of stockholders or any adjournment thereof, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which record date shall be not fewer than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the date of such meeting. If the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, the record date for each special meeting of stockholders shall be not fewer than fifty-five (55) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date, unless the calling of such meeting is ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation. If no record date is fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall be at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which notice is given, or, if notice is waived, at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which the meeting is held. A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting; provided, however, that the Board of Directors may fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
9.2
Consent to Corporate Action Without a Meeting.
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which date shall not be more than ten (10) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days after the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, when no prior action by the Board of Directors is required by Chapter 1 of the Delaware General Corporation Law as now or hereafter amended, shall be the first date on which a signed written consent setting forth the action taken or proposed to be
 
taken is delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the records of proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Delivery made to the Corporation's registered office shall be by hand or by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors and prior action by the Board of Directors is required by Chapter 1 of the Delaware General Corporation Law as now or hereafter amended, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution taking such prior action.
9.3
Dividends, Distributions, and Other Rights.
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to receive payment of any dividend or other distribution or allotment of any rights or the stockholders entitled to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion, or exchange of stock, or for the purpose of any other lawful action, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted, and which record date shall be not more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days prior to such action. If no record date is fixed, the record date for determining stockholders for any such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution relating thereto.
9.4
Voting List.
At least ten (10) days before each meeting of stockholders, a complete list of the stockholders entitled to vote at such meeting shall be made, arranged in alphabetical order, and showing the address of each stockholder and the number of shares registered in the name of each stockholder. This list shall be open to examination by any stockholder, for any purpose germane to the meeting, for a period of ten (10) days prior to the meeting, either (i) on a reasonably accessible electronic network, provided that the information required to gain access to such list is provided with the notice of meeting, or (ii) during ordinary business hours at the principal place of business of the Corporation. The list shall also be produced and kept at such meeting for inspection by any stockholder who is present.
SECTION 10.
Action by Stockholders Without a Meeting.
Subject to the provisions of Article NINTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, any action which could be taken at any annual or special meeting of stockholders may be taken without a meeting, without prior notice, and without a vote, if a consent or consents in writing, setting forth the action so taken, are (a) signed by the holders of outstanding stock having not fewer than the minimum number of votes that would be necessary to authorize or take such action at a meeting at which all shares entitled to vote thereon were present and voted and (b) delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the records of proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Delivery made to the Corporation's registered office shall be by hand or by certified mail or registered mail, return receipt requested. Every written consent shall bear the date of signature of each stockholder who signs the consent, and no written consent shall be effective to take the corporate action referred to therein unless written consents signed by a sufficient number of stockholders to take such action are delivered to the Corporation, in the manner required by this Section, within sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days of the date of the earliest dated consent delivered to the Corporation in the manner required by this Section 10. The validity of any consent executed by a proxy for a stockholder pursuant to a telegram, cablegram, or other means of electronic transmission transmitted to such proxy holder by or upon the authorization of the stockholder shall be determined by or at the direction of the Secretary of the Corporation. A written record of the information upon which the person making such determination relied shall be made and kept in the records of the proceedings of the stockholders. Any such consent shall be inserted in the minute book as if it were the minutes of a meeting of stockholders. Prompt notice of the taking of the corporate action without a meeting by less than unanimous written consent shall be given to those stockholders who have not consented in writing.
SECTION 11.
Notice of Nominations and Other Stockholder Business; Required Vote for Directors; Director Qualification.
11.1
Notice of Nominations and Other Stockholder Business.
A.
Annual Meetings of Stockholders.
 
1. Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors and the proposal of other business to be considered by the stockholders may be made at an annual meeting of stockholders (a) as specified in the Corporation's notice of meeting (or any supplement thereto); (b) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof; or (c) by any stockholder of the Corporation who (i) was a stockholder of record at the time the notice provided for in this By-Law is delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation, (ii) is entitled to vote at the meeting, and (iii) complies with the notice procedures set forth in this By-Law as to such nomination or other business; clause (c) shall be the exclusive means for a stockholder to make nominations or submit proposals for other business (other than matters properly brought under Rule 14a-8 under the Exchange Act and included in the Corporation's notice of meeting) before an annual meeting of stockholders.
2. Without qualification, for any nominations or any other business to be properly brought before an annual meeting by a stockholder pursuant to Section 11.1.A(1)(c), the stockholder must have given timely notice thereof in writing to the Secretary of the Corporation and any such proposed business (other than the nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors) must constitute a proper matter for stockholder action. To be timely, a stockholder's notice shall be delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not earlier than the close of business on the one hundred and twentieth (120th) day and not later than the close of business on the ninetieth (90th) day prior to the first anniversary of the preceding year's annual meeting; provided, however, that in the event that the date of the annual meeting is more than thirty (30) days before or more than seventy (70) days after such anniversary date, notice by the stockholder to be timely must be so delivered not later than the close of business on the later of the ninetieth (90th) day prior to such annual meeting and the tenth (10th) day following the day on which public announcement of the date of such annual meeting is first made by the Corporation. In no event shall the postponement of a meeting as to which notice has been sent to stockholders commence a new time period (or extend any time period) for the giving of a stockholder's notice as described above. To be in proper form, such stockholder's notice (whether given pursuant to this Section 11.1.A(2) or Section 11.1.B) to the Secretary of the Corporation must: (a) set forth, as to the stockholder giving the notice and the beneficial owner, if any, on whose behalf the nomination or proposal for other business is made (i) the name and address of such stockholder, as they appear on the Corporation's books, and of such beneficial owner, if any, (ii) (A) the class or series and number of shares of the Corporation which are, directly or indirectly, owned beneficially and of record by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, (B) any option, warrant, convertible security, stock appreciation right, or similar right with an exercise or conversion privilege or a settlement payment or mechanism at a price related to any class or series of shares of the Corporation or with a value derived in whole or in part from the value of any class or series of shares of the Corporation, whether or not such instrument or right shall be subject to settlement in the underlying class or series of shares of the Corporation or otherwise (a "Derivative Instrument") directly or indirectly owned beneficially by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, and any other direct or indirect opportunity to profit or share in any profit derived from any increase or decrease in the value of shares of the Corporation, (C) any proxy, contract, arrangement, understanding, or relationship pursuant to which such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, has a right to vote any shares of any security of the Corporation, (D) any short interest in any security of the Corporation (for purposes of this By-Law a person shall be deemed to have a short interest in a security if such person directly or indirectly, through any contract, arrangement, understanding, relationship or otherwise, has the opportunity to profit or share in any profit derived from any decrease in the value of the subject security), (E) any rights to dividends on the shares of the Corporation owned beneficially by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, that are separated or separable from the underlying shares of the Corporation, (F) any proportionate interest in shares of the Corporation or Derivative Instruments held, directly or indirectly, by a general or limited partnership in which such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, is a general partner or, directly or indirectly, beneficially owns an interest in a general partner, and (G) any performance-related fees (other than an asset-based fee) that such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, is entitled to based on any increase or decrease in the value of shares of the Corporation or Derivative Instruments, if any, all such information to be provided as of the date of such notice, including, without limitation, any such interests held by members of such stockholder's and such beneficial owner's, if any, immediate family sharing the same household (which information shall be supplemented by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, not later than ten (10) days after the record date for the annual meeting to disclose such ownership as of the record date), (iii) any other information relating to such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, that would be required to be disclosed in a proxy statement or other filings required to be made in connection with solicitations of proxies for, as applicable, the proposal of other business and/or for the election of directors in a contested election pursuant to Section 14 of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, and (iv) a representation (A) that the stockholder is a holder of record of stock of the Corporation entitled to vote at such annual meeting and intends to
 
appear in person or by proxy at the annual meeting to propose such business or nomination and (B) whether the stockholder or the beneficial owner, if any, intends or is part of a group which intends (x) to deliver a proxy statement and/or form of proxy to holders of at least the percentage of the Corporation's outstanding capital stock required to approve or adopt the proposal or elect the nominee and/or (y) otherwise to solicit proxies from stockholders in support of such proposal or nomination; (b) if the notice relates to any business other than the nomination of a director or directors that the stockholder proposes to bring before the annual meeting, set forth (i) a brief description of the business desired to be brought before the annual meeting, the text of the proposal or business (including the text of any resolutions proposed for consideration and in the event that such business includes a proposal to amend these By-Laws, the language of the proposed amendment), the reasons for conducting such business at the annual meeting and any material interest of such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, in such business and (ii) a description of all agreements, arrangements, and understandings between such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, and their respective affiliates and associates, and any other person or persons (including their names) acting in concert therewith in connection with the proposal of such business by such stockholder; (c) set forth, as to each person, if any, whom the stockholder proposes to nominate for election or reelection to the Board of Directors (i) all information relating to such person that would be required to be disclosed in a proxy statement or other filings required to be made in connection with solicitations of proxies for election of directors in a contested election pursuant to Section 14 of the Exchange Act, (ii) such person's written consent to being named in the proxy statement as a nominee and to serving as a director if elected and a statement whether such person, if elected, intends to tender, promptly following such person's election or reelection, an irrevocable resignation effective upon such person's failure to receive the required vote for reelection at the next meeting at which such person would face reelection and upon acceptance of such resignation by the Board of Directors, and (iii) a description of all direct and indirect compensation and other material monetary agreements, arrangements and understandings during the past three (3) years, and any other material relationships, between or among such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, and their respective affiliates and associates, or any other person or persons (including their names) acting in concert therewith, on the one hand, and each proposed nominee, and his or her respective affiliates and associates, or any other person or persons (including their names) acting in concert therewith, on the other hand, including, without limitation, all information that would be required to be disclosed pursuant to Rule 404 promulgated under Regulation S-K if the stockholder making the nomination and any beneficial owner on whose behalf the nomination is made, if any, or any affiliate or associate thereof or person acting in concert therewith, were the "registrant" for purposes of such rule and the nominee were a director or executive officer of such registrant; and (d) with respect to each nominee for election or reelection to the Board of Directors, include the completed and signed questionnaire, representation and agreement required by Section 11.3. The Corporation may require any proposed nominee to furnish such other information as may reasonably be required by the Corporation to determine the eligibility of such proposed nominee to serve as an independent director of the Corporation or that could be material to a reasonable stockholder's understanding of the independence, or lack thereof, of such nominee.
3. Notwithstanding anything in the second sentence of Section 11.1.A(2) to the contrary, in the event that the number of directors to be elected to the Board of Directors of the Corporation is increased effective at the annual meeting and there is no public announcement by the Corporation naming all of the nominees for director or specifying the size of the increased Board of Directors at least one hundred (100) days prior to the first anniversary of the preceding year's annual meeting, a stockholder's notice required by this By-Law shall also be considered timely, but only with respect to nominees for any new positions created by such increase, if it shall be delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not later than the close of business on the tenth (10th) day following the day on which such public announcement is first made by the Corporation.
B.
Special Meetings of Stockholders.
Only such business shall be conducted at a special meeting of stockholders as shall have been brought before the special meeting pursuant to the Corporation's notice of meeting. Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors may be made at a special meeting at which directors are to be elected pursuant to the Corporation's notice of special meeting (a) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof or stockholders pursuant to Article 1, Section 2 hereof, or (b) provided that the Board of Directors or stockholders pursuant to Article 1, Section 2 hereof has determined that directors shall be elected at such special meeting, by any stockholder of the Corporation who (i) is a stockholder of record at the time the notice provided for in this By-Law is delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation and at the time of the special meeting, (ii) is entitled to vote at the special
 
meeting, and (iii) complies with the notice procedures set forth in this By-Law as to such nomination. In the event the Corporation calls a special meeting for the purpose of electing one or more directors to the Board of Directors, any such stockholder may nominate a person or persons (as the case may be) for election to such position(s) as specified in the Corporation's notice of meeting, if the stockholder's notice required by Section 11.1.A(2) (including the completed and signed questionnaire, representation and agreement required by Section 11.3) shall be delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not earlier than the close of business on the one hundred and twentieth (120th) day prior to such special meeting and not later than the close of business on the later of the ninetieth (90th) day prior to such special meeting and the tenth (10th) day following the day on which public announcement is first made of the date of the special meeting and of the nominees proposed by the Board of Directors to be elected at such special meeting. In no event shall the postponement of a special meeting as to which notice has been sent to stockholders commence a new time period (or extend any time period) for the giving of a stockholder's notice as described above.
C.
General.
1. Only such persons who are nominated in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law shall be eligible to serve as directors and only such business shall be conducted at a meeting of stockholders as shall have been brought before the meeting in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law. Except as otherwise provided by law, the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, the chairman of the meeting shall have the power and duty (a) to determine whether a nomination or any other business proposed to be brought before the meeting was made or proposed, as the case may be, in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law (including whether the stockholder or beneficial owner, if any, on whose behalf the nomination or proposal is made solicited (or is part of a group which solicited) or did not so solicit, as the case may be, proxies in support of such stockholder's nominee or proposal in compliance with such stockholder's representation as required by Section 11.1.A(2)(a)(iv)) and (b) if any proposed nomination or business was not made or proposed in compliance with this By-Law, to declare that such nomination shall be disregarded or that such proposed business shall not be transacted. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this By-Law, unless otherwise required by law, if the stockholder (or a qualified representative of the stockholder) does not appear at the annual or special meeting of stockholders of the Corporation to present a nomination or proposed business, such nomination shall be disregarded and such proposed business shall not be transacted, notwithstanding that proxies in respect of such vote may have been received by the Corporation. For purposes of this By-Law, to be considered a qualified representative of the stockholder, a person must be a duly authorized officer, manager, or partner of such stockholder or must be authorized by a writing executed by such stockholder or an electronic transmission delivered by such stockholder to act for such stockholder as proxy at the annual or special meeting and such person must produce such writing or electronic transmission, or a reliable reproduction of the writing or electronic transmission, at the annual or special meeting.
1. For purposes of this By-Law, "public announcement" shall mean disclosure in a press release reported by the Dow Jones News Service, Associated Press, or comparable national news service or in a document publicly filed by the Corporation with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to Section 13, 14 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.
2. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this By-Law, a stockholder shall also comply with all applicable requirements of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder with respect to the matters set forth in this By-Law; provided, however, that any references in these By-Laws to the Exchange Act are not intended to and shall not limit the requirements applicable to any nominations or proposals as to any other business to be considered pursuant to this By-Law (including Section 11.1A(1)(c) or Section 11.1B). Nothing in this By-Law shall be deemed to affect any rights (a) of stockholders to request inclusion of proposals in the Corporation's proxy statement pursuant to Rule 14a-8 under the Exchange Act or (b) of the holders of any series of Preferred Stock if and to the extent provided for under law, the Certificate of Incorporation, or these By-Laws.
 
11.2
Required Vote for Directors.
A nominee for director shall be elected to the Board of Directors if the votes cast for such nominee's election exceed the votes cast against such nominee's election; provided, however, that the directors shall be elected by a plurality of the votes cast at any meeting of stockholders for which (i) the Secretary of the Corporation receives a notice that a stockholder has nominated a person for election to the Board of Directors in compliance with the advance notice requirements for stockholder nominees for director set forth in Section 11.1 of this By-law and (ii) such nomination has not been withdrawn by such stockholder on or prior to the tenth day preceding the date the Corporation first mails its notice of meeting for such meeting to stockholders. If directors are to be elected by a plurality of the votes cast, stockholders shall not be permitted to vote against a nominee. Votes cast shall exclude abstentions with respect to that director's election.
11.3
Director Qualification: Submission of Questionnaire, Representation, and Agreement.
To be eligible to be a nominee for election or reelection as a director of the Corporation, a person must deliver (in accordance with the time periods prescribed for delivery of notice under Section 11.1) to the Secretary of the Corporation at the principal executive offices of the Corporation a written questionnaire with respect to the background and qualification of such person and the background of any other person or entity on whose behalf the nomination is being made (which questionnaire shall be provided by the Secretary upon written request) and a written representation and agreement (in the form provided by the Secretary of the Corporation upon written request), that such person (a) is not and will not become a party to (i) any agreement, arrangement, or understanding with, and has not given any commitment or assurance to, any person or entity as to how such person, if elected as a director of the Corporation, will act or vote on any issue or question (a "Voting Commitment") that has not been disclosed to the Corporation or (ii) any Voting Commitment that could limit or interfere with such person's ability to comply, if elected as a director of the Corporation, with such person's fiduciary duties under applicable law; (b) is not and will not become a party to any agreement, arrangement, or understanding with any person or entity other than the Corporation with respect to any direct or indirect compensation, reimbursement, or indemnification in connection with service or action as a director that has not been disclosed therein; and (c) in such person's individual capacity and on behalf of any person or entity on whose behalf the nomination is being made, would be in compliance, if elected as a director of the Corporation, and will comply with all applicable publicly disclosed corporate governance, conflict of interest, confidentiality and stock ownership and trading policies and guidelines of the Corporation.
SECTION 12.
Notice to Corporation.
Any written notice required to be delivered by a stockholder to the Corporation pursuant to Section 11.1 of this Article I or Section 2.1 of Article II of these By-Laws must be given, either by personal delivery or by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, to the Secretary of the Corporation at the Corporation's executive offices in the City of Chicago, State of Illinois.
SECTION 1.
Number and Term of Office.
The number of directors shall be thirteen (13), but the number may be increased, or decreased to not less than three (3), from time to time, either by the directors by adoption of a resolution to such effect or by the stockholders by amendment of these By-Laws in accordance with Article VIII. At each annual meeting of stockholders, each director shall be elected to hold office until the next annual meeting or until his or her successor shall be elected and qualified or until his or her earlier resignation or removal.
 
SECTION 2.
Nomination and Election.
 
 
SECTION 3.
Place of Meeting.
Meetings of the Board of Directors, or of any committee thereof, may be held either within or without the State of Delaware.
SECTION 4.
Annual Meeting.
Each year the Board of Directors shall meet in connection with the annual meeting of stockholders for the purpose of electing officers and for the transaction of other business. No notice of such annual meeting is required. Such annual meeting may be held at any other time or place which shall be specified in a notice given as hereinafter provided for special meetings of the Board of Directors, or in a consent and waiver of notice thereof, signed by all the directors.
SECTION 5.
Stated Meetings.
The Board of Directors may, by resolution adopted by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors, from time to time appoint the time and place for holding stated meetings of the Board of Directors, if by it deemed advisable; and such stated meetings shall thereupon be held at the time and place so appointed, without the giving of any special notice with regard thereto. In case the day appointed for a stated meeting shall fall upon a legal holiday, such meeting shall be held on the next following day, not a legal holiday, at the regularly appointed hour. Except as otherwise provided in these By-Laws, any and all business may be transacted at any stated meeting.
SECTION 6.
Special Meetings.
 
Special meetings of the Board of Directors may be called by or at the request of the Chairman of the Board of Directors or any two (2) directors. Notice of a special meeting of the Board of Directors, stating the place, day, and hour of the meeting, shall be given to each director in writing (by mail, wire, facsimile, or personal delivery) or orally (by telephone or in person).
 
With respect to a special meeting of the Board of Directors, a written waiver, signed by a director, or waiver by electronic transmission, shall be deemed equivalent to notice to that director. A director's attendance at a meeting shall constitute that director's waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the director attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting was not lawfully called or convened. Neither the business to be transacted at, nor the purpose of, any regular or special meeting of the Board of Directors need be specified in the waiver of notice of such meeting.
SECTION 7.
Quorum and Manner of Acting.
Except as herein otherwise provided, forty percent (40%) of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided in these By-Laws at the time of any stated or special meeting of the Board of Directors or, if vacancies exist on the Board of Directors, forty percent (40%) of such number of directors then in office; provided, however, that such number may not be less than one-third of the total number of directors fixed by or in
 
the manner provided in these By-Laws, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and, except as otherwise required by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by these By-Laws, the act of a majority of the directors present at any such meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of the Board of Directors. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the directors present may adjourn any meeting, from time to time, until a quorum is present. No notice of any adjourned meeting need be given.
SECTION 8.
Chairman of the Board.
The Chairman of the Board shall preside, when present, at all meetings of the Board of Directors, except as otherwise provided by law.
SECTION 9.
Resignations.
Any director of the Corporation may resign at any time by giving written notice or notice by electronic transmission thereof to the Secretary of the Corporation. Such resignation shall take effect at the time specified therefor or if the time is not specified, upon delivery thereof; and, unless otherwise specified with respect thereto, the acceptance of such resignation shall not be necessary to make it effective.
SECTION 10.
Removal of Directors.
Any directors may be removed with or without cause by the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, at a meeting of stockholders called for that purpose; and the vacancy on the Board of Directors caused by any such removal may be filled by the stockholders at such meeting or at any subsequent meeting.
SECTION 11.
Filling of Vacancies Not Caused by Removal.
In case of any increase in the number of directors, or of any vacancy created by death or resignation, the additional director or directors may be elected or, as the case may be, the vacancy or vacancies may be filled, either (a) by the Board of Directors at any meeting, (i) if the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, or (ii) if the Corporation does not have an Interested Stockholder, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the remaining directors, though less than a quorum or (b) by the stockholders entitled to vote, either at an annual meeting or at a special meeting thereof called for that purpose, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the outstanding shares entitled to vote at such meeting.
SECTION 12.
Directors' Fees.
The Board of Directors shall have authority to determine from time to time the amount of compensation that shall be paid to its members for attendance at meetings of the Board of Directors or of any committee of the Board of Directors.
SECTION 13.
Action Without a Meeting.
Any action required or permitted to be taken at any meeting of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof may be taken without a meeting if all members of the Board of Directors or committee, as the case may be, consent thereto in writing, and the writing or writings are filed with the minutes of proceedings of the Board of Directors or committee.
 
SECTION 1.
Audit Committee.
In addition to any committees appointed pursuant to Section 2 of this Article, there shall be an Audit Committee, appointed annually by the Board of Directors, consisting of at least three (3) directors who are not members of management. It shall be the responsibility of the Audit Committee to review the scope and results of the annual independent audit of books and records of the Corporation and its subsidiaries and to discharge such other responsibilities as may from time to time be assigned to it by the Board of Directors. The Audit Committee shall meet at such times and places as the members deem advisable, and shall make such recommendations to the Board of Directors as they consider appropriate.
SECTION 2.
Other Committees.
2.1 The Board of Directors may appoint standing or temporary committees and invest such committees with such powers as it may see fit, with power to subdelegate such powers if deemed desirable by the Board of Directors; but no such committee shall have the power or authority of the Board of Directors to adopt, amend, or repeal these By-Laws or approve, adopt, or recommend to the stockholders of the Corporation any action or matter expressly required by the Certificate of Incorporation, these By-Laws or the Delaware General Corporation Law to be submitted to stockholders for approval.
Committee Powers.
2.2 The Board of Directors may designate one or more directors as alternate members of any committee, who may replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of the committee. In the absence or disqualification of a member of a committee, the member or members thereof present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, whether or not such member or members constitute a quorum, may unanimously appoint another member of the Board of Directors to act at the meeting in the place of any such absent or disqualified member.
Committee Members.
SECTION 3.
Quorum and Manner of Acting.
A majority of the number of directors composing any committee of the Board of Directors, as established and fixed by resolution of the Board of Directors, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at any meeting of such committee but, if less than a majority are present at a meeting, a majority of such directors present may adjourn the meeting from time to time without further notice. The act of a majority of the members of a committee present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of such committee.
SECTION 1.
Officers.
The elected officers of the Corporation shall be a Chairman of the Board of Directors (who shall be a director) and, at the discretion of the Board of Directors, a President (who shall be a director), and one or more Vice Presidents (each of whom may be assigned by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer an additional title descriptive of the functions assigned to such officer and one or more of whom may be designated Executive or Senior Vice President). The Board of Directors may also elect one or more Vice Chairmen. The Board of Directors shall also designate either the Chairman of the Board of Directors or the President as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation. The Board of Directors shall appoint a Controller, a Secretary, and a Treasurer. Any number of offices, whether elective or appointive, may be held by the same person. The Chief Executive Officer may, by a writing filed with the Secretary, designate titles as officers for employees and agents and appoint Assistant Secretaries and Assistant Treasurers as, from time to time, may appear to be necessary or advisable in the conduct of the affairs of the Corporation and may, in the same manner, terminate or change such titles.
 
SECTION 2.
Term of Office.
So far as practicable, all elected officers shall be elected at the annual meeting of the Board of Directors in each year, and shall hold office until the annual meeting of the Board of Directors in the next subsequent year and until their respective successors are chosen. The Controller, Secretary, and Treasurer shall hold office at the pleasure of the Board of Directors.
SECTION 3.
Salaries of Elected Officers.
The salaries paid to the elected officers of the Corporation shall be authorized or approved by the Board of Directors.
SECTION 4.
Bonuses.
None of the officers, directors, or employees of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations shall at any time be paid any bonus or share in the earnings or profits of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations except pursuant to a plan approved by affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members of the Board of Directors.
SECTION 5.
Removal of Elected and Appointed Officers.
Any elected or appointed officer may be removed at any time, either for or without cause, by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors, at any meeting called for the purpose.
SECTION 6.
Vacancies.
If any vacancy occurs in any office, the Board of Directors may elect or appoint a successor to fill such vacancy for the remainder of the term.
SECTION 1.
Chairman of the Board.
The Chairman of the Board of Directors shall preside, when present, at all meetings of the stockholders (except as otherwise provided by statute) and at all meetings of the Board of Directors. The Chairman shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation; to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the Chairman by the Board of Directors.
SECTION 2.
President.
The President shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation and to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; during the absence or disability of the Chairman of the Board of Directors, to exercise the Chairman's powers and to perform the Chairman's duties; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the President by the Board of Directors; provided, that if the office of President is vacant, the Chairman shall exercise the duties ordinarily exercised by the President until such time as a President is elected or appointed.
 
SECTION 3.
Chief Executive Officer.
The officer designated by the Board of Directors as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation shall have general and active control of its business and affairs. The Chief Executive Officer shall have general power to appoint or designate all employees and agents of the Corporation whose appointment or designation is not otherwise provided for and to fix the compensation thereof, subject to the provisions of these By-Laws; to remove or suspend any employee or agent who shall not have been elected or appointed by the Board of Directors or other body; to suspend for cause any employee, agent, or officer, other than an elected officer, pending final action by the body which shall have appointed such employee, agent, or officer; and to exercise all the powers usually pertaining to the office held by the Chief Executive Officer of a corporation.
SECTION 4.
Vice Presidents and Controller.
The several Vice Presidents and the Controller shall perform all such duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of them, from time to time, by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer, respectively.
SECTION 5.
Secretary.
The Secretary shall attend to the giving of notice of all meetings of stockholders and of the Board of Directors and shall keep and attest true records of all such proceedings. The Secretary shall have charge of the corporate seal and have authority to attest any and all instruments or writings to which the same may be affixed and shall keep and account for all books, documents, papers, and records of the Corporation relating to its corporate organization. The Secretary shall have authority to sign stock certificates and shall generally perform all the duties usually appertaining to the office of secretary of a corporation. In the absence of the Secretary, an Assistant Secretary or Secretary pro tempore shall perform the duties of the Secretary.
SECTION 6.
Treasurer.
The Treasurer shall have the care and custody of all moneys, funds, and securities of the Corporation, and shall deposit or cause to be deposited all funds of the Corporation in accordance with directions or authorizations of the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer. The Treasurer shall have power to sign stock certificates, to indorse for deposit or collection, or otherwise, all checks, drafts, notes, bills of exchange, or other commercial paper payable to the Corporation, and to give proper receipts or discharges therefor. In the absence of the Treasurer, an Assistant Treasurer shall perform the duties of the Treasurer.
SECTION 7.
Additional Powers and Duties.
In addition to the foregoing especially enumerated duties and powers, the several officers of the Corporation shall perform such other duties and exercise such further powers as may be provided in these By-Laws or as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine, or as may be assigned to them by any superior officer.
SECTION 8.
Disaster Emergency Powers of Acting Officers.
If, as a result of a disaster or other state of emergency, the Chief Executive Officer is unable to perform the duties of that office, (a) the powers and duties of the Chief Executive Officer shall be performed by the employee with the highest base salary who shall be available and capable of performing such powers and duties and, if more than one such employee has the same base salary, by the employee whose surname begins with the earliest letter of the alphabet among the group of those employees with the same base salary; (b) the officer performing such duties shall continue to perform such powers and duties until the Chief Executive Officer becomes capable of performing those duties or until the Board of Directors shall have elected a new Chief Executive Officer or designated another individual as Acting Chief Executive Officer; (c) such officer shall have the power in addition to all other powers granted to the Chief Executive Officer by these By-Laws and by the Board of Directors to appoint an acting President, acting Vice President - Finance, acting Controller, acting Secretary, and acting Treasurer, if any of the persons duly elected to any such office is not, by reason of such disaster or emergency,
 
able to perform the duties of such office, each of such acting appointees to serve in such capacities until the officer for whom the appointee is acting becomes capable of performing the duties of such office or until the Board of Directors shall have designated another individual to perform such duties or have elected another person to fill such office; (d) any such acting officer so appointed shall be entitled to exercise all powers vested by these By-Laws or the Board of Directors in the duly elected officer for whom the acting officer is acting; and (e) anyone transacting business with the Corporation may rely upon a certification by any two (2) officers of the Corporation that a specified individual has succeeded to the powers of the Chief Executive Officer and that such person has appointed other acting officers as herein provided and any person, firm, corporation, or other entity to which such certification has been delivered by such officers may continue to rely upon it until notified of a change in writing signed by two (2) officers of the Corporation.
SECTION 1.
Stock Certificates.
The shares of the stock of the Corporation shall be represented by certificates, provided that the Board of Directors may provide by resolution or resolutions that some or all of any or all classes or series of stock shall be uncertificated shares. Any such resolution shall not apply to shares represented by certificate until such certificate is surrendered to the Corporation. Every holder of stock of the Corporation represented by a certificate shall be entitled to a certificate, signed by the Chairman of the Board of Directors or the President or a Vice President and the Treasurer or an Assistant Treasurer or the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary, certifying the number of shares owned by the stockholder in the Corporation. Any and all of the signatures on a certificate may be a facsimile. If any officer, transfer agent, or registrar who has signed or whose facsimile signature has been placed upon a certificate shall have ceased to be such officer, transfer agent, or registrar before such certificate is issued, it may be issued by the Corporation with the same effect as if he or she were such officer, transfer agent, or registrar at the date of issue.
SECTION 2.
Transfer Agents and Registrars.
The Board of Directors may, in its discretion, appoint responsible banks or trust companies in the Borough of Manhattan, in the City of New York, State of New York, and in such other city or cities as the Board of Directors may deem advisable, from time to time, to act as transfer agents and registrars of the stock of the Corporation; and, when such appointments shall have been made, no stock certificate shall be valid until countersigned by one of such transfer agents and registered by one of such registrars.
SECTION 3.
Transfers of Stock.
Shares of stock may be transferred by delivery of the certificates therefor, accompanied either by an assignment in writing on the back of the certificates or by written power of attorney to sell, assign, and transfer the same, signed by the record holder thereof (or, with respect to uncertificated shares, by delivery of duly executed instructions or in any other manner permitted by law), but no transfer shall affect the right of the Corporation to pay any dividend upon the stock to the holder of record thereof, or to treat the holder of record as the holder in fact thereof for all purposes, and no transfer shall be valid, except between the parties thereto, until such transfer shall have been made upon the books of the Corporation.
SECTION 4.
Lost Certificates.
The Board of Directors may provide for the issuance of new certificates of stock or uncertificated shares to replace certificates of stock lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, or alleged to be lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, upon such terms and in accordance with such procedures as the Board of Directors shall deem proper and prescribe.
 
SECTION 1.
Fiscal Year.
The fiscal year of the Corporation shall be the calendar year.
SECTION 2. (Repealed in its entirety by vote of the stockholders, May 5, 1975.)
SECTION 3.
Signing of Negotiable Instruments.
All bills, notes, checks, or other instruments for the payment of money shall be signed or countersigned by such officer or officers and in such manner as from time to time may be prescribed by resolution (whether general or special) of the Board of Directors.
SECTION 4.
Indemnification of Directors and Officers.
4.1
Right to Indemnification.
Each person who was or is made a party to or is threatened to be made a party to or is otherwise involved (including, without limitation, as a witness) in any actual or threatened action, suit, or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative, or investigative (hereinafter a "proceeding"), by reason of the fact that he or she is or was a director or officer of the Corporation or that, being or having been such a director or officer or an employee of the Corporation, he or she is or was serving at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation as a director, officer, employee, or agent of another corporation or of a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise, including service with respect to an employee benefit plan (hereinafter an "indemnitee"), whether the basis of such proceeding is alleged action in an official capacity as such a director, officer, employee, or agent or in any other capacity while serving as such a director, officer, employee, or agent, shall be indemnified and held harmless by the Corporation to the full extent permitted by the Delaware General Corporation Law, as the same exists or may hereafter be amended (but, in the case of any such amendment, only to the extent that such amendment permits the Corporation to provide broader indemnification rights than permitted prior thereto), or by other applicable law as then in effect, against all expense, liability, and loss (including attorneys' fees, judgments, fines, ERISA excise taxes or penalties, and amounts paid in settlement) actually and reasonably incurred or suffered by such indemnitee in connection therewith, and such indemnification shall continue as to an indemnitee who has ceased to be a director, officer, employee, or agent and shall inure to the benefit of the indemnitee's heirs, executors, and administrators; provided, however, that except as provided in Section 4.2 with respect to proceedings seeking to enforce rights to indemnification, the Corporation shall indemnify any such indemnitee in connection with a proceeding (or part thereof) initiated by such indemnitee only if such proceeding (or part thereof) was authorized or ratified by the Board of Directors. The right to indemnification conferred in this Section 4.1 shall be a contract right and shall include the right to be paid by the Corporation the expenses incurred in defending any such proceeding in advance of its final disposition (hereinafter an "advancement of expenses"); provided, however, that an advancement of expenses incurred by an indemnitee in his or her capacity as a director or officer or former director or officer (and not in any other capacity in which service was or is rendered by such indemnitee, including, without limitation, service to an employee benefit plan) shall be made only upon delivery to the Corporation of an undertaking (hereinafter an "undertaking"), by or on behalf of such indemnitee, to repay all amounts so advanced if it shall ultimately be determined by final judicial decision from which there is no further right to appeal that such indemnitee is not entitled to be indemnified for such expenses under this Section 4.1 or otherwise; and provided, further, that an advancement of expenses shall not be made if the Board of Directors makes a good faith determination that such payment would violate law or public policy.
 
4.2
Right of Indemnitee to Bring Suit.
If a claim under Section 4.1 is not paid in full by the Corporation within sixty (60) days after a written claim has been received by the Corporation, except in the case of a claim for an advancement of expenses, in which case the applicable period shall be twenty (20) days, the indemnitee may at any time thereafter bring suit against the Corporation to recover the unpaid amount of the claim. If successful in whole or in part in any such suit, or in a suit brought by the Corporation to recover an advancement of expenses pursuant to the terms of an undertaking, the indemnitee shall also be entitled to be paid the expenses of prosecuting or defending such suit. The indemnitee shall be presumed to be entitled to indemnification under this Section 4 upon submission of a written claim (and, in an action brought to enforce a claim for an advancement of expenses, where the required undertaking has been tendered to the Corporation), and thereafter the Corporation shall have the burden of proof to overcome the presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled. Neither the failure of the Corporation (including the Board of Directors, independent legal counsel, or the stockholders) to have made a determination prior to the commencement of such suit that indemnification of the indemnitee is proper in the circumstances, nor an actual determination by the Corporation (including the Board of Directors, independent legal counsel, or the stockholders) that the indemnitee is not entitled to indemnification shall be a defense to the suit or create a presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled.
4.3
Nonexclusivity of Rights.
The rights to indemnification and to the advancement of expenses conferred in this Section 4 shall not be exclusive of any other right that any person may have or hereafter acquire under any statute, provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation, these By-Laws, any agreement, vote of stockholders or disinterested directors, or otherwise. Neither any amendment to or repeal of this Section 4 or of any of the procedures established by the Board of Directors pursuant to Section 4.7, nor the adoption of any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, nor, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any modification of law, shall eliminate or reduce the effect of the right or protection of any indemnitee to indemnification and to the advancement of expenses in accordance with the provisions hereof and thereof with respect to any proceeding (regardless of when such proceeding is first threatened, commenced or completed) arising out of, or related to, any acts or omissions of such indemnitee occurring prior to such amendment or repeal.
4.4
Insurance, Contracts, and Funding.
The Corporation may maintain insurance, at its expense, to protect itself and any director, officer, employee, or agent of the Corporation or another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise against any expense, liability, or loss, whether or not the Corporation would have the power to indemnify such person against such expense, liability, or loss under the Delaware General Corporation Law. The Corporation may, without further stockholder approval, enter into contracts with any indemnitee in furtherance of the provisions of this Section 4 and may create a trust fund, grant a security interest, or use other means (including, without limitation, a letter of credit) to ensure the payment of such amounts as may be necessary to effect indemnification as provided in this Section 4.
4.5
Persons Serving Other Entities.
Any person who is or was a director, officer, or employee of the Corporation who is or was serving (i) as a director or officer of another corporation of which a majority of the shares entitled to vote in the election of its directors is held by the Corporation or (ii) in an executive or management capacity in a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise of which the Corporation or a wholly owned subsidiary of the Corporation is a general partner or has a majority ownership shall be deemed to be so serving at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation and entitled to indemnification and advancement of expenses under Section 4.1.
 
4.6
Indemnification of Employees and Agents of the Corporation.
The Corporation may, by action of the Board of Directors, authorize one or more executive officers to grant rights to advancement of expenses to employees or agents of the Corporation on such terms and conditions as such officer or officers deem appropriate under the circumstances. The Corporation may, by action of the Board of Directors, grant rights to indemnification and advancement of expenses to employees or agents or groups of employees or agents of the Corporation with the same scope and effect as the provisions of this Section 4 with respect to the indemnification and advancement of expenses of directors and officers of the Corporation; provided, however, that an undertaking shall be made by an employee or agent only if required by the Board of Directors.
4.7
Procedures for the Submission of Claims.
The Board of Directors may establish reasonable procedures for the submission of claims for indemnification pursuant to this Section 4, determination of the entitlement of any person thereto, and review of any such determination. Such procedures shall be set forth in an appendix to these By-Laws and shall be deemed for all purposes to be a part hereof.
SECTION 1.
Amendment of the By-Laws: General.
Except as herein otherwise expressly provided, the By-Laws of the Corporation may be altered or repealed in any particular and new By-Laws, not inconsistent with any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or any provision of law, may be adopted, either by
A. the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority in number of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote at an annual meeting of stockholders or at a special meeting thereof, the notice of which special meeting shall include the form of the proposed alteration or repeal or of the proposed new By-Laws, or a summary thereof; or
B. either by
i. the affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors at any meeting thereof, or
ii. the affirmative vote of all the directors present at any meeting at which a quorum, less than a majority, is present;
provided, in either of the latter cases, that the notice of such meeting shall include the form of the proposed alteration or repeal or of the proposed new By-Laws, or a summary thereof; and provided, further, that Article I, Section 11.2 of these By-Laws may be amended only as set forth in Section 1.A of this By-Law, except that any amendment required by law or necessary or desirable to cure an administrative or technical deficiency may be made as provided in Section 1.B of this By-Law.
SECTION 2.
Amendments as to Compensation and Removal of Officers.
Notwithstanding anything contained in these By-Laws to the contrary, the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the Voting Stock, as defined in Article FOURTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, at a meeting of stockholders called for the purpose, shall be required to alter, amend, repeal, or adopt any provision inconsistent with Sections 3, 4 and 5 of Article IV of these By-Laws, notice of which meeting shall include the form of the proposed amendment, or a summary thereof.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Boeing Director William M. Daley Resigns Board Seat
, Jan. 10, 2011  The Boeing [NYSE: BA] board of directors today accepted the resignation of director William M. Daley who, on Jan. 7, submitted his request to resign following his appointment as U.S. President Barack Obama's chief of staff.
CHICAGO
"All of us at Boeing thank Bill for his contributions to our company and wish him well as he tackles this next phase of his exemplary public service career," said Chairman, President and Chief Executive Jim McNerney.
The resignation is effective as of Jan. 7. Daley, 62, joined the board in 2006. His public career includes serving as President Bill Clinton's Commerce secretary from Jan. 1997, to July, 2000.
Contact: John Dern, Communications, 312-544-2002


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20110126074135.txt.gz
TIME:20110126074135
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
(a) On January 26, 2011, The Boeing Company issued a press release reporting its financial results for the fourth quarter of 2010. A copy of the Company's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
(a) Not applicable
(b) Not applicable
(c) Not applicable
(d) Exhibits
99.1    Press Release issued by The Boeing Company dated January 26, 2011, reporting Boeing's financial results for the fourth quarter of 2010, furnished herewith.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
Boeing Reports Fourth-Quarter 2010 Results and 2011 Guidance
Fourth-Quarter 2010
 
 
Full Year 2010
 
 
 
Outlook
 
Table 1. Summary Financial Results
 
 The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] reported fourth-quarter net income of $1.2 billion, or $1.56 per share, on revenue of $16.6 billion. The results reflect solid performance across the company's core programs, a favorable tax settlement (+$0.50 per share), and a special one-time contribution to Boeing's charitable trust (-$0.05 per share) (Table 1).
CHICAGO, Jan. 26, 2011
Net income for the full year was $3.3 billion, or $4.45 per share, on revenue of $64.3 billion, which included the $0.45 per share net impact of the favorable tax settlement and the charitable trust contribution. First-quarter 2010 included a $0.20 per share tax charge on health care legislation. Earnings per share for 2009 of $1.84 included a combined $3.58 per share impact due to the 787 R&D reclassification and 747 charges.
 
Earnings guidance for 2011 has been established at between $3.80 and $4.00 per share reflecting solid core performance, higher pension expense, the revised 787 schedule and the current defense contracting environment.
"Boeing delivered strong operating performance and exceptional cash generation from core production and services businesses in 2010, which helped mitigate the impact of development program challenges," said Jim McNerney, Boeing chairman, president and chief executive officer. "We're entering 2011 well-positioned for growth, with a large order book, increasing global demand for commercial airplanes, greater clarity around our domestic defense outlook, and significant international defense sales opportunities. Our focus for the year is to deliver the 787 and 747-8; manage disciplined increases in commercial airplane production rates and drive improved competitiveness and financial performance throughout the business."
Boeing's quarterly operating cash flow was $1.1 billion, reflecting strong operating performance while continuing to invest in development programs. For the full year, operating cash flow was $3.0 billion. Free cash flow* was $0.7 billion in the quarter and $1.8 billion for the year (Table 2).
Table 2. Cash Flow
 
 
Cash and investments in marketable securities totaled $10.5 billion at year-end (Table 3), up 5 percent in the quarter. Debt was essentially unchanged in the quarter, and the company did not acquire any of its shares.
 
Table 3. Cash, Marketable Securities and Debt Balances
 
 
Total company backlog at year-end was $321 billion, unchanged from the prior quarter and up 2 percent from the prior year.
Segment Results
Commercial Airplanes
Boeing Commercial Airplanes fourth-quarter revenue decreased by 11 percent to $8.2 billion on lower expected 777 and 747 airplane deliveries. Operating margin was 7.7 percent, reflecting the lower deliveries and higher R&D and other period costs (Table 4).
For the full year, revenue decreased by 7 percent to $31.8 billion on the lower expected 777 and 747 airplane deliveries. Commercial Airplanes operating earnings were $3.0 billion on higher planned R&D spending. The prior-year results were impacted by the reclassification of 787 R&D costs of $2.7 billion and 747 charges totaling $1.4 billion.
Commercial Airplanes booked 180 gross orders during the quarter while 22 orders were removed from its order book. This contrasts with the year-ago period when net orders were 62 airplanes. For the full year, net orders were 530 airplanes. Contractual backlog remains strong with 3,443 airplanes valued at $256 billion.
Table 4. Commercial Airplanes Operating Results
 
 
The 787 program experienced an in-flight electrical incident on a test flight in November. As disclosed last week, first delivery is now expected in the third quarter of 2011 and includes the time required to produce, install and test updated software and new electrical power distribution panels in the flight test and production airplanes. Total firm orders for the 787 at year-end were 847 airplanes from 57 customers.
Flight testing of the 747-8 Freighter progressed during the quarter, and the first two Intercontinental passenger models had electrical power successfully turned on. Delivery of the first 747-8 Freighter is planned for mid-2011.
Boeing Defense, Space & Security
Boeing Defense, Space & Security's fourth-quarter revenue declined 4 percent to $8.2 billion on lower revenue in Boeing Military Aircraft (BMA) and Global Services & Support (GS&S). Operating margin was 10.0 percent reflecting improved margins in Network & Space Systems (N&SS) (Table 5).
For the full year, revenue decreased by 5 percent to $31.9 billion on expected lower volume in N&SS. Operating earnings decreased by $0.4 billion to $2.9 billion, producing operating margins of 9.0 percent on lower margins in BMA.
Table 5. Defense, Space & Security Operating Results
 
BMA fourth-quarter revenue decreased by $0.2 billion to $3.6 billion, due to fewer deliveries and less favorable mix. Operating margin was 8.9 percent, reflecting strong execution across its programs, offset by higher costs on the Airborne Early Warning & Control program, which reduced BMA margins by 3.8 points. During the quarter, BMA delivered 29 aircraft, and the U.S. Naval Air Systems Command awarded it an A160T Hummingbird unmanned vehicle contract.
 
N&SS fourth-quarter revenue was essentially unchanged at $2.4 billion. Operating margin grew to 9.0 percent on improved performance in Space and Intelligence Systems. During the quarter, the Mexican government signed a contract for three geomobile satellites and the X-37B Orbital Test Vehicle completed its first flight.
GS&S revenue decreased by $0.3 billion to $2.1 billion in the quarter due to lower volume in maintenance, modifications and upgrades and integrated logistics. Operating margin was 13.1 percent, driven by strong performance across its portfolio. During the quarter, the company was awarded a contract for the development of the Future Logistic Information Services from the U.K. Ministry of Defense and a contract for KC-135 Fleet Support from the U.S. Air Force.
Backlog at Defense, Space & Security is $65.2 billion, approximately two times the unit's expected 2011 revenue. Backlog increased slightly as compared to 2009.
Boeing Capital Corporation
Boeing Capital Corporation (BCC) reported fourth-quarter pre-tax earnings of $6 million compared to $14 million in the same period last year (Table 6). For the full year, pre-tax earnings were $152 million, up from $126 million last year. During the quarter, BCC's portfolio balance declined to $4.7 billion, down from $5.7 billion at the beginning of the year and $5.0 billion at the end of third quarter, on run-off, pre-payments and asset sales. BCC's debt-to-equity ratio was unchanged at 5.0-to-1.
Table 6. Boeing Capital Corporation Operating Results
 
Additional Information
The "Other" segment consists primarily of Boeing Engineering, Operations and Technology, as well as certain results related to the financial consolidation of all business units. Other segment expense was $73 million in the fourth quarter, up from $47 million in the same period last year.
Total pension expense for the fourth quarter was $254 million, as compared to $223 million in the same period last year. A total of $244 million was recognized in the operating segments in the quarter (down from $264 million in the same period last year), and $10 million was recognized in unallocated items.
 
Unallocated expense was $273 million, up from the $123 million reported in the same period last year, driven by a $55 million charitable trust contribution and higher unallocated pension expense. The company's pension plans were 83 percent funded at year end (5.3 percent discount rate and 12.7 percent actual asset return).
Other income for the quarter was $32 million, as compared to an expense of $33 million in the same period last year. Interest expense for the quarter was $132 million, up from $110 million in the same period last year.
The company's income tax benefit of $163 million in the quarter (compared to an expense of $267 million in the same period last year) included a $371 million non-cash gain due to an IRS settlement for 1998 through 2003 tax years and a benefit of $154 million due to the extension of the R&D credit for the 2010 tax year that was signed into law in December.
Outlook
The company's 2011 financial guidance (Table 7) reflects solid core operating performance, higher pension expense, the recently revised 787 schedule and the current defense contracting environment.
Boeing's 2011 revenue guidance is between $68 and $71 billion and reflects the initial 787 and 747-8 deliveries. Earnings guidance for 2011 is established at between $3.80 and $4.00 per share. Total pension expense in 2011 is expected to be $1.8 billion or $1.58 per share, an increase of $0.58 per share from 2010. Operating cash flow is expected to be greater than $2.5 billion in 2011, including $0.5 billion of discretionary pension contributions.
Commercial Airplanes' 2011 deliveries guidance is expected to be between 485 and 500 airplanes and is sold out. It includes the first 787 and 747-8 deliveries (combined 25 to 40 units), which are expected to begin in the third quarter of 2011 and mid-2011, respectively. Commercial Airplanes' 2011 revenue is expected to be between $36 and $38 billion with operating margins between 7.5 and 8.5 percent.
Defense, Space & Security's revenue for 2011 is expected to be between $31.5 and $33 billion with operating margins between 8.5 and 9 percent.
 
Boeing Capital Corporation expects that its aircraft finance portfolio will continue to reduce in 2011, as new aircraft financing of less than $0.5 billion is expected to be lower than normal portfolio runoff through customer payments and depreciation.
Boeing's 2011 R&D forecast is between $3.7 and $3.9 billion. Capital expenditures for 2011 are expected to be approximately $2.3 billion.
Table 7. Financial Outlook
 
 
 
Non-GAAP Measure Disclosure
Management believes that the non-GAAP (Generally Accepted Accounting Principles) measures (indicated by an asterisk *) used in this report provide investors with important perspectives into the company's ongoing business performance. The company does not intend for the information to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the related GAAP measures. Other companies may define the measures differently. The following definitions are provided:
Free Cash Flow
Free cash flow is defined as GAAP less capital expenditures for . Management believes free cash flow provides investors with an important perspective on the cash available for shareholders, debt repayment, and acquisitions after making the capital investments required to support ongoing business operations and long term value creation. Free cash flow does not represent the residual cash flow available for discretionary expenditures as it excludes certain mandatory expenditures such as repayment of maturing debt. Management uses free cash flow internally to assess both business performance and overall liquidity. Table 2 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and free cash flow.
operating cash flow
property, plant and equipment additions
 
This document contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "may," "will," "should," "expects," "intends," "projects," "plans," "believes," "estimates," "targets," "anticipates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. Examples of forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements we make regarding our guidance relating to 2011 financial and operating performance, as well as any other statement that does not directly relate to any historical or current fact. Forward-looking statements are based on our current expectations and assumptions, which may not prove to be accurate. These statements are not guarantees and are subject to risks, uncertainties, and changes in circumstances that are difficult to predict. Many factors could cause actual results to differ materially and adversely from these forward-looking statements. Among these factors are risks related to: (1) general conditions in the economy and our industry, including those due to regulatory changes; (2) our reliance on our commercial customers, our suppliers and the worldwide market; (3) our commercial development programs, including the 787 and 747-8 commercial aircraft programs; (4) changing acquisition priorities of the U.S. government; (5) our dependence on U.S. government contracts; (6) our reliance on fixed-price contracts; (7) our reliance on cost-type contracts; (8) uncertainties concerning contracts that include in-orbit incentive payments; (9) changes in accounting estimates; (10) our ability to develop new technologies; (11) significant changes in discount rates and actual investment return on pension assets; (12) our ability to attract, retain and develop qualified personnel; (13) work stoppages or other labor disruptions; (14) changes in the competitive landscape in our markets; (15) our non-U.S. operations, including sales to non-U.S. customers; (16) potential adverse developments in new or pending litigation and/or government investigations; (17) customer and aircraft concentration in Boeing Capital Corporation's customer financing portfolio; (18) changes in our ability to obtain debt on commercially reasonable terms and at competitive rates in order to fund our operations and contractual commitments; (19) realizing the anticipated benefits of mergers, acquisitions, joint ventures/strategic alliances or divestitures; (20) the adequacy of our insurance coverage to cover significant risk exposures; (21) potential business disruptions related to physical security threats, information technology attacks or natural disasters; and (22) potential environmental liabilities.
Additional information concerning these and other factors can be found in our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including our most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q and Current Reports on Form 8-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which it is made, and we assume no obligation to update any forward-looking statement, except as required by law.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20110427074836.txt.gz
TIME:20110427074836
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
(a) On April 27, 2011, The Boeing Company issued a press release reporting its financial results for the first quarter of 2011. A copy of the Company's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
(a) Not applicable
(b) Not applicable
(c) Not applicable
(d) Exhibits
99.1    Press Release issued by The Boeing Company dated April 27, 2011, reporting Boeing's financial results for the first quarter of 2011, furnished herewith.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Boeing Reports First-Quarter Results and Reaffirms 2011 Guidance
 
 
 
 
 
Table 1. Summary Financial Results
 
 The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] reported first-quarter net income of $0.6 billion, or $0.78 per share, on revenue of $14.9 billion. Operating margin of 6.7 percent reflects strong core performance across the company's businesses on expected lower volumes and higher pension expense. The year-ago quarter included a $0.20 per share tax charge on health care legislation (Table 1). The company also reaffirmed its 2011 revenue, earnings per share and operating cash flow outlook.
CHICAGO, April 27, 2011
"We're off to a good start in an important year for our company," said Jim McNerney, Boeing chairman, president and chief executive officer. "We delivered strong operating performance, made significant progress on 787 and 747-8 flight testing, and scored a major win on the U.S. Air Force Tanker program. Our outlook remains positive, and our people are focused on meeting customer commitments,
 
driving productivity and competitiveness gains, and capturing growth opportunities in our Commercial Airplanes and Defense, Space & Security businesses."
Table 2. Cash Flow
 
 
Boeing's quarterly operating cash flow was ($1.0) billion on the expected lower volumes and continued investment in development programs. Free cash flow* was ($1.4) billion in the quarter (Table 2).
Table 3. Cash, Marketable Securities and Debt Balances
 
 
Cash and investments in marketable securities totaled $7.8 billion at quarter-end (Table 3), down from $10.5 billion at year-end. Debt was $11.7 billion, down from $12.4 billion at year-end, primarily due to Boeing Capital Corporation maturities.
Total company backlog at quarter-end was $329 billion, up from $321 billion at year-end. Orders for the quarter were $23 billion and included a strong Commercial order mix, the U.S. Air Force KC-46A Tanker contract and the U.S. Navy P-8A low-rate initial production contract.
 
Segment Results
Commercial Airplanes
Table 4. Commercial Airplanes Operating Results
 
Boeing Commercial Airplanes first-quarter revenue decreased by 5 percent to $7.1 billion on planned lower 777 deliveries. Operating margin was 7.2 percent, reflecting the lower deliveries and higher R&D (Table 4).
Flight testing on the 787 program continued during the quarter, surpassing 3,500 hours on 1,250 flights. First delivery is expected in the third quarter of 2011. Total firm orders for the 787 at quarter-end were 835 airplanes from 56 customers.
The 747-8 program flight test also progressed during the quarter, surpassing 2,500 hours on 900 flights. First flight of the 747-8 Intercontinental was achieved in March. Delivery of the first 747-8 Freighter is planned for mid-2011.
Commercial Airplanes booked 153 gross orders during the quarter while 47 orders were removed from its order book, bringing net orders to 106, up from the year-ago period when net orders were 83 airplanes. Backlog remains strong with over 3,400 airplanes valued at $263 billion.
 
Boeing Defense, Space & Security
Table 5. Defense, Space & Security Operating Results
 
Boeing Defense, Space & Security's (BDS) first-quarter revenue was $7.6 billion, while operating margin was 8.8 percent (Table 5).
Boeing Military Aircraft (BMA) first-quarter revenue increased by $0.2 billion to $3.4 billion, due to higher deliveries. Operating margin was 10.9 percent, reflecting improved performance and mix in Global Strike programs and lower R&D. During the quarter, BMA completed full scale static testing of P-8A and achieved first flight on the F-15 radar modernization program.
Network & Space Systems (N&SS) first-quarter revenue was $2.3 billion. Operating margin was 6.1 percent, reflecting less favorable mix and lower earnings in the satellite business. During the quarter, N&SS successfully completed an Inmarsat-5 satellite milestone and final acceptance of a SkyTerra satellite.
Global Services & Support (GS&S) first-quarter revenue decreased by $0.2 billion to $1.9 billion, due to the conclusion of the KC-10 support program in 2010 and delivery timing in integrated logistics and training systems & services. Operating margin was 8.5 percent, reflecting lower earnings in integrated logistics and maintenance, modifications & upgrades. During the quarter, GS&S was awarded a performance based logistics contract for the C-17 Globemaster III Sustainment Partnership and a follow-on to extend the F-22 sustainment contract.
 
Backlog at BDS increased slightly to $66 billion, approximately two times the unit's expected 2011 revenue.
Additional Financial Information
Table 6. Additional Financial Information
 
During the quarter, Boeing Capital Corporation's (BCC) portfolio balance declined to $4.5 billion, down from $4.7 billion at the beginning of the year on run-off and asset sales. BCC's debt-to-equity ratio was unchanged at 5.0-to-1.
The "Other" segment consists primarily of Boeing Engineering, Operations and Technology, as well as certain results related to the financial consolidation of all business units.
Total pension expense for the first quarter was $526 million, as compared to $284 million in the same period last year. A total of $431 million was allocated to the operating segments in the quarter, up from $305 million in the same period last year, and $95 million was recognized in unallocated items, compared to a benefit of $21 million in the same period last year.
The company's income tax expense was $295 million in the quarter, down from $531 million in the same period last year, as the year-ago quarter included a $150 million ($0.20 per share) tax charge on health care legislation.
 
Outlook
The company's 2011 financial guidance (Table 7) is reaffirmed, reflecting solid core operating performance, higher pension expense, planned deliveries on development programs and the current defense contracting environment.
Table 7. Financial Outlook
 
 
 
Non-GAAP Measure Disclosure
Management believes that the non-GAAP (Generally Accepted Accounting Principles) measures (indicated by an asterisk *) used in this report provide investors with important perspectives into the company's ongoing business performance. The company does not intend for the information to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the related GAAP measures. Other companies may define the measures differently. The following definitions are provided:
Free Cash Flow
Free cash flow is defined as GAAP less capital expenditures for . Management believes free cash flow provides investors with an important perspective on the cash available for shareholders, debt repayment, and acquisitions after making the capital investments required to support ongoing business operations and long term value creation. Free cash flow does not represent the residual cash flow available for discretionary expenditures as it excludes certain mandatory expenditures such as repayment of maturing debt. Management uses free cash flow internally to assess both business performance and overall liquidity. Table 2 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and free cash flow.
operating cash flow
property, plant and equipment additions
 
This document contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "may," "will," "should," "expects," "intends," "projects," "plans," "believes," "estimates," "targets," "anticipates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. Examples of forward-looking statements include statements relating to our future financial condition and operating results, as well as any other statement that does not directly relate to any historical or current fact. Forward-looking statements are based on our current expectations and assumptions, which may not prove to be accurate. These statements are not guarantees and are subject to risks, uncertainties, and changes in circumstances that are difficult to predict. Many factors could cause actual results to differ materially and adversely from these forward-looking statements. Among these factors are risks related to: (1) general conditions in the economy and our industry, including those due to regulatory changes; (2) our reliance on our commercial customers, our suppliers and the worldwide market; (3) our commercial development programs, including the 787 and 747-8 commercial aircraft programs; (4) changing acquisition priorities of the U.S. government; (5) our dependence on U.S. government contracts; (6) our reliance on fixed-price contracts; (7) our reliance on cost-type contracts; (8) uncertainties concerning contracts that include in-orbit incentive payments; (9) changes in accounting estimates; (10) changes in the competitive landscape in our markets; (11) our non-U.S. operations, including sales to non-U.S. customers; (12) potential adverse developments in new or pending litigation and/or government investigations; (13) customer and aircraft concentration in Boeing Capital Corporation's customer financing portfolio; (14) changes in our ability to obtain debt on commercially reasonable terms and at competitive rates in order to fund our operations and contractual commitments; (15) realizing the anticipated benefits of mergers, acquisitions, joint ventures, strategic alliances or divestitures; (16) the adequacy of our insurance coverage to cover significant risk exposures; (17) potential business disruptions related to physical security threats, information technology attacks or natural disasters; (18) work stoppages or other labor disruptions; (19) significant changes in discount rates and actual investment return on pension assets; and (20) potential environmental liabilities.
Additional information concerning these and other factors can be found in our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including our most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q and Current Reports on Form 8-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which it is made, and we assume no obligation to update or revise any forward-looking statement, whether as a result of new information, future events, or otherwise, except as required by law.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20110503144249.txt.gz
TIME:20110503144249
EVENTS:	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On May 2, 2011, the Board of Directors (the "Board") of The Boeing Company (the "Company") approved and adopted an amendment to Article II, Section 1 of the Company's By-Laws to decrease the number of directors from thirteen to twelve. A copy of the amended and restated By-Laws is attached hereto as Exhibit 3.2 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
The Company held its Annual Meeting of Shareholders on May 2, 2011. Set forth below are the voting results for each of the matters submitted to a vote of the shareholders.
 
 
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: May 3, 2011
 

Exhibit 3.2
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The Annual Meeting of the stockholders shall be held on such date and at such time as the Board of Directors shall determine, for the election of directors and the transaction of such other business as may come before the meeting.
 
A special meeting of stockholders may be called at any time by the Board of Directors, or by stockholders holding together at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, except as otherwise provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto.
 
All meetings of the stockholders of the Corporation shall be held at such place or places, if any, within or without the State of Delaware as may from time to time be fixed by the Board of Directors or as shall be specified or fixed in the respective notices or waivers of notice thereof.
 
Except as otherwise required by statute and as set forth below, notice of each annual or special meeting of stockholders shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date. If the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, notice of each special meeting of stockholders shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than fifty-five (55) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date, unless the calling of such meeting is ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, in which case notice of such special meeting shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date. Such notice shall be given by delivering to each stockholder a written or printed notice thereof either personally or by mailing such notice in a postage-prepaid envelope addressed to the stockholder's address as it appears on the stock books of the Corporation or by transmitting the notice to the stockholder in any other manner permitted by Delaware law. Except as otherwise required by statute, no publication of any notice of a meeting of stockholders shall be required. Every notice of a meeting of stockholders shall state the place, if any (or the means of remote communication, if any, by which stockholders and proxy holders may be deemed to be present in person), date, and hour of the meeting and, in the case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called. Notices are deemed given (i) if by mail, when deposited in the United States mail, postage prepaid, directed to the stockholder at such stockholder's address as it appears on the records of the Corporation, or, if a stockholder shall have filed with the Secretary a written request that notices to such stockholder be mailed to some other address, then directed to such stockholder at such other address; (ii) if by facsimile, when directed to a number at which the stockholder has consented to receive notice; (iii) if by electronic mail, when directed to an electronic mail address at which the stockholder has consented to receive such notice; (iv) if by posting on an electronic network together with a separate notice to the stockholder of such specific posting, upon the later to occur of (A) such posting and (B) the giving of such separate notice of such posting; and (v) if by any other form of electronic transmission, when directed to the stockholder as required by law and, to the extent required by applicable law, in the manner consented to by the stockholder. An affidavit of the mailing or other means of giving any notice of any stockholders' meeting, executed by the Secretary, Assistant Corporate Secretary or any transfer agent of the Corporation giving the notice, shall be prima facie evidence of the giving of such notice. Notice shall be deemed to have been given to all stockholders of record who share an address if notice is given in accordance with the "householding" rules set forth in Rule 14a-3(e)
 
under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") and Section 233 of the Delaware General Corporation Law.
 
Whenever any notice is required to be given to any stockholder under the provisions of these By-Laws, the Certificate of Incorporation, or the Delaware General Corporation Law, a waiver thereof in writing, signed by the person or persons entitled to such notice, whether before or after the time stated therein, shall be deemed equivalent to the giving of such notice. The attendance of a stockholder at a meeting, in person or by proxy, or waiver by electronic transmission, shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when a stockholder attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened.
 
At all meetings of stockholders, except when otherwise provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by these By-Laws, the presence, in person or by proxy duly authorized, of the holders of one-third of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and except as otherwise provided by statute or rule of law, or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by these By-Laws, the vote, in person or by proxy, of the holders of a majority of the shares constituting such quorum shall be binding upon all stockholders of the Corporation. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote may adjourn any meeting, from time to time but not for a period of more than thirty (30) days at any one time, until a quorum shall attend. At any such adjourned meeting at which a quorum shall be present, any business may be transacted which might have been transacted at the meeting as originally called. Unless otherwise provided by statute, no notice of an adjourned meeting need be given.
 
 
Each stockholder entitled to vote at a meeting of stockholders or to express consent or dissent to corporate action in writing without a meeting may authorize another person or persons to act for such stockholder by proxy. Such authorization may be accomplished (a) by the stockholder or such stockholder's authorized officer, director, employee, or agent executing a writing or causing his or her signature to be affixed to such writing by any reasonable means, including facsimile signature, or (b) by transmitting or authorizing the transmission of a telegram, cablegram, or other means of electronic transmission to the intended holder of the proxy or to a proxy solicitation firm, proxy support service, or similar agent duly authorized by the intended proxy holder to receive such transmission; provided, that any such telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission must either set forth or be accompanied by information from which it can be determined that the telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission was authorized by the stockholder. Any copy, facsimile telecommunication, or other reliable reproduction of the writing or transmission by which a stockholder has authorized another person to act as proxy for such stockholder may be substituted or used in lieu of the original writing or transmission for any and all purposes for which the original writing or transmission could be used, provided that such copy, facsimile telecommunication, or other reproduction shall be a complete reproduction of the entire original writing or transmission.
 
A proxy shall be filed with the Secretary of the Corporation before or at the time of the meeting or the delivery to the Corporation of the consent to corporate action in writing. A proxy shall become invalid three (3) years after the date of its execution, unless otherwise provided in the proxy. A proxy with respect to a specified meeting shall entitle the holder thereof to vote at any reconvened meeting following adjournment of such meeting but shall not be valid after the final adjournment thereof.
 
 
In advance of any meeting of stockholders, the Board of Directors of the Corporation shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspectors of election at such meeting and to make a written report thereof. The Board of Directors may designate one or more persons to serve as alternate inspectors to serve in place of any inspector who is unable or fails to act. If no inspector or alternate is able to act at a meeting of stockholders, the chairman of such meeting shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspector at such meeting.
 
The inspectors of election shall (a) ascertain the number of shares of the Corporation outstanding and the voting power of each such share; (b) determine the shares represented at the meeting and the validity of proxies and ballots; (c) count all votes and ballots; (d) determine and retain for a reasonable period of time a record of the disposition of any challenges made to any determination by them; and (e) certify their determination of the number of shares represented at the meeting and their count of the votes and ballots. Each inspector shall, before entering upon the discharge of his or her duties, take and sign an oath to faithfully execute the duties of inspector with strict impartiality and according to the best of his or her ability. The inspectors may appoint or retain other persons or entities to assist them in the performance of their duties.
 
The validity of any proxy or ballot executed for a meeting of stockholders shall be determined by the inspectors of election in accordance with the applicable provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law as then in effect. In determining the validity of any proxy transmitted by telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission, the inspectors shall record in writing the information upon which they relied in making such determination.
 
 
For the purpose of determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at any meeting of stockholders or any adjournment thereof, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which record date shall be not fewer than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the date of such meeting. If the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, the record date for each special meeting of stockholders shall be not fewer than fifty-five (55) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date, unless the calling of such meeting is ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation. If no record date is fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall be at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which notice is given, or, if notice is waived, at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which the meeting is held. A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting; provided, however, that the Board of Directors may fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
 
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which date shall not be more than ten (10) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days after the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, when no prior action by the Board of Directors is required by Chapter 1 of the Delaware General Corporation Law as now or hereafter
 
amended, shall be the first date on which a signed written consent setting forth the action taken or proposed to be taken is delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the records of proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Delivery made to the Corporation's registered office shall be by hand or by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors and prior action by the Board of Directors is required by Chapter 1 of the Delaware General Corporation Law as now or hereafter amended, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution taking such prior action.
 
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to receive payment of any dividend or other distribution or allotment of any rights or the stockholders entitled to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion, or exchange of stock, or for the purpose of any other lawful action, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted, and which record date shall be not more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days prior to such action. If no record date is fixed, the record date for determining stockholders for any such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution relating thereto.
 
At least ten (10) days before each meeting of stockholders, a complete list of the stockholders entitled to vote at such meeting shall be made, arranged in alphabetical order, and showing the address of each stockholder and the number of shares registered in the name of each stockholder. This list shall be open to examination by any stockholder, for any purpose germane to the meeting, for a period of ten (10) days prior to the meeting, either (i) on a reasonably accessible electronic network, provided that the information required to gain access to such list is provided with the notice of meeting, or (ii) during ordinary business hours at the principal place of business of the Corporation. The list shall also be produced and kept at such meeting for inspection by any stockholder who is present.
 
Subject to the provisions of Article NINTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, any action which could be taken at any annual or special meeting of stockholders may be taken without a meeting, without prior notice, and without a vote, if a consent or consents in writing, setting forth the action so taken, are (a) signed by the holders of outstanding stock having not fewer than the minimum number of votes that would be necessary to authorize or take such action at a meeting at which all shares entitled to vote thereon were present and voted and (b) delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the records of proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Delivery made to the Corporation's registered office shall be by hand or by certified mail or registered mail, return receipt requested. Every written consent shall bear the date of signature of each stockholder who signs the consent, and no written consent shall be effective to take the corporate action referred to therein unless written consents signed by a sufficient number of stockholders to take such action are delivered to the Corporation, in the manner required by this Section, within sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days of the date of the earliest dated consent delivered to the Corporation in the manner required by this Section 10. The validity of any consent executed by a proxy for a stockholder pursuant to a telegram, cablegram, or other means of electronic transmission transmitted to such proxy holder by or upon the authorization of the stockholder shall be determined by or at the direction of the Secretary of the Corporation. A written record of the information upon which the person making such determination relied shall be made and kept in the records of the proceedings of the stockholders. Any such consent shall be inserted in the minute book as if it were the minutes of a meeting of stockholders. Prompt notice of the taking of the corporate action without a meeting by less than unanimous written consent shall be given to those stockholders who have not consented in writing.
 
 
A. Annual Meetings of Stockholders.
1. Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors and the proposal of other business to be considered by the stockholders may be made at an annual meeting of stockholders (a) as specified in the Corporation's notice of meeting (or any supplement thereto); (b) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof; or (c) by any stockholder of the Corporation who (i) was a stockholder of record at the time the notice provided for in this By-Law is delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation, (ii) is entitled to vote at the meeting, and (iii) complies with the notice procedures set forth in this By-Law as to such nomination or other business; clause (c) shall be the exclusive means for a stockholder to make nominations or submit proposals for other business (other than matters properly brought under Rule 14a-8 under the Exchange Act and included in the Corporation's notice of meeting) before an annual meeting of stockholders.
2. Without qualification, for any nominations or any other business to be properly brought before an annual meeting by a stockholder pursuant to Section 11.1.A(1)(c), the stockholder must have given timely notice thereof in writing to the Secretary of the Corporation and any such proposed business (other than the nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors) must constitute a proper matter for stockholder action. To be timely, a stockholder's notice shall be delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not earlier than the close of business on the one hundred and twentieth (120th) day and not later than the close of business on the ninetieth (90th) day prior to the first anniversary of the preceding year's annual meeting; provided, however, that in the event that the date of the annual meeting is more than thirty (30) days before or more than seventy (70) days after such anniversary date, notice by the stockholder to be timely must be so delivered not later than the close of business on the later of the ninetieth (90th) day prior to such annual meeting and the tenth (10th) day following the day on which public announcement of the date of such annual meeting is first made by the Corporation. In no event shall the postponement of a meeting as to which notice has been sent to stockholders commence a new time period (or extend any time period) for the giving of a stockholder's notice as described above. To be in proper form, such stockholder's notice (whether given pursuant to this Section 11.1.A(2) or Section 11.1.B) to the Secretary of the Corporation must: (a) set forth, as to the stockholder giving the notice and the beneficial owner, if any, on whose behalf the nomination or proposal for other business is made (i) the name and address of such stockholder, as they appear on the Corporation's books, and of such beneficial owner, if any, (ii) (A) the class or series and number of shares of the Corporation which are, directly or indirectly, owned beneficially and of record by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, (B) any option, warrant, convertible security, stock appreciation right, or similar right with an exercise or conversion privilege or a settlement payment or mechanism at a price related to any class or series of shares of the Corporation or with a value derived in whole or in part from the value of any class or series of shares of the Corporation, whether or not such instrument or right shall be subject to settlement in the underlying class or series of shares of the Corporation or otherwise (a "Derivative Instrument") directly or indirectly owned beneficially by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, and any other direct or indirect opportunity to profit or share in any profit derived from any increase or decrease in the value of shares of the Corporation, (C) any proxy, contract, arrangement, understanding, or relationship pursuant to which such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, has a right to vote any shares of any security of the Corporation, (D) any short interest in any security of the Corporation (for purposes of this By-Law a person shall be deemed to have a short interest in a security if such person directly or indirectly, through any contract, arrangement, understanding, relationship or otherwise, has the opportunity to profit or share in any profit derived from any decrease in the value of the subject security), (E) any rights to dividends on the shares of the Corporation owned beneficially by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, that are separated or separable from the underlying shares of the Corporation, (F) any proportionate interest in shares of the Corporation or Derivative Instruments held, directly or indirectly, by a general or limited partnership in which such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, is a general partner or, directly or indirectly, beneficially owns an interest in a general partner, and (G) any performance-related fees (other than an asset-based fee) that such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, is entitled to based on any increase or decrease in the value of shares of the Corporation or Derivative Instruments, if any, all such information to be provided as of the date of such notice, including, without limitation, any such interests held by members of such stockholder's and such beneficial owner's, if any, immediate family sharing the same household (which information shall be supplemented by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, not
 
later than ten (10) days after the record date for the annual meeting to disclose such ownership as of the record date), (iii) any other information relating to such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, that would be required to be disclosed in a proxy statement or other filings required to be made in connection with solicitations of proxies for, as applicable, the proposal of other business and/or for the election of directors in a contested election pursuant to Section 14 of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, and (iv) a representation (A) that the stockholder is a holder of record of stock of the Corporation entitled to vote at such annual meeting and intends to appear in person or by proxy at the annual meeting to propose such business or nomination and (B) whether the stockholder or the beneficial owner, if any, intends or is part of a group which intends (x) to deliver a proxy statement and/or form of proxy to holders of at least the percentage of the Corporation's outstanding capital stock required to approve or adopt the proposal or elect the nominee and/or (y) otherwise to solicit proxies from stockholders in support of such proposal or nomination; (b) if the notice relates to any business other than the nomination of a director or directors that the stockholder proposes to bring before the annual meeting, set forth (i) a brief description of the business desired to be brought before the annual meeting, the text of the proposal or business (including the text of any resolutions proposed for consideration and in the event that such business includes a proposal to amend these By-Laws, the language of the proposed amendment), the reasons for conducting such business at the annual meeting and any material interest of such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, in such business and (ii) a description of all agreements, arrangements, and understandings between such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, and their respective affiliates and associates, and any other person or persons (including their names) acting in concert therewith in connection with the proposal of such business by such stockholder; (c) set forth, as to each person, if any, whom the stockholder proposes to nominate for election or reelection to the Board of Directors (i) all information relating to such person that would be required to be disclosed in a proxy statement or other filings required to be made in connection with solicitations of proxies for election of directors in a contested election pursuant to Section 14 of the Exchange Act, (ii) such person's written consent to being named in the proxy statement as a nominee and to serving as a director if elected and a statement whether such person, if elected, intends to tender, promptly following such person's election or reelection, an irrevocable resignation effective upon such person's failure to receive the required vote for reelection at the next meeting at which such person would face reelection and upon acceptance of such resignation by the Board of Directors, and (iii) a description of all direct and indirect compensation and other material monetary agreements, arrangements and understandings during the past three (3) years, and any other material relationships, between or among such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, and their respective affiliates and associates, or any other person or persons (including their names) acting in concert therewith, on the one hand, and each proposed nominee, and his or her respective affiliates and associates, or any other person or persons (including their names) acting in concert therewith, on the other hand, including, without limitation, all information that would be required to be disclosed pursuant to Rule 404 promulgated under Regulation S-K if the stockholder making the nomination and any beneficial owner on whose behalf the nomination is made, if any, or any affiliate or associate thereof or person acting in concert therewith, were the "registrant" for purposes of such rule and the nominee were a director or executive officer of such registrant; and (d) with respect to each nominee for election or reelection to the Board of Directors, include the completed and signed questionnaire, representation and agreement required by Section 11.3. The Corporation may require any proposed nominee to furnish such other information as may reasonably be required by the Corporation to determine the eligibility of such proposed nominee to serve as an independent director of the Corporation or that could be material to a reasonable stockholder's understanding of the independence, or lack thereof, of such nominee.
3. Notwithstanding anything in the second sentence of Section 11.1.A(2) to the contrary, in the event that the number of directors to be elected to the Board of Directors of the Corporation is increased effective at the annual meeting and there is no public announcement by the Corporation naming all of the nominees for director or specifying the size of the increased Board of Directors at least one hundred (100) days prior to the first anniversary of the preceding year's annual meeting, a stockholder's notice required by this By-Law shall also be considered timely, but only with respect to nominees for any new positions created by such increase, if it shall be delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not later than the close of business on the tenth (10th) day following the day on which such public announcement is first made by the Corporation.
 
B. Special Meetings of Stockholders.
Only such business shall be conducted at a special meeting of stockholders as shall have been brought before the special meeting pursuant to the Corporation's notice of meeting. Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors may be made at a special meeting at which directors are to be elected pursuant to the Corporation's notice of special meeting (a) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof or stockholders pursuant to Article 1, Section 2 hereof, or (b) provided that the Board of Directors or stockholders pursuant to Article 1, Section 2 hereof has determined that directors shall be elected at such special meeting, by any stockholder of the Corporation who (i) is a stockholder of record at the time the notice provided for in this By-Law is delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation and at the time of the special meeting, (ii) is entitled to vote at the special meeting, and (iii) complies with the notice procedures set forth in this By-Law as to such nomination. In the event the Corporation calls a special meeting for the purpose of electing one or more directors to the Board of Directors, any such stockholder may nominate a person or persons (as the case may be) for election to such position(s) as specified in the Corporation's notice of meeting, if the stockholder's notice required by Section 11.1.A(2) (including the completed and signed questionnaire, representation and agreement required by Section 11.3) shall be delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not earlier than the close of business on the one hundred and twentieth (120th) day prior to such special meeting and not later than the close of business on the later of the ninetieth (90th) day prior to such special meeting and the tenth (10th) day following the day on which public announcement is first made of the date of the special meeting and of the nominees proposed by the Board of Directors to be elected at such special meeting. In no event shall the postponement of a special meeting as to which notice has been sent to stockholders commence a new time period (or extend any time period) for the giving of a stockholder's notice as described above.
C. General.
1. Only such persons who are nominated in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law shall be eligible to serve as directors and only such business shall be conducted at a meeting of stockholders as shall have been brought before the meeting in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law. Except as otherwise provided by law, the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, the chairman of the meeting shall have the power and duty (a) to determine whether a nomination or any other business proposed to be brought before the meeting was made or proposed, as the case may be, in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law (including whether the stockholder or beneficial owner, if any, on whose behalf the nomination or proposal is made solicited (or is part of a group which solicited) or did not so solicit, as the case may be, proxies in support of such stockholder's nominee or proposal in compliance with such stockholder's representation as required by Section 11.1.A(2)(a)(iv)) and (b) if any proposed nomination or business was not made or proposed in compliance with this By-Law, to declare that such nomination shall be disregarded or that such proposed business shall not be transacted. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this By-Law, unless otherwise required by law, if the stockholder (or a qualified representative of the stockholder) does not appear at the annual or special meeting of stockholders of the Corporation to present a nomination or proposed business, such nomination shall be disregarded and such proposed business shall not be transacted, notwithstanding that proxies in respect of such vote may have been received by the Corporation. For purposes of this By-Law, to be considered a qualified representative of the stockholder, a person must be a duly authorized officer, manager, or partner of such stockholder or must be authorized by a writing executed by such stockholder or an electronic transmission delivered by such stockholder to act for such stockholder as proxy at the annual or special meeting and such person must produce such writing or electronic transmission, or a reliable reproduction of the writing or electronic transmission, at the annual or special meeting.
1. For purposes of this By-Law, "public announcement" shall mean disclosure in a press release reported by the Dow Jones News Service, Associated Press, or comparable national news service or in a document publicly filed by the Corporation with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to Section 13, 14 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.
2. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this By-Law, a stockholder shall also comply with all applicable requirements of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder with respect to the matters set forth in this By-Law; provided, however, that any references in these By-Laws to the Exchange Act are not intended to and shall not limit the requirements applicable to any nominations or proposals as to any other business to be considered pursuant to this By-Law (including Section 11.1A(1)(c) or
 
Section 11.1B). Nothing in this By-Law shall be deemed to affect any rights (a) of stockholders to request inclusion of proposals in the Corporation's proxy statement pursuant to Rule 14a-8 under the Exchange Act or (b) of the holders of any series of Preferred Stock if and to the extent provided for under law, the Certificate of Incorporation, or these By-Laws.
 
A nominee for director shall be elected to the Board of Directors if the votes cast for such nominee's election exceed the votes cast against such nominee's election; provided, however, that the directors shall be elected by a plurality of the votes cast at any meeting of stockholders for which (i) the Secretary of the Corporation receives a notice that a stockholder has nominated a person for election to the Board of Directors in compliance with the advance notice requirements for stockholder nominees for director set forth in Section 11.1 of this By-law and (ii) such nomination has not been withdrawn by such stockholder on or prior to the tenth day preceding the date the Corporation first mails its notice of meeting for such meeting to stockholders. If directors are to be elected by a plurality of the votes cast, stockholders shall not be permitted to vote against a nominee. Votes cast shall exclude abstentions with respect to that director's election.
 
To be eligible to be a nominee for election or reelection as a director of the Corporation, a person must deliver (in accordance with the time periods prescribed for delivery of notice under Section 11.1) to the Secretary of the Corporation at the principal executive offices of the Corporation a written questionnaire with respect to the background and qualification of such person and the background of any other person or entity on whose behalf the nomination is being made (which questionnaire shall be provided by the Secretary upon written request) and a written representation and agreement (in the form provided by the Secretary of the Corporation upon written request), that such person (a) is not and will not become a party to (i) any agreement, arrangement, or understanding with, and has not given any commitment or assurance to, any person or entity as to how such person, if elected as a director of the Corporation, will act or vote on any issue or question (a "Voting Commitment") that has not been disclosed to the Corporation or (ii) any Voting Commitment that could limit or interfere with such person's ability to comply, if elected as a director of the Corporation, with such person's fiduciary duties under applicable law; (b) is not and will not become a party to any agreement, arrangement, or understanding with any person or entity other than the Corporation with respect to any direct or indirect compensation, reimbursement, or indemnification in connection with service or action as a director that has not been disclosed therein; and (c) in such person's individual capacity and on behalf of any person or entity on whose behalf the nomination is being made, would be in compliance, if elected as a director of the Corporation, and will comply with all applicable publicly disclosed corporate governance, conflict of interest, confidentiality and stock ownership and trading policies and guidelines of the Corporation.
 
Any written notice required to be delivered by a stockholder to the Corporation pursuant to Section 11.1 of this Article I or Section 2.1 of Article II of these By-Laws must be given, either by personal delivery or by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, to the Secretary of the Corporation at the Corporation's executive offices in the City of Chicago, State of Illinois.
 
The number of directors shall be twelve (12), but the number may be increased, or decreased to not less than three (3), from time to time, either by the directors by adoption of a resolution to such effect or by the stockholders by amendment of these By-Laws in accordance with Article VIII. At each annual meeting of stockholders, each
 
director shall be elected to hold office until the next annual meeting or until his or her successor shall be elected and qualified or until his or her earlier resignation or removal.
 
 
Only persons who are nominated in accordance with Article I, Section 11 of these By-Laws shall be eligible for election as directors.
 
At each election of directors by stockholders, the persons who are elected in accordance with Article I, Section 11 of these By-Laws shall be the directors.
 
Meetings of the Board of Directors, or of any committee thereof, may be held either within or without the State of Delaware.
 
Each year the Board of Directors shall meet in connection with the annual meeting of stockholders for the purpose of electing officers and for the transaction of other business. No notice of such annual meeting is required. Such annual meeting may be held at any other time or place which shall be specified in a notice given as hereinafter provided for special meetings of the Board of Directors, or in a consent and waiver of notice thereof, signed by all the directors.
 
The Board of Directors may, by resolution adopted by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors, from time to time appoint the time and place for holding stated meetings of the Board of Directors, if by it deemed advisable; and such stated meetings shall thereupon be held at the time and place so appointed, without the giving of any special notice with regard thereto. In case the day appointed for a stated meeting shall fall upon a legal holiday, such meeting shall be held on the next following day, not a legal holiday, at the regularly appointed hour. Except as otherwise provided in these By-Laws, any and all business may be transacted at any stated meeting.
 
 
Special meetings of the Board of Directors may be called by or at the request of the Chairman of the Board of Directors or any two (2) directors. Notice of a special meeting of the Board of Directors, stating the place, day, and hour of the meeting, shall be given to each director in writing (by mail, wire, facsimile, or personal delivery) or orally (by telephone or in person).
 
With respect to a special meeting of the Board of Directors, a written waiver, signed by a director, or waiver by electronic transmission, shall be deemed equivalent to notice to that director. A director's attendance at a meeting shall constitute that director's waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the director attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting was not lawfully called or convened. Neither the business to be transacted at, nor the purpose of, any regular or special meeting of the Board of Directors need be specified in the waiver of notice of such meeting.
 
Except as herein otherwise provided, forty percent (40%) of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided in these By-Laws at the time of any stated or special meeting of the Board of Directors or, if vacancies exist on the Board of Directors, forty percent (40%) of such number of directors then in office; provided, however, that such number may not be less than one-third of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided in these By-Laws, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and, except as otherwise required by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by these By-Laws, the act of a majority of the directors present at any such meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of the Board of Directors. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the directors present may adjourn any meeting, from time to time, until a quorum is present. No notice of any adjourned meeting need be given.
 
The Chairman of the Board shall preside, when present, at all meetings of the Board of Directors, except as otherwise provided by law.
 
Any director of the Corporation may resign at any time by giving written notice or notice by electronic transmission thereof to the Secretary of the Corporation. Such resignation shall take effect at the time specified therefor or if the time is not specified, upon delivery thereof; and, unless otherwise specified with respect thereto, the acceptance of such resignation shall not be necessary to make it effective.
 
Any directors may be removed with or without cause by the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, at a meeting of stockholders called for that purpose; and the vacancy on the Board of Directors caused by any such removal may be filled by the stockholders at such meeting or at any subsequent meeting.
 
In case of any increase in the number of directors, or of any vacancy created by death or resignation, the additional director or directors may be elected or, as the case may be, the vacancy or vacancies may be filled, either (a) by the Board of Directors at any meeting, (i) if the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, or (ii) if the Corporation does not have an Interested Stockholder, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the remaining directors, though less than a quorum or (b) by the stockholders entitled to vote, either at an annual meeting or at a special meeting thereof called for that purpose, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the outstanding shares entitled to vote at such meeting.
 
The Board of Directors shall have authority to determine from time to time the amount of compensation that shall be paid to its members for attendance at meetings of the Board of Directors or of any committee of the Board of Directors.
 
Any action required or permitted to be taken at any meeting of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof may be taken without a meeting if all members of the Board of Directors or committee, as the case may be, consent thereto in writing, and the writing or writings are filed with the minutes of proceedings of the Board of Directors or committee.
 
 
In addition to any committees appointed pursuant to Section 2 of this Article, there shall be an Audit Committee, appointed annually by the Board of Directors, consisting of at least three (3) directors who are not members of management. It shall be the responsibility of the Audit Committee to review the scope and results of the annual independent audit of books and records of the Corporation and its subsidiaries and to discharge such other responsibilities as may from time to time be assigned to it by the Board of Directors. The Audit Committee shall meet at such times and places as the members deem advisable, and shall make such recommendations to the Board of Directors as they consider appropriate.
 
 
The Board of Directors may appoint standing or temporary committees and invest such committees with such powers as it may see fit, with power to subdelegate such powers if deemed desirable by the Board of Directors; but no such committee shall have the power or authority of the Board of Directors to adopt, amend, or repeal these By-Laws or approve, adopt, or recommend to the stockholders of the Corporation any action or matter expressly required by the Certificate of Incorporation, these By-Laws or the Delaware General Corporation Law to be submitted to stockholders for approval.
 
The Board of Directors may designate one or more directors as alternate members of any committee, who may replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of the committee. In the absence or disqualification of a member of a committee, the member or members thereof present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, whether or not such member or members constitute a quorum, may unanimously appoint another member of the Board of Directors to act at the meeting in the place of any such absent or disqualified member.
 
A majority of the number of directors composing any committee of the Board of Directors, as established and fixed by resolution of the Board of Directors, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at any meeting of such committee but, if less than a majority are present at a meeting, a majority of such directors present may adjourn the meeting from time to time without further notice. The act of a majority of the members of a committee present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of such committee.
 
The elected officers of the Corporation shall be a Chairman of the Board of Directors (who shall be a director) and, at the discretion of the Board of Directors, a President (who shall be a director), and one or more Vice Presidents (each of whom may be assigned by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer an additional title descriptive of the functions assigned to such officer and one or more of whom may be designated Executive or Senior Vice President). The Board of Directors may also elect one or more Vice Chairmen. The Board of Directors shall also designate either the Chairman of the Board of Directors or the President as the Chief Executive Officer of
 
the Corporation. The Board of Directors shall appoint a Controller, a Secretary, and a Treasurer. Any number of offices, whether elective or appointive, may be held by the same person. The Chief Executive Officer may, by a writing filed with the Secretary, designate titles as officers for employees and agents and appoint Assistant Secretaries and Assistant Treasurers as, from time to time, may appear to be necessary or advisable in the conduct of the affairs of the Corporation and may, in the same manner, terminate or change such titles.
 
So far as practicable, all elected officers shall be elected at the annual meeting of the Board of Directors in each year, and shall hold office until the annual meeting of the Board of Directors in the next subsequent year and until their respective successors are chosen. The Controller, Secretary, and Treasurer shall hold office at the pleasure of the Board of Directors.
 
The salaries paid to the elected officers of the Corporation shall be authorized or approved by the Board of Directors.
 
None of the officers, directors, or employees of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations shall at any time be paid any bonus or share in the earnings or profits of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations except pursuant to a plan approved by affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members of the Board of Directors.
 
Any elected or appointed officer may be removed at any time, either for or without cause, by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors, at any meeting called for the purpose.
 
If any vacancy occurs in any office, the Board of Directors may elect or appoint a successor to fill such vacancy for the remainder of the term.
 
The Chairman of the Board of Directors shall preside, when present, at all meetings of the stockholders (except as otherwise provided by statute) and at all meetings of the Board of Directors. The Chairman shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation; to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the Chairman by the Board of Directors.
 
The President shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation and to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; during the absence or disability of the Chairman of the Board of Directors, to exercise the Chairman's powers and to perform the Chairman's duties; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the President by the Board of Directors; provided, that if the office of President is vacant, the Chairman shall exercise the duties ordinarily exercised by the President until such time as a President is elected or appointed.
 
The officer designated by the Board of Directors as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation shall have general and active control of its business and affairs. The Chief Executive Officer shall have general power to
 
appoint or designate all employees and agents of the Corporation whose appointment or designation is not otherwise provided for and to fix the compensation thereof, subject to the provisions of these By-Laws; to remove or suspend any employee or agent who shall not have been elected or appointed by the Board of Directors or other body; to suspend for cause any employee, agent, or officer, other than an elected officer, pending final action by the body which shall have appointed such employee, agent, or officer; and to exercise all the powers usually pertaining to the office held by the Chief Executive Officer of a corporation.
 
The several Vice Presidents and the Controller shall perform all such duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of them, from time to time, by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer, respectively.
 
The Secretary shall attend to the giving of notice of all meetings of stockholders and of the Board of Directors and shall keep and attest true records of all such proceedings. The Secretary shall have charge of the corporate seal and have authority to attest any and all instruments or writings to which the same may be affixed and shall keep and account for all books, documents, papers, and records of the Corporation relating to its corporate organization. The Secretary shall have authority to sign stock certificates and shall generally perform all the duties usually appertaining to the office of secretary of a corporation. In the absence of the Secretary, an Assistant Secretary or Secretary pro tempore shall perform the duties of the Secretary.
 
The Treasurer shall have the care and custody of all moneys, funds, and securities of the Corporation, and shall deposit or cause to be deposited all funds of the Corporation in accordance with directions or authorizations of the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer. The Treasurer shall have power to sign stock certificates, to indorse for deposit or collection, or otherwise, all checks, drafts, notes, bills of exchange, or other commercial paper payable to the Corporation, and to give proper receipts or discharges therefor. In the absence of the Treasurer, an Assistant Treasurer shall perform the duties of the Treasurer.
 
In addition to the foregoing especially enumerated duties and powers, the several officers of the Corporation shall perform such other duties and exercise such further powers as may be provided in these By-Laws or as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine, or as may be assigned to them by any superior officer.
 
If, as a result of a disaster or other state of emergency, the Chief Executive Officer is unable to perform the duties of that office, (a) the powers and duties of the Chief Executive Officer shall be performed by the employee with the highest base salary who shall be available and capable of performing such powers and duties and, if more than one such employee has the same base salary, by the employee whose surname begins with the earliest letter of the alphabet among the group of those employees with the same base salary; (b) the officer performing such duties shall continue to perform such powers and duties until the Chief Executive Officer becomes capable of performing those duties or until the Board of Directors shall have elected a new Chief Executive Officer or designated another individual as Acting Chief Executive Officer; (c) such officer shall have the power in addition to all other powers granted to the Chief Executive Officer by these By-Laws and by the Board of Directors to appoint an acting President, acting Vice President - Finance, acting Controller, acting Secretary, and acting Treasurer, if any of the persons duly elected to any such office is not, by reason of such disaster or emergency, able to perform the duties of such office, each of such acting appointees to serve in such capacities until the officer for whom the appointee is acting becomes capable of performing the duties of such office or until the Board of Directors shall have designated another individual to perform such duties or have elected another person to fill such office; (d) any such acting officer so appointed shall be entitled to exercise all powers vested by these By-Laws or the Board of Directors in the duly elected officer for whom the acting officer is acting; and (e) anyone transacting business with the Corporation may rely upon a certification by any two (2) officers of the Corporation that a specified individual has succeeded to
 
the powers of the Chief Executive Officer and that such person has appointed other acting officers as herein provided and any person, firm, corporation, or other entity to which such certification has been delivered by such officers may continue to rely upon it until notified of a change in writing signed by two (2) officers of the Corporation.
 
The shares of the stock of the Corporation shall be represented by certificates, provided that the Board of Directors may provide by resolution or resolutions that some or all of any or all classes or series of stock shall be uncertificated shares. Any such resolution shall not apply to shares represented by certificate until such certificate is surrendered to the Corporation. Every holder of stock of the Corporation represented by a certificate shall be entitled to a certificate, signed by the Chairman of the Board of Directors or the President or a Vice President and the Treasurer or an Assistant Treasurer or the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary, certifying the number of shares owned by the stockholder in the Corporation. Any and all of the signatures on a certificate may be a facsimile. If any officer, transfer agent, or registrar who has signed or whose facsimile signature has been placed upon a certificate shall have ceased to be such officer, transfer agent, or registrar before such certificate is issued, it may be issued by the Corporation with the same effect as if he or she were such officer, transfer agent, or registrar at the date of issue.
 
The Board of Directors may, in its discretion, appoint responsible banks or trust companies in the Borough of Manhattan, in the City of New York, State of New York, and in such other city or cities as the Board of Directors may deem advisable, from time to time, to act as transfer agents and registrars of the stock of the Corporation; and, when such appointments shall have been made, no stock certificate shall be valid until countersigned by one of such transfer agents and registered by one of such registrars.
 
Shares of stock may be transferred by delivery of the certificates therefor, accompanied either by an assignment in writing on the back of the certificates or by written power of attorney to sell, assign, and transfer the same, signed by the record holder thereof (or, with respect to uncertificated shares, by delivery of duly executed instructions or in any other manner permitted by law), but no transfer shall affect the right of the Corporation to pay any dividend upon the stock to the holder of record thereof, or to treat the holder of record as the holder in fact thereof for all purposes, and no transfer shall be valid, except between the parties thereto, until such transfer shall have been made upon the books of the Corporation.
 
The Board of Directors may provide for the issuance of new certificates of stock or uncertificated shares to replace certificates of stock lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, or alleged to be lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, upon such terms and in accordance with such procedures as the Board of Directors shall deem proper and prescribe.
 
The fiscal year of the Corporation shall be the calendar year.
 
 
All bills, notes, checks, or other instruments for the payment of money shall be signed or countersigned by such officer or officers and in such manner as from time to time may be prescribed by resolution (whether general or special) of the Board of Directors.
 
 
Each person who was or is made a party to or is threatened to be made a party to or is otherwise involved (including, without limitation, as a witness) in any actual or threatened action, suit, or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative, or investigative (hereinafter a "proceeding"), by reason of the fact that he or she is or was a director or officer of the Corporation or that, being or having been such a director or officer or an employee of the Corporation, he or she is or was serving at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation as a director, officer, employee, or agent of another corporation or of a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise, including service with respect to an employee benefit plan (hereinafter an "indemnitee"), whether the basis of such proceeding is alleged action in an official capacity as such a director, officer, employee, or agent or in any other capacity while serving as such a director, officer, employee, or agent, shall be indemnified and held harmless by the Corporation to the full extent permitted by the Delaware General Corporation Law, as the same exists or may hereafter be amended (but, in the case of any such amendment, only to the extent that such amendment permits the Corporation to provide broader indemnification rights than permitted prior thereto), or by other applicable law as then in effect, against all expense, liability, and loss (including attorneys' fees, judgments, fines, ERISA excise taxes or penalties, and amounts paid in settlement) actually and reasonably incurred or suffered by such indemnitee in connection therewith, and such indemnification shall continue as to an indemnitee who has ceased to be a director, officer, employee, or agent and shall inure to the benefit of the indemnitee's heirs, executors, and administrators; provided, however, that except as provided in Section 4.2 with respect to proceedings seeking to enforce rights to indemnification, the Corporation shall indemnify any such indemnitee in connection with a proceeding (or part thereof) initiated by such indemnitee only if such proceeding (or part thereof) was authorized or ratified by the Board of Directors. The right to indemnification conferred in this Section 4.1 shall be a contract right and shall include the right to be paid by the Corporation the expenses incurred in defending any such proceeding in advance of its final disposition (hereinafter an "advancement of expenses"); provided, however, that an advancement of expenses incurred by an indemnitee in his or her capacity as a director or officer or former director or officer (and not in any other capacity in which service was or is rendered by such indemnitee, including, without limitation, service to an employee benefit plan) shall be made only upon delivery to the Corporation of an undertaking (hereinafter an "undertaking"), by or on behalf of such indemnitee, to repay all amounts so advanced if it shall ultimately be determined by final judicial decision from which there is no further right to appeal that such indemnitee is not entitled to be indemnified for such expenses under this Section 4.1 or otherwise; and provided, further, that an advancement of expenses shall not be made if the Board of Directors makes a good faith determination that such payment would violate law or public policy.
 
If a claim under Section 4.1 is not paid in full by the Corporation within sixty (60) days after a written claim has been received by the Corporation, except in the case of a claim for an advancement of expenses, in which case the applicable period shall be twenty (20) days, the indemnitee may at any time thereafter bring suit against the Corporation to recover the unpaid amount of the claim. If successful in whole or in part in any such suit, or in a suit brought by the Corporation to recover an advancement of expenses pursuant to the terms of an undertaking, the indemnitee shall also be entitled to be paid the expenses of prosecuting or defending such suit. The indemnitee shall be presumed to be entitled to indemnification under this Section 4 upon submission of a written claim (and, in an action brought to enforce a claim for an advancement of expenses, where the required undertaking has been tendered to the Corporation), and thereafter the Corporation shall have the burden of proof to overcome the presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled. Neither the failure of the Corporation (including the Board of Directors,
 
independent legal counsel, or the stockholders) to have made a determination prior to the commencement of such suit that indemnification of the indemnitee is proper in the circumstances, nor an actual determination by the Corporation (including the Board of Directors, independent legal counsel, or the stockholders) that the indemnitee is not entitled to indemnification shall be a defense to the suit or create a presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled.
 
The rights to indemnification and to the advancement of expenses conferred in this Section 4 shall not be exclusive of any other right that any person may have or hereafter acquire under any statute, provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation, these By-Laws, any agreement, vote of stockholders or disinterested directors, or otherwise. Neither any amendment to or repeal of this Section 4 or of any of the procedures established by the Board of Directors pursuant to Section 4.7, nor the adoption of any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, nor, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any modification of law, shall eliminate or reduce the effect of the right or protection of any indemnitee to indemnification and to the advancement of expenses in accordance with the provisions hereof and thereof with respect to any proceeding (regardless of when such proceeding is first threatened, commenced or completed) arising out of, or related to, any acts or omissions of such indemnitee occurring prior to such amendment or repeal.
 
The Corporation may maintain insurance, at its expense, to protect itself and any director, officer, employee, or agent of the Corporation or another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise against any expense, liability, or loss, whether or not the Corporation would have the power to indemnify such person against such expense, liability, or loss under the Delaware General Corporation Law. The Corporation may, without further stockholder approval, enter into contracts with any indemnitee in furtherance of the provisions of this Section 4 and may create a trust fund, grant a security interest, or use other means (including, without limitation, a letter of credit) to ensure the payment of such amounts as may be necessary to effect indemnification as provided in this Section 4.
 
Any person who is or was a director, officer, or employee of the Corporation who is or was serving (i) as a director or officer of another corporation of which a majority of the shares entitled to vote in the election of its directors is held by the Corporation or (ii) in an executive or management capacity in a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise of which the Corporation or a wholly owned subsidiary of the Corporation is a general partner or has a majority ownership shall be deemed to be so serving at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation and entitled to indemnification and advancement of expenses under Section 4.1.
 
The Corporation may, by action of the Board of Directors, authorize one or more executive officers to grant rights to advancement of expenses to employees or agents of the Corporation on such terms and conditions as such officer or officers deem appropriate under the circumstances. The Corporation may, by action of the Board of Directors, grant rights to indemnification and advancement of expenses to employees or agents or groups of employees or agents of the Corporation with the same scope and effect as the provisions of this Section 4 with respect to the indemnification and advancement of expenses of directors and officers of the Corporation; provided, however, that an undertaking shall be made by an employee or agent only if required by the Board of Directors.
 
The Board of Directors may establish reasonable procedures for the submission of claims for indemnification pursuant to this Section 4, determination of the entitlement of any person thereto, and review of any such determination. Such procedures shall be set forth in an appendix to these By-Laws and shall be deemed for all purposes to be a part hereof.
 
 
Except as herein otherwise expressly provided, the By-Laws of the Corporation may be altered or repealed in any particular and new By-Laws, not inconsistent with any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or any provision of law, may be adopted, either by
A. the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority in number of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote at an annual meeting of stockholders or at a special meeting thereof, the notice of which special meeting shall include the form of the proposed alteration or repeal or of the proposed new By-Laws, or a summary thereof; or
B. either by
i. the affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors at any meeting thereof, or
ii. the affirmative vote of all the directors present at any meeting at which a quorum, less than a majority, is present;
provided, in either of the latter cases, that the notice of such meeting shall include the form of the proposed alteration or repeal or of the proposed new By-Laws, or a summary thereof; and provided, further, that Article I, Section 11.2 of these By-Laws may be amended only as set forth in Section 1.A of this By-Law, except that any amendment required by law or necessary or desirable to cure an administrative or technical deficiency may be made as provided in Section 1.B of this By-Law.
 
Notwithstanding anything contained in these By-Laws to the contrary, the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the Voting Stock, as defined in Article FOURTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, at a meeting of stockholders called for the purpose, shall be required to alter, amend, repeal, or adopt any provision inconsistent with Sections 3, 4 and 5 of Article IV of these By-Laws, notice of which meeting shall include the form of the proposed amendment, or a summary thereof.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20110614145514.txt.gz
TIME:20110614145514
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On June 13, 2011, the Board of Directors (the "Board") of The Boeing Company (the "Company") accepted John E. Bryson's offer to resign from the Board effective immediately. In accordance with the Company's Corporate Governance Principles, on June 3, 2011 Mr. Bryson offered to resign from the Board after being nominated by President Obama to serve as U.S. Secretary of Commerce.
 
On June 13, 2011, the Board adopted an amendment to Article II, Section 1 of the Company's By-Laws (the "By-Laws") to decrease the number of directors from twelve to eleven in connection with the Board's acceptance of Mr. Bryson's offer to resign from the Board, as set forth in Item 5.02 above. A copy of the amended and restated By-Laws is attached hereto as Exhibit 3.2 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: June 14, 2011
 

Exhibit 3.2
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The Annual Meeting of the stockholders shall be held on such date and at such time as the Board of Directors shall determine, for the election of directors and the transaction of such other business as may come before the meeting.
 
A special meeting of stockholders may be called at any time by the Board of Directors, or by stockholders holding together at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, except as otherwise provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto.
 
All meetings of the stockholders of the Corporation shall be held at such place or places, if any, within or without the State of Delaware as may from time to time be fixed by the Board of Directors or as shall be specified or fixed in the respective notices or waivers of notice thereof.
 
Except as otherwise required by statute and as set forth below, notice of each annual or special meeting of stockholders shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date. If the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, notice of each special meeting of stockholders shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than fifty-five (55) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date, unless the calling of such meeting is ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, in which case notice of such special meeting shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date. Such notice shall be given by delivering to each stockholder a written or printed notice thereof either personally or by mailing such notice in a postage-prepaid envelope addressed to the stockholder's address as it appears on the stock books of the Corporation or by transmitting the notice to the stockholder in any other manner permitted by Delaware law. Except as otherwise required by statute, no publication of any notice of a meeting of stockholders shall be required. Every notice of a meeting of stockholders shall state the place, if any (or the means of remote communication, if any, by which stockholders and proxy holders may be deemed to be present in person), date, and hour of the meeting and, in the case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called. Notices are deemed given (i) if by mail, when deposited in the United States mail, postage prepaid, directed to the stockholder at such stockholder's address as it appears on the records of the Corporation, or, if a stockholder shall have filed with the Secretary a written request that notices to such stockholder be mailed to some other address, then directed to such stockholder at such other address; (ii) if by facsimile, when directed to a number at which the stockholder has consented to receive notice; (iii) if by electronic mail, when directed to an electronic mail address at which the stockholder has consented to receive such notice; (iv) if by posting on an electronic network together with a separate notice to the stockholder of such specific posting, upon the later to occur of (A) such posting and (B) the giving of such separate notice of such posting; and (v) if by any other form of electronic transmission, when directed to the stockholder as required by law and, to the extent required by applicable law, in the manner consented to by the stockholder. An affidavit of the mailing or other means of giving any notice of any stockholders' meeting, executed by the Secretary, Assistant Corporate Secretary or any transfer agent of the Corporation giving the notice, shall be prima facie evidence of the giving of such notice. Notice shall be deemed to have been given to all stockholders of record who share an address if notice is given in accordance with the "householding" rules set forth in Rule 14a-3(e)
 
under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") and Section 233 of the Delaware General Corporation Law.
 
Whenever any notice is required to be given to any stockholder under the provisions of these By-Laws, the Certificate of Incorporation, or the Delaware General Corporation Law, a waiver thereof in writing, signed by the person or persons entitled to such notice, whether before or after the time stated therein, shall be deemed equivalent to the giving of such notice. The attendance of a stockholder at a meeting, in person or by proxy, or waiver by electronic transmission, shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when a stockholder attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened.
 
At all meetings of stockholders, except when otherwise provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by these By-Laws, the presence, in person or by proxy duly authorized, of the holders of one-third of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and except as otherwise provided by statute or rule of law, or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by these By-Laws, the vote, in person or by proxy, of the holders of a majority of the shares constituting such quorum shall be binding upon all stockholders of the Corporation. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote may adjourn any meeting, from time to time but not for a period of more than thirty (30) days at any one time, until a quorum shall attend. At any such adjourned meeting at which a quorum shall be present, any business may be transacted which might have been transacted at the meeting as originally called. Unless otherwise provided by statute, no notice of an adjourned meeting need be given.
 
 
Each stockholder entitled to vote at a meeting of stockholders or to express consent or dissent to corporate action in writing without a meeting may authorize another person or persons to act for such stockholder by proxy. Such authorization may be accomplished (a) by the stockholder or such stockholder's authorized officer, director, employee, or agent executing a writing or causing his or her signature to be affixed to such writing by any reasonable means, including facsimile signature, or (b) by transmitting or authorizing the transmission of a telegram, cablegram, or other means of electronic transmission to the intended holder of the proxy or to a proxy solicitation firm, proxy support service, or similar agent duly authorized by the intended proxy holder to receive such transmission; provided, that any such telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission must either set forth or be accompanied by information from which it can be determined that the telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission was authorized by the stockholder. Any copy, facsimile telecommunication, or other reliable reproduction of the writing or transmission by which a stockholder has authorized another person to act as proxy for such stockholder may be substituted or used in lieu of the original writing or transmission for any and all purposes for which the original writing or transmission could be used, provided that such copy, facsimile telecommunication, or other reproduction shall be a complete reproduction of the entire original writing or transmission.
 
A proxy shall be filed with the Secretary of the Corporation before or at the time of the meeting or the delivery to the Corporation of the consent to corporate action in writing. A proxy shall become invalid three (3) years after the date of its execution, unless otherwise provided in the proxy. A proxy with respect to a specified meeting shall entitle the holder thereof to vote at any reconvened meeting following adjournment of such meeting but shall not be valid after the final adjournment thereof.
 
 
In advance of any meeting of stockholders, the Board of Directors of the Corporation shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspectors of election at such meeting and to make a written report thereof. The Board of Directors may designate one or more persons to serve as alternate inspectors to serve in place of any inspector who is unable or fails to act. If no inspector or alternate is able to act at a meeting of stockholders, the chairman of such meeting shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspector at such meeting.
 
The inspectors of election shall (a) ascertain the number of shares of the Corporation outstanding and the voting power of each such share; (b) determine the shares represented at the meeting and the validity of proxies and ballots; (c) count all votes and ballots; (d) determine and retain for a reasonable period of time a record of the disposition of any challenges made to any determination by them; and (e) certify their determination of the number of shares represented at the meeting and their count of the votes and ballots. Each inspector shall, before entering upon the discharge of his or her duties, take and sign an oath to faithfully execute the duties of inspector with strict impartiality and according to the best of his or her ability. The inspectors may appoint or retain other persons or entities to assist them in the performance of their duties.
 
The validity of any proxy or ballot executed for a meeting of stockholders shall be determined by the inspectors of election in accordance with the applicable provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law as then in effect. In determining the validity of any proxy transmitted by telegram, cablegram, or other electronic transmission, the inspectors shall record in writing the information upon which they relied in making such determination.
 
 
For the purpose of determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at any meeting of stockholders or any adjournment thereof, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which record date shall be not fewer than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the date of such meeting. If the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, the record date for each special meeting of stockholders shall be not fewer than fifty-five (55) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date, unless the calling of such meeting is ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation. If no record date is fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall be at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which notice is given, or, if notice is waived, at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which the meeting is held. A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting; provided, however, that the Board of Directors may fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
 
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which date shall not be more than ten (10) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days after the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, when no prior action by the Board of Directors is required by Chapter 1 of the Delaware General Corporation Law as now or hereafter
 
amended, shall be the first date on which a signed written consent setting forth the action taken or proposed to be taken is delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the records of proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Delivery made to the Corporation's registered office shall be by hand or by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors and prior action by the Board of Directors is required by Chapter 1 of the Delaware General Corporation Law as now or hereafter amended, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution taking such prior action.
 
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to receive payment of any dividend or other distribution or allotment of any rights or the stockholders entitled to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion, or exchange of stock, or for the purpose of any other lawful action, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted, and which record date shall be not more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days prior to such action. If no record date is fixed, the record date for determining stockholders for any such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution relating thereto.
 
At least ten (10) days before each meeting of stockholders, a complete list of the stockholders entitled to vote at such meeting shall be made, arranged in alphabetical order, and showing the address of each stockholder and the number of shares registered in the name of each stockholder. This list shall be open to examination by any stockholder, for any purpose germane to the meeting, for a period of ten (10) days prior to the meeting, either (i) on a reasonably accessible electronic network, provided that the information required to gain access to such list is provided with the notice of meeting, or (ii) during ordinary business hours at the principal place of business of the Corporation. The list shall also be produced and kept at such meeting for inspection by any stockholder who is present.
 
Subject to the provisions of Article NINTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, any action which could be taken at any annual or special meeting of stockholders may be taken without a meeting, without prior notice, and without a vote, if a consent or consents in writing, setting forth the action so taken, are (a) signed by the holders of outstanding stock having not fewer than the minimum number of votes that would be necessary to authorize or take such action at a meeting at which all shares entitled to vote thereon were present and voted and (b) delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the records of proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Delivery made to the Corporation's registered office shall be by hand or by certified mail or registered mail, return receipt requested. Every written consent shall bear the date of signature of each stockholder who signs the consent, and no written consent shall be effective to take the corporate action referred to therein unless written consents signed by a sufficient number of stockholders to take such action are delivered to the Corporation, in the manner required by this Section, within sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days of the date of the earliest dated consent delivered to the Corporation in the manner required by this Section 10. The validity of any consent executed by a proxy for a stockholder pursuant to a telegram, cablegram, or other means of electronic transmission transmitted to such proxy holder by or upon the authorization of the stockholder shall be determined by or at the direction of the Secretary of the Corporation. A written record of the information upon which the person making such determination relied shall be made and kept in the records of the proceedings of the stockholders. Any such consent shall be inserted in the minute book as if it were the minutes of a meeting of stockholders. Prompt notice of the taking of the corporate action without a meeting by less than unanimous written consent shall be given to those stockholders who have not consented in writing.
 
 
A. Annual Meetings of Stockholders.
1. Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors and the proposal of other business to be considered by the stockholders may be made at an annual meeting of stockholders (a) as specified in the Corporation's notice of meeting (or any supplement thereto); (b) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof; or (c) by any stockholder of the Corporation who (i) was a stockholder of record at the time the notice provided for in this By-Law is delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation, (ii) is entitled to vote at the meeting, and (iii) complies with the notice procedures set forth in this By-Law as to such nomination or other business; clause (c) shall be the exclusive means for a stockholder to make nominations or submit proposals for other business (other than matters properly brought under Rule 14a-8 under the Exchange Act and included in the Corporation's notice of meeting) before an annual meeting of stockholders.
2. Without qualification, for any nominations or any other business to be properly brought before an annual meeting by a stockholder pursuant to Section 11.1.A(1)(c), the stockholder must have given timely notice thereof in writing to the Secretary of the Corporation and any such proposed business (other than the nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors) must constitute a proper matter for stockholder action. To be timely, a stockholder's notice shall be delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not earlier than the close of business on the one hundred and twentieth (120th) day and not later than the close of business on the ninetieth (90th) day prior to the first anniversary of the preceding year's annual meeting; provided, however, that in the event that the date of the annual meeting is more than thirty (30) days before or more than seventy (70) days after such anniversary date, notice by the stockholder to be timely must be so delivered not later than the close of business on the later of the ninetieth (90th) day prior to such annual meeting and the tenth (10th) day following the day on which public announcement of the date of such annual meeting is first made by the Corporation. In no event shall the postponement of a meeting as to which notice has been sent to stockholders commence a new time period (or extend any time period) for the giving of a stockholder's notice as described above. To be in proper form, such stockholder's notice (whether given pursuant to this Section 11.1.A(2) or Section 11.1.B) to the Secretary of the Corporation must: (a) set forth, as to the stockholder giving the notice and the beneficial owner, if any, on whose behalf the nomination or proposal for other business is made (i) the name and address of such stockholder, as they appear on the Corporation's books, and of such beneficial owner, if any, (ii) (A) the class or series and number of shares of the Corporation which are, directly or indirectly, owned beneficially and of record by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, (B) any option, warrant, convertible security, stock appreciation right, or similar right with an exercise or conversion privilege or a settlement payment or mechanism at a price related to any class or series of shares of the Corporation or with a value derived in whole or in part from the value of any class or series of shares of the Corporation, whether or not such instrument or right shall be subject to settlement in the underlying class or series of shares of the Corporation or otherwise (a "Derivative Instrument") directly or indirectly owned beneficially by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, and any other direct or indirect opportunity to profit or share in any profit derived from any increase or decrease in the value of shares of the Corporation, (C) any proxy, contract, arrangement, understanding, or relationship pursuant to which such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, has a right to vote any shares of any security of the Corporation, (D) any short interest in any security of the Corporation (for purposes of this By-Law a person shall be deemed to have a short interest in a security if such person directly or indirectly, through any contract, arrangement, understanding, relationship or otherwise, has the opportunity to profit or share in any profit derived from any decrease in the value of the subject security), (E) any rights to dividends on the shares of the Corporation owned beneficially by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, that are separated or separable from the underlying shares of the Corporation, (F) any proportionate interest in shares of the Corporation or Derivative Instruments held, directly or indirectly, by a general or limited partnership in which such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, is a general partner or, directly or indirectly, beneficially owns an interest in a general partner, and (G) any performance-related fees (other than an asset-based fee) that such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, is entitled to based on any increase or decrease in the value of shares of the Corporation or Derivative Instruments, if any, all such information to be provided as of the date of such notice, including, without limitation, any such interests held by members of such stockholder's and such beneficial owner's, if any, immediate family sharing the same household (which information shall be supplemented by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, not
 
later than ten (10) days after the record date for the annual meeting to disclose such ownership as of the record date), (iii) any other information relating to such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, that would be required to be disclosed in a proxy statement or other filings required to be made in connection with solicitations of proxies for, as applicable, the proposal of other business and/or for the election of directors in a contested election pursuant to Section 14 of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, and (iv) a representation (A) that the stockholder is a holder of record of stock of the Corporation entitled to vote at such annual meeting and intends to appear in person or by proxy at the annual meeting to propose such business or nomination and (B) whether the stockholder or the beneficial owner, if any, intends or is part of a group which intends (x) to deliver a proxy statement and/or form of proxy to holders of at least the percentage of the Corporation's outstanding capital stock required to approve or adopt the proposal or elect the nominee and/or (y) otherwise to solicit proxies from stockholders in support of such proposal or nomination; (b) if the notice relates to any business other than the nomination of a director or directors that the stockholder proposes to bring before the annual meeting, set forth (i) a brief description of the business desired to be brought before the annual meeting, the text of the proposal or business (including the text of any resolutions proposed for consideration and in the event that such business includes a proposal to amend these By-Laws, the language of the proposed amendment), the reasons for conducting such business at the annual meeting and any material interest of such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, in such business and (ii) a description of all agreements, arrangements, and understandings between such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, and their respective affiliates and associates, and any other person or persons (including their names) acting in concert therewith in connection with the proposal of such business by such stockholder; (c) set forth, as to each person, if any, whom the stockholder proposes to nominate for election or reelection to the Board of Directors (i) all information relating to such person that would be required to be disclosed in a proxy statement or other filings required to be made in connection with solicitations of proxies for election of directors in a contested election pursuant to Section 14 of the Exchange Act, (ii) such person's written consent to being named in the proxy statement as a nominee and to serving as a director if elected and a statement whether such person, if elected, intends to tender, promptly following such person's election or reelection, an irrevocable resignation effective upon such person's failure to receive the required vote for reelection at the next meeting at which such person would face reelection and upon acceptance of such resignation by the Board of Directors, and (iii) a description of all direct and indirect compensation and other material monetary agreements, arrangements and understandings during the past three (3) years, and any other material relationships, between or among such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, and their respective affiliates and associates, or any other person or persons (including their names) acting in concert therewith, on the one hand, and each proposed nominee, and his or her respective affiliates and associates, or any other person or persons (including their names) acting in concert therewith, on the other hand, including, without limitation, all information that would be required to be disclosed pursuant to Rule 404 promulgated under Regulation S-K if the stockholder making the nomination and any beneficial owner on whose behalf the nomination is made, if any, or any affiliate or associate thereof or person acting in concert therewith, were the "registrant" for purposes of such rule and the nominee were a director or executive officer of such registrant; and (d) with respect to each nominee for election or reelection to the Board of Directors, include the completed and signed questionnaire, representation and agreement required by Section 11.3. The Corporation may require any proposed nominee to furnish such other information as may reasonably be required by the Corporation to determine the eligibility of such proposed nominee to serve as an independent director of the Corporation or that could be material to a reasonable stockholder's understanding of the independence, or lack thereof, of such nominee.
3. Notwithstanding anything in the second sentence of Section 11.1.A(2) to the contrary, in the event that the number of directors to be elected to the Board of Directors of the Corporation is increased effective at the annual meeting and there is no public announcement by the Corporation naming all of the nominees for director or specifying the size of the increased Board of Directors at least one hundred (100) days prior to the first anniversary of the preceding year's annual meeting, a stockholder's notice required by this By-Law shall also be considered timely, but only with respect to nominees for any new positions created by such increase, if it shall be delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not later than the close of business on the tenth (10th) day following the day on which such public announcement is first made by the Corporation.
 
B. Special Meetings of Stockholders.
Only such business shall be conducted at a special meeting of stockholders as shall have been brought before the special meeting pursuant to the Corporation's notice of meeting. Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors may be made at a special meeting at which directors are to be elected pursuant to the Corporation's notice of special meeting (a) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof or stockholders pursuant to Article 1, Section 2 hereof, or (b) provided that the Board of Directors or stockholders pursuant to Article 1, Section 2 hereof has determined that directors shall be elected at such special meeting, by any stockholder of the Corporation who (i) is a stockholder of record at the time the notice provided for in this By-Law is delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation and at the time of the special meeting, (ii) is entitled to vote at the special meeting, and (iii) complies with the notice procedures set forth in this By-Law as to such nomination. In the event the Corporation calls a special meeting for the purpose of electing one or more directors to the Board of Directors, any such stockholder may nominate a person or persons (as the case may be) for election to such position(s) as specified in the Corporation's notice of meeting, if the stockholder's notice required by Section 11.1.A(2) (including the completed and signed questionnaire, representation and agreement required by Section 11.3) shall be delivered to the Secretary of the Corporation at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not earlier than the close of business on the one hundred and twentieth (120th) day prior to such special meeting and not later than the close of business on the later of the ninetieth (90th) day prior to such special meeting and the tenth (10th) day following the day on which public announcement is first made of the date of the special meeting and of the nominees proposed by the Board of Directors to be elected at such special meeting. In no event shall the postponement of a special meeting as to which notice has been sent to stockholders commence a new time period (or extend any time period) for the giving of a stockholder's notice as described above.
C. General.
1. Only such persons who are nominated in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law shall be eligible to serve as directors and only such business shall be conducted at a meeting of stockholders as shall have been brought before the meeting in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law. Except as otherwise provided by law, the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, the chairman of the meeting shall have the power and duty (a) to determine whether a nomination or any other business proposed to be brought before the meeting was made or proposed, as the case may be, in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law (including whether the stockholder or beneficial owner, if any, on whose behalf the nomination or proposal is made solicited (or is part of a group which solicited) or did not so solicit, as the case may be, proxies in support of such stockholder's nominee or proposal in compliance with such stockholder's representation as required by Section 11.1.A(2)(a)(iv)) and (b) if any proposed nomination or business was not made or proposed in compliance with this By-Law, to declare that such nomination shall be disregarded or that such proposed business shall not be transacted. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this By-Law, unless otherwise required by law, if the stockholder (or a qualified representative of the stockholder) does not appear at the annual or special meeting of stockholders of the Corporation to present a nomination or proposed business, such nomination shall be disregarded and such proposed business shall not be transacted, notwithstanding that proxies in respect of such vote may have been received by the Corporation. For purposes of this By-Law, to be considered a qualified representative of the stockholder, a person must be a duly authorized officer, manager, or partner of such stockholder or must be authorized by a writing executed by such stockholder or an electronic transmission delivered by such stockholder to act for such stockholder as proxy at the annual or special meeting and such person must produce such writing or electronic transmission, or a reliable reproduction of the writing or electronic transmission, at the annual or special meeting.
1. For purposes of this By-Law, "public announcement" shall mean disclosure in a press release reported by the Dow Jones News Service, Associated Press, or comparable national news service or in a document publicly filed by the Corporation with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to Section 13, 14 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.
2. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this By-Law, a stockholder shall also comply with all applicable requirements of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder with respect to the matters set forth in this By-Law; provided, however, that any references in these By-Laws to the Exchange Act are not intended to and shall not limit the requirements applicable to any nominations or proposals as to any other business to be considered pursuant to this By-Law (including Section 11.1A(1)(c) or
 
Section 11.1B). Nothing in this By-Law shall be deemed to affect any rights (a) of stockholders to request inclusion of proposals in the Corporation's proxy statement pursuant to Rule 14a-8 under the Exchange Act or (b) of the holders of any series of Preferred Stock if and to the extent provided for under law, the Certificate of Incorporation, or these By-Laws.
 
A nominee for director shall be elected to the Board of Directors if the votes cast for such nominee's election exceed the votes cast against such nominee's election; provided, however, that the directors shall be elected by a plurality of the votes cast at any meeting of stockholders for which (i) the Secretary of the Corporation receives a notice that a stockholder has nominated a person for election to the Board of Directors in compliance with the advance notice requirements for stockholder nominees for director set forth in Section 11.1 of this By-law and (ii) such nomination has not been withdrawn by such stockholder on or prior to the tenth day preceding the date the Corporation first mails its notice of meeting for such meeting to stockholders. If directors are to be elected by a plurality of the votes cast, stockholders shall not be permitted to vote against a nominee. Votes cast shall exclude abstentions with respect to that director's election.
 
To be eligible to be a nominee for election or reelection as a director of the Corporation, a person must deliver (in accordance with the time periods prescribed for delivery of notice under Section 11.1) to the Secretary of the Corporation at the principal executive offices of the Corporation a written questionnaire with respect to the background and qualification of such person and the background of any other person or entity on whose behalf the nomination is being made (which questionnaire shall be provided by the Secretary upon written request) and a written representation and agreement (in the form provided by the Secretary of the Corporation upon written request), that such person (a) is not and will not become a party to (i) any agreement, arrangement, or understanding with, and has not given any commitment or assurance to, any person or entity as to how such person, if elected as a director of the Corporation, will act or vote on any issue or question (a "Voting Commitment") that has not been disclosed to the Corporation or (ii) any Voting Commitment that could limit or interfere with such person's ability to comply, if elected as a director of the Corporation, with such person's fiduciary duties under applicable law; (b) is not and will not become a party to any agreement, arrangement, or understanding with any person or entity other than the Corporation with respect to any direct or indirect compensation, reimbursement, or indemnification in connection with service or action as a director that has not been disclosed therein; and (c) in such person's individual capacity and on behalf of any person or entity on whose behalf the nomination is being made, would be in compliance, if elected as a director of the Corporation, and will comply with all applicable publicly disclosed corporate governance, conflict of interest, confidentiality and stock ownership and trading policies and guidelines of the Corporation.
 
Any written notice required to be delivered by a stockholder to the Corporation pursuant to Section 11.1 of this Article I or Section 2.1 of Article II of these By-Laws must be given, either by personal delivery or by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, to the Secretary of the Corporation at the Corporation's executive offices in the City of Chicago, State of Illinois.
 
The number of directors shall be eleven (11), but the number may be increased, or decreased to not less than three (3), from time to time, either by the directors by adoption of a resolution to such effect or by the stockholders by amendment of these By-Laws in accordance with Article VIII. At each annual meeting of stockholders, each
 
director shall be elected to hold office until the next annual meeting or until his or her successor shall be elected and qualified or until his or her earlier resignation or removal.
 
 
Only persons who are nominated in accordance with Article I, Section 11 of these By-Laws shall be eligible for election as directors.
 
At each election of directors by stockholders, the persons who are elected in accordance with Article I, Section 11 of these By-Laws shall be the directors.
 
Meetings of the Board of Directors, or of any committee thereof, may be held either within or without the State of Delaware.
 
Each year the Board of Directors shall meet in connection with the annual meeting of stockholders for the purpose of electing officers and for the transaction of other business. No notice of such annual meeting is required. Such annual meeting may be held at any other time or place which shall be specified in a notice given as hereinafter provided for special meetings of the Board of Directors, or in a consent and waiver of notice thereof, signed by all the directors.
 
The Board of Directors may, by resolution adopted by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors, from time to time appoint the time and place for holding stated meetings of the Board of Directors, if by it deemed advisable; and such stated meetings shall thereupon be held at the time and place so appointed, without the giving of any special notice with regard thereto. In case the day appointed for a stated meeting shall fall upon a legal holiday, such meeting shall be held on the next following day, not a legal holiday, at the regularly appointed hour. Except as otherwise provided in these By-Laws, any and all business may be transacted at any stated meeting.
 
 
Special meetings of the Board of Directors may be called by or at the request of the Chairman of the Board of Directors or any two (2) directors. Notice of a special meeting of the Board of Directors, stating the place, day, and hour of the meeting, shall be given to each director in writing (by mail, wire, facsimile, or personal delivery) or orally (by telephone or in person).
 
With respect to a special meeting of the Board of Directors, a written waiver, signed by a director, or waiver by electronic transmission, shall be deemed equivalent to notice to that director. A director's attendance at a meeting shall constitute that director's waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the director attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting was not lawfully called or convened. Neither the business to be transacted at, nor the purpose of, any regular or special meeting of the Board of Directors need be specified in the waiver of notice of such meeting.
 
Except as herein otherwise provided, forty percent (40%) of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided in these By-Laws at the time of any stated or special meeting of the Board of Directors or, if vacancies exist on the Board of Directors, forty percent (40%) of such number of directors then in office; provided, however, that such number may not be less than one-third of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided in these By-Laws, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and, except as otherwise required by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or any amendment thereto, or by these By-Laws, the act of a majority of the directors present at any such meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of the Board of Directors. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the directors present may adjourn any meeting, from time to time, until a quorum is present. No notice of any adjourned meeting need be given.
 
The Chairman of the Board shall preside, when present, at all meetings of the Board of Directors, except as otherwise provided by law.
 
Any director of the Corporation may resign at any time by giving written notice or notice by electronic transmission thereof to the Secretary of the Corporation. Such resignation shall take effect at the time specified therefor or if the time is not specified, upon delivery thereof; and, unless otherwise specified with respect thereto, the acceptance of such resignation shall not be necessary to make it effective.
 
Any directors may be removed with or without cause by the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, at a meeting of stockholders called for that purpose; and the vacancy on the Board of Directors caused by any such removal may be filled by the stockholders at such meeting or at any subsequent meeting.
 
In case of any increase in the number of directors, or of any vacancy created by death or resignation, the additional director or directors may be elected or, as the case may be, the vacancy or vacancies may be filled, either (a) by the Board of Directors at any meeting, (i) if the Corporation has an Interested Stockholder as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Continuing Directors, as defined in Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, or (ii) if the Corporation does not have an Interested Stockholder, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the remaining directors, though less than a quorum or (b) by the stockholders entitled to vote, either at an annual meeting or at a special meeting thereof called for that purpose, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the outstanding shares entitled to vote at such meeting.
 
The Board of Directors shall have authority to determine from time to time the amount of compensation that shall be paid to its members for attendance at meetings of the Board of Directors or of any committee of the Board of Directors.
 
Any action required or permitted to be taken at any meeting of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof may be taken without a meeting if all members of the Board of Directors or committee, as the case may be, consent thereto in writing, and the writing or writings are filed with the minutes of proceedings of the Board of Directors or committee.
 
 
In addition to any committees appointed pursuant to Section 2 of this Article, there shall be an Audit Committee, appointed annually by the Board of Directors, consisting of at least three (3) directors who are not members of management. It shall be the responsibility of the Audit Committee to review the scope and results of the annual independent audit of books and records of the Corporation and its subsidiaries and to discharge such other responsibilities as may from time to time be assigned to it by the Board of Directors. The Audit Committee shall meet at such times and places as the members deem advisable, and shall make such recommendations to the Board of Directors as they consider appropriate.
 
 
The Board of Directors may appoint standing or temporary committees and invest such committees with such powers as it may see fit, with power to subdelegate such powers if deemed desirable by the Board of Directors; but no such committee shall have the power or authority of the Board of Directors to adopt, amend, or repeal these By-Laws or approve, adopt, or recommend to the stockholders of the Corporation any action or matter expressly required by the Certificate of Incorporation, these By-Laws or the Delaware General Corporation Law to be submitted to stockholders for approval.
 
The Board of Directors may designate one or more directors as alternate members of any committee, who may replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of the committee. In the absence or disqualification of a member of a committee, the member or members thereof present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, whether or not such member or members constitute a quorum, may unanimously appoint another member of the Board of Directors to act at the meeting in the place of any such absent or disqualified member.
 
A majority of the number of directors composing any committee of the Board of Directors, as established and fixed by resolution of the Board of Directors, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at any meeting of such committee but, if less than a majority are present at a meeting, a majority of such directors present may adjourn the meeting from time to time without further notice. The act of a majority of the members of a committee present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of such committee.
 
The elected officers of the Corporation shall be a Chairman of the Board of Directors (who shall be a director) and, at the discretion of the Board of Directors, a President (who shall be a director), and one or more Vice Presidents (each of whom may be assigned by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer an additional title descriptive of the functions assigned to such officer and one or more of whom may be designated Executive or Senior Vice President). The Board of Directors may also elect one or more Vice Chairmen. The Board of Directors shall also designate either the Chairman of the Board of Directors or the President as the Chief Executive Officer of
 
the Corporation. The Board of Directors shall appoint a Controller, a Secretary, and a Treasurer. Any number of offices, whether elective or appointive, may be held by the same person. The Chief Executive Officer may, by a writing filed with the Secretary, designate titles as officers for employees and agents and appoint Assistant Secretaries and Assistant Treasurers as, from time to time, may appear to be necessary or advisable in the conduct of the affairs of the Corporation and may, in the same manner, terminate or change such titles.
 
So far as practicable, all elected officers shall be elected at the annual meeting of the Board of Directors in each year, and shall hold office until the annual meeting of the Board of Directors in the next subsequent year and until their respective successors are chosen. The Controller, Secretary, and Treasurer shall hold office at the pleasure of the Board of Directors.
 
The salaries paid to the elected officers of the Corporation shall be authorized or approved by the Board of Directors.
 
None of the officers, directors, or employees of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations shall at any time be paid any bonus or share in the earnings or profits of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations except pursuant to a plan approved by affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members of the Board of Directors.
 
Any elected or appointed officer may be removed at any time, either for or without cause, by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors, at any meeting called for the purpose.
 
If any vacancy occurs in any office, the Board of Directors may elect or appoint a successor to fill such vacancy for the remainder of the term.
 
The Chairman of the Board of Directors shall preside, when present, at all meetings of the stockholders (except as otherwise provided by statute) and at all meetings of the Board of Directors. The Chairman shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation; to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the Chairman by the Board of Directors.
 
The President shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation and to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; during the absence or disability of the Chairman of the Board of Directors, to exercise the Chairman's powers and to perform the Chairman's duties; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the President by the Board of Directors; provided, that if the office of President is vacant, the Chairman shall exercise the duties ordinarily exercised by the President until such time as a President is elected or appointed.
 
The officer designated by the Board of Directors as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation shall have general and active control of its business and affairs. The Chief Executive Officer shall have general power to
 
appoint or designate all employees and agents of the Corporation whose appointment or designation is not otherwise provided for and to fix the compensation thereof, subject to the provisions of these By-Laws; to remove or suspend any employee or agent who shall not have been elected or appointed by the Board of Directors or other body; to suspend for cause any employee, agent, or officer, other than an elected officer, pending final action by the body which shall have appointed such employee, agent, or officer; and to exercise all the powers usually pertaining to the office held by the Chief Executive Officer of a corporation.
 
The several Vice Presidents and the Controller shall perform all such duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of them, from time to time, by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer, respectively.
 
The Secretary shall attend to the giving of notice of all meetings of stockholders and of the Board of Directors and shall keep and attest true records of all such proceedings. The Secretary shall have charge of the corporate seal and have authority to attest any and all instruments or writings to which the same may be affixed and shall keep and account for all books, documents, papers, and records of the Corporation relating to its corporate organization. The Secretary shall have authority to sign stock certificates and shall generally perform all the duties usually appertaining to the office of secretary of a corporation. In the absence of the Secretary, an Assistant Secretary or Secretary pro tempore shall perform the duties of the Secretary.
 
The Treasurer shall have the care and custody of all moneys, funds, and securities of the Corporation, and shall deposit or cause to be deposited all funds of the Corporation in accordance with directions or authorizations of the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer. The Treasurer shall have power to sign stock certificates, to indorse for deposit or collection, or otherwise, all checks, drafts, notes, bills of exchange, or other commercial paper payable to the Corporation, and to give proper receipts or discharges therefor. In the absence of the Treasurer, an Assistant Treasurer shall perform the duties of the Treasurer.
 
In addition to the foregoing especially enumerated duties and powers, the several officers of the Corporation shall perform such other duties and exercise such further powers as may be provided in these By-Laws or as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine, or as may be assigned to them by any superior officer.
 
If, as a result of a disaster or other state of emergency, the Chief Executive Officer is unable to perform the duties of that office, (a) the powers and duties of the Chief Executive Officer shall be performed by the employee with the highest base salary who shall be available and capable of performing such powers and duties and, if more than one such employee has the same base salary, by the employee whose surname begins with the earliest letter of the alphabet among the group of those employees with the same base salary; (b) the officer performing such duties shall continue to perform such powers and duties until the Chief Executive Officer becomes capable of performing those duties or until the Board of Directors shall have elected a new Chief Executive Officer or designated another individual as Acting Chief Executive Officer; (c) such officer shall have the power in addition to all other powers granted to the Chief Executive Officer by these By-Laws and by the Board of Directors to appoint an acting President, acting Vice President - Finance, acting Controller, acting Secretary, and acting Treasurer, if any of the persons duly elected to any such office is not, by reason of such disaster or emergency, able to perform the duties of such office, each of such acting appointees to serve in such capacities until the officer for whom the appointee is acting becomes capable of performing the duties of such office or until the Board of Directors shall have designated another individual to perform such duties or have elected another person to fill such office; (d) any such acting officer so appointed shall be entitled to exercise all powers vested by these By-Laws or the Board of Directors in the duly elected officer for whom the acting officer is acting; and (e) anyone transacting business with the Corporation may rely upon a certification by any two (2) officers of the Corporation that a specified individual has succeeded to
 
the powers of the Chief Executive Officer and that such person has appointed other acting officers as herein provided and any person, firm, corporation, or other entity to which such certification has been delivered by such officers may continue to rely upon it until notified of a change in writing signed by two (2) officers of the Corporation.
 
The shares of the stock of the Corporation shall be represented by certificates, provided that the Board of Directors may provide by resolution or resolutions that some or all of any or all classes or series of stock shall be uncertificated shares. Any such resolution shall not apply to shares represented by certificate until such certificate is surrendered to the Corporation. Every holder of stock of the Corporation represented by a certificate shall be entitled to a certificate, signed by the Chairman of the Board of Directors or the President or a Vice President and the Treasurer or an Assistant Treasurer or the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary, certifying the number of shares owned by the stockholder in the Corporation. Any and all of the signatures on a certificate may be a facsimile. If any officer, transfer agent, or registrar who has signed or whose facsimile signature has been placed upon a certificate shall have ceased to be such officer, transfer agent, or registrar before such certificate is issued, it may be issued by the Corporation with the same effect as if he or she were such officer, transfer agent, or registrar at the date of issue.
 
The Board of Directors may, in its discretion, appoint responsible banks or trust companies in the Borough of Manhattan, in the City of New York, State of New York, and in such other city or cities as the Board of Directors may deem advisable, from time to time, to act as transfer agents and registrars of the stock of the Corporation; and, when such appointments shall have been made, no stock certificate shall be valid until countersigned by one of such transfer agents and registered by one of such registrars.
 
Shares of stock may be transferred by delivery of the certificates therefor, accompanied either by an assignment in writing on the back of the certificates or by written power of attorney to sell, assign, and transfer the same, signed by the record holder thereof (or, with respect to uncertificated shares, by delivery of duly executed instructions or in any other manner permitted by law), but no transfer shall affect the right of the Corporation to pay any dividend upon the stock to the holder of record thereof, or to treat the holder of record as the holder in fact thereof for all purposes, and no transfer shall be valid, except between the parties thereto, until such transfer shall have been made upon the books of the Corporation.
 
The Board of Directors may provide for the issuance of new certificates of stock or uncertificated shares to replace certificates of stock lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, or alleged to be lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, upon such terms and in accordance with such procedures as the Board of Directors shall deem proper and prescribe.
 
The fiscal year of the Corporation shall be the calendar year.
 
 
All bills, notes, checks, or other instruments for the payment of money shall be signed or countersigned by such officer or officers and in such manner as from time to time may be prescribed by resolution (whether general or special) of the Board of Directors.
 
 
Each person who was or is made a party to or is threatened to be made a party to or is otherwise involved (including, without limitation, as a witness) in any actual or threatened action, suit, or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative, or investigative (hereinafter a "proceeding"), by reason of the fact that he or she is or was a director or officer of the Corporation or that, being or having been such a director or officer or an employee of the Corporation, he or she is or was serving at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation as a director, officer, employee, or agent of another corporation or of a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise, including service with respect to an employee benefit plan (hereinafter an "indemnitee"), whether the basis of such proceeding is alleged action in an official capacity as such a director, officer, employee, or agent or in any other capacity while serving as such a director, officer, employee, or agent, shall be indemnified and held harmless by the Corporation to the full extent permitted by the Delaware General Corporation Law, as the same exists or may hereafter be amended (but, in the case of any such amendment, only to the extent that such amendment permits the Corporation to provide broader indemnification rights than permitted prior thereto), or by other applicable law as then in effect, against all expense, liability, and loss (including attorneys' fees, judgments, fines, ERISA excise taxes or penalties, and amounts paid in settlement) actually and reasonably incurred or suffered by such indemnitee in connection therewith, and such indemnification shall continue as to an indemnitee who has ceased to be a director, officer, employee, or agent and shall inure to the benefit of the indemnitee's heirs, executors, and administrators; provided, however, that except as provided in Section 4.2 with respect to proceedings seeking to enforce rights to indemnification, the Corporation shall indemnify any such indemnitee in connection with a proceeding (or part thereof) initiated by such indemnitee only if such proceeding (or part thereof) was authorized or ratified by the Board of Directors. The right to indemnification conferred in this Section 4.1 shall be a contract right and shall include the right to be paid by the Corporation the expenses incurred in defending any such proceeding in advance of its final disposition (hereinafter an "advancement of expenses"); provided, however, that an advancement of expenses incurred by an indemnitee in his or her capacity as a director or officer or former director or officer (and not in any other capacity in which service was or is rendered by such indemnitee, including, without limitation, service to an employee benefit plan) shall be made only upon delivery to the Corporation of an undertaking (hereinafter an "undertaking"), by or on behalf of such indemnitee, to repay all amounts so advanced if it shall ultimately be determined by final judicial decision from which there is no further right to appeal that such indemnitee is not entitled to be indemnified for such expenses under this Section 4.1 or otherwise; and provided, further, that an advancement of expenses shall not be made if the Board of Directors makes a good faith determination that such payment would violate law or public policy.
 
If a claim under Section 4.1 is not paid in full by the Corporation within sixty (60) days after a written claim has been received by the Corporation, except in the case of a claim for an advancement of expenses, in which case the applicable period shall be twenty (20) days, the indemnitee may at any time thereafter bring suit against the Corporation to recover the unpaid amount of the claim. If successful in whole or in part in any such suit, or in a suit brought by the Corporation to recover an advancement of expenses pursuant to the terms of an undertaking, the indemnitee shall also be entitled to be paid the expenses of prosecuting or defending such suit. The indemnitee shall be presumed to be entitled to indemnification under this Section 4 upon submission of a written claim (and, in an action brought to enforce a claim for an advancement of expenses, where the required undertaking has been tendered to the Corporation), and thereafter the Corporation shall have the burden of proof to overcome the presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled. Neither the failure of the Corporation (including the Board of Directors,
 
independent legal counsel, or the stockholders) to have made a determination prior to the commencement of such suit that indemnification of the indemnitee is proper in the circumstances, nor an actual determination by the Corporation (including the Board of Directors, independent legal counsel, or the stockholders) that the indemnitee is not entitled to indemnification shall be a defense to the suit or create a presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled.
 
The rights to indemnification and to the advancement of expenses conferred in this Section 4 shall not be exclusive of any other right that any person may have or hereafter acquire under any statute, provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation, these By-Laws, any agreement, vote of stockholders or disinterested directors, or otherwise. Neither any amendment to or repeal of this Section 4 or of any of the procedures established by the Board of Directors pursuant to Section 4.7, nor the adoption of any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, nor, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any modification of law, shall eliminate or reduce the effect of the right or protection of any indemnitee to indemnification and to the advancement of expenses in accordance with the provisions hereof and thereof with respect to any proceeding (regardless of when such proceeding is first threatened, commenced or completed) arising out of, or related to, any acts or omissions of such indemnitee occurring prior to such amendment or repeal.
 
The Corporation may maintain insurance, at its expense, to protect itself and any director, officer, employee, or agent of the Corporation or another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise against any expense, liability, or loss, whether or not the Corporation would have the power to indemnify such person against such expense, liability, or loss under the Delaware General Corporation Law. The Corporation may, without further stockholder approval, enter into contracts with any indemnitee in furtherance of the provisions of this Section 4 and may create a trust fund, grant a security interest, or use other means (including, without limitation, a letter of credit) to ensure the payment of such amounts as may be necessary to effect indemnification as provided in this Section 4.
 
Any person who is or was a director, officer, or employee of the Corporation who is or was serving (i) as a director or officer of another corporation of which a majority of the shares entitled to vote in the election of its directors is held by the Corporation or (ii) in an executive or management capacity in a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise of which the Corporation or a wholly owned subsidiary of the Corporation is a general partner or has a majority ownership shall be deemed to be so serving at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation and entitled to indemnification and advancement of expenses under Section 4.1.
 
The Corporation may, by action of the Board of Directors, authorize one or more executive officers to grant rights to advancement of expenses to employees or agents of the Corporation on such terms and conditions as such officer or officers deem appropriate under the circumstances. The Corporation may, by action of the Board of Directors, grant rights to indemnification and advancement of expenses to employees or agents or groups of employees or agents of the Corporation with the same scope and effect as the provisions of this Section 4 with respect to the indemnification and advancement of expenses of directors and officers of the Corporation; provided, however, that an undertaking shall be made by an employee or agent only if required by the Board of Directors.
 
The Board of Directors may establish reasonable procedures for the submission of claims for indemnification pursuant to this Section 4, determination of the entitlement of any person thereto, and review of any such determination. Such procedures shall be set forth in an appendix to these By-Laws and shall be deemed for all purposes to be a part hereof.
 
 
Except as herein otherwise expressly provided, the By-Laws of the Corporation may be altered or repealed in any particular and new By-Laws, not inconsistent with any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or any provision of law, may be adopted, either by
A. the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority in number of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote at an annual meeting of stockholders or at a special meeting thereof, the notice of which special meeting shall include the form of the proposed alteration or repeal or of the proposed new By-Laws, or a summary thereof; or
B. either by
i. the affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors at any meeting thereof, or
ii. the affirmative vote of all the directors present at any meeting at which a quorum, less than a majority, is present;
provided, in either of the latter cases, that the notice of such meeting shall include the form of the proposed alteration or repeal or of the proposed new By-Laws, or a summary thereof; and provided, further, that Article I, Section 11.2 of these By-Laws may be amended only as set forth in Section 1.A of this By-Law, except that any amendment required by law or necessary or desirable to cure an administrative or technical deficiency may be made as provided in Section 1.B of this By-Law.
 
Notwithstanding anything contained in these By-Laws to the contrary, the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the Voting Stock, as defined in Article FOURTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, at a meeting of stockholders called for the purpose, shall be required to alter, amend, repeal, or adopt any provision inconsistent with Sections 3, 4 and 5 of Article IV of these By-Laws, notice of which meeting shall include the form of the proposed amendment, or a summary thereof.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20110727073641.txt.gz
TIME:20110727073641
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
(a) On July 27, 2011, The Boeing Company issued a press release reporting its financial results for the second quarter of 2011. A copy of the Company's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
(a) Not applicable
(b) Not applicable
(c) Not applicable
(d) Exhibits
99.1    Press Release issued by The Boeing Company dated July 27, 2011, reporting Boeing's financial results for the second quarter of 2011, furnished herewith.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
Boeing Reports Second-Quarter Results and Raises 2011 EPS Guidance
 
 
 
 
 
Table 1. Summary Financial Results
 
 The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] reported second-quarter net income of $0.9 billion, or $1.25 per share, on revenue of $16.5 billion. Operating margin of 9.3 percent reflects higher Commercial Airplanes volume and strong core performance across the company's businesses, partially offset by higher pension expense. The company increased its 2011 earnings per share guidance to between $3.90 and $4.10 per share reflecting the strong core performance. Total company 2011 revenue and cash flow guidance is unchanged.
CHICAGO, July 27, 2011
"Strong operational performance drove double-digit margins at both of our major businesses and produced outstanding results in the quarter," said Jim McNerney, Boeing chairman, president and chief executive officer. "We also made major progress toward certification and delivery of the 787 Dreamliner and 747-8 and continued our disciplined increases in commercial airplane production rates. Our outlook for the year has strengthened as our team continues its relentless focus on productivity improvement, cash management and program execution."
 
Table 2. Cash Flow
 
 
Boeing's quarterly operating cash flow was $1.6 billion, reflecting strong operating performance and continued investment in development programs. Free cash flow* was $1.3 billion in the quarter (Table 2).
Table 3. Cash, Marketable Securities and Debt Balances
 
 
Cash and investments in marketable securities totaled $8.8 billion at quarter-end (Table 3), up from $7.8 billion at the beginning of the quarter. Debt was essentially unchanged in the quarter.
Total company backlog at quarter-end was $323 billion, down from $329 billion at the beginning of the quarter. Net orders for the quarter were $12 billion and included a significant mix of wide-body commercial airplanes. Backlog is up $2.7 billion from year-end, reflecting $35 billion of net orders in the first half of 2011.
 
Segment Results
Commercial Airplanes
Table 4. Commercial Airplanes Operating Results
 
Boeing Commercial Airplanes second-quarter revenue increased by 19 percent to $8.8 billion on higher deliveries, improved model mix and higher services volume. Operating margin was 10.4 percent, reflecting the higher revenue and strong operating performance, partially offset by higher R&D (Table 4).
Flight testing activities on the 787 and 747-8 Freighter programs are nearing completion. During the quarter, both programs entered into Function and Reliability testing, while the 787 program also began Extended Operations testing. First deliveries of the 787 and 747-8 Freighter are expected later in the third quarter.
Total firm orders for the 787 at quarter-end were 827 airplanes from 57 customers. Commercial Airplanes booked 65 net orders during the quarter and 171 during the first half of 2011. Backlog remains strong with more than 3,300 airplanes valued at $262 billion.
 
Boeing Defense, Space & Security
Table 5. Defense, Space & Security Operating Results
 
Boeing Defense, Space & Security's second-quarter revenue was $7.7 billion, while operating margin was 10.4 percent (Table 5).
Boeing Military Aircraft (BMA) second-quarter revenue was $3.6 billion. Operating margin was 10.6 percent, reflecting strong operating performance. Last year's results were impacted by a charge on the Airborne Early Warning & Control program. During the quarter, India signed an agreement for ten C-17s, which are expected to be on contract later this year, and BMA was awarded the U.S. Navy's study contract for the Unmanned Carrier-Launched Airborne Surveillance and Strike Program.
Network & Space Systems (N&SS) second-quarter revenue decreased to $2.1 billion, due to funding reductions in Brigade Combat Team Modernization and lower SBInet volume. Operating margin was 9.5 percent, reflecting United Launch Alliance performance and a gain on the sale of property. During the quarter, the GPS Operational Control Segment entered service with the U.S. Air Force and the High Energy Laser program completed system integration.
Global Services & Support (GS&S) second-quarter revenue was $2.0 billion. Operating margin was 10.9 percent, reflecting strong performance in integrated logistics. During the quarter, GS&S was awarded modernization and upgrade contracts from the U.S. Air Force.
Backlog at Defense, Space & Security decreased to $61 billion on run-off of multi-year contracts, and remains nearly two times the unit's expected 2011 revenue.
 
Additional Financial Information
Table 6. Additional Financial Information
 
During the quarter, Boeing Capital Corporation's (BCC) portfolio balance declined to $4.4 billion, down from $4.5 billion at the beginning of the quarter on run-off and asset sales. BCC's debt-to-equity ratio was unchanged at 5.0-to-1.
The "Other" segment includes unallocated activities of Engineering, Operations and Technology, Shared Services Group as well as certain intercompany guarantees provided to BCC.
The loss in unallocated items and eliminations increased primarily due to higher pension expense. Total pension expense for the second quarter was $389 million, as compared to $283 million in the same period last year. A total of $326 million was allocated to the operating segments in the quarter, up from $305 million in the same period last year, and $63 million was recognized in unallocated items, compared to a benefit of $22 million in the same period last year.
 
Outlook
The company's 2011 financial guidance (Table 7) has been updated to reflect the strong core performance in both businesses.
Table 7. Financial Outlook
 
 
Boeing's 2011 earnings per share guidance is increased to between $3.90 and $4.10 per share, up from between $3.80 and $4.00 per share.
Commercial Airplanes' deliveries guidance is now between 485 and 495, down from between 485 and 500, on lower planned deliveries on development programs (now a combined 25 to 30 787 and 747-8 units, from 25 to 40 units). Operating margin is improved to between 8.0 and 8.5 percent, from between 7.5 and 8.5 percent, reflecting strong core performance and the lower planned development program deliveries.
 
Defense, Space & Security's revenue guidance for 2011 is now between $31.5 and $32.5, from between $31.5 to $33 billion, on the current business environment. Defense, Space & Security's operating margin is improved to approximately 9 percent, from between 8.5 and 9 percent, reflecting the strong performance to date.
Capital expenditures for 2011 have been reduced to approximately $2.0 billion, down from approximately $2.3 billion.
Non-GAAP Measure Disclosure
Management believes that the non-GAAP (Generally Accepted Accounting Principles) measures (indicated by an asterisk *) used in this report provide investors with important perspectives into the company's ongoing business performance. The company does not intend for the information to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the related GAAP measures. Other companies may define the measures differently. The following definitions are provided:
Free Cash Flow
Free cash flow is defined as GAAP less capital expenditures for . Management believes free cash flow provides investors with an important perspective on the cash available for shareholders, debt repayment, and acquisitions after making the capital investments required to support ongoing business operations and long term value creation. Free cash flow does not represent the residual cash flow available for discretionary expenditures as it excludes certain mandatory expenditures such as repayment of maturing debt. Management uses free cash flow internally to assess both business performance and overall liquidity. Table 2 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and free cash flow.
operating cash flow
property, plant and equipment additions
 
This document contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "may," "will," "should," "expects," "intends," "projects," "plans," "believes," "estimates," "targets," "anticipates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. Examples of forward-looking statements include statements relating to our future financial condition and operating results, as well as any other statement that does not directly relate to any historical or current fact. Forward-looking statements are based on our current expectations and assumptions, which may not prove to be accurate. These statements are not guarantees and are subject to risks, uncertainties, and changes in circumstances that are difficult to predict. Many factors could cause actual results to differ materially and adversely from these forward-looking statements. Among these factors are risks related to: (1) general conditions in the economy and our industry, including those due to regulatory changes; (2) our reliance on our commercial customers, our suppliers and the worldwide market; (3) our commercial development programs, including the 787 and 747-8 commercial aircraft programs; (4) changing acquisition priorities of the U.S. government; (5) our dependence on U.S. government contracts; (6) our reliance on fixed-price contracts; (7) our reliance on cost-type contracts; (8) uncertainties concerning contracts that include in-orbit incentive payments; (9) changes in accounting estimates; (10) changes in the competitive landscape in our markets; (11) our non-U.S. operations, including sales to non-U.S. customers; (12) potential adverse developments in new or pending litigation and/or government investigations; (13) customer and aircraft concentration in Boeing Capital Corporation's customer financing portfolio; (14) changes in our ability to obtain debt on commercially reasonable terms and at competitive rates in order to fund our operations and contractual commitments; (15) realizing the anticipated benefits of mergers, acquisitions, joint ventures, strategic alliances or divestitures; (16) the adequacy of our insurance coverage to cover significant risk exposures; (17) potential business disruptions related to physical security threats, information technology attacks or natural disasters; (18) work stoppages or other labor disruptions; (19) significant changes in discount rates and actual investment return on pension assets; and (20) potential environmental liabilities.
Additional information concerning these and other factors can be found in our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including our most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q and Current Reports on Form 8-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which it is made, and we assume no obligation to update or revise any forward-looking statement, whether as a result of new information, future events, or otherwise, except as required by law.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20110830165415.txt.gz
TIME:20110830165415
EVENTS:	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On August 29, 2011, as part of its periodic review of corporate governance matters, the Board of Directors (the "Board") of The Boeing Company (the "Company") adopted a number of changes to the Company's By-Laws (the "By-Laws").
These changes for the most part consisted of nonsubstantive wording changes and the elimination of certain provisions that remain applicable as a matter of Delaware law, such as provisions concerning the form of proxy, the role of inspectors of elections and the delivery of written consents. Other changes consist of the following: (i) requiring that stockholders seeking to call a special meeting provide certain information to the Company, and that the existing 25% ownership requirement consist of shares as to which there is both the right to vote and dispose (Article I, Section 2); (ii) removing provisions that reserve certain powers for "Continuing Directors" as opposed to the full Board (Article I, Sections 4 and 9.1; Article II, Section 11); (iii) permitting the Board to postpone previously scheduled stockholder meetings upon prior public notice (Article I, Section 4); (iv) establishing procedures for adjournment of stockholder meetings absent a quorum (Article I, Section 6); (v) setting forth the means by which a proxy may be revoked (Article I, Section 7.2); (vi) prohibiting directors and director candidates from service as inspectors of an election of directors (Article I, Section 8); (vii) requiring that stockholders seeking action by written consent request that the Board set a record date and disclose the text of the proposed written consent action (Article I, Section 9.2); (viii) providing for ministerial review by independent inspectors of written consents (Article I, Section 10); (ix) requiring delivery of required notice for proposed annual meeting business not more than 120 days prior to a meeting which is more than 30 days before or 70 days after the prior year's meeting (Article I, Section 11.1); (x) requiring delivery of undertakings that stockholders and beneficial holders proposing annual meeting business update required disclosures to the Company as of the record date and that director nominees comply with the Company's ethics policies (Article I, Sections 11.1 and 11.3); (xi) setting forth procedures for the conduct of stockholder meetings (Article I, Section 13); (xii) clarifying directors' ability to transmit written consents by electronic means and conduct meetings by telephone (Article II, Sections 13 and 14); (xiii) in the event that the Chief Executive Officer is unable to perform the duties of that office, designating the Chief Financial Officer as the officer to perform such duties on a temporary basis (Article V, Section 8); (xiv) removing the requirement for procedures established by the Board for the submission of claims for indemnification pursuant to the By-Laws to be set forth in an appendix to the By-Laws (Article VIII, Section 4.7); and (xv) absent the Company's written consent, establishing the Court of Chancery of the State of Delaware as the sole and exclusive forum for (a) any derivative action or proceeding brought on behalf of the Company, (b) any action asserting a claim of breach of a fiduciary duty owed by any director, officer or other employee of the Company to the Company or the Company's stockholders, (c) any action asserting a claim arising pursuant to any provision of the Delaware General Corporation Law, the Certificate of Incorporate or the By-Laws, or (d) any action asserting a claim governed by the internal affairs doctrine, in each case that arises out of any act or omission occurring after the adoption of the By-Laws, as amended and restated on August 29, 2011 (Article VIII, Section 5).
The foregoing summary of the amendments to the By-Laws is subject to, and qualified in its entirety by, the By-Laws, as amended and restated on August 29, 2011, a copy of which is filed as Exhibit 3.2 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: August 30, 2011
 

Exhibit 3.2
 
 
 
 
The annual meeting of stockholders shall be held on such date and at such time as the Board of Directors shall determine for the election of directors and the transaction of such other business as may properly be brought before the meeting.
 
A special meeting of stockholders may be called at any time by the Board of Directors, and the Board of Directors shall call a special meeting upon written request to the Secretary by stockholders entitled to vote and dispose of at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the outstanding shares of the Corporation. Any such written request must be signed by each requesting holder, stating the number of shares owned by each such holder, and shall specify the purpose of the proposed meeting (including the text of any resolutions proposed for consideration and, in the event that such business includes a proposal to amend these By-Laws or the Certificate of Incorporation, the language of the proposed amendment). Business transacted at any special meeting of stockholders shall be limited to the purposes stated in the notice provided pursuant to Article I, Section 4 of these By-Laws; provided, however, that nothing in these By-Laws shall prohibit the Board of Directors from submitting matters to the stockholders at any special meeting requested by stockholders.
 
All meetings of stockholders shall be held at such place or places, if any, within or without the State of Delaware as may from time to time be fixed by the Board of Directors or as shall be specified or fixed in the respective notices or waivers of notice thereof.
 
Except as otherwise required by statute and as set forth below, notice of each annual or special meeting of stockholders shall be given by the Corporation personally, by mail or by electronic transmission to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date. Except as otherwise required by statute, no publication of any notice of a meeting of stockholders shall be required. Every notice of a meeting of stockholders shall state the place, if any (or the means of remote communication, if any, by which stockholders and proxy holders may be deemed to be present in person), date, and hour of the meeting and, in the case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called (including any purpose set forth in a request by stockholders properly made pursuant to Article I, Section 2 of these By-Laws). Notices are deemed given by the Corporation (i) if by mail, when deposited in the United States mail, postage prepaid, directed to the stockholder at such stockholder's address as it appears on the records of the Corporation, or, if a stockholder shall have filed with the Secretary a written request that notices to such stockholder be mailed to some other address, then directed to such stockholder at such other address; (ii) if by facsimile, when directed to a number at which the stockholder has consented to receive notice; (iii) if by electronic mail, when directed to an electronic mail address at which the stockholder has consented to receive such notice; (iv) if by posting on an electronic network together with a separate notice to the stockholder of such specific posting, upon the later to occur of (A) such posting and (B) the giving of such separate notice of such posting; and (v) if by any other form of electronic transmission, when directed to the stockholder as required by law and, to the extent required by applicable law, in the manner consented to by the stockholder. An affidavit of the mailing or other means of giving any notice of any stockholders' meeting, executed by the Secretary, Assistant Secretary or any transfer agent of the Corporation giving the notice, shall be prima facie evidence of the giving of such notice. Notice shall be deemed to have been given to all stockholders of record who share an address if notice is given in accordance with the "householding" rules set forth in Rule 14a-3(e) under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "Exchange Act"), and Section 233 of the Delaware General Corporation Law. Any previously scheduled meeting of stockholders may be postponed by resolution of the Board of Directors upon public notice given prior to the time previously scheduled for such meeting of stockholders.
 
Whenever any notice is required to be given to any stockholder under the provisions of these By-Laws, the Certificate of Incorporation, or the Delaware General Corporation Law, a waiver thereof in writing signed by the person or persons entitled to such notice or a waiver by electronic transmission, whether before or after the time stated therein, shall be deemed equivalent to the giving of such notice. The attendance of a stockholder at a meeting, in person or by proxy shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when a stockholder attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened.
 
At all meetings of stockholders, except when otherwise provided by applicable law, the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, the presence, in person or by proxy, of the holders of one-third of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and except as otherwise provided by the Certificate of Incorporation, these By-Laws, the rules and regulations of any stock exchange applicable to the Corporation, or applicable law or pursuant to any regulation applicable to the Corporation or its securities, the vote, in person or by proxy, of the holders of a majority of the shares constituting such quorum shall be binding upon all stockholders. In the absence of a quorum, the chairman of the meeting or a majority of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote may adjourn any meeting to another place and time. At any such adjourned meeting at which a quorum shall be present, any business may be transacted which might have been transacted at the meeting as originally called. Unless otherwise provided by statute, no notice of an adjourned meeting need be given.
 
7.1 Appointment.
Each stockholder entitled to vote at a meeting of stockholders or to express consent or dissent to corporate action in writing without a meeting may authorize another person or persons to act for such stockholder by proxy. Such authorization may be accomplished by the stockholder or such stockholder's authorized officer, director, employee, or agent executing a writing or causing his or her signature to be affixed to such writing by any reasonable means, including facsimile signature or by electronic transmission to the intended holder of the proxy or to a proxy solicitation firm, proxy support service, or similar agent duly authorized by the intended proxy holder to receive such transmission.
7.2 Delivery to Corporation; Duration.
A proxy shall be filed with the Secretary before or at the time of the meeting or the delivery to the Corporation of the consent to corporate action in writing. A proxy shall become invalid three (3) years after the date of its execution, unless otherwise provided in the proxy. A proxy with respect to a specified meeting shall entitle the holder thereof to vote at any reconvened meeting following adjournment of such meeting but shall not be valid after the final adjournment thereof. A proxy shall be irrevocable if it states that it is irrevocable and if, and only as long as, it is coupled with an interest sufficient in law to support an irrevocable power. A stockholder may revoke any proxy which is not irrevocable by attending the meeting and voting in person or by delivering to the Secretary a revocation of the proxy or a new proxy bearing a later date.
 
8.1 Appointment.
In advance of any meeting of stockholders, the Board of Directors shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspectors of election at such meeting and any adjournment thereof and to make a written report thereof. The Board of Directors may designate one or more persons to serve as alternate inspectors to serve in place of any inspector who is unable or fails to act. If no inspector or alternate is able to act at a meeting of stockholders, the chairman of such meeting shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspector at such meeting. Inspectors may be employees of the Corporation, but no director or candidate for director may act as an inspector of an election of directors.
 
8.2 Duties.
The inspectors of election shall (a) ascertain the number of shares of the Corporation outstanding and the voting power of each such share; (b) determine the shares represented at the meeting and the validity of proxies and ballots; (c) count all votes and ballots; (d) determine and retain for a reasonable period of time a record of the disposition of any challenges made to any determination by them; and (e) certify their determination of the number of shares represented at the meeting and their count of the votes and ballots. Each inspector shall, before entering upon the discharge of his or her duties, take and sign an oath to faithfully execute the duties of inspector with strict impartiality and according to the best of his or her ability. The inspectors may appoint or retain other persons or entities to assist them in the performance of their duties.
8.3 Determination of Proxy Validity.
The validity of any proxy or ballot executed for a meeting of stockholders shall be determined by the inspectors of election in accordance with the Delaware General Corporation Law.
 
9.1 Meetings.
For the purpose of determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at any meeting of stockholders or any adjournment thereof, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which record date shall be not fewer than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the date of such meeting. If no record date is fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall be at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which notice is given, or, if notice is waived, at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which the meeting is held. A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting; provided, however, that the Board of Directors may fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
9.2 Consent to Corporate Action Without a Meeting.
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which record date shall not be more than ten (10) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days after the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors. Any stockholder of record seeking to have the stockholders authorize or take corporate action by written consent pursuant to Article I, Section 10 of these By-Laws shall, by written notice to the Secretary, request that the Board of Directors fix a record date, which notice shall include the text of any proposed resolutions. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors pursuant to this Section 9.2 or otherwise within ten (10) days of receipt of a valid request by a stockholder, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, when no prior action by the Board of Directors is required pursuant to applicable law, shall be the first date on which a signed written consent setting forth the action taken or proposed to be taken is delivered to the Corporation pursuant to Article I, Section 10 of these By-Laws; provided, however, that if prior action by the Board of Directors is required by applicable law, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting shall in such an event be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution taking such prior action.
9.3 Dividends, Distributions, and Other Rights.
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to receive payment of any dividend or other distribution or allotment of any rights or the stockholders entitled to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion, or exchange of stock, or for the purpose of any other lawful action, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted, and which record
 
date shall be not more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days prior to such action. If no record date is fixed, the record date for determining stockholders for any such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution relating thereto.
9.4 Voting List.
The officer who has charge of the stock ledger shall prepare and make, at least ten (10) days before each meeting of stockholders, a complete list of the stockholders entitled to vote at such meeting, arranged in alphabetical order, and showing the address of each stockholder and the number of shares registered in the name of each stockholder. This list shall be open to examination by any stockholder, for any purpose germane to the meeting, for a period of ten (10) days prior to the meeting, either (i) on a reasonably accessible electronic network, provided that the information required to gain access to such list is provided with the notice of meeting, or (ii) during ordinary business hours at the principal place of business of the Corporation. The list shall also be produced and kept at such meeting for inspection by any stockholder who is present.
 
Subject to the provisions of Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation and Article I, Section 9.2 of these By-Laws, any action which could be taken at any annual or special meeting of stockholders may be taken without a meeting, without prior notice, and without a vote, if a consent or consents in writing, setting forth the action so taken, are (a) signed by the holders of outstanding stock having not fewer than the minimum number of votes that would be necessary to authorize or take such action at a meeting at which all shares entitled to vote thereon were present and voted and (b) delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the records of proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Delivery made to the Corporation's registered office shall be by hand or by certified mail or registered mail, return receipt requested. Every written consent shall bear the date of signature of each stockholder who signs the consent, and no written consent shall be effective to take the corporate action referred to therein unless written consents signed by a sufficient number of stockholders to take such action are delivered to the Corporation, in the manner required by this Section 10, within sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days of the date of the earliest dated consent delivered to the Corporation in the manner required by this Section 10. The validity of any consent executed by a proxy for a stockholder pursuant to an electronic transmission transmitted to such proxy holder by or upon the authorization of the stockholder shall be determined by or at the direction of the Secretary. A written record of the information upon which the person making such determination relied shall be made and kept in the records of the proceedings of the stockholders. Any such consent shall be inserted in the minute book as if it were the minutes of a meeting of stockholders. Prompt notice of the taking of the corporate action without a meeting by less than unanimous written consent shall be given to those stockholders who have not consented in writing.
In the event of the delivery, in the manner provided by this Section 10 and applicable law, to the Corporation of written consent or consents to take corporate action and/or any related revocation or revocations, the Corporation shall engage independent inspectors of election for the purpose of performing promptly a ministerial review of the validity of the consents and revocations. For the purpose of permitting the inspectors to perform such review, no action by written consent and without a meeting shall be effective until such inspectors have completed their review, determined that the requisite number of valid and unrevoked consents delivered to the Corporation in accordance with this Section 10 and applicable law have been obtained to authorize or take the action specified in the consents, and certified such determination for entry in the records of the Corporation kept for the purpose of recording the proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Nothing contained in this Section 10 shall in any way be construed to suggest or imply that the Board of Directors or any stockholder shall not be entitled to contest the validity of any consent or revocation thereof, whether before or after such certification by the independent inspectors, or to take any other action (including, without limitation, the commencement, prosecution or defense of any litigation with respect thereto, and the seeking of injunctive relief in such litigation).
 
11.1 Notice of Nominations and Other Stockholder Business.
A. Annual Meetings of Stockholders.
1. Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors and the proposal of other business to be considered by the stockholders may be made at an annual meeting of stockholders (a) as specified in the Corporation's notice of meeting (or any supplement thereto); (b) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof; or (c) by any stockholder of the Corporation who (i) was a stockholder of record at the time the notice provided for in this By-Law is delivered to the Secretary, (ii) is entitled to vote at the meeting, and (iii) complies with the notice procedures set forth in this By-Law as to such nomination or other business; clause (c) shall be the exclusive means for a stockholder to make nominations or submit proposals for other business (other than matters properly brought under Rule 14a-8 under the Exchange Act and included in the Corporation's proxy statement that has been prepared to solicit proxies for such annual meeting) before an annual meeting of stockholders.
2. Without qualification, for any nominations or any other business to be properly brought before an annual meeting by a stockholder pursuant to Section 11.1.A(1)(c), the stockholder must have given timely notice thereof in writing to the Secretary and any such proposed business (other than the nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors) must constitute a proper matter for stockholder action. To be timely, a stockholder's notice shall be delivered to the Secretary at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not earlier than the close of business on the one hundred and twentieth (120
th
) day and not later than the close of business on the ninetieth (90th) day prior to the first anniversary of the preceding year's annual meeting; provided, however, that in the event that the date of the annual meeting is more than thirty (30) days before or more than seventy (70) days after such anniversary date, notice by the stockholder to be timely must be so delivered not earlier than the close of business on the one hundred and twentieth (120
th
) day prior to such annual meeting and not later than the close of business on the later of the ninetieth (90
th
) day prior to such annual meeting and the tenth (10
th
) day following the day on which public announcement of the date of such annual meeting is first made by the Corporation. In no event shall the adjournment or postponement of an annual meeting (or any public announcement thereof) commence a new time period (or extend any time period) for the giving of a stockholder's notice as described above. To be in proper form, such stockholder's notice (whether given pursuant to this Section 11.1.A(2) or Section 11.1.B) to the Secretary must: (a) set forth, as to the stockholder giving the notice and the beneficial owner, if any, on whose behalf the nomination or proposal for other business is made (i) the name and address of such stockholder, as they appear on the Corporation's books, and of such beneficial owner, if any, (ii) (A) the class or series and number of shares of the Corporation which are, directly or indirectly, owned beneficially and of record by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, (B) a description of any option, warrant, convertible security, stock appreciation right, or similar right with an exercise or conversion privilege or a settlement payment or mechanism at a price related to any class or series of shares of the Corporation or with a value derived in whole or in part from the value of any class or series of shares of the Corporation, whether or not such instrument or right shall be subject to settlement in the underlying class or series of shares of the Corporation or otherwise (a "Derivative Instrument") directly or indirectly owned beneficially by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, and any other direct or indirect opportunity to profit or share in any profit derived from any increase or decrease in the value of shares of the Corporation, (C) a description of any proxy, contract, arrangement, understanding, or relationship pursuant to which such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, has a right to vote any shares of any security of the Corporation, (D) any short interest in any security of the Corporation (for purposes of this By-Law a person shall be deemed to have a short interest in a security if such person directly or indirectly, through any contract, arrangement, understanding, relationship or otherwise, has the opportunity to profit or share in any profit derived from any decrease in the value of the subject security), (E) any rights to dividends on the shares of the Corporation owned beneficially by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, that are separated or separable from the underlying shares of the Corporation, (F) any proportionate interest in shares of the Corporation or Derivative Instruments held, directly or indirectly, by a general or limited partnership in which such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, is a general partner or, directly or indirectly, beneficially owns an interest in a general partner, and (G) any performance-related fees (other than an asset-based fee) that such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, is entitled to based on any increase or decrease in the value of shares of the Corporation or Derivative Instruments, if any, all such information to be provided as of the date of such notice, including, without limitation, any such interests held by members of such stockholder's and such beneficial owner's, if any, immediate
 
family sharing the same household (which information shall be supplemented by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, not later than ten (10) days after the record date for the annual meeting to disclose such ownership as of the record date), (iii) any other information relating to such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, that would be required to be disclosed in a proxy statement or other filings required to be made in connection with solicitations of proxies for, as applicable, the proposal of other business and/or for the election of directors in a contested election pursuant to Section 14 of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, (iv) a representation (A) that the stockholder is a holder of record of stock of the Corporation entitled to vote at such annual meeting and intends to appear in person or by proxy at the annual meeting to propose such business or nomination and (B) whether the stockholder or the beneficial owner, if any, intends or is part of a group which intends (x) to deliver a proxy statement and/or form of proxy to holders of at least the percentage of the Corporation's outstanding capital stock required to approve or adopt the proposal or elect the nominee and/or (y) otherwise to solicit proxies or votes from stockholders in support of such proposal or nomination, and (v) an undertaking by the stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, to notify the Corporation in writing of any change in the information called for by clauses (i), (ii), (iii) and (iv) as of the record date for such meeting, by notice received by the Secretary at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not later than the 10
th
day following such record date; (b) if the notice relates to any business other than the nomination of a director or directors that the stockholder proposes to bring before the annual meeting, set forth (i) a brief description of the business desired to be brought before the annual meeting, the text of the proposal or business (including the text of any resolutions proposed for consideration and in the event that such business includes a proposal to amend these By-Laws, the language of the proposed amendment), the reasons for conducting such business at the annual meeting and any material interest of such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, in such business and (ii) a description of all agreements, arrangements, and understandings between such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, and their respective affiliates and associates, and any other person or persons (including their names) acting in concert therewith in connection with the proposal of such business by such stockholder; (c) set forth, as to each person, if any, whom the stockholder proposes to nominate for election or reelection to the Board of Directors (i) all information relating to such person that would be required to be disclosed in a proxy statement or other filings required to be made in connection with solicitations of proxies for election of directors in a contested election pursuant to Section 14 of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, (ii) such person's written consent to being named in the proxy statement as a nominee and to serving as a director if elected and a statement whether such person, if elected, intends to tender, promptly following such person's election or reelection, an irrevocable resignation effective upon such person's failure to receive the required vote for reelection at the next meeting at which such person would face reelection and upon acceptance of such resignation by the Board of Directors, and (iii) a description of all direct and indirect compensation and other material monetary agreements, arrangements and understandings during the past three (3) years, and any other material relationships, between or among such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, and their respective affiliates and associates, or any other person or persons (including their names) acting in concert therewith, on the one hand, and each proposed nominee, and his or her respective affiliates and associates, or any other person or persons (including their names) acting in concert therewith, on the other hand, including, without limitation, all information that would be required to be disclosed pursuant to Item 404 promulgated under Regulation S-K if the stockholder making the nomination and any beneficial owner on whose behalf the nomination is made, if any, or any affiliate or associate thereof or person acting in concert therewith, were the "registrant" for purposes of such rule and the nominee were a director or executive officer of such registrant; and (d) with respect to each nominee for election or reelection to the Board of Directors, include the completed and signed questionnaire, representation and agreement required by Section 11.3. The Corporation may require any proposed nominee to furnish such other information as may reasonably be required by the Corporation to determine the eligibility of such proposed nominee to serve as an independent director of the Corporation or that could be material to a reasonable stockholder's understanding of the independence, or lack thereof, of such nominee.
3. Notwithstanding anything in the second sentence of Section 11.1.A(2) to the contrary, in the event that the number of directors to be elected to the Board of Directors at the annual meeting of stockholders is increased effective after the time period for which nominations would otherwise be due under Section 11.1.A(2) and there is no public announcement by the Corporation naming all of the nominees for the additional directorships at least one hundred (100) days prior to the first anniversary of the preceding year's annual meeting, a stockholder's notice required by this By-Law shall also be considered timely, but only with respect to nominees for any new positions created by such increase, if it shall be delivered to the Secretary at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not later than the close of business on the tenth (10
th
) day following the day on which such public announcement is first made by the Corporation.
 
B. Special Meetings of Stockholders.
Only such business shall be conducted at a special meeting of stockholders as shall have been brought before the special meeting pursuant to the Corporation's notice of meeting. Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors may be made at a special meeting at which directors are to be elected pursuant to the Corporation's notice of special meeting (a) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof or stockholders pursuant to Article 1, Section 2 hereof, or (b) provided that the Board of Directors or stockholders pursuant to Article 1, Section 2 hereof has determined that directors shall be elected at such special meeting, by any stockholder of the Corporation who (i) is a stockholder of record at the time the notice provided for in this By-Law is delivered to the Secretary and at the time of the special meeting, (ii) is entitled to vote at the special meeting, and (iii) complies with the notice procedures set forth in this By-Law (including the information requirements in Section 11.1.A(2)) as to such nomination. For the avoidance of doubt, the foregoing clause (b) of this Section 11.1.B shall be the exclusive means for a stockholder to propose nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors at a special meeting of stockholders at which directors are to be elected. In the event the Corporation calls a special meeting for the purpose of electing one or more directors to the Board of Directors, any such stockholder may nominate a person or persons (as the case may be) for election to such position(s) as specified in the Corporation's notice of meeting, if the stockholder's notice required by Section 11.1.A(2) (including the completed and signed questionnaire, representation and agreement required by Section 11.3) shall be delivered to the Secretary at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not earlier than the close of business on the one hundred and twentieth (120th) day prior to such special meeting and not later than the close of business on the later of the ninetieth (90th) day prior to such special meeting and the tenth (10th) day following the day on which public announcement is first made of the date of the special meeting and of the nominees proposed by the Board of Directors to be elected at such special meeting. In no event shall the adjournment or postponement of a special meeting as to which notice has been sent to stockholders, or any public announcement with respect thereto, commence a new time period (or extend any time period) for the giving of a stockholder's notice as described above.
C. General.
1. Only such persons who are nominated in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law shall be eligible to be elected as directors at an annual or special meeting of stockholders or to serve as directors and only such business shall be conducted at a meeting of stockholders as shall have been brought before the meeting in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law. Except as otherwise provided by law, the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, the chairman of the meeting shall have the power and duty (a) to determine whether a nomination or any other business proposed to be brought before the meeting was made or proposed, as the case may be, in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law (including whether the stockholder or beneficial owner, if any, on whose behalf the nomination or proposal is made solicited (or is part of a group which solicited) or did not so solicit, as the case may be, proxies in support of such stockholder's nominee or proposal in compliance with such stockholder's representation as required by Section 11.1.A(2)(a)(iv)) and (b) if any proposed nomination or business was not made or proposed in compliance with this By-Law, to declare that such nomination shall be disregarded or that such proposed business shall not be transacted. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this By-Law, unless otherwise required by law, if the stockholder (or a qualified representative of the stockholder) does not appear at the annual or special meeting of stockholders of the Corporation to present a nomination or proposed business, such nomination shall be disregarded and such proposed business shall not be transacted, notwithstanding that proxies in respect of such vote may have been received by the Corporation. For purposes of this By-Law, to be considered a qualified representative of the stockholder, a person must be a duly authorized officer, manager, or partner of such stockholder or must be authorized by a writing executed by such stockholder or an electronic transmission delivered by such stockholder to act for such stockholder as proxy at the annual or special meeting and such person must produce such writing or electronic transmission, or a reliable reproduction of the writing or electronic transmission, at the annual or special meeting.
2. For purposes of this By-Law, "public announcement" shall mean disclosure in a press release reported by the Dow Jones News Service, Associated Press, or comparable national news service or in a document publicly filed by the Corporation with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to Section 13, 14 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.
 
3. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this By-Law, a stockholder shall also comply with all applicable requirements of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder with respect to the matters set forth in this By-Law; provided, however, that any references in these By-Laws to the Exchange Act or to the rules or regulations promulgated thereunder are not intended to and shall not limit the requirements applicable to any nominations or proposals as to any other business to be considered pursuant to this By-Law (including Section 11.1.A(1)(c) or Section 11.1.B). Nothing in this By-Law shall be deemed to affect any rights (a) of stockholders to request inclusion of proposals in the Corporation's proxy statement pursuant to Rule 14a-8 under the Exchange Act or (b) of the holders of any series of Preferred Stock if and to the extent provided for under law, the Certificate of Incorporation, or these By-Laws.
.
11.2 Required Vote for Directors
A nominee for director shall be elected to the Board of Directors if the votes cast for such nominee's election exceed the votes cast against such nominee's election; provided, however, that the directors shall be elected by a plurality of the votes cast at any meeting of stockholders for which (i) the Secretary receives a notice that a stockholder has nominated a person for election to the Board of Directors in compliance with the advance notice requirements for stockholder nominees for director set forth in Section 11.1 and (ii) such nomination has not been withdrawn by such stockholder on or prior to the tenth day preceding the date the Corporation first mails its notice of meeting for such meeting to stockholders. If directors are to be elected by a plurality of the votes cast, stockholders shall not be permitted to vote against a nominee. Votes cast shall exclude abstentions with respect to that director's election.
.
11.3 Director Qualification: Submission of Questionnaire, Representation, and Agreement
To be eligible to be a nominee for election or reelection as a director of the Corporation, a person must deliver (in accordance with the time periods prescribed for delivery of notice under Section 11.1) to the Secretary at the principal executive offices of the Corporation a written questionnaire with respect to the background and qualification of such person and the background of any other person or entity on whose behalf the nomination is being made (which questionnaire shall be provided by the Secretary upon written request) and a written representation and agreement (in the form provided by the Secretary upon written request), that such person (a) is not and will not become a party to (i) any agreement, arrangement, or understanding with, and has not given any commitment or assurance to, any person or entity as to how such person, if elected as a director of the Corporation, will act or vote on any issue or question (a "Voting Commitment") that has not been disclosed to the Corporation or (ii) any Voting Commitment that could limit or interfere with such person's ability to comply, if elected as a director of the Corporation, with such person's fiduciary duties under applicable law; (b) is not and will not become a party to any agreement, arrangement, or understanding with any person or entity other than the Corporation with respect to any direct or indirect compensation, reimbursement, or indemnification in connection with service or action as a director that has not been disclosed therein; and (c) in such person's individual capacity and on behalf of any person or entity on whose behalf the nomination is being made, would be in compliance, if elected as a director of the Corporation, and will comply with all applicable publicly disclosed corporate governance, ethics, conflict of interest, confidentiality and stock ownership and trading policies and guidelines of the Corporation.
 
Any written notice or consent required to be delivered by a stockholder to the Corporation pursuant to Sections 9.2 or 11.1 of this Article I or Section 2.1 of Article II must be given, either by personal delivery or by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, to the Secretary at the Corporation's executive offices in the City of Chicago, State of Illinois.
 
The Chairman of the Board of Directors or, in the Chairman's absence, a Director or officer as a majority of the members of the Board may designate shall act as chairman of meetings of stockholders. The Secretary shall act as secretary of meetings of stockholders, but in his or her absence the chairman of the meeting may appoint any
 
person to act as secretary of the meeting. Except to the extent inconsistent with any rules and regulations for the conduct of any meeting of stockholders as adopted by the Board of Directors, the chairman of any meeting of stockholders shall have the right and authority to convene and (for any or no reason) to adjourn the meeting, to prescribe such rules, regulations and procedures and to do all such acts as, in the judgment of such chairman, are appropriate for the proper conduct of the meeting.
 
The number of directors shall be eleven (11), but the number may be increased, or decreased to not less than three (3), from time to time, by the directors or stockholders by amendment of these By-Laws in accordance with Article VIII. At each annual meeting of stockholders, each director shall be elected to hold office until the next annual meeting or until his or her successor shall be elected and qualified or until his or her earlier death, disqualification, resignation or removal.
 
.
2.1
Nomination
Only persons who are nominated in accordance with Article I, Section 11 of these By-Laws shall be eligible for election as directors.
2.2 Election.
At each election of directors by stockholders, the persons who are elected in accordance with Article I, Section 11 of these By-Laws shall be the directors.
 
Meetings of the Board of Directors, or of any committee thereof, may be held within or without the State of Delaware.
 
Each year the Board of Directors shall meet in connection with the annual meeting of stockholders for the purpose of electing officers and for the transaction of other business. No notice of such annual meeting of the Board of Directors is required. Such annual meeting may be held at any other time or place which shall be specified in a notice given as hereinafter provided for special meetings of the Board of Directors, or in a consent and waiver of notice thereof, signed by all the directors.
 
The Board of Directors may, by resolution adopted by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors, from time to time appoint the time and place for holding stated meetings of the Board of Directors, if by it deemed advisable; and such stated meetings shall thereupon be held at the time and place so appointed, without the giving of any special notice with regard thereto. Except as otherwise provided in these By-Laws, any and all business may be transacted at any stated meeting.
 
6.1 Convenors and Notice.
Special meetings of the Board of Directors may be called by or at the request of the Chairman of the Board of Directors or any two (2) directors. Notice of a special meeting of the Board of Directors, stating the place, day, and hour of the meeting, shall be given to each director in writing (by mail, electronic transmission or personal delivery) or orally (by telephone or in person).
 
6.2 Waiver of Notice.
With respect to a special meeting of the Board of Directors, a written waiver signed by a director or waiver by electronic transmission shall be deemed equivalent to notice to that director. A director's attendance at a meeting shall constitute that director's waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the director attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting was not lawfully called or convened. Neither the business to be transacted at, nor the purpose of, any regular or special meeting of the Board of Directors need be specified in the waiver of notice of such meeting.
 
Except as herein otherwise provided, forty percent (40%) of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided for in these By-Laws at the time of any stated or special meeting of the Board of Directors or, if vacancies exist on the Board of Directors, forty percent (40%) of such number of directors then in office; provided, however, that such number may not be less than one-third of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided for in these By-Laws, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and, except as otherwise required by statute, the Certificate of Incorporation, or these By-Laws, the act of a majority of the directors present at any such meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of the Board of Directors. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the directors present may adjourn any meeting, from time to time, until a quorum is present. No notice of any adjourned meeting need be given.
 
The Chairman of the Board shall preside, when present, at all meetings of the Board of Directors, except as otherwise provided by law.
 
Any director may resign at any time by giving written notice or notice by electronic transmission thereof to the Secretary. Such resignation shall take effect at the time specified therefor or if the time is not specified, upon delivery thereof; and, unless otherwise specified with respect thereto, the acceptance of such resignation shall not be necessary to make it effective.
 
Any director may be removed with or without cause by the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, at a meeting of stockholders called for that purpose; and the vacancy on the Board of Directors caused by any such removal may be filled by the stockholders at such meeting or at any subsequent meeting.
 
In case of any increase in the number of directors, or of any vacancy created by death, disqualification, or resignation, the additional director or directors may be elected or, as the case may be, the vacancy or vacancies may be filled, either (a) by the affirmative vote of a majority of the remaining directors, even if less than a quorum or (b) by the stockholders entitled to vote, either at an annual meeting or at a special meeting thereof called for that purpose, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the outstanding shares entitled to vote at such meeting.
 
The Board of Directors shall have authority to determine from time to time the amount of compensation that shall be paid to its members for their service on the Board of Directors or any committee thereof.
 
Any action required or permitted to be taken at any meeting of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof may be taken without a meeting if all members of the Board of Directors or committee, as the case may be, consent thereto in writing or by electronic transmission, and the writings or electronic transmissions are filed with the minutes of proceedings of the Board of Directors or committee.
 
Members of the Board of Directors, or any committee designated by the Board of Directors, may participate in a meeting thereof by means of conference telephone or other communications equipment by means of which all persons participating in the meeting can hear each other, and participation in a meeting by such means shall constitute presence in person at such meeting.
 
In addition to any committees appointed pursuant to Section 2 of this Article, there shall be an Audit Committee, appointed annually by the Board of Directors, consisting of at least three (3) directors who are not members of management. It shall be the responsibility of the Audit Committee to review the scope and results of the annual independent audit of books and records of the Corporation and its subsidiaries and to discharge such other responsibilities as may from time to time be assigned to it by the Board of Directors. The Audit Committee shall meet at such times and places as the members deem advisable, and shall make such recommendations to the Board of Directors as they consider appropriate.
 
2.1 Committee Powers.
The Board of Directors may appoint standing or temporary committees and invest such committees with such powers as it may see fit, with power to subdelegate such powers if deemed desirable by the Board of Directors; but no such committee shall have the power or authority of the Board of Directors to adopt, amend, or repeal these By-Laws or approve, adopt, or recommend to the stockholders any action or matter expressly required by the Certificate of Incorporation, these By-Laws or the Delaware General Corporation Law to be submitted to stockholders for approval.
2.2 Committee Members.
The Board of Directors may designate one or more directors as alternate members of any committee, who may replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of the committee. In the absence or disqualification of a member of a committee, the member or members thereof present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, whether or not such member or members constitute a quorum, may unanimously appoint another member of the Board of Directors to act at the meeting in the place of any such absent or disqualified member.
 
A majority of the number of directors composing any committee of the Board of Directors, as established and fixed by resolution of the Board of Directors, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at any meeting of such committee but, if less than a majority are present at a meeting, a majority of such directors present may adjourn the meeting from time to time without further notice. The act of a majority of the members of a committee present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of such committee.
 
 
The elected officers shall be a Chairman of the Board of Directors (who shall be a director) and, at the discretion of the Board of Directors, a President (who shall be a director), and one or more Vice Presidents (each of whom may be assigned by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer an additional title descriptive of the functions assigned to such officer and one or more of whom may be designated Executive or Senior Vice President). The Board of Directors may also elect one or more Vice Chairmen. The Board of Directors shall also designate either the Chairman of the Board of Directors or the President as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation. The Board of Directors shall appoint a Controller, a Secretary, and a Treasurer. Any number of offices, whether elective or appointive, may be held by the same person. The Chief Executive Officer may, by a writing filed with the Secretary, designate titles as officers for employees and agents and appoint Assistant Secretaries and Assistant Treasurers as, from time to time, may appear to be necessary or advisable in the conduct of the affairs of the Corporation and may, in the same manner, terminate or change such titles.
 
So far as practicable, all elected officers shall be elected at the annual meeting of the Board of Directors in each year, and shall hold office until the annual meeting of the Board of Directors in the next subsequent year and until their respective successors are elected. The Controller, Secretary, and Treasurer shall hold office at the pleasure of the Board of Directors.
 
The salaries paid to the elected officers of the Corporation shall be authorized or approved by the Board of Directors.
 
None of the officers, directors, or employees of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations shall at any time be paid any bonus or share in the earnings or profits of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations except pursuant to a plan approved by affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members of the Board of Directors.
 
Any elected or appointed officer may be removed at any time, either for or without cause, by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors, at any meeting called for the purpose.
 
If any vacancy occurs in any office, the Board of Directors may elect or appoint a successor to fill such vacancy for the remainder of the term.
 
The Chairman of the Board of Directors shall preside, when present, at all meetings of stockholders and at all meetings of the Board of Directors, in each case except as required by law. The Chairman shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation; to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the Chairman by the Board of Directors.
 
The President shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation; to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; during the absence or disability of the Chairman of the Board of Directors, to exercise the Chairman's powers and to perform the Chairman's duties; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the President by the Board of Directors; provided, that if the office of President is vacant, the Chairman shall exercise the duties ordinarily exercised by the President until such time as a President is elected or appointed.
 
The officer designated by the Board of Directors as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation shall have general and active control of its business and affairs. The Chief Executive Officer shall have general power to appoint or designate all employees and agents of the Corporation whose appointment or designation is not otherwise provided for and to fix the compensation thereof, subject to the provisions of these By-Laws; to remove or suspend any employee or agent who shall not have been elected or appointed by the Board of Directors or other body; to suspend for cause any employee, agent, or officer, other than an elected officer, pending final action by the body which shall have appointed such employee, agent, or officer; and to exercise all the powers usually pertaining to the office held by the Chief Executive Officer of a corporation.
 
The several Vice Presidents and the Controller shall perform all such duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of them, from time to time, by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer, respectively.
 
The Secretary shall attend to the giving of notice of all meetings of stockholders and of the Board of Directors and shall keep and attest true records of all such proceedings. The Secretary shall have charge of the corporate seal and have authority to attest any and all instruments or writings to which the same may be affixed and shall keep and account for all books, documents, papers, and records of the Corporation relating to its corporate organization. The Secretary shall have authority to sign stock certificates and shall generally perform all the duties usually pertaining to the office of secretary of a corporation. In the absence of the Secretary, an Assistant Secretary or Secretary pro tempore shall perform the duties of the Secretary.
 
The Treasurer shall have the care and custody of all moneys, funds, and securities of the Corporation, and shall deposit or cause to be deposited all funds of the Corporation in accordance with directions or authorizations of the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer. The Treasurer shall have power to sign stock certificates, to indorse for deposit or collection, or otherwise, all checks, drafts, notes, bills of exchange, or other commercial paper payable to the Corporation, and to give proper receipts or discharges therefor. In the absence of the Treasurer, an Assistant Treasurer shall perform the duties of the Treasurer.
 
In addition to the foregoing especially enumerated duties and powers, the several officers of the Corporation shall perform such other duties and exercise such further powers as may be provided in these By-Laws or as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine, or as may be assigned to them by any superior officer.
 
If, as a result of a disaster or other state of emergency, the Chief Executive Officer is unable to perform the duties of that office, (a) the powers and duties of the Chief Executive Officer shall be performed by the officer designated as Chief Financial Officer of the Corporation, provided that such officer is available and capable of performing such powers and duties, until the Chief Executive Officer becomes capable of performing those duties or until the Board of Directors shall have elected a new Chief Executive Officer or designated another individual as Acting Chief
 
Executive Officer; (b) such officer shall have the power in addition to all other powers granted to the Chief Executive Officer by these By-Laws and by the Board of Directors to appoint an acting President, acting Vice President - Finance, acting Controller, acting Secretary, and acting Treasurer, if any of the persons duly elected to any such office is not, by reason of such disaster or emergency, able to perform the duties of such office, each of such acting appointees to serve in such capacities until the officer for whom the appointee is acting becomes capable of performing the duties of such office or until the Board of Directors shall have designated another individual to perform such duties or have elected another person to fill such office; (c) any such acting officer so appointed shall be entitled to exercise all powers vested by these By-Laws or the Board of Directors in the duly elected officer for whom the acting officer is acting; and (d) anyone transacting business with the Corporation may rely upon a certification by any two (2) officers of the Corporation that a specified individual has succeeded to the powers of the Chief Executive Officer and that such person has appointed other acting officers as herein provided and any person, firm, corporation, or other entity to which such certification has been delivered by such officers may continue to rely upon it until notified of a change in writing signed by two (2) officers of the Corporation.
 
The shares of the stock of the Corporation shall be represented by certificates, provided that the Board of Directors may provide by resolution or resolutions that some or all of any or all classes or series of stock shall be uncertificated shares. Any such resolution shall not apply to shares represented by certificate until such certificate is surrendered to the Corporation. Every holder of stock of the Corporation represented by a certificate shall be entitled to a certificate, signed by the Chairman of the Board or the President or a Vice President and the Treasurer or an Assistant Treasurer or the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary, certifying the number of shares owned by the stockholder in the Corporation. Any and all of the signatures on a certificate may be a facsimile. If any officer, transfer agent, or registrar who has signed or whose facsimile signature has been placed upon a certificate shall have ceased to be such officer, transfer agent, or registrar before such certificate is issued, it may be issued by the Corporation with the same effect as if he or she were such officer, transfer agent, or registrar at the date of issue.
 
The Board of Directors may, in its discretion, appoint responsible banks or trust companies in the Borough of Manhattan, in the City of New York, State of New York, or in such other city or cities as the Board of Directors may deem advisable, from time to time, to act as transfer agents and registrars of the stock of the Corporation; and, when such appointments shall have been made, no stock certificate shall be valid until countersigned by one of such transfer agents and registered by one of such registrars.
 
Shares of stock may be transferred by delivery of the certificates therefor, accompanied either by an assignment in writing on the back of the certificates or by written power of attorney to sell, assign, and transfer the same, signed by the record holder thereof (or, with respect to uncertificated shares, by delivery of duly executed instructions or in any other manner permitted by law), but no transfer shall affect the right of the Corporation to pay any dividend upon the stock to the holder of record thereof, or to treat the holder of record as the holder in fact thereof for all purposes, and no transfer shall be valid, except between the parties thereto, until such transfer shall have been made upon the books of the Corporation.
 
The Board of Directors may provide for the issuance of new certificates of stock or uncertificated shares to replace certificates of stock lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, or alleged to be lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, upon such terms and in accordance with such procedures as the Board of Directors shall deem proper and prescribe.
 
 
The fiscal year of the Corporation shall be the calendar year.
 
 
All bills, notes, checks, or other instruments for the payment of money shall be signed or countersigned by such officer or officers and in such manner as from time to time may be prescribed by resolution (whether general or special) of the Board of Directors.
 
4.1
Right to Indemnification.
Each person who was or is made a party to or is threatened to be made a party to or is otherwise involved (including, without limitation, as a witness) in any actual or threatened action, suit, or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative, or investigative (hereinafter a "proceeding"), by reason of the fact that he or she is or was a director or officer of the Corporation or that, being or having been such a director or officer or an employee of the Corporation, he or she is or was serving at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation as a director, officer, employee, or agent of another corporation or of a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise, including service with respect to an employee benefit plan (hereinafter an "indemnitee"), whether the basis of such proceeding is alleged action in an official capacity as such a director, officer, employee, or agent or in any other capacity while serving as such a director, officer, employee, or agent, shall be indemnified and held harmless by the Corporation to the full extent permitted by the Delaware General Corporation Law, as the same exists or may hereafter be amended (but, in the case of any such amendment, only to the extent that such amendment permits the Corporation to provide broader indemnification rights than permitted prior thereto), or by other applicable law as then in effect, against all expense, liability, and loss (including attorneys' fees, judgments, fines, ERISA excise taxes or penalties, and amounts paid in settlement) actually and reasonably incurred or suffered by such indemnitee in connection therewith, and such indemnification shall continue as to an indemnitee who has ceased to be a director, officer, employee, or agent and shall inure to the benefit of the indemnitee's heirs, executors, and administrators; provided, however, that except as provided in Article VII, Section 4.2 with respect to proceedings seeking to enforce rights to indemnification, the Corporation shall indemnify any such indemnitee in connection with a proceeding (or part thereof) initiated by such indemnitee only if such proceeding (or part thereof) was authorized or ratified by the Board of Directors. The right to indemnification conferred in this Section 4.1 shall be a contract right and shall include the right to be paid by the Corporation the expenses incurred in defending any such proceeding in advance of its final disposition (hereinafter an "advancement of expenses"); provided, however, that an advancement of expenses incurred by an indemnitee in his or her capacity as a director or officer or former director or officer (and not in any other capacity in which service was or is rendered by such indemnitee, including, without limitation, service to an employee benefit plan) shall be made only upon delivery to the Corporation of an undertaking (hereinafter an "undertaking"), by or on behalf of such indemnitee, to repay all amounts so advanced if it shall ultimately be determined by final judicial decision from which there is no further right to appeal that such indemnitee is not entitled to be indemnified for such expenses under this Section 4.1 or otherwise; and provided, further, that an advancement of expenses shall not be made if the Board of Directors makes a good faith determination that such payment would violate law or public policy.
4.2
Right of Indemnitee to Bring Suit.
If a claim under Article VII, Section 4.1 is not paid in full by the Corporation within sixty (60) days after a written claim has been received by the Corporation, except in the case of a claim for an advancement of expenses, in which case the applicable period shall be twenty (20) days, the indemnitee may at any time thereafter bring suit against the Corporation to recover the unpaid amount of the claim. If successful in whole or in part in any such suit, or in a suit
 
brought by the Corporation to recover an advancement of expenses pursuant to the terms of an undertaking, the indemnitee shall also be entitled to be paid the expenses of prosecuting or defending such suit. The indemnitee shall be presumed to be entitled to indemnification under this Section 4 upon submission of a written claim (and, in an action brought to enforce a claim for an advancement of expenses, where the required undertaking has been tendered to the Corporation), and thereafter the Corporation shall have the burden of proof to overcome the presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled. Neither the failure of the Corporation (including the Board of Directors, independent legal counsel, or the stockholders) to have made a determination prior to the commencement of such suit that indemnification of the indemnitee is proper in the circumstances, nor an actual determination by the Corporation (including the Board of Directors, independent legal counsel, or the stockholders) that the indemnitee is not entitled to indemnification shall be a defense to the suit or create a presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled.
4.3 Nonexclusivity of Rights.
The rights to indemnification and to the advancement of expenses conferred in this Section 4 shall not be exclusive of any other right that any person may have or hereafter acquire under any statute, provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation, these By-Laws, any agreement, vote of stockholders or disinterested directors, or otherwise. Neither any amendment to or repeal of this Section 4 or of any of the procedures established by the Board of Directors pursuant to Article VII, Section 4.7, nor the adoption of any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, nor, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any modification of law, shall eliminate or reduce the effect of the right or protection of any indemnitee to indemnification and to the advancement of expenses in accordance with the provisions hereof and thereof with respect to any proceeding (regardless of when such proceeding is first threatened, commenced or completed) arising out of, or related to, any acts or omissions of such indemnitee occurring prior to such amendment or repeal.
.
4.4 Insurance, Contracts, and Funding
The Corporation may maintain insurance, at its expense, to protect itself and any director, officer, employee, or agent of the Corporation or another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise against any expense, liability, or loss, whether or not the Corporation would have the power to indemnify such person against such expense, liability, or loss under the Delaware General Corporation Law. The Corporation may, without further stockholder approval, enter into contracts with any indemnitee in furtherance of the provisions of this Section 4 and may create a trust fund, grant a security interest, or use other means (including, without limitation, a letter of credit) to ensure the payment of such amounts as may be necessary to effect indemnification as provided in this Section 4.
.
4.5 Persons Serving Other Entities
Any person who is or was a director, officer, or employee of the Corporation who is or was serving (i) as a director or officer of another corporation of which a majority of the shares entitled to vote in the election of its directors is held by the Corporation or (ii) in an executive or management capacity in a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise of which the Corporation or a wholly owned subsidiary of the Corporation is a general partner or has a majority ownership shall be deemed to be so serving at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation and entitled to indemnification and advancement of expenses under Article VII, Section 4.1.
4.6 Indemnification of Employees and Agents of the Corporation.
The Corporation may, by action of the Board of Directors, authorize one or more executive officers to grant rights to advancement of expenses to employees or agents of the Corporation on such terms and conditions as such officer or officers deem appropriate under the circumstances. The Corporation may, by action of the Board of Directors, grant rights to indemnification and advancement of expenses to employees or agents or groups of employees or agents of the Corporation with the same scope and effect as the provisions of this Section 4 with respect to the indemnification and advancement of expenses of directors and officers of the Corporation; provided, however, that an undertaking shall be made by an employee or agent only if required by the Board of Directors.
 
4.7 Procedures for the Submission of Claims.
The Board of Directors may establish reasonable procedures for the submission of claims for indemnification pursuant to this Section 4, determination of the entitlement of any person thereto, and review of any such determination.
 
With respect to any action arising out of any act or omission occurring after the adoption of this By-Law, unless the Corporation consents in writing to the selection of an alternative forum, the Court of Chancery of the State of Delaware shall be the sole and exclusive forum for (i) any derivative action or proceeding brought on behalf of the Corporation, (ii) any action asserting a claim of breach of a fiduciary duty owed by any director, officer or other employee of the Corporation to the Corporation or the Corporation's stockholders, (iii) any action asserting a claim arising pursuant to any provision of the Delaware General Corporation Law, the Certificate of Incorporate or these By-Laws, or (iv) any action asserting a claim governed by the internal affairs doctrine, in each case subject to the Court of Chancery of the State of Delaware having personal jurisdiction over the indispensable parties named as defendants therein.
 
Except as herein otherwise expressly provided, these By-Laws may be altered or repealed in any particular and new By-Laws, not inconsistent with any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or any provision of law, may be adopted, either by
A. the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority in number of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote at an annual meeting of stockholders or at a special meeting thereof, the notice of which special meeting shall include the form of the proposed alteration or repeal or of the proposed new By-Laws, or a summary thereof; or
B. either by
i. the affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors at any meeting thereof (or in accordance with Article II, Section 13), or
ii. the affirmative vote of all the directors present at any meeting at which a quorum, less than a majority, is present;
provided that Article I, Section 11.2 of these By-Laws may be amended only as set forth in Section 1.A of this By-Law, except that any amendment required by law or necessary or desirable to cure an administrative or technical deficiency may be made as provided in Section 1.B of this By-Law.
 
Notwithstanding anything contained in these By-Laws to the contrary, the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the Voting Stock, as defined in Article FOURTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, at a meeting of stockholders called for the purpose, shall be required to alter, amend, repeal, or adopt any provision inconsistent with Sections 3, 4 and 5 of Article IV of these By-Laws, notice of which meeting shall include the form of the proposed amendment, or a summary thereof.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20110830165645.txt.gz
TIME:20110830165645
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The Boeing Company (the "Company") is filing this Amendment No. 1 to its Current Report on Form 8-K filed on May 3, 2011 for the sole purpose of disclosing the Company's decision as to the frequency with which it will include advisory votes on executive compensation in future annual meeting proxy materials.
 
 
Item 5.07. Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders.
As previously reported, at the Company's 2011 Annual Meeting of Shareholders a majority of the shares cast voted, on an advisory basis, to hold future advisory votes on executive compensation on an annual basis. After consideration of the shareholder voting results, the Company's Board of Directors has determined that the Company will hold an annual advisory vote on executive compensation until the next shareholder advisory vote on the frequency of future votes on executive compensation.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: August 30, 2011


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20111004140710.txt.gz
TIME:20111004140710
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On October 3, 2011, the Board of Directors (the "Board") of The Boeing Company (the "Company") elected Lawrence W. Kellner, President of Emerald Creek Group LLC, as a new director. The Board has appointed Mr. Kellner to the Audit Committee and the Finance Committee.
Mr. Kellner will participate in the Company's nonemployee director compensation program, which is described on pages 15 to 18 of the Company's proxy statement for its 2011 Annual Meeting of Shareholders filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 18, 2011.
A copy of the Company's press release announcing the election of Mr. Kellner is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
On October 3, 2011, the Board adopted an amendment to Article II, Section 1 of the Company's By-Laws to increase the number of directors from eleven to twelve. A copy of the amended and restated By-Laws is attached hereto as Exhibit 3.2 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 3.2
 
 
 
 
The annual meeting of stockholders shall be held on such date and at such time as the Board of Directors shall determine for the election of directors and the transaction of such other business as may properly be brought before the meeting.
 
A special meeting of stockholders may be called at any time by the Board of Directors, and the Board of Directors shall call a special meeting upon written request to the Secretary by stockholders entitled to vote and dispose of at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the outstanding shares of the Corporation. Any such written request must be signed by each requesting holder, stating the number of shares owned by each such holder, and shall specify the purpose of the proposed meeting (including the text of any resolutions proposed for consideration and, in the event that such business includes a proposal to amend these By-Laws or the Certificate of Incorporation, the language of the proposed amendment). Business transacted at any special meeting of stockholders shall be limited to the purposes stated in the notice provided pursuant to Article I, Section 4 of these By-Laws; provided, however, that nothing in these By-Laws shall prohibit the Board of Directors from submitting matters to the stockholders at any special meeting requested by stockholders.
 
All meetings of stockholders shall be held at such place or places, if any, within or without the State of Delaware as may from time to time be fixed by the Board of Directors or as shall be specified or fixed in the respective notices or waivers of notice thereof.
 
Except as otherwise required by statute and as set forth below, notice of each annual or special meeting of stockholders shall be given by the Corporation personally, by mail or by electronic transmission to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date. Except as otherwise required by statute, no publication of any notice of a meeting of stockholders shall be required. Every notice of a meeting of stockholders shall state the place, if any (or the means of remote communication, if any, by which stockholders and proxy holders may be deemed to be present in person), date, and hour of the meeting and, in the case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called (including any purpose set forth in a request by stockholders properly made pursuant to Article I, Section 2 of these By-Laws). Notices are deemed given by the Corporation (i) if by mail, when deposited in the United States mail, postage prepaid, directed to the stockholder at such stockholder's address as it appears on the records of the Corporation, or, if a stockholder shall have filed with the Secretary a written request that notices to such stockholder be mailed to some other address, then directed to such stockholder at such other address; (ii) if by facsimile, when directed to a number at which the stockholder has consented to receive notice; (iii) if by electronic mail, when directed to an electronic mail address at which the stockholder has consented to receive such notice; (iv) if by posting on an electronic network together with a separate notice to the stockholder of such specific posting, upon the later to occur of (A) such posting and (B) the giving of such separate notice of such posting; and (v) if by any other form of electronic transmission, when directed to the stockholder as required by law and, to the extent required by applicable law, in the manner consented to by the stockholder. An affidavit of the mailing or other means of giving any notice of any stockholders' meeting, executed by the Secretary, Assistant Secretary or any transfer agent of the Corporation giving the notice, shall be prima facie evidence of the giving of such notice. Notice shall be deemed to have been given to all stockholders of record who share an address if notice is given in accordance with the "householding" rules set forth in Rule 14a-3(e) under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "Exchange Act"), and Section 233 of the Delaware General Corporation Law. Any previously scheduled meeting of stockholders may be postponed by resolution of the Board of Directors upon public notice given prior to the time previously scheduled for such meeting of stockholders.
 
Whenever any notice is required to be given to any stockholder under the provisions of these By-Laws, the Certificate of Incorporation, or the Delaware General Corporation Law, a waiver thereof in writing signed by the person or persons entitled to such notice or a waiver by electronic transmission, whether before or after the time stated therein, shall be deemed equivalent to the giving of such notice. The attendance of a stockholder at a meeting, in person or by proxy shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when a stockholder attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened.
 
At all meetings of stockholders, except when otherwise provided by applicable law, the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, the presence, in person or by proxy, of the holders of one-third of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and except as otherwise provided by the Certificate of Incorporation, these By-Laws, the rules and regulations of any stock exchange applicable to the Corporation, or applicable law or pursuant to any regulation applicable to the Corporation or its securities, the vote, in person or by proxy, of the holders of a majority of the shares constituting such quorum shall be binding upon all stockholders. In the absence of a quorum, the chairman of the meeting or a majority of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote may adjourn any meeting to another place and time. At any such adjourned meeting at which a quorum shall be present, any business may be transacted which might have been transacted at the meeting as originally called. Unless otherwise provided by statute, no notice of an adjourned meeting need be given.
 
7.1 Appointment.
Each stockholder entitled to vote at a meeting of stockholders or to express consent or dissent to corporate action in writing without a meeting may authorize another person or persons to act for such stockholder by proxy. Such authorization may be accomplished by the stockholder or such stockholder's authorized officer, director, employee, or agent executing a writing or causing his or her signature to be affixed to such writing by any reasonable means, including facsimile signature or by electronic transmission to the intended holder of the proxy or to a proxy solicitation firm, proxy support service, or similar agent duly authorized by the intended proxy holder to receive such transmission.
7.2 Delivery to Corporation; Duration.
A proxy shall be filed with the Secretary before or at the time of the meeting or the delivery to the Corporation of the consent to corporate action in writing. A proxy shall become invalid three (3) years after the date of its execution, unless otherwise provided in the proxy. A proxy with respect to a specified meeting shall entitle the holder thereof to vote at any reconvened meeting following adjournment of such meeting but shall not be valid after the final adjournment thereof. A proxy shall be irrevocable if it states that it is irrevocable and if, and only as long as, it is coupled with an interest sufficient in law to support an irrevocable power. A stockholder may revoke any proxy which is not irrevocable by attending the meeting and voting in person or by delivering to the Secretary a revocation of the proxy or a new proxy bearing a later date.
 
8.1 Appointment.
In advance of any meeting of stockholders, the Board of Directors shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspectors of election at such meeting and any adjournment thereof and to make a written report thereof. The Board of Directors may designate one or more persons to serve as alternate inspectors to serve in place of any inspector who is unable or fails to act. If no inspector or alternate is able to act at a meeting of stockholders, the chairman of such meeting shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspector at such meeting. Inspectors may be employees of the Corporation, but no director or candidate for director may act as an inspector of an election of directors.
 
8.2 Duties.
The inspectors of election shall (a) ascertain the number of shares of the Corporation outstanding and the voting power of each such share; (b) determine the shares represented at the meeting and the validity of proxies and ballots; (c) count all votes and ballots; (d) determine and retain for a reasonable period of time a record of the disposition of any challenges made to any determination by them; and (e) certify their determination of the number of shares represented at the meeting and their count of the votes and ballots. Each inspector shall, before entering upon the discharge of his or her duties, take and sign an oath to faithfully execute the duties of inspector with strict impartiality and according to the best of his or her ability. The inspectors may appoint or retain other persons or entities to assist them in the performance of their duties.
8.3 Determination of Proxy Validity.
The validity of any proxy or ballot executed for a meeting of stockholders shall be determined by the inspectors of election in accordance with the Delaware General Corporation Law.
 
9.1 Meetings.
For the purpose of determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at any meeting of stockholders or any adjournment thereof, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which record date shall be not fewer than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the date of such meeting. If no record date is fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall be at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which notice is given, or, if notice is waived, at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which the meeting is held. A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting; provided, however, that the Board of Directors may fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
9.2 Consent to Corporate Action Without a Meeting.
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which record date shall not be more than ten (10) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days after the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors. Any stockholder of record seeking to have the stockholders authorize or take corporate action by written consent pursuant to Article I, Section 10 of these By-Laws shall, by written notice to the Secretary, request that the Board of Directors fix a record date, which notice shall include the text of any proposed resolutions. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors pursuant to this Section 9.2 or otherwise within ten (10) days of receipt of a valid request by a stockholder, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, when no prior action by the Board of Directors is required pursuant to applicable law, shall be the first date on which a signed written consent setting forth the action taken or proposed to be taken is delivered to the Corporation pursuant to Article I, Section 10 of these By-Laws; provided, however, that if prior action by the Board of Directors is required by applicable law, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting shall in such an event be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution taking such prior action.
9.3 Dividends, Distributions, and Other Rights.
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to receive payment of any dividend or other distribution or allotment of any rights or the stockholders entitled to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion, or exchange of stock, or for the purpose of any other lawful action, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted, and which record
 
date shall be not more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days prior to such action. If no record date is fixed, the record date for determining stockholders for any such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution relating thereto.
9.4 Voting List.
The officer who has charge of the stock ledger shall prepare and make, at least ten (10) days before each meeting of stockholders, a complete list of the stockholders entitled to vote at such meeting, arranged in alphabetical order, and showing the address of each stockholder and the number of shares registered in the name of each stockholder. This list shall be open to examination by any stockholder, for any purpose germane to the meeting, for a period of ten (10) days prior to the meeting, either (i) on a reasonably accessible electronic network, provided that the information required to gain access to such list is provided with the notice of meeting, or (ii) during ordinary business hours at the principal place of business of the Corporation. The list shall also be produced and kept at such meeting for inspection by any stockholder who is present.
 
Subject to the provisions of Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation and Article I, Section 9.2 of these By-Laws, any action which could be taken at any annual or special meeting of stockholders may be taken without a meeting, without prior notice, and without a vote, if a consent or consents in writing, setting forth the action so taken, are (a) signed by the holders of outstanding stock having not fewer than the minimum number of votes that would be necessary to authorize or take such action at a meeting at which all shares entitled to vote thereon were present and voted and (b) delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the records of proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Delivery made to the Corporation's registered office shall be by hand or by certified mail or registered mail, return receipt requested. Every written consent shall bear the date of signature of each stockholder who signs the consent, and no written consent shall be effective to take the corporate action referred to therein unless written consents signed by a sufficient number of stockholders to take such action are delivered to the Corporation, in the manner required by this Section 10, within sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days of the date of the earliest dated consent delivered to the Corporation in the manner required by this Section 10. The validity of any consent executed by a proxy for a stockholder pursuant to an electronic transmission transmitted to such proxy holder by or upon the authorization of the stockholder shall be determined by or at the direction of the Secretary. A written record of the information upon which the person making such determination relied shall be made and kept in the records of the proceedings of the stockholders. Any such consent shall be inserted in the minute book as if it were the minutes of a meeting of stockholders. Prompt notice of the taking of the corporate action without a meeting by less than unanimous written consent shall be given to those stockholders who have not consented in writing.
In the event of the delivery, in the manner provided by this Section 10 and applicable law, to the Corporation of written consent or consents to take corporate action and/or any related revocation or revocations, the Corporation shall engage independent inspectors of election for the purpose of performing promptly a ministerial review of the validity of the consents and revocations. For the purpose of permitting the inspectors to perform such review, no action by written consent and without a meeting shall be effective until such inspectors have completed their review, determined that the requisite number of valid and unrevoked consents delivered to the Corporation in accordance with this Section 10 and applicable law have been obtained to authorize or take the action specified in the consents, and certified such determination for entry in the records of the Corporation kept for the purpose of recording the proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Nothing contained in this Section 10 shall in any way be construed to suggest or imply that the Board of Directors or any stockholder shall not be entitled to contest the validity of any consent or revocation thereof, whether before or after such certification by the independent inspectors, or to take any other action (including, without limitation, the commencement, prosecution or defense of any litigation with respect thereto, and the seeking of injunctive relief in such litigation).
 
11.1 Notice of Nominations and Other Stockholder Business.
A. Annual Meetings of Stockholders.
1. Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors and the proposal of other business to be considered by the stockholders may be made at an annual meeting of stockholders (a) as specified in the Corporation's notice of meeting (or any supplement thereto); (b) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof; or (c) by any stockholder of the Corporation who (i) was a stockholder of record at the time the notice provided for in this By-Law is delivered to the Secretary, (ii) is entitled to vote at the meeting, and (iii) complies with the notice procedures set forth in this By-Law as to such nomination or other business; clause (c) shall be the exclusive means for a stockholder to make nominations or submit proposals for other business (other than matters properly brought under Rule 14a-8 under the Exchange Act and included in the Corporation's proxy statement that has been prepared to solicit proxies for such annual meeting) before an annual meeting of stockholders.
2. Without qualification, for any nominations or any other business to be properly brought before an annual meeting by a stockholder pursuant to Section 11.1.A(1)(c), the stockholder must have given timely notice thereof in writing to the Secretary and any such proposed business (other than the nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors) must constitute a proper matter for stockholder action. To be timely, a stockholder's notice shall be delivered to the Secretary at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not earlier than the close of business on the one hundred and twentieth (120
th
) day and not later than the close of business on the ninetieth (90th) day prior to the first anniversary of the preceding year's annual meeting; provided, however, that in the event that the date of the annual meeting is more than thirty (30) days before or more than seventy (70) days after such anniversary date, notice by the stockholder to be timely must be so delivered not earlier than the close of business on the one hundred and twentieth (120
th
) day prior to such annual meeting and not later than the close of business on the later of the ninetieth (90
th
) day prior to such annual meeting and the tenth (10
th
) day following the day on which public announcement of the date of such annual meeting is first made by the Corporation. In no event shall the adjournment or postponement of an annual meeting (or any public announcement thereof) commence a new time period (or extend any time period) for the giving of a stockholder's notice as described above. To be in proper form, such stockholder's notice (whether given pursuant to this Section 11.1.A(2) or Section 11.1.B) to the Secretary must: (a) set forth, as to the stockholder giving the notice and the beneficial owner, if any, on whose behalf the nomination or proposal for other business is made (i) the name and address of such stockholder, as they appear on the Corporation's books, and of such beneficial owner, if any, (ii) (A) the class or series and number of shares of the Corporation which are, directly or indirectly, owned beneficially and of record by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, (B) a description of any option, warrant, convertible security, stock appreciation right, or similar right with an exercise or conversion privilege or a settlement payment or mechanism at a price related to any class or series of shares of the Corporation or with a value derived in whole or in part from the value of any class or series of shares of the Corporation, whether or not such instrument or right shall be subject to settlement in the underlying class or series of shares of the Corporation or otherwise (a "Derivative Instrument") directly or indirectly owned beneficially by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, and any other direct or indirect opportunity to profit or share in any profit derived from any increase or decrease in the value of shares of the Corporation, (C) a description of any proxy, contract, arrangement, understanding, or relationship pursuant to which such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, has a right to vote any shares of any security of the Corporation, (D) any short interest in any security of the Corporation (for purposes of this By-Law a person shall be deemed to have a short interest in a security if such person directly or indirectly, through any contract, arrangement, understanding, relationship or otherwise, has the opportunity to profit or share in any profit derived from any decrease in the value of the subject security), (E) any rights to dividends on the shares of the Corporation owned beneficially by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, that are separated or separable from the underlying shares of the Corporation, (F) any proportionate interest in shares of the Corporation or Derivative Instruments held, directly or indirectly, by a general or limited partnership in which such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, is a general partner or, directly or indirectly, beneficially owns an interest in a general partner, and (G) any performance-related fees (other than an asset-based fee) that such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, is entitled to based on any increase or decrease in the value of shares of the Corporation or Derivative Instruments, if any, all such information to be provided as of the date of such notice, including, without limitation, any such interests held by members of such stockholder's and such beneficial owner's, if any, immediate
 
family sharing the same household (which information shall be supplemented by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, not later than ten (10) days after the record date for the annual meeting to disclose such ownership as of the record date), (iii) any other information relating to such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, that would be required to be disclosed in a proxy statement or other filings required to be made in connection with solicitations of proxies for, as applicable, the proposal of other business and/or for the election of directors in a contested election pursuant to Section 14 of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, (iv) a representation (A) that the stockholder is a holder of record of stock of the Corporation entitled to vote at such annual meeting and intends to appear in person or by proxy at the annual meeting to propose such business or nomination and (B) whether the stockholder or the beneficial owner, if any, intends or is part of a group which intends (x) to deliver a proxy statement and/or form of proxy to holders of at least the percentage of the Corporation's outstanding capital stock required to approve or adopt the proposal or elect the nominee and/or (y) otherwise to solicit proxies or votes from stockholders in support of such proposal or nomination, and (v) an undertaking by the stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, to notify the Corporation in writing of any change in the information called for by clauses (i), (ii), (iii) and (iv) as of the record date for such meeting, by notice received by the Secretary at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not later than the 10
th
day following such record date; (b) if the notice relates to any business other than the nomination of a director or directors that the stockholder proposes to bring before the annual meeting, set forth (i) a brief description of the business desired to be brought before the annual meeting, the text of the proposal or business (including the text of any resolutions proposed for consideration and in the event that such business includes a proposal to amend these By-Laws, the language of the proposed amendment), the reasons for conducting such business at the annual meeting and any material interest of such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, in such business and (ii) a description of all agreements, arrangements, and understandings between such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, and their respective affiliates and associates, and any other person or persons (including their names) acting in concert therewith in connection with the proposal of such business by such stockholder; (c) set forth, as to each person, if any, whom the stockholder proposes to nominate for election or reelection to the Board of Directors (i) all information relating to such person that would be required to be disclosed in a proxy statement or other filings required to be made in connection with solicitations of proxies for election of directors in a contested election pursuant to Section 14 of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, (ii) such person's written consent to being named in the proxy statement as a nominee and to serving as a director if elected and a statement whether such person, if elected, intends to tender, promptly following such person's election or reelection, an irrevocable resignation effective upon such person's failure to receive the required vote for reelection at the next meeting at which such person would face reelection and upon acceptance of such resignation by the Board of Directors, and (iii) a description of all direct and indirect compensation and other material monetary agreements, arrangements and understandings during the past three (3) years, and any other material relationships, between or among such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, and their respective affiliates and associates, or any other person or persons (including their names) acting in concert therewith, on the one hand, and each proposed nominee, and his or her respective affiliates and associates, or any other person or persons (including their names) acting in concert therewith, on the other hand, including, without limitation, all information that would be required to be disclosed pursuant to Item 404 promulgated under Regulation S-K if the stockholder making the nomination and any beneficial owner on whose behalf the nomination is made, if any, or any affiliate or associate thereof or person acting in concert therewith, were the "registrant" for purposes of such rule and the nominee were a director or executive officer of such registrant; and (d) with respect to each nominee for election or reelection to the Board of Directors, include the completed and signed questionnaire, representation and agreement required by Section 11.3. The Corporation may require any proposed nominee to furnish such other information as may reasonably be required by the Corporation to determine the eligibility of such proposed nominee to serve as an independent director of the Corporation or that could be material to a reasonable stockholder's understanding of the independence, or lack thereof, of such nominee.
3. Notwithstanding anything in the second sentence of Section 11.1.A(2) to the contrary, in the event that the number of directors to be elected to the Board of Directors at the annual meeting of stockholders is increased effective after the time period for which nominations would otherwise be due under Section 11.1.A(2) and there is no public announcement by the Corporation naming all of the nominees for the additional directorships at least one hundred (100) days prior to the first anniversary of the preceding year's annual meeting, a stockholder's notice required by this By-Law shall also be considered timely, but only with respect to nominees for any new positions created by such increase, if it shall be delivered to the Secretary at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not later than the close of business on the tenth (10
th
) day following the day on which such public announcement is first made by the Corporation.
 
B. Special Meetings of Stockholders.
Only such business shall be conducted at a special meeting of stockholders as shall have been brought before the special meeting pursuant to the Corporation's notice of meeting. Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors may be made at a special meeting at which directors are to be elected pursuant to the Corporation's notice of special meeting (a) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof or stockholders pursuant to Article 1, Section 2 hereof, or (b) provided that the Board of Directors or stockholders pursuant to Article 1, Section 2 hereof has determined that directors shall be elected at such special meeting, by any stockholder of the Corporation who (i) is a stockholder of record at the time the notice provided for in this By-Law is delivered to the Secretary and at the time of the special meeting, (ii) is entitled to vote at the special meeting, and (iii) complies with the notice procedures set forth in this By-Law (including the information requirements in Section 11.1.A(2)) as to such nomination. For the avoidance of doubt, the foregoing clause (b) of this Section 11.1.B shall be the exclusive means for a stockholder to propose nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors at a special meeting of stockholders at which directors are to be elected. In the event the Corporation calls a special meeting for the purpose of electing one or more directors to the Board of Directors, any such stockholder may nominate a person or persons (as the case may be) for election to such position(s) as specified in the Corporation's notice of meeting, if the stockholder's notice required by Section 11.1.A(2) (including the completed and signed questionnaire, representation and agreement required by Section 11.3) shall be delivered to the Secretary at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not earlier than the close of business on the one hundred and twentieth (120th) day prior to such special meeting and not later than the close of business on the later of the ninetieth (90th) day prior to such special meeting and the tenth (10th) day following the day on which public announcement is first made of the date of the special meeting and of the nominees proposed by the Board of Directors to be elected at such special meeting. In no event shall the adjournment or postponement of a special meeting as to which notice has been sent to stockholders, or any public announcement with respect thereto, commence a new time period (or extend any time period) for the giving of a stockholder's notice as described above.
C. General.
1. Only such persons who are nominated in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law shall be eligible to be elected as directors at an annual or special meeting of stockholders or to serve as directors and only such business shall be conducted at a meeting of stockholders as shall have been brought before the meeting in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law. Except as otherwise provided by law, the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, the chairman of the meeting shall have the power and duty (a) to determine whether a nomination or any other business proposed to be brought before the meeting was made or proposed, as the case may be, in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law (including whether the stockholder or beneficial owner, if any, on whose behalf the nomination or proposal is made solicited (or is part of a group which solicited) or did not so solicit, as the case may be, proxies in support of such stockholder's nominee or proposal in compliance with such stockholder's representation as required by Section 11.1.A(2)(a)(iv)) and (b) if any proposed nomination or business was not made or proposed in compliance with this By-Law, to declare that such nomination shall be disregarded or that such proposed business shall not be transacted. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this By-Law, unless otherwise required by law, if the stockholder (or a qualified representative of the stockholder) does not appear at the annual or special meeting of stockholders of the Corporation to present a nomination or proposed business, such nomination shall be disregarded and such proposed business shall not be transacted, notwithstanding that proxies in respect of such vote may have been received by the Corporation. For purposes of this By-Law, to be considered a qualified representative of the stockholder, a person must be a duly authorized officer, manager, or partner of such stockholder or must be authorized by a writing executed by such stockholder or an electronic transmission delivered by such stockholder to act for such stockholder as proxy at the annual or special meeting and such person must produce such writing or electronic transmission, or a reliable reproduction of the writing or electronic transmission, at the annual or special meeting.
2. For purposes of this By-Law, "public announcement" shall mean disclosure in a press release reported by the Dow Jones News Service, Associated Press, or comparable national news service or in a document publicly filed by the Corporation with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to Section 13, 14 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.
 
3. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this By-Law, a stockholder shall also comply with all applicable requirements of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder with respect to the matters set forth in this By-Law; provided, however, that any references in these By-Laws to the Exchange Act or to the rules or regulations promulgated thereunder are not intended to and shall not limit the requirements applicable to any nominations or proposals as to any other business to be considered pursuant to this By-Law (including Section 11.1.A(1)(c) or Section 11.1.B). Nothing in this By-Law shall be deemed to affect any rights (a) of stockholders to request inclusion of proposals in the Corporation's proxy statement pursuant to Rule 14a-8 under the Exchange Act or (b) of the holders of any series of Preferred Stock if and to the extent provided for under law, the Certificate of Incorporation, or these By-Laws.
.
11.2 Required Vote for Directors
A nominee for director shall be elected to the Board of Directors if the votes cast for such nominee's election exceed the votes cast against such nominee's election; provided, however, that the directors shall be elected by a plurality of the votes cast at any meeting of stockholders for which (i) the Secretary receives a notice that a stockholder has nominated a person for election to the Board of Directors in compliance with the advance notice requirements for stockholder nominees for director set forth in Section 11.1 and (ii) such nomination has not been withdrawn by such stockholder on or prior to the tenth day preceding the date the Corporation first mails its notice of meeting for such meeting to stockholders. If directors are to be elected by a plurality of the votes cast, stockholders shall not be permitted to vote against a nominee. Votes cast shall exclude abstentions with respect to that director's election.
.
11.3 Director Qualification: Submission of Questionnaire, Representation, and Agreement
To be eligible to be a nominee for election or reelection as a director of the Corporation, a person must deliver (in accordance with the time periods prescribed for delivery of notice under Section 11.1) to the Secretary at the principal executive offices of the Corporation a written questionnaire with respect to the background and qualification of such person and the background of any other person or entity on whose behalf the nomination is being made (which questionnaire shall be provided by the Secretary upon written request) and a written representation and agreement (in the form provided by the Secretary upon written request), that such person (a) is not and will not become a party to (i) any agreement, arrangement, or understanding with, and has not given any commitment or assurance to, any person or entity as to how such person, if elected as a director of the Corporation, will act or vote on any issue or question (a "Voting Commitment") that has not been disclosed to the Corporation or (ii) any Voting Commitment that could limit or interfere with such person's ability to comply, if elected as a director of the Corporation, with such person's fiduciary duties under applicable law; (b) is not and will not become a party to any agreement, arrangement, or understanding with any person or entity other than the Corporation with respect to any direct or indirect compensation, reimbursement, or indemnification in connection with service or action as a director that has not been disclosed therein; and (c) in such person's individual capacity and on behalf of any person or entity on whose behalf the nomination is being made, would be in compliance, if elected as a director of the Corporation, and will comply with all applicable publicly disclosed corporate governance, ethics, conflict of interest, confidentiality and stock ownership and trading policies and guidelines of the Corporation.
 
Any written notice or consent required to be delivered by a stockholder to the Corporation pursuant to Sections 9.2 or 11.1 of this Article I or Section 2.1 of Article II must be given, either by personal delivery or by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, to the Secretary at the Corporation's executive offices in the City of Chicago, State of Illinois.
 
The Chairman of the Board of Directors or, in the Chairman's absence, a Director or officer as a majority of the members of the Board may designate shall act as chairman of meetings of stockholders. The Secretary shall act as secretary of meetings of stockholders, but in his or her absence the chairman of the meeting may appoint any
 
person to act as secretary of the meeting. Except to the extent inconsistent with any rules and regulations for the conduct of any meeting of stockholders as adopted by the Board of Directors, the chairman of any meeting of stockholders shall have the right and authority to convene and (for any or no reason) to adjourn the meeting, to prescribe such rules, regulations and procedures and to do all such acts as, in the judgment of such chairman, are appropriate for the proper conduct of the meeting.
 
The number of directors shall be twelve (12), but the number may be increased, or decreased to not less than three (3), from time to time, by the directors or stockholders by amendment of these By-Laws in accordance with Article VIII. At each annual meeting of stockholders, each director shall be elected to hold office until the next annual meeting or until his or her successor shall be elected and qualified or until his or her earlier death, disqualification, resignation or removal.
 
.
2.1
Nomination
Only persons who are nominated in accordance with Article I, Section 11 of these By-Laws shall be eligible for election as directors.
2.2 Election.
At each election of directors by stockholders, the persons who are elected in accordance with Article I, Section 11 of these By-Laws shall be the directors.
 
Meetings of the Board of Directors, or of any committee thereof, may be held within or without the State of Delaware.
 
Each year the Board of Directors shall meet in connection with the annual meeting of stockholders for the purpose of electing officers and for the transaction of other business. No notice of such annual meeting of the Board of Directors is required. Such annual meeting may be held at any other time or place which shall be specified in a notice given as hereinafter provided for special meetings of the Board of Directors, or in a consent and waiver of notice thereof, signed by all the directors.
 
The Board of Directors may, by resolution adopted by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors, from time to time appoint the time and place for holding stated meetings of the Board of Directors, if by it deemed advisable; and such stated meetings shall thereupon be held at the time and place so appointed, without the giving of any special notice with regard thereto. Except as otherwise provided in these By-Laws, any and all business may be transacted at any stated meeting.
 
6.1 Convenors and Notice.
Special meetings of the Board of Directors may be called by or at the request of the Chairman of the Board of Directors or any two (2) directors. Notice of a special meeting of the Board of Directors, stating the place, day, and hour of the meeting, shall be given to each director in writing (by mail, electronic transmission or personal delivery) or orally (by telephone or in person).
 
6.2 Waiver of Notice.
With respect to a special meeting of the Board of Directors, a written waiver signed by a director or waiver by electronic transmission shall be deemed equivalent to notice to that director. A director's attendance at a meeting shall constitute that director's waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the director attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting was not lawfully called or convened. Neither the business to be transacted at, nor the purpose of, any regular or special meeting of the Board of Directors need be specified in the waiver of notice of such meeting.
 
Except as herein otherwise provided, forty percent (40%) of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided for in these By-Laws at the time of any stated or special meeting of the Board of Directors or, if vacancies exist on the Board of Directors, forty percent (40%) of such number of directors then in office; provided, however, that such number may not be less than one-third of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided for in these By-Laws, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and, except as otherwise required by statute, the Certificate of Incorporation, or these By-Laws, the act of a majority of the directors present at any such meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of the Board of Directors. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the directors present may adjourn any meeting, from time to time, until a quorum is present. No notice of any adjourned meeting need be given.
 
The Chairman of the Board shall preside, when present, at all meetings of the Board of Directors, except as otherwise provided by law.
 
Any director may resign at any time by giving written notice or notice by electronic transmission thereof to the Secretary. Such resignation shall take effect at the time specified therefor or if the time is not specified, upon delivery thereof; and, unless otherwise specified with respect thereto, the acceptance of such resignation shall not be necessary to make it effective.
 
Any director may be removed with or without cause by the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, at a meeting of stockholders called for that purpose; and the vacancy on the Board of Directors caused by any such removal may be filled by the stockholders at such meeting or at any subsequent meeting.
 
In case of any increase in the number of directors, or of any vacancy created by death, disqualification, or resignation, the additional director or directors may be elected or, as the case may be, the vacancy or vacancies may be filled, either (a) by the affirmative vote of a majority of the remaining directors, even if less than a quorum or (b) by the stockholders entitled to vote, either at an annual meeting or at a special meeting thereof called for that purpose, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the outstanding shares entitled to vote at such meeting.
 
The Board of Directors shall have authority to determine from time to time the amount of compensation that shall be paid to its members for their service on the Board of Directors or any committee thereof.
 
Any action required or permitted to be taken at any meeting of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof may be taken without a meeting if all members of the Board of Directors or committee, as the case may be, consent thereto in writing or by electronic transmission, and the writings or electronic transmissions are filed with the minutes of proceedings of the Board of Directors or committee.
 
Members of the Board of Directors, or any committee designated by the Board of Directors, may participate in a meeting thereof by means of conference telephone or other communications equipment by means of which all persons participating in the meeting can hear each other, and participation in a meeting by such means shall constitute presence in person at such meeting.
 
In addition to any committees appointed pursuant to Section 2 of this Article, there shall be an Audit Committee, appointed annually by the Board of Directors, consisting of at least three (3) directors who are not members of management. It shall be the responsibility of the Audit Committee to review the scope and results of the annual independent audit of books and records of the Corporation and its subsidiaries and to discharge such other responsibilities as may from time to time be assigned to it by the Board of Directors. The Audit Committee shall meet at such times and places as the members deem advisable, and shall make such recommendations to the Board of Directors as they consider appropriate.
 
2.1 Committee Powers.
The Board of Directors may appoint standing or temporary committees and invest such committees with such powers as it may see fit, with power to subdelegate such powers if deemed desirable by the Board of Directors; but no such committee shall have the power or authority of the Board of Directors to adopt, amend, or repeal these By-Laws or approve, adopt, or recommend to the stockholders any action or matter expressly required by the Certificate of Incorporation, these By-Laws or the Delaware General Corporation Law to be submitted to stockholders for approval.
2.2 Committee Members.
The Board of Directors may designate one or more directors as alternate members of any committee, who may replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of the committee. In the absence or disqualification of a member of a committee, the member or members thereof present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, whether or not such member or members constitute a quorum, may unanimously appoint another member of the Board of Directors to act at the meeting in the place of any such absent or disqualified member.
 
A majority of the number of directors composing any committee of the Board of Directors, as established and fixed by resolution of the Board of Directors, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at any meeting of such committee but, if less than a majority are present at a meeting, a majority of such directors present may adjourn the meeting from time to time without further notice. The act of a majority of the members of a committee present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of such committee.
 
 
The elected officers shall be a Chairman of the Board of Directors (who shall be a director) and, at the discretion of the Board of Directors, a President (who shall be a director), and one or more Vice Presidents (each of whom may be assigned by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer an additional title descriptive of the functions assigned to such officer and one or more of whom may be designated Executive or Senior Vice President). The Board of Directors may also elect one or more Vice Chairmen. The Board of Directors shall also designate either the Chairman of the Board of Directors or the President as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation. The Board of Directors shall appoint a Controller, a Secretary, and a Treasurer. Any number of offices, whether elective or appointive, may be held by the same person. The Chief Executive Officer may, by a writing filed with the Secretary, designate titles as officers for employees and agents and appoint Assistant Secretaries and Assistant Treasurers as, from time to time, may appear to be necessary or advisable in the conduct of the affairs of the Corporation and may, in the same manner, terminate or change such titles.
 
So far as practicable, all elected officers shall be elected at the annual meeting of the Board of Directors in each year, and shall hold office until the annual meeting of the Board of Directors in the next subsequent year and until their respective successors are elected. The Controller, Secretary, and Treasurer shall hold office at the pleasure of the Board of Directors.
 
The salaries paid to the elected officers of the Corporation shall be authorized or approved by the Board of Directors.
 
None of the officers, directors, or employees of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations shall at any time be paid any bonus or share in the earnings or profits of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations except pursuant to a plan approved by affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members of the Board of Directors.
 
Any elected or appointed officer may be removed at any time, either for or without cause, by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors, at any meeting called for the purpose.
 
If any vacancy occurs in any office, the Board of Directors may elect or appoint a successor to fill such vacancy for the remainder of the term.
 
The Chairman of the Board of Directors shall preside, when present, at all meetings of stockholders and at all meetings of the Board of Directors, in each case except as required by law. The Chairman shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation; to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the Chairman by the Board of Directors.
 
The President shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation; to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; during the absence or disability of the Chairman of the Board of Directors, to exercise the Chairman's powers and to perform the Chairman's duties; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the President by the Board of Directors; provided, that if the office of President is vacant, the Chairman shall exercise the duties ordinarily exercised by the President until such time as a President is elected or appointed.
 
The officer designated by the Board of Directors as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation shall have general and active control of its business and affairs. The Chief Executive Officer shall have general power to appoint or designate all employees and agents of the Corporation whose appointment or designation is not otherwise provided for and to fix the compensation thereof, subject to the provisions of these By-Laws; to remove or suspend any employee or agent who shall not have been elected or appointed by the Board of Directors or other body; to suspend for cause any employee, agent, or officer, other than an elected officer, pending final action by the body which shall have appointed such employee, agent, or officer; and to exercise all the powers usually pertaining to the office held by the Chief Executive Officer of a corporation.
 
The several Vice Presidents and the Controller shall perform all such duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of them, from time to time, by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer, respectively.
 
The Secretary shall attend to the giving of notice of all meetings of stockholders and of the Board of Directors and shall keep and attest true records of all such proceedings. The Secretary shall have charge of the corporate seal and have authority to attest any and all instruments or writings to which the same may be affixed and shall keep and account for all books, documents, papers, and records of the Corporation relating to its corporate organization. The Secretary shall have authority to sign stock certificates and shall generally perform all the duties usually pertaining to the office of secretary of a corporation. In the absence of the Secretary, an Assistant Secretary or Secretary pro tempore shall perform the duties of the Secretary.
 
The Treasurer shall have the care and custody of all moneys, funds, and securities of the Corporation, and shall deposit or cause to be deposited all funds of the Corporation in accordance with directions or authorizations of the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer. The Treasurer shall have power to sign stock certificates, to indorse for deposit or collection, or otherwise, all checks, drafts, notes, bills of exchange, or other commercial paper payable to the Corporation, and to give proper receipts or discharges therefor. In the absence of the Treasurer, an Assistant Treasurer shall perform the duties of the Treasurer.
 
In addition to the foregoing especially enumerated duties and powers, the several officers of the Corporation shall perform such other duties and exercise such further powers as may be provided in these By-Laws or as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine, or as may be assigned to them by any superior officer.
 
If, as a result of a disaster or other state of emergency, the Chief Executive Officer is unable to perform the duties of that office, (a) the powers and duties of the Chief Executive Officer shall be performed by the officer designated as Chief Financial Officer of the Corporation, provided that such officer is available and capable of performing such powers and duties, until the Chief Executive Officer becomes capable of performing those duties or until the Board of Directors shall have elected a new Chief Executive Officer or designated another individual as Acting Chief
 
Executive Officer; (b) such officer shall have the power in addition to all other powers granted to the Chief Executive Officer by these By-Laws and by the Board of Directors to appoint an acting President, acting Vice President - Finance, acting Controller, acting Secretary, and acting Treasurer, if any of the persons duly elected to any such office is not, by reason of such disaster or emergency, able to perform the duties of such office, each of such acting appointees to serve in such capacities until the officer for whom the appointee is acting becomes capable of performing the duties of such office or until the Board of Directors shall have designated another individual to perform such duties or have elected another person to fill such office; (c) any such acting officer so appointed shall be entitled to exercise all powers vested by these By-Laws or the Board of Directors in the duly elected officer for whom the acting officer is acting; and (d) anyone transacting business with the Corporation may rely upon a certification by any two (2) officers of the Corporation that a specified individual has succeeded to the powers of the Chief Executive Officer and that such person has appointed other acting officers as herein provided and any person, firm, corporation, or other entity to which such certification has been delivered by such officers may continue to rely upon it until notified of a change in writing signed by two (2) officers of the Corporation.
 
The shares of the stock of the Corporation shall be represented by certificates, provided that the Board of Directors may provide by resolution or resolutions that some or all of any or all classes or series of stock shall be uncertificated shares. Any such resolution shall not apply to shares represented by certificate until such certificate is surrendered to the Corporation. Every holder of stock of the Corporation represented by a certificate shall be entitled to a certificate, signed by the Chairman of the Board or the President or a Vice President and the Treasurer or an Assistant Treasurer or the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary, certifying the number of shares owned by the stockholder in the Corporation. Any and all of the signatures on a certificate may be a facsimile. If any officer, transfer agent, or registrar who has signed or whose facsimile signature has been placed upon a certificate shall have ceased to be such officer, transfer agent, or registrar before such certificate is issued, it may be issued by the Corporation with the same effect as if he or she were such officer, transfer agent, or registrar at the date of issue.
 
The Board of Directors may, in its discretion, appoint responsible banks or trust companies in the Borough of Manhattan, in the City of New York, State of New York, or in such other city or cities as the Board of Directors may deem advisable, from time to time, to act as transfer agents and registrars of the stock of the Corporation; and, when such appointments shall have been made, no stock certificate shall be valid until countersigned by one of such transfer agents and registered by one of such registrars.
 
Shares of stock may be transferred by delivery of the certificates therefor, accompanied either by an assignment in writing on the back of the certificates or by written power of attorney to sell, assign, and transfer the same, signed by the record holder thereof (or, with respect to uncertificated shares, by delivery of duly executed instructions or in any other manner permitted by law), but no transfer shall affect the right of the Corporation to pay any dividend upon the stock to the holder of record thereof, or to treat the holder of record as the holder in fact thereof for all purposes, and no transfer shall be valid, except between the parties thereto, until such transfer shall have been made upon the books of the Corporation.
 
The Board of Directors may provide for the issuance of new certificates of stock or uncertificated shares to replace certificates of stock lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, or alleged to be lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, upon such terms and in accordance with such procedures as the Board of Directors shall deem proper and prescribe.
 
 
The fiscal year of the Corporation shall be the calendar year.
 
 
All bills, notes, checks, or other instruments for the payment of money shall be signed or countersigned by such officer or officers and in such manner as from time to time may be prescribed by resolution (whether general or special) of the Board of Directors.
 
4.1
Right to Indemnification.
Each person who was or is made a party to or is threatened to be made a party to or is otherwise involved (including, without limitation, as a witness) in any actual or threatened action, suit, or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative, or investigative (hereinafter a "proceeding"), by reason of the fact that he or she is or was a director or officer of the Corporation or that, being or having been such a director or officer or an employee of the Corporation, he or she is or was serving at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation as a director, officer, employee, or agent of another corporation or of a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise, including service with respect to an employee benefit plan (hereinafter an "indemnitee"), whether the basis of such proceeding is alleged action in an official capacity as such a director, officer, employee, or agent or in any other capacity while serving as such a director, officer, employee, or agent, shall be indemnified and held harmless by the Corporation to the full extent permitted by the Delaware General Corporation Law, as the same exists or may hereafter be amended (but, in the case of any such amendment, only to the extent that such amendment permits the Corporation to provide broader indemnification rights than permitted prior thereto), or by other applicable law as then in effect, against all expense, liability, and loss (including attorneys' fees, judgments, fines, ERISA excise taxes or penalties, and amounts paid in settlement) actually and reasonably incurred or suffered by such indemnitee in connection therewith, and such indemnification shall continue as to an indemnitee who has ceased to be a director, officer, employee, or agent and shall inure to the benefit of the indemnitee's heirs, executors, and administrators; provided, however, that except as provided in Article VII, Section 4.2 with respect to proceedings seeking to enforce rights to indemnification, the Corporation shall indemnify any such indemnitee in connection with a proceeding (or part thereof) initiated by such indemnitee only if such proceeding (or part thereof) was authorized or ratified by the Board of Directors. The right to indemnification conferred in this Section 4.1 shall be a contract right and shall include the right to be paid by the Corporation the expenses incurred in defending any such proceeding in advance of its final disposition (hereinafter an "advancement of expenses"); provided, however, that an advancement of expenses incurred by an indemnitee in his or her capacity as a director or officer or former director or officer (and not in any other capacity in which service was or is rendered by such indemnitee, including, without limitation, service to an employee benefit plan) shall be made only upon delivery to the Corporation of an undertaking (hereinafter an "undertaking"), by or on behalf of such indemnitee, to repay all amounts so advanced if it shall ultimately be determined by final judicial decision from which there is no further right to appeal that such indemnitee is not entitled to be indemnified for such expenses under this Section 4.1 or otherwise; and provided, further, that an advancement of expenses shall not be made if the Board of Directors makes a good faith determination that such payment would violate law or public policy.
4.2
Right of Indemnitee to Bring Suit.
If a claim under Article VII, Section 4.1 is not paid in full by the Corporation within sixty (60) days after a written claim has been received by the Corporation, except in the case of a claim for an advancement of expenses, in which case the applicable period shall be twenty (20) days, the indemnitee may at any time thereafter bring suit against the Corporation to recover the unpaid amount of the claim. If successful in whole or in part in any such suit, or in a suit
 
brought by the Corporation to recover an advancement of expenses pursuant to the terms of an undertaking, the indemnitee shall also be entitled to be paid the expenses of prosecuting or defending such suit. The indemnitee shall be presumed to be entitled to indemnification under this Section 4 upon submission of a written claim (and, in an action brought to enforce a claim for an advancement of expenses, where the required undertaking has been tendered to the Corporation), and thereafter the Corporation shall have the burden of proof to overcome the presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled. Neither the failure of the Corporation (including the Board of Directors, independent legal counsel, or the stockholders) to have made a determination prior to the commencement of such suit that indemnification of the indemnitee is proper in the circumstances, nor an actual determination by the Corporation (including the Board of Directors, independent legal counsel, or the stockholders) that the indemnitee is not entitled to indemnification shall be a defense to the suit or create a presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled.
4.3 Nonexclusivity of Rights.
The rights to indemnification and to the advancement of expenses conferred in this Section 4 shall not be exclusive of any other right that any person may have or hereafter acquire under any statute, provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation, these By-Laws, any agreement, vote of stockholders or disinterested directors, or otherwise. Neither any amendment to or repeal of this Section 4 or of any of the procedures established by the Board of Directors pursuant to Article VII, Section 4.7, nor the adoption of any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, nor, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any modification of law, shall eliminate or reduce the effect of the right or protection of any indemnitee to indemnification and to the advancement of expenses in accordance with the provisions hereof and thereof with respect to any proceeding (regardless of when such proceeding is first threatened, commenced or completed) arising out of, or related to, any acts or omissions of such indemnitee occurring prior to such amendment or repeal.
.
4.4 Insurance, Contracts, and Funding
The Corporation may maintain insurance, at its expense, to protect itself and any director, officer, employee, or agent of the Corporation or another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise against any expense, liability, or loss, whether or not the Corporation would have the power to indemnify such person against such expense, liability, or loss under the Delaware General Corporation Law. The Corporation may, without further stockholder approval, enter into contracts with any indemnitee in furtherance of the provisions of this Section 4 and may create a trust fund, grant a security interest, or use other means (including, without limitation, a letter of credit) to ensure the payment of such amounts as may be necessary to effect indemnification as provided in this Section 4.
.
4.5 Persons Serving Other Entities
Any person who is or was a director, officer, or employee of the Corporation who is or was serving (i) as a director or officer of another corporation of which a majority of the shares entitled to vote in the election of its directors is held by the Corporation or (ii) in an executive or management capacity in a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise of which the Corporation or a wholly owned subsidiary of the Corporation is a general partner or has a majority ownership shall be deemed to be so serving at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation and entitled to indemnification and advancement of expenses under Article VII, Section 4.1.
4.6 Indemnification of Employees and Agents of the Corporation.
The Corporation may, by action of the Board of Directors, authorize one or more executive officers to grant rights to advancement of expenses to employees or agents of the Corporation on such terms and conditions as such officer or officers deem appropriate under the circumstances. The Corporation may, by action of the Board of Directors, grant rights to indemnification and advancement of expenses to employees or agents or groups of employees or agents of the Corporation with the same scope and effect as the provisions of this Section 4 with respect to the indemnification and advancement of expenses of directors and officers of the Corporation; provided, however, that an undertaking shall be made by an employee or agent only if required by the Board of Directors.
 
4.7 Procedures for the Submission of Claims.
The Board of Directors may establish reasonable procedures for the submission of claims for indemnification pursuant to this Section 4, determination of the entitlement of any person thereto, and review of any such determination.
 
With respect to any action arising out of any act or omission occurring after the adoption of this By-Law, unless the Corporation consents in writing to the selection of an alternative forum, the Court of Chancery of the State of Delaware shall be the sole and exclusive forum for (i) any derivative action or proceeding brought on behalf of the Corporation, (ii) any action asserting a claim of breach of a fiduciary duty owed by any director, officer or other employee of the Corporation to the Corporation or the Corporation's stockholders, (iii) any action asserting a claim arising pursuant to any provision of the Delaware General Corporation Law, the Certificate of Incorporate or these By-Laws, or (iv) any action asserting a claim governed by the internal affairs doctrine, in each case subject to the Court of Chancery of the State of Delaware having personal jurisdiction over the indispensable parties named as defendants therein.
 
Except as herein otherwise expressly provided, these By-Laws may be altered or repealed in any particular and new By-Laws, not inconsistent with any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or any provision of law, may be adopted, either by
A. the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority in number of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote at an annual meeting of stockholders or at a special meeting thereof, the notice of which special meeting shall include the form of the proposed alteration or repeal or of the proposed new By-Laws, or a summary thereof; or
B. either by
i. the affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors at any meeting thereof (or in accordance with Article II, Section 13), or
ii. the affirmative vote of all the directors present at any meeting at which a quorum, less than a majority, is present;
provided that Article I, Section 11.2 of these By-Laws may be amended only as set forth in Section 1.A of this By-Law, except that any amendment required by law or necessary or desirable to cure an administrative or technical deficiency may be made as provided in Section 1.B of this By-Law.
 
Notwithstanding anything contained in these By-Laws to the contrary, the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the Voting Stock, as defined in Article FOURTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, at a meeting of stockholders called for the purpose, shall be required to alter, amend, repeal, or adopt any provision inconsistent with Sections 3, 4 and 5 of Article IV of these By-Laws, notice of which meeting shall include the form of the proposed amendment, or a summary thereof.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
Boeing Board Elects Former Continental CEO Kellner as New Director
CHICAGO, Oct. 4, 2011  Boeing (NYSE: BA) Chairman, President & CEO Jim McNerney announced today that the Boeing board of directors has elected Larry Kellner as a new director.
Kellner, 52, is president of Emerald Creek Group, a private equity firm based in Houston. From 2004 through 2009 he was chairman and chief executive officer of Continental Airlines. He joined the airline in 1995 as CFO, and later served as president and chief operating officer.
Prior to joining Continental, Kellner was executive vice president and chief financial officer of American Savings Bank, and executive vice president and chief financial officer of The Koll Company, a private real estate investment and construction firm.
"Larry brings to our board significant industry experience spanning strategy, operations and finance," said McNerney. "He understands the challenges our customers face in increasingly competitive markets, and we will benefit from having his perspective on our board."
He will serve on the board's Audit and Finance committees.
Kellner graduated magna cum laude with a bachelor of science in business administration from the University of South Carolina.
He is active in numerous community and civic organizations in the Houston area, where he resides with his wife. They have four children.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20111026074838.txt.gz
TIME:20111026074838
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
(a) On October 26, 2011, The Boeing Company issued a press release reporting its financial results for the third quarter of 2011. A copy of the Company's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
(a) Not applicable
(b) Not applicable
(c) Not applicable
(d) Exhibits
99.1    Press Release issued by The Boeing Company dated October 26, 2011, reporting Boeing's financial results for the third quarter of 2011, furnished herewith.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Boeing Reports Third-Quarter Results and Raises 2011 EPS Guidance
 
 
 
 
 
Table 1. Summary Financial Results
 
 The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] reported third-quarter net income of $1.1 billion, or $1.46 per share, on revenue of $17.7 billion. Operating margin of 9.7 percent reflects continued strong core performance across the company's businesses, partially offset by higher pension expense.
CHICAGO, October 26, 2011
The company increased its 2011 earnings per share guidance to between $4.30 and $4.40 per share reflecting the strong core performance. Total company 2011 revenue is narrowed to between $68 and $70 billion. Operating cash flow guidance is unchanged.
"Strong operational performance drove double-digit margins in both of our major businesses and produced an outstanding quarter," said Boeing chairman, president and chief executive officer, Jim McNerney. "We also strengthened our foundation for accelerated growth by completing development and certification of the 787-8 Dreamliner and 747-8 Freighter, launching the new 737 MAX, and continuing our disciplined ramp
 
up in commercial airplane production rates. Our improved outlook for earnings reflects confidence in our market positions, and our team's relentless focus on productivity and disciplined execution."
Table 2. Cash Flow
 
 
Boeing's quarterly operating cash flow was $0.4 billion, with strong operating performance more than offsetting continued investment in development programs and discretionary pension funding of $0.5 billion. Free cash flow* was $0.1 billion in the quarter (Table 2).
Table 3. Cash, Marketable Securities and Debt Balances
 
 
Cash and investments in marketable securities totaled $9.2 billion at quarter-end (Table 3), up from $8.8 billion at the beginning of the quarter. Debt balances grew to $12.4 billion at quarter-end, up from $11.6 billion, due to the issuance of new debt at Boeing Capital Corporation.
Total company backlog at quarter-end was $332 billion, up from $323 billion at the beginning of the quarter. Net orders for the quarter were $26 billion and included a significant mix of wide-body commercial airplanes. Backlog is up $10.7 billion from year-end, reflecting $61 billion of net orders in the first nine months of 2011.
 
Segment Results
Commercial Airplanes
Table 4. Commercial Airplanes Operating Results
 
Boeing Commercial Airplanes third-quarter revenue increased by 9 percent to $9.5 billion on higher deliveries and improved mix. Operating margin was 11.4 percent, reflecting continued strong operating performance (Table 4).
During the quarter, the 787-8 and 747-8 Freighter completed flight testing activities and achieved FAA certification. In September, the first 787 Dreamliner was delivered to launch customer, ANA, and, in October, the first 747-8 Freighter was delivered to Cargolux.
At quarter end, the 787 had 821 units sold firm and approximately 200 options. The company established the initial accounting quantity for the 787 program at 1,100 units, consistent with accounting practices applied on other new airplane programs.
Also during third quarter, the company launched the 737 MAX, the new engine variant of the 737. At the time of launch, the company had received nearly 500 order commitments.
Commercial Airplanes booked 255 net orders during the quarter and 426 during the first nine months of 2011. Backlog remains strong with more than 3,500 airplanes valued at $273 billion.
 
Boeing Defense, Space & Security
Table 5. Defense, Space & Security Operating Results
 
Boeing Defense, Space & Security's third-quarter revenue was $8.2 billion, while operating margin was 10.0 percent (Table 5).
Boeing Military Aircraft (BMA) third-quarter revenue increased to $4.0 billion, due to higher Airborne Early Warning & Control deliveries and C-17 mix. Operating margin was 10.0 percent, reflecting strong operating performance and changes in delivery mix. During the quarter, BMA was awarded a contract from the U.K. Ministry of Defence to provide 14 CH-47 Chinook helicopters and associated support to the Royal Air Force and the KC-46A Tanker program successfully completed the Integrated Baseline Review with the U.S. Air Force.
Network & Space Systems (N&SS) third-quarter revenue was $2.3 billion. Operating margin was 7.9 percent, reflecting improved performance on the commercial satellite programs. During the quarter, N&SS was awarded a contract modification with the U.S. Air Force for the full production, launch and on-orbit activation of the seventh Wideband Global SATCOM satellite.
Global Services & Support (GS&S) third-quarter revenue was $2.0 billion. Operating margin was 12.7 percent, reflecting improved performance in integrated logistics. During the quarter, GS&S was awarded a contract from the U.S. Air Force for support and logistics to India's recently announced acquisition of 10 C-17 airlifters and a contract modification from the U.S. Navy for P-8A low rate initial production lot II support award.
 
Backlog at Defense, Space & Security decreased to $59 billion on run-off of multi-year contracts.
Additional Financial Information
Table 6. Additional Financial Information
 
During the quarter, Boeing Capital Corporation's (BCC) portfolio balance declined to $4.3 billion, down from $4.4 billion at the beginning of the quarter on portfolio run-off and asset sales. BCC's earnings decreased due to a smaller portfolio and higher asset impairments. BCC's debt-to-equity ratio rose to 6.2-to-1 on pre-funding of an early 2012 debt maturity.
The "Other" segment includes unallocated activities of Engineering, Operations and Technology, Shared Services Group as well as certain intercompany guarantees provided to BCC. During the quarter, Other segment earnings improved by $141 million as a result of assigning an upgraded credit rating to financing receivables with AirTran.
The loss in unallocated items and eliminations increased due to a one-time accounting adjustment for post-retiree medical of $161 million and higher pension expense. Total pension expense for the third quarter was $389 million, as compared to $280 million in the same period last year. A total of $331 million was allocated to the operating segments in the quarter, up from $301 million in the same period last year, and $58 million was recognized in unallocated items, compared to a benefit of $21 million in the same period last year.
 
Outlook
The company's 2011 financial guidance (Table 7) has been updated to reflect the strong core performance in both businesses.
Table 7. Financial Outlook
 
 
Boeing's 2011 earnings per share guidance is increased to between $4.30 and $4.40 per share, up from between $3.90 and $4.10 per share. Total company 2011 revenue is narrowed to between $68 and $70 billion.
Commercial Airplanes' deliveries guidance is now approximately 480, down from between 485 and 495, on lower planned deliveries on development programs (now a combined 15 to 20 787 and 747-8 units, from 25 to 30 units). Approximately two-thirds of the development programs deliveries are anticipated to be 747-8s. Operating margin
 
is improved to between 9.0 and 9.5 percent, from between 8.0 and 8.5 percent, reflecting strong core performance and the lower planned development program deliveries.
Defense, Space & Security's operating margin is improved to between 9.0 and 9.5 percent, from approximately 9 percent, reflecting the strong performance to date.
BCC's debt-to-equity ratio is expected to return to 5.0-to-1 in the first quarter of 2012 due to the repayment of maturing debt.
The company's 2011 R&D forecast is unchanged at between $3.7 and $3.9 billion. 2012 R&D is expected to decrease by approximately $0.3 to $0.5 billion.
Capital expenditures for 2011 have been reduced to approximately $1.7 billion, down from approximately $2.0 billion.
Pension expense for 2011 is now expected to be $1.7 billion, down from $1.8 billion. Based on current interest rates and market conditions, pension expense in 2012 is estimated to be approximately $2.6 billion, of which approximately $1.0 billion is expected to be recorded in unallocated items and eliminations. 2012 pension expense will be determined at year end based on market conditions at that time.
 
Non-GAAP Measure Disclosure
Management believes that the non-GAAP (Generally Accepted Accounting Principles) measure (indicated by an asterisk *) used in this report provide investors with important perspectives into the company's ongoing business performance. The company does not intend for the information to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the related GAAP measure. Other companies may define the measure differently. The following definition is provided:
Free Cash Flow
Free cash flow is defined as GAAP less capital expenditures for . Management believes free cash flow provides investors with an important perspective on the cash available for shareholders, debt repayment, and acquisitions after making the capital investments required to support ongoing business operations and long term value creation. Free cash flow does not represent the residual cash flow available for discretionary expenditures as it excludes certain mandatory expenditures such as repayment of maturing debt. Management uses free cash flow internally to assess both business performance and overall liquidity. Table 2 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and free cash flow.
operating cash flow
property, plant and equipment additions
 
This document contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "may," "should," "expects," "intends," "projects," "plans," "believes," "estimates," "targets," "anticipates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. Examples of forward-looking statements include statements relating to our future financial condition and operating results, as well as any other statement that does not directly relate to any historical or current fact. Forward-looking statements are based on our current expectations and assumptions, which may not prove to be accurate. These statements are not guarantees and are subject to risks, uncertainties, and changes in circumstances that are difficult to predict. Many factors could cause actual results to differ materially and adversely from these forward-looking statements. Among these factors are risks related to: (1) general conditions in the economy and our industry, including those due to regulatory changes; (2) our reliance on our commercial customers, our suppliers and the worldwide market; (3) our commercial development programs, including the 787 and 747-8 commercial aircraft programs; (4) changing acquisition priorities of the U.S. government; (5) our dependence on U.S. government contracts; (6) our reliance on fixed-price contracts; (7) our reliance on cost-type contracts; (8) uncertainties concerning contracts that include in-orbit incentive payments; (9) changes in accounting estimates; (10) changes in the competitive landscape in our markets; (11) our non-U.S. operations, including sales to non-U.S. customers; (12) potential adverse developments in new or pending litigation and/or government investigations; (13) customer and aircraft concentration in Boeing Capital Corporation's customer financing portfolio; (14) changes in our ability to obtain debt on commercially reasonable terms and at competitive rates in order to fund our operations and contractual commitments; (15) realizing the anticipated benefits of mergers, acquisitions, joint ventures, strategic alliances or divestitures; (16) the adequacy of our insurance coverage to cover significant risk exposures; (17) potential business disruptions related to physical security threats, information technology attacks or natural disasters; (18) work stoppages or other labor disruptions; (19) significant changes in discount rates and actual investment return on pension assets; and (20) potential environmental liabilities.
Additional information concerning these and other factors can be found in our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including our most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q and Current Reports on Form 8-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which it is made, and we assume no obligation to update or revise any forward-looking statement, whether as a result of new information, future events, or otherwise, except as required by law.
Contact:
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20111101125433.txt.gz
TIME:20111101125433
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On October 31, 2011, the Board of Directors of The Boeing Company (the "Company") approved certain management changes at the Company. As described in the press release filed herewith, James A. Bell, Executive Vice President, Corporate President and Chief Financial Officer of the Company, has announced his retirement from that position effective at the end of January 31, 2012. Mr. Bell will continue in his capacity as an Executive Vice President of the Company until April 1, 2012.
The Company has also announced the election of Gregory D. Smith as Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer effective February 1, 2012. Mr. Smith, 45, has served as the Company's Vice President of Finance and Corporate Controller since February 2010. Prior to that, he served as the Company's Vice President of Financial Planning & Analysis since June 2008. From August 2004 until June 2008, Mr. Smith served as Vice President of Global Investor Relations at Raytheon Company.
The Company has also announced the appointment of Diana L. Sands as Vice President of Finance and Corporate Controller effective February 1, 2012. Ms. Sands, 46, has served as the Company's Vice President of Investor Relations, Financial Planning & Analysis since February 2010. Prior to that, she served as the Company's Vice President of Investor Relations since February 2008. Ms. Sands has held several positions in the Company's Financial Planning & Analysis and Corporate Treasury departments since she joined the Company in 2001. In her new position, Ms. Sands will also serve as the Company's chief accounting officer.
Mr. Smith and Ms. Sands will receive salary, bonus and equity awards, and will participate in other benefit and compensation plans, at levels consistent with their respective seniority and scope of responsibility. The Company has not entered into or materially amended a material compensatory arrangement and has not granted or materially amended a material award in connection with these appointments.
A copy of the Company's press release announcing Mr. Bell's retirement, as well as Mr. Smith's election as Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer and Ms. Sands' appointment as Vice President of Finance and Corporate Controller is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: November 1, 2011
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Boeing CFO James Bell Announces April 2012 Retirement
 Corporate Controller Smith elected to replace Bell effective Feb. 1, 2012
Sands appointed corporate controller
CHICAGO, Nov.1, 2011 Boeing Executive Vice President, Corporate President and Chief Financial Officer James Bell has announced plans to retire from the company, effective April 1, 2012.
Greg Smith, 45, corporate controller and finance vice president, has been elected by Boeing's board of directors to succeed Bell as executive vice president and chief financial officer effective Feb. 1, 2012; the two will work together over the coming months to ensure a smooth transition.
Diana Sands, 46, vice president of investor relations and financial planning and analysis, has been appointed corporate controller, also effective Feb. 1, 2012.
Boeing Chairman, President and CEO Jim McNerney said Bell will leave a legacy of leadership in a career marked by exemplary personal and professional accomplishment.
"James Bell's service to Boeing has been extraordinary in many ways over many years," said McNerney. "As CFO he created a world-class finance organization and a culture of continuous improvement. His disciplined approach to financial management ensured our fiscal strength throughout his tenure, and his personal commitment to developing leaders created a strong, diverse team across our finance organization. As corporate president, he instilled a focus on excellence and teamwork by driving tighter integration across our businesses and functions."
Bell, 63, has served as CFO since 2003 and was appointed corporate president in 2008. He served as the company's interim CEO for several months in 2005, immediately preceding McNerney. "James has been an invaluable business partner to me and to our entire leadership team. His passion, strength of character, and 40 years of accomplishment will have a lasting impact on our company," McNerney said.
Smith has more than two decades of aerospace industry experience. Prior to being named corporate controller in February 2010, he led the company's financial planning and analysis and internal audit groups; served as controller of the Boeing Shared Services Group; and held various leadership and operational roles in supplier management, factory operations and program management. He led investor relations for Raytheon from 2004 to 2008.
"Greg is an extremely capable and seasoned industry leader with a uniquely broad background in finance, manufacturing and supply chain operations, and program management," McNerney said. "His insight into how the business works from the ground level up is a tremendous asset to have in a CFO."
Sands joined Boeing in 2001 from General Motors. She has led investor relations and financial planning and analysis since February 2010. She previously held key company positions in corporate treasury and other finance areas. Prior to General Motors, she worked in finance at Ameritech, Helene Curtis and Arthur Andersen.
Bell joined the company in 1972, at what was then Rockwell International, as a staff accountant; Boeing acquired Rockwell's aerospace business in 1996. His career spans a wide spectrum of assignments and roles across Boeing. Prior to his CFO role, he served as corporate controller. At the business operating group level, he was vice president of contracts for Boeing's defense and space businesses, and he also served in business management roles for the International Space Station program.
Bell plans to remain active in various civic, business and philanthropic roles. He is a member of the board of directors of Dow Chemical Company, the Chicago Urban League, World Business Chicago and the Chicago Economic Club.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20111114171642.txt.gz
TIME:20111114171642
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On November 10, 2011, The Boeing Company ("Boeing") entered into a $2.3 billion, 364-day revolving credit agreement (the "364-Day Credit Agreement") with Citigroup Global Markets Inc. and J.P. Morgan Securities LLC as joint lead arrangers and joint book managers, JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. as syndication agent and Citibank, N.A. ("Citibank") as administrative agent, and a syndicate of lenders as defined in the 364-Day Credit Agreement. This facility replaces the $2.376 billion, 364-day credit agreement dated as of November 12, 2010.
Under the 364-Day Credit Agreement, Boeing will pay a fee of 0.05% per annum on the commitments. Borrowings under the 364-Day Credit Agreement that are not based on Eurodollar rates will bear interest at an annual rate equal to the highest of (1) the rate announced publicly by Citibank, from time to time, as its "base" rate, (2) the federal funds rate plus 0.50% and (3) the British Bankers Association one month LIBOR plus 1.00%. Borrowings under the 364-Day Credit Agreement that are based on Eurodollar rates will generally bear interest based on an applicable LIBOR rate plus 0.825% per annum.
The 364-Day Credit Agreement is scheduled to terminate on November 8, 2012, subject to Boeing's right to extend the term for an additional 364 days or, following payment of additional fees, convert outstanding borrowings into term loans with a maturity date that is the one-year anniversary of the termination date.
On November 10, 2011, Boeing also entered into a $2.3 billion, five-year revolving credit agreement (the "5-Year Credit Agreement" and, together with the 364-Day Credit Agreement, the "Credit Agreements") with Citigroup Global Markets Inc. and J.P. Morgan Securities LLC as joint lead arrangers and joint book managers, JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. as syndication agent and Citibank as administrative agent, and a syndicate of lenders as defined in the 5-Year Credit Agreement. This facility replaces the $2.0 billion, five-year credit agreement dated as of November 16, 2007.
Under the 5-Year Credit Agreement, Boeing will pay a fee between 0.06% and 0.15% per annum on the commitments, depending on Boeing's credit rating. Borrowings under the 5-Year Credit Agreement that are not based on Eurodollar rates will bear interest at an annual rate equal to the highest of (1) the rate announced publicly by Citibank, from time to time, as its "base" rate, (2) the federal funds rate plus 0.50% and (3) the British Bankers Association one month LIBOR plus 1.00%. Borrowings under the 5-Year Credit Agreement that are based on Eurodollar rates will generally bear interest based on an applicable LIBOR rate plus between 0.565% and 0.975% per annum, depending on Boeing's credit rating. The Five-Year Credit Agreement is scheduled to terminate on November 10, 2016, subject to Boeing's right to extend the term for one additional year.
The Credit Agreements contain customary terms and conditions, including covenants restricting Boeing's ability to permit consolidated debt (as defined in the applicable agreement) in excess of 60% of Boeing's total capital (as defined in the applicable agreement) or to incur liens, merge or consolidate with another entity. Events of default under the Credit Agreements include: (1) failure to pay outstanding principal or interest within five business days of when due, (2) determination that any representation or warranty was incorrect in any material respect when made, (3) failure to perform any other term, covenant or agreement, which failure is not remedied within 30 days of notice, (4) a cross-default with other debt in certain circumstances, (5) the incurrence of certain liabilities under the Employee Retirement Income Security Act and (6) bankruptcy and other insolvency events. If an event of default occurs and is continuing, the lenders would have the right to accelerate and require the repayment of all amounts outstanding under the applicable agreement and would not be required to advance any additional funds.
Some of the lenders under the Credit Agreements and their affiliates have various relationships with Boeing and its subsidiaries involving the provision of financial services, including cash management, investment banking, and trust and leasing services. In addition, Boeing and certain of its subsidiaries have entered into foreign exchange and other derivative arrangements with certain of the lenders and their affiliates.
The foregoing description is qualified in its entirety by the Credit Agreements, which are filed as exhibits hereto.
 
The information set forth above under "Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement" is incorporated herein by reference.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: November 14, 2011
 

Exhibit 10.1
 
 
 
 
THE BOEING COMPANY, a Delaware corporation ("" or the ""), for itself and on behalf of the other BORROWERS (as defined below), the LENDERS (as defined below), CITIGROUP GLOBAL MARKETS INC. and J.P. MORGAN SECURITIES LLC, as joint lead arrangers and joint book managers, JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., as syndication agent, and CITIBANK, N.A., in its capacity as administrative agent for the Lenders (in such capacity, the ""), agree as follows:
TBC
Company
Agent
 
"" means the 364-Day Credit Agreement, dated as of November 12, 2010, by and among TBC, Citibank, N.A., as administrative agent, and certain other banks as lenders.
2010 Credit Agreement
"" means an Administrative Questionnaire in a form supplied by the Agent.
Administrative Questionnaire
"" means a Committed Advance or a Bid Advance.
Advance
"" means Citibank, N.A. acting in its capacity as administrative agent for the Lenders, or any successor administrative agent appointed pursuant to Section 7.6.
Agent
"" means the account of the Agent maintained by the Agent with Citibank, N.A., at its office at 388 Greenwich Street, New York, New York 10013, Account 36852248, Attention: Agency/Medium Term Finance, Reference: Boeing.
Agent's Account
"" means, as to any Person, any other Person that, directly or indirectly, controls, is controlled by or is under common control with such Person or is a director or officer of such Person. (For purposes of this definition, the term "controls", "controlling", "controlled by" and "under common control with" mean, with respect to a Person, the possession, direct or indirect, of the power to vote 5% or more of the Voting Stock of such Person or to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of such Person, whether through the ownership of Voting Stock, by contract, or otherwise.)
Affiliate
"" means this agreement, as it may be amended or otherwise modified from time to time, and any written additions or supplements hereto.
Agreement
"" means, with respect to each Lender, such Lender's Domestic Lending Office, in the case of a Base Rate Advance, and such Lender's Eurodollar Lending Office, in the case of a Eurodollar Rate Advance, and, in the case of a Bid Advance, the office of such Lender specified by such Lender in a notice to the Agent as its Applicable Lending Office with respect to such Bid Advance.
Applicable Lending Office
 
 
"" means 0.05% per annum.
Applicable Percentage
"" means, as of any date of determination, (a) the aggregate Commitments of the Lenders, as such amount may be reduced, changed or terminated in accordance with the terms of this Agreement, reduced by (b) the aggregate Advances outstanding on such date of determination.
Available Commitments
"" means the highest of (a) the rate of interest announced publicly by Citibank, N.A., in New York City, from time to time, as Citibank's "base" rate, (b) the Federal Funds Rate plus 0.50% per annum and (c) the British Bankers Association Interest Settlement Rate applicable to US dollars for a period of one month ("") plus 1.00% (for the avoidance of doubt, the One Month LIBOR for any day shall be based on the rate appearing on Reuters LIBOR01 Page (or other commercially available source providing such quotations as designated by the Agent from time to time) at approximately 11:00 a.m. London time on such day).
Base Rate
One Month LIBOR
"" means a Committed Advance which bears interest at the Base Rate.
Base Rate Advance
"" means an advance by a Lender to a Borrower as part of a Bid Borrowing resulting from the auction bidding procedure described in Section 2.5, and refers to a Fixed Rate Advance or a Eurodollar Rate Bid Advance, each of which shall be a "Type" of Bid Advance.
Bid Advance
"" means a borrowing consisting of simultaneous Bid Advances from each of the Lenders whose offers to make one or more Bid Advances as part of such borrowing has been accepted by a Borrower under the auction bidding procedure described in Section 2.5.
Bid Borrowing
"" means a promissory note of a Borrower payable to the order of a Lender, in substantially the form of Exhibit A-2, evidencing the indebtedness of that Borrower to such Lender resulting from a Bid Advance made by such Lender to such Borrower.
Bid Note
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.1(a).
Bid Reduction
"" means, individually and collectively, as the context requires, TBC and each Subsidiary Borrower (unless and until it becomes a "Terminated Subsidiary Borrower" pursuant to Section 2.22).
Borrower
"" means, with respect to any Subsidiary Borrower, a letter in the form of Exhibit D, signed by such Subsidiary Borrower and TBC.
Borrower Subsidiary Letter
"" means a Committed Borrowing or a Bid Borrowing.
Borrowing
"" means a day of the year on which banks are not required or authorized to close in New York City and, if the applicable Business Day relates to any Eurodollar Rate Advance, on which dealings are carried on in the London interbank market.
Business Day
"" means, for each Lender, the full amount set forth opposite the name of such Lender in Schedule I or, if such Lender is a Replacement Lender or a Lender that has entered into one or more assignments pursuant to Section 2.20 or Section 2.21, the amount set forth for such Lender in the Register maintained by the Agent pursuant to Section 2.20(d), as such amount may be reduced pursuant to Section 2.3, Section 2.8 or Section 2.19 or increased pursuant to Section 2.19.
Commitment
 
"" means an advance made by a Lender to a Borrower as part of a Committed Borrowing and refers to a Base Rate Advance or a Eurodollar Rate Committed Advance, each of which is a "Type" of Committed Advance.
Committed Advance
"" means a borrowing consisting of simultaneous Committed Advances of the same Type made by each of the Lenders pursuant to Section 2.1.
Committed Borrowing
"" means a promissory note of a Borrower payable to the order of any Lender, in substantially the form of Exhibit A-1, evidencing the indebtedness of that Borrower to such Lender resulting from the Committed Advances made by such Lender to that Borrower.
Committed Note
"" means The Boeing Company, a Delaware corporation.
Company
"" means information that a Borrower furnishes to the Agent or any Lender in a writing designated as confidential, but does not include any such information that is or becomes generally available to the public or that is or becomes available to the Agent or such Lender from a source other than a Borrower.
Confidential Information
"" refers to the consolidation of accounts in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.
Consolidated
means the total amount of assets (less applicable reserves and other properly deductible items) after, deducting therefrom (i) all current liabilities (excluding any thereof which are by their terms extendible or renewable at the option of the obligor thereon to a time more than 12 months after the time as of which the amount thereof is being computed), and (ii) all good will, trade names, trademarks, patents, unamortized debt discount and expenses and other like intangibles, all as set forth on the most recent balance sheet of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries and computed in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.
"Consolidated Net Tangible Assets"
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.21(a).
Continuing Lender
"", "" and "" each means a conversion of Committed Advances of one Type into Committed Advances of another Type pursuant to Section 2.10, 2.11 or 2.15.
Convert
Conversion
Converted
 
 
 
 
 
 
"" means any Event of Default or any event that would constitute an Event of Default but for the requirement that notice be given or time elapse or both.
Default
"" means, at any time, subject to Section 2.23(c), a Lender that (i) has failed for two or more Business Days to comply with its obligations under this Agreement to make an Advance (each a ""), unless such Lender has notified the Agent and the Company in writing that such failure is the result of such Lender's determination that one or more conditions precedent to funding has not been satisfied (which conditions precedent, together with the applicable default, if any, will be specifically identified in such writing), (ii) has notified the Agent or the Company in writing, or has stated publicly, that it will not comply with any such funding obligation hereunder unless such writing or statement states that such position is based on such Lender's determination that one or more conditions precedent to funding cannot be satisfied (which conditions precedent, together with the applicable default, if any, will be specifically identified in such writing or public statement), (iii) has defaulted on its funding obligations under other loan agreements or credit agreements generally under which it has commitments to extend credit or has notified, or whose Parent Company has notified, the Agent or the Company in writing, or has stated publicly, that it does not intend to comply with its funding obligations under loan agreements or credit agreements generally, (iv) has, for three or more Business Days, failed to confirm in writing to the Agent, in response to a written request of the Agent or the Company, that it will comply with its funding obligations hereunder (provided that such Lender will cease to be a Defaulting Lender pursuant to this clause (iv) upon the Agent's and the Borrower's receipt of such written confirmation), or (v) as to which a Lender Insolvency Event has occurred and is continuing with respect to it or its Parent Company; that, for the avoidance of doubt, a Lender shall not be a Defaulting Lender solely by virtue of (1) the control, ownership or acquisition of any equity interest in that Lender or any direct or indirect parent company thereof by a governmental authority or (2) in the case of a solvent Lender, the precautionary appointment of an administrator, guardian, custodian or other similar official by a government authority under or based on the law of the country where such lender is subject to home jurisdiction supervision if applicable law requires that such appointment not be publicly disclosed, so long as, in the case of clause (1) and clause (2), such action does not result in or provide such Lender with immunity from the jurisdiction of courts within the United States or from the enforcement of judgments or writs of attachment on its assets or permit such Lender (or such governmental authority or instrumentality) to reject, repudiate, disavow or disaffirm any contracts or agreements made with such Lender. Any determination by the Agent that a Lender is a Defaulting Lender under clauses (i) through (v) above shall be conclusive and binding absent manifest error, and such Lender shall be deemed to be a Defaulting Lender (subject to Section 2.23(c)) upon delivery of written notice of such determination to the Company and each Lender.
Defaulting Lender
funding obligation
provided
"" means with respect to any Lender, the office of such Lender specified as its "Domestic Lending Office" in its Administrative Questionnaire or such other office of such Lender as such Lender may from time to time specify to TBC and the Agent.
Domestic Lending Office
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.19(d).
Effective Date
"" means
Eligible Assignee
 
 
 
 
 
 
"" means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended from time to time and the regulations promulgated and rulings issued thereunder.
ERISA
 means any Person that for purposes of Title IV of ERISA is a member of the controlled group of any Borrower, or under common control with any Borrower, within the meaning of Section 414 of the Internal Revenue Code.
"ERISA Affiliate"
"" has the meaning assigned to that term in Regulation D of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, as in effect from time to time.
Eurocurrency Liabilities
"" means, with respect to any Lender, (a) the office of such Lender specified as its "Eurodollar Lending Office" in its Administrative Questionnaire or such other office of such Lender as such Lender may from time to time specify to TBC and the Agent.
Eurodollar Lending Office
"" means, for an Interest Period for a Eurodollar Rate Committed Advance constituting part of a Committed Borrowing, and for the relevant period specified in the applicable Notice of Bid Borrowing for a Eurodollar Rate Bid Advance, an interest rate per annum equal to either
Eurodollar Rate
 
 
 
 
The Eurodollar Rate for any Interest Period for each Eurodollar Rate Committed Advance constituting part of the same Borrowing and for the relevant period specified in a Notice of Bid Borrowing for each Eurodollar Rate Bid Advance shall be determined by the Agent on the basis of applicable rates furnished to and received by the Agent from the Reference Banks two Business Days before the first day of such Interest Period or period, as the case may be, , , to the provisions of Section 2.10.
subject
however
"" means a Committed Advance (a "") or a Bid Advance (a "") which bears interest at a rate of interest quoted as a margin (which shall be the Applicable Margin in the case of a Committed Advance or as offered by a Lender and accepted by a Borrower in the case of a Bid Advance) over the Eurodollar Rate.
Eurodollar Rate Advance
Eurodollar Rate Committed Advance
Eurodollar Rate Bid Advance
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.5(b).
Eurodollar Rate Bid Borrowing
"" means the reserve percentage applicable to a Lender for any Interest Period for a Eurodollar Rate Advance during such Interest Period (or if more than one such percentage shall be so applicable, the daily average of such percentages for those days in such Interest Period during which any such percentage shall be so applicable) under regulations issued from time to time by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (or any successor) for determining the maximum reserve requirement (including, without limitation, any emergency, supplemental or other marginal reserve requirement) for such Lender with respect to liabilities or assets consisting of or including Eurocurrency Liabilities (or with respect to any other category of liabilities that includes deposits by reference to which the interest rate on Eurodollar Rate Advances is determined) having a term equal to such Interest Period.
Eurodollar Rate Reserve Percentage
"" means any of the events described in Section 6.1.
Event of Default
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.21.
Extension Request
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.7.
Facility Fee
"" means Sections 1471 though 1474 of the Internal Revenue Code, as of the date of this Agreement (or any amended or successor version that is substantively comparable and not materially more onerous to comply with) and any current or future regulations or official interpretations thereof.
FATCA
"" means, for each day during a period, an interest rate per annum equal to the weighted average of the fluctuating rates on overnight Federal funds transactions with members of the Federal Reserve System arranged by Federal funds brokers, as published for such day (or, if such day is not a Business Day, for the immediately preceding Business Day) by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, or, if such rate is not so published for any day which is a Business Day, the average of the quotations for such day on such transactions received by the Agent from three Federal funds brokers of recognized standing selected by it.
Federal Funds Rate
"" means Fitch, Inc.
Fitch
 
"" means an Advance made by a Lender to a Borrower as part of a Fixed Rate Borrowing.
Fixed Rate Advance
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.5(b).
Fixed Rate Borrowing
"" means each Guaranty Agreement executed by TBC in favor of the Agent and the Lenders, unconditionally guaranteeing the payment of all obligations of a Subsidiary Borrower hereunder and under any Notes executed or to be executed by it.
Guaranty
"" has the meaning specified in Section 7.5.
Indemnified Costs
"" has the meaning specified in Section 8.3(b).
Indemnified Party
"" means, for each Eurodollar Rate Committed Advance constituting part of the same Borrowing, the period commencing on the date of such Committed Advance or the date of the Conversion of a Base Rate Advance into such a Eurodollar Rate Committed Advance and ending on the last day of the period selected by the applicable Borrower pursuant to the provisions below and, thereafter, each subsequent period commencing on the last day of the immediately preceding Interest Period and ending on the last day of the period selected by such Borrower pursuant to the provisions below. The duration of each such Interest Period shall be one, two, three, or six months (or, subject to clause (iii) below, nine months), as the applicable Borrower may, upon notice received by the Agent not later than 11:00 a.m. (New York City time) on the third Business Day prior to the first day of such Interest Period, select, , , that:
Interest Period
provided
however
 
 
 
 
"", subject to Section 2.20, means any of the institutions that is a signatory hereto or that, pursuant to Section 2.13, 2.19, 2.20 or 2.21, becomes a "Lender" hereunder.
Lender
"" means that (i) a Lender or its Parent Company is insolvent, or is generally unable to pay its debts as they become due, or admits in writing its inability to pay its debts as they become due, or makes a general assignment for the benefit of its creditors, or (ii) such
Lender Insolvency Event
 
Lender or its Parent Company is the subject of a bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, liquidation or similar proceeding, or a receiver, trustee, conservator, intervenor or sequestrator or similar Person charged with the reorganization or liquidation of its business or custodian has been appointed for such Lender or its Parent Company, or such Lender or its Parent Company has taken any action in furtherance of or indicating its consent to or acquiescence in any such proceeding or appointment.
"" means Lenders holding greater than 50% of the then aggregate unpaid principal amount of the Committed Advances or, if no Committed Advances are outstanding, Lenders having greater than 50% of the total Commitments; that if any Lender shall be a Defaulting Lender at such time, there shall be excluded from the determination of Majority Lenders at such time the Commitments of such Lender at such time.
Majority Lenders
provided
"" means the Termination Date or, if the Term Loan Conversion Option described in Section 2.3 has been exercised, the date that is the one-year anniversary of the Termination Date.
Maturity Date
"" means Moody's Investor Services, Inc.
Moody's
"" means, at any time, a Lender that is not a Defaulting Lender.
Non-Defaulting Lender
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.21(a).
Non-Extending Lender
"" means a Committed Note or a Bid Note.
Note
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.5(b).
Notice of Bid Borrowing
"" means a Notice of Committed Borrowing or a Notice of Bid Borrowing.
Notice of Borrowing
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.2(a).
Notice of Committed Borrowing
"" means the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development.
OECD
"" means, with respect to a Lender, the bank holding company (as defined in Federal Reserve Board Regulation Y), if any, of such Lender, and/or any Person owning, beneficially or of record, directly or indirectly, a majority of the shares of such Lender.
Parent Company
"" means an individual, partnership, corporation (including a business trust), limited liability company, joint stock company, trust, unincorporated association, joint venture or other entity, or a government or any political subdivision or agency thereof.
Person
"" means any item of real property, or any interest therein, buildings, improvements and machinery.
Property, Plant and Equipment
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.19(c).
Proposed Increased Commitment
"" means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., Citibank, N.A., Bank of America, N.A., and Deutsche Bank AG.
Reference Banks
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.20(d).
Register
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.21(c).
Replacement Lenders
 
"" means a document substantially in the form of Exhibit C, duly executed by TBC, pursuant to Section 2.19.
Request for Alteration
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.20(a).
Required Assignment
"" means Standard & Poor's, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc.
S&P
"" means any Person in which more than 50% of the Voting Stock or the interest in the capital or profits is owned by TBC, by TBC and any one or more other Subsidiaries, or by any one or more other Subsidiaries.
Subsidiary
"" means, individually and collectively, as the context requires, each Subsidiary that is or becomes a "Borrower" in accordance with Section 2.22; in each case, unless and until it becomes a "Terminated Subsidiary Borrower".
Subsidiary Borrower
"" means The Boeing Company, a Delaware corporation.
TBC
"" means a term loan resulting from the conversion of Committed Advances on the Termination Date pursuant to Section 2.3.
Term Loan
"" means the option under Section 2.3 for TBC to convert, as of the Termination Date, all or a part of the Committed Advances then outstanding into Term Loans.
Term Loan Conversion Option
"" means, individually and collectively, as the context requires, a Subsidiary Borrower that has ceased to be a "Borrower" in accordance with Section 2.22.
Terminated Subsidiary Borrower
"" means the earlier to occur of (i) November 8, 2012, as such date may be extended from time to time pursuant to Section 2.21, and (ii) the date of termination in whole of the Commitments pursuant to Section 2.8 or Section 6.2.
Termination Date
"" has the meaning specified in Section 4.2(b).
Total Capital
"", as to Committed Borrowings, means either Base Rate Advances or Eurodollar Rate Committed Advances and, as to Bid Borrowings, means either Fixed Rate Advances or Eurodollar Rate Bid Advances.
Type
"" means, with respect to each Lender, such Lender's Commitment minus the aggregate principal amount of Committed Advances made by such Lender.
Unused Commitment
"" means, as to a corporation, all the issued and outstanding capital stock of such corporation having general voting power, under ordinary circumstances, to elect a majority of the Board of Directors of such corporation (irrespective of whether or not any capital stock of any other class or classes shall or might have voting power upon the occurrence of any contingency).
Voting Stock
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Every Notice of Committed Borrowing given by a Subsidiary Borrower must be countersigned by an authorized representative of TBC, in order to evidence the consent of TBC, in its sole discretion, to that proposed Committed Borrowing. Upon receipt of a Notice of Committed Borrowing, the Agent shall promptly give notice to each Lender thereof.
 
 
 
 
 
If such Lender shall repay to the Agent such corresponding amount, such amount so repaid shall constitute such Lender's Committed Advance as part of such Committed Borrowing for purposes of this Agreement.
 
 
 
The amounts so converted shall be treated for all purposes of this Agreement as Committed Advances except that after the Termination Date:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
that in the event and during the continuance of an Event of Default the Agent may, and upon the request of the Majority Lenders shall, give notice to the Borrowers that (x) the Applicable Margin shall immediately increase by 1.0% above the Applicable Margin then in effect, and, in the case of a Eurodollar Rate Advance, such Advance shall automatically convert to a Base Rate Advance at the end of the Interest Period then in effect for such Eurodollar Rate Advance and (y) to the fullest extent permitted by law, the Borrowers shall pay interest on the amount of any interest, fee or other amount payable hereunder that is not paid when due, from the date such amount shall be due until such amount shall be paid in full, payable in arrears on the date such amount shall be paid in full and on demand, at a rate per annum equal at all times to 1% above the Base Rate; , , that following acceleration of the Advances pursuant to Section 6.2, the foregoing described interest shall accrue and be payable hereunder whether or not previously required by the Agent.
provided
provided
however
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
A Borrower requesting a Bid Borrowing shall deliver a Notice of Bid Borrowing to the Agent not later than 11:00 a.m. (New York City time) (A) at least one Business Day prior to the date of the proposed Bid Borrowing if the proposed Bid Borrowing is to be a Fixed Rate Borrowing, and (B) at least four Business Days prior to the date of the proposed Bid Borrowing, if the proposed Bid Borrowing is to be a Eurodollar Rate Bid Borrowing. Every Notice of Bid Borrowing given by a Subsidiary Borrower must be countersigned by an authorized representative of TBC, in order to evidence the consent of TBC, in its sole discretion, to that proposed Bid Borrowing. The Agent shall in turn promptly notify each Lender of each request for a Bid Borrowing by sending such Lender a copy of the related Notice of Bid Borrowing.
 
 
 
 
that if the Agent in its capacity as a Lender, in its sole discretion, elects to make any such offer, it shall notify such Borrower and the Company of such offer before 9:30 a.m. (New York City time) on the date on which notice of such election is to be given to the Agent by the other Lenders. If, by 10:00 a.m. (New York City time) on the date on which notice of a Lender's election under this Section 2.5(c) is to be made, the Agent fails to receive, at its address specified in Section 8.2, a notice from a Lender provided for in this Section 2.5(c), the Agent may conclusively presume that such Lender has elected not to offer to make any Bid Advances to such Borrower with respect to the related Notice of Bid Borrowing.
provided
 
 
 
If the Borrower proposing the Bid Borrowing notifies the Agent that such Bid Borrowing is canceled pursuant to Section 2.5(d)(i), the Agent shall give prompt notice thereof to the Lenders and such Bid Borrowing shall not be made.
 
 
 
 
 
When each Lender that is to make a Bid Advance as part of such Bid Borrowing has received notice from the Agent pursuant to clause (iii) of the preceding sentence, such Lender shall, before 1:00 p.m. (New York City time) on the date of such Bid Borrowing specified in the notice received from the Agent pursuant to clause (i) of the preceding sentence, make available for the account of its Applicable Lending Office to the Agent at the Agent's Account such Lender's portion of such Bid Borrowing, in same day funds. Upon fulfillment of the applicable conditions set forth in Article 5 and after receipt by the Agent of such funds, the Agent will make such funds available to the relevant Borrower at an account specified by such Borrower. Promptly after each Bid Borrowing the Agent shall notify each Lender of the amount of the Bid Borrowing, the consequent Bid Reduction, and the dates upon which such Bid Reduction commenced and will terminate.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
there is an increase in the cost incurred by a Lender in agreeing to make or making, funding or maintaining any Eurodollar Rate Committed Advance or Eurodollar Rate Bid Advance then or at any time thereafter outstanding (excluding for purposes of this Section 2.13 any such increased costs resulting from (i) Taxes or Other Taxes (as to which Section 2.14 shall govern), (ii) changes in the basis of taxation of overall net income or overall gross income by the United States or by the foreign jurisdiction or state under the laws of which such Lender is organized or has its Applicable Lending Office (or any political subdivision thereof) and (iii) FATCA), then TBC shall from time to time, upon demand of such Lender (with a copy of such demand to the Agent),
 
pay to the Agent for the account of such Lender such amounts as are required to compensate such Lender for such increased cost, that such Lender shall exercise reasonable efforts (consistent with its internal policy and legal and regulatory restrictions) to minimize any such increased cost and that the Borrowers shall not be required to pay any such compensation with respect to any period prior to the 90th day before the date of any such demand, unless such introduction, change, compliance or request shall have retroactive effect to a date prior to such 90
provided
provided
further
th
day. A certificate as to the amount of such increase in cost, submitted to the relevant Borrowers and the Agent by such Lender, shall be conclusive and binding for all purposes under this Section 2.13(a), absent manifest error.
 
 
 
 
and, in either case, subject to payment in full of all principal, accrued and unpaid interest, fees and other amounts payable under this Agreement and then owing to such Lender immediately prior to the assignment or termination of the Commitment of such Lender.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Lender listed in Schedule I), and from the date on which any other Lender becomes a party hereto (in the case of each other Lender), and from time to time thereafter as requested in writing by TBC (but only so long thereafter as such Lender remains lawfully able to do so), provide each of the Agent and TBC with two original Internal Revenue Service forms W-8BEN, W-8IMY, or W-8EC1, as appropriate, or any successor form prescribed by the Internal Revenue Service, to establish that such Lender is not subject to, or is entitled to a reduced rate of, United States withholding tax on payments pursuant to this Agreement or with respect to any Advances or any Notes. If the forms provided by a Lender at the time such Lender first becomes a party to this Agreement indicates a United States interest withholding tax rate in excess of zero, withholding tax at such rate shall be considered excluded from Taxes unless and until such Lender provides the appropriate form certifying that a lower rate applies, whereupon withholding tax at such lower rate only shall be considered excluded from Taxes for periods governed by such form; ,, that, if at the date on which a Lender becomes a party to this Agreement, the Lender assignor was entitled to payments under subsection 2.14(a) in respect of United States withholding tax with respect to interest paid at such date, then, to such extent, the term Taxes shall include (in addition to withholding taxes that may be imposed in the future or other amounts otherwise includable in Taxes) United States withholding tax, if any, applicable with respect to the Lender assignee on such date. If any form or document referred to in this subsection 2.14(e) requires the disclosure of information, other than information necessary to compute the tax payable and information required on the date hereof by Internal Revenue Service form W-8BEN, W-8IMY, or W-8EC1, that the Lender reasonably considers to be confidential, the Lender shall give notice thereof to the relevant Borrowers and shall not be obligated to include in such form or document confidential information.
provided
however
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
for such Lender to continue to fund or maintain any Eurodollar Rate Advances or to perform its obligations hereunder with respect to Eurodollar Rate Advances hereunder, then, upon the issuance of such opinion of counsel or such assertion by a central bank or other governmental authority, the Agent shall give notice of such opinion or assertion to the Borrowers (accompanied by such opinion, if applicable). The Borrowers shall forthwith (or at the end of the then-current Interest Period if the Eurodollar Rate Advances may be lawfully maintained as Eurodollar Rate Advances until then) either
 
 
Upon such prepayment or Conversion, the obligation of such Lender to make Eurodollar Rate Committed Advances or Eurodollar Rate Bid Advances, or to Convert Committed Advances into Eurodollar Rate Committed Advances, shall be suspended until the Agent shall notify the Borrowers that the circumstances causing such suspension no longer exists.
 
 
 
effective date of an assignment pursuant to Section 2.20, the Agent shall make all payments hereunder and with respect to any Advances or under any Notes in respect of the interest assigned thereby to the Lender assignee thereunder, and the parties to such assignment shall make all appropriate adjustments in such payments for the periods prior to such effective date directly between themselves.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Each Borrower consents to the foregoing and agrees, to the extent it may effectively do so under applicable law, that any Lender acquiring a participation pursuant to the foregoing arrangements may exercise against such Borrower rights of setoff and counterclaim with respect to such participation as fully as if such Lender were a direct creditor of such Borrower in the amount of such participation.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
2.19
Alteration of Commitments and Addition of Lenders .
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
subject, in either case, to payment in full of all principal, accrued and unpaid interest, fees, commissions and other amounts payable under this Agreement and then owing to such Lender immediately prior to the assignment or termination of the Commitment of such Lender.
If the Company shall designate as a Subsidiary Borrower hereunder any Subsidiary not organized under the laws of the United States or any State thereof, any Lender may, with notice to the Agent and the Company, fulfill its Commitment by causing an Affiliate of such Lender to act as the Lender in respect of such Subsidiary Borrower.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
In lieu of furnishing the Lenders the items referred to in clauses (1), (3), (5) and (6) above, the Company may make available such items on the Company's website at , at or at such other website as notified to the Agent and the Lenders, which shall be deemed to have satisfied the requirement of delivery of such items in accordance with this Section.
www.boeing.com
www.sec.gov
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
and (b) a representation by TBC that the representations and warranties of TBC contained in subsections (a) through (g) of Section 3.1 (other than clause (i) of subsection (d) thereof) are true and accurate on and as of each such date as though made on and as of each such date (except to the extent that such representations and warranties relate solely to an earlier date), and that, as of each such date, no event has occurred and is continuing, or would result from the proposed Committed Borrowing, which constitutes a Default.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
provided, that, notwithstanding the foregoing, the Agent agrees to give to each Lender prompt notice of each notice given to it by the Borrowers pursuant to the terms of this Agreement. The Agent further agrees to make a request pursuant to Section 4.1(a)(8) at the request of any Lender, and to share such requested information with the Lenders.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
successor shall have been so appointed by the Majority Lenders and shall have accepted such appointment within 30 days (or such earlier day as shall be agreed by the Majority Lenders) (the ""), then such removal shall nonetheless become effective in accordance with such notice on the Removal Effective Date.
Removal Effective Date
 
 
 
 
 
 
(a) . No failure or delay on the part of any Lender in exercising any power or right hereunder shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exercise of any such right or power preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right or power hereunder. No notice to or demand on the Borrowers in any case shall entitle the Borrowers to any other or further notice or demand in similar or other circumstances.
Waiver
(b) . No amendment or waiver of any provision of this Agreement, any Committed Notes or any Guaranties, nor consent to any departure by the Borrowers therefrom, shall in any event be effective unless such amendment, waiver or consent is in writing and signed by the Company and the Majority Lenders, and then such amendment, waiver or consent shall be effective only in the specific instance and for the specific purpose for which given; , , that no amendment, waiver or consent shall do any of the following:
Amendment
provided
however
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
and that no amendment, waiver, or consent shall, unless in writing and signed by the Agent in addition to the Lenders required above to take such action, affect the rights or duties of the Agent under this Agreement or any Note.
provided
further
 
 
 
if to the Agent, as set forth on Schedule II;
if to any Borrower,
 
care of The Boeing Company
100 N. Riverside
Mail Code: 5003 3648
Chicago, Illinois 60606
Attention: Assistant Treasurer, Corporate Finance and Banking
facsimile number (312) 544-2399
if to any Lender, at its Domestic Lending Office; or,
as to each party, at such other address as designated by such party in a written notice to each other party referring specifically to this Agreement.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
to the fullest extent permitted by law, without notice to any Borrower (any such notice being expressly waived by each Borrower), to set off and apply any and all deposits (general or special, time or demand, provisional or final) at any time held and other indebtedness at any time owing by such Lender or such Affiliate to or for the credit or the account of any Borrower against any and all of the obligations to such Lender or such Affiliate of such Borrower now or hereafter existing under this Agreement and any Notes held by such Lender, whether or not such Lender has made a demand under this Agreement or such Notes and although such obligations may be unmatured. Each Lender shall promptly notify any Borrower after any such setoff and application made by such Lender, that the failure to give such notice shall not affect the validity of such setoff and application. The rights of each Lender under this Section are in addition to other rights and remedies (including, without limitation, other rights of setoff) which such Lender and its Affiliates may have.
provided
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be executed by their officers thereunto duly authorized as of the day and year first above written.
 
 
Syndication Agent
 
Documentation Agents
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 10.2
 
 
 
 
 
THE BOEING COMPANY, a Delaware corporation ("" or the ""), for itself and on behalf of the other BORROWERS (as defined below), the LENDERS (as defined below), CITIGROUP GLOBAL MARKETS INC. and J.P.MORGAN SECURITIES LLC, as joint lead arrangers and joint book managers, JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., as syndication agent, and CITIBANK, N.A., in its capacity as administrative agent for the Lenders (in such capacity, the ""), agree as follows:
TBC
Company
Agent
 
"" means the Five-Year Credit Agreement, dated as of November 16, 2007, by and among TBC, Citibank, N.A., as administrative agent, and certain other banks as lenders.
2007 Credit Agreement
"" means an Administrative Questionnaire in a form supplied by the Agent.
Administrative Questionnaire
"" means a Committed Advance or a Bid Advance.
Advance
"" means Citibank, N.A. acting in its capacity as administrative agent for the Lenders, or any successor administrative agent appointed pursuant to Section 7.6.
Agent
"" means the account of the Agent maintained by the Agent with Citibank, N.A., at its office at 388 Greenwich Street, New York, New York 10013, Account 36852248, Attention: Agency/Medium Term Finance, Reference: Boeing.
Agent's Account
"" means, as to any Person, any other Person that, directly or indirectly, controls, is controlled by or is under common control with such Person or is a director or officer of such Person. (For purposes of this definition, the term "controls", "controlling", "controlled by" and "under common control with" mean, with respect to a Person, the possession, direct or indirect, of the power to vote 5% or more of the Voting Stock of such Person or to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of such Person, whether through the ownership of Voting Stock, by contract, or otherwise.)
Affiliate
"" means this agreement, as it may be amended or otherwise modified from time to time, and any written additions or supplements hereto.
Agreement
"" means, with respect to each Lender, such Lender's Domestic Lending Office, in the case of a Base Rate Advance, and such Lender's Eurodollar Lending Office, in the case of a Eurodollar Rate Advance, and, in the case of a Bid Advance, the office of such Lender specified by such Lender in a notice to the Agent as its Applicable Lending Office with respect to such Bid Advance.
Applicable Lending Office
 
"" means, for any date, a fluctuating per annum rate equal to the then-applicable rate set forth in the pricing grid below, depending upon the Debt Rating then in effect:
Applicable Letter of Credit Commissions
 
"" means,
Applicable Margin
 
 
 
 
"" means, for any date, a fluctuating per annum rate equal to the then-applicable rate set forth in the pricing grid below, depending upon the Debt Rating then in effect:
Applicable Percentage
 
"" of any Letter of Credit means, at any time, the maximum amount available to be drawn under such Letter of Credit at such time (assuming compliance at such time with all conditions to drawing).
Available Amount
"" means the highest of (a) the rate of interest announced publicly by Citibank, N.A., in New York City, from time to time, as Citibank's "base" rate, (b) the Federal Funds Rate plus 0.50% per annum and (c) the British Bankers Association Interest Settlement Rate applicable to US dollars for a period of one month ("") plus 1.00% (for the avoidance of doubt, the One Month LIBOR for any day shall be based on the rate appearing on Reuters LIBOR01 Page (or other commercially available source providing such quotations as designated by the Agent from time to time) at approximately 11:00 a.m. London time on such day).
Base Rate
One Month LIBOR
"" means a Committed Advance which bears interest at the Base Rate.
Base Rate Advance
"" means an advance by a Lender to a Borrower as part of a Bid Borrowing resulting from the auction bidding procedure described in Section 2.6, and refers to a Fixed Rate Advance or a Eurodollar Rate Bid Advance, each of which shall be a "Type" of Bid Advance.
Bid Advance
"" means a borrowing consisting of simultaneous Bid Advances from each of the Lenders whose offers to make one or more Bid Advances as part of such borrowing has been accepted by a Borrower under the auction bidding procedure described in Section 2.6.
Bid Borrowing
"" means a promissory note of a Borrower payable to the order of a Lender, in substantially the form of Exhibit A-2, evidencing the indebtedness of that Borrower to such Lender resulting from a Bid Advance made by such Lender to such Borrower.
Bid Note
"" means, individually and collectively, as the context requires, TBC and each Subsidiary Borrower (unless and until it becomes a "Terminated Subsidiary Borrower" pursuant to Section 2.23).
Borrower
"" means, with respect to any Subsidiary Borrower, a letter in the form of Exhibit D, signed by such Subsidiary Borrower and TBC.
Borrower Subsidiary Letter
"" means a Committed Borrowing or a Bid Borrowing.
Borrowing
 
"" means a day of the year on which banks are not required or authorized to close in New York City and, if the applicable Business Day relates to any Eurodollar Rate Advance, on which dealings are carried on in the London interbank market.
Business Day
"" means, for each Lender, the full amount set forth opposite the name of such Lender in Schedule I or, if such Lender is a Replacement Lender or a Lender that has entered into one or more assignments pursuant to Section 2.21 or 2.22, the amount set forth for such Lender in the Register maintained by the Agent pursuant to Section 2.21(d), as such amount may be reduced pursuant to Section 2.4, Section 2.9 or Section 2.20 or increased pursuant to Section 2.20.
Commitment
"" means an advance made by a Lender to a Borrower as part of a Committed Borrowing and refers to a Base Rate Advance or a Eurodollar Rate Committed Advance, each of which is a "Type" of Committed Advance.
Committed Advance
"" means a borrowing consisting of simultaneous Committed Advances of the same Type made by each of the Lenders pursuant to Section 2.1 or Section 2.3.
Committed Borrowing
"" means a promissory note of a Borrower payable to the order of any Lender, in substantially the form of Exhibit A-1, evidencing the indebtedness of that Borrower to such Lender resulting from the Committed Advances made by such Lender to that Borrower.
Committed Note
"" means The Boeing Company, a Delaware corporation.
Company
"" means information that a Borrower furnishes to the Agent or any Lender in a writing designated as confidential, but does not include any such information that is or becomes generally available to the public or that is or becomes available to the Agent or such Lender from a source other than a Borrower.
Confidential Information
"" refers to the consolidation of accounts in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.
Consolidated
"" means the total amount of assets (less applicable reserves and other properly deductible items) after, deducting therefrom (i) all current liabilities (excluding any thereof which are by their terms extendible or renewable at the option of the obligor thereon to a time more than 12 months after the time as of which the amount thereof is being computed), and (ii) all good will, trade names, trademarks, patents, unamortized debt discount and expenses and other like intangibles, all as set forth on the most recent balance sheet of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries and computed in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.
Consolidated Net Tangible Assets
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.22(a).
Continuing Lender
"", "" and "" each means a conversion of Committed Advances of one Type into Committed Advances of another Type pursuant to Section 2.11, 2.12 or 2.16.
Convert
Conversion
Converted
"" of a Person means
Debt
 
 
 
 
"" means, as of any date, the rating of the long-term senior unsecured debt of TBC then in effect, , , that if the ratings from S&P, Moody's and Fitch fall within different levels, (i) two of the ratings are at the same level and the other rating is one level higher or one level lower than the two same ratings, the Applicable Letter of Credit Commissions, Applicable Margin and Applicable Percentage will be based on the two ratings at the same level, (ii) two of the ratings are at the same level and the other rating is two or more levels above the two same ratings, the Applicable Letter of Credit Commissions, Applicable Margin and Applicable Percentage will be based on the rating that is one level above the two same ratings, (iii) two of the ratings are at the same level and the other rating is two or more levels below the two same ratings, the Applicable Letter of Credit Commissions, Applicable Margin and Applicable Percentage will be based on the rating that is one level below the two same ratings and (iv) each of the three ratings fall within different levels, then the Applicable Letter of Credit Commissions, Applicable Margin and Applicable Percentage will be determined based on the rating level that is in between the highest and the lowest ratings, and
Debt Rating
provided
however
that if, at any time, no rating is available from S&P, Moody's and Fitch or any other nationally recognized statistical rating organization designated by TBC and approved in writing by the Majority Lenders, the Applicable Letter of Credit Commissions, Applicable Margin and Applicable Percentage for each Interest Period or each other period, as applicable, commencing during the thirty days following such ratings becoming unavailable shall be the Applicable Letter of Credit Commissions, Applicable Margin or Applicable Percentage, respectively, in effect immediately prior to such ratings becoming unavailable. Thereafter, the rating to be used until ratings from S&P, Moody's and Fitch become available shall be as agreed between TBC and the Majority Lenders, and TBC and the Majority Lenders shall use good faith efforts to reach such agreement within such thirty-day period, , , that if no such agreement is reached within such thirty-day period the Applicable Letter of Credit Commissions, Applicable Margin and Applicable Percentage thereafter, until such agreement is reached, shall be (a) if any such rating has become unavailable as a result of S&P, Moody's or Fitch ceasing its business as a rating agency, the Applicable Letter of Credit Commissions, Applicable Margin or Applicable Percentage, respectively, in effect immediately prior to such cessation or (b) otherwise, the Applicable Letter of Credit Commissions, Applicable Margin or Applicable Percentage as set forth under Level V in the respective definitions of "Applicable Letter of Credit Commissions", "Applicable Margin" and "Applicable Percentage".
provided
further
provided
however
"" means any Event of Default or any event that would constitute an Event of Default but for the requirement that notice be given or time elapse or both.
Default
"" means, at any time, subject to Section 2.24(d), a Lender that (i) has failed for two or more Business Days to comply with its obligations under this Agreement to make an Advance and/or make a payment to the Issuing Bank in respect of a Letter of Credit Advance (each a ""), unless such Lender has notified the Agent and the Company in writing that such failure is the result of such Lender's determination that one or more conditions precedent to funding has not been satisfied (which conditions precedent, together with the applicable default,
Defaulting Lender
funding obligation
 
if any, will be specifically identified in such writing), (ii) has notified the Agent, the Company or an Issuing Bank in writing, or has stated publicly, that it will not comply with any such funding obligation hereunder unless such writing or statement states that such position is based on such Lender's determination that one or more conditions precedent to funding cannot be satisfied (which conditions precedent, together with the applicable default, if any, will be specifically identified in such writing or public statement), (iii) has defaulted on its funding obligations under other loan agreements or credit agreements generally under which it has commitments to extend credit or has notified, or whose Parent Company has notified, the Agent or the Company in writing, or has stated publicly, that it does not intend to comply with its funding obligations under loan agreements or credit agreements generally, (iv) has, for three or more Business Days, failed to confirm in writing to the Agent, in response to a written request of the Agent or the Company, that it will comply with its funding obligations hereunder (provided that such Lender will cease to be a Defaulting Lender pursuant to this clause (iv) upon the Agent's and the Borrower's receipt of such written confirmation), or (v) as to which a Lender Insolvency Event has occurred and is continuing with respect to it or its Parent Company; that, for the avoidance of doubt, a Lender shall not be a Defaulting Lender solely by virtue of (1) the control, ownership or acquisition of any equity interest in that Lender or any direct or indirect parent company thereof by a governmental authority or (2) in the case of a solvent Lender, the precautionary appointment of an administrator, guardian, custodian or other similar official by a government authority under or based on the law of the country where such lender is subject to home jurisdiction supervision if applicable law requires that such appointment not be publicly disclosed, so long as, in the case of clause (1) and clause (2), such action does not result in or provide such Lender with immunity from the jurisdiction of courts within the United States or from the enforcement of judgments or writs of attachment on its assets or permit such Lender (or such governmental authority or instrumentality) to reject, repudiate, disavow or disaffirm any contracts or agreements made with such Lender. Any determination by the Agent that a Lender is a Defaulting Lender under clauses (i) through (v) above shall be conclusive and binding absent manifest error, and such Lender shall be deemed to be a Defaulting Lender (subject to Section 2.24(d)) upon delivery of written notice of such determination to the Company, each Issuing Bank and each Lender.
provided
"" means with respect to any Lender, the office of such Lender specified as its "Domestic Lending Office" in its Administrative Questionnaire or such other office of such Lender as such Lender may from time to time specify to TBC and the Agent.
Domestic Lending Office
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.20(d).
Effective Date
"" means
Eligible Assignee
 
 
 
 
 
 
"" means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended from time to time and the regulations promulgated and rulings issued thereunder.
ERISA
"ERISA Affiliate" means any Person that for purposes of Title IV of ERISA is a member of the controlled group of any Borrower, or under common control with any Borrower, within the meaning of Section 414 of the Internal Revenue Code.
"" has the meaning assigned to that term in Regulation D of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, as in effect from time to time.
Eurocurrency Liabilities
"" means, with respect to any Lender, (a) the office of such Lender specified as its "Eurodollar Lending Office" in its Administrative Questionnaire or such other office of such Lender as such Lender may from time to time specify to TBC and the Agent.
Eurodollar Lending Office
"" means, for an Interest Period for a Eurodollar Rate Committed Advance constituting part of a Committed Borrowing, and for the relevant period specified in the applicable Notice of Bid Borrowing for a Eurodollar Rate Bid Advance, an interest rate per annum equal to either
Eurodollar Rate
 
 
 
 
 
The Eurodollar Rate for any Interest Period for each Eurodollar Rate Committed Advance constituting part of the same Borrowing and for the relevant period specified in a Notice of Bid Borrowing for each Eurodollar Rate Bid Advance shall be determined by the Agent on the basis of applicable rates furnished to and received by the Agent from the Reference Banks two Business Days before the first day of such Interest Period or period, as the case may be, , , to the provisions of Section 2.11.
subject
however
"" means a Committed Advance (a "") or a Bid Advance (a "") which bears interest at a rate of interest quoted as a margin (which shall be the Applicable Margin in the case of a Committed Advance or as offered by a Lender and accepted by a Borrower in the case of a Bid Advance) over the Eurodollar Rate.
Eurodollar Rate Advance
Eurodollar Rate Committed Advance
Eurodollar Rate Bid Advance
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.6(b).
Eurodollar Rate Bid Borrowing
"" means the reserve percentage applicable to a Lender for any Interest Period for a Eurodollar Rate Advance during such Interest Period (or if more than one such percentage shall be so applicable, the daily average of such percentages for those days in such Interest Period during which any such percentage shall be so applicable) under regulations issued from time to time by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (or any successor) for determining the maximum reserve requirement (including, without limitation, any emergency, supplemental or other marginal reserve requirement) for such Lender with respect to liabilities or assets consisting of or including Eurocurrency Liabilities (or with respect to any other category of liabilities that includes deposits by reference to which the interest rate on Eurodollar Rate Advances is determined) having a term equal to such Interest Period.
Eurodollar Rate Reserve Percentage
"" means any of the events described in Section 6.1.
Event of Default
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.22.
Extension Request
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.8.
Facility Fee
"" means Sections 1471 though 1474 of the Internal Revenue Code, as of the date of this Agreement (or any amended or successor version that is substantively comparable and not materially more onerous to comply with) and any current or future regulations or official interpretations thereof.
FATCA
"" means, for each day during a period, an interest rate per annum equal to the weighted average of the fluctuating rates on overnight Federal funds transactions with members of the Federal Reserve System arranged by Federal funds brokers, as published for such day (or, if such day is not a Business Day, for the immediately preceding Business Day) by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, or, if such rate is not so published for any day which is a Business Day, the average of the quotations for such day on such transactions received by the Agent from three Federal funds brokers of recognized standing selected by it.
Federal Funds Rate
"" means Fitch, Inc.
Fitch
"" means an Advance made by a Lender to a Borrower as part of a Fixed Rate Borrowing.
Fixed Rate Advance
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.6(b).
Fixed Rate Borrowing
 
"" means each Guaranty Agreement executed by TBC in favor of the Agent and the Lenders, unconditionally guaranteeing the payment of all obligations of a Subsidiary Borrower hereunder and under any Notes executed or to be executed by it.
Guaranty
"" has the meaning specified in Section 7.5.
Indemnified Costs
"" has the meaning specified in Section 8.3(b).
Indemnified Party
"" means, for each Eurodollar Rate Committed Advance constituting part of the same Borrowing, the period commencing on the date of such Committed Advance or the date of the Conversion of a Base Rate Advance into such a Eurodollar Rate Committed Advance and ending on the last day of the period selected by the applicable Borrower pursuant to the provisions below and, thereafter, each subsequent period commencing on the last day of the immediately preceding Interest Period and ending on the last day of the period selected by such Borrower pursuant to the provisions below. The duration of each such Interest Period shall be one, two, three, or six months (or, subject to clause (iii) below, nine months), as the applicable Borrower may, upon notice received by the Agent not later than 11:00 a.m. (New York City time) on the third Business Day prior to the first day of such Interest Period, select, , , that:
Interest Period
provided
however
 
 
 
 
"" means any Lender that has issued a Letter of Credit pursuant to Section 2.3.
Issuing Bank
"" means a cash deposit account to be established and maintained by the Agent, over which the Agent shall have sole dominion and control, upon terms as may be satisfactory to the Agent.
L/C Cash Deposit Account
"" means, as of any date, the aggregate Available Amount of outstanding Letters of Credit and Committed Advances made by an Issuing Bank in accordance with Section 2.3 that have not been funded by the Lenders.
L/C Obligations
 
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.4(b)(i).
L/C Related Documents
"", subject to Section 2.21, means any of the institutions that is a signatory hereto or that, pursuant to Section 2.14, 2.20, 2.21 or 2.22, becomes a "Lender" hereunder.
Lender
"" means that (i) a Lender or its Parent Company is insolvent, or is generally unable to pay its debts as they become due, or admits in writing its inability to pay its debts as they become due, or makes a general assignment for the benefit of its creditors, or (ii) such Lender or its Parent Company is the subject of a bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, liquidation or similar proceeding, or a receiver, trustee, conservator, intervenor or sequestrator or similar Person charged with the reorganization or liquidation of its business or custodian has been appointed for such Lender or its Parent Company, or such Lender or its Parent Company has taken any action in furtherance of or indicating its consent to or acquiescence in any such proceeding or appointment.
Lender Insolvency Event
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.3(a).
Letter of Credit
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.3(d).
Letter of Credit Agreement
"" means, at any time, an amount equal to the lesser of (a) $2,000,000,000 and (b) the aggregate amount of the Commitments, as such amount may be reduced pursuant to Section 2.4, Section 2.9 or Section 2.20 or increased pursuant to Section 2.20.
Letter of Credit Facility
"" means this Agreement, the Notes and the other L/C Related Documents.
Loan Document
"" means Lenders holding greater than 50% of the then aggregate unpaid principal amount of the Advances plus the participations in Letters of Credit or, if no Advances or Letters of Credit are outstanding, Lenders having greater than 50% of the total Commitments; that if any Lender shall be a Defaulting Lender at such time, there shall be excluded from the determination of Majority Lenders at such time the Commitments of such Lender at such time.
Majority Lenders
provided
"" means Moody's Investor Services, Inc.
Moody's
"" means, at any time, a Lender that is not a Defaulting Lender or a Potential Defaulting Lender.
Non-Defaulting Lender
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.22(a).
Non-Extending Lender
"" means a Committed Note or a Bid Note.
Note
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.6(b).
Notice of Bid Borrowing
"" means a Notice of Committed Borrowing or a Notice of Bid Borrowing.
Notice of Borrowing
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.2(a).
Notice of Committed Borrowing
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.3(d).
Notice of Issuance
"" means the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development.
OECD
 
"" means, with respect to a Lender, the bank holding company (as defined in Federal Reserve Board Regulation Y), if any, of such Lender, and/or any Person owning, beneficially or of record, directly or indirectly, a majority of the shares of such Lender.
Parent Company
"" means an individual, partnership, corporation (including a business trust), limited liability company, joint stock company, trust, unincorporated association, joint venture or other entity, or a government or any political subdivision or agency thereof.
Person
"" means, at any time, a Lender (i) as to which an event of the kind referred to in the definition of "Lender Insolvency Event" has occurred and is continuing in respect of any Subsidiary of such Lender, (ii) as to which the Agent or any Issuing Bank has in good faith determined and notified the Company and (in the case of an Issuing Bank) the Agent that such Lender or its Parent Company or a Subsidiary thereof has notified the Agent, or has stated publicly, that it will not comply with its funding obligations under any other loan agreement or credit agreement or other similar/other financing agreement or (iii) that has, or whose Parent Company has, a non-investment grade rating from Moody's or S&P or another nationally recognized rating agency. Any determination that is made that a Lender is a Potential Defaulting Lender under any of clauses (i) through (iii) above will be made by the Agent or, in the case of clause (ii), an Issuing Bank, in its sole discretion acting in good faith. The Agent will promptly send to all parties hereto a copy of any notice to the Company provided for in this definition.
Potential Defaulting Lender
"" means any item of real property, or any interest therein, buildings, improvements and machinery.
Property, Plant and Equipment
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.20(c).
Proposed Increased Commitment
"" of any amount means, with respect to any Lender at any time, the product of (a) a fraction the numerator of which is the amount of such Lender's Commitment at such time and the denominator of which is the aggregate Commitments at such time and (b) such amount.
Ratable Share
"" means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., Citibank, N.A., Bank of America, N.A., and Deutsche Bank AG.
Reference Banks
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.21(d).
Register
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.22(c).
Replacement Lenders
"" means a document substantially in the form of Exhibit C, duly executed by TBC, pursuant to Section 2.20.
Request for Alteration
"" has the meaning specified in Section 2.21(a).
Required Assignment
"" means Standard & Poor's, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc.
S&P
"" means any Person in which more than 50% of the Voting Stock or the interest in the capital or profits is owned by TBC, by TBC and any one or more other Subsidiaries, or by any one or more other Subsidiaries.
Subsidiary
"" means, individually and collectively, as the context requires, each Subsidiary that is or becomes a "Borrower" in accordance with Section 2.23; in each case, unless and until it becomes a "Terminated Subsidiary Borrower".
Subsidiary Borrower
 
"" means The Boeing Company, a Delaware corporation.
TBC
"" means, individually and collectively, as the context requires, a Subsidiary Borrower that has ceased to be a "Borrower" in accordance with Section 2.23.
Terminated Subsidiary Borrower
"" means the earlier to occur of (i) November 10, 2016, as such date may be extended from time to time pursuant to Section 2.22, and (ii) the date of termination in whole of the Commitments pursuant to Section 2.9 or Section 6.2; , , that the Termination Date of any Lender that is a Non-Extending Lender to any requested extension pursuant to Section 2.22 shall be the Termination Date in effect immediately prior to the applicable extension date for all purposes of this Agreement.
Termination Date
provided
however
"" has the meaning specified in Section 4.2(b).
Total Capital
"", as to Committed Borrowings, means either Base Rate Advances or Eurodollar Rate Committed Advances and, as to Bid Borrowings, means either Fixed Rate Advances or Eurodollar Rate Bid Advances.
Type
"" means, with respect to each Lender at any time, (a) the amount of such Lender's Commitment at such time (b) the sum of (i) the aggregate principal amount of all Committed Advances made by such Lender (in its capacity as a Lender) and outstanding at such time, (ii) such Lender's Ratable Share of the aggregate principal amount of all Bid Advances outstanding at such time (iii) such Lender's Ratable Share of the aggregate Available Amount of all the Letters of Credit outstanding at such time.
Unused Commitment
minus
plus
plus
"" means, as to a corporation, all the issued and outstanding capital stock of such corporation having general voting power, under ordinary circumstances, to elect a majority of the Board of Directors of such corporation (irrespective of whether or not any capital stock of any other class or classes shall or might have voting power upon the occurrence of any contingency).
Voting Stock
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Every Notice of Committed Borrowing given by a Subsidiary Borrower must be countersigned by an authorized representative of TBC, in order to evidence the consent of TBC, in its sole discretion, to that proposed Committed Borrowing. Upon receipt of a Notice of Committed Borrowing, the Agent shall promptly give notice to each Lender thereof.
 
 
 
 
 
If such Lender shall repay to the Agent such corresponding amount, such amount so repaid shall constitute such Lender's Committed Advance as part of such Committed Borrowing for purposes of this Agreement.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Every Notice of Issuance given by a Subsidiary Borrower must be countersigned by an authorized representative of TBC, in order to evidence the consent of TBC, in its sole discretion, to that proposed Letter of Credit.
If the requested form of such Letter of Credit is acceptable to such Issuing Bank in its sole discretion, such Issuing Bank may, upon fulfillment of the applicable conditions set forth in Article 5, make such Letter of Credit available to the Borrower requesting such issuance at its office referred to in Section 8.2 or as otherwise agreed with such Borrower in connection with such issuance. In the event and to the extent that the provisions of any Letter of Credit Agreement shall conflict with this Agreement, the provisions of this Agreement shall govern.
 
 
 
 
 
If and to the extent that any Lender shall not have so made the amount of such Committed Advance available to the Agent, such Lender agrees to pay to the Agent forthwith on demand such amount together with interest thereon, for each day from the date of demand by any such Issuing Bank until the date such amount is paid to the Agent, at the Federal Funds Rate for its account or the account of such Issuing Bank, as applicable. If such Lender shall pay to the Agent such amount for the account of any such Issuing Bank on any Business Day, such amount so paid in respect of principal shall constitute a Committed Advance made by such Lender on such Business Day for purposes of this Agreement, and the outstanding principal amount of the Committed Advance made by such Issuing Bank shall be reduced by such amount on such Business Day.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
that in the event and during the continuance of an Event of Default the Agent may, and upon the request of the Majority Lenders shall, give notice to the Borrowers that (x) the Applicable Margin shall immediately increase by 1.0% above the Applicable Margin then in effect, and, in the case of a Eurodollar Rate Advance, such Advance shall automatically convert to a Base Rate Advance at the end of the Interest Period then in effect for such Eurodollar Rate Advance and (y) to the fullest extent permitted by law, the Borrowers shall pay interest on the amount of any interest, fee or other amount payable hereunder that is not paid when due, from the date such amount shall be due until such amount shall be paid in full, payable in arrears on the date such amount shall be paid in full and on demand, at a rate per annum equal at all times to 1% above the Base Rate; , , that following acceleration of the Advances pursuant to Section 6.2, the foregoing described interest shall accrue and be payable hereunder whether or not previously required by the Agent.
provided
provided
however
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
A Borrower requesting a Bid Borrowing shall deliver a Notice of Bid Borrowing to the Agent not later than 11:00 a.m. (New York City time) (A) at least one Business Day prior to the date of the proposed Bid Borrowing if the proposed Bid Borrowing is to be a Fixed Rate Borrowing, and (B) at least four Business Days prior to the date of the proposed Bid Borrowing, if the proposed Bid Borrowing is to be a Eurodollar Rate Bid Borrowing. Every Notice of Bid Borrowing given by a Subsidiary Borrower must be countersigned by an authorized representative of TBC, in order to evidence the consent of TBC, in its sole discretion, to that proposed Bid Borrowing. The Agent shall in turn promptly notify each Lender of each request for a Bid Borrowing by sending such Lender a copy of the related Notice of Bid Borrowing.
 
 
 
 
that if the Agent in its capacity as a Lender, in its sole discretion, elects to make any such offer, it shall notify such Borrower and the Company of such offer before 9:30 a.m. (New York City time) on the date on which notice of such election is to be given to the Agent by the other Lenders. If, by 10:00 a.m. (New York City time) on the date on which notice of a Lender's election under this Section 2.6(c) is to be made, the Agent fails to receive, at its address specified in Section 8.2, a notice from a Lender provided for in this Section 2.6(c), the Agent may conclusively presume that such Lender has elected not to offer to make any Bid Advances to such Borrower with respect to the related Notice of Bid Borrowing.
provided
 
 
 
If the Borrower proposing the Bid Borrowing notifies the Agent that such Bid Borrowing is canceled pursuant to Section 2.6(d)(i), the Agent shall give prompt notice thereof to the Lenders and such Bid Borrowing shall not be made.
 
 
 
 
 
When each Lender that is to make a Bid Advance as part of such Bid Borrowing has received notice from the Agent pursuant to clause (iii) of the preceding sentence, such Lender shall, before 1:00 p.m. (New York City time) on the date of such Bid Borrowing specified in the notice received from the Agent pursuant to clause (i) of the preceding sentence, make available for the account of its Applicable Lending Office to the Agent at the Agent's Account such Lender's portion of such Bid Borrowing, in same day funds. Upon fulfillment of the applicable conditions set forth in Article 5 and after receipt by the Agent of such funds, the Agent will make such funds available to the relevant Borrower at an account specified by such Borrower. Promptly after each Bid Borrowing the Agent shall notify each Lender of the amount and tenor of the Bid Borrowing.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
there is an increase in the cost incurred by a Lender in agreeing to make or making, funding or maintaining any Eurodollar Rate Committed Advance or Eurodollar Rate Bid Advance then or at any time thereafter outstanding or agreeing to issue or of issuing or maintaining or participating in Letters of Credit (excluding for purposes of this Section 2.14 any such increased costs resulting from (i) Taxes or Other Taxes (as to which Section 2.15 shall govern), (ii) changes in the basis of taxation of overall net income or overall gross income by the United States or by the foreign jurisdiction or state under the laws of which such Lender is organized or has its Applicable Lending Office (or any political subdivision thereof) and (iii) FATCA), then TBC shall from time to time, upon demand of such Lender (with a copy of such demand to the Agent), pay to the Agent for the account of such Lender such amounts as are required to compensate such Lender for such increased cost, that such Lender shall exercise reasonable efforts (consistent with its internal policy and legal and regulatory restrictions) to minimize any such increased cost and that the Borrowers shall not be required to pay any such compensation with respect to any period prior to the 90th day before the date of any such demand, unless such introduction, change, compliance or request shall have retroactive effect to a date prior to such 90
provided
provided
further
th
day. A certificate as to the amount of such increase in cost, submitted to the relevant Borrowers and the Agent by such Lender, shall be conclusive and binding for all purposes under this Section 2.14(a), absent manifest error.
 
 
 
 
and, in either case, subject to payment in full of all principal, accrued and unpaid interest, fees, commissions and other amounts payable under this Agreement and then owing to such Lender immediately prior to the assignment or termination of the Commitment of such Lender.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
for such Lender to continue to fund or maintain any Eurodollar Rate Advances or to perform its obligations hereunder with respect to Eurodollar Rate Advances hereunder, then, upon the issuance of such opinion of counsel or such assertion by a central bank or other governmental authority, the Agent shall give notice of such opinion or assertion to the Borrowers (accompanied by such opinion, if applicable). The Borrowers shall forthwith (or at the end of the then-current Interest Period if the Eurodollar Rate Advances may be lawfully maintained as Eurodollar Rate Advances until then) either
 
 
Upon such prepayment or Conversion, the obligation of such Lender to make Eurodollar Rate Committed Advances or Eurodollar Rate Bid Advances, or to Convert Committed Advances into Eurodollar Rate Committed Advances, shall be suspended until the Agent shall notify the Borrowers that the circumstances causing such suspension no longer exists.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Each Borrower consents to the foregoing and agrees, to the extent it may effectively do so under applicable law, that any Lender acquiring a participation pursuant to the foregoing arrangements may exercise against such Borrower rights of setoff and counterclaim with respect to such participation as fully as if such Lender were a direct creditor of such Borrower in the amount of such participation.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
subject, in either case, to payment in full of all principal, accrued and unpaid interest, fees, commissions and other amounts payable under this Agreement and then owing to such Lender immediately prior to the assignment or termination of the Commitment of such Lender.
 
If the Company shall designate as a Subsidiary Borrower hereunder any Subsidiary not organized under the laws of the United States or any State thereof, any Lender may, with notice to the Agent and the Company, fulfill its Commitment by causing an Affiliate of such Lender to act as the Lender in respect of such Subsidiary Borrower.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
In lieu of furnishing the Lenders the items referred to in clauses (1), (3), (5) and (6) above, the Company may make available such items on the Company's website at , at or at such other website as notified to the Agent and the Lenders, which shall be deemed to have satisfied the requirement of delivery of such items in accordance with this Section.
www.boeing.com
www.sec.gov
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
and (b) a representation by TBC that the representations and warranties of TBC contained in subsections (a) through (g) of Section 3.1 (other than clause (i) of subsection (d) thereof) are true and accurate on and as of each such date as though made on and as of each such date (except to the extent that such representations and warranties relate solely to an earlier date), and that, as of each such date, no event has occurred and is continuing, or would result from the proposed Committed Borrowing or issuance, which constitutes a Default.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
provided, that, notwithstanding the foregoing, the Agent agrees to give to each Lender prompt notice of each notice given to it by the Borrowers pursuant to the terms of this Agreement. The Agent further agrees to make a request pursuant to Section 4.1(a)(8) at the request of any Lender, and to share such requested information with the Lenders.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
and that no amendment, waiver, or consent shall, unless in writing and signed by the Agent in addition to the Lenders required above to take such action, affect the rights or duties of the Agent under this Agreement or any Note and no amendment, waiver or consent shall, unless in writing and signed by the Issuing Banks in addition to the Lenders required above to take such action, adversely affect the rights or obligations of the Issuing Banks in their capacities as such under this Agreement.
provided
further
 
 
 
if to the Agent, as set forth on Schedule II;
 
if to any Borrower,
care of The Boeing Company
100 N. Riverside
Mail Code: 5003 3648
Chicago, Illinois 60606
Attention: Assistant Treasurer, Corporate Finance and Banking
facsimile number (312) 544-2399
if to any Lender, at its Domestic Lending Office; or,
as to each party, at such other address as designated by such party in a written notice to each other party referring specifically to this Agreement.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
to the fullest extent permitted by law, without notice to any Borrower (any such notice being expressly waived by each Borrower), to set off and apply any and all deposits (general or special, time or demand, provisional or final) at any time held and other indebtedness at any time owing by such Lender or such Affiliate to or for the credit or the account of any Borrower against any and all of the obligations to such Lender or such Affiliate of such Borrower now or hereafter existing under this Agreement and any Notes held by such Lender, whether or not such Lender has made a demand under this Agreement or such Notes and although such obligations may be unmatured. Each Lender shall promptly notify any Borrower after any such setoff and application made by such Lender, that the failure to give such notice shall not affect the validity of such setoff and application. The rights of each Lender under this Section are in addition to other rights and remedies (including, without limitation, other rights of setoff) which such Lender and its Affiliates may have.
provided
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
TBC agrees that in connection with all aspects of the transactions contemplated hereby and any communications in connection therewith, TBC and its Affiliates, on the one hand, and the Agent, the Lenders and their respective Affiliates, on the other hand, will have a business relationship that does not create, by implication or otherwise, any fiduciary duty on the part of the Agent, the Issuing Banks, the Lenders or their respective Affiliates and no such duty will be deemed to have arisen in connection with any such transactions or communications.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be executed by their officers thereunto duly authorized as of the day and year first above written.
 
 
Syndication Agent
 
Documentation Agents
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20111215170634.txt.gz
TIME:20111215170634
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
As previously reported, on October 31, 2011, the Board of Directors (the "Board") of The Boeing Company (the "Company") approved certain management changes at the Company, including the election of Gregory D. Smith as Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer effective February 1, 2012.
On December 12, 2011, the Board, acting on the recommendation of its Compensation Committee (the "Committee"), approved an increase in Mr. Smith's annual base salary to $625,000 per year, effective February 1, 2012. On December 11, 2012, the Committee also determined that, in connection with Mr. Smith's election, Mr. Smith's target awards under the Company's annual and long-term incentive plans shall be set at 85% and 325%, respectively, of his new annual base salary. Awards under the long-term incentive plan shall be allocated among performance awards, stock options and restricted stock units in accordance with the long-term incentive plan. Additional details regarding awards under these plans are set forth on pages 27 to 29 of the Company's proxy statement for its 2011 Annual Meeting of Shareholders filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 18, 2011.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: December 15, 2011


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20120125074600.txt.gz
TIME:20120125074600
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
(a) On January 25, 2012, The Boeing Company issued a press release reporting its financial results for the fourth quarter of 2011. A copy of the Company's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
(a) Not applicable
(b) Not applicable
(c) Not applicable
(d) Exhibits
99.1    Press Release issued by The Boeing Company dated January 25, 2012, reporting Boeing's financial results for the fourth quarter of 2011, furnished herewith.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Boeing Reports Strong Fourth-Quarter Results and Provides 2012 Guidance
Fourth-Quarter 2011
 
 
 
Full Year 2011
 
 
 
Outlook for 2012
 
 
 
Table 1. Summary Financial Results
 
 The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] reported fourth-quarter net income rose to $1.4 billion, or $1.84 per share, on revenue of $19.6 billion. The results reflect continued strong core performance across the company's businesses, a $0.52 per share impact related to a favorable tax settlement, and higher pension expense (Table 1). Fourth-quarter 2010 results included a $0.50 per share favorable tax settlement.
CHICAGO, Jan. 25, 2012
 
Net income for the full year increased to $4.0 billion, or $5.34 per share, on revenue of $68.7 billion, which included the impact of the favorable tax settlement ($0.53 per share for the year). Full-year 2010 results included the $0.50 per share favorable tax settlement and a $0.20 per share tax charge resulting from health care legislation.
Earnings guidance for 2012 has been established at between $4.05 and $4.25 per share reflecting solid core performance and higher pension expense. Revenue guidance for 2012 is between $78 and $80 billion.
"Strong fourth-quarter operating performance, record revenue and backlog, and expanded earnings and cash flow capped a year of substantial progress for Boeing in 2011," said Jim McNerney, Boeing chairman, president, and chief executive officer. "Major accomplishments of our team during the year included certifying and delivering the first 787s and 747-8s, winning the U.S. Air Force Tanker program, launching the 737 MAX, and securing both an important U.S. missile defense contract and a key agreement for F-15s to Saudi Arabia."
"We enter 2012 with renewed momentum, and proven business and product strategies. With a record backlog and intense focus on productivity, we are well positioned to deliver growth and increased competitiveness, even as we face constrained U.S. defense spending and pension headwinds. Our priorities for the year are to continue with disciplined increases in production rates for our commercial airplane customers, and to build on our strong position in defense, space and security with aggressive pursuit of growth in core, adjacent and international markets," he said.
Table 2. Cash Flow
 
 
Boeing's quarterly operating cash flow was $2.9 billion, with strong operating performance more than offsetting continued investment in the 787 and 747-8 programs. For the full year, operating cash flow was $4.0 billion. Free cash flow* was $2.4 billion in the quarter (Table 2).
 
Table 3. Cash, Marketable Securities and Debt Balances
 
 
Cash and investments in marketable securities totaled $11.3 billion at year-end (Table 3), up from $9.2 billion at the beginning of the quarter. Debt was unchanged in the quarter.
Total company backlog at year-end was a record $356 billion, up from $332 billion at the beginning of the quarter. Net orders for the quarter were $42 billion and included a significant mix of wide-body commercial airplanes. Backlog is up $34.6 billion from prior year-end, reflecting $103 billion of net orders in 2011.
Segment Results
Commercial Airplanes
Table 4. Commercial Airplanes Operating Results
 
Boeing Commercial Airplanes fourth-quarter revenue increased by 31 percent to $10.7 billion on higher delivery volume and mix. Operating margin was 9.2 percent, reflecting lower R&D partially offset by the dilutive impact of initial 787 and 747-8 deliveries and higher period costs (Table 4).
For the full year, revenue increased by 14 percent on higher delivery volume, increased services revenue and mix. Operating margin was 9.7 percent, reflecting
 
improved mix and lower R&D partially offset by higher period costs and the dilutive impact of initial 787 and 747-8 deliveries.
During the quarter, the first 747-8 Freighter was delivered to Cargolux and the 747-8 Intercontinental achieved FAA certification. Also during the quarter, the company and the International Association of Machinists & Aerospace Workers reached agreement on a four-year contract extension primarily related to machinists in Puget Sound.
At year-end, the company had over 1,000 orders and commitments for the 737 MAX, including 150 firm orders from launch customer Southwest Airlines.
Commercial Airplanes booked 379 net orders during the quarter and 805 during the full year. Backlog remains strong with more than 3,700 airplanes valued at a record $296 billion.
Boeing Defense, Space & Security
Table 5. Defense, Space & Security Operating Results
 
Boeing Defense, Space & Security's fourth-quarter revenue increased by 4 percent to $8.5 billion, while operating margin was 10.2 percent (Table 5).
For the full year, revenue was unchanged at $32.0 billion. Operating margin increased to 9.9 percent, driven by higher Boeing Military Aircraft (BMA) margins.
BMA fourth-quarter revenue increased to $3.9 billion, due to Airborne Early Warning & Control (AEW&C) mix and higher KC-767 International Tanker deliveries partially offset by fewer C-17 deliveries. Operating margin increased to 9.5 percent, reflecting strong execution across various programs. Fourth-quarter 2010 included charges for higher costs on the AEW&C program. During the quarter, the U.S. Government and Saudi Arabia reached agreement on the purchase of 84 new F-15SA
 
aircraft and upgrades to an additional 70 F-15Ss. Additionally, BMA was awarded the P-8A low rate initial production lot II production award from the U.S. Navy.
Network & Space Systems (N&SS) fourth-quarter revenue decreased to $2.0 billion, due to lower volume driven by termination of the Brigade Combat Team Modernization program. Operating margin decreased to 8.6 percent, reflecting higher R&D. During the quarter, N&SS was awarded the development and sustainment contract for Ground-based Midcourse Defense from the U.S. Missile Defense Agency. Also during the quarter, N&SS delivered the first 702 medium power satellite.
Global Services & Support (GS&S) fourth-quarter revenue increased to $2.6 billion, due to higher revenues in integrated logistics. Operating margin decreased to 12.6 percent, reflecting the current defense contracting environment. During the quarter, GS&S was awarded the C-17 Globemaster III Integrated Sustainment Program from the U.S. Air Force.
Backlog at Defense, Space & Security was $60 billion.
Additional Financial Information
Table 6. Additional Financial Information
 
At year-end, Boeing Capital Corporation's (BCC) portfolio balance was $4.3 billion, unchanged from the beginning of the quarter and down from $4.7 billion at the start of the year. BCC's earnings decreased due to a smaller portfolio and higher asset impairments. BCC's debt-to-equity ratio was unchanged at 6.2-to-1.
The "Other" segment includes unallocated activities of Engineering, Operations and Technology, Shared Services Group as well as certain intercompany guarantees
 
provided to BCC. Other segment earnings of $43 million in the fourth quarter 2011 were driven by assigning an upgraded credit rating category to certain financing receivables.
The loss in unallocated items and eliminations increased due to higher pension and deferred compensation expense partially offset by a charitable trust contribution that impacted fourth-quarter 2010. Total pension expense for the fourth quarter was $344 million, as compared to $254 million in the same period last year. A total of $291 million was allocated to the operating segments in the quarter, up from $244 million in the same period last year, and $53 million was recognized in unallocated items, compared to $10 million in the same period last year.
The company's income tax expense of $57 million in the quarter (compared to a benefit of $163 million in the same period last year) included a $397 million non-cash gain due to an IRS settlement for tax years 2004 through 2006. Fourth-quarter 2010 included a $371 million non-cash gain due to an IRS settlement and a benefit of $154 million due to the extension of the R&D credit.
 
Outlook
The company's 2012 financial guidance (Table 7) reflects continued strong core performance, generating a 7 percent increase in adjusted earnings per share*, which is offset by higher pension expense and other items.
Table 7. Financial Outlook
 
 
Boeing's 2012 revenue guidance is between $78 and $80 billion. Earnings guidance for 2012 is established at between $4.05 and $4.25 per share. Total pension expense in 2012 is expected to be $2.6 billion (of which approximately $1.0 billion is expected to be recorded in unallocated items and eliminations) or $2.21 per share, an increase of $0.83 per share from 2011. Operating cash flow is expected to be greater than $5.0 billion in 2012, including $1.5 billion of discretionary pension contributions.
 
Commercial Airplanes' 2012 deliveries are expected to be between 585 and 600 airplanes and is sold out. This includes an expected 70 to 85 787 and 747-8 deliveries, of which approximately half are 787 aircraft. Commercial Airplanes' 2012 revenue is expected to be between $47.5 and $49.5 billion with operating margins between 8.5 and 9 percent.
Defense, Space & Security's revenue for 2012 is expected to be between $30.0 and $30.5 billion with operating margins greater than 9.0 percent.
Boeing Capital Corporation expects that its aircraft finance portfolio will continue to decline in 2012, as new aircraft financing of less than $0.5 billion is expected to be lower than normal portfolio runoff through customer payments and depreciation. BCC's debt-to-equity ratio is expected to return to 5.0-to-1 in the first quarter of 2012 due to the repayment of maturing debt.
Boeing's 2012 R&D forecast is between $3.3 and $3.5 billion. Capital expenditures for 2012 are expected to be approximately $2.0 billion.
 
Non-GAAP Measure Disclosures
Management believes that the non-GAAP (Generally Accepted Accounting Principles) measures (indicated by an asterisk *) used in this report provide investors with important perspectives into the company's ongoing business performance. The company does not intend for the information to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the related GAAP measures. Other companies may define the measures differently. The following definitions are provided:
Free Cash Flow
Free cash flow is defined as GAAP less capital expenditures for . Management believes free cash flow provides investors with an important perspective on the cash available for shareholders, debt repayment, and acquisitions after making the capital investments required to support ongoing business operations and long term value creation. Free cash flow does not represent the residual cash flow available for discretionary expenditures as it excludes certain mandatory expenditures such as repayment of maturing debt. Management uses free cash flow internally to assess both business performance and overall liquidity. Table 2 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and free cash flow.
operating cash flow
property, plant and equipment additions
Increase in Adjusted Earnings Per Share
Adjusted earnings per share is defined as GAAP adjusted for certain significant charges or credits. Management believes the increase in adjusted earnings per share is important to understanding the company's on-going operations and provide additional insights into underlying business performance. Significant charges or credits are described in the attachments to this release which provide reconciliations between GAAP earnings per share and adjusted earnings per share.
diluted earnings per share
 
This press release contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "may," "should," "expects," "intends," "projects," "plans," "believes," "estimates," "targets," "anticipates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. Examples of forward-looking statements include statements relating to our future financial condition and operating results, as well as any other statement that does not directly relate to any historical or current fact. Forward-looking statements are based on our current expectations and assumptions, which may not prove to be accurate. These statements are not guarantees and are subject to risks, uncertainties, and changes in circumstances that are difficult to predict. Many factors could cause actual results to differ materially and adversely from these forward-looking statements. Among these factors are risks related to: (1) general conditions in the economy and our industry, including those due to regulatory changes; (2) our reliance on our commercial airline customers; (3) our commercial development programs, planned production rate increases across multiple commercial airline programs and the overall health of our production system; (4) changing acquisition priorities of the U.S. government; (5) our dependence on U.S. government contracts; (6) our reliance on fixed-price contracts; (7) our reliance on cost-type contracts; (8) uncertainties concerning contracts that include in-orbit incentive payments; (9) our dependence on our subcontractors and suppliers, as well as the availability of raw materials, (10) changes in accounting estimates; (11) changes in the competitive landscape in our markets; (12) our non-U.S. operations, including sales to non-U.S. customers; (13) potential adverse developments in new or pending litigation and/or government investigations; (14) customer and aircraft concentration in Boeing Capital Corporation's customer financing portfolio; (15) changes in our ability to obtain debt on commercially reasonable terms and at competitive rates in order to fund our operations and contractual commitments; (16) realizing the anticipated benefits of mergers, acquisitions, joint ventures/strategic alliances or divestitures; (17) the adequacy of our insurance coverage to cover significant risk exposures; (18) potential business disruptions, including those related to physical security threats, information technology or cyber-attacks or natural disasters; (19) work stoppages or other labor disruptions; (20) significant changes in discount rates and actual investment return on pension assets; (21) potential environmental liabilities; and (22) threats to the security of our or our customers' information.
Additional information concerning these and other factors can be found in our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including our most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q and Current Reports on Form 8-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which it is made, and we assume no obligation to update or revise any forward-looking statement, whether as a result of new information, future events, or otherwise, except as required by law.
Contact:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
In addition to disclosing results that are determined in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), the company also discloses non-GAAP results that exclude certain significant charges or credits or highlight certain significant items that are important to an understanding of the company's ongoing operations. The company provides reconciliations of its non-GAAP financial reporting to the most comparable GAAP reporting. The company believes that discussion of results excluding certain significant charges or credits provides additional insights into underlying business performance. The company also believes that it is useful to highlight the significant impact pensions and the higher tax rate and shares have on the company's projected 2012 results. The determination of significant charges or credits or exclusion of certain items may not be comparable to similarly titled measures used by other companies and may vary from quarter to quarter.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20120229111823.txt.gz
TIME:20120229111823
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On February 27, 2012, the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of The Boeing Company (the "Company") approved a grant of 40,000 restricted stock units (the "Award") to J. Michael Luttig, the Company's Executive Vice President and General Counsel. The Award was granted in recognition of Mr. Luttig's performance and as a retention vehicle. The Award will vest 100% and settle in shares of the Company's common stock on a one-for-one basis on February 27, 2016, which is the fourth anniversary of the grant date. The Award was made under the Company's 2003 Incentive Stock Plan, as amended and restated (the "2003 Plan"), and is subject to the terms and conditions set forth in the 2003 Plan and the Form of Notice of Terms of Restricted Stock Units, a copy of which is included as Exhibit 10.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: February 29, 2012
 

Exhibit 10.1
To:                     
As part of the Executive Compensation Program, The Boeing Company (the "Company") has awarded you a Restricted Stock Unit award. The terms and conditions of the award are as follows:
 
 
 
"Disability" here means a disability entitling a participant to benefits under a long-term disability policy sponsored by the Company or one of its subsidiaries.
 
 
5.1 While RSUs are in your account, they will earn dividend equivalents in the form of additional RSUs. Specifically, as of each dividend payment date for Boeing stock, your RSU account will be credited with additional RSUs ("Earnings Credit RSUs") equal in number to the number of shares of Boeing stock that could be bought with the cash dividends that would be paid on the RSUs in your account if each RSU were a share of Boeing stock. The number of RSUs that results from the Earnings Credit calculation will be to two decimal places.
5.2 The number of shares of Boeing stock that could be bought with such cash dividends will be calculated based on the "Fair Market Value" of Boeing stock on the applicable dividend payment date. "Fair Market Value" here means the average of the high and the low per share trading prices for Boeing stock as reported in for the specific dividend payment date, or in such other source as the Company deems reliable.
The Wall Street Journal
5.3 Earnings Credit RSUs will vest at the same time as the RSUs with which they are associated.
 
 
 
9.1 Distribution from your RSU account will be made as soon as reasonably possible after the vesting of your RSUs, but not later than 60 days after the applicable vesting date. Distribution will be in whole shares of Boeing stock. The number of shares distributed will be equal to the number of whole vested RSUs in your account, subject to deductions described in paragraph 9.2. Fractional share values will be applied to income tax withholding.
9.2 The Company will deduct from the distribution of your vested RSUs any withholding or other taxes required by law and may deduct any amounts due from you to the Company or to a subsidiary of the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20120425074351.txt.gz
TIME:20120425074351
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
(a) On April 25, 2012, The Boeing Company issued a press release reporting its financial results for the first quarter of 2012. A copy of the Company's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
(a) Not applicable
(b) Not applicable
(c) Not applicable
(d) Exhibits
99.1    Press Release issued by The Boeing Company dated April 25, 2012, reporting Boeing's financial results for the first quarter of 2012, furnished herewith.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Boeing Reports Strong First-Quarter Results
 
 
 
 
 
 
Table 1. Summary Financial Results
 
 The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] reported first-quarter net income rose to $0.9 billion, or $1.22 per share, on revenue of $19.4 billion. Earnings per share rose 56 percent, reflecting continued strong core performance across the company's businesses, which more than offset higher pension expense (Table 1). The results also include an increase in earnings of $0.11 per share related to a reduction in a litigation-related reserve. Earnings per share guidance for 2012 increased to between $4.15 and $4.35 to incorporate the reduction in the litigation-related reserve. The company reaffirmed its 2012 revenue and operating cash flow outlook.
CHICAGO, Apr. 25, 2012
"Strong core operating performance from our production programs and services businesses continues to drive expanded earnings, revenue and cash flow for Boeing," said Jim McNerney, chairman, president, and chief executive officer. "We also grew our record backlog with more than 300 firm orders for our new 737 MAX, a contract award for 84 new F-15s for Saudi Arabia, and other key wins."
 
"Our outlook for the year remains positive, and our team is focused on meeting our commitments to customers, profitably increasing commercial airplane production and delivery rates, and building on our strong position in defense, space and security markets."
Table 2. Cash Flow
 
 
Boeing's quarterly operating cash flow was $0.8 billion, with higher commercial airplane deliveries, increased orders and strong operating performance more than offsetting continued investment in the 787 program. Free cash flow* was $0.4 billion in the quarter (Table 2).
Table 3. Cash, Marketable Securities and Debt Balances
 
 
Cash and investments in marketable securities totaled $10.5 billion at quarter-end (Table 3), down from $11.3 billion at the beginning of the year. Debt was $11.6 billion, down from $12.4 billion at year-end, primarily due to Boeing Capital Corporation maturities.
Total company backlog at quarter-end was a record $380 billion, up from $356 billion at the beginning of the year. Net orders for the quarter were $42 billion, as backlog increased for both Commercial Airplanes and Defense, Space & Security.
 
Segment Results
Commercial Airplanes
Table 4. Commercial Airplanes Operating Results
 
Boeing Commercial Airplanes first-quarter revenue increased by 54 percent to $10.9 billion on higher delivery volume and mix. Operating margin was 9.9 percent, reflecting the higher deliveries and lower R&D partially offset by higher period costs and the dilutive impact of 787 and 747-8 deliveries (Table 4).
During the quarter, the first two GEnx-powered 787s were delivered. The first 747-8 Intercontinental VIP airplane was also delivered during the quarter.
Commercial Airplanes booked 412 net orders during the quarter, including 301 firm orders for the 737 MAX. Backlog remains strong with more than 4,000 airplanes valued at a record $308 billion.
 
Boeing Defense, Space & Security
Table 5. Defense, Space & Security Operating Results
 
Boeing Defense, Space & Security's first-quarter revenue increased to $8.2 billion, while operating margin was 9.0 percent (Table 5).
Boeing Military Aircraft (BMA) first-quarter revenue increased to $4.3 billion, primarily due to initial revenue for the F-15 Saudi Arabia contract. Operating margin was 10.1 percent, reflecting strong execution across various programs. During the quarter, BMA was awarded both domestic and international C-17 Globemaster III orders and delivered the first production P-8A Poseidon aircraft to the U.S. Navy.
Network & Space Systems (N&SS) first-quarter revenue decreased to $1.8 billion, driven by lower volume on Brigade Combat Team Modernization and timing on United Launch Alliance. Operating margin was 4.1 percent, primarily due to the lower volume and satellite mix. During the quarter, N&SS launched its new 702 small satellite product line with a contract for four units through a joint international agreement.
Global Services & Support (GS&S) first-quarter revenue increased to $2.1 billion, due to higher volume in integrated logistics. Operating margin was 10.9 percent, reflecting improved performance in integrated logistics. During the quarter, GS&S was awarded a performance-based logistics contract for the sustainment of the Republic of Korea Air Force fleet of F-15s.
Backlog at Defense, Space & Security increased by 20 percent to $72 billion on F-15 and C-17 order activity in the quarter, bringing backlog to more than two times the unit's projected 2012 revenue.
 
Additional Financial Information
Table 6. Additional Financial Information
 
At quarter-end, Boeing Capital Corporation's (BCC) portfolio balance was $4.2 billion, down from $4.3 billion at the beginning of the year on portfolio run-off and asset sales. BCC's debt-to-equity ratio was 5.1-to-1, down from year-end, primarily due to the repayment of maturing debt.
The "Other" segment includes unallocated activities of Engineering, Operations and Technology, Shared Services Group as well as certain intercompany guarantees provided to BCC. Other segment expense of $79 million in the first quarter 2012 was primarily driven by higher asset impairment expense.
The loss in unallocated items and eliminations was essentially unchanged as a $131 million increase to earnings from a reduction in a litigation-related reserve was offset by higher pension expense. Total pension expense for the first quarter was $655 million, as compared to $526 million in the same period last year. A total of $466 million was allocated to the operating segments in the quarter, up from $431 million in the same period last year, and $189 million was recognized in unallocated items, compared to $95 million in the same period last year.
The company's effective tax rate was 36.8% in the quarter, up from 33.4% in the same period last year partly due to the expiration of the R&D tax credit legislation, which the company expects Congress to consider for extension later this year.
 
Outlook
The company's 2012 financial guidance (Table 7) reflects continued strong core performance offset by higher pension expense and other items. Earnings per share guidance for 2012 increased to between $4.15 and $4.35 to incorporate the earnings from the reduction in the litigation-related reserve. All other financial guidance is reaffirmed.
Table 7. Financial Outlook
 
 
 
Non-GAAP Measure Disclosures
Management believes that the non-GAAP (Generally Accepted Accounting Principles) measures (indicated by an asterisk *) used in this report provide investors with important perspectives into the company's ongoing business performance. The company does not intend for the information to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the related GAAP measures. Other companies may define the measures differently. The following definitions are provided:
Free Cash Flow
Free cash flow is defined as GAAP less capital expenditures for . Management believes free cash flow provides investors with an important perspective on the cash available for shareholders, debt repayment, and acquisitions after making the capital investments required to support ongoing business operations and long term value creation. Free cash flow does not represent the residual cash flow available for discretionary expenditures as it excludes certain mandatory expenditures such as repayment of maturing debt. Management uses free cash flow internally to assess both business performance and overall liquidity. Table 2 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and free cash flow.
operating cash flow
property, plant and equipment additions
 
This press release contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "may," "should," "expects," "intends," "projects," "plans," "believes," "estimates," "targets," "anticipates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. Examples of forward-looking statements include statements relating to our future financial condition and operating results, as well as any other statement that does not directly relate to any historical or current fact. Forward-looking statements are based on our current expectations and assumptions, which may not prove to be accurate. These statements are not guarantees and are subject to risks, uncertainties, and changes in circumstances that are difficult to predict. Many factors could cause actual results to differ materially and adversely from these forward-looking statements. Among these factors are risks related to: (1) general conditions in the economy and our industry, including those due to regulatory changes; (2) our reliance on our commercial airline customers; (3) our commercial development programs, planned production rate increases across multiple commercial airline programs and the overall health of our aircraft production system; (4) changing acquisition priorities of the U.S. government; (5) our dependence on U.S. government contracts; (6) our reliance on fixed-price contracts; (7) our reliance on cost-type contracts; (8) uncertainties concerning contracts that include in-orbit incentive payments; (9) our dependence on our subcontractors and suppliers, as well as the availability of raw materials, (10) changes in accounting estimates; (11) changes in the competitive landscape in our markets; (12) our non-U.S. operations, including sales to non-U.S. customers; (13) potential adverse developments in new or pending litigation and/or government investigations; (14) customer and aircraft concentration in Boeing Capital's customer financing portfolio; (15) changes in our ability to obtain debt on commercially reasonable terms and at competitive rates in order to fund our operations and contractual commitments; (16) realizing the anticipated benefits of mergers, acquisitions, joint ventures/strategic alliances or divestitures; (17) the adequacy of our insurance coverage to cover significant risk exposures; (18) potential business disruptions, including those related to physical security threats, information technology or cyber-attacks or natural disasters; (19) work stoppages or other labor disruptions; (20) significant changes in discount rates and actual investment return on pension assets; (21) potential environmental liabilities; and (22) threats to the security of our or our customers' information.
Additional information concerning these and other factors can be found in our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including our most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q and Current Reports on Form 8-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which it is made, and we assume no obligation to update or revise any forward-looking statement, whether as a result of new information, future events, or otherwise, except as required by law.
Contact:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20120503112852.txt.gz
TIME:20120503112852
EVENTS:	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.03. Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year.
On April 30, 2012, the Board of Directors of The Boeing Company (the "Company") adopted an amendment to Article II, Section 1 of the Company's By-Laws to decrease the number of directors from twelve to eleven. A copy of the amended and restated By-Laws is attached hereto as Exhibit 3.2 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 5.07. Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders.
The Company held its Annual Meeting of Shareholders on April 30, 2012. Set forth below are the voting results for each of the matters submitted to a vote of the shareholders.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
THE BOEING COMPANY
 
Dated: May 3, 2012
 

Exhibit 3.2
 
 
 
 
The annual meeting of stockholders shall be held on such date and at such time as the Board of Directors shall determine for the election of directors and the transaction of such other business as may properly be brought before the meeting.
 
A special meeting of stockholders may be called at any time by the Board of Directors, and the Board of Directors shall call a special meeting upon written request to the Secretary by stockholders entitled to vote and dispose of at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the outstanding shares of the Corporation. Any such written request must be signed by each requesting holder, stating the number of shares owned by each such holder, and shall specify the purpose of the proposed meeting (including the text of any resolutions proposed for consideration and, in the event that such business includes a proposal to amend these By-Laws or the Certificate of Incorporation, the language of the proposed amendment). Business transacted at any special meeting of stockholders shall be limited to the purposes stated in the notice provided pursuant to Article I, Section 4 of these By-Laws; provided, however, that nothing in these By-Laws shall prohibit the Board of Directors from submitting matters to the stockholders at any special meeting requested by stockholders.
 
All meetings of stockholders shall be held at such place or places, if any, within or without the State of Delaware as may from time to time be fixed by the Board of Directors or as shall be specified or fixed in the respective notices or waivers of notice thereof.
 
Except as otherwise required by statute and as set forth below, notice of each annual or special meeting of stockholders shall be given by the Corporation personally, by mail or by electronic transmission to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date. Except as otherwise required by statute, no publication of any notice of a meeting of stockholders shall be required. Every notice of a meeting of stockholders shall state the place, if any (or the means of remote communication, if any, by which stockholders and proxy holders may be deemed to be present in person), date, and hour of the meeting and, in the case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called (including any purpose set forth in a request by stockholders properly made pursuant to Article I, Section 2 of these By-Laws). Notices are deemed given by the Corporation (i) if by mail, when deposited in the United States mail, postage prepaid, directed to the stockholder at such stockholder's address as it appears on the records of the Corporation, or, if a stockholder shall have filed with the Secretary a written request that notices to such stockholder be mailed to some other address, then directed to such stockholder at such other address; (ii) if by facsimile, when directed to a number at which the stockholder has consented to receive notice; (iii) if by electronic mail, when directed to an electronic mail address at which the stockholder has consented to receive such notice; (iv) if by posting on an electronic network together with a separate notice to the stockholder of such specific posting, upon the later to occur of (A) such posting and (B) the giving of such separate notice of such posting; and (v) if by any other form of electronic transmission, when directed to the stockholder as required by law and, to the extent required by applicable law, in the manner consented to by the stockholder. An affidavit of the mailing or other means of giving any notice of any stockholders' meeting, executed by the Secretary, Assistant Secretary or any transfer agent of the Corporation giving the notice, shall be prima facie evidence of the giving of such notice. Notice shall be deemed to have been given to all stockholders of record who share an address if notice is given in accordance with the "householding" rules set forth in Rule 14a-3(e) under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "Exchange Act"), and Section 233 of the Delaware General Corporation Law. Any previously scheduled meeting of stockholders may be postponed by resolution of the Board of Directors upon public notice given prior to the time previously scheduled for such meeting of stockholders.
 
Whenever any notice is required to be given to any stockholder under the provisions of these By-Laws, the Certificate of Incorporation, or the Delaware General Corporation Law, a waiver thereof in writing signed by the person or persons entitled to such notice or a waiver by electronic transmission, whether before or after the time stated therein, shall be deemed equivalent to the giving of such notice. The attendance of a stockholder at a meeting, in person or by proxy shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when a stockholder attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened.
 
At all meetings of stockholders, except when otherwise provided by applicable law, the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, the presence, in person or by proxy, of the holders of one-third of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and except as otherwise provided by the Certificate of Incorporation, these By-Laws, the rules and regulations of any stock exchange applicable to the Corporation, or applicable law or pursuant to any regulation applicable to the Corporation or its securities, the vote, in person or by proxy, of the holders of a majority of the shares constituting such quorum shall be binding upon all stockholders. In the absence of a quorum, the chairman of the meeting or a majority of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote may adjourn any meeting to another place and time. At any such adjourned meeting at which a quorum shall be present, any business may be transacted which might have been transacted at the meeting as originally called. Unless otherwise provided by statute, no notice of an adjourned meeting need be given.
 
7.1 Appointment.
Each stockholder entitled to vote at a meeting of stockholders or to express consent or dissent to corporate action in writing without a meeting may authorize another person or persons to act for such stockholder by proxy. Such authorization may be accomplished by the stockholder or such stockholder's authorized officer, director, employee, or agent executing a writing or causing his or her signature to be affixed to such writing by any reasonable means, including facsimile signature or by electronic transmission to the intended holder of the proxy or to a proxy solicitation firm, proxy support service, or similar agent duly authorized by the intended proxy holder to receive such transmission.
7.2 Delivery to Corporation; Duration.
A proxy shall be filed with the Secretary before or at the time of the meeting or the delivery to the Corporation of the consent to corporate action in writing. A proxy shall become invalid three (3) years after the date of its execution, unless otherwise provided in the proxy. A proxy with respect to a specified meeting shall entitle the holder thereof to vote at any reconvened meeting following adjournment of such meeting but shall not be valid after the final adjournment thereof. A proxy shall be irrevocable if it states that it is irrevocable and if, and only as long as, it is coupled with an interest sufficient in law to support an irrevocable power. A stockholder may revoke any proxy which is not irrevocable by attending the meeting and voting in person or by delivering to the Secretary a revocation of the proxy or a new proxy bearing a later date.
 
8.1 Appointment.
In advance of any meeting of stockholders, the Board of Directors shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspectors of election at such meeting and any adjournment thereof and to make a written report thereof. The Board of Directors may designate one or more persons to serve as alternate inspectors to serve in place of any inspector who is unable or fails to act. If no inspector or alternate is able to act at a meeting of stockholders, the chairman of such meeting shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspector at such meeting. Inspectors may be employees of the Corporation, but no director or candidate for director may act as an inspector of an election of directors.
 
8.2 Duties.
The inspectors of election shall (a) ascertain the number of shares of the Corporation outstanding and the voting power of each such share; (b) determine the shares represented at the meeting and the validity of proxies and ballots; (c) count all votes and ballots; (d) determine and retain for a reasonable period of time a record of the disposition of any challenges made to any determination by them; and (e) certify their determination of the number of shares represented at the meeting and their count of the votes and ballots. Each inspector shall, before entering upon the discharge of his or her duties, take and sign an oath to faithfully execute the duties of inspector with strict impartiality and according to the best of his or her ability. The inspectors may appoint or retain other persons or entities to assist them in the performance of their duties.
8.3 Determination of Proxy Validity.
The validity of any proxy or ballot executed for a meeting of stockholders shall be determined by the inspectors of election in accordance with the Delaware General Corporation Law.
 
9.1 Meetings.
For the purpose of determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at any meeting of stockholders or any adjournment thereof, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which record date shall be not fewer than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the date of such meeting. If no record date is fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall be at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which notice is given, or, if notice is waived, at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which the meeting is held. A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting; provided, however, that the Board of Directors may fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
9.2 Consent to Corporate Action Without a Meeting.
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which record date shall not be more than ten (10) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days after the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors. Any stockholder of record seeking to have the stockholders authorize or take corporate action by written consent pursuant to Article I, Section 10 of these By-Laws shall, by written notice to the Secretary, request that the Board of Directors fix a record date, which notice shall include the text of any proposed resolutions. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors pursuant to this Section 9.2 or otherwise within ten (10) days of receipt of a valid request by a stockholder, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, when no prior action by the Board of Directors is required pursuant to applicable law, shall be the first date on which a signed written consent setting forth the action taken or proposed to be taken is delivered to the Corporation pursuant to Article I, Section 10 of these By-Laws; provided, however, that if prior action by the Board of Directors is required by applicable law, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting shall in such an event be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution taking such prior action.
9.3 Dividends, Distributions, and Other Rights.
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to receive payment of any dividend or other distribution or allotment of any rights or the stockholders entitled to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion, or exchange of stock, or for the purpose of any other lawful action, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted, and which record
 
date shall be not more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days prior to such action. If no record date is fixed, the record date for determining stockholders for any such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution relating thereto.
9.4 Voting List.
The officer who has charge of the stock ledger shall prepare and make, at least ten (10) days before each meeting of stockholders, a complete list of the stockholders entitled to vote at such meeting, arranged in alphabetical order, and showing the address of each stockholder and the number of shares registered in the name of each stockholder. This list shall be open to examination by any stockholder, for any purpose germane to the meeting, for a period of ten (10) days prior to the meeting, either (i) on a reasonably accessible electronic network, provided that the information required to gain access to such list is provided with the notice of meeting, or (ii) during ordinary business hours at the principal place of business of the Corporation. The list shall also be produced and kept at such meeting for inspection by any stockholder who is present.
 
Subject to the provisions of Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation and Article I, Section 9.2 of these By-Laws, any action which could be taken at any annual or special meeting of stockholders may be taken without a meeting, without prior notice, and without a vote, if a consent or consents in writing, setting forth the action so taken, are (a) signed by the holders of outstanding stock having not fewer than the minimum number of votes that would be necessary to authorize or take such action at a meeting at which all shares entitled to vote thereon were present and voted and (b) delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the records of proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Delivery made to the Corporation's registered office shall be by hand or by certified mail or registered mail, return receipt requested. Every written consent shall bear the date of signature of each stockholder who signs the consent, and no written consent shall be effective to take the corporate action referred to therein unless written consents signed by a sufficient number of stockholders to take such action are delivered to the Corporation, in the manner required by this Section 10, within sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days of the date of the earliest dated consent delivered to the Corporation in the manner required by this Section 10. The validity of any consent executed by a proxy for a stockholder pursuant to an electronic transmission transmitted to such proxy holder by or upon the authorization of the stockholder shall be determined by or at the direction of the Secretary. A written record of the information upon which the person making such determination relied shall be made and kept in the records of the proceedings of the stockholders. Any such consent shall be inserted in the minute book as if it were the minutes of a meeting of stockholders. Prompt notice of the taking of the corporate action without a meeting by less than unanimous written consent shall be given to those stockholders who have not consented in writing.
In the event of the delivery, in the manner provided by this Section 10 and applicable law, to the Corporation of written consent or consents to take corporate action and/or any related revocation or revocations, the Corporation shall engage independent inspectors of election for the purpose of performing promptly a ministerial review of the validity of the consents and revocations. For the purpose of permitting the inspectors to perform such review, no action by written consent and without a meeting shall be effective until such inspectors have completed their review, determined that the requisite number of valid and unrevoked consents delivered to the Corporation in accordance with this Section 10 and applicable law have been obtained to authorize or take the action specified in the consents, and certified such determination for entry in the records of the Corporation kept for the purpose of recording the proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Nothing contained in this Section 10 shall in any way be construed to suggest or imply that the Board of Directors or any stockholder shall not be entitled to contest the validity of any consent or revocation thereof, whether before or after such certification by the independent inspectors, or to take any other action (including, without limitation, the commencement, prosecution or defense of any litigation with respect thereto, and the seeking of injunctive relief in such litigation).
 
11.1 Notice of Nominations and Other Stockholder Business.
A. Annual Meetings of Stockholders.
1. Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors and the proposal of other business to be considered by the stockholders may be made at an annual meeting of stockholders (a) as specified in the Corporation's notice of meeting (or any supplement thereto); (b) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof; or (c) by any stockholder of the Corporation who (i) was a stockholder of record at the time the notice provided for in this By-Law is delivered to the Secretary, (ii) is entitled to vote at the meeting, and (iii) complies with the notice procedures set forth in this By-Law as to such nomination or other business; clause (c) shall be the exclusive means for a stockholder to make nominations or submit proposals for other business (other than matters properly brought under Rule 14a-8 under the Exchange Act and included in the Corporation's proxy statement that has been prepared to solicit proxies for such annual meeting) before an annual meeting of stockholders.
2. Without qualification, for any nominations or any other business to be properly brought before an annual meeting by a stockholder pursuant to Section 11.1.A(1)(c), the stockholder must have given timely notice thereof in writing to the Secretary and any such proposed business (other than the nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors) must constitute a proper matter for stockholder action. To be timely, a stockholder's notice shall be delivered to the Secretary at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not earlier than the close of business on the one hundred and twentieth (120
th
) day and not later than the close of business on the ninetieth (90th) day prior to the first anniversary of the preceding year's annual meeting; provided, however, that in the event that the date of the annual meeting is more than thirty (30) days before or more than seventy (70) days after such anniversary date, notice by the stockholder to be timely must be so delivered not earlier than the close of business on the one hundred and twentieth (120
th
) day prior to such annual meeting and not later than the close of business on the later of the ninetieth (90
th
) day prior to such annual meeting and the tenth (10
th
) day following the day on which public announcement of the date of such annual meeting is first made by the Corporation. In no event shall the adjournment or postponement of an annual meeting (or any public announcement thereof) commence a new time period (or extend any time period) for the giving of a stockholder's notice as described above. To be in proper form, such stockholder's notice (whether given pursuant to this Section 11.1.A(2) or Section 11.1.B) to the Secretary must: (a) set forth, as to the stockholder giving the notice and the beneficial owner, if any, on whose behalf the nomination or proposal for other business is made (i) the name and address of such stockholder, as they appear on the Corporation's books, and of such beneficial owner, if any, (ii) (A) the class or series and number of shares of the Corporation which are, directly or indirectly, owned beneficially and of record by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, (B) a description of any option, warrant, convertible security, stock appreciation right, or similar right with an exercise or conversion privilege or a settlement payment or mechanism at a price related to any class or series of shares of the Corporation or with a value derived in whole or in part from the value of any class or series of shares of the Corporation, whether or not such instrument or right shall be subject to settlement in the underlying class or series of shares of the Corporation or otherwise (a "Derivative Instrument") directly or indirectly owned beneficially by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, and any other direct or indirect opportunity to profit or share in any profit derived from any increase or decrease in the value of shares of the Corporation, (C) a description of any proxy, contract, arrangement, understanding, or relationship pursuant to which such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, has a right to vote any shares of any security of the Corporation, (D) any short interest in any security of the Corporation (for purposes of this By-Law a person shall be deemed to have a short interest in a security if such person directly or indirectly, through any contract, arrangement, understanding, relationship or otherwise, has the opportunity to profit or share in any profit derived from any decrease in the value of the subject security), (E) any rights to dividends on the shares of the Corporation owned beneficially by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, that are separated or separable from the underlying shares of the Corporation, (F) any proportionate interest in shares of the Corporation or Derivative Instruments held, directly or indirectly, by a general or limited partnership in which such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, is a general partner or, directly or indirectly, beneficially owns an interest in a general partner, and (G) any performance-related fees (other than an asset-based fee) that such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, is entitled to based on any increase or decrease in the value of shares of the Corporation or Derivative Instruments, if any, all such information to be provided as of the date of such notice, including, without limitation, any such interests held by members of such stockholder's and such beneficial owner's, if any, immediate
 
family sharing the same household (which information shall be supplemented by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, not later than ten (10) days after the record date for the annual meeting to disclose such ownership as of the record date), (iii) any other information relating to such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, that would be required to be disclosed in a proxy statement or other filings required to be made in connection with solicitations of proxies for, as applicable, the proposal of other business and/or for the election of directors in a contested election pursuant to Section 14 of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, (iv) a representation (A) that the stockholder is a holder of record of stock of the Corporation entitled to vote at such annual meeting and intends to appear in person or by proxy at the annual meeting to propose such business or nomination and (B) whether the stockholder or the beneficial owner, if any, intends or is part of a group which intends (x) to deliver a proxy statement and/or form of proxy to holders of at least the percentage of the Corporation's outstanding capital stock required to approve or adopt the proposal or elect the nominee and/or (y) otherwise to solicit proxies or votes from stockholders in support of such proposal or nomination, and (v) an undertaking by the stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, to notify the Corporation in writing of any change in the information called for by clauses (i), (ii), (iii) and (iv) as of the record date for such meeting, by notice received by the Secretary at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not later than the 10
th
day following such record date; (b) if the notice relates to any business other than the nomination of a director or directors that the stockholder proposes to bring before the annual meeting, set forth (i) a brief description of the business desired to be brought before the annual meeting, the text of the proposal or business (including the text of any resolutions proposed for consideration and in the event that such business includes a proposal to amend these By-Laws, the language of the proposed amendment), the reasons for conducting such business at the annual meeting and any material interest of such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, in such business and (ii) a description of all agreements, arrangements, and understandings between such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, and their respective affiliates and associates, and any other person or persons (including their names) acting in concert therewith in connection with the proposal of such business by such stockholder; (c) set forth, as to each person, if any, whom the stockholder proposes to nominate for election or reelection to the Board of Directors (i) all information relating to such person that would be required to be disclosed in a proxy statement or other filings required to be made in connection with solicitations of proxies for election of directors in a contested election pursuant to Section 14 of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, (ii) such person's written consent to being named in the proxy statement as a nominee and to serving as a director if elected and a statement whether such person, if elected, intends to tender, promptly following such person's election or reelection, an irrevocable resignation effective upon such person's failure to receive the required vote for reelection at the next meeting at which such person would face reelection and upon acceptance of such resignation by the Board of Directors, and (iii) a description of all direct and indirect compensation and other material monetary agreements, arrangements and understandings during the past three (3) years, and any other material relationships, between or among such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, and their respective affiliates and associates, or any other person or persons (including their names) acting in concert therewith, on the one hand, and each proposed nominee, and his or her respective affiliates and associates, or any other person or persons (including their names) acting in concert therewith, on the other hand, including, without limitation, all information that would be required to be disclosed pursuant to Item 404 promulgated under Regulation S-K if the stockholder making the nomination and any beneficial owner on whose behalf the nomination is made, if any, or any affiliate or associate thereof or person acting in concert therewith, were the "registrant" for purposes of such rule and the nominee were a director or executive officer of such registrant; and (d) with respect to each nominee for election or reelection to the Board of Directors, include the completed and signed questionnaire, representation and agreement required by Section 11.3. The Corporation may require any proposed nominee to furnish such other information as may reasonably be required by the Corporation to determine the eligibility of such proposed nominee to serve as an independent director of the Corporation or that could be material to a reasonable stockholder's understanding of the independence, or lack thereof, of such nominee.
3. Notwithstanding anything in the second sentence of Section 11.1.A(2) to the contrary, in the event that the number of directors to be elected to the Board of Directors at the annual meeting of stockholders is increased effective after the time period for which nominations would otherwise be due under Section 11.1.A(2) and there is no public announcement by the Corporation naming all of the nominees for the additional directorships at least one hundred (100) days prior to the first anniversary of the preceding year's annual meeting, a stockholder's notice required by this By-Law shall also be considered timely, but only with respect to nominees for any new positions created by such increase, if it shall be delivered to the Secretary at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not later than the close of business on the tenth (10
th
) day following the day on which such public announcement is first made by the Corporation.
 
B. Special Meetings of Stockholders.
Only such business shall be conducted at a special meeting of stockholders as shall have been brought before the special meeting pursuant to the Corporation's notice of meeting. Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors may be made at a special meeting at which directors are to be elected pursuant to the Corporation's notice of special meeting (a) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof or stockholders pursuant to Article 1, Section 2 hereof, or (b) provided that the Board of Directors or stockholders pursuant to Article 1, Section 2 hereof has determined that directors shall be elected at such special meeting, by any stockholder of the Corporation who (i) is a stockholder of record at the time the notice provided for in this By-Law is delivered to the Secretary and at the time of the special meeting, (ii) is entitled to vote at the special meeting, and (iii) complies with the notice procedures set forth in this By-Law (including the information requirements in Section 11.1.A(2)) as to such nomination. For the avoidance of doubt, the foregoing clause (b) of this Section 11.1.B shall be the exclusive means for a stockholder to propose nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors at a special meeting of stockholders at which directors are to be elected. In the event the Corporation calls a special meeting for the purpose of electing one or more directors to the Board of Directors, any such stockholder may nominate a person or persons (as the case may be) for election to such position(s) as specified in the Corporation's notice of meeting, if the stockholder's notice required by Section 11.1.A(2) (including the completed and signed questionnaire, representation and agreement required by Section 11.3) shall be delivered to the Secretary at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not earlier than the close of business on the one hundred and twentieth (120th) day prior to such special meeting and not later than the close of business on the later of the ninetieth (90th) day prior to such special meeting and the tenth (10th) day following the day on which public announcement is first made of the date of the special meeting and of the nominees proposed by the Board of Directors to be elected at such special meeting. In no event shall the adjournment or postponement of a special meeting as to which notice has been sent to stockholders, or any public announcement with respect thereto, commence a new time period (or extend any time period) for the giving of a stockholder's notice as described above.
C. General.
1. Only such persons who are nominated in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law shall be eligible to be elected as directors at an annual or special meeting of stockholders or to serve as directors and only such business shall be conducted at a meeting of stockholders as shall have been brought before the meeting in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law. Except as otherwise provided by law, the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, the chairman of the meeting shall have the power and duty (a) to determine whether a nomination or any other business proposed to be brought before the meeting was made or proposed, as the case may be, in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law (including whether the stockholder or beneficial owner, if any, on whose behalf the nomination or proposal is made solicited (or is part of a group which solicited) or did not so solicit, as the case may be, proxies in support of such stockholder's nominee or proposal in compliance with such stockholder's representation as required by Section 11.1.A(2)(a)(iv)) and (b) if any proposed nomination or business was not made or proposed in compliance with this By-Law, to declare that such nomination shall be disregarded or that such proposed business shall not be transacted. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this By-Law, unless otherwise required by law, if the stockholder (or a qualified representative of the stockholder) does not appear at the annual or special meeting of stockholders of the Corporation to present a nomination or proposed business, such nomination shall be disregarded and such proposed business shall not be transacted, notwithstanding that proxies in respect of such vote may have been received by the Corporation. For purposes of this By-Law, to be considered a qualified representative of the stockholder, a person must be a duly authorized officer, manager, or partner of such stockholder or must be authorized by a writing executed by such stockholder or an electronic transmission delivered by such stockholder to act for such stockholder as proxy at the annual or special meeting and such person must produce such writing or electronic transmission, or a reliable reproduction of the writing or electronic transmission, at the annual or special meeting.
2. For purposes of this By-Law, "public announcement" shall mean disclosure in a press release reported by the Dow Jones News Service, Associated Press, or comparable national news service or in a document publicly filed by the Corporation with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to Section 13, 14 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.
 
3. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this By-Law, a stockholder shall also comply with all applicable requirements of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder with respect to the matters set forth in this By-Law; provided, however, that any references in these By-Laws to the Exchange Act or to the rules or regulations promulgated thereunder are not intended to and shall not limit the requirements applicable to any nominations or proposals as to any other business to be considered pursuant to this By-Law (including Section 11.1.A(1)(c) or Section 11.1.B). Nothing in this By-Law shall be deemed to affect any rights (a) of stockholders to request inclusion of proposals in the Corporation's proxy statement pursuant to Rule 14a-8 under the Exchange Act or (b) of the holders of any series of Preferred Stock if and to the extent provided for under law, the Certificate of Incorporation, or these By-Laws.
.
11.2 Required Vote for Directors
A nominee for director shall be elected to the Board of Directors if the votes cast for such nominee's election exceed the votes cast against such nominee's election; provided, however, that the directors shall be elected by a plurality of the votes cast at any meeting of stockholders for which (i) the Secretary receives a notice that a stockholder has nominated a person for election to the Board of Directors in compliance with the advance notice requirements for stockholder nominees for director set forth in Section 11.1 and (ii) such nomination has not been withdrawn by such stockholder on or prior to the tenth day preceding the date the Corporation first mails its notice of meeting for such meeting to stockholders. If directors are to be elected by a plurality of the votes cast, stockholders shall not be permitted to vote against a nominee. Votes cast shall exclude abstentions with respect to that director's election.
.
11.3 Director Qualification: Submission of Questionnaire, Representation, and Agreement
To be eligible to be a nominee for election or reelection as a director of the Corporation, a person must deliver (in accordance with the time periods prescribed for delivery of notice under Section 11.1) to the Secretary at the principal executive offices of the Corporation a written questionnaire with respect to the background and qualification of such person and the background of any other person or entity on whose behalf the nomination is being made (which questionnaire shall be provided by the Secretary upon written request) and a written representation and agreement (in the form provided by the Secretary upon written request), that such person (a) is not and will not become a party to (i) any agreement, arrangement, or understanding with, and has not given any commitment or assurance to, any person or entity as to how such person, if elected as a director of the Corporation, will act or vote on any issue or question (a "Voting Commitment") that has not been disclosed to the Corporation or (ii) any Voting Commitment that could limit or interfere with such person's ability to comply, if elected as a director of the Corporation, with such person's fiduciary duties under applicable law; (b) is not and will not become a party to any agreement, arrangement, or understanding with any person or entity other than the Corporation with respect to any direct or indirect compensation, reimbursement, or indemnification in connection with service or action as a director that has not been disclosed therein; and (c) in such person's individual capacity and on behalf of any person or entity on whose behalf the nomination is being made, would be in compliance, if elected as a director of the Corporation, and will comply with all applicable publicly disclosed corporate governance, ethics, conflict of interest, confidentiality and stock ownership and trading policies and guidelines of the Corporation.
 
Any written notice or consent required to be delivered by a stockholder to the Corporation pursuant to Sections 9.2 or 11.1 of this Article I or Section 2.1 of Article II must be given, either by personal delivery or by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, to the Secretary at the Corporation's executive offices in the City of Chicago, State of Illinois.
 
The Chairman of the Board of Directors or, in the Chairman's absence, a Director or officer as a majority of the members of the Board may designate shall act as chairman of meetings of stockholders. The Secretary shall act as secretary of meetings of stockholders, but in his or her absence the chairman of the meeting may appoint any
 
person to act as secretary of the meeting. Except to the extent inconsistent with any rules and regulations for the conduct of any meeting of stockholders as adopted by the Board of Directors, the chairman of any meeting of stockholders shall have the right and authority to convene and (for any or no reason) to adjourn the meeting, to prescribe such rules, regulations and procedures and to do all such acts as, in the judgment of such chairman, are appropriate for the proper conduct of the meeting.
 
The number of directors shall be eleven (11), but the number may be increased, or decreased to not less than three (3), from time to time, by the directors or stockholders by amendment of these By-Laws in accordance with Article VIII. At each annual meeting of stockholders, each director shall be elected to hold office until the next annual meeting or until his or her successor shall be elected and qualified or until his or her earlier death, disqualification, resignation or removal.
 
.
2.1
Nomination
Only persons who are nominated in accordance with Article I, Section 11 of these By-Laws shall be eligible for election as directors.
2.2 Election.
At each election of directors by stockholders, the persons who are elected in accordance with Article I, Section 11 of these By-Laws shall be the directors.
 
Meetings of the Board of Directors, or of any committee thereof, may be held within or without the State of Delaware.
 
Each year the Board of Directors shall meet in connection with the annual meeting of stockholders for the purpose of electing officers and for the transaction of other business. No notice of such annual meeting of the Board of Directors is required. Such annual meeting may be held at any other time or place which shall be specified in a notice given as hereinafter provided for special meetings of the Board of Directors, or in a consent and waiver of notice thereof, signed by all the directors.
 
The Board of Directors may, by resolution adopted by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors, from time to time appoint the time and place for holding stated meetings of the Board of Directors, if by it deemed advisable; and such stated meetings shall thereupon be held at the time and place so appointed, without the giving of any special notice with regard thereto. Except as otherwise provided in these By-Laws, any and all business may be transacted at any stated meeting.
 
6.1 Convenors and Notice.
Special meetings of the Board of Directors may be called by or at the request of the Chairman of the Board of Directors or any two (2) directors. Notice of a special meeting of the Board of Directors, stating the place, day, and hour of the meeting, shall be given to each director in writing (by mail, electronic transmission or personal delivery) or orally (by telephone or in person).
 
6.2 Waiver of Notice.
With respect to a special meeting of the Board of Directors, a written waiver signed by a director or waiver by electronic transmission shall be deemed equivalent to notice to that director. A director's attendance at a meeting shall constitute that director's waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the director attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting was not lawfully called or convened. Neither the business to be transacted at, nor the purpose of, any regular or special meeting of the Board of Directors need be specified in the waiver of notice of such meeting.
 
Except as herein otherwise provided, forty percent (40%) of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided for in these By-Laws at the time of any stated or special meeting of the Board of Directors or, if vacancies exist on the Board of Directors, forty percent (40%) of such number of directors then in office; provided, however, that such number may not be less than one-third of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided for in these By-Laws, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and, except as otherwise required by statute, the Certificate of Incorporation, or these By-Laws, the act of a majority of the directors present at any such meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of the Board of Directors. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the directors present may adjourn any meeting, from time to time, until a quorum is present. No notice of any adjourned meeting need be given.
 
The Chairman of the Board shall preside, when present, at all meetings of the Board of Directors, except as otherwise provided by law.
 
Any director may resign at any time by giving written notice or notice by electronic transmission thereof to the Secretary. Such resignation shall take effect at the time specified therefor or if the time is not specified, upon delivery thereof; and, unless otherwise specified with respect thereto, the acceptance of such resignation shall not be necessary to make it effective.
 
Any director may be removed with or without cause by the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, at a meeting of stockholders called for that purpose; and the vacancy on the Board of Directors caused by any such removal may be filled by the stockholders at such meeting or at any subsequent meeting.
 
In case of any increase in the number of directors, or of any vacancy created by death, disqualification, or resignation, the additional director or directors may be elected or, as the case may be, the vacancy or vacancies may be filled, either (a) by the affirmative vote of a majority of the remaining directors, even if less than a quorum or (b) by the stockholders entitled to vote, either at an annual meeting or at a special meeting thereof called for that purpose, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the outstanding shares entitled to vote at such meeting.
 
The Board of Directors shall have authority to determine from time to time the amount of compensation that shall be paid to its members for their service on the Board of Directors or any committee thereof.
 
Any action required or permitted to be taken at any meeting of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof may be taken without a meeting if all members of the Board of Directors or committee, as the case may be, consent thereto in writing or by electronic transmission, and the writings or electronic transmissions are filed with the minutes of proceedings of the Board of Directors or committee.
 
Members of the Board of Directors, or any committee designated by the Board of Directors, may participate in a meeting thereof by means of conference telephone or other communications equipment by means of which all persons participating in the meeting can hear each other, and participation in a meeting by such means shall constitute presence in person at such meeting.
 
In addition to any committees appointed pursuant to Section 2 of this Article, there shall be an Audit Committee, appointed annually by the Board of Directors, consisting of at least three (3) directors who are not members of management. It shall be the responsibility of the Audit Committee to review the scope and results of the annual independent audit of books and records of the Corporation and its subsidiaries and to discharge such other responsibilities as may from time to time be assigned to it by the Board of Directors. The Audit Committee shall meet at such times and places as the members deem advisable, and shall make such recommendations to the Board of Directors as they consider appropriate.
 
2.1 Committee Powers.
The Board of Directors may appoint standing or temporary committees and invest such committees with such powers as it may see fit, with power to subdelegate such powers if deemed desirable by the Board of Directors; but no such committee shall have the power or authority of the Board of Directors to adopt, amend, or repeal these By-Laws or approve, adopt, or recommend to the stockholders any action or matter expressly required by the Certificate of Incorporation, these By-Laws or the Delaware General Corporation Law to be submitted to stockholders for approval.
2.2 Committee Members.
The Board of Directors may designate one or more directors as alternate members of any committee, who may replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of the committee. In the absence or disqualification of a member of a committee, the member or members thereof present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, whether or not such member or members constitute a quorum, may unanimously appoint another member of the Board of Directors to act at the meeting in the place of any such absent or disqualified member.
 
A majority of the number of directors composing any committee of the Board of Directors, as established and fixed by resolution of the Board of Directors, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at any meeting of such committee but, if less than a majority are present at a meeting, a majority of such directors present may adjourn the meeting from time to time without further notice. The act of a majority of the members of a committee present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of such committee.
 
 
The elected officers shall be a Chairman of the Board of Directors (who shall be a director) and, at the discretion of the Board of Directors, a President (who shall be a director), and one or more Vice Presidents (each of whom may be assigned by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer an additional title descriptive of the functions assigned to such officer and one or more of whom may be designated Executive or Senior Vice President). The Board of Directors may also elect one or more Vice Chairmen. The Board of Directors shall also designate either the Chairman of the Board of Directors or the President as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation. The Board of Directors shall appoint a Controller, a Secretary, and a Treasurer. Any number of offices, whether elective or appointive, may be held by the same person. The Chief Executive Officer may, by a writing filed with the Secretary, designate titles as officers for employees and agents and appoint Assistant Secretaries and Assistant Treasurers as, from time to time, may appear to be necessary or advisable in the conduct of the affairs of the Corporation and may, in the same manner, terminate or change such titles.
 
So far as practicable, all elected officers shall be elected at the annual meeting of the Board of Directors in each year, and shall hold office until the annual meeting of the Board of Directors in the next subsequent year and until their respective successors are elected. The Controller, Secretary, and Treasurer shall hold office at the pleasure of the Board of Directors.
 
The salaries paid to the elected officers of the Corporation shall be authorized or approved by the Board of Directors.
 
None of the officers, directors, or employees of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations shall at any time be paid any bonus or share in the earnings or profits of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations except pursuant to a plan approved by affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members of the Board of Directors.
 
Any elected or appointed officer may be removed at any time, either for or without cause, by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors, at any meeting called for the purpose.
 
If any vacancy occurs in any office, the Board of Directors may elect or appoint a successor to fill such vacancy for the remainder of the term.
 
The Chairman of the Board of Directors shall preside, when present, at all meetings of stockholders and at all meetings of the Board of Directors, in each case except as required by law. The Chairman shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation; to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the Chairman by the Board of Directors.
 
The President shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation; to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; during the absence or disability of the Chairman of the Board of Directors, to exercise the Chairman's powers and to perform the Chairman's duties; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the President by the Board of Directors; provided, that if the office of President is vacant, the Chairman shall exercise the duties ordinarily exercised by the President until such time as a President is elected or appointed.
 
The officer designated by the Board of Directors as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation shall have general and active control of its business and affairs. The Chief Executive Officer shall have general power to appoint or designate all employees and agents of the Corporation whose appointment or designation is not otherwise provided for and to fix the compensation thereof, subject to the provisions of these By-Laws; to remove or suspend any employee or agent who shall not have been elected or appointed by the Board of Directors or other body; to suspend for cause any employee, agent, or officer, other than an elected officer, pending final action by the body which shall have appointed such employee, agent, or officer; and to exercise all the powers usually pertaining to the office held by the Chief Executive Officer of a corporation.
 
The several Vice Presidents and the Controller shall perform all such duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of them, from time to time, by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer, respectively.
 
The Secretary shall attend to the giving of notice of all meetings of stockholders and of the Board of Directors and shall keep and attest true records of all such proceedings. The Secretary shall have charge of the corporate seal and have authority to attest any and all instruments or writings to which the same may be affixed and shall keep and account for all books, documents, papers, and records of the Corporation relating to its corporate organization. The Secretary shall have authority to sign stock certificates and shall generally perform all the duties usually pertaining to the office of secretary of a corporation. In the absence of the Secretary, an Assistant Secretary or Secretary pro tempore shall perform the duties of the Secretary.
 
The Treasurer shall have the care and custody of all moneys, funds, and securities of the Corporation, and shall deposit or cause to be deposited all funds of the Corporation in accordance with directions or authorizations of the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer. The Treasurer shall have power to sign stock certificates, to indorse for deposit or collection, or otherwise, all checks, drafts, notes, bills of exchange, or other commercial paper payable to the Corporation, and to give proper receipts or discharges therefor. In the absence of the Treasurer, an Assistant Treasurer shall perform the duties of the Treasurer.
 
In addition to the foregoing especially enumerated duties and powers, the several officers of the Corporation shall perform such other duties and exercise such further powers as may be provided in these By-Laws or as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine, or as may be assigned to them by any superior officer.
 
If, as a result of a disaster or other state of emergency, the Chief Executive Officer is unable to perform the duties of that office, (a) the powers and duties of the Chief Executive Officer shall be performed by the officer designated as Chief Financial Officer of the Corporation, provided that such officer is available and capable of performing such powers and duties, until the Chief Executive Officer becomes capable of performing those duties or until the Board of Directors shall have elected a new Chief Executive Officer or designated another individual as Acting Chief
 
Executive Officer; (b) such officer shall have the power in addition to all other powers granted to the Chief Executive Officer by these By-Laws and by the Board of Directors to appoint an acting President, acting Vice President - Finance, acting Controller, acting Secretary, and acting Treasurer, if any of the persons duly elected to any such office is not, by reason of such disaster or emergency, able to perform the duties of such office, each of such acting appointees to serve in such capacities until the officer for whom the appointee is acting becomes capable of performing the duties of such office or until the Board of Directors shall have designated another individual to perform such duties or have elected another person to fill such office; (c) any such acting officer so appointed shall be entitled to exercise all powers vested by these By-Laws or the Board of Directors in the duly elected officer for whom the acting officer is acting; and (d) anyone transacting business with the Corporation may rely upon a certification by any two (2) officers of the Corporation that a specified individual has succeeded to the powers of the Chief Executive Officer and that such person has appointed other acting officers as herein provided and any person, firm, corporation, or other entity to which such certification has been delivered by such officers may continue to rely upon it until notified of a change in writing signed by two (2) officers of the Corporation.
 
The shares of the stock of the Corporation shall be represented by certificates, provided that the Board of Directors may provide by resolution or resolutions that some or all of any or all classes or series of stock shall be uncertificated shares. Any such resolution shall not apply to shares represented by certificate until such certificate is surrendered to the Corporation. Every holder of stock of the Corporation represented by a certificate shall be entitled to a certificate, signed by the Chairman of the Board or the President or a Vice President and the Treasurer or an Assistant Treasurer or the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary, certifying the number of shares owned by the stockholder in the Corporation. Any and all of the signatures on a certificate may be a facsimile. If any officer, transfer agent, or registrar who has signed or whose facsimile signature has been placed upon a certificate shall have ceased to be such officer, transfer agent, or registrar before such certificate is issued, it may be issued by the Corporation with the same effect as if he or she were such officer, transfer agent, or registrar at the date of issue.
 
The Board of Directors may, in its discretion, appoint responsible banks or trust companies in the Borough of Manhattan, in the City of New York, State of New York, or in such other city or cities as the Board of Directors may deem advisable, from time to time, to act as transfer agents and registrars of the stock of the Corporation; and, when such appointments shall have been made, no stock certificate shall be valid until countersigned by one of such transfer agents and registered by one of such registrars.
 
Shares of stock may be transferred by delivery of the certificates therefor, accompanied either by an assignment in writing on the back of the certificates or by written power of attorney to sell, assign, and transfer the same, signed by the record holder thereof (or, with respect to uncertificated shares, by delivery of duly executed instructions or in any other manner permitted by law), but no transfer shall affect the right of the Corporation to pay any dividend upon the stock to the holder of record thereof, or to treat the holder of record as the holder in fact thereof for all purposes, and no transfer shall be valid, except between the parties thereto, until such transfer shall have been made upon the books of the Corporation.
 
The Board of Directors may provide for the issuance of new certificates of stock or uncertificated shares to replace certificates of stock lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, or alleged to be lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, upon such terms and in accordance with such procedures as the Board of Directors shall deem proper and prescribe.
 
 
The fiscal year of the Corporation shall be the calendar year.
 
 
All bills, notes, checks, or other instruments for the payment of money shall be signed or countersigned by such officer or officers and in such manner as from time to time may be prescribed by resolution (whether general or special) of the Board of Directors.
 
4.1
Right to Indemnification.
Each person who was or is made a party to or is threatened to be made a party to or is otherwise involved (including, without limitation, as a witness) in any actual or threatened action, suit, or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative, or investigative (hereinafter a "proceeding"), by reason of the fact that he or she is or was a director or officer of the Corporation or that, being or having been such a director or officer or an employee of the Corporation, he or she is or was serving at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation as a director, officer, employee, or agent of another corporation or of a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise, including service with respect to an employee benefit plan (hereinafter an "indemnitee"), whether the basis of such proceeding is alleged action in an official capacity as such a director, officer, employee, or agent or in any other capacity while serving as such a director, officer, employee, or agent, shall be indemnified and held harmless by the Corporation to the full extent permitted by the Delaware General Corporation Law, as the same exists or may hereafter be amended (but, in the case of any such amendment, only to the extent that such amendment permits the Corporation to provide broader indemnification rights than permitted prior thereto), or by other applicable law as then in effect, against all expense, liability, and loss (including attorneys' fees, judgments, fines, ERISA excise taxes or penalties, and amounts paid in settlement) actually and reasonably incurred or suffered by such indemnitee in connection therewith, and such indemnification shall continue as to an indemnitee who has ceased to be a director, officer, employee, or agent and shall inure to the benefit of the indemnitee's heirs, executors, and administrators; provided, however, that except as provided in Article VII, Section 4.2 with respect to proceedings seeking to enforce rights to indemnification, the Corporation shall indemnify any such indemnitee in connection with a proceeding (or part thereof) initiated by such indemnitee only if such proceeding (or part thereof) was authorized or ratified by the Board of Directors. The right to indemnification conferred in this Section 4.1 shall be a contract right and shall include the right to be paid by the Corporation the expenses incurred in defending any such proceeding in advance of its final disposition (hereinafter an "advancement of expenses"); provided, however, that an advancement of expenses incurred by an indemnitee in his or her capacity as a director or officer or former director or officer (and not in any other capacity in which service was or is rendered by such indemnitee, including, without limitation, service to an employee benefit plan) shall be made only upon delivery to the Corporation of an undertaking (hereinafter an "undertaking"), by or on behalf of such indemnitee, to repay all amounts so advanced if it shall ultimately be determined by final judicial decision from which there is no further right to appeal that such indemnitee is not entitled to be indemnified for such expenses under this Section 4.1 or otherwise; and provided, further, that an advancement of expenses shall not be made if the Board of Directors makes a good faith determination that such payment would violate law or public policy.
4.2
Right of Indemnitee to Bring Suit.
If a claim under Article VII, Section 4.1 is not paid in full by the Corporation within sixty (60) days after a written claim has been received by the Corporation, except in the case of a claim for an advancement of expenses, in which case the applicable period shall be twenty (20) days, the indemnitee may at any time thereafter bring suit against the Corporation to recover the unpaid amount of the claim. If successful in whole or in part in any such suit, or in a suit
 
brought by the Corporation to recover an advancement of expenses pursuant to the terms of an undertaking, the indemnitee shall also be entitled to be paid the expenses of prosecuting or defending such suit. The indemnitee shall be presumed to be entitled to indemnification under this Section 4 upon submission of a written claim (and, in an action brought to enforce a claim for an advancement of expenses, where the required undertaking has been tendered to the Corporation), and thereafter the Corporation shall have the burden of proof to overcome the presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled. Neither the failure of the Corporation (including the Board of Directors, independent legal counsel, or the stockholders) to have made a determination prior to the commencement of such suit that indemnification of the indemnitee is proper in the circumstances, nor an actual determination by the Corporation (including the Board of Directors, independent legal counsel, or the stockholders) that the indemnitee is not entitled to indemnification shall be a defense to the suit or create a presumption that the indemnitee is not so entitled.
4.3 Nonexclusivity of Rights.
The rights to indemnification and to the advancement of expenses conferred in this Section 4 shall not be exclusive of any other right that any person may have or hereafter acquire under any statute, provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation, these By-Laws, any agreement, vote of stockholders or disinterested directors, or otherwise. Neither any amendment to or repeal of this Section 4 or of any of the procedures established by the Board of Directors pursuant to Article VII, Section 4.7, nor the adoption of any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, nor, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any modification of law, shall eliminate or reduce the effect of the right or protection of any indemnitee to indemnification and to the advancement of expenses in accordance with the provisions hereof and thereof with respect to any proceeding (regardless of when such proceeding is first threatened, commenced or completed) arising out of, or related to, any acts or omissions of such indemnitee occurring prior to such amendment or repeal.
.
4.4 Insurance, Contracts, and Funding
The Corporation may maintain insurance, at its expense, to protect itself and any director, officer, employee, or agent of the Corporation or another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise against any expense, liability, or loss, whether or not the Corporation would have the power to indemnify such person against such expense, liability, or loss under the Delaware General Corporation Law. The Corporation may, without further stockholder approval, enter into contracts with any indemnitee in furtherance of the provisions of this Section 4 and may create a trust fund, grant a security interest, or use other means (including, without limitation, a letter of credit) to ensure the payment of such amounts as may be necessary to effect indemnification as provided in this Section 4.
.
4.5 Persons Serving Other Entities
Any person who is or was a director, officer, or employee of the Corporation who is or was serving (i) as a director or officer of another corporation of which a majority of the shares entitled to vote in the election of its directors is held by the Corporation or (ii) in an executive or management capacity in a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise of which the Corporation or a wholly owned subsidiary of the Corporation is a general partner or has a majority ownership shall be deemed to be so serving at the request of an executive officer of the Corporation and entitled to indemnification and advancement of expenses under Article VII, Section 4.1.
4.6 Indemnification of Employees and Agents of the Corporation.
The Corporation may, by action of the Board of Directors, authorize one or more executive officers to grant rights to advancement of expenses to employees or agents of the Corporation on such terms and conditions as such officer or officers deem appropriate under the circumstances. The Corporation may, by action of the Board of Directors, grant rights to indemnification and advancement of expenses to employees or agents or groups of employees or agents of the Corporation with the same scope and effect as the provisions of this Section 4 with respect to the indemnification and advancement of expenses of directors and officers of the Corporation; provided, however, that an undertaking shall be made by an employee or agent only if required by the Board of Directors.
 
4.7 Procedures for the Submission of Claims.
The Board of Directors may establish reasonable procedures for the submission of claims for indemnification pursuant to this Section 4, determination of the entitlement of any person thereto, and review of any such determination.
 
With respect to any action arising out of any act or omission occurring after the adoption of this By-Law, unless the Corporation consents in writing to the selection of an alternative forum, the Court of Chancery of the State of Delaware shall be the sole and exclusive forum for (i) any derivative action or proceeding brought on behalf of the Corporation, (ii) any action asserting a claim of breach of a fiduciary duty owed by any director, officer or other employee of the Corporation to the Corporation or the Corporation's stockholders, (iii) any action asserting a claim arising pursuant to any provision of the Delaware General Corporation Law, the Certificate of Incorporate or these By-Laws, or (iv) any action asserting a claim governed by the internal affairs doctrine, in each case subject to the Court of Chancery of the State of Delaware having personal jurisdiction over the indispensable parties named as defendants therein.
 
Except as herein otherwise expressly provided, these By-Laws may be altered or repealed in any particular and new By-Laws, not inconsistent with any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or any provision of law, may be adopted, either by
A. the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority in number of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote at an annual meeting of stockholders or at a special meeting thereof, the notice of which special meeting shall include the form of the proposed alteration or repeal or of the proposed new By-Laws, or a summary thereof; or
B. either by
i. the affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors at any meeting thereof (or in accordance with Article II, Section 13), or
ii. the affirmative vote of all the directors present at any meeting at which a quorum, less than a majority, is present;
provided that Article I, Section 11.2 of these By-Laws may be amended only as set forth in Section 1.A of this By-Law, except that any amendment required by law or necessary or desirable to cure an administrative or technical deficiency may be made as provided in Section 1.B of this By-Law.
 
Notwithstanding anything contained in these By-Laws to the contrary, the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the Voting Stock, as defined in Article FOURTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, at a meeting of stockholders called for the purpose, shall be required to alter, amend, repeal, or adopt any provision inconsistent with Sections 3, 4 and 5 of Article IV of these By-Laws, notice of which meeting shall include the form of the proposed amendment, or a summary thereof.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20120626165953.txt.gz
TIME:20120626165953
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On June 26, 2012, The Boeing Company (the "Company") issued a press release, a copy of which is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1, announcing the election of Raymond L. Conner as Executive Vice President, President and Chief Executive Officer, Boeing Commercial Airplanes, effective immediately. Mr. Conner replaces James F. Albaugh in that position. Mr. Albaugh has announced that he will retire from the Company on October 1, 2012.
Mr. Conner, 57, has served as the Company's Senior Vice President of Sales and Customer Support, Boeing Commercial Airplanes since August 2011. Prior to that, he served as the Company's Vice President and General Manager, Supply Chain Management and Operations, Boeing Commercial Airplanes from December 2008 until August 2011. From December 2007 until December 2008, Mr. Conner served as Vice President of Sales, Boeing Commercial Airplanes. Prior to that, between February 2003 and December 2007, Mr. Conner was Vice President of Sales (Americas), Boeing Commercial Airplanes.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: June 26, 2012
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Boeing Executive Ray Conner to Lead Commercial Airplanes Business
 
CHICAGO, June 26, 2012  Boeing Chairman, President and CEO Jim McNerney today announced the appointment of Raymond L. Conner as president and CEO, Boeing Commercial Airplanes.
Conner, 57, a 34-year company veteran who began his career as an airplane mechanic, moves to the leadership post from senior vice president, Sales and Customer Support for Commercial Airplanes. He replaces James F. Albaugh, 62, who has announced he will retire from the company October 1, after 37 years of service.
"Ray's breadth and depth of experience in commercial airplanes is unmatched in our industry," said McNerney. "He has built airplanes, sold airplanes, serviced airplanes, managed our largest programs, knows our customers extremely well, and is respected by our employees. He is the natural next leader of our growing commercial airplanes business and this move is consistent with our executive succession plan."
Prior to leading global Sales and Customer Support, Conner served as vice president of Supply Chain Management and Operations, where he was responsible for business conducted with thousands of global suppliers, as well as the performance of the company's in-house manufacturing, quality, fabrication and propulsion systems divisions. This assignment included overseeing development of Boeing's new production and assembly facilities in South Carolina.
Among many other leadership roles held during his career, Conner also served as vice president and general manager of the 777 and 747 programs, and vice president of sales for the Americas and Asia-Pacific regions. Last year, he played a lead role in negotiating a landmark, four-year contract extension with Boeing's largest union. Conner joined Boeing in 1977 as a mechanic on the 727 program.
Albaugh joined Boeing in 1975 in what was then Rockwell Corporation's defense and space business, which Boeing acquired in 1996. During his career, he served as president of Rocketdyne Propulsion & Power, president and CEO of Boeing Space and Communications, and president and CEO of Boeing Integrated Defense Systems. He will continue to report to McNerney while assisting with the transition to Conner until the effective date of his retirement.
"We thank Jim for his many years of service in our defense, space and security businesses and, most recently, to Boeing Commercial Airplanes where he helped ensure the certification and successful entry into service of the 787 Dreamliner and 747-8, and the launch of the 737 MAX," said McNerney.
The leadership change is effective immediately. A replacement for Conner will be named at a later date.
Editor's note: Biographies and photos of these Boeing executives can be found at .
http://www.boeing.com/companyoffices/aboutus/execprofiles/index.html
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20120725074439.txt.gz
TIME:20120725074439
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
(a) On July 25, 2012, The Boeing Company issued a press release reporting its financial results for the second quarter of 2012. A copy of the Company's press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
(a) Not applicable
(b) Not applicable
(c) Not applicable
(d) Exhibits
99.1    Press Release issued by The Boeing Company dated July 25, 2012, reporting Boeing's financial results for the second quarter of 2012, furnished herewith.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Boeing Reports Second-Quarter Results and Raises 2012 EPS Guidance
 
 
 
 
 
 
Table 1. Summary Financial Results
 
 
* Non-GAAP measure. Complete definitions of Boeing's use of non-GAAP measures, identified by an asterisk (*), are found on page 7, "Non-GAAP Measure Disclosures."
 The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] reported that second-quarter net income rose to $1.0 billion, or $1.27 per share, on revenue of $20.0 billion. Earnings per share rose 2 percent, reflecting continued strong core performance across the company's businesses, which more than offset higher pension expense (Table 1). Earnings per share guidance for 2012 increased to between $4.40 and $4.60 reflecting the strong core operating performance. The company also increased its revenue guidance to between $79.5 and $81.5 billion on higher Defense, Space & Security revenues, and reaffirmed its 2012 operating cash flow outlook.
CHICAGO, July 25, 2012
"Increased revenues and strong operating performance across both our major businesses drove significantly improved first-half 2012 results for Boeing," said Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer Jim McNerney. "Commercial airplane
 
deliveries increased 27 percent in the second quarter, and our defense, space and security business also produced higher revenues and strong margins in a difficult market environment. As a result of this solid first-half performance, we have strengthened our outlook for the year, and our people remain focused on disciplined execution, quality and productivity, and meeting customer commitments," McNerney said.
Table 2. Cash Flow
 
Boeing's quarterly operating cash flow before pension contributions* was $1.7 billion. Operating cash flow was $0.9 billion, with higher commercial airplane deliveries and strong operating performance more than offsetting continued investment in the 787 program and discretionary pension funding. Free cash flow* was $0.6 billion in the quarter (Table 2).
Table 3. Cash, Marketable Securities and Debt Balances
 
 
Marketable securities consists primarily of time deposits due within one year classified as "short-term investments."
1
Cash and investments in marketable securities totaled $10.3 billion at quarter-end (Table 3), down from $10.5 billion at the beginning of the quarter. Debt was $11.2 billion, down from $11.6 billion at the beginning of the quarter.
Total company backlog at quarter-end was $374 billion, down from $380 billion at the beginning of the quarter, and included net orders for the quarter of $13 billion.
 
Segment Results
Commercial Airplanes
Table 4. Commercial Airplanes Operating Results
 
Boeing Commercial Airplanes second-quarter revenue increased by 34 percent to $11.8 billion on higher delivery volume. Operating margin was 10.2 percent, reflecting higher period costs and the dilutive impact of 787 and 747-8 deliveries partially offset by the higher deliveries and lower R&D (Table 4).
During the quarter, final assembly of the first 787 built in South Carolina was completed and the first 747-8 Intercontinental passenger airplane was delivered.
Commercial Airplanes booked 28 net orders during the quarter. Backlog remains strong with approximately 4,000 airplanes valued at $302 billion.
 
Boeing Defense, Space & Security
Table 5. Defense, Space & Security Operating Results
 
Boeing Defense, Space & Security's second-quarter revenue increased to $8.2 billion, while operating margin was 9.1 percent (Table 5).
Boeing Military Aircraft (BMA) second-quarter revenue increased to $4.1 billion, primarily due to higher delivery volume. Operating margin decreased 1.8 points to 8.8 percent, as strong execution across various programs was more than offset by an inventory adjustment on A160. During the quarter, BMA was awarded the Apache Block III low rate initial production contract with the U.S. Army.
Network & Space Systems (N&SS) second-quarter revenue decreased to $1.9 billion, driven by lower volume on Brigade Combat Team Modernization. Operating margin was 6.7 percent, reflecting lower earnings in United Launch Alliance. During the quarter, N&SS was awarded its first international cybersecurity contract.
Global Services & Support (GS&S) second-quarter revenue increased to $2.2 billion, due to higher volume in integrated logistics. Operating margin was 11.9 percent, reflecting improved performance in maintenance, modification and upgrades. During the quarter, GS&S was awarded the F-15 Singapore follow-on performance-based logistics contract.
Backlog at Defense, Space & Security remained at $72 billion, more than two times the unit's projected 2012 revenue.
 
Additional Financial Information
Table 6. Additional Financial Information
 
At quarter-end, Boeing Capital Corporation's (BCC) portfolio balance was $4.1 billion, down from $4.2 billion at the beginning of the quarter on portfolio run-off and asset sales. BCC's debt-to-equity ratio was 5.0-to-1.
The "Other" segment includes unallocated activities of Engineering, Operations and Technology, Shared Services Group as well as certain intercompany guarantees provided to BCC. Other segment expense was $50 million in the quarter.
The loss in unallocated items and eliminations increased due to higher pension expense. Total pension expense for the second quarter was $593 million, as compared to $389 million in the same period last year.
 
Outlook
The company's 2012 financial guidance (Table 7) has been updated to reflect the strong core performance in both businesses.
Table 7. Financial Outlook
 
 
After discretionary cash pension contributions of $1.5 billion and assuming new aircraft financings under $0.5 billion.
1
2012 is sold out and includes an expected 70 to 85 787 and 747-8 deliveries, of which approximately half are 787 aircraft.
2
Approximately $0.8 billion is expected to be recorded in unallocated items and eliminations.
3
Earnings per share guidance for 2012 increased to between $4.40 and $4.60, up from between $4.15 and $4.35, reflecting the strong core operating performance. Total company 2012 revenue increased to between $79.5 and $81.5 billion, from between $78 and $80 billion, on higher Defense, Space & Security revenues.
Commercial Airplanes' operating margin improved to approximately 9 percent, from between 8.5 and 9 percent, reflecting the strong core performance.
 
Defense, Space & Security's revenue increased to between $31.5 and $32 billion, from between $30 and $30.5 billion, reflecting increased volume.
Non-GAAP Measure Disclosures
Management believes that the non-GAAP (Generally Accepted Accounting Principles) measures (indicated by an asterisk *) used in this report provide investors with important perspectives into the company's ongoing business performance. The company does not intend for the information to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the related GAAP measures. Other companies may define the measures differently. The following definitions are provided:
Operating Cash Flow Before Pension Contributions
Operating cash flow before pension contributions is defined as GAAP less . Management believes operating cash flow before pension contributions provides additional insights into underlying business performance. Table 2 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and operating cash flow before pension contributions.
operating cash flow
pension contributions
Free Cash Flow
Free cash flow is defined as GAAP less capital expenditures for . Management believes free cash flow provides investors with an important perspective on the cash available for shareholders, debt repayment, and acquisitions after making the capital investments required to support ongoing business operations and long term value creation. Free cash flow does not represent the residual cash flow available for discretionary expenditures as it excludes certain mandatory expenditures such as repayment of maturing debt. Management uses free cash flow internally to assess both business performance and overall liquidity. Table 2 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and free cash flow.
operating cash flow
property, plant and equipment additions
 
 
This press release contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "may," "should," "expects," "intends," "projects," "plans," "believes," "estimates," "targets," "anticipates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. Examples of forward-looking statements include statements relating to our future financial condition and operating results, as well as any other statement that does not directly relate to any historical or current fact. Forward-looking statements are based on our current expectations and assumptions, which may not prove to be accurate. These statements are not guarantees and are subject to risks, uncertainties, and changes in circumstances that are difficult to predict. Many factors could cause actual results to differ materially and adversely from these forward-looking statements. Among these factors are risks related to: (1) general conditions in the economy and our industry, including those due to regulatory changes; (2) our reliance on our commercial airline customers; (3) our commercial development programs, planned production rate increases across multiple commercial airline programs and the overall health of our aircraft production system; (4) changing acquisition priorities of the U.S. government; (5) our dependence on U.S. government contracts; (6) our reliance on fixed-price contracts; (7) our reliance on cost-type contracts; (8) uncertainties concerning contracts that include in-orbit incentive payments; (9) our dependence on our subcontractors and suppliers, as well as the availability of raw materials, (10) changes in accounting estimates; (11) changes in the competitive landscape in our markets; (12) our non-U.S. operations, including sales to non-U.S. customers; (13) potential adverse developments in new or pending litigation and/or government investigations; (14) customer and aircraft concentration in Boeing Capital's customer financing portfolio; (15) changes in our ability to obtain debt on commercially reasonable terms and at competitive rates in order to fund our operations and contractual commitments; (16) realizing the anticipated benefits of mergers, acquisitions, joint ventures/strategic alliances or divestitures; (17) the adequacy of our insurance coverage to cover significant risk exposures; (18) potential business disruptions, including those related to physical security threats, information technology or cyber-attacks or natural disasters; (19) work stoppages or other labor disruptions; (20) significant changes in discount rates and actual investment return on pension assets; (21) potential environmental liabilities; and (22) threats to the security of our or our customers' information.
Additional information concerning these and other factors can be found in our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including our most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q and Current Reports on Form 8-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which it is made, and we assume no obligation to update or revise any forward-looking statement, whether as a result of new information, future events, or otherwise, except as required by law.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20120828182454.txt.gz
TIME:20120828182454
EVENTS:	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.03. Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year.
On August 27, 2012, as part of its periodic review of corporate governance matters, the Board of Directors (the "Board") of The Boeing Company (the "Company") adopted changes to Article I and Article VII of the Company's By-Laws (the "By-Laws").
The changes include (a) requiring that a stockholder's notice to the Company for the nomination of a person for election to the Board disclose information relating to the potential nominee's interest in Company securities and derivative instruments and include an undertaking to update required disclosures to the Company as of the record date (Article I, Section 11.1.A(2)(c)(iv) and (v)); (b) clarifying that only those persons who are nominated in accordance with the procedures and have satisfied the conditions in the By-Laws, and who have delivered and are in compliance with the representation and agreement required by Article I, Section 11.3 of the By-Laws, are eligible to be elected and, if properly elected, to serve as directors (Article I, Section 11.1.C(1)); (c) permitting the Board to authorize one or more officers to indemnify and/or advance legal expenses to current or former employees or agents of the Company or any of its subsidiaries (Article VII, Section 3.5); and (d) providing that any indemnification or advancement of legal expenses by the Company to a person for serving at the Company's request as a director, officer, employee or agent of another entity shall be reduced by any amounts such person collects as indemnification or advancement of legal expenses from such other entity (Article VII, Section 3.7). In addition, certain non-substantive amendments were made to the By-Laws.
The foregoing summary of the amendments to the By-Laws is subject to, and qualified in its entirety by, the By-Laws, as amended and restated on August 27, 2012, a copy of which is filed as Exhibit 3.2 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: August 28, 2012
 

Exhibit 3.2
 
 
 
SECTION 1. Annual Meetings.
The annual meeting of stockholders shall be held on such date and at such time as the Board of Directors shall determine for the election of directors and the transaction of such other business as may properly be brought before the meeting.
SECTION 2. Special Meetings.
A special meeting of stockholders may be called at any time by the Board of Directors, and the Board of Directors shall call a special meeting upon written request to the Secretary by stockholders entitled to vote and dispose of at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the outstanding shares of the Corporation. Any such written request must be signed by each requesting holder, stating the number of shares owned by each such holder, and shall specify the purpose of the proposed meeting (including the text of any resolutions proposed for consideration and, in the event that such business includes a proposal to amend these By-Laws or the Certificate of Incorporation, the language of the proposed amendment). Business transacted at any special meeting of stockholders shall be limited to the purposes stated in the notice provided pursuant to Article I, Section 4 of these By-Laws; provided, however, that nothing in these By-Laws shall prohibit the Board of Directors from submitting matters to the stockholders at any special meeting requested by stockholders.
.
SECTION 3. Place of Meetings
All meetings of stockholders shall be held at such place or places, if any, within or without the State of Delaware as may from time to time be fixed by the Board of Directors or as shall be specified or fixed in the respective notices or waivers of notice thereof.
SECTION 4. Notice of Meetings.
Except as otherwise required by statute and as set forth below, notice of each annual or special meeting of stockholders shall be given by the Corporation personally, by mail or by electronic transmission to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting not less than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the meeting date. Except as otherwise required by statute, no publication of any notice of a meeting of stockholders shall be required. Every notice of a meeting of stockholders shall state the place, if any (or the means of remote communication, if any, by which stockholders and proxy holders may be deemed to be present in person), date, and hour of the meeting and, in the case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called (including any purpose set forth in a request by stockholders properly made pursuant to Article I, Section 2 of these By-Laws). Notices are deemed given by the Corporation (i) if by mail, when deposited in the United States mail, postage prepaid, directed to the stockholder at such stockholder's address as it appears on the records of the Corporation, or, if a stockholder shall have filed with the Secretary a written request that notices to such stockholder be mailed to some other address, then directed to such stockholder at such other address; (ii) if by facsimile, when directed to a number at which the stockholder has consented to receive notice; (iii) if by electronic mail, when directed to an electronic mail address at which the stockholder has consented to receive such notice; (iv) if by posting on an electronic network together with a separate notice to the stockholder of such specific posting, upon the later to occur of (A) such posting and (B) the giving of such separate notice of such posting; and (v) if by any other form of electronic transmission, when directed to the stockholder as required by law and, to the extent required by applicable law, in the manner consented to by the stockholder. An affidavit of the mailing or other means of giving any notice of any stockholders' meeting, executed by the Secretary, Assistant Secretary or any transfer agent of the Corporation giving the notice, shall be prima facie evidence of the giving of such notice. Notice shall be deemed to have been given to all stockholders of record who share an address if notice is given in accordance with the "householding" rules set forth in Rule 14a-3(e) under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "Exchange Act"), and Section 233 of the Delaware General Corporation Law. Any previously scheduled meeting of stockholders may be postponed by resolution of the Board of Directors upon public notice given prior to the time previously scheduled for such meeting of stockholders.
 
.
SECTION 5. Waivers of Notice
Whenever any notice is required to be given to any stockholder under the provisions of these By-Laws, the Certificate of Incorporation, or the Delaware General Corporation Law, a waiver thereof in writing signed by the person or persons entitled to such notice or a waiver by electronic transmission, whether before or after the time stated therein, shall be deemed equivalent to the giving of such notice. The attendance of a stockholder at a meeting, in person or by proxy shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when a stockholder attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened.
.
SECTION 6. Quorum; Required Vote
At all meetings of stockholders, except when otherwise provided by applicable law, the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, the presence, in person or by proxy, of the holders of one-third of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and except as otherwise provided by the Certificate of Incorporation, these By-Laws, the rules and regulations of any stock exchange applicable to the Corporation, or applicable law or pursuant to any regulation applicable to the Corporation or its securities, the vote, in person or by proxy, of the holders of a majority of the shares constituting such quorum shall be binding upon all stockholders. In the absence of a quorum, the chairman of the meeting or a majority of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote may adjourn any meeting to another place and time. At any such adjourned meeting at which a quorum shall be present, any business may be transacted which might have been transacted at the meeting as originally called. Unless otherwise provided by statute, no notice of an adjourned meeting need be given.
.
SECTION 7. Proxies
7.1 Appointment.
Each stockholder entitled to vote at a meeting of stockholders or to express consent or dissent to corporate action in writing without a meeting may authorize another person or persons to act for such stockholder by proxy. Such authorization may be accomplished by the stockholder or such stockholder's authorized officer, director, employee, or agent executing a writing or causing his or her signature to be affixed to such writing by any reasonable means, including facsimile signature or by electronic transmission to the intended holder of the proxy or to a proxy solicitation firm, proxy support service, or similar agent duly authorized by the intended proxy holder to receive such transmission.
7.2 Delivery to Corporation; Duration.
A proxy shall be filed with the Secretary before or at the time of the meeting or the delivery to the Corporation of the consent to corporate action in writing. A proxy shall become invalid three (3) years after the date of its execution, unless otherwise provided in the proxy. A proxy with respect to a specified meeting shall entitle the holder thereof to vote at any reconvened meeting following adjournment of such meeting but shall not be valid after the final adjournment thereof. A proxy shall be irrevocable if it states that it is irrevocable and if, and only as long as, it is coupled with an interest sufficient in law to support an irrevocable power. A stockholder may revoke any proxy which is not irrevocable by attending the meeting and voting in person or by delivering to the Secretary a revocation of the proxy or a new proxy bearing a later date.
SECTION 8. Inspectors of Election.
8.1 Appointment.
In advance of any meeting of stockholders, the Board of Directors shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspectors of election at such meeting and any adjournment thereof and to make a written report thereof. The Board of Directors may designate one or more persons to serve as alternate inspectors to serve in place of any inspector who is unable or fails to act. If no inspector or alternate is able to act at a meeting of stockholders, the chairman of such meeting shall appoint one or more persons to act as inspector at such meeting. Inspectors may be employees of the Corporation, but no director or candidate for director may act as an inspector of an election of directors.
 
8.2 Duties.
The inspectors of election shall (a) ascertain the number of shares of the Corporation outstanding and the voting power of each such share; (b) determine the shares represented at the meeting and the validity of proxies and ballots; (c) count all votes and ballots; (d) determine and retain for a reasonable period of time a record of the disposition of any challenges made to any determination by them; and (e) certify their determination of the number of shares represented at the meeting and their count of the votes and ballots. Each inspector shall, before entering upon the discharge of his or her duties, take and sign an oath to faithfully execute the duties of inspector with strict impartiality and according to the best of his or her ability. The inspectors may appoint or retain other persons or entities to assist them in the performance of their duties.
8.3 Determination of Proxy Validity.
The validity of any proxy or ballot executed for a meeting of stockholders shall be determined by the inspectors of election in accordance with the Delaware General Corporation Law.
SECTION 9. Fixing the Record Date.
9.1 Meetings.
For the purpose of determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at any meeting of stockholders or any adjournment thereof, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which record date shall be not fewer than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days before the date of such meeting. If no record date is fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall be at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which notice is given, or, if notice is waived, at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which the meeting is held. A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of and to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting; provided, however, that the Board of Directors may fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
9.2 Consent to Corporate Action Without a Meeting.
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which record date shall not be more than ten (10) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days after the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors. Any stockholder of record seeking to have the stockholders authorize or take corporate action by written consent pursuant to Article I, Section 10 of these By-Laws shall, by written notice to the Secretary, request that the Board of Directors fix a record date, which notice shall include the text of any proposed resolutions. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors pursuant to this Section 9.2 or otherwise within ten (10) days of receipt of a valid request by a stockholder, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, when no prior action by the Board of Directors is required pursuant to applicable law, shall be the first date on which a signed written consent setting forth the action taken or proposed to be taken is delivered to the Corporation pursuant to Article I, Section 10 of these By-Laws; provided, however, that if prior action by the Board of Directors is required by applicable law, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting shall in such an event be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution taking such prior action.
9.3 Dividends, Distributions, and Other Rights.
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to receive payment of any dividend or other distribution or allotment of any rights or the stockholders entitled to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion, or exchange of stock, or for the purpose of any other lawful action, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted, and which record
 
date shall be not more than sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days prior to such action. If no record date is fixed, the record date for determining stockholders for any such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution relating thereto.
9.4 Voting List.
The officer who has charge of the stock ledger shall prepare and make, at least ten (10) days before each meeting of stockholders, a complete list of the stockholders entitled to vote at such meeting, arranged in alphabetical order, and showing the address of each stockholder and the number of shares registered in the name of each stockholder. This list shall be open to examination by any stockholder, for any purpose germane to the meeting, for a period of ten (10) days prior to the meeting, either (i) on a reasonably accessible electronic network, provided that the information required to gain access to such list is provided with the notice of meeting, or (ii) during ordinary business hours at the principal place of business of the Corporation. The list shall also be produced and kept at such meeting for inspection by any stockholder who is present.
SECTION 10. Action by Stockholders Without a Meeting.
Subject to the provisions of Article EIGHTH of the Certificate of Incorporation and Article I, Section 9.2 of these By-Laws, any action which could be taken at any annual or special meeting of stockholders may be taken without a meeting, without prior notice, and without a vote, if a consent or consents in writing, setting forth the action so taken, are (a) signed by the holders of outstanding stock having not fewer than the minimum number of votes that would be necessary to authorize or take such action at a meeting at which all shares entitled to vote thereon were present and voted and (b) delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the records of proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Delivery made to the Corporation's registered office shall be by hand or by certified mail or registered mail, return receipt requested. Every written consent shall bear the date of signature of each stockholder who signs the consent, and no written consent shall be effective to take the corporate action referred to therein unless written consents signed by a sufficient number of stockholders to take such action are delivered to the Corporation, in the manner required by this Section 10, within sixty (60) (or the maximum number permitted by applicable law) days of the date of the earliest dated consent delivered to the Corporation in the manner required by this Section 10. The validity of any consent executed by a proxy for a stockholder pursuant to an electronic transmission transmitted to such proxy holder by or upon the authorization of the stockholder shall be determined by or at the direction of the Secretary. A written record of the information upon which the person making such determination relied shall be made and kept in the records of the proceedings of the stockholders. Any such consent shall be inserted in the minute book as if it were the minutes of a meeting of stockholders. Prompt notice of the taking of the corporate action without a meeting by less than unanimous written consent shall be given to those stockholders who have not consented in writing.
In the event of the delivery, in the manner provided by this Section 10 and applicable law, to the Corporation of written consent or consents to take corporate action and/or any related revocation or revocations, the Corporation shall engage independent inspectors of election for the purpose of performing promptly a ministerial review of the validity of the consents and revocations. For the purpose of permitting the inspectors to perform such review, no action by written consent and without a meeting shall be effective until such inspectors have completed their review, determined that the requisite number of valid and unrevoked consents delivered to the Corporation in accordance with this Section 10 and applicable law have been obtained to authorize or take the action specified in the consents, and certified such determination for entry in the records of the Corporation kept for the purpose of recording the proceedings of meetings of stockholders. Nothing contained in this Section 10 shall in any way be construed to suggest or imply that the Board of Directors or any stockholder shall not be entitled to contest the validity of any consent or revocation thereof, whether before or after such certification by the independent inspectors, or to take any other action (including, without limitation, the commencement, prosecution or defense of any litigation with respect thereto, and the seeking of injunctive relief in such litigation).
 
SECTION 11. Notice of Nominations and Other Stockholder Business; Required Vote for Directors; Director Qualification.
11.1 Notice of Nominations and Other Stockholder Business.
A. Annual Meetings of Stockholders.
(1) Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors and the proposal of other business to be considered by the stockholders may be made at an annual meeting of stockholders (a) as specified in the Corporation's notice of meeting (or any supplement thereto); (b) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof; or (c) by any stockholder of the Corporation who (i) was a stockholder of record at the time the notice provided for in this By-Law is delivered to the Secretary, (ii) is entitled to vote at the meeting, and (iii) complies with the notice procedures and conditions set forth in this By-Law as to such nomination or other business; clause (c) shall be the exclusive means for a stockholder to make nominations or submit proposals for other business (other than matters properly brought under Rule 14a-8 under the Exchange Act and included in the Corporation's proxy statement that has been prepared to solicit proxies for such annual meeting) before an annual meeting of stockholders.
(2) Without qualification, for any nominations or any other business to be properly brought before an annual meeting by a stockholder, the stockholder must have given timely notice thereof in writing to the Secretary and any such proposed business (other than the nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors) must constitute a proper matter for stockholder action. To be timely, a stockholder's notice shall be delivered to the Secretary at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not earlier than the close of business on the one hundred and twentieth (120
th
) day and not later than the close of business on the ninetieth (90th) day prior to the first anniversary of the preceding year's annual meeting; provided, however, that in the event that the date of the annual meeting is more than thirty (30) days before or more than seventy (70) days after such anniversary date, notice by the stockholder to be timely must be so delivered not earlier than the close of business on the one hundred and twentieth (120
th
) day prior to such annual meeting and not later than the close of business on the later of the ninetieth (90
th
) day prior to such annual meeting and the tenth (10
th
) day following the day on which public announcement of the date of such annual meeting is first made by the Corporation. In no event shall the adjournment or postponement of an annual meeting (or any public announcement thereof) commence a new time period (or extend any time period) for the giving of a stockholder's notice as described above. To be in proper form, such stockholder's notice (whether given pursuant to this Section 11.1.A(2) or Section 11.1.B) to the Secretary must: (a) set forth, as to the stockholder giving the notice and the beneficial owner, if any, on whose behalf the nomination or proposal for other business is made (i) the name and address of such stockholder, as they appear on the Corporation's books, and of such beneficial owner, if any, (ii) (A) the class or series and number of shares of the Corporation which are, directly or indirectly, owned beneficially and of record by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, (B) a description of any option, warrant, convertible security, stock appreciation right, or similar right with an exercise or conversion privilege or a settlement payment or mechanism at a price related to any class or series of shares of the Corporation or with a value derived in whole or in part from the value of any class or series of shares of the Corporation, whether or not such instrument or right shall be subject to settlement in the underlying class or series of shares of the Corporation or otherwise (a "Derivative Instrument") directly or indirectly owned beneficially by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, and any other direct or indirect opportunity to profit or share in any profit derived from any increase or decrease in the value of shares of the Corporation, (C) a description of any proxy, contract, arrangement, understanding, or relationship pursuant to which such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, has a right to vote any shares of any security of the Corporation, (D) any short interest in any security of the Corporation (for purposes of this By-Law a person shall be deemed to have a short interest in a security if such person directly or indirectly, through any contract, arrangement, understanding, relationship or otherwise, has the opportunity to profit or share in any profit derived from any decrease in the value of the subject security), (E) any rights to dividends on the shares of the Corporation owned beneficially by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, that are separated or separable from the underlying shares of the Corporation, (F) any proportionate interest in shares of the Corporation or Derivative Instruments held, directly or indirectly, by a general or limited partnership in which such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, is a general partner or, directly or indirectly, beneficially owns an interest in a general partner, and (G) any performance-related fees (other than an asset-based fee) that such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, is entitled to based on any increase or decrease in the value of shares of the Corporation or Derivative Instruments, if any, all such information to be provided as of the date of such notice, including, without limitation, any such interests held by members of such
 
stockholder's and such beneficial owner's, if any, immediate family sharing the same household (which information shall be supplemented by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, not later than ten (10) days after the record date for the annual meeting to disclose such ownership as of the record date), (iii) any other information relating to such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, that would be required to be disclosed in a proxy statement or other filings required to be made in connection with solicitations of proxies for, as applicable, the proposal of other business and/or for the election of directors in a contested election pursuant to Section 14 of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, (iv) a representation (A) that the stockholder is a holder of record of stock of the Corporation entitled to vote at such annual meeting and intends to appear in person or by proxy at the annual meeting to propose such business or nomination and (B) whether the stockholder or the beneficial owner, if any, intends or is part of a group which intends (x) to deliver a proxy statement and/or form of proxy to holders of at least the percentage of the Corporation's outstanding capital stock required to approve or adopt the proposal or elect the nominee and/or (y) otherwise to solicit proxies or votes from stockholders in support of such proposal or nomination, and (v) an undertaking by the stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, to notify the Corporation in writing of any change in the information called for by clauses (i), (ii), (iii) and (iv) as of the record date for such meeting, by notice received by the Secretary at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not later than the tenth (10
th
) day following such record date; (b) if the notice relates to any business other than the nomination of a director or directors that the stockholder proposes to bring before the annual meeting, set forth (i) a brief description of the business desired to be brought before the annual meeting, the text of the proposal or business (including the text of any resolutions proposed for consideration and in the event that such business includes a proposal to amend these By-Laws, the language of the proposed amendment), the reasons for conducting such business at the annual meeting and any material interest of such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, in such business and (ii) a description of all agreements, arrangements, and understandings between such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, and their respective affiliates and associates, and any other person or persons (including their names) acting in concert therewith in connection with the proposal of such business by such stockholder; (c) set forth, as to each person, if any, whom the stockholder proposes to nominate for election or reelection to the Board of Directors (i) all information relating to such person that would be required to be disclosed, whether in a proxy statement, other filings required to be made in connection with solicitations of proxies for election of directors in a contested election, or otherwise, in each case pursuant to Section 14 of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, (ii) such person's written consent to being named in the proxy statement as a nominee and to serving as a director if elected and a statement whether such person, if elected, intends to tender, promptly following such person's election or reelection, an irrevocable resignation effective upon such person's failure to receive the required vote for reelection at the next meeting at which such person would face reelection and upon acceptance of such resignation by the Board of Directors, (iii) a description of all direct and indirect compensation and other material monetary agreements, arrangements and understandings during the past three (3) years, and any other material relationships, between or among such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, and their respective affiliates and associates, or any other person or persons (including their names) acting in concert therewith, on the one hand, and each proposed nominee, and his or her respective affiliates and associates, or any other person or persons (including their names) acting in concert therewith, on the other hand, including, without limitation, all information that would be required to be disclosed pursuant to Item 404 promulgated under Regulation S-K if the stockholder making the nomination and any beneficial owner on whose behalf the nomination is made, if any, or any affiliate or associate thereof or person acting in concert therewith, were the "registrant" for purposes of such rule and the nominee were a director or executive officer of such registrant, (iv) any information that such person would be required to disclose pursuant to Section 11.1.A(2)(a)(ii) if such person were a stockholder purporting to make a nomination or propose business pursuant to Section 11.1.A(1)(c), and (v) an undertaking to notify the Corporation in writing of any change in the information called for by clauses (i), (ii), (iii) and (iv) as of the record date for such meeting, by notice received by the Secretary at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not later than the tenth (10
th
) day following such record date; and (d) with respect to each nominee for election or reelection to the Board of Directors, include the completed and signed questionnaire, representation and agreement required by Section 11.3. The Corporation may also, as a condition of any such nomination being deemed properly brought before an annual meeting, require any proposed nominee to furnish (i) any information required pursuant to any undertaking delivered pursuant to this Section 11.1.A(2) and (ii) such other information as may reasonably be required by the Corporation to determine the eligibility of such proposed nominee to serve as an independent director of the Corporation or that could be material to a reasonable stockholder's understanding of the independence, or lack thereof, of such nominee.
 
(3) Notwithstanding anything in the second sentence of Section 11.1.A(2) to the contrary, in the event that the number of directors to be elected to the Board of Directors at the annual meeting of stockholders is increased effective after the time period for which nominations would otherwise be due under Section 11.1.A(2) and there is no public announcement by the Corporation naming all of the nominees for the additional directorships at least one hundred (100) days prior to the first anniversary of the preceding year's annual meeting, a stockholder's notice required by this By-Law shall also be considered timely, but only with respect to nominees for any new positions created by such increase, if it shall be delivered to the Secretary at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not later than the close of business on the tenth (10
th
) day following the day on which such public announcement is first made by the Corporation.
B. Special Meetings of Stockholders.
Only such business shall be conducted at a special meeting of stockholders as shall have been brought before the special meeting pursuant to the Corporation's notice of meeting. Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors may be made at a special meeting at which directors are to be elected pursuant to the Corporation's notice of special meeting (a) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof or stockholders pursuant to Article 1, Section 2 hereof, or (b) provided that the Board of Directors or stockholders pursuant to Article 1, Section 2 hereof has determined that directors shall be elected at such special meeting, by any stockholder of the Corporation who (i) is a stockholder of record at the time the notice provided for in this By-Law is delivered to the Secretary and at the time of the special meeting, (ii) is entitled to vote at the special meeting, and (iii) complies with the notice procedures and conditions set forth in this By-Law (including the information requirements in Section 11.1.A(2)) as to such nomination. For the avoidance of doubt, the foregoing clause (b) of this Section 11.1.B shall be the exclusive means for a stockholder to propose nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors at a special meeting of stockholders at which directors are to be elected. In the event the Corporation calls a special meeting for the purpose of electing one or more directors to the Board of Directors, any such stockholder may nominate a person or persons (as the case may be) for election to such position(s) as specified in the Corporation's notice of meeting, if the stockholder's notice required by Section 11.1.A(2) (including the completed and signed questionnaire, representation and agreement required by Section 11.3) shall be delivered to the Secretary at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not earlier than the close of business on the one hundred and twentieth (120th) day prior to such special meeting and not later than the close of business on the later of the ninetieth (90th) day prior to such special meeting and the tenth (10th) day following the day on which public announcement is first made of the date of the special meeting and of the nominees proposed by the Board of Directors to be elected at such special meeting. In no event shall the adjournment or postponement of a special meeting as to which notice has been sent to stockholders, or any public announcement with respect thereto, commence a new time period (or extend any time period) for the giving of a stockholder's notice as described above.
C. General.
(1) Only such persons who (a) are nominated in accordance with the procedures and have satisfied the conditions set forth in this By-Law and (b) have delivered and are in compliance with the representation and agreement described in Section 11.3 shall be eligible to be elected as directors at an annual or special meeting of stockholders and, if properly elected, to serve as directors and only such business shall be conducted at a meeting of stockholders as shall have been brought before the meeting in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law. Except as otherwise provided by law, the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, the chairman of the meeting shall have the power and duty (a) to determine whether a nomination or any other business proposed to be brought before the meeting was made or proposed, as the case may be, in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law (including whether the stockholder or beneficial owner, if any, on whose behalf the nomination or proposal is made solicited (or is part of a group which solicited) or did not so solicit, as the case may be, proxies in support of such stockholder's nominee or proposal in compliance with such stockholder's representation as required by Section 11.1.A(2)(a)(iv)) and (b) if any proposed nomination or business was not made or proposed in compliance with this By-Law, to declare that such nomination shall be disregarded or that such proposed business shall not be transacted. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this By-Law, unless otherwise required by law, if the stockholder (or a qualified representative of the stockholder) does not appear at the annual or special meeting of stockholders of the Corporation to present a nomination or proposed business, such nomination shall be disregarded and such proposed
 
business shall not be transacted, notwithstanding that proxies in respect of such vote may have been received by the Corporation. For purposes of this By-Law, to be considered a qualified representative of the stockholder, a person must be (i) a duly authorized officer, manager, or partner of such stockholder or (ii) authorized, by a writing executed by such stockholder or an electronic transmission delivered by such stockholder, to act for such stockholder as proxy at the annual or special meeting and such person attending the meeting must produce such writing or electronic transmission, or a reliable reproduction of the writing or electronic transmission, at the annual or special meeting.
(2) For purposes of this By-Law, "public announcement" shall mean disclosure in a press release reported by the Dow Jones News Service, Associated Press, or comparable national news service or in a document publicly filed by the Corporation with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to Section 13, 14 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.
(3) Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this By-Law, a stockholder shall also comply with all applicable requirements of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder with respect to the matters set forth in this By-Law; provided, however, that any references in these By-Laws to the Exchange Act or to the rules or regulations promulgated thereunder are not intended to and shall not limit the requirements applicable to any nominations or proposals as to any other business to be considered pursuant to this By-Law (including Section 11.1.A(1)(c) or Section 11.1.B). Nothing in this By-Law shall be deemed to affect any rights (a) of stockholders to request inclusion of proposals in the Corporation's proxy statement pursuant to Rule 14a-8 under the Exchange Act or (b) of the holders of any series of Preferred Stock if and to the extent provided for under law, the Certificate of Incorporation, or these By-Laws.
.
11.2 Required Vote for Directors
A nominee for director shall be elected to the Board of Directors if the votes cast for such nominee's election exceed the votes cast against such nominee's election; provided, however, that the directors shall be elected by a plurality of the votes cast at any meeting of stockholders for which (i) the Secretary receives a notice that a stockholder has nominated a person for election to the Board of Directors in compliance with the advance notice requirements for stockholder nominees for director set forth in Section 11.1 and (ii) such nomination has not been withdrawn by such stockholder on or prior to the tenth day preceding the date the Corporation first mails its notice of meeting for such meeting to stockholders. If directors are to be elected by a plurality of the votes cast, stockholders shall not be permitted to vote against a nominee. Votes cast shall exclude abstentions with respect to that director's election.
.
11.3 Director Qualification: Submission of Questionnaire, Representation, and Agreement
To be eligible to be a nominee for election or reelection as a director of the Corporation, a person must deliver (in accordance with the time periods prescribed for delivery of notice under Section 11.1) to the Secretary at the principal executive offices of the Corporation a written questionnaire with respect to the background and qualification of such person and the background of any other person or entity on whose behalf the nomination is being made (which questionnaire shall be provided by the Secretary upon written request) and a written representation and agreement (in the form provided by the Secretary upon written request), that such person (a) is not and will not become a party to (i) any agreement, arrangement, or understanding with, and has not given any commitment or assurance to, any person or entity as to how such person, if elected as a director of the Corporation, will act or vote on any issue or question (a "Voting Commitment") that has not been disclosed to the Corporation or (ii) any Voting Commitment that could limit or interfere with such person's ability to comply, if elected as a director of the Corporation, with such person's fiduciary duties under applicable law; (b) is not and will not become a party to any agreement, arrangement, or understanding with any person or entity other than the Corporation with respect to any direct or indirect compensation, reimbursement, or indemnification in connection with service or action as a director that has not been disclosed therein; and (c) in such person's individual capacity and on behalf of any person or entity on whose behalf the nomination is being made, would be in compliance, if elected as a director of the Corporation, and will comply with the Corporation's Corporate Governance Principles and Code of Ethical Business Conduct for Members of the Board of Directors, as well as all other applicable publicly disclosed corporate governance, ethics, conflict of interest, confidentiality and stock ownership and trading policies and guidelines of the Corporation.
 
.
SECTION 12.
Notice to Corporation
Any written notice or consent required to be delivered by a stockholder to the Corporation pursuant to Sections 9.2 or 11.1 of this Article I or Section 2.1 of Article II must be given, either by personal delivery or by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, to the Secretary at the Corporation's executive offices in the City of Chicago, State of Illinois.
SECTION 13.
Organization and Conduct of Meetings.
The Chairman of the Board of Directors or, in the Chairman's absence, a Director or officer as a majority of the members of the Board may designate shall act as chairman of meetings of stockholders. The Secretary shall act as secretary of meetings of stockholders, but in his or her absence the chairman of the meeting may appoint any person to act as secretary of the meeting. Except to the extent inconsistent with any rules and regulations for the conduct of any meeting of stockholders as adopted by the Board of Directors, the chairman of any meeting of stockholders shall have the right and authority to convene and (for any or no reason) to adjourn the meeting, to prescribe such rules, regulations and procedures and to do all such acts as, in the judgment of such chairman, are appropriate for the proper conduct of the meeting.
SECTION 1. Number and Term of Office.
The number of directors shall be eleven (11), but the number may be increased, or decreased to not less than three (3), from time to time, by the directors or stockholders by amendment of these By-Laws in accordance with Article VIII. At each annual meeting of stockholders, each director shall be elected to hold office until the next annual meeting or until his or her successor shall be elected and qualified or until his or her earlier death, disqualification, resignation or removal.
.
SECTION 2. Nomination and Election
.
2.1
Nomination
Only persons who are nominated in accordance with Article I, Section 11 of these By-Laws shall be eligible for election as directors.
2.2 Election.
At each election of directors by stockholders, the persons who are elected in accordance with Article I, Section 11 of these By-Laws shall be the directors.
.
SECTION 3. Place of Meeting
Meetings of the Board of Directors, or of any committee thereof, may be held within or without the State of Delaware.
.
SECTION 4. Annual Meeting
Each year the Board of Directors shall meet in connection with the annual meeting of stockholders for the purpose of electing officers and for the transaction of other business. No notice of such annual meeting of the Board of Directors is required. Such annual meeting may be held at any other time or place which shall be specified in a notice given as hereinafter provided for special meetings of the Board of Directors, or in a consent and waiver of notice thereof, signed by all the directors.
.
SECTION 5. Stated Meetings
The Board of Directors may, by resolution adopted by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors, from time to time appoint the time and place for holding stated meetings of the Board of Directors, if by it deemed advisable; and such stated meetings shall thereupon be held at the time and place so appointed, without the giving of any special notice with regard thereto. Except as otherwise provided in these By-Laws, any and all business may be transacted at any stated meeting.
 
.
SECTION 6. Special Meetings
6.1 Convenors and Notice.
Special meetings of the Board of Directors may be called by or at the request of the Chairman of the Board of Directors or any two (2) directors. Notice of a special meeting of the Board of Directors, stating the place, day, and hour of the meeting, shall be given to each director in writing (by mail, electronic transmission or personal delivery) or orally (by telephone or in person).
6.2 Waiver of Notice.
With respect to a special meeting of the Board of Directors, a written waiver signed by a director or waiver by electronic transmission shall be deemed equivalent to notice to that director. A director's attendance at a meeting shall constitute that director's waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the director attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting was not lawfully called or convened. Neither the business to be transacted at, nor the purpose of, any regular or special meeting of the Board of Directors need be specified in the waiver of notice of such meeting.
.
SECTION 7. Quorum and Manner of Acting
Except as herein otherwise provided, forty percent (40%) of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided for in these By-Laws at the time of any stated or special meeting of the Board of Directors or, if vacancies exist on the Board of Directors, forty percent (40%) of such number of directors then in office; provided, however, that such number may not be less than one-third of the total number of directors fixed by or in the manner provided for in these By-Laws, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and, except as otherwise required by statute, the Certificate of Incorporation, or these By-Laws, the act of a majority of the directors present at any such meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of the Board of Directors. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the directors present may adjourn any meeting, from time to time, until a quorum is present. No notice of any adjourned meeting need be given.
.
SECTION 8. Chairman of the Board
The Chairman of the Board shall preside, when present, at all meetings of the Board of Directors, except as otherwise provided by law.
.
SECTION 9. Resignations
Any director may resign at any time by giving written notice or notice by electronic transmission thereof to the Secretary. Such resignation shall take effect at the time specified therefor or if the time is not specified, upon delivery thereof; and, unless otherwise specified with respect thereto, the acceptance of such resignation shall not be necessary to make it effective.
.
SECTION 10. Removal of Directors
Any director may be removed with or without cause by the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the outstanding shares of stock entitled to vote, at a meeting of stockholders called for that purpose; and the vacancy on the Board of Directors caused by any such removal may be filled by the stockholders at such meeting or at any subsequent meeting.
 
SECTION 11. Filling of Vacancies Not Caused by Removal.
In case of any increase in the number of directors, or of any vacancy created by death, disqualification, or resignation, the additional director or directors may be elected or, as the case may be, the vacancy or vacancies may be filled, either (a) by the affirmative vote of a majority of the remaining directors, even if less than a quorum or (b) by the stockholders entitled to vote, either at an annual meeting or at a special meeting thereof called for that purpose, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the outstanding shares entitled to vote at such meeting.
.
SECTION 12. Director Compensation
The Board of Directors shall have authority to determine from time to time the amount of compensation that shall be paid to its members for their service on the Board of Directors or any committee thereof.
.
SECTION 13. Action Without a Meeting
Any action required or permitted to be taken at any meeting of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof may be taken without a meeting if all members of the Board of Directors or committee, as the case may be, consent thereto in writing or by electronic transmission, and the writings or electronic transmissions are filed with the minutes of proceedings of the Board of Directors or committee.
.
SECTION 14. Telephonic Meetings
Members of the Board of Directors, or any committee designated by the Board of Directors, may participate in a meeting thereof by means of conference telephone or other communications equipment by means of which all persons participating in the meeting can hear each other, and participation in a meeting by such means shall constitute presence in person at such meeting.
SECTION 1. Audit Committee.
In addition to any committees appointed pursuant to Section 2 of this Article, there shall be an Audit Committee, appointed annually by the Board of Directors, consisting of at least three (3) directors who are not members of management. It shall be the responsibility of the Audit Committee to review the scope and results of the annual independent audit of books and records of the Corporation and its subsidiaries and to discharge such other responsibilities as may from time to time be assigned to it by the Board of Directors. The Audit Committee shall meet at such times and places as the members deem advisable, and shall make such recommendations to the Board of Directors as they consider appropriate.
SECTION 2.
Other Committees.
2.1 Committee Powers.
The Board of Directors may appoint standing or temporary committees and invest such committees with such powers as it may see fit, with power to subdelegate such powers if deemed desirable by the Board of Directors; but no such committee shall have the power or authority of the Board of Directors to adopt, amend, or repeal these By-Laws or approve, adopt, or recommend to the stockholders any action or matter expressly required by the Certificate of Incorporation, these By-Laws or the Delaware General Corporation Law to be submitted to stockholders for approval.
2.2 Committee Members.
The Board of Directors may designate one or more directors as alternate members of any committee, who may replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of the committee. In the absence or disqualification of a member of a committee, the member or members thereof present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, whether or not such member or members constitute a quorum, may unanimously appoint another member of the Board of Directors to act at the meeting in the place of any such absent or disqualified member.
 
SECTION 3. Quorum and Manner of Acting.
A majority of the number of directors composing any committee of the Board of Directors, as established and fixed by resolution of the Board of Directors, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at any meeting of such committee but, if less than a majority are present at a meeting, a majority of such directors present may adjourn the meeting from time to time without further notice. The act of a majority of the members of a committee present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of such committee.
.
SECTION 1. Officers
The elected officers shall be a Chairman of the Board of Directors (who shall be a director) and, at the discretion of the Board of Directors, a President (who shall be a director), and one or more Vice Presidents (each of whom may be assigned by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer an additional title descriptive of the functions assigned to such officer and one or more of whom may be designated Executive or Senior Vice President). The Board of Directors may also elect one or more Vice Chairmen. The Board of Directors shall also designate either the Chairman of the Board of Directors or the President as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation. The Board of Directors shall appoint a Controller, a Secretary, and a Treasurer. Any number of offices, whether elective or appointive, may be held by the same person. The Chief Executive Officer may, by a writing filed with the Secretary, designate titles as officers for employees and agents and appoint Assistant Secretaries and Assistant Treasurers as, from time to time, may appear to be necessary or advisable in the conduct of the affairs of the Corporation and may, in the same manner, terminate or change such titles.
.
SECTION 2. Term of Office
So far as practicable, all elected officers shall be elected at the annual meeting of the Board of Directors in each year, and shall hold office until the annual meeting of the Board of Directors in the next subsequent year and until their respective successors are elected. The Controller, Secretary, and Treasurer shall hold office at the pleasure of the Board of Directors.
.
SECTION 3. Salaries of Elected Officers
The salaries paid to the elected officers of the Corporation shall be authorized or approved by the Board of Directors.
.
SECTION 4. Bonuses
None of the officers, directors, or employees of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations shall at any time be paid any bonus or share in the earnings or profits of the Corporation or any of its subsidiary corporations except pursuant to a plan approved by affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members of the Board of Directors.
SECTION 5. Removal of Elected and Appointed Officers.
Any elected or appointed officer may be removed at any time, either for or without cause, by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors, at any meeting called for the purpose.
.
SECTION 6. Vacancies
If any vacancy occurs in any office, the Board of Directors may elect or appoint a successor to fill such vacancy for the remainder of the term.
 
SECTION 1. Chairman of the Board.
The Chairman of the Board of Directors shall preside, when present, at all meetings of stockholders and at all meetings of the Board of Directors, in each case except as required by law. The Chairman shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation; to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the Chairman by the Board of Directors.
.
SECTION 2. President
The President shall have general power to execute bonds, deeds, and contracts in the name of the Corporation; to affix the corporate seal; to sign stock certificates; during the absence or disability of the Chairman of the Board of Directors, to exercise the Chairman's powers and to perform the Chairman's duties; and to perform such other duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of the President by the Board of Directors; provided, that if the office of President is vacant, the Chairman shall exercise the duties ordinarily exercised by the President until such time as a President is elected or appointed.
SECTION 3. Chief Executive Officer.
The officer designated by the Board of Directors as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation shall have general and active control of its business and affairs. The Chief Executive Officer shall have general power to appoint or designate all employees and agents of the Corporation whose appointment or designation is not otherwise provided for and to fix the compensation thereof, subject to the provisions of these By-Laws; to remove or suspend any employee or agent who shall not have been elected or appointed by the Board of Directors or other body; to suspend for cause any employee, agent, or officer, other than an elected officer, pending final action by the body which shall have appointed such employee, agent, or officer; and to exercise all the powers usually pertaining to the office held by the Chief Executive Officer of a corporation.
SECTION 4. Vice Presidents and Controller.
The several Vice Presidents and the Controller shall perform all such duties and services as shall be assigned to or required of them, from time to time, by the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer, respectively.
.
SECTION 5. Secretary
The Secretary shall attend to the giving of notice of all meetings of stockholders and of the Board of Directors and shall keep and attest true records of all such proceedings. The Secretary shall have charge of the corporate seal and have authority to attest any and all instruments or writings to which the same may be affixed and shall keep and account for all books, documents, papers, and records of the Corporation relating to its corporate organization. The Secretary shall have authority to sign stock certificates and shall generally perform all the duties usually pertaining to the office of secretary of a corporation. In the absence of the Secretary, an Assistant Secretary or Secretary pro tempore shall perform the duties of the Secretary.
SECTION 6. Treasurer.
The Treasurer shall have the care and custody of all moneys, funds, and securities of the Corporation, and shall deposit or cause to be deposited all funds of the Corporation in accordance with directions or authorizations of the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer. The Treasurer shall have power to sign stock certificates, to indorse for deposit or collection, or otherwise, all checks, drafts, notes, bills of exchange, or other commercial paper payable to the Corporation, and to give proper receipts or discharges therefor. In the absence of the Treasurer, an Assistant Treasurer shall perform the duties of the Treasurer.
 
.
SECTION 7. Additional Powers and Duties
In addition to the foregoing especially enumerated duties and powers, the several officers of the Corporation shall perform such other duties and exercise such further powers as may be provided in these By-Laws or as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine, or as may be assigned to them by any superior officer.
.
SECTION 8. Disaster Emergency Powers of Acting Officers
If, as a result of a disaster or other state of emergency, the Chief Executive Officer is unable to perform the duties of that office, (a) the powers and duties of the Chief Executive Officer shall be performed by the officer designated as Chief Financial Officer of the Corporation, provided that such officer is available and capable of performing such powers and duties, until the Chief Executive Officer becomes capable of performing those duties or until the Board of Directors shall have elected a new Chief Executive Officer or designated another individual as Acting Chief Executive Officer; (b) such officer shall have the power in addition to all other powers granted to the Chief Executive Officer by these By-Laws and by the Board of Directors to appoint an acting President, acting Vice PresidentFinance, acting Controller, acting Secretary, and acting Treasurer, if any of the persons duly elected to any such office is not, by reason of such disaster or emergency, able to perform the duties of such office, each of such acting appointees to serve in such capacities until the officer for whom the appointee is acting becomes capable of performing the duties of such office or until the Board of Directors shall have designated another individual to perform such duties or have elected another person to fill such office; (c) any such acting officer so appointed shall be entitled to exercise all powers vested by these By-Laws or the Board of Directors in the duly elected officer for whom the acting officer is acting; and (d) anyone transacting business with the Corporation may rely upon a certification by any two (2) officers of the Corporation that a specified individual has succeeded to the powers of the Chief Executive Officer and that such person has appointed other acting officers as herein provided and any person, firm, corporation, or other entity to which such certification has been delivered by such officers may continue to rely upon it until notified of a change in writing signed by two (2) officers of the Corporation.
SECTION 1. Stock Certificates; Uncertificated Shares.
The shares of the stock of the Corporation shall be represented by certificates, provided that the Board of Directors may provide by resolution or resolutions that some or all of any or all classes or series of stock shall be uncertificated shares. Any such resolution shall not apply to shares represented by certificate until such certificate is surrendered to the Corporation. Every holder of stock of the Corporation represented by a certificate shall be entitled to a certificate, signed by the Chairman of the Board or the President or a Vice President and the Treasurer or an Assistant Treasurer or the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary, certifying the number of shares owned by the stockholder in the Corporation. Any and all of the signatures on a certificate may be a facsimile. If any officer, transfer agent, or registrar who has signed or whose facsimile signature has been placed upon a certificate shall have ceased to be such officer, transfer agent, or registrar before such certificate is issued, it may be issued by the Corporation with the same effect as if he or she were such officer, transfer agent, or registrar at the date of issue.
SECTION 2. Transfer Agents and Registrars.
The Board of Directors may, in its discretion, appoint responsible banks or trust companies in the Borough of Manhattan, in the City of New York, State of New York, or in such other city or cities as the Board of Directors may deem advisable, from time to time, to act as transfer agents and registrars of the stock of the Corporation; and, when such appointments shall have been made, no stock certificate shall be valid until countersigned by one of such transfer agents and registered by one of such registrars.
SECTION 3. Transfers of Stock.
Shares of stock may be transferred by delivery of the certificates therefor, accompanied either by an assignment in writing on the back of the certificates or by written power of attorney to sell, assign, and transfer the same, signed by the record holder thereof (or, with respect to uncertificated shares, by delivery of duly executed instructions or in
 
any other manner permitted by law), but no transfer shall affect the right of the Corporation to pay any dividend upon the stock to the holder of record thereof, or to treat the holder of record as the holder in fact thereof for all purposes, and no transfer shall be valid, except between the parties thereto, until such transfer shall have been made upon the books of the Corporation.
SECTION 4. Lost Certificates.
The Board of Directors may provide for the issuance of new certificates of stock or uncertificated shares to replace certificates of stock lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, or alleged to be lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, upon such terms and in accordance with such procedures as the Board of Directors shall deem proper and prescribe.
.
SECTION 1. Fiscal Year
The fiscal year of the Corporation shall be the calendar year.
SECTION 2. Signing of Negotiable Instruments.
All bills, notes, checks, or other instruments for the payment of money shall be signed or countersigned by such officer or officers and in such manner as from time to time may be prescribed by resolution (whether general or special) of the Board of Directors.
SECTION 3. Indemnification.
3.1
Right to Indemnification.
Each person who was or is made a party to or is threatened to be made a party to or is otherwise involved or threatened to be involved (including, without limitation, as a witness) in any actual or threatened action, suit, or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative, or investigative (hereinafter a "Proceeding"), by reason of the fact that he or she is or was a director or officer of the Corporation or, while serving as a director or officer of the Corporation, is or was serving at the request of the Corporation as a director, officer, employee, or agent of another corporation or a partnership, joint venture, trust, non-profit entity or other enterprise, including service with respect to an employee benefit plan (hereinafter an "Indemnitee"), whether the basis of such Proceeding is alleged action in an official capacity as such a director or officer or in any other capacity while serving as such a director or officer, shall be indemnified and held harmless by the Corporation to the fullest extent permitted by the Delaware General Corporation Law, or by other applicable law as then in effect, against all expense, liability, and loss (including attorneys' fees, judgments, fines, taxes or penalties, and amounts paid in settlement) actually and reasonably incurred or suffered by such Indemnitee in connection therewith, and such indemnification shall continue as to an Indemnitee who has ceased to be a director or officer and shall inure to the benefit of the Indemnitee's heirs, executors, administrators and legal representatives; provided, however, that except as provided in Article VII, Section 3.2 with respect to Proceedings seeking to enforce rights to indemnification hereunder, the Corporation shall indemnify any such Indemnitee in connection with a Proceeding (or part thereof) initiated by such Indemnitee only if the commencement of such Proceeding (or part thereof) was authorized in the specific case by the Board of Directors. The right to indemnification conferred in this Section 3.1 shall be a contract right and shall include the right, to the fullest extent permitted by law, to be paid by the Corporation the expenses incurred in defending any such Proceeding in advance of its final disposition (hereinafter an "Advancement of Expenses"); provided, however, that an Advancement of Expenses shall be made only upon delivery to the Corporation of an undertaking (hereinafter an "Undertaking"), by or on behalf of such Indemnitee, to repay all amounts so advanced if it shall ultimately be determined that such Indemnitee is not entitled to be indemnified for such expenses under this Section 3.1 or otherwise.
 
3.2
Right of Indemnitee to Bring Suit.
If a claim under Article VII, Section 3.1 for indemnification (following the final disposition of such Proceeding) is not paid in full by the Corporation within sixty (60) days after a written claim has been received by the Corporation, except in the case of a claim for an Advancement of Expenses, in which case the applicable period shall be twenty (20) days from the date a written request for Advancement of Expenses is received by the Corporation, the Indemnitee may at any time thereafter bring suit against the Corporation to recover any such unpaid amounts (excluding any amounts previously advanced and not returned). If successful in whole or in part in any such suit, the Indemnitee shall also be entitled to be paid the expenses of prosecuting or defending such suit to the fullest extent permitted by law. The Indemnitee shall be presumed to be entitled to indemnification under this Section 3 upon submission of a written claim in compliance herewith, and the Corporation shall have the burden of proof to overcome the presumption that the Indemnitee is so entitled. Neither the failure of the Corporation (including the Board of Directors, a committee thereof, independent legal counsel, or the stockholders) to have made a determination prior to the commencement of such suit that indemnification of the Indemnitee is proper in the circumstances, nor an actual determination by the Corporation (including the Board of Directors, a committee thereof, independent legal counsel, or the stockholders) that the Indemnitee is not entitled to indemnification shall be a defense to the suit or create a presumption that the Indemnitee is not so entitled.
3.3 Nonexclusivity of Rights.
The rights to indemnification and to Advancement of Expenses conferred in this Section 3 shall not be exclusive of any other right that any person may have or hereafter acquire under any statute, the Certificate of Incorporation, these By-Laws, any agreement, vote of stockholders or disinterested directors, or otherwise. Neither any amendment to or alteration or repeal of this Section 3 or of any of the procedures established by the Board of Directors pursuant to Article VII, Section 3.6, nor the adoption of any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, nor, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any modification of law, shall eliminate or reduce the effect of the right or protection of any Indemnitee to indemnification and to Advancement of Expenses in accordance with the provisions hereof and thereof with respect to any Proceeding (regardless of when such Proceeding is first threatened, commenced or completed) arising out of, or related to, any alleged acts or omissions by such Indemnitee occurring prior to such amendment, alteration or repeal.
.
3.4 Insurance, Contracts, and Funding
The Corporation may maintain insurance, at its expense, on behalf of itself and any Indemnitee or any other person whom the Corporation has the power to indemnify pursuant to Article VII, Section 3.5 of these By-Laws against any expense, liability or loss, whether or not the Corporation would have the power to indemnify such person against such expense, liability or loss under the Delaware General Corporation Law or otherwise. The Corporation may, without stockholder approval, enter into contracts with any Indemnitee or any other person whom the Corporation has the power to indemnify pursuant to Article VII, Section 3.5 of these By-Laws in furtherance of the provisions of this Section 3 and may create a trust fund, grant a security interest, or use other means (including, without limitation, a letter of credit) to ensure the payment of such amounts as may be necessary to effect indemnification as provided in this Section 3.
3.5 Indemnification of Employees and Agents.
The Board of Directors may, or may authorize one or more officers to, indemnify and/or provide Advancement of Expenses to any current or former employee or agent of the Corporation or any of the Corporation's subsidiaries who is not an Indemnitee and was or is made a party to or is threatened to be made a party to or is otherwise involved or threatened to be involved (including, without limitation, as a witness) in any Proceeding, by reason of the fact that he or she is or was such an employee or agent or, while serving as an employee or agent, he or she is or was serving at the request of the Corporation as a director, officer, employee, or agent of another corporation or a partnership, joint venture, trust, non-profit entity or other enterprise, including service with respect to an employee benefit plan, of such scope and effect and subject to such terms as determined by the Board of Directors or such officer or officers, in each case as and to the extent permitted by applicable law.
 
3.6 Procedures for the Submission of Claims.
The Board of Directors may establish reasonable procedures for the submission of claims for indemnification pursuant to this Section 3, determination of the entitlement of any person thereto, and review of any such determination.
3.7 Other Sources of Indemnification or Advancement of Expenses.
Any indemnification or Advancement of Expenses by the Corporation to any Indemnitee or person indemnified by the Corporation pursuant to Article VII, Section 3.5 of these By-Laws who is or was serving at the request of the Corporation as a director, officer, employee or agent of another corporation or a partnership, joint venture, trust, non-profit entity or other enterprise shall be reduced by any amount such Indemnitee may collect as indemnification or Advancement of Expenses from such other corporation or partnership, joint venture, trust, non-profit entity or other enterprise.
SECTION 4. Forum for Adjudication of Disputes.
With respect to any action arising out of any act or omission occurring after the adoption of this By-Law, unless the Corporation consents in writing to the selection of an alternative forum, the Court of Chancery of the State of Delaware shall be the sole and exclusive forum for (i) any derivative action or proceeding brought on behalf of the Corporation, (ii) any action asserting a claim of breach of a fiduciary duty owed by any director, officer or other employee of the Corporation to the Corporation or the Corporation's stockholders, (iii) any action asserting a claim arising pursuant to any provision of the Delaware General Corporation Law, the Certificate of Incorporate or these By-Laws, or (iv) any action asserting a claim governed by the internal affairs doctrine, in each case subject to the Court of Chancery of the State of Delaware having personal jurisdiction over the indispensable parties named as defendants therein.
SECTION 1. Amendment of the By-Laws: General.
Except as herein otherwise expressly provided, these By-Laws may be altered or repealed in any particular and new By-Laws, not inconsistent with any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or any provision of law, may be adopted, either by
A. the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority in number of the shares present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote at an annual meeting of stockholders or at a special meeting thereof, the notice of which special meeting shall include the form of the proposed alteration or repeal or of the proposed new By-Laws, or a summary thereof; or
B. either by
i. the affirmative vote of a majority of the whole Board of Directors at any meeting thereof (or in accordance with Article II, Section 13), or
ii. the affirmative vote of all the directors present at any meeting at which a quorum, less than a majority, is present;
provided that Article I, Section 11.2 of these By-Laws may be amended only as set forth in Section 1.A of this By-Law, except that any amendment required by law or necessary or desirable to cure an administrative or technical deficiency may be made as provided in Section 1.B of this By-Law.
SECTION 2. Amendments as to Compensation and Removal of Officers.
Notwithstanding anything contained in these By-Laws to the contrary, the affirmative vote of the holders of record of a majority of the Voting Stock, as defined in Article FOURTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, at a meeting of stockholders called for the purpose, shall be required to alter, amend, repeal, or adopt any provision inconsistent with Sections 3, 4 and 5 of Article IV of these By-Laws, notice of which meeting shall include the form of the proposed amendment, or a summary thereof.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20121017172049.txt.gz
TIME:20121017172049
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
 
 
Current Report
PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF
THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACTOF 1934
October 15, 2012
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported)
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
Extension of Termination Dates of Credit Agreements
    
On November 10, 2011, The Boeing Company (Boeing) entered into (1) a $2.3 billion, 364-day revolving credit agreement (the 364-Day Credit Agreement) and (2) a $2.3 billion, five-year revolving credit agreement (the 5-Year Credit Agreement and, together with the 364-Day Credit Agreement, the Credit Agreements), in each case with Citigroup Global Markets Inc. and J.P. Morgan Securities LLC as joint lead arrangers and joint book managers, JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. as syndication agent, Citibank, N.A. (the Agent) as administrative agent, and a syndicate of lenders as defined in the respective Credit Agreement. On October 15, 2012, the Agent notified Boeing that the lenders have agreed to Boeing's request to extend each Credit Agreement for an additional 364 days (one year, in the case of the 5-Year Credit Agreement) pursuant to the terms of the respective agreements. The 364-Day Credit Agreement is now scheduled to terminate on November 7, 2013, subject to Boeing's right to, following payment of additional fees, convert outstanding borrowings into term loans with a maturity date of November 7, 2014. The 5-Year Credit Agreement is now scheduled to terminate on November 10, 2017. The Credit Agreements are otherwise subject to the same terms and conditions as previously disclosed in Boeing's Form 8-K dated November 10, 2011.
The information set forth above under Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement is incorporated herein by reference.
SIGNATURE
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
           
THE BOEING COMPANY
      
By:    
/s/Michael F. Lohr
     Michael F. Lohr
     Vice President, Assistant General Counsel
and Corporate Secretary
Dated:  October 17, 2012


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20121024073753.txt.gz
TIME:20121024073753
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
(a) On October 24, 2012, The Boeing Company issued a press release reporting its financial results for the third quarter of 2012. A copy of the Company's press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
(a) Not applicable
(b) Not applicable
(c) Not applicable
(d) Exhibits
99.1    Press Release issued by The Boeing Company dated October 24, 2012, reporting Boeing's financial results for the third quarter of 2012, furnished herewith.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
Boeing Reports Third-Quarter Results and Raises 2012 Guidance
 
 
 
 
 
 
Table 1. Summary Financial Results
 
 
 The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] reported third-quarter net income of $1.0 billion, or $1.35 per share, on continued strong core performance and revenue of $20.0 billion. Increased earnings at Commercial Airplanes and Defense, Space & Security were more than offset by higher pension expense of $194 million ($0.18 per share). Earnings per share guidance for 2012 was raised to between $4.80 and $4.95. The company also raised its revenue guidance to between $80.5 and $82 billion on higher Defense, Space & Security revenue, and increased its 2012 operating cash flow outlook to greater than $5.5 billion.
CHICAGO, October 24, 2012
"Strong core operating performance drove increased earnings in both our major businesses, along with higher overall revenues, improved cash flow, and solid earnings per share even as pension headwinds rose," said Boeing Chairman, President and
 
Chief Executive Officer Jim McNerney. "Our Defense, Space & Security business maintained double-digit margins in a challenging environment while Commercial Airplanes continued to build momentum with 787 deliveries and 737 MAX orders. Underpinned by our solid performance to date and positive outlook, we are raising our year-end guidance for revenue, earnings and operating cash flow. We remain well positioned for long-term growth with a clear focus on quality, productivity and disciplined program execution," McNerney said.
Table 2. Cash Flow
 
Boeing's quarterly operating cash flow before pension contributions* was $2.3 billion. Operating cash flow was $1.6 billion, with higher commercial airplane deliveries and strong operating performance more than offsetting continued investment in the 787 program and discretionary pension funding. Free cash flow* was $1.2 billion in the quarter (Table 2).
Table 3. Cash, Marketable Securities and Debt Balances
 
 
Cash and investments in marketable securities totaled $11.2 billion at quarter-end (Table 3), up from $10.3 billion at the beginning of the quarter. Debt was $11.2 billion, unchanged from the prior quarter.
Total company backlog at quarter-end was $378 billion, up from $374 billion at the beginning of the quarter, and included net orders for the quarter of $24 billion.
 
Segment Results
Commercial Airplanes
Table 4. Commercial Airplanes Operating Results
 
Boeing Commercial Airplanes third-quarter revenue increased by 28 percent to $12.2 billion on higher delivery volume. Operating margin was 9.5 percent, reflecting the dilutive impact of 787 and 747-8 deliveries and higher period costs partially offset by lower R&D (Table 4).
During the quarter, Commercial Airplanes began major assembly on the 787-9, and, in October, delivered the first 787 built in South Carolina.
Commercial Airplanes booked 369 net orders during the quarter. Backlog remains strong with approximately 4,100 airplanes valued at $307 billion.
 
Boeing Defense, Space & Security
Table 5. Defense, Space & Security Operating Results
 
Boeing Defense, Space & Security's (BDS) third-quarter revenue was $7.8 billion, while operating margin was 10.5 percent (Table 5).
Boeing Military Aircraft (BMA) third-quarter revenue decreased to $3.8 billion, driven by delivery mix. Operating margin increased to 11.7 percent, on strong performance across various programs. During the quarter, BMA was awarded the P-8A low rate initial production contract III with the U.S. Navy, while the first P-8I aircraft for the Indian Navy began its official flight test program.
Network & Space Systems (N&SS) third-quarter revenue decreased to $2.0 billion, driven by lower volume on Brigade Combat Team Modernization. Operating margin was 8.1 percent. During the quarter, N&SS was awarded a contract to build and launch the tenth Wideband Global Communications satellite, while the second Intelsat 702 medium power satellite was launched and is on orbit.
Global Services & Support (GS&S) third-quarter revenue increased to $2.1 billion, primarily due to higher volume in training systems. Operating margin decreased to 10.7 percent, reflecting lower earnings in integrated logistics. During the quarter, GS&S was awarded a follow-on upgrade contract from the U.S. Air Force for the B-1 bomber.
Backlog at BDS was $71 billion, more than two times the unit's projected 2012 revenue.
 
Additional Financial Information
Table 6. Additional Financial Information
 
At quarter-end, Boeing Capital Corporation's (BCC) portfolio balance was $4.1 billion, unchanged from the beginning of the quarter. BCC's debt-to-equity ratio was 5.0-to-1.
The "Other" segment includes unallocated activities of Engineering, Operations and Technology, Shared Services Group as well as certain intercompany guarantees provided to BCC. Other segment expense was $74 million in the quarter compared with Other segment income of $92 million in 2011 due to a $141 million gain in the third quarter of 2011 from an upgraded credit rating assigned to certain financing receivables.
The loss in unallocated items and eliminations increased due to higher pension expense. The third quarter of 2011 included a $161 million charge for post-retirement medical. Total pension expense for the third quarter was $583 million, as compared to $389 million in the same period last year.
 
Outlook
The company's 2012 financial guidance (Table 7) has been updated to reflect the strong core performance in both businesses.
Table 7. Financial Outlook
 
 
Earnings per share guidance for 2012 increased to between $4.80 and $4.95, up from between $4.40 and $4.60, reflecting the strong core operating performance. Total company 2012 revenue increased to between $80.5 and $82 billion, from between $79.5 and $81.5 billion, on higher Defense, Space & Security revenues. Operating cash flow guidance for 2012 is now expected to be greater than $5.5 billion, up from greater than $5 billion.
 
BDS's revenue guidance increased to between $32.5 and $33 billion, from between $31.5 and $32 billion, reflecting increased volume. BDS's operating margin is now greater than 9.25 percent, up from greater than 9 percent.
BCC's return on assets is now expected to be approximately 1.0 percent, up from approximately 0.5 percent.
Capital expenditures for 2012 have been reduced to approximately $1.8 billion, down from approximately $2.0 billion.
Based on current interest rates and market conditions, pension expense in 2013 is estimated to be approximately $3.5 billion, of which approximately $1.8 billion is expected to be recorded in unallocated items and eliminations. 2013 pension expense will be determined at year end based on market conditions at that time.
Non-GAAP Measure Disclosures
Management believes that the non-GAAP (Generally Accepted Accounting Principles) measures (indicated by an asterisk *) used in this report provide investors with important perspectives into the company's ongoing business performance. The company does not intend for the information to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the related GAAP measures. Other companies may define the measures differently. The following definitions are provided:
Operating Cash Flow Before Pension Contributions
Operating cash flow before pension contributions is defined as GAAP less . Management believes operating cash flow before pension contributions provides additional insights into underlying business performance. Table 2 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and operating cash flow before pension contributions.
operating cash flow
pension contributions
 
Free Cash Flow
Free cash flow is defined as GAAP less capital expenditures for . Management believes free cash flow provides investors with an important perspective on the cash available for shareholders, debt repayment, and acquisitions after making the capital investments required to support ongoing business operations and long term value creation. Free cash flow does not represent the residual cash flow available for discretionary expenditures as it excludes certain mandatory expenditures such as repayment of maturing debt. Management uses free cash flow internally to assess both business performance and overall liquidity. Table 2 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and free cash flow.
operating cash flow
property, plant and equipment additions
 
 
This press release contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "may," "should," "expects," "intends," "projects," "plans," "believes," "estimates," "targets," "anticipates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. Examples of forward-looking statements include statements relating to our future financial condition and operating results, as well as any other statement that does not directly relate to any historical or current fact. Forward-looking statements are based on our current expectations and assumptions, which may not prove to be accurate. These statements are not guarantees and are subject to risks, uncertainties, and changes in circumstances that are difficult to predict. Many factors could cause actual results to differ materially and adversely from these forward-looking statements. Among these factors are risks related to: (1) general conditions in the economy and our industry, including those due to regulatory changes; (2) our reliance on our commercial airline customers; (3) our commercial development programs, planned production rate increases across multiple commercial airline programs and the overall health of our aircraft production system; (4) changing acquisition priorities of the U.S. government; (5) our dependence on U.S. government contracts; (6) our reliance on fixed-price contracts; (7) our reliance on cost-type contracts; (8) uncertainties concerning contracts that include in-orbit incentive payments; (9) our dependence on our subcontractors and suppliers, as well as the availability of raw materials, (10) changes in accounting estimates; (11) changes in the competitive landscape in our markets; (12) our non-U.S. operations, including sales to non-U.S. customers; (13) potential adverse developments in new or pending litigation and/or government investigations; (14) customer and aircraft concentration in Boeing Capital's customer financing portfolio; (15) changes in our ability to obtain debt on commercially reasonable terms and at competitive rates in order to fund our operations and contractual commitments; (16) realizing the anticipated benefits of mergers, acquisitions, joint ventures/strategic alliances or divestitures; (17) the adequacy of our insurance coverage to cover significant risk exposures; (18) potential business disruptions, including those related to physical security threats, information technology or cyber-attacks or natural disasters; (19) work stoppages or other labor disruptions; (20) significant changes in discount rates and actual investment return on pension assets; (21) potential environmental liabilities; and (22) threats to the security of our or our customers' information.
Additional information concerning these and other factors can be found in our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including our most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q and Current Reports on Form 8-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which it is made, and we assume no obligation to update or revise any forward-looking statement, whether as a result of new information, future events, or otherwise, except as required by law.
Contact:
Investor Relations:   Stephanie Pope or Matt Welch (312) 544-2140
Communications:     Chaz Bickers (312) 544-2002
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20121217172137.txt.gz
TIME:20121217172137
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Current Report
PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF
THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACTOF 1934
December 17, 2012
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported)
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
Item 8.01 Other Events
On December 17, 2012, The Boeing Company issued a press release announcing an increase in its quarterly dividend and the resumption of its share repurchase program. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
SIGNATURE
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
    
 
    
 
THE BOEING COMPANY
 
    
 
By:
    
/s/ Michael F. Lohr
 
    
Michael F. Lohr
 
    
Vice President, Assistant General Counsel and Corporate Secretary
Dated:  December 17, 2012
 
INDEX TO EXHIBITS

Boeing Raises Dividend 10 Percent and Resumes $3.6 Billion Share Repurchase Program
CHICAGO, Dec. 17, 2012 - Boeing [NYSE: BA] Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer Jim McNerney announced a 10 percent increase in the company's regular quarterly dividend to 48.5 cents per share and the resumption of its stock repurchase program with repurchases currently expected to total between $1.5 billion and $2.0 billion in 2013.
Strong cash generation, consistently solid core operating performance and a positive growth outlook enable us to take these steps to deliver value for our shareholders, McNerney said. As returns accelerate on the investments we made in innovative new products, we plan to continue our balanced cash deployment strategy, increasing returns to shareholders, investing in our core businesses and our workforce, and maintaining a strong balance sheet with healthy credit ratings.
The repurchase program is expected to use the remaining $3.6 billion previously authorized by the Boeing board of directors in October 2007. Boeing plans to begin repurchasing shares following its fourth-quarter earnings announcement in late January 2013.
Boeing plans to make the share repurchases on the open market. The number and timing of shares to be purchased will be based on the level of cash balances, general business conditions and other factors, including alternative investment opportunities. The repurchase program also may be suspended or discontinued at any time.
The dividend is payable March 8, 2013, to shareholders of record as of Feb. 15, 2013.
# # #
Contact: Boeing Communications (312) 544-2002


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20121219172041.txt.gz
TIME:20121219172041
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Current Report
PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF
THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACTOF 1934
December 17, 2012
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported)
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
The Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of The Boeing Company (the Company) has approved a grant of 60,000 restricted stock units (the Award) to Dennis A. Muilenburg, the Company's Executive Vice President, President and Chief Executive Officer, Boeing Defense, Space & Security. The Award was granted on December 17, 2012 in recognition of Mr. Muilenburg's performance and as a retention vehicle. The Award will vest 100% and settle in shares of the Company's common stock on a one-for-one basis on December 17, 2016, which is the fourth anniversary of the grant date. The Award was made under the Company's 2003 Incentive Stock Plan, as amended and restated (the 2003 Plan), and is subject to the terms and conditions set forth in the 2003 Plan and the Form of Notice of Terms of Restricted Stock Units, a copy of which is included as Exhibit 10.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
(d) Exhibits.
SIGNATURE
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
THE BOEING COMPANY
Dated: December 19, 2012
INDEX TO EXHIBITS

Exhibit 10.1
Notice of Terms of
Restricted Stock Units
[Grant Date]
To:
        
BEMSID:
    
As part of the Executive Compensation Program, The Boeing Company (the Company) has awarded you a Restricted Stock Unit award. The terms and conditions of the award are as follows:
"Disability" here means a disability entitling a participant to benefits under a long-term disability policy sponsored by the Company or one of its subsidiaries.
5.1 While RSUs are in your account, they will earn dividend equivalents in the form of additional RSUs. Specifically, as of each dividend payment date for Boeing stock, your RSU account will be credited with additional RSUs (Earnings Credit RSUs) equal in number to the number of shares of Boeing stock that could be bought with the cash dividends that would be paid on the RSUs in your account if each RSU were a share of Boeing stock. The number of RSUs that results from the Earnings Credit calculation will be to two decimal places.
5.2 The number of shares of Boeing stock that could be bought with such cash dividends will be calculated based on the Fair Market Value of Boeing stock on the applicable dividend payment date. Fair Market Value here means the average of the high and the low per share trading prices for Boeing stock as reported in
The Wall Street Journal
for the specific dividend payment date, or in such other source as the Company deems reliable.
5.3 Earnings Credit RSUs will vest at the same time as the RSUs with which they are associated.
9.1 Distribution from your RSU account will be made as soon as reasonably possible after the vesting of your RSUs, but not later than 60 days after the applicable vesting date. Distribution will be in whole shares of Boeing stock. The number of shares distributed will be equal to the number of whole vested RSUs in your account, subject to deductions described in paragraph 9.2. Fractional share values will be applied to income tax withholding.
9.2 The Company will deduct from the distribution of your vested RSUs any withholding or other taxes required by law and may deduct any amounts due from you to the Company or to a subsidiary of the Company.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20130111114400.txt.gz
TIME:20130111114400
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Current Report
PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF
THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACTOF 1934
January 11, 2013
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported)
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Item 8.01 Other Events
On January 11, 2013, The Boeing Company issued a press release announcing a joint review with the U.S. Federal Aviation Administration of the 787's recent issues and critical systems. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
SIGNATURE
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
    
 
    
 
THE BOEING COMPANY
 
    
 
By:
        
/s/ Michael F. Lohr
 
    
 
    
Michael F. Lohr
 
    
 
    
Vice President, Assistant General Counsel and Corporate Secretary
Dated:  January 11, 2013
 
INDEX TO EXHIBITS

Boeing Statement on FAA Joint Review on 787
EVERETT, Wash., Jan. 11, 2013 -- Boeing [NYSE:BA] is confident in the design and performance of the 787. It is a safe and efficient airplane that brings tremendous value to our customers and an improved flying experience to their passengers.
The airplane has logged 50,000 hours of flight and there are more than 150 flights occurring daily. Its in-service performance is on par with the industry's best-ever introduction into service - the Boeing 777. Like the 777, at 15 months of service, we are seeing the 787's fleet wide dispatch reliability well above 90 percent.
More than a year ago, the 787 completed the most robust and rigorous certification process in the history of the FAA. We remain fully confident in the airplane's design and production system.
Regular reviews of program and technical progress are an important part of the validation and oversight process that has created today's safe and efficient air transportation system. While the 787's reliability is on par with the best in class, we have experienced in-service issues in recent months and we are never satisfied while there is room for improvement. For that reason, today we jointly announced with the U.S. Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) the start of a review of the 787's recent issues and critical systems.
We welcome the opportunity to conduct this joint review. Our standard practice calls on us to apply rigorous and ongoing validation of our tools, processes and systems so that we can always be ensured that our products bring the highest levels of safety and reliability to our customers.
Just as we are confident in the airplane, we are equally confident in the regulatory process that has been applied to the 787 since its design inception. With this airplane, the FAA conducted its most robust certification process ever. We expect that this review will complement that effort.
# # #
Contact:
Lori Gunter
787 Communications
+1 206-931-5919
loretta.m.gunter@boeing.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20130117110115.txt.gz
TIME:20130117110115
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Current Report
PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF
THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACTOF 1934
January 16, 2013
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported)
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Item 8.01 Other Events
On January 16, 2013, the U.S. Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) issued an emergency airworthiness directive that requires U.S. 787 operators to temporarily cease operations and recommends other regulatory agencies to follow suit. The Boeing Company issued a press release regarding the FAA's action, a copy of which is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
SIGNATURE
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
    
 
    
 
THE BOEING COMPANY
 
    
 
By:
        
/s/ Michael F. Lohr
 
    
 
    
Michael F. Lohr
 
    
 
    
Vice President, Assistant General Counsel and Corporate Secretary
Dated:  January 17, 2013
INDEX TO EXHIBITS

Boeing Statement on Federal Aviation Administration 787 Action
CHICAGO, Jan. 16, 2013 - Boeing Chairman, President and CEO Jim McNerney issued the following statement today after the U.S. Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) issued an emergency airworthiness directive that requires U.S. 787 operators to temporarily cease operations and recommends other regulatory agencies to follow suit: 
The safety of passengers and crew members who fly aboard Boeing airplanes is our highest priority.
 Boeing is committed to supporting the FAA and finding answers as quickly as possible. The company is working around the clock with its customers and the various regulatory and investigative authorities. We will make available the entire resources of The Boeing Company to assist.
We are confident the 787 is safe and we stand behind its overall integrity.  We will be taking every necessary step in the coming days to assure our customers and the traveling public of the 787's safety and to return the airplanes to service.
 Boeing deeply regrets the impact that recent events have had on the operating schedules of our customers and the inconvenience to them and their passengers.
###
Contact:
John Dern
Boeing Corporate Offices
312-544-2002
Marc Birtel
Boeing Commercial Airplanes
425-266-5822


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20130123164406.txt.gz
TIME:20130123164406
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Current Report
PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF
THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACTOF 1934
January 23, 2013
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported)
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Item 8.01 Other Events.
On January 23, 2013, The Boeing Company (Boeing) announced that its aircraft financing and leasing unit, Boeing Capital Corporation (BCC), plans to suspend BCC's obligation to file reports with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). In connection with this announcement, Boeing has entered into guaranties, each dated as of January 23, 2013, with Deutsche Bank Trust Company Americas on behalf of the holders of BCC's outstanding debt securities issued under (i) an indenture dated as of April 15, 1987 and supplemented as of June 12, 1995 and (ii) an indenture dated as of August 31, 2000 (collectively, the Guaranties). The Guaranties provide for the full and unconditional guarantee of all the outstanding publicly issued debt securities of BCC, representing approximately $1.8 billion of principal in the aggregate. The amounts subject to the Guaranties have been previously disclosed as outstanding debt obligations in the consolidated financial reports filed by Boeing with the SEC, and Boeing will continue to report BCC as a segment in its SEC reports.
A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
SIGNATURE
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
    
 
    
 
THE BOEING COMPANY
 
    
 
By:
        
/s/ Michael F. Lohr
 
    
 
    
Michael F. Lohr
 
    
 
    
Vice President, Assistant General Counsel and Corporate Secretary
Dated: January 23, 2013
 
INDEX TO EXHIBITS

Boeing's Aircraft Financing Unit, Boeing Capital, to Discontinue Separate SEC Reporting in 2013
CHICAGO, Jan. 23, 2013 -
Boeing (NYSE: BA) announced today that its aircraft financing and leasing unit, Boeing Capital Corporation (BCC), plans to suspend its separate U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) reporting. The move will help streamline Boeing's financial reporting process while not affecting the financing and leasing unit's mission, operations or customer interactions. Boeing Capital's financial information will continue to be included in Boeing's SEC disclosures.
Boeing issued today a full and unconditional guarantee of all of the outstanding publicly-issued debt securities of Boeing Capital. The aircraft financing unit will suspend its separate SEC reporting after filing its Form 10-K for 2012 in the coming weeks. In connection with the plan to suspend reporting obligations, BCC will file with the SEC today to terminate its current debt registration statement.
This action will generate efficiencies in Boeing's financial reporting process while allowing Boeing Capital to continue to fulfill its mission of supporting the company's Commercial Airplanes and Defense, Space & Security customers and managing its financial risks,  said Mike Cave, Boeing Capital's president. Our customers and stakeholders will see no change in Boeing Capital's mission or how it operates. In addition, Boeing Capital intends to continue to maintain a target debt-to-equity ratio of 5.0 to 1.
Cave said any future funding requirements for Boeing Capital are expected to be raised at the corporate level and then provided to Boeing Capital through intercompany loans.
Boeing Capital's roots date back more than four decades in service to the aircraft financing needs of Boeing's customers around the globe.
   
Boeing Capital will continue to be reported as a segment in Boeing's SEC reports, and we will continue to provide transparency into BCC's financial results, financial position and leverage, said Diana Sands, Boeing's corporate vice president and controller.
BCC currently has approximately 150 employees and is based in Renton, Wash., near Seattle.
Contact:
John Kvasnosky
Communications, Boeing Capital Corp.
Office: 425-965-4057
Mobile: 206-898-9528
john.kvasnosky@boeing.com
Caution Concerning Forward-Looking Statements
 
Statements in this press release relating to the intention to maintain a target debt-to-equity ratio for BCC are forward-looking statements.  There are a number of important factors that could cause actual events to differ materially from those suggested or indicated by such forward-looking statements.  These include, among others, prefunding of debt maturities, Boeing Capital's results for any particular quarter, and changes in Boeing's or Boeing Capital's target for Boeing Capital's leverage and other factors identified in the Boeing's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including its most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q and Current Reports on Form 8-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which it is made, and the company assumes no obligation to update or revise any forward-looking statement, whether as a result of new information, future events, or otherwise, except as required by law.
# # #
.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20130130073807.txt.gz
TIME:20130130073807
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
(a) On January 30, 2013, The Boeing Company issued a press release reporting its financial results for the fourth quarter of 2012. A copy of the Company's press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
(a) Not applicable
(b) Not applicable
(c) Not applicable
(d) Exhibits
99.1    Press Release issued by The Boeing Company dated January 30, 2013, reporting Boeing's financial results for the fourth quarter of 2012, furnished herewith.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
News Release
 
 
 
 
Boeing Reports Record Revenue and Backlog and Provides 2013 Guidance
Fourth-Quarter 2012
 
 
Full Year 2012
 
 
 
Outlook for 2013
 
 
Table 1. Summary Financial Results
 
 
The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] reported record fourth-quarter revenue of $22.3 billion (Table 1) and core operating earnings (non-GAAP) that increased by 9 percent to $1.8 billion, driven by strong performance across the company's businesses and higher deliveries of commercial airplanes. Fourth-quarter 2012 core earnings per share (non-GAAP) of $1.46 increased 4 percent* from the same period last year when excluding a $0.52 per share impact related to a favorable tax settlement recognized in the fourth-quarter 2011. The company reported fourth-quarter earnings from operations of $1.6 billion and earnings per share of $1.28.
CHICAGO, January 30, 2013
 
Core operating earnings (non-GAAP) rose 13 percent in the full-year to $7.2 billion, compared to $6.4 billion in 2011. 2012 core earnings per share (non-GAAP) of $5.88 increased 12 percent* from 2011 when excluding the impact of the 2011 favorable tax settlement ($0.53 per share for the year). Full-year 2012 revenue was a record $81.7 billion, with earnings from operations of $6.3 billion and earnings per share of $5.11.
Core earnings per share guidance (non-GAAP) for 2013 is set at between $6.10 and $6.30, while earnings per share guidance is established at between $5.00 and $5.20. Revenue guidance is between $82 and $85 billion and operating cash flow is expected to be greater than $6.5 billion, which includes $1.5 billion of discretionary pension contributions.
"Strong fourth-quarter operating performance capped a year of significant growth and solid execution, driving higher earnings and cash flow for our company," said Boeing Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer Jim McNerney. "In a year of considerable achievement, Boeing was the commercial aviation market leader for both orders and deliveries, with more than 600 airplanes delivered, including the first three Charlestonbuilt 787 Dreamliners. Significant new international orders for Defense, Space & Security and more than 900 orders for the 737 MAX also contributed to our record company backlog."
"Our first order of business for 2013 is to resolve the battery issue on the 787 and return the airplanes safely to service with our customers. At the same time, we remain focused on our ongoing priorities of profitable ramp up in commercial airplane production, successful execution of our development programs, and continued growth in core, adjacent and international defense and space markets."
Table 2. Cash Flow
 
Operating cash flow in the quarter was $4.2 billion, driven by higher commercial airplane deliveries, continued strong operating performance and timing of receipts and expenditures. Free cash flow was $3.7 billion in the quarter (Table 2).
 
Table 3. Cash, Marketable Securities and Debt Balances
 
Cash and investments in marketable securities totaled $13.5 billion at year-end (Table 3), up from $11.2 billion at the beginning of the quarter. Debt was $10.4 billion, down from $11.2 at the beginning of the quarter.
Total company backlog at year-end was a record $390 billion, up from $378 billion at the beginning of the quarter, and included net orders for the quarter of $35 billion. Backlog is up $35 billion from prior year-end, reflecting $114 billion of net orders in 2012.
Segment Results
Commercial Airplanes
Table 4. Commercial Airplanes Operating Results
 
Boeing Commercial Airplanes fourth-quarter revenue increased to $14.2 billion and full-year revenue increased to a record $49.1 billion on higher delivery volume. Fourth-quarter operating margin was 8.9 percent and full-year operating margin was 9.6 percent, both reflecting the dilutive impact of 787 and 747-8 deliveries and higher period costs partially offset by the higher volume and lower R&D (Table 4).
During the quarter, Commercial Airplanes achieved a five-per-month production rate on the 787 program and, as of year-end, had won over 1,000 firm orders for the 737 MAX since launch. The 737 program broke the company's single-year record for both orders and deliveries in 2012. During the year, Commercial Airplanes delivered the first 747-8 Intercontinental, began major assembly on the 787-9 and successfully executed a total of five production rate increases.
 
On January 16, 2013, the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) issued an airworthiness directive that resulted in all in-service 787s temporarily ceasing operations. The company is committed to working with the FAA and other applicable regulatory authorities to return aircraft to service with the full confidence of customers and the traveling public. While production continues on the 787, the company is suspending deliveries until clearance is granted by the FAA.
Commercial Airplanes booked 394 net orders during the quarter. Backlog remains strong with nearly 4,400 airplanes valued at a record $319 billion.
Boeing Defense, Space & Security
Table 5. Defense, Space & Security Operating Results
 
Boeing Defense, Space & Security's (BDS) fourth-quarter revenue was $8.3 billion, while operating margin was 9.0 percent (Table 5). For the full year, revenue was $32.6 billion, while operating margin was 9.4 percent.
Boeing Military Aircraft (BMA) fourth-quarter revenue increased to $4.2 billion, driven primarily by the KC-46 Tanker and P-8A programs. Operating margin decreased to 8.1 percent, driven by delivery mix. During the quarter, the U.S. Navy ordered 13 additional F/A-18 aircraft and BMA started production of the first KC-46 Tanker refueling boom.
Network & Space Systems (N&SS) fourth-quarter revenue was $1.9 billion. Operating margin decreased to 6.2 percent, reflecting lower earnings on Ground-based Midcourse Defense and several satellite programs. During the quarter, N&SS was awarded a contract with NASA for the Space Launch System (SLS) and completed the preliminary design review for the SLS core stage and avionics.
 
Global Services & Support (GS&S) fourth-quarter revenue decreased to $2.3 billion, primarily due to lower revenue in integrated logistics. Operating margin increased to 13.1 percent, reflecting improved performance in integrated logistics. During the quarter, GS&S was awarded the C-17 Globemaster III Integrated Sustainment Program from the U.S. Air Force and a contract to upgrade 68 F-15s for an international customer.
Backlog at BDS was $71 billion, more than two times projected 2013 revenue.
Additional Financial Information
Table 6. Additional Financial Information
 
At year-end, Boeing Capital Corporation's (BCC) portfolio balance was $4.1 billion, unchanged from the beginning of the quarter and down from $4.3 billion at the beginning of the year. BCC's debt-to-equity ratio was 5.0-to-1.
The loss in unallocated items and eliminations increased due to higher pension expense. Total pension expense for the fourth quarter was $576 million up from $344 million in the same period last year.
The company's income tax expense was $557 million in the quarter, compared to $57 million in the same period of last year. Fourth-quarter 2011 included a $397 million non-cash gain due to an IRS settlement. The full year effective tax rate was 34 percent compared with 25.6 percent in 2011.
 
Outlook
The company's current 2013 financial guidance (Table 7) assumes no significant financial impact from the FAA directive. The guidance reflects continued strong core performance, generating an expected 5 percent increase in core earnings per share (non-GAAP).
Table 7. Financial Outlook
 
Boeing's 2013 revenue guidance is between $82 and $85 billion. Core earnings per share (non-GAAP) guidance for 2013 is set at between $6.10 and $6.30. Earnings per share guidance is established at between $5.00 and $5.20. Total pension expense in 2013 is expected to be approximately $3.2 billion (of which approximately $1.8 billion is expected to be recorded in core operating earnings
 
with $1.4 billion recorded in unallocated items and eliminations). Operating cash flow before pension contributions (non-GAAP) is expected to be greater than $8 billion. Operating cash flow is expected to be greater than $6.5 billion in 2013, including $1.5 billion of discretionary pension contributions.
Commercial Airplanes' 2013 deliveries are expected to be between 635 and 645 airplanes, which includes greater than 60 787 deliveries. Commercial Airplanes' 2013 revenue is expected to be between $51 and $53 billion with operating margins of approximately 9.5 percent.
Defense, Space & Security's revenue for 2013 is expected to be between $30.5 and $31.5 billion with operating margins greater than 9 percent.
Boeing Capital Corporation expects that its aircraft finance portfolio will continue to decline in 2013, as new aircraft financing of less than $0.5 billion is expected to be lower than normal portfolio runoff through customer payments and depreciation.
Boeing's 2013 R&D forecast is approximately $3.4 billion. Capital expenditures for 2013 are expected to be between $2.3 and $2.5 billion. Boeing's effective tax rate is expected to be approximately 30 percent in 2013 reflecting the benefit of research and development credits for 2012 and 2013.
Non-GAAP Measure Disclosures
We supplement the reporting of our financial information determined under U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) with certain non-GAAP financial information. The non-GAAP financial information presented excludes certain significant items that may not be indicative of, or are unrelated to, results from our ongoing business operations. We believe that these non-GAAP measures provide investors with additional insight into the company's ongoing business performance. These non-GAAP measures should not be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the related GAAP measures, and other companies may define such measures differently. We encourage investors to review our financial statements and publicly-filed reports in their entirety and not to rely on any single financial measure. The following definitions are provided:
Core Operating Earnings, Core Operating Margin and Core Earnings Per Share
Core operating earnings is defined as GAAP excluding . Core operating margin is defined as core operating earnings expressed as a percentage of revenue. Core earnings per share is defined as GAAP excluding the net earnings per share impact of .  represents the portion of pension and other post-retirement costs that are not recognized by business segments for segment reporting purposes. The business segments have traditionally been allocated pension and other post-retirement costs using U.S. government Cost Accounting Standards (CAS), which employ different actuarial assumptions and accounting conventions than GAAP. Beginning in 2013, pension costs at Commercial Airplanes will be allocated
earnings from operations
unallocated pension and post-retirement expense
earnings per share
unallocated pension and post-retirement expense
Unallocated pension and post-retirement expense
 
based on GAAP service and prior service costs instead of CAS. Defense Space & Security will continue to be allocated CAS pension costs which are allocable to government contracts. Other post-retirement costs will continue to be allocated to business segments based on CAS, which is generally based on benefits paid. Management uses core operating earnings, core operating margin and core earnings per share for purposes of evaluating and forecasting underlying business performance. Management believes these core earnings measures provide investors additional insights into operational performance as they exclude unallocated pension and post-retirement costs, which primarily represent costs driven by market factors and costs not allocable to government contracts.
Increase in Core Earnings Per Share Excluding Favorable Tax Settlement
The company is disclosing the increase in core earnings per share in 2012 over 2011 excluding the impact of the favorable federal tax audit settlement in fourth quarter 2011. The company believes it is useful to occasionally exclude certain items that are not reflective of underlying business performance and that can distort period to period performance comparisons. Management uses similar measures for purposes of evaluating and forecasting underlying business performance.
Operating Cash Flow Before Pension Contributions
Operating cash flow before pension contributions is defined as GAAP less . Management believes operating cash flow before pension contributions provides additional insights into underlying business performance. Table 2 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and operating cash flow before pension contributions.
operating cash flow
pension contributions
Free Cash Flow
Free cash flow is defined as GAAP less capital expenditures for . Management believes free cash flow provides investors with an important perspective on the cash available for shareholders, debt repayment, and acquisitions after making the capital investments required to support ongoing business operations and long term value creation. Free cash flow does not represent the residual cash flow available for discretionary expenditures as it excludes certain mandatory expenditures such as repayment of maturing debt. Management uses free cash flow internally to assess both business performance and overall liquidity. Table 2 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and free cash flow.
operating cash flow
property, plant and equipment additions
 
 
This press release contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "may," "should," "expects," "intends," "projects," "plans," "believes," "estimates," "targets," "anticipates," and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. Examples of forward-looking statements include statements relating to our future financial condition and operating results, as well as any other statement that does not directly relate to any historical or current fact. Forward-looking statements are based on our current expectations and assumptions, which may not prove to be accurate. These statements are not guarantees and are subject to risks, uncertainties, and changes in circumstances that are difficult to predict. Many factors could cause actual results to differ materially and adversely from these forward-looking statements. Among these factors are risks related to: (1) general conditions in the economy and our industry, including those due to regulatory changes; (2) our reliance on our commercial airline customers; (3) the overall health of our aircraft production system, planned production rate increases across multiple commercial airline programs, our commercial development and derivative aircraft programs, and our aircraft being subject to stringent performance and reliability standards; (4) changing acquisition priorities of the U.S. government; (5) our dependence on U.S. government contracts; (6) our reliance on fixed-price contracts; (7) our reliance on cost-type contracts; (8) uncertainties concerning contracts that include in-orbit incentive payments; (9) our dependence on our subcontractors and suppliers, as well as the availability of raw materials, (10) changes in accounting estimates; (11) changes in the competitive landscape in our markets; (12) our non-U.S. operations, including sales to non-U.S. customers; (13) potential adverse developments in new or pending litigation and/or government investigations; (14) customer and aircraft concentration in Boeing Capital's customer financing portfolio; (15) changes in our ability to obtain debt on commercially reasonable terms and at competitive rates in order to fund our operations and contractual commitments; (16) realizing the anticipated benefits of mergers, acquisitions, joint ventures/strategic alliances or divestitures; (17) the adequacy of our insurance coverage to cover significant risk exposures; (18) potential business disruptions, including those related to physical security threats, information technology or cyber-attacks or natural disasters; (19) work stoppages or other labor disruptions; (20) significant changes in discount rates and actual investment return on pension assets; (21) potential environmental liabilities; and (22) threats to the security of our or our customers' information.
Additional information concerning these and other factors can be found in our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including our most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q and Current Reports on Form 8-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which it is made, and we assume no obligation to update or revise any forward-looking statement, whether as a result of new information, future events, or otherwise, except as required by law.
Contact:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The tables provided below reconcile the non-GAAP financial measures core operating earnings, core operating margin and core earnings per share with the most directly comparable GAAP financial measures, earnings from operations, operating margin and diluted earnings per share. See page 7 of this release for additional information on the use of these non-GAAP financial measures.
 
 
The tables provided below reconcile the non-GAAP financial measures core operating earnings, core operating margin and core earnings per share with the most directly comparable GAAP financial measures, earnings from operations, operating margin and diluted earnings per share. See page 7 of this release for additional information on the use of these non-GAAP financial measures.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20130424075006.txt.gz
TIME:20130424075006
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):
April 24, 2013
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
(a) On
April 24, 2013
, The Boeing Company issued a press release reporting its financial results for the
first quarter
of
2013
. A copy of the Companys press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
(a) Not applicable
(b) Not applicable
(c) Not applicable
(d) Exhibits
SIGNATURE
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
           
          
EXHIBIT INDEX

 
Boeing Reports Strong First-Quarter Results and Reaffirms 2013 Guidance
* Non-GAAP measures (core operating earnings, core operating margin and core earnings per share) exclude certain components of pension and post retirement benefit expense that the company believes are not reflective of underlying business performance. Complete definitions of Boeings non-GAAP measures begin on page 6, Non-GAAP Measures Disclosures.
CHICAGO, April 24, 2013
 The Boeing Company [NYSE: BA] reported first-quarter core earnings per share (non-GAAP) increased 24 percent* to $1.73, driven by strong performance across the company's businesses (Table 1). First-quarter 2013 results included the expected benefit of $0.19 per share for the 2012 research and development tax credit; first-quarter 2012 included a benefit of $0.11 per share related to a favorable court judgment on satellite litigation. First-quarter core operating earnings (non-GAAP) increased 14 percent* to $1.9
1
billion from the same period of the prior year when excluding the benefit of $131 million related to the favorable court judgment. First-quarter revenue was $18.9 billion, earnings from operations was $1.5 billion and earnings per share was $1.44. The company reaffirmed its 2013 financial and deliveries guidance.
"Strong core operating performance fueled by productivity gains and solid program execution drove higher company earnings and double-digit operating margins in both major businesses during the quarter," said Boeing Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer Jim McNerney. "Commercial Airplanes worked around the clock to resolve the 787 battery issue while also successfully increasing production rates on the 737 and 777 programs. Defense, Space & Security continued to perform exceptionally well, meeting tough affordability goals while investing in future growth."
"Our first priority in the days ahead is to fully restore our customers' 787 fleets to service and resume production deliveries. Our outlook for the year is positive, and our financial and delivery guidance is reaffirmed as we remain focused on the profitable ramp up in commercial airplane production rates, disciplined execution of our development programs, and continued growth in core, adjacent and international defense and space markets."
Operating cash flow in the quarter was
$0.5 billion
, reflecting inventory build on the 787 program offset by timing of receipts and expenditures (Table 2).
1
Marketable securities consists primarily of time deposits due within one year classified as "short-term investments."
Cash and investments in marketable securities totaled
$11.8 billion
at quarter-end (Table 3), down from
$13.5 billion
at the beginning of the year, primarily due to the pay-down of maturing debt. Debt was
$9.2 billion
, down from
$10.4 billion
at year-end, due to the maturities.
Total company backlog at year-end was a record
$392 billion
, up from $390 billion at the beginning of the year, and included net orders for the quarter of $20 billion.
2
Segment Results
Commercial Airplanes
Boeing Commercial Airplanes first-quarter revenue decreased to
$10.7 billion
on delivery mix and lower services revenue. First-quarter operating margin improved to
11.4%
, reflecting the delivery mix and lower R&D, partially offset by higher period costs (Table 4).
During the quarter, Commercial Airplanes delivered the first 777 aircraft produced at a record production rate of 8.3-per-month and reached a four-year contract extension with the Society of Professional Engineering Employees in Aerospace (SPEEA). In April, Commercial Airplanes delivered the first 737 produced at a record production rate of 38-per-month.
In April, approval was given by the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) for airlines to begin the process of returning the 787 to service with an enhanced battery system. The company is committed to the safety of all of our airplanes and has worked diligently alongside authorities to further enhance the safety of the 787.
Commercial Airplanes booked 209 net orders during the quarter. Backlog remains strong with more than 4,400 airplanes valued at a record $324 billion.
Boeing Defense, Space & Security
Boeing Defense, Space & Securitys (BDS) first-quarter revenue was
$8.1 billion
, while operating margin was
10.3 percent
(Table 5).
Boeing Military Aircraft (BMA) first-quarter revenue was $4.1 billion, primarily reflecting lower revenue on the F-15 program, partially offset by higher C-17 and Apache deliveries. Operating margin increased to 10.5
3
percent, due to delivery mix. During the quarter, BMA delivered the first Indian Air Force C-17 to flight test and completed the second Phantom Eye flight.
Network & Space Systems (N&SS) first-quarter revenue increased to $2.0 billion, primarily driven by higher volume in satellite programs as well as the Space Launch System program. Operating margin increased to 8.0 percent, reflecting the increased volume and mix in satellite programs. During the quarter, N&SS was awarded a contract in the small satellite business and had a successful flight test of the Ground-based Midcourse Defense (GMD) system.
Global Services & Support (GS&S) first-quarter revenue was $2.0 billion, reflecting lower volume in integrated logistics. Operating margin increased to 12.1 percent, reflecting improved performance in maintenance, modification and upgrades.
Backlog at BDS was $
68 billion
, of which 42 percent represents orders with international customers.
Additional Financial Information
At quarter-end, Boeing Capital Corporations (BCC) net portfolio balance was
$4.2 billion
and debt-to-equity ratio was
5.0-to-1
.
Unallocated items and eliminations in the first quarter of 2012 included a $131 million favorable court judgment on satellite litigation. Total pension expense for the first quarter was
$791 million
up from
$655 million
in the same period last year.
The companys income tax expense was
$332 million
in the quarter, compared to
$539 million
in the same period of last year, as the expected $145 million benefit for the 2012 research and development credit was reflected in the first quarter of 2013.
4
Outlook
The companys 2013 financial guidance (Table 7) is reaffirmed and reflects continued strong core performance, generating an expected 5 percent increase in core earnings per share (non-GAAP).
1
    After discretionary cash pension contributions of $1.5 billion and assuming new aircraft financings under $0.5 billion.
2
    Assumes greater than 60 787 deliveries.
3    
Approximately $1.4 billion is expected to be recorded in unallocated items and eliminations.
*    Non-GAAP measures. Complete definitions of Boeings use of non-GAAP measures begin on page 7, Non-GAAP Measures Disclosures.
 
5
Non-GAAP Measures Disclosures
We supplement the reporting of our financial information determined under U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) with certain non-GAAP financial information. The non-GAAP financial information presented excludes certain significant items that may not be indicative of, or are unrelated to, results from our ongoing business operations. We believe that these non-GAAP measures provide investors with additional insight into the companys ongoing business performance. These non-GAAP measures should not be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the related GAAP measures, and other companies may define such measures differently. We encourage investors to review our financial statements and publicly-filed reports in their entirety and not to rely on any single financial measure. The following definitions are provided:
Core Operating Earnings, Core Operating Margin and Core Earnings Per Share
Core operating earnings is defined as GAAP
earnings from operations
excluding
unallocated pension and post-retirement expense
. Core operating margin is defined as core operating earnings expressed as a percentage of revenue. Core earnings per share is defined as GAAP
diluted earnings per share
excluding the net earnings per share impact of
unallocated pension and post-retirement expense
.
Unallocated pension and post-retirement expense
represents the portion of pension and other post-retirement costs that are not recognized by business segments for segment reporting purposes. Management uses core operating earnings, core operating margin and core earnings per share for purposes of evaluating and forecasting underlying business performance. Management believes these core earnings measures provide investors additional insights into operational performance as they exclude unallocated pension and post-retirement costs, which primarily represent costs driven by market factors and costs not allocable to government contracts.
Increase in Core Operating Earnings Excluding Favorable Court Judgment
The company is disclosing the increase in core operating earnings in first quarter of 2013 over first quarter of 2012 excluding the impact of the favorable court judgment in the first quarter of 2012. The company believes it is useful to occasionally exclude certain items that are not reflective of underlying business performance and that can distort period to period performance comparisons. Management uses similar measures for purposes of evaluating and forecasting underlying business performance.
Operating Cash Flow Before Pension Contributions
Operating cash flow before pension contributions is defined as GAAP
operating cash flow
less
pension contributions
. Management believes operating cash flow before pension contributions provides additional insights into underlying business performance. Management uses operating cash flow before pension contributions as a measure to assess both business performance and overall liquidity. Table 2 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and operating cash flow before pension contributions.
Free Cash Flow
Free cash flow is defined as GAAP
operating cash flow
less capital expenditures for
property, plant and equipment additions
. Management believes free cash flow provides investors with an important perspective on the cash available for shareholders, debt repayment, and acquisitions after making the capital investments required to support ongoing business operations and long term value creation. Free cash flow does not represent the residual cash flow available for discretionary expenditures as it excludes certain mandatory expenditures such as repayment of maturing debt. Management uses free cash flow as a measure to assess both business performance and overall liquidity. Table 2 provides a reconciliation between GAAP operating cash flow and free cash flow.
6
Caution Concerning Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as may, should, expects, intends, projects, plans, believes, estimates, targets, anticipates, and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. Examples of forward-looking statements include statements relating to our future financial condition and operating results, as well as any other statement that does not directly relate to any historical or current fact. Forward-looking statements are based on our current expectations and assumptions, which may not prove to be accurate. These statements are not guarantees and are subject to risks, uncertainties, and changes in circumstances that are difficult to predict. Many factors could cause actual results to differ materially and adversely from these forward-looking statements. Among these factors are risks related to: (1) general conditions in the economy and our industry, including those due to regulatory changes; (2) our reliance on our commercial airline customers; (3) the overall health of our aircraft production system, planned production rate increases across multiple commercial airline programs, our commercial development and derivative aircraft programs, and our aircraft being subject to stringent performance and reliability standards; (4) changing acquisition priorities of the U.S. government; (5) our dependence on U.S. government contracts; (6) our reliance on fixed-price contracts; (7) our reliance on cost-type contracts; (8) uncertainties concerning contracts that include in-orbit incentive payments; (9) our dependence on our subcontractors and suppliers, as well as the availability of raw materials, (10) changes in accounting estimates; (11) changes in the competitive landscape in our markets; (12) our non-U.S. operations, including sales to non-U.S. customers; (13) potential adverse developments in new or pending litigation and/or government investigations; (14) customer and aircraft concentration in Boeing Capitals customer financing portfolio; (15) changes in our ability to obtain debt on commercially reasonable terms and at competitive rates in order to fund our operations and contractual commitments; (16) realizing the anticipated benefits of mergers, acquisitions, joint ventures/strategic alliances or divestitures; (17) the adequacy of our insurance coverage to cover significant risk exposures; (18) potential business disruptions, including those related to physical security threats, information technology or cyber-attacks or natural disasters; (19) work stoppages or other labor disruptions; (20) significant changes in discount rates and actual investment return on pension assets; (21) potential environmental liabilities; and (22) threats to the security of our or our customers information.
Additional information concerning these and other factors can be found in our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including our most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q and Current Reports on Form 8-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which it is made, and we assume no obligation to update or revise any forward-looking statement, whether as a result of new information, future events, or otherwise, except as required by law.
# # #
Contact:
7
The Boeing Company and Subsidiaries
Consolidated Statements of Operations
(Unaudited)
8
The Boeing Company and Subsidiaries
Consolidated Statements of Financial Position
(Unaudited)
 
9
The Boeing Company and Subsidiaries
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows
(Unaudited)
10
The Boeing Company and Subsidiaries
Summary of Business Segment Data
(Unaudited)
11
The Boeing Company and Subsidiaries
Operating and Financial Data
(Unaudited)
 
 
12
The Boeing Company and Subsidiaries
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Measures
Core Operating Earnings, Core Operating Margin and Core Earnings Per Share
(Unaudited)
The tables provided below reconcile the non-GAAP financial measures core operating earnings, core operating margin and core earnings per share with the most directly comparable GAAP financial measures, earnings from operations, operating margin and diluted earnings per share. See page 6 of this release for additional information on the use of these non-GAAP financial measures.
13
The Boeing Company and Subsidiaries
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Measures
2013 Increase in Core Earnings Per Share
(Unaudited)
The tables provided below reconcile the non-GAAP financial measures core operating earnings, core operating margin and core earnings per share with the most directly comparable GAAP financial measures, earnings from operations, operating margin and diluted earnings per share. See page 6 of this release for additional information on the use of these non-GAAP financial measures.
14


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20130430171317.txt.gz
TIME:20130430171317
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported): April 29, 2013
Commission file number 1-442
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Item 5.07. Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders.
The Boeing Company (the Company) held its Annual Meeting of Shareholders on April 29, 2013. Set forth below are the final voting results for each of the proposals submitted to a vote of the shareholders.
SIGNATURE
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
THE BOEING COMPANY
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BA/BA-8K-20130503155457.txt.gz
TIME:20130503155457
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On May 3, 2013, The Boeing Company (the "Company") issued $150,000,000 in aggregate principal amount of Floating Rate Senior Notes due 2014 (the "2014 Notes") and $350,000,000 in aggregate principal amount of 0.950% Senior Notes due 2018 (the "2018 Notes" and, together with the 2014 Notes, the "Notes"). The Notes were issued pursuant to an Indenture dated as of February 1, 2003, between the Company and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as successor trustee to JPMorgan Chase Bank. The sale of the Notes was made pursuant to the terms of a Purchase Agreement (the "Purchase Agreement"), dated April 30, 2013, by and among the Company and, with respect to the 2014 Notes, Barclays Capital Inc., Deutsche Bank Securities Inc. and Morgan Stanley & Co. LLC, and, with respect to the 2018 Notes, Citigroup Global Markets Inc., Goldman, Sachs & Co., J.P. Morgan Securities LLC and Morgan Stanley & Co. LLC, as representatives of the purchasers named therein.
The Notes are unsecured and have the same rank as the Company's other unsecured and unsubordinated debt. The 2014 Notes will mature on November 3, 2014 and the 2018 Notes will mature on May 15, 2018. The 2014 Notes bear interest at a rate per annum, reset quarterly, equal to the three-month LIBOR for U.S. dollar deposits plus 0.01%, payable quarterly in arrears on February 3, May 3, August 3 and November 3 of each year, beginning on August 3, 2013. The 2018 Notes bear interest at the rate of 0.950% per annum, payable semiannually in arrears on May 15 and November 15 of each year, beginning on November 15, 2013. The 2014 Notes are not redeemable prior to maturity. The Company may redeem the 2018 Notes in whole or in part, upon at least 30 days notice, at any time prior to maturity at the redemption price described in the Final Prospectus Supplement filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC") on May 1, 2013 (the "Final Prospectus Supplement"). The Notes were registered under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, pursuant to the Company's Registration Statement on Form S-3 (Registration No. 333-179808) filed on February 29, 2012.
The Company has filed with the SEC a Prospectus dated February 29, 2012, a Preliminary Prospectus Supplement dated April 30, 2013, a Free Writing Prospectus dated April 30, 2013, and the Final Prospectus Supplement in connection with the public offering of the Notes.
The above description of the Purchase Agreement is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Purchase Agreement, a copy of which is filed as Exhibit 1.1 hereto and is incorporated herein by reference. Kirkland & Ellis LLP has issued an opinion, dated May 3, 2013, to the Company regarding certain legal matters with respect to the offering of the Notes, a copy of which is filed as Exhibit 5.1 hereto.
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: May 3, 2013
 

Exhibit 1.1
Execution Version
April 30, 2013
The Boeing Company
100 North Riverside
Chicago, Illinois 60606
Ladies and Gentlemen:
Referring to the Unsecured Debt Securities of The Boeing Company (the "Company") covered by the registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration No. 333-179808) (such registration statement, including (i) the prospectus included therein (the "Base Prospectus"), and (ii) all documents filed as part thereof or incorporated by reference therein including the information, if any, deemed pursuant to Rule 430A, 430B or 430C under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Securities Act") to be part of the registration statement at the time of its effectiveness, and at each deemed effective date with respect to the Purchasers (as defined below) pursuant to Rule 430B(f)(2) of the Securities Act, are hereinafter collectively called the "Registration Statement"). The Base Prospectus (i) as supplemented by the prospectus supplement dated April 30, 2013 specifically relating to the Purchased Notes (as defined below) in the form first filed under Rule 424(b) under the Securities Act (or in the form first made available to the Purchasers (as defined below) by the Company to meet the requests of purchasers pursuant to Rule 173 under the Securities Act) and (ii) all documents filed as part thereof or incorporated or deemed to be incorporated by reference therein are hereinafter collectively called the "Prospectus," and the preliminary form of the Prospectus is hereinafter called the "Preliminary Prospectus". For purposes of this Agreement, "free writing prospectus" has the meaning set forth in Rule 405 under the Securities Act and "Time of Sale Prospectus" means the Preliminary Prospectus together with each free writing prospectus, if any, identified in Schedule B hereto. "Time of Sale" means 3:20 p.m. (Eastern time) on the date of this Agreement. Any reference to "amend", "amendment" or "supplement" with respect to the Registration Statement, any Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus shall be deemed to refer to and include any documents filed after such date under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and the rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "Commission") thereunder (collectively, the "Exchange Act") that are deemed to be incorporated by reference therein.
 
On the basis of the representations, warranties and agreements contained in this Agreement, but subject to the terms and conditions herein set forth, the purchaser or purchasers named in Schedule A hereto (the "Purchasers") agree to purchase, severally and not jointly, and the Company agrees to sell to the Purchasers, severally and not jointly, the respective principal amounts of the Company's Floating Rate Senior Notes due 2014 (the "2014 Notes") and 0.950% Senior Notes due 2018 (the "2018 Notes" and, together with the 2014 Notes, the "Purchased Notes") set forth opposite the name of each Purchaser on Schedule A hereto. The Purchased Notes will have the terms as set forth in the Pricing Term Sheet on Schedule B hereto.
The price at which the Purchased Notes shall be purchased from the Company by the Purchasers shall be 99.850% of the principal amount of the 2014 Notes and 98.549% of the principal amount of the 2018 Notes, plus, in each case, accrued interest, if any, from May 3, 2013, to the date of delivery. The initial public offering price shall be 100.000% of the principal amount of the 2014 Notes and 98.899% of the principal amount of the 2018 Notes, plus, in each case, accrued interest, if any, from May 3, 2013 to the date of delivery. The Purchased Notes will be offered by the Purchasers as set forth in the Time of Sale Prospectus relating to the Purchased Notes.
The Company understands that the Purchasers intend to make a public offering of the Purchased Notes as soon after the effectiveness of this Agreement as in the judgment of the Purchasers is advisable, and initially to offer the Purchased Notes on the terms set forth in the Time of Sale Prospectus. The Company acknowledges and agrees that the Purchasers may offer and sell Purchased Notes to or through any affiliate of a Purchaser and that any such affiliate may offer and sell Purchased Notes purchased by it to or through any Purchaser.
If we are acting as Representative(s) for the several Purchasers named in Schedule A hereto, we represent that we are authorized to act for such several Purchasers in connection with the transactions contemplated in this Agreement, and that, if there are more than one of us, any action under this Agreement taken by any of us will be binding upon all the Purchasers.
All of the provisions contained in the document entitled "The Boeing Company Standard Purchase Provisions", a copy of which is attached hereto, are hereby incorporated by reference in their entirety and shall be deemed to be a part of this Agreement to the same extent as if such provisions had been set forth in full herein, except that references in Section 10 of "The Boeing Company Standard Purchase Provisions" with respect to this Agreement only, are references to the 2014 Notes and the 2018 Notes separately and Section 10 shall apply to each such series separately and not to all such series together.
In relation to each Member State of the European Economic Area which has implemented the Prospectus Directive, as defined below (each, a "Relevant Member State"), each Purchaser hereby represents and agrees, that with effect from and including the date on which the Prospectus Directive is implemented in that Relevant Member State (the "Relevant Implementation Date") it has not made and will not make an offer of the Purchased Notes to the public in that Relevant Member State, except that it may, with effect from and including the Relevant Implementation Date, make an offer of the Purchased Notes to the public in that Relevant Member State: (a) to any legal entity which is a qualified investor as defined in the
 
Prospectus Directive; (b) to fewer than 100 or, if the Relevant Member State has implemented the relevant provision of the 2010 PD Amending Directive (as defined below), 150 natural or legal persons (other than qualified investors as defined in the Prospectus Directive) subject to obtaining the prior consent of the Purchasers for any such offer; or (c) in any other circumstances falling within Article 3(2) of the Prospectus Directive, provided that no such offer of the Purchased Notes referred to in (a) to (c) above shall require the Company or any Purchaser to publish a prospectus pursuant to Article 3 of the Prospectus Directive or supplement a prospectus pursuant to Article 16 of the Prospectus Directive. For purposes of the foregoing, the expression an "offer of the Purchased Notes to the public" in relation to any Purchased Notes in any Relevant Member State means the communication in any form and by any means of sufficient information on the terms of the offer and the Purchased Notes to be offered so as to enable an investor to decide to purchase or subscribe for the Purchased Notes, as the same may be varied in that Relevant Member State by any measure implementing the Prospectus Directive in that Relevant Member State, the expression "Prospectus Directive" means Directive 2003/71/EC (and amendments thereto, including the 2010 PD Amending Directive, to the extent implemented in the Relevant Member State) and includes any relevant implementing measure in each Relevant Member State, and the expression "2010 PD Amending Directive" means Directive 2010/73/EU.
Each Purchaser hereby represents that, in connection with the distribution of the Purchased Notes, it has only communicated or caused to be communicated and will only communicate or cause to be communicated any invitation or inducement to engage in investment activity (within the meaning of Section 21 of the Financial Services and Markets Act 2000, as amended by the Financial Services and Markets Act 2012 ("FSMA") of the United Kingdom) received by it in connection with the issue or sale of the Purchased Notes or any investments representing the Purchased Notes in circumstances in which Section 21(1) of the FSMA would not apply to the Company and that it has complied and will comply with all applicable provisions of the FSMA with respect to anything done by it in relation to the Purchased Notes in, from or otherwise involving the United Kingdom.
Each Purchaser that is not a U.S. registered broker-dealer, represents that if it sells Purchased Notes in the United States it will do so through one or more U.S. registered broker-dealers as permitted by the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority regulations.
Each Purchaser hereby agrees that it will not offer, sell or deliver any of the Purchased Notes in any jurisdiction outside the United States except under circumstances that will result in compliance with the applicable laws thereof, and that it will take at its own expense whatever action is required to permit its resale of the Purchased Notes in such jurisdictions. Each Purchaser understands that no action has been taken to permit a public offering in any jurisdiction outside the United States where action would be required for such purpose. Each Purchaser agrees not to cause any advertisement of the Purchased Notes to be published in any newspaper or periodical or posted in any public place and not to issue any circular relating to the Purchased Notes, except in any such case with the prior express written consent of the Company and of the Purchasers, with respect to the 2014 Notes, and the Representatives acting on behalf of the Purchasers, with respect to the 2018 Notes, and then only at its own risk and expense.
 
The "Closing Date" shall be: May 3, 2013
The place to which the
Purchased Notes may be
checked, packaged and
delivered shall be:
Kirkland & Ellis LLP
601 Lexington Avenue
New York, New York 10022
Attention: Christian O. Nagler
Notices to the Purchasers shall be sent to the following address(es) or telecopier number(s):
Barclays Capital Inc.
745 Seventh Avenue
New York, New York 10019
Attention: Syndicate Registration
Facsimile: 646-834-8133
Citigroup Global Markets Inc.
388 Greenwich Street
New York, New York 10013
Attention: General Counsel
Facsimile: 212-816-7912
Deutsche Bank Securities Inc.
60 Wall Street
New York, New York 10005
Attention: Debt Capital Markets Syndicate
Facsimile: 212-469-4877
Goldman, Sachs & Co.
200 West Street
New York, New York 10282
Attention: Registration Department
Facsimile: 212-902-9316
J.P. Morgan Securities LLC
383 Madison Avenue
New York, New York 10179
Attention: High Grade Syndicate Desk
Facsimile: 212-834-6081
 
Morgan Stanley & Co. LLC
1585 Broadway, 29
th
Floor
New York, New York 10036
Attention: Investment Banking Division
Facsimile: 212-507-8999
With a copy to:
Shearman & Sterling LLP
599 Lexington Avenue
New York, New York 10022
Attention: Lisa L. Jacobs
 
If the foregoing is in accordance with your understanding of our agreement, kindly sign and return to us the enclosed duplicate hereof, whereupon it will become a binding agreement between the Company and the several Purchasers in accordance with its terms.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The foregoing Purchase
Agreement is hereby confirmed
as of the date first above
written
THE BOEING COMPANY
 
 
 
 
 
Filed Pursuant to Rule 433 under the Securities Act of 1933
Registration Statement No. 333-179808
Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, dated April 30, 2013
 
 
Notes:
 
The issuer has filed a registration statement (including a prospectus) with the SEC for the offering to which this communication relates. Before you invest, you should read the prospectus in that registration statement and other documents the issuer has filed with the SEC for more complete information about the issuer and this offering. You may get these documents for free by visiting EDGAR on the SEC Web site at www.sec.gov. Alternatively, the issuer, any underwriter or any dealer participating in the offering will arrange to send you the prospectus if you request it by calling Barclays Capital Inc. toll-free at 1-888-603-5847 or by emailing barclaysprospectus@broadridge.com, by calling Deutsche Bank Securities Inc. toll-free at 1-800-503-4611 or by calling Morgan Stanley & Co. LLC toll-free at 1-866-718-1649.
 
 
 
Notes:
 
The issuer has filed a registration statement (including a prospectus) with the SEC for the offering to which this communication relates. Before you invest, you should read the prospectus in that registration statement and other documents the issuer has filed with the SEC for more complete information about the issuer and this offering. You may get these documents for free by visiting EDGAR on the SEC Web site at www.sec.gov. Alternatively, the issuer, any underwriter or any dealer participating in the offering will arrange to send you the prospectus if you request it by calling Citigroup Global Markets Inc. toll-free at 1-800-831-9146, by calling Goldman, Sachs & Co. toll-free at 1-866-471-2526 or by emailing prospectus-ny@ny.email.gs.com, by calling J.P. Morgan Securities LLC at 1-212-834-4533 or by calling Morgan Stanley & Co. LLC toll-free at 1-866-718-1649.
 
EXECUTION COPY
From time to time, The Boeing Company, a Delaware corporation ("Company"), may enter into purchase agreements that provide for the sale of designated securities to the purchaser or purchasers named therein. The standard provisions set forth herein may be incorporated by reference in any such purchase agreement ("Purchase Agreement"). The Purchase Agreement, including the provisions incorporated therein by reference, is herein sometimes referred to as "this Agreement." Unless otherwise defined herein, terms defined in the Purchase Agreement are used herein as therein defined.
1. . The Company proposes to issue and sell from time to time its Unsecured Debt Securities ("Notes") registered under the registration statement referred to in Section 2(a). The Notes will be issued under an Indenture, dated as of February 1, 2003, between the Company and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as successor to JPMorgan Chase Bank, as Trustee, as may be supplemented from time to time, (the "Indenture"). The Notes will be sold to the Purchasers (as defined below) for resale in accordance with the terms of the offering determined at the time of the sale. The Notes involved in any such offering are hereinafter referred to as the "Purchased Notes," and the firm or firms, as the case may be, which agree to purchase the same are hereinafter referred to as the "Purchasers" of such Purchased Notes. The terms "you" and "your" refer to those Purchasers who sign the Purchase Agreement either on behalf of themselves only or on behalf of themselves and as representatives of the several Purchasers named in Schedule A thereto, as the case may be.
Introductory
2. . The Company represents and warrants to and agrees with each Purchaser that:
Representations and Warranties of the Company
(a) A Registration Statement (as defined in the Purchase Agreement) covering an indeterminate amount of the securities of the Company (including the Purchased Notes), including a prospectus has been filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission ("Commission") and has become effective under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Securities Act"); no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement is in effect, and no proceedings for such purpose are pending before or threatened by the Commission. The Company is a well known seasoned issuer (as defined in Rule 405 under the Securities Act) eligible to use the Registration Statement as an automatic shelf registration statement and the Company has not received notice that the Commission objects to the use of the Registration Statement as an automatic shelf registration statement. The terms Registration Statement, Time of Sale Prospectus and Prospectus shall have the meanings ascribed to them in the Purchase Agreement.
(b) The Company is not an "ineligible issuer" in connection with the offering pursuant to Rules 164, 405 and 433 under the Securities Act. Any free writing prospectus that the Company is required to file pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Securities Act has been, or will be, filed with the Commission in accordance with the requirements of the Securities Act and the applicable rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder (the "Securities Act Rules and Regulations"). Each free writing prospectus that the Company has filed, or is required to file, pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Securities Act or that was prepared by or on behalf of or used or referred to by the Company complies or will comply in all material respects with the requirements of the Securities Act and the applicable rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder. Except for the free writing prospectuses, if any, identified in Schedule B to the Purchase Agreement, the Company has not prepared, used or referred to, and will not, without your prior consent, prepare, use or refer to, any free writing prospectus. Each free writing prospectus that the Company has filed, as of its issue date and at all subsequent times through the completion of the public offer and sale
 
of the Purchased Notes or until any earlier date that the Company notifies the Purchasers as described in the next sentence, will not contain any information that conflicts with the information contained in the Registration Statement, including any document incorporated by reference therein, the Time of Sale Prospectus, the Prospectus and any prospectus supplement deemed to be a part thereof that has not been superseded or modified. If at any time following issuance of a free writing prospectus that the Company has filed there occurs an event or development as a result of which such free writing prospectus contained an untrue statement of a material fact or omits to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, the Company will promptly notify the Purchasers so that any use of such free writing prospectus may cease until it is amended or supplemented. The foregoing two sentences do not apply to statements or omissions in such document based upon written information furnished to the Company by any Purchaser specifically for use therein.
(c) The Registration Statement conforms in all respects to the requirements of the Securities Act and the Securities Act Rules and Regulations and does not include any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, except that the foregoing does not apply to statements or omissions in such document based upon written information furnished to the Company by any Purchaser specifically for use therein. At the Time of Sale, the Time of Sale Prospectus did not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, except that the foregoing does not apply to statements or omissions in such document based upon written information furnished to the Company by any Purchaser specifically for use therein. The Prospectus, as of its date, does not contain and, as amended or supplemented, if applicable, and as of the Closing Date, will not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, except that the foregoing does not apply to statements or omissions in such document based upon written information furnished to the Company by any Purchaser specifically for use therein. The documents incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus pursuant to Item 12 of Form S-3 of the Securities Act, at the time they were filed with the Commission, complied in all material respects with the requirements of the Exchange Act and the pertinent published rules and regulations thereunder (the "Exchange Act Rules and Regulations"). Any additional documents deemed to be incorporated by reference in the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus, will, when they are filed with the Commission, comply in all material respects with the requirements of the Exchange Act and the Exchange Act Rules and Regulations and will not contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
(d) The Company has been duly incorporated and is an existing corporation in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware, with power and corporate authority to own its properties and conduct its business as described in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus; and the Company is duly qualified to do business as a foreign corporation in good standing in all other jurisdictions in which its ownership or lease of property or the conduct of its business requires such qualification except where failure to so qualify would not individually or in the aggregate have a material adverse effect on the financial condition, business, properties or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole or on the Company's ability to perform its obligations under the Purchased Notes and the Indenture in any material respect (a "Material Adverse Effect").
 
(e) Each "significant subsidiary" (as such term is defined in Rule 1-02 of Regulation S-X) of the Company (each a "Material Subsidiary" and together the "Material Subsidiaries") has been duly incorporated and is an existing corporation or other entity in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its incorporation or organization, with power and authority to own its properties and conduct its business as described in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus; and each Material Subsidiary of the Company is duly qualified to do business as a foreign corporation or other entity in good standing in all other jurisdictions in which its ownership or lease of property or the conduct of its business requires such qualification except where failure to so qualify would not have a Material Adverse Effect; all of the issued and outstanding capital stock or ownership interests of each Material Subsidiary of the Company has been duly authorized and validly issued and is fully paid and nonassessable; and the capital stock or ownership interests of each Material Subsidiary owned by the Company, directly or through subsidiaries, is owned free from liens and encumbrances except for such liens or encumbrances that would not have a Material Adverse Effect.
(f) This Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company.
(g) The Indenture has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company and the Trustee and duly qualified under the Trust Indenture Act 1939, as amended (the "Trust Indenture Act"), and constitutes a valid and binding agreement of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with its terms, except as the enforcement thereof may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency (including, without limitation, all laws relating to fraudulent transfers), reorganization, moratorium or similar laws affecting enforcement of creditors' rights generally and except as enforcement thereof is subject to general principles of equity (regardless of whether enforcement is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law).
(h) The Purchased Notes have been duly authorized and, at the Closing Date (as defined in the Purchase Agreement), will have been duly executed by the Company and, when authenticated, issued and delivered in the manner provided for in the Indenture and delivered against payment of the purchase price therefor as provided in this Agreement, will constitute valid and binding obligations of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with their terms, except as the enforcement thereof may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency (including, without limitation, all laws relating to fraudulent transfers), reorganization, moratorium or similar laws affecting enforcement of creditors' rights generally and except as enforcement thereof is subject to general principles of equity (regardless of whether enforcement is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law), and will be in the form contemplated by, and entitled to the benefits of, the Indenture.
(i) The Purchased Notes and the Indenture will conform in all material respects to the respective statements relating thereto contained in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus and will be in substantially the respective forms filed or incorporated by reference, as the case may be, as exhibits to the Registration Statement.
(j) No consent, approval, authorization, or order of, or filing with, any governmental agency or body or any court is required for the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement in connection with the issuance and sale of the Purchased Notes by the Company, except such as have been obtained and made under the Securities Act and the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended, and such as may be required under state securities laws.
 
 
(k) The execution, delivery and performance of the Indenture and this Agreement, and the issuance and sale of the Purchased Notes and compliance with the terms and provisions thereof have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate action and do not and will not result in a breach or violation of any of the terms and provisions of, or constitute a default under, or result in the creation or imposition of any lien, charge or encumbrance upon any property, or assets of the Company or any Material Subsidiary under (i) any statute, any rule, regulation or order of any governmental agency or body or any court, domestic or foreign, having jurisdiction over the Company or any Material Subsidiary of the Company (provided however that enforcement of rights to indemnity and contribution in this Agreement may be limited by federal or state securities laws or principles of public policy), or any of their properties, (ii) any material agreement or instrument to which the Company or any such Material Subsidiary is a party or by which the Company or any such Material Subsidiary is bound or to which any of the properties of the Company or any such Material Subsidiary is subject, or (iii) the charter or by-laws of the Company or any such Material Subsidiary except in the case of (i) and (ii) where such breach or violation or default would not have a Material Adverse Effect.
(l) Except as disclosed in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus, the Company and its Material Subsidiaries have good and marketable title to all real properties and good title to all other properties and assets owned by them that are material to the business of the Company and its subsidiaries consolidated as a single enterprise, in each case free from liens, encumbrances and defects that would materially affect the value thereof or materially interfere with the use made or to be made thereof by them; and except as disclosed in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus, the Company and its Material Subsidiaries hold any leased real or personal property under valid and enforceable leases with such exceptions that are not material to the business of the Company and its subsidiaries consolidated as a single enterprise and that would not materially interfere with the use made or to be made thereof by them.
(m) Neither the Company nor any of its Material Subsidiaries is (i) in violation of its charter or bylaws or (ii) in default in the performance or observance of any obligation, agreement, covenant or condition contained in any contract, indenture, mortgage, loan agreement, note, lease or other instrument to which it is a party or by which it or any of them or their properties may be bound or to which any of their properties may be subject, except in the case of (ii) where such default would not have a Material Adverse Effect.
(n) Except as disclosed in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus, the Company and its Material Subsidiaries possess adequate certificates, authorities, licenses, permits, orders or approvals issued by appropriate governmental agencies or bodies necessary to conduct the business now operated by them, including, without limitation, from the Federal Aviation Administration, except where the failure to do so would not have a Material Adverse Effect, and have not received any notice of proceedings relating to the revocation or modification of any such certificate, authority or permit that, if determined adversely to the Company or any of its Material Subsidiaries, would have a Material Adverse Effect.
(o) Except as disclosed in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus, no strike, lockout, or work stoppage involving the employees of the Company or any Material Subsidiary exists or, to the knowledge of the Company, is imminent that might have a Material Adverse Effect.
 
(p) Except as disclosed in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus, neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries is in violation of any statute, any rule, regulation, decision or order of any governmental agency or body or any court, domestic or foreign, relating to the use, disposal or release of hazardous or toxic substances or relating to the protection or restoration of the environment or human exposure to hazardous or toxic substances (collectively, "environmental laws"), owns or operates any real property contaminated with any substance that is subject to any environmental laws, is liable for any off-site disposal or contamination pursuant to any environmental laws, or is subject to any claim relating to any environmental laws, which violation, contamination, liability or claim would individually or in the aggregate have a Material Adverse Effect; and the Company is not aware of any pending investigation which might lead to such a claim.
(q) Except as disclosed in the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus, there are no pending actions, suits or proceedings against or affecting the Company, any of its subsidiaries or any of their respective officers, in their capacity as such, or any of their respective properties that would, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, or would materially and adversely affect the ability of the Company to perform its obligations under the Indenture, this Agreement, or the Purchased Notes or which are otherwise material in the context of the sale of the Purchased Notes; and no such actions, suits or proceedings are, to the Company's knowledge, threatened or, contemplated.
(r) The financial statements included in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus present fairly in all material respects the financial position of the Company and its consolidated subsidiaries as of the dates shown and their results of operations and cash flows for the periods shown (subject, in the case of unaudited statements, to normal year-end audit adjustments), and such financial statements have been prepared in conformity with the generally accepted accounting principles in the United States applied on a consistent basis (except as otherwise noted therein) and the schedules included in the Registration Statement present fairly in all material respects the information required to be stated therein.
(s) Except as disclosed in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus, since the date of the latest audited financial statements included in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus there has been no material adverse change, nor any development or event reasonably likely to involve a prospective material adverse change, in the financial condition, business, properties or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole.
(t) The Company is not and, after giving effect to the offering and sale of the Purchased Notes and the application of the proceeds thereof as described in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus, will not be required to register under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended.
(u) To the Company's knowledge, after due inquiry, the accountants who certified the financial statements and supporting schedules included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus are an independent registered public accounting firm as required by the Securities Act and the Exchange Act.
(v) The capitalization of the Company has not materially changed since the date of the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus.
 
(w) Neither the Company nor any subsidiary has taken or will take, directly or indirectly, any action designed to, or that might be reasonably expected to, cause or result in stabilization or manipulation of the price of the Purchased Notes.
(x) The Company maintains a system of "disclosure controls and procedures" (as defined in Rule 13a-15(e) of the Exchange Act) that is designed to ensure that information required to be disclosed by the Company in reports that it files or submits under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the time periods specified in the Commission's rules and forms, including controls and procedures designed to ensure that such information is accumulated and communicated to the Company's management as appropriate to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure. The Company has carried out evaluations of the effectiveness of their disclosure controls and procedures as of December 31, 2008 as required by Rule 13a-15 of the Exchange Act.
(y) The Company maintains a system of "internal control over financial reporting" (as defined in Rule 13a-15(f) of the Exchange Act) that complies with the requirements of the Exchange Act and has been designed by, or under the supervision of, its principal executive and principal financial officers, or persons performing similar functions, to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, including, but not limited to policies and procedures that: (i) pertain to the maintenance of records that in reasonable detail accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of the Company; (ii) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the Company are being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the Company; and (iii) provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use or disposition of the Company's assets that could have a material effect on the financial statements. Except as disclosed in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus, there are no material weaknesses in the Company's internal controls.
(z) The interactive data in eXtensible Business Reporting Language included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement fairly presents the information called for in all material respects and has been prepared in accordance with the Commission's rules and guidelines applicable thereto.
Any certificate signed by any officer of the Company or any subsidiary and delivered to the Purchasers or to counsel for the Purchasers shall be deemed a representation and warranty by the Company and not the officer in its individual capacity to the Purchasers as to the matters covered thereby.
3. . The Company will deliver the Purchased Notes to you for the accounts of the Purchasers at the offices of the Trustee (at the place specified in the Purchase Agreement) against payment of the purchase price by wire transfer to an account specified by the Company or by certified or official bank check or checks in same day or New York or Chicago Clearing House funds drawn to the order of the Company, at the office of the Company, 100 North Riverside, Chicago, Illinois, 60606, at the time set forth in this Agreement or at such other time not later than seven full business days thereafter as you and the Company determine, such time being herein referred to as the "Closing Date." The Purchased Notes to be delivered will be in definitive fully registered form registered in such minimum denominations, of $2,000 and integral multiples of $1,000 thereof, and in such names as you request in writing not later than 3:00 p.m., New York Time, on the second full business day prior to the Closing Date, or, if no such request is received, in the names of the respective Purchasers in the amounts
Delivery and Payment
 
agreed to be purchased by them pursuant to this Agreement. The Company shall make the Purchased Notes available for checking and packaging at the offices of the Trustee (at the place specified in the Purchase Agreement) prior to the Closing Date and, unless prevented from doing so by circumstances beyond its control, not later than 2:00 p.m., New York Time, on the business day next preceding the Closing Date. If you request that any Purchased Notes be issued in a name or names other than that of the Purchaser agreeing to purchase such Purchased Notes hereunder, the Company shall not be obligated to pay any transfer taxes resulting therefrom. The Notes may also be represented by a permanent global Note or Notes, registered in the name of The Depository Trust Company, as depositary (the "Depositary"), or a nominee of the Depositary (each such Note represented by a permanent global Note being referred to herein as a "Book-Entry Note"). Beneficial interests in Book-Entry Notes will only be evidenced by, and transfers thereof will only be effected through, records maintained by the Depositary's participants.
4. . The several Purchasers propose to offer the Purchased Notes for sale to the public as set forth in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus.
Offering by the Purchasers
5. . The Company covenants and agrees with the several Purchasers that:
Covenants of the Company
(a) It will promptly cause the Preliminary Prospectus and the Prospectus to be filed with the Commission as required by Rule 424.
(b) It will furnish to each Purchaser a copy of each proposed free writing prospectus to be prepared by or on behalf of, used by, or referred to by the Company and not to use or refer to any proposed free writing prospectus to which the Purchasers reasonably object.
(c) It will not take any action that would result in a Purchaser or the Company being required to file with the Commission pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Securities Act a free writing prospectus prepared by or on behalf of a Purchaser that otherwise would not have been required to be filed thereunder.
(d) For as long as a prospectus relating to the Purchased Notes is required to be delivered under the Securities Act, if any event relating to or affecting the Company or of which the Company shall be advised in writing by the Purchasers shall occur which, which in the opinion of the Company or your counsel, should be set forth in a supplement or amendment to the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus in order either to make the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus comply with the requirements of the Securities Act or which would require the making of any change in the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus so that as thereafter delivered to purchasers such Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus will not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, the Company will promptly amend or supplement the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus by either (i) preparing and filing with the Commission supplement(s) or amendment(s) to the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus, or (ii) making an appropriate filing pursuant to the Exchange Act, which will supplement or amend the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus so that, as supplemented or amended, the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus when the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus is delivered to a purchaser will comply with the Securities Act and will not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to
 
make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. Prior to the Closing Date, the Company will not file any amendment or supplement without first providing the Purchasers with such amendment or supplement and having obtained the Purchasers' consent to the filing, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld.
(e) The Company will make generally available to its security holders as soon as practicable, but in any event not later than eighteen months after the effective date of the Registration Statement (as defined in Rule 158(c) under the Securities Act), an earnings statement of the Company and its subsidiaries (which need not be audited) complying with Section 11(a) of the Securities Act and the Securities Act Rules and Regulations (including at the option of the Company Rule 158).
(f) The Company will furnish to you copies of the following documents, in each case as soon as available after filing and in such quantities as you reasonably request (i) the Registration Statement relating to the Notes as originally filed and all post-effective amendments thereto (at least one of which will be signed and will include all exhibits except those incorporated by reference to previous filings with the Commission); (ii) each prospectus relating to the Purchased Notes; and (iii) during the time when a prospectus relating to the Purchased Notes is required to be delivered under the Securities Act, all post-effective amendments and supplements to the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus, respectively (except supplements relating to securities that are not Purchased Notes).
(g) During the period of one year after the Closing Date, the Company will furnish to you, and upon request, to each of the other Purchasers (unless such reports are available electronically on the Commission's website or the Company's website): (i) as soon as practicable after the end of each fiscal year, a copy of its annual report to shareholders for such year, and (ii) as soon as available, a copy of each report or definitive proxy statement of the Company filed with the Commission under the Exchange Act or mailed to shareholders.
(h) Whether or not any sale of the Purchased Notes is consummated, the Company will pay and bear all costs and expenses incident to the performance of its obligations under this Agreement, including (a) the preparation, printing and filing of the Registration Statement (including financial statements and exhibits) as originally filed and of each amendment thereto, (b) the preparation, and distribution of the Purchased Notes and the Indenture, (c) the delivery of the certificates for the Purchased Notes to the Purchasers, (d) the fees and disbursements of the Company's counsel and accountants, (e) the delivery to the Purchasers of copies of the Registration Statement as originally filed and the printing and delivery of each amendment thereto, of each preliminary prospectus and of the Prospectus and any amendments or supplements thereto, (f) any fees charged by rating agencies for rating the Purchased Notes, and (g) the fees and expenses of the Trustee and any paying agent (including reasonable fees and expenses of any counsel to such parties).
If this Agreement is terminated by the Purchasers in accordance with the provisions of Section 7, the Company shall reimburse the Purchasers for all of their reasonable out-of-pocket expenses, including the reasonable fees and disbursements of counsel for the Purchasers.
 
(i) The Company will not offer or sell any of its other debt securities which are substantially similar to the Purchased Notes prior to ten days after the Closing Date, without the consent of the Purchasers.
(j) The Company will prepare a final term sheet relating to the offering of the Purchased Notes, containing only information that describes the final terms of the Purchased Notes or the offering in a form consented to by the Purchasers, and to file such final term sheet within the period required by Rule 433(d)(5)(ii) under the Securities Act following the date the final terms have been established for the offering of the Purchased Notes.
(k) The Company will advise the Purchasers promptly, and confirm such advice in writing, (i) when any amendment to the Registration Statement has been filed or becomes effective prior to the Closing Date; (ii) when any supplement to the Prospectus or any amendment to the Prospectus or any free writing prospectus has been filed prior to the Closing Date; (iii) of any request by the Commission for any amendment to the Registration Statement or any amendment or supplement to the Prospectus or the receipt of any comments from the Commission relating to the Registration Statement or any other request by the Commission for any additional information prior to the Closing Date; (iv) of the issuance by the Commission of any order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or preventing or suspending the use of any Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus or the initiation or threatening of any proceeding for that purpose or pursuant to Section 8A of the Securities Act; (v) of the occurrence of any event during the period that a prospectus is required to be delivered as a result of which the Prospectus, the Time of Sale Prospectus or any free writing prospectus as then amended or supplemented would include any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances existing when the Prospectus, the Time of Sale Prospectus or any such free writing prospectus is delivered to a purchaser, not misleading; (vi) of the receipt by the Company of any notice of objection of the Commission to the use of the Registration Statement or any post-effective amendment thereto pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) under the Securities Act; and (vii) of the receipt by the Company of any notice with respect to any suspension of the qualification of the Purchased Notes for offer and sale in any jurisdiction or the initiation or threatening of any proceeding for such purpose; and the Company will use its reasonable best efforts to prevent the issuance of any such order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement, preventing or suspending the use of any Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus or suspending any such qualification of the Purchased Notes and, if any such order is issued, will obtain as soon as possible the withdrawal thereof.
(l) The Company will qualify the Purchased Notes for offering and sale under the applicable securities laws of such states and other jurisdictions as you may reasonably designate in consultation with the Company and to maintain such qualifications in effect for a period of not less than a year from the date of the Prospectus; , , that the Company shall not be obligated to file any general consent to service of process or to qualify as a foreign corporation or as a dealer in securities in any jurisdiction in which it is not so qualified or to subject itself to taxation in respect of doing business in any jurisdiction in which it is not otherwise so subject. The Company will file such statements and reports as may be required by the laws of each jurisdiction in which the Securities have been qualified as above provided. The Company will also supply you with such information as is necessary for the determination of the legality of the Purchased Notes for investment under the laws of such jurisdictions as you may request.
provided
however
 
(m) The Company will use its reasonable best efforts in cooperation with you to permit the Purchased Notes offered and sold in transactions by you to be eligible for clearance and settlement through The Depository Trust Company.
(n) The Company will apply the net proceeds received by it from the sale of the Purchased Notes in the manner specified in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus under the heading "Use of Proceeds."
6. . Each Purchaser severally covenants with the Company not to take any action that would result in the Company being required to file with the Commission under Rule 433(d) a free writing prospectus prepared by or on behalf of such Purchaser that otherwise would not be required to be filed by the Company thereunder, but the for the action of the Purchaser.
Covenants of the Purchasers
7. . The obligations of the several Purchasers to purchase and pay for the Purchased Notes will be subject to the accuracy of the representations and warranties on the part of the Company herein, to the accuracy of the statements of Company officers made pursuant to the provisions hereof, to the performance by the Company of its obligations hereunder and to the following additional conditions precedent:
Conditions of the Obligations of the Purchasers
(a) On the date of execution of the Purchase Agreement and on the Closing Date, you shall have received from Deloitte & Touche LLP, independent registered public accounting firm with respect to the Company within the meaning of the Securities Act and the Securities Act Rules and Regulations, a letter, dated such a date, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to you containing statements and information of the type customarily included in accountants' "comfort letters" to underwriters with respect to the financial statements and certain financial information contained or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus; provided that the letter delivered on the Closing Date shall use a "cut-off" date no more than three business days prior to the Closing Date.
(b) The Registration Statement shall remain effective and at the Closing Date, no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement shall have been issued, no proceedings for such purpose shall have been instituted or, to the knowledge of the Company or you, shall be contemplated by the Commission and the Company has not received a notice of objection to the use of the Registration Statement as an automatic shelf registration statement. The Prospectus and each issuer "free writing prospectus" shall have been timely filed with the Commission under the Securities Act, as required; and all requests by the Commission for additional information shall have been complied with to the reasonable satisfaction of the Purchasers.
(c) Subsequent to the date of this Agreement, there shall not have occurred (A) any change or any development involving a prospective change not contemplated by the Time of Sale Prospectus as of the date of this Agreement in or affecting particularly the business or properties of the Company which, in the judgment of a majority in interest of the Purchasers including you, materially impairs the investment quality of the Purchased Notes, and (B) (i) any downgrading in the rating of the Purchased Notes or any other debt securities or preferred stock of or guaranteed by the Company or any of its subsidiaries by any "nationally recognized statistical rating organization" (as defined for purposes of Rule 436(g) under the 1933 Act) or (ii) any public announcement that any such organization has under surveillance or review its rating of the Purchased Notes or any other debt securities or preferred stock of or guaranteed by the Company or any of its subsidiaries (other than an announcement with positive implications of a possible upgrading, and no implication of a possible downgrading, of such rating) or any announcement that the Company has been placed on negative outlook.
 
(d) You shall have received an opinion, dated the Closing Date, of a counsel for the Company, to the effect that:
(i) The Company has been duly incorporated or formed, and is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware;
(ii) The Indenture has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company and is a valid instrument, legally binding on the Company and enforceable in accordance with its terms, except as limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, or other laws affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights and by general principles of equity;
(iii) The issuance and sale of the Purchased Notes have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate action of the Company. The Purchased Notes (assuming that they have been duly authenticated by the Trustee or a duly designated Authentication Agent under the Indenture, which fact counsel need not verify by an inspection of the Purchased Notes) have been duly issued and constitute legal, valid, and binding obligations of the Company enforceable in accordance with their terms, and are entitled to the benefits provided by the Indenture except as such enforceability or entitlement may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, or other laws affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights and by general principles of equity;
(iv) The execution and delivery of the Purchase Agreement, the Indenture, and the Purchased Notes, the issuance and sale of the Purchased Notes to you in accordance with the Purchase Agreement do not (i) constitute a violation by the Company of any applicable provision of U.S federal laws or the laws of the State of New York (except that no opinion in this paragraph is being given as to compliance with any disclosure requirement or any prohibition against fraud or misrepresentation or as to whether performance of the indemnification or contribution provisions in the Purchase Agreement would be permitted);
(v) The Registration Statement is effective under the Securities Act and, (a) to the best of such counsel's knowledge, no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement has been issued, and no proceedings for such purpose have been instituted or are pending under the Securities Act; and (b) the Registration Statement (as of its effective date), the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus (as of the date of the Purchase Agreement and as of the Closing Date) and any amendments or supplements thereto, as of their respective dates, appeared to comply as to form in all material respects with the requirements of Form S-3 under the Securities Act and the Securities Act Rules and Regulations; provided that no opinion is expressed with respect to financial statements or other financial information contained in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus or incorporated therein or attached as an exhibit thereto or as to the Statement of Eligibility and Qualification on Form T-l of the Trustee under the Indenture.
(vi) The consummation of the transactions contemplated in this Agreement and the compliance by the Company with all the terms of the Indenture did not and will not result in a breach of any of the terms and provisions of, the Company's Charter or By-Laws or any indenture, mortgage or deed of trust or other agreement or instrument to which the Company is a party which is filed as an exhibit to the Company's most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K or any other periodic report filed by the Company subsequent to that date;
 
(vii) This Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company; and
(viii) The statements set forth in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus under the caption "Description of the Debt Securities," and on the cover page of the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus insofar as they purport to constitute a summary of the terms of the Indenture and the Purchased Notes, are accurate and fair summaries of the matters set forth therein. The statements in the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus under the caption "Material United States Federal Income Tax Considerations," insofar as such statements constitute summaries of legal matters referred to therein, correctly summarize in all material respects the legal matters referred to therein.
(ix) To such counsel's knowledge, there are no legal or governmental proceedings that are pending against the Company or any of its subsidiaries or to which any property of the Company or any of its subsidiaries is subject that has caused us to conclude that such proceeding is required by Item 103 of Regulation S-K to be described in the Registration Statement, Time of Sale Prospectus or Prospectus but is not so described.
(x) The Company is not and, after giving effect to the offering and sale of the Purchased Notes and the application of the proceeds thereof as described in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus, will not be an "investment company" or an entity "controlled" by an "investment company" within the meaning of the Investment Company Act.
(xi) The documents incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus or any further amendment or supplement thereto made by the Company prior to the Closing Date (other than the financial statements and related schedules therein, as to which such counsel need express no opinion), when they were filed with the Commission, complied as to form in all material respects with the requirements of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder.
(xii) The Indenture has been duly qualified under the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended.
In addition, such counsel shall state that such counsel has participated in conferences with officers, counsel and other representatives of the Company, representatives of the independent registered public accounting firm for the Company and representatives of the Purchasers at which the contents of the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus and related matters were discussed; and, although such counsel is not passing upon and does not assume responsibility for the accuracy, completeness or fairness of the statements contained in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus (except as to the matters referred to in their opinion rendered pursuant to subheading (viii) above), on the basis of the foregoing (relying as to matters of fact to a large extent upon the opinions of officers, counsel and other representatives of the Company), no facts have come to the attention of such counsel which lead such counsel to believe that (a) the Registration Statement, when it became effective and as of the date of this Agreement, contained any untrue statement of a
 
material fact or omitted to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, (b) the Time of Sale Information as of the Time of Sale and as of the date hereof, contained any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, or (c) the Prospectus as of its date and as of the date hereof, contained any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading (it being understood that such counsel need make no comment with respect to the financial statements and other financial data included in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus or Prospectus or incorporated therein or as to the Statement of Eligibility and Qualification on Form T-l of the Trustee under the Indenture).
(e) The Purchasers shall have received from counsel for the Purchasers, an opinion dated the Closing Date, with respect to the matters as the Purchasers shall reasonably request and the Company shall have furnished to such counsel such documents as they reasonably request for the purpose of enabling them to pass on such matters.
(f) You shall have received a certificate of the Chief Executive Officer, President or any Vice President of the Company and a principal financial or accounting officer of the Company, dated the Closing Date, in which such officers shall state, to the best of their knowledge after reasonable investigation, (i) the representations and warranties of the Company in this Agreement are true and correct in all material respects, (ii) the Company has complied with all agreements and satisfied all conditions on its part to be performed or satisfied at or prior to the Closing Date, (iii) no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement has been issued and no proceedings for such purpose have been instituted, are pending or, to the best knowledge of the Company, threatened by the Commission, and (iv) that, subsequent to the date of the most recent financial statements set forth or incorporated by reference in the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus, there has been no material adverse change, nor any development or event reasonably likely to involve a prospective material adverse change, in the financial condition, business, properties or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole, except as set forth or contemplated in the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus.
(g) The Company will furnish you with such conformed copies of such opinions, certificates, letters and documents as you reasonably request.
In case any such condition shall not have been satisfied, this Agreement may be terminated by you upon notice in writing or by telecopy to the Company without liability or obligation on the part of the Company or any Purchaser, except as set forth in Section 12 hereof.
8. . The obligations of the Company to sell and deliver the Purchased Notes are subject to the following condition precedent:
Conditions of the Obligations of the Company
Prior to the Closing Date, no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement shall have been issued and no proceedings for that purpose shall have been instituted or, to the knowledge of the Company or you, shall be contemplated by the Commission.
If any such condition shall not have been satisfied, then the Company shall be entitled, by notice in writing or by telecopy to you, to terminate this Agreement without any liability on the part of the Company or any Purchaser, except as set forth in Section 12 hereof.
 
9. .
Indemnification
(a) The Company will indemnify and hold harmless each Purchaser, its affiliates, as such term is defined in Rule 501(b) under the Securities Act (each, an "Affiliate"), each of its directors and officers and each person, if any, who controls any Purchaser within the meaning of the Securities Act or the Exchange Act against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities, joint or several, to which such Purchaser, Affiliate or such controlling person may become subject, under the Securities Act or otherwise, insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) arise out of or are based upon any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of any material fact contained in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus, the Prospectus or any issuer "free writing prospectus" (or any amendment or supplement thereto), or arise out of or are based upon the omission or alleged omission to state therein a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading; and will reimburse each Purchaser, Affiliate and each such controlling person for any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such Purchaser, Affiliate or such controlling person in connection with investigating or defending any such loss, claim, damage, liability or action; provided, however, that the Company will not be liable to such Purchaser, Affiliate or controlling person in any such case to the extent that any such loss, claim, damage or liability arises out of or is based upon an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission made in any such documents in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by such Purchaser specifically for use therein. This indemnity agreement will be in addition to any liability which the Company may otherwise have.
(b) Each Purchaser agrees, severally and not jointly, to indemnify and hold harmless the Company, each of its directors and officers and each person, if any, who controls the Company within the meaning of the Securities Act or the Exchange Act, against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities to which the Company or any such director, officer or controlling person may become subject, under the Securities Act, or otherwise, insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) arise out of or are based upon any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of any material fact contained in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus, the Prospectus or any issuer "free writing prospectus" as defined in Rule 433(h) under the Act, any Company information that the Company has filed, or is required to file, pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Act or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto) or arise out of or are based upon the omission or the alleged omission to state therein a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, in each case to the extent, but only to the extent, that such untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission was made in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by such Purchaser specifically for use therein; and will reimburse any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by the Company or any such director, officer or controlling person in connection with investigating or defending any such loss, claim, damage, liability or action as such expenses are incurred. This indemnity agreement will be in addition to any liability which such Purchaser may otherwise have.
(c) Promptly after receipt by an indemnified party under this Section of notice of the commencement of any action, such indemnified party will, if a claim in respect thereof is to be made against the indemnifying party under (a) and (b) above, notify the indemnifying party of the commencement thereof; but the omission so to notify the indemnifying party will not relieve it from any liability which it may have to any indemnified party otherwise than under this Section, except to the extent the indemnifying
 
party has been materially prejudiced by such omission. In case any such action is brought against any indemnified party, and it notifies the indemnifying party of the commencement thereof, the indemnifying party will be entitled to participate therein and, to the extent that it may wish, jointly with any other indemnifying party similarly notified, to assume the defense thereof, with counsel satisfactory to such indemnified party (who may, with the consent of the indemnified party, be counsel to the indemnifying party) and who shall not be counsel to any other indemnified party who may have interests conflicting with those of such indemnified party, and after notice from the indemnifying party to such indemnified party of its election so to assume the defense thereof, the indemnifying party will not be liable to such indemnified party under this Section for any legal or other expenses subsequently incurred by such indemnified party in connection with the defense thereof other than reasonable costs of investigation. The indemnifying party shall not be liable for any settlement of any proceeding effected without its written consent, but if settled with such consent or if there be a final judgment for the plaintiff, the indemnifying party agrees to indemnify each indemnified party from and against any loss or liability by reason of such settlement or judgment. Notwithstanding the foregoing sentence, if at any time an indemnified party shall have requested that an indemnifying party reimburse the indemnified party for fees and expenses of counsel as contemplated by this paragraph, the indemnifying party shall be liable for any settlement of any proceeding effected without its written consent if (i) such settlement is entered into more than 30 days after receipt by the indemnifying party of such request and (ii) the indemnifying party shall not have reimbursed the indemnified party in accordance with such request prior to the date of such settlement unless the request is being disputed in good faith. No indemnifying party shall, without the written consent of the indemnified party, effect any settlement of any pending or threatened proceeding in respect of which any indemnified party is or could have been a party and indemnification could have been sought hereunder by such indemnified party, unless such settlement (x) includes an unconditional release of such indemnified party, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to such indemnified party, from all liability on claims that are the subject matter of such proceeding and (y) does not include any statement as to or any admission of fault, culpability or a failure to act by or on behalf of any indemnified party.
(d) If recovery is not available under the foregoing indemnification provisions of this Section, for any reason other than as specified therein, the parties entitled to indemnification by the terms thereof shall be entitled to contribution to liabilities and expenses, except to the extent that contribution is not permitted under Section 11(f) of the Act. In determining the amount of contribution to which the respective parties are entitled, there shall be considered the relative benefits received by each party from the offering of the Purchased Notes (taking into account the portion of the proceeds of the offering realized by each), the parties' relative knowledge and access to information concerning the matter with respect to which the claim was asserted, the opportunity to correct and prevent any statement or omission, and any other equitable considerations appropriate under the circumstances. The relative benefits received by the Company on the one hand and the Purchasers on the other shall be deemed to be in the same respective proportions as the net proceeds (before deducting expenses) received by the Company from the sale of the Purchased Notes and the total underwriting discounts and commissions received by the Purchasers in connection therewith, in each case as set forth in the table on the cover of the Prospectus, bear to the aggregate offering price of the Purchased Notes. The Company and the Purchasers and such controlling persons agree that it would not be equitable if the amount of such contribution were determined by pro rata or per capita allocation (even if the Purchasers and such controlling persons were treated as one entity for such purpose). Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection (d), no Purchaser or controlling person shall be required to make contribution hereunder which in the aggregate exceeds the total public offering price of the Purchased Notes, purchased by the Purchaser under this
 
Agreement, less the aggregate amount of any damages which such Purchaser or such controlling person has otherwise been required to pay in respect of the same claim or any substantially similar claim. The Purchasers' obligations to contribute are several in proportion to their respective underwriting obligations and not joint.
10. . If any Purchaser or Purchasers default in their obligations to purchase Purchased Notes hereunder and the aggregate principal amount of Purchased Notes which such defaulting Purchaser or Purchasers agreed but failed to purchase is 10% of the principal amount of Purchased Notes or less, the non-defaulting Purchasers may make arrangements satisfactory to the Company for the purchase of such Purchased Notes by other persons, including any of the Purchasers, but if no such arrangements are made by the Closing Date the non-defaulting Purchasers shall be obligated severally, in proportion to their respective commitments hereunder, to purchase the Purchased Notes which such defaulting Purchasers agreed but failed to purchase. If any Purchaser or Purchasers so default and the aggregate principal amount of Purchased Notes with respect to which such default or defaults occur is more than the above percentage and arrangements reasonably satisfactory to you and the Company for the purchase of such Purchased Notes by other persons are not made within seventy-two hours after such default, this Agreement will terminate without liability on the part of any non-defaulting Purchaser or the Company, except as provided in Section 11. In the event that any Purchaser or Purchasers default in their obligation to purchase Purchased Notes hereunder, the Company may, by prompt written notice to the non-defaulting Purchasers, postpone the Closing Date for a period of not more than seven full business days in order to effect whatever changes may thereby be made necessary in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus or in any other documents, and the Company will promptly file any amendments to the Registration Statement or supplements to the Time of Sale Prospectus or the Prospectus which may thereby be made necessary. As used in this Agreement, the term "Purchaser" includes any person substituted for a Purchaser under this Section. Nothing herein will relieve a defaulting Purchaser from liability for its default.
Default of Purchasers
11. . This Agreement may be terminated, by notice to the Company, if after the execution and delivery of this Agreement and prior to the Closing Date (i) trading generally shall have been suspended or materially limited on the New York Stock Exchange; (ii) trading of any securities issued or guaranteed by the Company shall have been suspended on any exchange; (iii) a general moratorium on commercial banking activities shall have been declared by federal or New York State authorities or a material disruption in commercial banking or securities settlement clearance services in the United States; or (iv) there shall have occurred any outbreak or escalation of hostilities or any change in financial markets or any calamity or crisis, either within or outside the United States, that, in each case in the reasonable judgment of the Purchasers, is material and adverse and makes it impracticable or inadvisable to proceed with the offering, sale or delivery of the Purchased Notes on the terms and in the manner contemplated by this Agreement, the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus.
Termination
12. . The respective indemnities, agreements, representations, warranties, and other statements of the Company or its officers and of the several Purchasers set forth in or made pursuant to this Agreement will remain in full force and effect, regardless of any investigation, or statement as to the results thereof, made by or on behalf of any Purchaser or the Company or any of its officers or directors or any controlling person, and will survive delivery of and payment for the Purchased Notes. If this Agreement is terminated pursuant to Section 7, 8, 10 or 11 or if for any reason the purchase of the Purchased Notes by the Purchasers is not consummated, the Company shall remain responsible for the expenses to be paid or reimbursed by it pursuant to Section 5(h). In addition, in such event the respective obligations of the Company and the Purchasers pursuant to Section 9 shall remain in effect; provided, however, that each Purchaser will use its best efforts to promptly notify each other Purchaser and each dealer and prospective customer to whom such
Survival of Certain Representations and Obligations
 
Purchaser has delivered a Prospectus for the Purchased Notes by telephone or telegraph, confirmed by letter in either case, of such termination or failure to consummate, including in such notice instructions regarding the continued use of the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Prospectus, the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto.
13. . All communications hereunder will be in writing, and, if sent to the Purchasers will be delivered or telecopied and confirmed to the address furnished in writing for the purpose of such communications hereunder, or, if sent to the Company, will be delivered or telecopied and confirmed to it, attention of Treasurer at 100 North Riverside, Chicago, Illinois 60606, telecopier (312) 544-2399, with a copy to Corporate Secretary at the same address, telecopier (312) 544-2829.
Notices
14. . This Purchase Agreement will inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the parties hereto and their respective successors and the officers and directors and controlling persons referred to in Section 9, and no other person will have any right or obligation hereunder.
Successors
15. . This Agreement, together with any contemporaneous written agreements and any prior written agreements (to the extent not superseded by this Agreement) that relate to the offering of the Purchased Notes, represents the entire agreement between the Company and the Purchasers with respect to the preparation of the Time of Sale Prospectus and the Prospectus, the conduct of the offering, and the purchase and sale of the Purchased Notes.
Entire Agreement
(b) The Company acknowledges that in connection with the offering of the Purchased Notes: (i) the Purchasers have acted at arm's-length, are not agents of, and owe no fiduciary duties to, the Company or any other person, (ii) the Purchasers owe the Company only those duties and obligations set forth in this Agreement and prior written agreements to the extent not superseded by this Agreement), if any, and (iii) the Purchasers may have interests that differ from those of the Company. The Company waives to the full extent permitted by applicable law any claims it may have against the Purchasers arising from an alleged breach of fiduciary duty in connection with the offering of the Purchased Notes.
16. . This Purchase Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of New York without giving effect to any conflicts of law provisions that would apply the laws of another jurisdiction.
Construction
17. . This Agreement may be executed in one or more counterparts and it is not necessary that the signatures of all parties appear on the same counterpart, but such counterparts together shall constitute but one and the same agreement.
Counterparts
18. . No amendment or waiver of any provision of this Agreement, nor any consent or approval to any departure therefrom, shall in any event be effective unless the same shall be in writing and signed by the parties hereto.
Amendments or Waivers
 

Exhibit 5.1
The Boeing Company
100 North Riverside
Chicago, Illinois 60606-1596
Re: Registration Statement on Form S-3
Ladies and Gentlemen:
We are issuing this opinion letter in our capacity as legal counsel to The Boeing Company, a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), in connection with the issuance and sale by the Company of $150,000,000 aggregate principal amount of Floating Rate Senior Notes due 2014 (the "2014 Notes") and $350,000,000 aggregate principal amount of 0.950% Senior Notes due 2018 (together with the 2014 Notes, the "Notes") under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Securities Act").
In that connection, we have examined originals, or copies certified or otherwise identified to our satisfaction, of such documents, corporate records and other instruments as we have deemed necessary for the purposes of this opinion, including (i) the articles of incorporation and bylaws of the Company, (ii) the registration statement on Form S-3 (No. 333-179808) (as amended, the "Registration Statement") to which this letter is an exhibit, (iii) the indenture, dated February 1, 2003, between the Company and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as successor trustee to JPMorgan Chase Bank (the "Indenture"), and (iv) copies of the Notes.
For purposes of this opinion, we have assumed the authenticity of all documents submitted to us as originals, the conformity to the originals of all documents submitted to us as copies and the authenticity of the originals of all documents submitted to us as copies. We have also assumed the genuineness of the signatures of persons signing all documents in connection with which this opinion is rendered, the authority of such persons signing on behalf of the parties thereto, and the due authorization, execution and delivery of all documents by the parties thereto. As to any facts material to the opinions expressed herein that we have not independently established or verified, we have relied upon statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Our opinion expressed below is subject to the qualifications that we express no opinion as to the applicability of, compliance with, or effect of (i) any bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, fraudulent transfer, fraudulent conveyance, moratorium or other similar law
affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally, (ii) general principals of equity (regardless of whether enforcement is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law), and (iii) public policy considerations that may limit the rights of parties to obtain certain remedies.
Based upon and subject to the foregoing qualifications, assumptions and limitations and the further limitations set forth below, we are of the opinion that the Notes have been duly authorized and are binding obligations of the Company.
We hereby consent to the filing of this opinion as Exhibit 5.1 to the Registration Statement. We also consent to the reference to our firm under the heading "Legal Matters" in the Registration Statement. In giving this consent, we do not thereby admit that we are in the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of the rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Our advice on every legal issue addressed in this letter is based exclusively on the internal law of the State of New York and the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware.
This opinion is limited to the specific issues addressed herein, and no opinion may be inferred or implied beyond that expressly stated herein. This opinion speaks only as of the date hereof and we assume no obligation to revise or supplement this opinion.
We have also assumed that the execution and delivery of the Indenture and the Notes and the performance by the Company of its obligations thereunder do not and will not violate, conflict with or constitute a default under any agreement or instrument to which the Company is bound.
This opinion is furnished to you in connection with the filing of the Registration Statement and in accordance with the requirements of Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K promulgated under the Securities Act, and is not to be used, circulated, quoted or otherwise relied upon for any other purposes.
Yours very truly,
/s/ KIRKLAND & ELLIS LLP
KIRKLAND & ELLIS LLP
 


</DOCUMENT>
